All Contracts
User Terms And Conditions
Privacy Notice
TFH Developer Portal Terms
Cookie Policy
P2P Marketplace Terms and Conditions
DCP / Grants Terms / Non-US Persons
Aviso de Privacidad de Tools for Humanity – Argentina
TFH Orb App and Operating Partner Privacy Notice
TFH Operator User Terms and Conditions
Law Enforcement Requests
Test Data Collection Consent Form
Privacy Notice – Research and Development
‎العربية‎ (Arabic)
中文（繁體字） (Chinese (Traditional))
English (United States)
français (French)
Deutsch (German)
हिंदी (Hindi)
Bahasa Indonesia (Indonesian)
日本語 (Japanese)
한국어 (Korean)
Bahasa Melayu (Malay)
polski (Polish)
português (Portuguese)
português (Brasil) (Portuguese (Brazil))
español (Spanish)
español (Latinoamérica) (Spanish (Latin America))
Kiswahili (Swahili)
ไทย (Thai)
Tiếng Việt (Vietnamese)
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Tools
For Humanity User Terms and Conditions
Welcome to World App! These Terms between you and Tools for Humanity Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("TFH", “we” or “us”) govern your use of and access to our websites and applications, including World App and the Operator App (collectively, the “Apps”), and all of the associated functionality, content, and services we provide to you (collectively, the “Services” or “Our Services”) in relation to the World Network (“World Network”) and ecosystem.
Please read these Terms carefully before using or accessing the Services. By accessing or using any of the Services we provide, along with your explicit consent to these Terms, you expressly agree to be bound by these Terms and by our Privacy Notice, which is incorporated as a part of these Terms. Please note these especially important parts of these Terms:
You agree to resolve any disputes between you and TFH through binding arbitration rather than in court. If you reside in South Korea, you may choose to resolve the dispute in a competent local court instead. Please review Section 15 below for details.
Crypto products, including Digital Tokens, are largely unregulated and can be highly risky. There may be no regulatory recourse for any loss from such transactions.
Nothing in the Services constitutes an offer to sell, or the solicitation of an offer to buy, any securities or Digital Tokens. The Services do not constitute investment advice. Holding, buying, or selling any Digital Tokens (as defined in Section 2.1 below) may not be permitted where you live, and it is your responsibility to comply with all applicable law. Please consider whether buying, selling, using, or holding Digital Tokens is suitable for you in light of your financial circumstances and your understanding of Digital Tokens. The value Digital Tokens may change quickly and may lose all of their value.
In addition, Worldcoin tokens (“WLD”) are not intended to be available for use, purchase, or access by US persons, including US citizens, residents, or persons in the United States, or companies incorporated, located, or resident in the United States, or who have a registered agent in the United States. We do not make WLD available to such US persons. Furthermore, you agree that you will not sell, transfer or make available WLD to US persons. Further information on risks associated with WLD can be found here.
1. Scope
of the Terms
1.1 Privacy and Your Data
. When accessing the Apps, you may provide us with categories of personal information, such as your name or telephone number. If you provide information to establish your proof of personhood and to claim your WLD tokens, then you may provide special categories of sensitive personal data, such as your biometric information. Our Privacy Notice describes the data we collect from you and how we use it. Please do not use the Services if you do not want us to collect or use your data in the manner described in the Privacy Notice.
1.2 Eligibility.
Webpages describing our services might be accessible worldwide, but this does not mean all Services or service features are legal or available in your country. You may not use VPN or similar tools for the purpose of circumventing any restrictions. It is your responsibility to make sure that your use of our Services is legal where you use them. Our Services are not available in all languages. ourServices is legal where you use them. Our Services are not available in all languages. In order to use the Services, you must comply with these Terms and all applicable laws. You cannot use Our Services to conduct, promote, or help others to carry out any illegal or unlawful activity.
In addition, you must meet all of the following criteria:
You are 18 years of age or older; and
You are
not
located in, under the control of, a national, or resident of: Syria, the Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson and Zaporizhzhia regions of Ukraine, Russia, North Korea, Iran, Cuba, or any other country or region with whom the United States, the European Union, or any other country or jurisdiction has restricted the access of the Services;
You are not a “Specially Designated National” as declared by the U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”) or the sanctions lists of any other country, and your name is not on the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Denied Persons List or the banned persons lists of any other country.
If you do not meet all of these requirements, you are not allowed to access or use the Services, and, accordingly, we may restrict your ability to access or use the Services.
In addition, if you are established or situated in Germany or have your ordinary residence or registered office there, you are not allowed to access or use third-party services within the meaning of Section 2.5 or decentralized applications within the meaning of Section 2.8. These features are not available for you.
1.3 Availability
. Webpages describing the Services are accessible worldwide, but this does not mean all Services or service features are legal or available in your country. Access to certain Services (or certain Service features) in certain countries may be blocked by us or governments. You may not use VPN or similar tools for the purpose of circumventing any restrictions. Access to the Apps, and certain features within the Apps, may be unavailable or restricted, depending on your location.
It is your responsibility to make sure that your use of the Services is legal where you use them.
Services are not available in all languages.
1.4 Updates
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. If we do this, we will make the updated terms available on the Services and where required by applicable law we shall notify you prior to making any changes and where such changes might be especially material or disadvantageous for you, we shall provide additional prior notice if required by applicable law. You understand and agree that your continued use of the Services after we have made any such changes and where you have not specifically objected to the same constitutes your acceptance of the updated Terms. You can stop using the Services at any time if you do not agree to these Terms. Because the Services are evolving over time we may change or discontinue all or any part of the Services, at any time and without notice, at our sole discretion, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
1.5 Additional Terms.
Additional terms and conditions may apply to specific applications, content, features, or portions of the Services, and all such additional terms and conditions we provide to you will form part of these Terms.
2. Services
2.1 Non-Custodial Wallet.
World App includes an unhosted and non-custodial wallet for holding supported cryptocurrencies, digital currencies, or Digital Tokens (including WLD and collectively, “Digital Tokens”). You control the Digital Tokens held in your wallet. With World App, the private keys (which represent the password to access the Digital Tokens) are stored directly on your device. At any time, subject to having internet access and the congestion on the blockchain, you may withdraw your Digital Tokens by sending them to a different blockchain address. When holding your Digital Tokens in your wallet, we do not maintain control over your wallet, Digital Tokens, or private keys. Users are responsible for the risk of loss of their private keys and neither TFH nor World App is able to recover such keys.
As World App is a non-custodial wallet, you will be given a wallet address which specifies where your Digital Tokens are held on the corresponding blockchain. We have no ability to access your Digital Tokens.
2.2 Supported Digital Tokens.
World App supports certain ERC-20 tokens. We may add support for additional Digital Tokens in the future. World App displays supported Digital Tokens.
Be sure to check which tokens and networks are supported within World App before you deposit or withdraw your Digital Tokens. We are not able to recover your Digital Tokens if you send unsupported tokens or send Digital Tokens to the wrong wallet address.
You understand that sending non-supported Digital Tokens to a World App wallet address may mean you will entirely lose access to those Digital Tokens. We have no way of recovering Digital Tokens. Please be sure you are sending the correct Digital Tokens to the correct wallet address at all times. You may wish to test a transaction with a small amount of Digital Tokens.
2.3 Offerings and Access.
When you interact with your Digital Tokens - such as sending them to another wallet address or connecting to a distributed application - using the Services, you will be required to approve or “sign” the interaction via the devices you have identified during the onboarding process. The Apps fully rely upon your approvals from these devices to initiate interactions with the relevant blockchain. You understand that you are interacting directly with the relevant blockchain when you perform these interactions, and that we are not responsible for transmitting orders on your behalf.
2.4 Information
from
Third
Parties.
By using the Services you may have access to information pertaining to your Digital Tokens, such as, but not limited to, their current market value. The presentation of this information does not imply any association with or endorsement of third parties, even if certain functionalities provided in connection with the Services require the use of such third-party products. The content of such third-party services and products as stated via the Services is based on information made publicly available or by such third parties to us, and we therefore make no representations or warranties on the accuracy of such third-party service or product related information.
2.5 Third-Party
Services
Users established or situated in Germany or having their ordinary residence or registered office there are not able to use Third-Party
Services
to
sell
or
exchange
their
Digital
Tokens
under
this
Section.
Where available, the Services may provide you with links to third-party processors to process transactions such as fiat purchases of Digital Tokens, sale of Digital Tokens, exchange of Digital Tokens, and other functionalities which may be available in the future. You can see what third-party services are available within World App. When you perform these transactions, you are making transactions with third parties and not us. You must follow the relevant instructions provided by the third-party provider and accept their terms of service. We do not take control of or transmit your funds or Digital Tokens at any time while providing our Services, or when you access third-party services.
2.6 Peer-to-Peer Transactions.
The Services provide a communications platform through which you may send to, or request, receive, and store supported Digital Tokens from, other blockchain wallets, whether controlled by you or third parties. Your transfer of supported Digital Tokens between your other blockchain wallets and to and from third parties is a transfer. The party initiating the transfer is solely responsible for executing the transaction properly, which may include, among other things, payment of sufficient network or miner’s fees in order for the transaction to be successful. Insufficient network fees may cause a transfer to remain in a pending state and may result in delays or loss incurred as a result of an error in the initiation of the transaction. We have no obligation to assist in the remediation of such transactions. When you send any Digital Token from your wallet to another blockchain wallet, such transfers are executed on chain by you and not under our control. You should verify all transaction information prior to submitting them. We bear no liability or responsibility in the event you enter an incorrect blockchain destination address. Digital Token transfers cannot be reversed once they have been broadcast to the relevant blockchain network, although they may be in a pending state, and designated accordingly, while the transaction is processed by network operators. We do not control the network and make no guarantees that a transfer will be confirmed by the network.
2.7 Vault
2.7.1 General information.
World App provides the user interface to a decentralized “vault” for your Digital Tokens (“Vault”). Your use of the Vault constitutes your acknowledgment and acceptance of the terms governing the Vault, as well as any additional terms provided by third parties that have developed or provide features relating to or arising out of your use of the Vault.
Vault only supports certain Digital Tokens. These Digital Tokens do not qualify as Asset Referenced Tokens or E-Money Tokens, in the terms set by Regulation (EU) 2023/1114 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 31 May 2023 on markets in crypto-assets. The supported Digital Tokens will be displayed in World App when accessing your Vault. The Digital Tokens supported by the Vault may change from time to time, and there is no guarantee that supported Digital Tokens will remain available for use in the Vault.
Vault is provided in connection with third-party smart contracts. No other person or entity, besides you, has the ability to interact with your Vault or the Digital Tokens inside your Vault. Neither TFH nor any third-party has administrative keys or access (privileged or otherwise) to your Vault or the associated smart contracts. A deposit into, or withdrawal from, the Vault of any Digital Tokens for your account can only occur if such a transaction is signed with your corresponding private key(s) described in Section 2.1 of these Terms. This means that if you lose access to or control of your private key(s), you will not be able to make any deposits or withdrawals of Digital Tokens from the Vault and no other party will be able to assist you or do so on your behalf. Accordingly, use of the Vault does not, and cannot, provide to you any custody, bailment, or transfer services by TFH or any other third party with respect to any Digital Tokens you may lock up using the Vault on your account.
The smart contract governing the Vault functions for WLD tokens can be viewed using the blockchain here. For clarity, use of these and any other related Vault functions are subject to the same Disclaimer of Warranties contained in Section 12 of these Terms.
2.7.2 Vault Functions
. Vault currently offers the following features, which may be altered, removed, or added to by TFH or third parties: Locking, Yield, Withdrawal and Security Period, Grants to Vault.
2.7.3 Locking
. By using Vault, you agree to lock your Digital Tokens for a set period of time. Locking Digital Tokens using your Vault will transfer those Digital Tokens from your non-custodial wallet to a decentralized smart contract. Upon transfer, these Digital Tokens will become “locked” in the vault, which includes the period during which they remain deposited in the Vault as well as a pre-determined duration called a “Security Period,” which is described in more detail below. While your Digital Tokens are locked, you will not be able to access, transfer, or perform any other transaction using them until you have requested to withdraw them and allowed the applicable Security Period to elapse. No one, including TFH or the third party Provider, has the ability to unlock, custody, control, withdraw or transfer your locked Digital Tokens. Placing your Digital Tokens into the Vault and subjecting them to the locking and withdrawal restrictions does not constitute a sale, loan, or transfer of any rights, title, or interest in the Digital Tokens to TFH or any other third party.
Locking your Digital Tokens in Vault does not guarantee the safekeeping or custody of your Digital Tokens. No deposit insurance scheme, or any similar safeguard, applies to your Digital Tokens, and the value and/or utility of any Digital Tokens you have locked up may increase or decrease throughout the duration of the Security Period. This means the value or utility of any Digital Tokens you lock up in your Vault may decrease, or go to zero during the Security Period. You acknowledge and agree that any withdrawal of Digital Tokens on your account after the applicable Security Period may result in the return of Digital Tokens that have a lower value, or no value, than they had at the time you locked them in your Vault, and that TFH nor any third party bears the risk or responsibility of any diminution in value that may occur.
2.7.4 Yield.
You may also be eligible to generate what, for purposes of this product, is referred to as “yield” on certain Digital Tokens in your Vault. This yield, which may take the form of additional Digital Tokens, is provided by a third party via a separate series of smart contract operations that you may access using the interface provided within World App. Neither TFH nor any third party uses, assumes control of, receives any credit for, or otherwise disposes of your Digital Tokens. As such, yield is not interest that is tied to or generated by anything other than the locking up of your Digital Tokens according to the terms and specifications provided. Any yield you may receive is provided to you as a grant by the third party based on your decisions to store Digital Tokens using the Vault. The specifications determining the generation of yield, including the amount generated or the time over which it may accrue, may be changed or canceled at any time, at the discretion of the third party Provider.
There may be a maximum amount of yield you can earn. These details will be displayed alongside your Vault and via any additional terms provided by the third party (identified as the “Provider” within the World App) providing the yield. These additional terms are also incorporated into these Terms. Yield is not provided or serviced by TFH.
Any yield that accrues will only be distributed to you upon the completion of withdrawal for any yield-generating Digital Tokens from the Vault, which occurs only after any applicable Security Period expires. This withdrawal is the final condition of any yield grant, meaning you have no right, title, or interest in any yield that has generated or will be generated unless and until such time as the yield has been received in your non-custodial wallet. This also means that if you lose access to or control of your private key(s), you will not be able to make any withdrawals that will entitle you to receive yield.
2.7.5 Withdrawal and Security Period.
You may initiate a withdrawal of your Digital Tokens from your Vault at any time. The Digital Tokens you have requested to withdraw from your Vault will be returned to you after a pre-set duration of time called the “Security Period” has elapsed. Each time you initiate a withdrawal of Digital Tokens from the Vault, a new Security Period will start and count down the time until those Digital Tokens will be returned to you. During this time, the Digital Tokens you have selected to withdraw will remain locked, and you may also cancel your withdrawal. Once the Security Period has elapsed, your withdrawal will be complete and the Digital Tokens, along with any generated yield that may have accrued, will be sent to your wallet. The duration of the Security Period will be stated within World App when you access your Vault.
2.7.6 Grants to Vault.
This feature, once selected, allows you to automatically send WLD Grants directly to the Vault on your account instead of to your wallet. You can change this setting at any time.
2.7.7 TFH and Vault.
The access to this feature is made via World App. However, TFH will only be able to read related data and display it to you. TFH cannot transfer, withdraw or deposit any of your Digital Tokens and does not have any access to your Vault.
2.8 Decentralized
Applications
This
section
does
not
apply
to
users
established
or
situated
in
Germany
or
having
their
ordinary
residence
or
registered
office
there:
Where available,
we may have functionality enabling you to connect your wallet to various decentralized applications. You are solely responsible for ensuring the safety and security of these third-party applications. We have no control over third-party applications and cannot provide support for any problems you may encounter when connecting with third-party applications.
2.9 User Support.
We provide user support for assistance with certain features and functions in connection with the Services. To get in touch, select “Support” from the in-app menu or via
support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 World ID interface.
The World Foundation, and not TFH, stewards the World ID Protocol and controls the Orb related data processing to verify a World ID. We may make your World ID available to you (as an interface) through the Service. The World ID Protocol allows you to prove you are a real and unique human being while protecting your privacy.
2.11 Invite Program.
Where available, we may make the ‘Invite’ feature available to you. Using Invite, you can invite friends and family to download World App and get verified for World ID. If you are using Invite you agree to the following terms and conditions:
Rewards for participating in Invite are provided by World Assets Limited. World Assets Limited may, in its sole discretion, offer you a reward for inviting users that successfully verify their World ID. In order to receive the reward, you must meet certain conditions, which will be explained to you in World App. You have a maximum limit of how many users you can refer to World App. This limit is displayed in World App.
No purchase is necessary to participate in the Invite feature. Invite is only available for personal, non-commercial use. You may only use the Invite feature in good faith for lawful purposes. You may not: (a) use Invite or the Services in a deceptive, fraudulent or unlawful manner; (b) do anything to damage our brand, goodwill or reputation; (c) transmit unsolicited or unauthorized advertising or promotional material; (d) make false or misleading claims; (e) use paid search, paid media or other similar activity to solicit users via Invite; and (f) use Invite to try to obtain personal information from other users.
Invite is not available in all countries or locations and is not available to all users. Participation in Invite is not available in any jurisdiction where all or any portion of this feature may violate (or cause us to violate) any legal requirements. You agree not to use Invite if the Invite feature is not in accordance with applicable law in your location.
Invite is made available at our sole discretion. We may change, modify, suspend and cancel the feature at any time. World Assets Limited may refuse to offer you a reward for inviting users to verify their World ID where it determines, in its sole discretion, that you have violated these Terms.
2.12 WLD Grants & Reservations.
One of the Third Party services is claiming a small amount of WLD at different intervals (“WLD Grants”). WLD Grants are provided by World Assets Limited, a subsidiary of the Worldcoin Foundation. Exact amounts, intervals, and timings of both WLD Grants will be specified in World App, but are determined solely by World Assets Limited. Consistent with prior versions of these terms, the previously available WLD Reservations do not guarantee that you will receive any amount of WLD Grants. Exact amounts, intervals, and timings of WLD Reservations will be specified in World App, but are determined solely by World Assets Limited. WLD Reservations may expire, with or without prior notice in World App, regardless of whether you have already made a WLD Reservation or received the associated WLD Grant. They are revocable at the sole discretion of World Assets Limited.
2.13 Operator App.
For Orb Operators and other partners, we make available an Operator App that allows you to monitor certain activity and statistics relevant to you and your business as Orb Operators. We may also make certain features available to help you conduct your business as Orb Operators.
2.14 Miniapps
. “Miniapps” is a feature of World App that allows you to access a platform of mini applications that can be accessed within World App. We have sole discretion of determining how Miniapps are displayed within World App. You must have a World App wallet address to access Miniapps.
You acknowledge that in displaying Miniapps, TFH is providing a technology platform only connecting users. At no time does TFH transmit, store, take possession of, custody, or otherwise engage with any traditional or digital currency. TFH does not process transactions, act as a payment processor, or otherwise become involved in processing transactions. TFH is not a party to the transactions and has no liability in regards to these transactions. TFH is unable to provide support in regards to transaction problems.
2.14.1 Transactions and Payments related to Miniapps.
Miniapps are displayed within World App and may offer goods or services World App users may buy using Digital Tokens in their World App wallets. These transactions occur between you and the miniapp. TFH is not party to any such transaction.
With respect to any such transactions, you acknowledge that World App wallet is a non-custodial service, that TFH does not store or custody your Digital Tokens and does not transact, transmit, take possession of, or otherwise have any involvement with making any transactions. Digital Tokens are always stored and transmitted on their respective blockchain networks. There are no guarantees the transactions will process correctly.
TFH only connects you to a third-party in the Miniapps platform and is not a party to any transactions. TFH has no role in processing payments and governing refund or cancellation charges.
Once you decide to engage in a transaction, you must send the agreed amount and type of Digital Tokens. TFH does not process user’s Digital Tokens or traditional currency and does not perform any transfers on behalf of users. TFH does not handle, manage, oversee, verify or provide any sort of warranty over any transactions. In the event where the transaction is not received, reversed, improperly processed, or otherwise encountered an error, you and the third-party providers must work together to resolve any issue. Any disputes, claims, losses, misunderstandings, technical errors, or issues of any kind (both accidental and allegedly intentional) related to payments or transactions must be dealt directly between you and the third-party provider. TFH bears no responsibility whatsoever and will not be a party to any payment-related disputes or discussions, nor is it liable for any losses or damages the parties involved may incur.
You are solely responsible for accepting the risk of any price fluctuations regarding the value of Digital Tokens, and understand that by the time you complete a transaction, the value of the Digital Tokens involved in the transaction may have changed significantly.
2.14.2 Third-Party.
Products and services displayed in any miniapp are offered and managed by third-parties. By using Miniapps, you acknowledge and agree that:
These Terms are between you and us, and not with any specific miniapp;
You are accessing an app developed and/or provided by a third-party app, which party is solely responsible for the miniapp;
TFH only provides access to third-party payment providers via World App wallet, and does not itself process payments or hold funds;
The miniapps may have additional terms as a part of their products or services with which you must comply if you are accepting their service; and
You fully acknowledge and explicitly assume any and all risks related to the transactions, and agree that we shall not be liable for any risks or adverse consequences arising from such transactions.
The individual Developers of the miniapps available at Miniapps are solely responsible for the content, products, goods, or services made available to you directly via their respective miniapps. For any queries or disputes you shall contact the respective Developer directly.
Users accept all risks related to making a transaction, including the risk that they will not receive the proceeds of their purchase or sale. In the event of a problem in regards to any transaction, TFH is not able to assist with a resolution, nor holds any liability for problems arising from any transactions.
2.14.3 TFH Fees.
We may add a fee for using Miniapps when you make a transaction with a Developer. The amount of this fee will be displayed to you within the platform. Any such fees will be displayed and current as reflected in Miniapps and may be updated and changed from time to time.
2.14.4 Taxes.
It is your sole responsibility to determine whether, and to what extent, any taxes apply to any transaction via Miniapps or any transactions you make therein, and to withhold, collect, report and remit the correct amount of tax to the appropriate tax authorities.
2.14.5 No general monitoring.
TFH will have no general obligation to monitor the information generated by users, nor actively to seek facts or circumstances indicating any illegal activity within Miniapps.
However, if we become aware, irrespective of the means used, that an illegal product or service has been offered via Miniapps to users located in the European Union, we shall inform the users that have purchased the illegal product or service through Miniapps.
2.14.6 Prohibited Activities.
Users of Miniapps Services agree not to post or distribute any content that violates any laws or infringes any third-party rights, including but not limited to any intellectual property rights, privacy rights, or rights of publicity.
Also, you agree to not engage in any activities that:
Are unlawful, fraudulent, or harmful;
Interfere with or disrupt the operation of Miniapps;
Violate any terms set forth in our App Guidelines; and
Include content not permitted under the App Guidelines.
2.14.7 Flagging of illegal content.
World App has easy to access and user-friendly mechanisms for users to notify us of illegal content in the Miniapps platform. We will act expeditiously to review such reports.
2.14.8 Removal of illegal content.
If we determine that any miniapp contains illegal content or offers illegal products or services, it shall be removed from Miniapps. TFH will provide a brief, clear and specific statement of reasons to any poster of illegal content or services.
Any restriction enforced by World App to its users will be done diligently, objectively and proportionately.
Users who believe their content has been removed or access to it has been disabled unjustifiably can contact us via
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
to appeal the decision. We provide a free, electronic complaint system enabling users to challenge our decisions related to content removal, service suspension, account termination, or monetization restrictions due to alleged illegal content or terms violations.
2.14.9 Content moderation.
TFH reserves the right to suspend, for a reasonable period of time and after having issued a prior warning where legally required to do so, the provision of our services to users that frequently provide manifestly illegal content. TFH also may temporarily suspend processing of notices and complaints from users frequently submitting unfounded claims.
2.15 Usernames
. Your World App username does not have to be your real name. When choosing a username you are obligated to abide by the Username Policy
in its most recent version.
3. Purchases,
Fees,
and
Taxes
3.1 Transaction Fees.
By using the Services, you agree to pay all applicable fees, including transaction fees for Digital Token swaps and transactions. We will let you know of any applicable fee before you make a transaction. If you use a third party payment service, bank fees, credit card and debit card fees charged for any Digital Token purchases may be netted out of the settled amount of your Digital Token purchases. You are also responsible for paying any additional fees charged by your financial service provider.
3.2 Network Fee.
Interactions with the blockchain also incur a network fee. The network fee is charged by and paid to the blockchain network, not to us, for facilitating any interactions. In some cases you may be eligible to a limited number of gas-free transactions within a given time period determined in full discretion by TFH. Such transactions are subject to a minimum transaction value that TFH may adjust.
3.3 Taxes.
It is your sole responsibility to determine whether, and to what extent, any taxes apply to any transaction via the Services, and to withhold, collect, report and remit the correct amount of tax to the appropriate tax authorities.
3.4 Updates.
All fees are displayed and current as reflected in the Services and may be updated and changed from time to time.
4. Risk
Factors
4.1 Not Legal Tender.
Digital Tokens are not legal tender, are not backed by any government, and Digital Token accounts and value balances on the Services are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Securities Investor Protection Corporation
[2]
protections, or similar protections found in other countries. We are not a bank and do not offer fiduciary services. Transactions made over World App are largely unregulated in many countries. We make no guarantee as to the functionality of the blockchains we support, which could, among other things, lead to delays, conflicts of interest, or operational decisions by third parties that are unfavorable to certain owners of Digital Tokens, or lead to your inability to complete a transaction using the Services. The transaction details you submit via the Services may not be completed, or may be substantially delayed on the applicable blockchain, and we take no responsibility for the failure of a transaction to be confirmed or processed as expected. There are no warranties or guarantees that a transfer initiated via the Services will successfully transfer title or right in any Digital Token. In addition, there may be risks specific to the use of certain Digital Tokens, such as WLD. Further information on risks specific to WLD can be found here.
4.2 New Technology.
The Services are new. While this software has been extensively tested, the software used for the Services is still relatively new and could have bugs or security vulnerabilities. Further, the software is still under development and may undergo significant changes over time that may not meet users’ expectations.
4.3 Information Security Risk.
Digital Tokens and use of the Services may be subject to expropriation or theft. Hackers or other malicious groups or organizations may attempt to interfere with the Services in a variety of ways, including, but not limited to, malware attacks, denial of service attacks, consensus-based attacks, Sybil attacks, smurfing and spoofing. Furthermore, because the blockchain networks we support, such as the Ethereum protocol, rest on open source software, the software underlying the Services may contain intentional or unintentional bugs or weaknesses which may negatively affect the Services or result in the loss of user’s Digital Tokens or the loss of user’s ability to access or control her wallet via the Services. In the event of such a software bug or weakness, there may be no remedy and users are not guaranteed any remedy, refund or compensation.
4.4 Accuracy.
Although we intend to provide accurate and timely information provided through the Services (including, without limitation, the content) may not always be entirely accurate, complete or current and may also include technical inaccuracies or typographical errors. In an effort to continue to provide you with as complete and accurate information as possible, information may, to the extent permitted by applicable law, be changed or updated from time to time without notice, including without limitation information regarding our policies, products and services. Accordingly, you should verify all information before relying on it, and all decisions based on information provided through the Services are your sole responsibility and we shall have no liability for such decisions.
4.5 Availability.
Although we strive to provide you with excellent service, we do not guarantee that the Services will be available without interruption. The Services may be temporarily unavailable from time to time for maintenance or other reasons. We assume no responsibility for any error, omission, interruption, deletion, defect, delay in operation or transmission, communications line failure, theft or destruction or unauthorized access to, or alteration of, user communications. We are not responsible for any problems or technical malfunction of any telephone network or lines, computer online systems, servers or providers, computer equipment, software, failure of email or players on account of technical problems or traffic congestion on the Internet or on the Services or combination thereof, including injury or damage to users or to any other person's computer related to or resulting from participating or downloading materials in connection with the Services. We are not responsible for any loss or damage, financial damages or lost profits, loss of business, or personal injury or death, resulting from anyone's use of the Service, any Content posted on or through the Service or transmitted to users, or any interactions between users of the Services, whether online or offline.
4.6 Forks.
The software used to create WLD is open-source and free for anyone to copy and use. This means that anyone can create a modified version of WLD, otherwise known as a “Fork.” In the event of a Fork or any other disruption of a Digital Tokens network, we may not be able to support any activity related to the Fork. Transactions may not be completed, completed partially, incorrectly completed, or substantially delayed when a Fork occurs. We are not responsible for any losses you incur which are caused in whole or in part by a Fork or other network disruption.
4.7 Third Party Services.
Where available (see in particular Section 2.5), we rely upon third party service providers to provide some features and functionality within the Apps, for instance the ability to purchase Digital Tokens with fiat currency, or the ability to swap one Digital Asset for another. We do not provide these services, and we are not party to any such transaction. You are solely relying upon third party providers for these services, and you must have an account with the third-party providers and agree to their terms. We are unable to assist you if you encounter problems using their service, and we are not responsible for any transactions you make using third party providers.
5. Intellectual
Property.
5.1 Ownership.
Our software, the application, the Services, the Content, the Marks (as defined below) and the design, selection, and arrangement of the Content in the Services (the “IP”) are protected by copyright, trademark, patent, and other intellectual property rights and laws of the United States and other applicable countries. You agree to abide by all applicable intellectual property rights and laws, as well as any trademark or copyright notices or restrictions contained in the Agreement or the Services. You may not remove any copyright, trademark, or proprietary notices contained in the IP.
5.2 Trademarks.
The Tools for Humanity Corporation name, the World App logo and all related logos, and slogans are trademarks or service marks of the Tools for Humanity Corporation or its licensors (the “Marks”). You may not copy, imitate, or use the Marks, in whole or in part, without our written permission. All other trademarks, names, or logos mentioned in connection with the Services are the property of their respective owners and you may not copy, imitate, or use them, in whole or in part, without the written permission of the applicable trademark owner. The inclusion of any marks of others in the Services does not constitute an approval, endorsement, or recommendation by us.
6. License
and
Restrictions
6.1 License.
Provided that you are eligible to use the Services and subject to your compliance with these Terms, we hereby grant you a limited license to access and use the Services.
6.2 License Restrictions.
You may not republish Content on any Internet, Intranet or Extranet site or incorporate the information in any other database or compilation, and any other use of the Content is strictly prohibited. Any use of the Services other than as specifically authorized herein, without our prior written permission, is strictly prohibited and will terminate the license granted herein. Such unauthorized use may also violate applicable laws including without limitation copyright and trademark laws and applicable communications regulations and statutes. Unless explicitly stated herein, nothing in these Terms are construed as conferring any license to intellectual property rights, whether by estoppel, implication or otherwise. This license is revocable by us at any time without notice and with or without cause, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
6.3 Government.
If you are a U.S. Government end user, we are licensing the Services to you as a “Commercial Item” as that term is defined in the U.S. Code of Federal Regulations (see 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), and the rights we grant you to the Services are the same as the rights we grant to all others under these Terms.
7. Acceptable
Use
7.1 You may use the Services only for your own personal use. We reserve the right at all times and in our sole discretion to review, cancel or suspend your access to or use of the Services in accordance with applicable law. The items on the Prohibited Uses list are only examples and the list is not exhaustive; we may add or remove prohibited uses at our sole discretion in accordance with applicable law.
7.2 Prohibited
Uses
include:
Illegal Activity:
Any activity that would violate, or assist in the violation of, any sanctions programs administered by OFAC; violate, or assist in the violation of, any laws in the countries where we conduct business; involve proceeds of any illegal activity; or publish, distribute, or disseminate any illegal material or information.
Excessive Use or Hacking:
Any activity that imposes an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure; detrimentally interferes with, intercepts, or expropriates any system, data, or information; transmits or uploads any material to the Services that contains viruses, trojan horses, worms, or any other harmful or deleterious programs; or attempts to gain unauthorized access to the computer systems or networks connected to the Services.
Abuse of Others:
Any activity that interferes with another person’s access to or use of the Services; defames, abuses, extorts, harasses, stalks, threatens, or otherwise violates or infringes upon another person’s privacy, intellectual property, or any other legal rights; incites, threatens, facilitates, promotes, or encourages hatred, racial intolerance, or violent acts against others; or harvests, scrapes, or collects another user’s data from the Services without permission.
Fraud and Other Unfair Business Practices:
Any activity that operates to defraud us, our users, or any other person; provides any false, inaccurate, or misleading information to us; promises unreasonably high rewards or sells a service without added benefit to the buyer; or furthers other predatory and deceptive practices including unlawful lotteries, raffles, bidding fee auctions, contests, sweepstakes, gambling, or any other game of chance.
Intellectual Property Infringement:
Any activity that involves the sale, distribution, or provision of access to counterfeit music, movies, software, or other licensed materials without the appropriate authorization from the rights holder; uses the IP (including the Mark) without express consent or in a manner that otherwise harms us or our brand; implies an untrue endorsement by or affiliation with us; or infringes or violates any copyright, trademark, right of publicity or privacy, or any other proprietary right under the law.
8. Orb
Operators
We partner with local independent contractors called “Orb Operators,” who facilitate user signups and help answer questions you may have about us. These Orb Operators have received training and are knowledgeable about World Network. However, we have no control over and disclaim all liability for what they say or how they conduct themselves.
Orb Operators are not our agents or employees in any way. Any effort, feature, process, policy, standard, or other efforts undertaken by TFH in the interest of its users do not indicate an employment or agency relationship with an Orb Operator.
9. Suspension
We may suspend and restrict your access to the Services: (i) We are so required by a facially valid subpoena, court order, or binding order of a government authority; (ii) We reasonably suspect you of using the Service in connection with a Prohibited Use; (iii) Use of your using the Services is subject to any pending litigation, investigation, or government proceeding and/or we perceive a heightened risk of legal or regulatory non-compliance associated with your activity; (iv) Our service partners are unable to support your use; (v) You take any action that we deem as circumventing our controls (such as but not limited to attempting to create multiple accounts).
10. Not an Offering
of Securities or
Commodity Interest
The content of the Services does not constitute an offer to buy or sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell investments, securities, partnership interests, commodities or any other financial instruments; the content or the Services also do not constitute, and may not be used for or in connection with, an offer or solicitation by anyone in any state or jurisdiction in which such an offer or solicitation is not authorized or permitted, or to any person to whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.
11. Content
11.1
Reliance on Content; Changes to the Services
.
The information and material we provide to you through the Services (“Content”) are solely for general information purposes, and we do not guarantee its accuracy, usefulness, or completeness, to the extent permitted by applicable law. Any reliance you place on our Content is strictly at your own risk. We have no liability or responsibility for any actions you take or do not take because of the Content, or for anyone with whom you share the Content. Other users’ statements describing their use of our Services found on the Services or anywhere else should not be viewed as our endorsement of their statements if the statements are inconsistent with these Terms or our Content. We may update the Content from time to time, but such Content may not be complete or up-to-date, and we are under no obligation to you to update the Content or any other part of the Services. We may modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, any part or all of the Content or Services without prior notice to you, to the extent permitted by applicable law. We will not be liable for any modification, suspension, or discontinuance of part or all of the Content or the Services, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
11.2 Third-Party Services and Content
. We may provide links to educational materials, webinars, meet-ups, and promotions on social media platforms (“Third-Party Services”) that enable sharing and collaboration among users and other third parties. If you share any personal information, pictures, opinions, content, or any other data on those services, you do so at your own risk, and your use of those services is subject to the terms of use and privacy policies of those services, and not ours. You should review the terms of services of each Third-Party Service to better understand your rights, and the manner in which those platforms use your data. We are not responsible for any loss, theft, compromise, or misuse of your data whatsoever in connection with any Third-Party Service (including Negligence) except to the extent such liability cannot be limited under applicable laws. Your use of any information provided by a Third Party Service (“Third-Party Content”) is at your own risk, and we make no promises to you that any Third-Party Content is accurate, complete, authentic, or appropriate for your personal circumstances. Third-Party Content includes information provided by other users not specifically endorsed by us.
11.3
User Content.
As a member of the Worldcoin community, you may post messages, data, software, images, videos, or other content (“User Content”) on message boards, blogs, social media accounts owned by us, as well as various other publicly available locations on the Services. These forums may be hosted by us or a Third-Party Service Provider on our behalf. You are responsible for all User Content you submit, upload, post, or store through the Services. You must provide all required and appropriate warnings, information, and disclosures regarding your User Content. We are not responsible for any User Content you submit through the Services.
11.4 User Content License.
By submitting User Content to us, you represent that you have all necessary rights to the User Content and you thereby grant us a perpetual, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free, sub-licensable, and transferable license to use, reproduce, distribute, prepare derivative works from, modify, display, and perform all or any portion of the User Content in connection with our marketing and promotions, and for any other legitimate business purpose related to the Services. We may redistribute part or all of and derivative works from your User Content in any media formats and through any media channels we choose. You also hereby grant us and other users a non-exclusive license to use, access, reproduce, distribute, modify, and display, and perform your User Content through the Services. Section 11.4 will apply to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law.
11.5 User Content Restrictions.
You agree not to use, nor permit any third party to use, the Services to post or transmit any User Content that: (a) is libelous or defamatory, or discloses private or personal matters concerning any person; (b) is indecent, obscene, pornographic, harassing, threatening, abusive, hateful, racially or ethnically offensive; encourages conduct that would be considered a criminal offense, give rise to civil liability, or violate any law, or is otherwise inappropriate; (c) would violate the intellectual property rights of others, including unauthorized copyrighted text, images or programs, trade secrets or other confidential proprietary information, or trademarks or service marks used in an infringing fashion; or (d) unreasonably interferes with another user’s use of the Services. You represent to us that you are posting User Content to the Services voluntarily; accordingly, posting User Content does not create an employer-employee relationship between you and us. You may not copy or use email addresses, mobile phone numbers, balances, usernames, or any other personal information about other users without their permission. Unsolicited emails, mailings, telephone calls, or other communications to other users through the Services or in any other channel are prohibited.
11.6 Complaints and DMCA Takedowns.
If you believe that your trademark or copyrighted work is being infringed by our Content or User Content on the Services or is otherwise being published in a way suggesting some endorsement of or affiliation with us, please send an email to us at
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
with the subject line “[Trademark/Copyright] Complaint,” whichever the case may be. For your complaint to be effective and in order for us to take action under the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (“DMCA”), you must follow all applicable legislation requirements by including the following information in your email:
Clear identification of the copyrighted work or mark claimed to be infringed, including the Copyright Registration number if the work is registered;
Identification of the work or mark that is claimed to be infringing and that you want removed; The URL or other clear direction to enable us to locate the alleged infringing content;
Your email address, mailing address, and telephone number; and
A signed statement that you have a good faith belief that the content is infringing, that the information you are providing is correct, and that you are the owner or authorized to represent the owner of the content.
You should also be aware that under the applicable civil and criminal legislation any person who knowingly sends meritless notices of infringement may be liable for damages, so please do not make any false claims. We may share any information or correspondence you provide us with third parties, including the person who uploaded the allegedly infringing material to the Service.
When we receive a bona fide infringement notice, our policy is to: (a) immediately remove or disable access to the infringing content;
(b) notify the person who uploaded the infringing material that we have removed or disabled access to the material; and (c) for repeat offenders, terminate the person’s access to the Services. If we receive a counter-notice from such a person, we may send a copy of the counter-notice to you explaining that we may restore the removed material or cease disabling it in 10 business days. Unless you file an action seeking a court order against us or against the person who uploaded the content, we will restore access to the removed material in 10 to 14 business days or more after receipt of the counter-notice, at our discretion.
12. DISCLAIMER
OF
WARRANTIES
12.1 Your use of the Services is at your own risk. The Services, WLD, the content and all other IP are provided on an “AS-IS” and “AS AVAILABLE” basis without any representation or warranty, whether express, implied, or statutory. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, we specifically disclaim any implied warranties of title, merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, or non infringement as to the features, content, or other IP contained in the Services. Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of implied warranties, so the above exclusions may not apply to you. We do not endorse, guarantee, or assume responsibility for any advertisements, offers, or statements made by third parties, including other users concerning the Services.
12.2 We do not make any representations or warranties that (a) access to all or part of the Services will be continuous, uninterrupted, timely, secure, or error-free; (b) that the Services or content are accurate, complete, reliable, or current; (c) that the Services are free of viruses or other harmful components; or (d) that the Services or the content will meet your requirements, needs, or expectations.
12.3 Additionally, we do not make any representations or warranties with respect to the legality of the Services or WLD for any use case, or that the Services or WLD will meet any regulatory or compliance needs. You are also responsible for determining and complying with all legal and regulatory restrictions and requirements that may govern your use of the Services or WLD. Except for the express statements set forth in these Terms, you hereby acknowledge and agree that you have not relied upon any other statement or understanding, whether written or oral, with respect to your access to and use of the Services or WLD.
12.4 We are not acting and cannot act as your advisor with respect to any financial, legal, investment, or tax matters. Any content speaks only as of the date indicated. Any projections, estimates, forecasts, targets and/or opinions expressed here are subject to risks, uncertainties, and assumptions, and so may be incorrect and may change without notice. No content should be relied upon for any decision-making.
Certain information here may have been obtained from third-party sources. While such sources are believed to be reliable, we have not independently verified all such information and make no representations as to its accuracy. We are not a registered broker dealer or investment adviser. We make no representations, and specifically disclaim all warranties, express, implied, or statutory, regarding the accuracy, timeliness, or completeness of any material contained in the Services. Our content is for general information only, and you are solely responsible for determining whether or not to use the Services. You acknowledge that trading, using, and holding Digital Tokens is inherently risky. You may lose all of the funds in your wallet. You acknowledge that the Service may be subject to export restrictions and economic sanctions imposed by U.S. law.
12.5 We are not liable to you or any third party for any modification or termination of the Services, or suspension or termination of your access to the Services.
13. LIMITATION
OF
LIABILITY
13.1 We don’t exclude or limit our liability to you where it would be illegal to do so. In countries where the below types of exclusions aren’t allowed, we’re responsible to you only for losses and damages that are a reasonably foreseeable result of our failure to use reasonable care and skill or our breach of our contract with you. This paragraph doesn’t affect consumer rights that can’t be waived or limited by any contract or agreement.
13.2 To the extent permitted by law, you agree that under no circumstances will we or any of our officers, directors, employees, contractors, agents, affiliates, or subsidiaries (the “TFH Parties”) be liable to you for any indirect, punitive, incidental, special, consequential, or exemplary damages, including damages for loss of profits, goodwill, use, data, or other intangible property, whether such liability is asserted on the basis of tort or otherwise, and whether or not the TFH Parties have been advised of the possibility of such damages arising out of or in connection with: (a) your use or inability to use the Services, your Digital Tokens, or the World Network; (b) inaccessibility or termination of the Services; (c) any hacking, tampering, unauthorized access to or alteration of any transaction or your Data; (d) any transaction or agreement entered into by you with any third party through the Services; (e) any activities or communications of third parties; (f) the actions of Orb Operators, (g) any loss of the value of any Digital Tokens; (h) any Third-Party Content accessed on or through the Services; (i) errors, mistakes, or inaccuracies in our Content; (j) personal injury or property damage of any nature whatsoever resulting from any access to or use of the Services; (k) viruses, trojan horses, or the like that may be transmitted to or through the Services; or (l) the defamatory, offensive, or illegal conduct of any third party. This limitation of liability will apply whether the damages arise from use or misuse of, or reliance on TFH or the Services, notwithstanding any failure of essential purpose of any limited remedy and to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
13.3 Under no circumstances will the TFH Parties be liable to you for any direct claims, proceedings, liabilities, obligations, damages, losses, or costs in an amount exceeding $100.00. If you are dissatisfied with the Services, you agree that your sole and exclusive remedy will be for you to discontinue your use of the Services. This limitation of liability will apply to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
13.4 Release and Indemnification.
You agree to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the TFH Parties from and against any claims, damages, costs, liabilities, reasonable attorneys’ fees, and expenses brought against a TFH Party by any third party arising out of or related to: (a) your use of the Services; (b) your violation of these Terms; (c) your violation of any rights of another person; (d) your conduct in connection with the Services; or (e) your use of WLD, any Digital Tokens, or the Worldcoin network. Some jurisdictions limit consumer indemnities, so some or all of the indemnity provisions in this paragraph may not apply to you. If you are obligated to indemnify any of the TFH Parties, we reserve the right, in our sole discretion, to control any action or proceeding and to determine whether to settle and on what terms.
IF YOU ARE A CALIFORNIA RESIDENT, you waive the benefits and protections of California Civil Code § 1542, which provides: “[a] general release does not extend to claims that the creditor or releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release and that, if known by him or her, would have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor or released party.”
14. Governing
Law
The laws of the State of California will apply to this Agreement and any disputes arising out of or related to this Agreement. The governing law stated in this section will apply without regard to principles of conflict of laws. You further agree that the Service will be deemed to be based solely in the State of California, and that although the Services may be available in other jurisdictions, its availability does not give rise to general or specific personal jurisdiction in any forum outside the State of California.
15. DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ARBITRATION AND WAIVER OF CLASS ACTION
15.1 PLEASE READ THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPHS CAREFULLY. THEY REQUIRE YOU TO SETTLE DISPUTES WITH US THROUGH INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION BEFORE A SOLE ARBITRATOR, AND NOT AS A MEMBER OF A CLASS ACTION. ARBITRATION PREVENTS YOU FROM SUING US IN COURT OR FROM HAVING A JURY TRIAL, THOUGH YOU MAY BRING A DISPUTE AGAINST US IN SMALL CLAIMS COURT IF YOU QUALIFY.
15.2 We will use our best efforts to resolve any potential disputes through informal, good faith negotiations. If a potential dispute arises, you must contact us by sending an email to
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
so that we can attempt to resolve it without resorting to formal dispute resolution. If we aren’t able to reach an informal resolution within 60 days of your email, and you elect to bring a federal or state statutory claim, common law claim, claim based in contract, tort, fraud, misrepresentation or any other legal theory, or any other formal proceeding arising out of or relating to these Terms, the Content, or the Services (each, a “Dispute”), then you agree to resolve the Dispute through binding arbitration, on an individual basis according to the following terms (collectively, the “Arbitration Agreement”):
Arbitration will be conducted confidentially by a single arbitrator, in English. The arbitrator will apply applicable statutes of limitation and all applicable law and will honor claims of privilege recognized by applicable law.
The Dispute will be solely and finally settled by arbitration administered by JAMS in accordance with the JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules, unless the aggregated amount of the Dispute is $250,000 or more, in which case the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules will apply. Arbitration will occur in San Francisco, California, unless you and we both agree to conduct it elsewhere. You agree that the federal and state courts in San Francisco, California are the proper forum for any appeals of an arbitration award or for court proceedings in the event that this Agreement’s binding arbitration clause is found to be unenforceable.
In any arbitration, regardless of its location, the parties will not seek discovery from each other, and the arbitrator will not allow parties to engage in discovery; rather, each party will disclose the evidence supporting their positions at a mutually agreeable time and date prior to the final arbitration hearing.
This Arbitration Agreement covers the enforceability, revocability, scope, and validity of the Arbitration Agreement or any portion of the Arbitration Agreement, and all other Disputes arising out of or related to the interpretation or applicability of the Arbitration Agreement; and all such matters will be decided by the arbitrator and not by a court or judge.
If the arbitrator imposes filing fees or other administrative costs on you, we will reimburse you, upon request, to the extent such fees or costs would exceed those that you would otherwise have to pay if you were proceeding instead in a court. We will also pay additional fees or costs if required to do so by the arbitration administrator's rules or applicable law.
At the request of either party, all arbitration proceedings will be conducted in utmost secrecy and, in such case, all documents, testimony, and records will be received, heard, and maintained by the arbitrator in secrecy under seal, available for inspection only by the parties, their respective attorneys, and their respective experts, consultants, or witnesses who have agreed, in advance and in writing, to receive all such information as confidential to be used solely for purposes of the arbitration.
Other than class procedures and remedies discussed in this Arbitration Agreement, the arbitrator has the authority to grant any remedy that would otherwise be available in court.
Any judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction.
If the requirement to arbitrate or the prohibition against class actions and other Disputes brought on behalf of third parties contained in this Arbitration Agreement is found to be unenforceable, then only the unenforceable provisions will be deemed to have been removed from these Terms and all remaining obligations in these Terms shall continue in full force and effect.
15.3 30-Day Right to Opt Out
. You have the right to opt out and not be bound by this Arbitration Agreement by sending an email from the address you used to set up your application to
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
with the Subject Line: “ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT. You must send your email within 30 days of agreeing to these Terms, otherwise you will be bound to arbitrate Disputes in accordance with the terms of this Arbitration Agreement. If you opt out of this Arbitration Agreement, we will also not be bound by the Arbitration Agreement.
15.4 Changes to this Arbitration Agreement.
We will provide you 30 days’ notice of any changes to the section of these Terms titled “
Dispute
Resolution,
Arbitration
and
Waiver
of
Class
Action”
by notice to you, and the changes will become effective 30 days after you receive notice from us. Changes to the
Dispute Resolution, Arbitration and Waiver of Class Action
section will otherwise apply prospectively only to Disputes that arise after the 30th day. If a court or arbitrator decides that the changes to this sectionare not enforceable or valid, then the changes will be severed from these Terms and the court or arbitrator will apply the terms of the first Arbitration Agreement in effect after you began using the Services. You may exercise your right to opt out of the new Arbitration Agreement terms by following the procedures set forth in the section above titled “30-Day Right to Opt Out.”
This Arbitration Agreement will survive the termination of these Terms, and your use of the Services.
Notwithstanding anything in this Arbitration Agreement to the contrary, either party may bring a lawsuit solely for injunctive relief to stop unauthorized use or abuse of the Services, or infringement of intellectual property rights (for example, trademark, trade secret, copyright, patent rights or any other pertaining to intellectual property rights) without first engaging in arbitration or the informal dispute resolution process described above.
16. General
Provisions
16.1
No Waiver; Severability; Non-Assignability.
Our failure to enforce a provision is not a waiver of our right to do so later. If a provision is found unenforceable, the remaining provisions of these Terms will remain in full effect and an enforceable term will be substituted reflecting our intent as closely as possible, to the extent permitted by applicable law. You may not assign any of your rights under these Terms, and any such attempt will be void. We may assign our rights to any of its affiliates or subsidiaries, or to any successor in interest of any business associated with the Services.
16.2 Entire Agreement.
These Terms constitute the complete and exclusive statement of the agreement between you and us with respect to the Services and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous understandings, agreements, representations, and warranties, both written and oral, concerning the Services. Section headings in these Terms are for convenience only and will not govern the meaning or interpretation of any provision.
16.3 Survival.
All provisions of these Terms pertaining to suspension or termination, debts owed to TFH, general use of the Services, Disputes with TFH, as well as provisions which by their nature extend beyond the expiration or termination of these Terms, will survive even when these Terms are no longer valid.
16.4 Relationship of the Parties.
Nothing in these Terms will be deemed or is intended to be deemed, nor will it cause you and TFH to be treated as partners, joint-venturers, or otherwise as joint associates for profit, and neither you nor TFH will be treated as the agent of the other. This includes the fact that nothing in these Terms establishes or is intended to establish any employment relationship between you and TFH.
16.5 No Professional Advice or Fiduciary Duties.
All Content provided by us is for informational purposes only and should not be construed as professional advice. You should not take, or refrain from taking, any action based on any information contained in the Services. Before you make any financial, legal, or other decisions involving the Services or any Digital Tokens, you should seek independent professional advice from an individual who is licensed and qualified in the area for which such advice would be appropriate. These Terms are not intended to, and do not, create or impose any fiduciary duties on us. To the fullest extent permitted by Law, you acknowledge and agree that we owe no fiduciary duties or liabilities to you or any other party, and that to the extent any such duties or liabilities may exist at law or in equity, those duties and liabilities are hereby irrevocably disclaimed, waived, and eliminated. You further agree that the only duties and obligations that we owe you are those set out expressly in these Terms.
16.6 Change of Control.
In the event that we are acquired by or merged with a third-party entity, or otherwise assigns certain functions to an affiliated or successor entity or other entity that we determine is in the best interest of Users, then we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign the Data we have collected from you as part of such merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control, in accordance with applicable law.
16.7 Force Majeure.
We will not be liable for delays, failure in performance, or interruption of service that result directly or indirectly from significant market volatility in Digital Tokens, any act of God, acts of civil or military authorities, acts of terrorists, civil disturbances, war, strike, health emergency, labor dispute, fire, interruption in telecommunications or Internet services or network provider services, failure of equipment or software, or any cause or condition beyond our reasonable control (each, a “Force Majeure Event”). The occurrence of a Force Majeure Event will not affect the validity and enforceability of any of the remaining provisions of these Terms.
16.8 App Stores.
Where you download our Apps from any app store or distribution platform other than the Apple App Store, including the Google Play Store (the "Distribution Platform") you agree that:
the Terms are between you and us, and not with the provider of the Distribution Platform ("Store Provider"); your use of the Apps must comply with the Store Provider's then-current Distribution Platform Terms of Service; the Store Provider is only a provider of the Distribution Platform where you obtained the Apps;
We, and not the Store Provider, are solely responsible for the Apps;
the Store Provider has no obligation or liability to you with respect to the Apps or the Terms; and
you acknowledge and agree that the Store Provider is a third-party beneficiary to the Terms as it relates to the Apps.
16.9 Apple App Store.
This section applies where the Apps have been acquired from the Apple App Store. You acknowledge and agree that the Terms are solely between you and us, not Apple, Inc. ("Apple") and that Apple has no responsibility for the Apps or content thereof. Your use of the Apps must comply with the App Store Terms of Service.
You acknowledge that Apple has no obligation whatsoever to furnish any maintenance and support services with respect to the Apps. In the event of any failure of the Apps to conform to any applicable warranty, you may notify Apple, and (where applicable) Apple will refund the purchase price for the Apps to you; to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Apple will have no other warranty obligation whatsoever with respect to the Apps, and any other claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs or expenses attributable to any failure to conform to any warranty will be solely governed by the Terms and any law applicable to us as provider of the Apps.
You acknowledge that Apple is not responsible for addressing any claims of you or any third party relating to the Apps or your possession and/or use of the Apps, including, but not limited to: (i) product liability claims; (ii) any claim that the Apps fail to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory requirement; and (iii) claims arising under consumer protection or similar legislation; and all such claims are governed solely by the Terms and any law applicable to us as provider of the software.
You acknowledge that, in the event of any third-party claim that the Apps or your possession and use of that Apps infringe that third party's intellectual property rights, TFH, not Apple, will be solely responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement and discharge of any such intellectual property infringement claim to the extent required by the Terms.
You represent and warrant that (i) you are not located in a country that is subject to U.S. Government embargo, or that has been designated by the U.S. Government as a "terrorist supporting" country; and (ii) you are not listed on any U.S. Government list of prohibited or restricted parties.
You and TFH acknowledge and agree that Apple, and Apple's subsidiaries, are third-party beneficiaries of the Terms of Service as relates to your license of the Apps, and that, upon your acceptance of the terms and conditions of the Terms of Service, Apple will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to enforce the Terms of Service as relates to your license of the Apps against you as a third-party beneficiary thereof.
TFHUSERTOS20241112
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
ข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขการใช้งาน
Tools For Humanity
ยินดีต้อนรับสู่
World App
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ระหว่างท่านกับ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
ซึ่งเป็นบริษัทจัดตั้งในรัฐเดลาแวร์ (“
TFH”
หรือ “เรา”) จะมีผลบังคับกับการใช้งานและการเข้าถึงเว็บไซต์และ             แอปพลิเคชันของเรา รวมถึง
World App
และ
Operator App (
เรียกรวมกันว่า “แอป”) ตลอดจนฟังก์ชันการทำงาน เนื้อหา และบริการทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวข้องซึ่งเราจัดหาให้แก่ท่าน (เรียกรวมกันว่า “บริการ” หรือ “บริการของเรา”) ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับ
World Network (“World Network”)
และระบบนิเวศที่เกี่ยวข้อง
โปรดอ่านข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้อย่างละเอียดก่อนใช้หรือเข้าถึงบริการ โดยการเข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการใด ๆ ที่เราจัดหาให้ และโดยการให้ความยินยอมอย่างชัดแจ้งตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ ท่านตกลงอย่างชัดแจ้งที่จะผูกพันตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และตามนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของเราซึ่งรวมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ โปรดความเข้าใจเนื้อหาส่วนต่อไปนี้ของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ซึ่งมีความสำคัญเป็นพิเศษ
ท่านตกลงที่จะระงับข้อพิพาทใด ๆ ระหว่างท่านกับ
TFH
ผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่มีผลผูกพันแทนการฟ้องร้องในศาล หากท่านอาศัยอยู่ในเกาหลีใต้ ท่านสามารถเลือกที่จะระงับข้อพิพาทในศาลท้องถิ่นที่มีอำนาจแทนได้ โปรดดูรายละเอียดในข้อ
15
ด้านล่าง
โดยส่วนใหญ่แล้ว ผลิตภัณฑ์คริปโทรวมถึงโทเคนดิจิทัลจะไม่ได้อยู่ภายใต้การกำกับดูแลและอาจมีความเสี่ยงสูง ในกรณีที่เกิดการสูญเสียจากธุรกรรมดังกล่าว อาจไม่มีวิธีการเยียวยาที่กำหนดไว้ตามกฎหมาย
ไม่มีส่วนใดของบริการที่ถือว่าเป็นการเสนอขายหรือการชักชวนให้เสนอซื้อหลักทรัพย์หรือโทเคนดิจิทัล บริการจะไม่ถือเป็นคำแนะนำในการลงทุน การถือครอง ซื้อ หรือขายโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ (ตามคำจำกัดความในข้อ
2.1
ด้านล่างนี้) อาจเป็นสิ่งที่ห้ามดำเนินการในพื้นที่ที่ท่านอาศัยอยู่ และท่านมีหน้าที่ในการปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด โปรดพิจารณาว่าการซื้อ ขาย ใช้ หรือถือครองโทเคนดิจิทัลเหมาะสมกับท่านหรือไม่ โดยพิจารณาถึงสถานการณ์ทางการเงินของท่านและความเข้าใจของท่านเกี่ยวกับโทเคนดิจิทัล มูลค่าของโทเคนดิจิทัลอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงอย่างรวดเร็วและอาจสูญเสียมูลค่าทั้งหมด    ก็ได้
นอกจากนี้ โทเคน
Worldcoin (“WLD”)
ไม่ได้มีเจตนาให้ใช้งาน ซื้อ หรือเข้าถึงโดยบุคคลในสหรัฐอเมริกา รวมถึงพลเมืองสหรัฐอเมริกา ผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ หรือบุคคลที่อยู่ในสหรัฐอเมริกา หรือบริษัทที่จัดตั้ง ตั้งอยู่ หรือมีที่มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในสหรัฐอเมริกา หรือมีตัวแทนจดทะเบียนในสหรัฐอเมริกา เราไม่เปิดให้บุคคลในสหรัฐอเมริกาใช้งาน ซื้อ หรือเข้าถึง
WLD
นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ขาย โอน หรือทำให้บุคคลในสหรัฐอเมริกาสามารถใช้งาน
WLD
ได้ ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมเกี่ยวกับความเสี่ยงที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
WLD
ได้ที่นี่
1. ขอบเขตของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
1.1 ความเป็นส่วนตัวและข้อมูลของท่าน
เมื่อเข้าถึงแอป ท่านอาจมอบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลบางประเภทแก่เรา เช่น ชื่อหรือหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่าน หากท่านมอบข้อมูลเพื่อแสดง
proof of personhood
และเพื่อใช้สิทธิรับโทเคน
WLD
จากนั้นท่านอาจต้องมอบข้อมูลประเภทพิเศษคือข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่มีความอ่อนไหว เช่น ข้อมูลไบโอเมตริกซ์ นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของเราอธิบายถึงข้อมูลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมจากท่านและวิธีที่เราใช้ข้อมูลนั้น โปรดอย่าใช้บริการหากท่านไม่ต้องการให้เราเก็บรวบรวมหรือใช้ข้อมูลของท่านในลักษณะที่ระบุในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัว
1.2 สิทธิในการใช้บริการ
หน้าเว็บที่แสดงรายละเอียดบริการของเราอาจเข้าถึงได้ทั่วโลก แต่ไม่ได้หมายความว่าบริการทั้งหมดหรือฟีเจอร์ของบริการทั้งหมดจะถูกกฎหมายหรือพร้อมให้บริการในประเทศของท่าน ท่านต้องไม่ใช้
VPN
หรือเครื่องมือที่คล้ายกันเพื่อหลบเลี่ยงข้อจำกัดใด ๆ ท่านมีหน้าที่รับผิดชอบในการดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าท่านสามารถใช้บริการของเราได้โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในพื้นที่ที่ท่านใช้บริการ บริการของเราอาจไม่พร้อมให้บริการในทุกภาษา เพื่อใช้บริการของเรา ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด ท่านต้องไม่ใช้บริการของเราเพื่อดำเนินการ ส่งเสริม หรือช่วยเหลือผู้อื่นในการดำเนินกิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมายหรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายใด ๆ
นอกจากนี้ ท่านต้องมีคุณสมบัติครบตามเกณฑ์ทั้งหมดดังต่อไปนี้
มีอายุ
18
ปีขึ้นไป และ
ไม่ได้
อยู่ใน อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมของ เป็นพลเมืองของ หรือเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในพื้นที่ต่อไปนี้: ซีเรีย ภูมิภาคไครเมีย โดเนตสก์ ลูฮันสก์ เคอร์ซอน และซาโปริซเซียของยูเครน รัสเซีย เกาหลีเหนือ อิหร่าน คิวบา หรือประเทศหรือภูมิภาคอื่นใดที่สหรัฐอเมริกา สหภาพยุโรป หรือประเทศหรือเขตแดนอื่นใดได้จำกัดการเข้าถึงบริการ และ
ท่านไม่ได้เป็น “บุคคลต้องห้ามไม่ให้ดำเนินธุรกรรมทางธุรกิจด้วย (
Specially Designated National: SDN
)” ตามที่ประกาศโดยสำนักงานควบคุมทรัพย์สินต่างประเทศของกระทรวงการคลังสหรัฐอเมริกา (“
OFAC”)
หรือมีรายชื่ออยู่ในบัญชีบุคคลที่อยู่ภายใต้มาตรการลงโทษของประเทศ                 อื่นใด และชื่อของท่านไม่ได้อยู่ในรายชื่อบุคคลที่ถูกปฏิเสธไม่ให้ได้รับสิทธิพิเศษด้านการส่งออก (
Denied Person List
) ของกระทรวงพาณิชย์สหรัฐอเมริกา หรือรายชื่อบุคคลที่ถูกห้ามของประเทศอื่นใด
หากท่านมีคุณสมบัติไม่ครบถ้วนตามข้อกำหนดดังกล่าว ท่านจะไม่ได้รับอนุญาตให้เข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการ และเราอาจจำกัดความสามารถของท่านในการเข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการ
นอกจากนี้ หากท่านจดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีที่ตั้งอยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในประเทศดังกล่าว ท่านจะไม่ได้รับอนุญาตให้เข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งอยู่ภายในขอบเขตความหมายที่กำหนดในข้อ
2.5
หรือแอปพลิเคชันแบบกระจายศูนย์ (
decentralized application
) ซึ่งอยู่ภายในขอบเขตความหมายที่กำหนดในข้อ
2.8
ฟีเจอร์ดังกล่าวไม่สามารถใช้ได้สำหรับท่าน
1.3 ความพร้อมใช้งาน
หน้าเว็บที่แสดงรายละเอียดบริการของเราอาจเข้าถึงได้ทั่วโลก แต่ไม่ได้หมายความว่าบริการทั้งหมดหรือฟีเจอร์ของบริการทั้งหมดจะถูกกฎหมายหรือพร้อมให้บริการในประเทศของท่าน การเข้าถึงบริการบางอย่าง (หรือฟีเจอร์ของบริการบางอย่าง) ในบางประเทศอาจถูกปิดกั้นโดยเราหรือรัฐบาล ท่านต้องไม่ใช้
VPN
หรือเครื่องมือที่คล้ายกันเพื่อหลบเลี่ยงข้อจำกัดใด ๆ การเข้าถึงแอปและฟีเจอร์บางอย่างภายในแอปอาจไม่สามารถใช้ได้หรือถูกจำกัด ขึ้นอยู่กับตำแหน่งที่ตั้งของท่าน
ท่านมีหน้าที่ในการดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าท่านสามารถใช้บริการของเราได้โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในพื้นที่ที่ท่านใช้บริการ
บริการของเราอาจไม่พร้อมให้บริการในทุกภาษา
1.4 การปรับปรุงข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
เราอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นครั้งคราว ในกรณีดังกล่าว เราจะเผยแพร่ข้อกำหนดฉบับปรับปรุงผ่านทางบริการ และหากกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนด เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบก่อนทำการเปลี่ยนแปลงใด ๆ หากการเปลี่ยนแปลงดังกล่าวเป็นการเปลี่ยนแปลงในส่วนที่เป็นสาระสำคัญหรือทำให้ท่านเสียประโยชน์ เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้าเพิ่มเติมหากกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนด ท่านเข้าใจและตกลงว่า การที่ท่านยังคงใช้บริการต่อไปหลังจากที่เราเปลี่ยนแปลงข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้โดยไม่ได้คัดค้านการเปลี่ยนแปลงนั้นอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงจะถือเป็นการที่ท่านยอมรับข้อกำหนดฉบับแก้ไขนั้น ท่านสามารถหยุดใช้บริการได้ทุกเมื่อหากท่านไม่ยอมรับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ เนื่องจากบริการมีการเปลี่ยนแปลงตลอดเวลา เราอาจใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือหยุดการให้บริการทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนได้ทุกเมื่อโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบล่วงหน้าเท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต
1.5 ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม
อาจมีการบังคับใช้ข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขเพิ่มเติมกับแอปพลิเคชัน เนื้อหา ฟีเจอร์ หรือส่วนต่าง ๆ ของบริการที่เฉพาะเจาะจง และข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขเพิ่มเติมทั้งหมดที่เราแจ้งให้ท่านทราบจะถือเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
2. บริการ
2.1 วอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
World App
มาพร้อมกับวอลเล็ตแบบไม่ได้ผูกกับผู้ให้บริการรายใดรายหนึ่ง (
unhosted
) และผู้ใช้เป็นผู้เก็บรักษากุญแจส่วนตัวหรือ
private key
ด้วยตนเอง (
non-custodial
) ซึ่งใช้สำหรับการถือครองคริปโทเคอร์เรนซี สกุลเงินดิจิทัล หรือโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับ (รวมถึง
WLD
โดยเรียกรวมกันว่า “โทเคนดิจิทัล”) ท่านเป็นผู้ควบคุมโทเคนดิจิทัลที่อยู่ในวอลเล็ตของท่านเอง ใน
World App
กุญแจส่วนตัว (ซึ่งเป็นรหัสผ่านในการเข้าถึงโทเคนดิจิทัล) จะถูกเก็บไว้บนอุปกรณ์ของท่านโดยตรง ท่านสามารถถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านได้ทุกเมื่อโดยการส่งไปยังที่อยู่บล็อกเชนอื่น โดยจะขึ้นอยู่กับการเข้าถึงอินเทอร์เน็ตและความแออัดบนบล็อกเชน ในเวลาที่ท่านถือโทเคนดิจิทัลอยู่ในวอลเล็ตของท่าน เราจะไม่มีสิทธิควบคุมวอลเล็ต โทเคนดิจิทัล หรือกุญแจส่วนตัวของท่านแต่อย่างใด ผู้ใช้ต้องรับผิดชอบต่อความเสี่ยงจากการสูญเสียกุญแจส่วนตัวของตน และ
TFH
หรือ
World App
จะไม่สามารถกู้คืนกุญแจเหล่านั้นได้
เนื่องจาก
World App
เป็นวอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
ท่านจะได้รับที่อยู่วอลเล็ตซึ่งระบุว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านถูกเก็บไว้ที่ใดบนบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้อง เราจะไม่สามารถเข้าถึงโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านได้
2.2 โทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับ
World App
รองรับโทเคน
ERC-20
บางประเภท เราอาจเพิ่มโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับเพิ่มเติมในอนาคต ท่านสามารถดูโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับได้ใน
World App
โปรดตรวจสอบโทเคนและเครือข่ายที่รองรับใน
World App
ให้แน่ใจก่อนที่จะฝากหรือถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน เราจะไม่สามารถกู้คืนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านได้หากท่านส่งโทเคนที่ระบบไม่รองรับหรือส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลไปยังที่อยู่วอลเล็ตที่ไม่ถูกต้อง
ท่านเข้าใจว่าการส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ระบบไม่รองรับไปยังที่อยู่วอลเล็ต
World App
อาจหมายความว่าท่านจะสูญเสียการเข้าถึงโทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านั้นทั้งหมด เราไม่มีวิธีการกู้คืนโทเคนดิจิทัลด้วย โปรดตรวจสอบให้มั่นใจว่าท่านส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ถูกต้องไปยังที่อยู่วอลเล็ตที่ถูกต้องไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตาม ทั้งนี้ ท่านอาจทดสอบการทำธุรกรรมได้โดยใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลจำนวนเล็กน้อย
2.3 ข้อเสนอและการเข้าถึง
เมื่อท่านดำเนินการเกี่ยวกับโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน เช่น การส่งไปยังที่อยู่            วอลเล็ตอื่นหรือการเชื่อมต่อกับแอปพลิเคชันแบบ
distributed application
โดยใช้บริการ ท่านต้องอนุมัติหรือ “ลงนาม” เพื่อให้ดำเนินการดังกล่าวผ่านทางอุปกรณ์ที่ท่านระบุในระหว่างกระบวนการเริ่มต้นใช้งาน แอปจะอ้างอิงการอนุมัติจากอุปกรณ์ดังกล่าวเท่านั้นในการเริ่มต้นการดำเนินการกับบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้อง ท่านเข้าใจว่าท่านจะติดต่อกับบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้องโดยตรงเมื่อท่านดำเนินการดังกล่าว และท่านเข้าใจว่าเราไม่มีหน้าที่รับผิดชอบในการส่งคำสั่งในนามของท่าน
2.4 ข้อมูลจากบุคคลภายนอก
ในการใช้บริการ ท่านอาจเข้าถึงข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน เช่น มูลค่าตลาดปัจจุบัน แต่ก็ไม่ได้จำกัดเพียงข้อมูลนี้ การนำเสนอข้อมูลดังกล่าวไม่ได้แสดงถึงความเกี่ยวข้องหรือการรับรองบุคคลภายนอกนั้น แม้ว่าในการให้บริการฟังก์ชันบางประการในบริการจำเป็นต้องใช้ผลิตภัณฑ์ของบุคคลภายนอกนั้นก็ตาม เนื้อหาของบริการและผลิตภัณฑ์ของบุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าวตามที่แสดงให้เห็นผ่านทางบริการจะอ้างอิงตามข้อมูลที่เปิดเผยต่อสาธารณะหรือที่บุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าวมอบให้กับเรา ดังนั้น เราจึงไม่รับรองหรือรับประกันความถูกต้องของข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการหรือผลิตภัณฑ์ของบุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าว
2.5 บริการของบุคคลภายนอก
ผู้ใช้ที่จดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีที่ตั้งอยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในประเทศดังกล่าว จะไม่สามารถใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอกเพื่อขายหรือแลกเปลี่ยนโทเคนดิจิทัลของตนตามข้อนี้
ในกรณีที่มีให้บริการ บริการอาจแสดงลิงก์ที่นำไปยังผู้ประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกเพื่อทำธุรกรรม เช่น การซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลด้วยเงินสด การขายโทเคนดิจิทัล การแลกเปลี่ยนโทเคนดิจิทัล และฟังก์ชันอื่น ๆ ที่อาจมีให้บริการในอนาคต ท่านสามารถดูบริการของบุคคลภายนอกที่พร้อมให้บริการได้ใน
World App
เมื่อท่านทำธุรกรรมดังกล่าว ท่านจะทำธุรกรรมกับบุคคลภายนอกนั้น ไม่ใช่กับเรา ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามคำแนะนำที่เกี่ยวข้องและยอมรับข้อกำหนดในการให้บริการของผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกนั้น เราจะไม่ควบคุมหรือส่งเงินหรือโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตามในขณะที่ให้บริการของเราหรือเมื่อท่านเข้าถึงบริการของบุคคลภายนอก
2.6 ธุรกรรม
Peer-to-Peer
บริการมาพร้อมกับแพลตฟอร์มการสื่อสารที่ท่านสามารถใช้เพื่อส่ง มีคำขอ รับ และเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับจากวอลเล็ตบล็อกเชนอื่น ๆ ไม่ว่าจะควบคุมโดยท่านหรือบุคคลภายนอก การโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับระหว่างวอลเล็ตบล็อกเชนของท่าน รวมทั้งการโอนไปยังบุคคลภายนอกและการโอนจากบุคคลภายนอก จะถือเป็นการโอน ฝ่ายที่เริ่มต้นการโอนต้องรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการทำธุรกรรมอย่างถูกต้อง ซึ่งอาจรวมถึงการชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่ายหรือค่าธรรมเนียมผู้ตรวจสอบธุรกรรม (
miner’s fee)
ที่เพียงพอเพื่อให้ธุรกรรมสำเร็จ การชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่ายไม่ครบถ้วนอาจทำให้การโอนอยู่ในสถานะรอดำเนินการและอาจส่งผลให้เกิดความล่าช้าหรือการสูญเสียที่เกิดจากข้อผิดพลาดในการเริ่มต้นธุรกรรม เราไม่มีหน้าที่ในการให้ความช่วยเหลือในการแก้ไขธุรกรรมดังกล่าว เมื่อท่านส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ จากวอลเล็ตของท่านไปยังวอลเล็ตบล็อกเชนอีกวอลเล็ตหนึ่ง การโอนดังกล่าวจะเป็นการดำเนินการบนบล็อกเชนโดยท่านเอง ซึ่งไม่อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมของเรา ท่านควรตรวจสอบความถูกต้องของข้อมูลธุรกรรมทั้งหมดก่อนที่จะส่งข้อมูล เราจะไม่รับผิดหรือรับผิดชอบในกรณีที่ท่านป้อนที่อยู่ปลายทางบล็อกเชนที่ไม่ถูกต้อง การโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจะไม่สามารถย้อนกลับได้เมื่อถูกส่งไปยังเครือข่ายบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้องแล้ว แม้ว่าธุรกรรมจะอยู่ในสถานะรอดำเนินการและแสดงสถานะดังกล่าวในระหว่างที่ธุรกรรมกำลังประมวลผลโดยผู้ดำเนินการเครือข่ายก็ตาม เราไม่ได้เป็นผู้ควบคุมเครือข่ายและไม่สามารถรับประกันได้ว่าการโอนจะได้รับการยืนยันจากเครือข่าย
2.7 Vault
2.7.1 ข้อมูลทั่วไป
World App
มาพร้อมกับอินเทอร์เฟสสำหรับผู้ใช้ซึ่งเชื่อมต่อกับ “ห้องนิรภัย” แบบกระจายศูนย์สำหรับจัดเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน (“
vault
”) การที่ท่านใช้
vault
ถือเป็นการรับทราบและยอมรับข้อกำหนดที่ใช้บังคับกับ
vault
รวมถึงข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมใด ๆ ที่กำหนดโดยบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งเป็นผู้พัฒนาหรือให้บริการฟีเจอร์ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับหรือมีขึ้นจากการใช้
vault
ของท่าน
vault
รองรับเฉพาะโทเคนดิจิทัลบางประเภทเท่านั้น โทเคนดิจิทัลดังกล่าวไม่ถือเป็นโทเคนที่อ้างอิงมูลค่าของสินทรัพย์อื่น (
asset referenced token)
หรือโทเคนที่มีคุณสมบัติเป็นเงินอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ (
e-money token)
ตามข้อกำหนดของ
Regulation
(
EU) 2023/1114
ของรัฐสภายุโรปและสภาแห่งสหภาพยุโรป ฉบับลงวันที่
31
พฤษภาคม 2566 ว่าด้วยตลาดสินทรัพย์คริปโท โทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับจะแสดงใน
World App
เมื่อท่านเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่าน โทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับโดย
vault
อาจเปลี่ยนแปลงได้เป็นครั้งคราว และจะไม่มีการรับประกันว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับจะยังคงสามารถใช้ได้ใน
vault
vault
ให้บริการร่วมกับ
smart contract
ของบุคคลภายนอก บุคคลหรือหน่วยงานอื่นใดนอกจากท่านจะไม่สามารถโต้ตอบกับ
vault
ของท่านหรือโทเคนดิจิทัลภายใน
vault
ของท่านได้ ทั้ง
TFH
และบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ จะไม่มีกุญแจสำหรับการจัดการดูแลระบบ (
administrative key)
หรือสิทธิในการเข้าถึง (ไม่ว่าในลักษณะที่เป็นสิทธิพิเศษหรือโดยประการอื่น) สำหรับเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่านหรือ
smart contract
ที่เกี่ยวข้อง การฝากหรือถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ จาก
vault
สำหรับบัญชีของท่านสามารถเกิดขึ้นได้ต่อเมื่อธุรกรรมนั้นลงนามด้วยกุญแจส่วนตัวที่เกี่ยวข้องของท่านตามที่อธิบายไว้ในข้อ
2.1
ของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ นั่นหมายความว่าหากท่านเสียสิทธิในการเข้าถึงหรือการควบคุมกุญแจส่วนตัวของท่าน ท่านจะไม่สามารถทำการฝากหรือถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจาก
vault
ได้ และบุคคลอื่นจะไม่สามารถให้ความช่วยเหลือท่านหรือดำเนินการดังกล่าวในนามของท่านได้ ดังนั้น การใช้
vault
จึงไม่ได้เป็นและไม่สามารถให้บริการดูแลทรัพย์ การรับฝากทรัพย์ หรือการโอน โดย
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ สำหรับโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ท่านอาจจัดเก็บไว้โดยใช้
vault
ในบัญชีของท่าน
smart contract
ที่ควบคุมฟังก์ชัน
vault
ซึ่งใช้ในการจัดเก็บโทเคน
WLD
สามารถดูได้โดยใช้บล็อกเชนที่นี่ เพื่อความชัดเจน การใช้ฟังก์ชัน
vault
ดังกล่าวและฟังก์ชันอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องจะอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของข้อกำหนดว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธการรับประกันที่ระบุในข้อ
12
ของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
2.7.2 ฟังก์ชัน
vault
ในปัจจุบัน
vault
มีฟีเจอร์ดังต่อไปนี้ ซึ่ง
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกอาจทำการเปลี่ยนแปลง ยกเลิก หรือเพิ่มได้ในอนาคต: การล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลไว้เป็นระยะเวลาที่กำหนด (
Locking)
ผลตอบแทน (
Yield
) การถอนและระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม
(Withdraw and Security Period)
การโอน
grant
ที่ได้รับไปยัง
vault
โดยตรง (
Grants to Vault
)
2.7.3 การล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลไว้เป็นระยะเวลาที่กำหนด (
Locking)
โดยการใช้
vault
ท่านตกลงที่จะล็อก     โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านไว้เป็นระยะเวลาที่กำหนด เมื่อท่านล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลโดยใช้
vault
โทเคนดิจิทัลจะถูกโอนจากวอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
ของท่านไปยัง
smart contract
แบบกระจายศูนย์ เมื่อโอนแล้ว โทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านี้จะถูก “ล็อก” ไว้ใน
vault
เป็นระยะเวลาหนึ่ง ซึ่งรวมถึงระยะเวลาที่โทเคนดิจิทัลดังกล่าวยังคงฝากอยู่ใน
vault
และระยะเวลาที่กำหนดล่วงหน้าที่เรียกว่า “ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม” หรือ
security period
ซึ่งอธิบายรายละเอียดเพิ่มเติมไว้ด้านล่างนี้ ในระหว่างที่โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านถูกล็อก ท่านจะไม่สามารถเข้าถึง โอน หรือทำธุรกรรมอื่นใดโดยใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านั้นได้ จนกว่าท่านจะขอถอนและรอให้ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมที่เกี่ยวข้องสิ้นสุดลง บุคคลใด ๆ ก็ตาม รวมถึง
TFH
หรือผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก จะไม่สามารถปลดล็อก ดูแล
(custody)
ควบคุม ถอน หรือโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ถูกล็อกของท่านได้ การจัดเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านใน
vault
และการยินยอมให้โทเคนเหล่านั้นอยู่ภายใต้ข้อจำกัดเกี่ยวกับการล็อกและการถอนจะไม่ถือเป็นการขาย การให้กู้ หรือการโอนสิทธิ กรรมสิทธิ์ หรือประโยชน์ใด ๆ ในโทเคนดิจิทัลให้กับ
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกอื่นใด
การล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านใน
vault
จะไม่เป็นการรับประกันว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านจะได้รับการจัดเก็บไว้อย่างปลอดภัยหรืออยู่ภายใต้การดูแล โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านจะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การคุ้มครองการประกันการฝาก
(deposit insurance)
หรือการคุ้มครองที่คล้ายกันใด ๆ และมูลค่าและ/หรือการใช้ประโยชน์ของโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ที่ท่านได้ล็อกไว้อาจเพิ่มขึ้นหรือลดลงได้ตลอดระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม นั่นหมายความว่ามูลค่าหรือการใช้ประโยชน์ของโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ที่ท่านล็อกไว้ใน
vault
ของท่านอาจลดลงหรือกลายเป็นศูนย์ในระหว่างระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าการถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ในบัญชีของท่านหลังจากระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมที่ใช้บังคับอาจทำให้ท่านได้รับคืนโทเคนดิจิทัลที่มีมูลค่าต่ำกว่าเดิมหรือไม่มีมูลค่าเลยเมื่อเทียบกับเวลาที่ท่านทำการล็อกโทเคนเหล่านั้นไว้ใน
vault
ของท่าน และ
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ จะไม่รับความเสี่ยงหรือความรับผิดชอบใด ๆ ต่อการลดลงของมูลค่าที่อาจเกิดขึ้น
2.7.4 ผลตอบแทน
ท่านอาจมีสิทธิได้รับสิ่งที่เรียกว่า “ผลตอบแทน” จากโทเคนดิจิทัลบางประเภทใน
vault
ของท่าน ผลตอบแทนนี้ซึ่งอาจอยู่ในรูปแบบของโทเคนดิจิทัลเพิ่มเติมนั้น ซึ่งมอบให้โดยบุคคลภายนอกผ่านการดำเนินการของ
smart contract
อีกชุดหนึ่งที่ท่านสามารถเข้าถึงได้โดยใช้อินเทอร์เฟสที่จัดหาให้ใน
World App
ทั้ง
TFH
และบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ จะไม่ใช้ ควบคุม รับเครดิตใด ๆ หรือจำหน่ายจ่ายโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านโดยประการอื่น ดังนั้น ผลตอบแทนจึงไม่ใช่ดอกเบี้ยที่ผูกกับหรือเกิดขึ้นจากการดำเนินการอื่นใดนอกเหนือไปจากการล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านตามข้อกำหนดและข้อกำหนดเฉพาะที่กำหนด ผลตอบแทนใด ๆ ที่ท่านอาจได้รับจะมอบให้ท่านในรูปแบบของ
grant
ซึ่งมอบให้โดยบุคคลภายนอก โดยขึ้นอยู่กับการตัดสินใจของท่านในการจัดเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลโดยใช้
vault
ข้อกำหนดเฉพาะที่จะเป็นตัวกำหนดการสร้างผลตอบแทน รวมถึงจำนวนผลตอบแทนที่จะเกิดขึ้นหรือระยะเวลาที่อาจมีผลตอบแทนเกิดขึ้น อาจเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือยกเลิกได้ทุกเมื่อ โดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
อาจมีการจำกัดจำนวนผลตอบแทนสูงสุดที่ท่านสามารถได้รับ รายละเอียดเหล่านี้จะแสดงควบคู่กับข้อมูล
vault
ของท่านและผ่านทางข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมใด ๆ ที่บุคคลภายนอก (ซึ่งเรียกว่า “ผู้ให้บริการ” ใน
World App)
ซึ่งเป็นผู้ให้ผลตอบแทนกำหนด ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมดังกล่าวจะรวมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ด้วย
TFH
ไม่ได้เป็นผู้จัดหาหรือผู้ให้บริการเกี่ยวกับผลตอบแทน
ผลตอบแทนใด ๆ ที่มีขึ้นจะถูกมอบให้แก่ท่านเมื่อการถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลซึ่งสร้างผลตอบแทนนั้นออกจาก
vault
ดำเนินการจนเสร็จสิ้น ซึ่งจะเกิดขึ้นหลังจากที่ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมที่ใช้บังคับสิ้นสุดลงเท่านั้น การถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจะเป็นเงื่อนไขสุดท้ายในการมอบ
grant
ที่เป็นผลตอบแทนใด ๆ นั่นหมายความว่าท่านไม่มีสิทธิในผลตอบแทนใด ๆ ที่มีขึ้นหรือที่จะมีขึ้นเว้นแต่และจนกว่าผลตอบแทนที่ได้รับจะถูกโอนเข้าไปยังวอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
ของท่าน นอกจากนี้ นั่นยังหมายความว่า หากท่านเสียสิทธิในการเข้าถึงหรือการควบคุมกุญแจส่วนตัวของท่าน ท่านจะไม่สามารถทำการถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ที่จะทำให้ท่านมีสิทธิได้รับผลตอบแทน
2.7.5 การถอนและระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม (
Withdraw and Security Period)
ท่านสามารถขอถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจาก
vault
ของท่านได้ทุกเมื่อ โทเคนดิจิทัลที่ท่านขอถอนจาก
vault
จะถูกส่งคืนให้ท่านหลังจากระยะเวลาที่กำหนดล่วงหน้าที่เรียกว่า “ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม” สิ้นสุดลง  ทุกครั้งที่ท่านขอถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจาก
vault
ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมช่วงใหม่จะเริ่มต้นและเริ่มนับถอยหลังจนกว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านั้นจะถูกส่งคืนให้ท่าน ในช่วงเวลานี้ โทเคนดิจิทัลที่ท่านเลือกที่จะถอนจะยังคงถูกล็อกอยู่ และท่านยังสามารถยกเลิกการถอนได้ เมื่อระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมสิ้นสุดลง การถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจะเสร็จสมบูรณ์ และโทเคนดิจิทัลพร้อมกับผลตอบแทนที่อาจมีขึ้นจะถูกส่งไปยังวอลเล็ตของท่าน ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมจะระบุอยู่ใน
World App
เมื่อท่านเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่าน
2.7.6 การโอน
grant
ที่ได้รับไปยัง
vault
โดยตรง (
Grants to Vault)
เมื่อเลือกฟีเจอร์นี้ ท่านจะสามารถส่ง
WLD Grant
ไปยัง
vault
ในบัญชีของท่านได้โดยตรง แทนที่จะส่งไปยังวอลเล็ตของท่าน ท่านสามารถเปลี่ยนการตั้งค่านี้ได้ตลอดเวลา
2.7.7 TFH
และ
vault
ท่านสามารถเข้าถึงฟีเจอร์นี้ได้ผ่านทาง
World App
อย่างไรก็ตาม
TFH
ทำได้เพียงอ่านและแสดงข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องต่อท่านเท่านั้น
TFH
ไม่สามารถโอน ถอน หรือฝากโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ของท่าน และจะไม่มีสิทธิเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่าน
2.7.8 แอปพลิเคชันแบบกระจายศูนย์
ส่วนนี้จะไม่ใช้บังคับกับผู้ใช้ที่จดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีที่ตั้งอยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในประเทศดังกล่าว
ในกรณีที่มีความพร้อมในการให้บริการ
เราอาจมีฟังก์ชันที่อนุญาตให้ท่านเชื่อมต่อวอลเล็ตของท่านกับ แอปพลิเคชันแบบกระจายศูนย์ ท่านมีหน้าที่แต่เพียงผู้เดียวในดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าแอปพลิเคชันของบุคคลภายนอกเหล่านี้มีความมั่นคงปลอดภัย เราไม่มีอำนาจควบคุมแอปพลิเคชันของบุคคลภายนอก และไม่สามารถให้การสนับสนุนสำหรับปัญหาใด ๆ ที่ท่านอาจพบเมื่อเชื่อมต่อกับแอปพลิเคชันของบุคคลภายนอก
2.9 การสนับสนุนผู้ใช้
เราให้การสนับสนุนเพื่อช่วยเหลือผู้ใช้เกี่ยวกับฟีเจอร์และฟังก์ชันบางอย่างที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ หากต้องการติดต่อเรา เลือก “การสนับสนุน” จากเมนูในแอปหรือส่งอีเมลผ่านทาง
support@toolsforhumanity.com
2.10 อินเทอร์เฟส
World ID
World Foundation
(ไม่ใช่
TFH
) เป็นผู้ดูแลโปรโตคอล
World ID
และควบคุมการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
Orb
เพื่อยืนยัน
World ID
เราอาจเปิดให้ท่านใช้งาน
World ID
(ในลักษณะที่เป็นอินเทอร์เฟส) ผ่านทางบริการ โปรโตคอล
World ID
ช่วยให้ท่านพิสูจน์ว่าท่านเป็นมนุษย์จริงและมีเอกลักษณ์เฉพาะตัว
(real and unique human being)
และในขณะเดียวกันก็คุ้มครองความเป็นส่วนตัวของท่านด้วย
2.11 โปรแกรมเชิญชวน
ในกรณีที่มีความพร้อมในการให้บริการ เราอาจเปิดให้ท่านใช้งานฟีเจอร์
'
เชิญชวน
'
เมื่อใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวน ท่านจะสามารถเชิญชวนเพื่อนและครอบครัวให้ดาวน์โหลด
World App
และทำการยืนยันตัวตนเพื่อขอรับ
World ID
ได้ หากท่านใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวน ท่านตกลงยอมรับข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขดังต่อไปนี้
ค่าตอบแทนสำหรับการเข้าร่วมโปรแกรมเชิญชวนจะมอบให้โดย
World Assets Limited
โดย
World Assets Limited
อาจใช้ดุลยพินิจของตนแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการเสนอค่าตอบแทนให้ท่านสำหรับการเชิญชวนผู้ใช้ที่ยืนยันตัวตนเพื่อขอรับ
World ID
สำเร็จ เพื่อรับค่าตอบแทน ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามเงื่อนไขบางประการ ซึ่งจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบใน
World App
ทั้งนี้ จะมีการกำหนดจำนวนผู้ใช้สูงสุดที่ท่านสามารถแนะนำให้ใช้
World App
ได้ โดยจำนวนที่กำหนดดังกล่าวจะแสดงใน
World App
ท่านไม่จำเป็นต้องซื้อสินค้าหรือบริการใด ๆ เพื่อเข้าร่วมโปรแกรมเชิญชวน ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนมีไว้สำหรับการใช้งานส่วนบุคคลที่ไม่ใช่เชิงพาณิชย์เท่านั้น ท่านต้องใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนโดยสุจริตเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ที่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายเท่านั้น ท่านต้องไม่ (ก
)
ใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนหรือบริการในลักษณะที่เป็นการหลอกลวง ฉ้อโกง หรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
(
ข
)
ทำสิ่งใด ๆ ที่ทำให้แบรนด์ ค่าความนิยม หรือชื่อเสียงของเราได้รับความเสียหาย
(
ค
)
ส่งโฆษณาหรือสื่อส่งเสริมการขายโดยไม่ได้รับการร้องขอหรือโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
(
ง
)
กล่าวอ้างข้อมูลที่เป็นเท็จหรือทำให้เข้าใจผิด
(
จ
)
จ่ายเงินซื้อพื้นที่โฆษณาบนโปรแกรมค้นหาข้อมูล ใช้สื่อที่เสียค่าใช้จ่าย หรือดำเนินกิจกรรมที่คล้ายกันเพื่อชักชวนผู้ใช้ผ่านฟีเจอร์เชิญชวน และ (ฉ
)
ใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนเพื่อพยายามขอข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลจากผู้ใช้อื่น
ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนไม่สามารถใช้ได้ในทุกประเทศหรือพื้นที่ และไม่ได้เปิดให้ใช้สำหรับผู้ใช้ทุกคน โปรแกรมเชิญชวนจะไม่เปิดให้ใช้ในประเทศใด ๆ ที่ฟีเจอร์นี้หรือส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งของฟีเจอร์นี้อาจละเมิด (หรือทำให้เราละเมิด) ข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายใด ๆ ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนหากฟีเจอร์เชิญไม่เป็นไปตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับในประเทศของท่าน
ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนจะเปิดให้ใช้งานโดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียว เราอาจเปลี่ยนแปลง แก้ไข ระงับ และยกเลิกฟีเจอร์นี้ได้ทุกเมื่อ
World Assets Limited
อาจปฏิเสธที่จะเสนอค่าตอบแทนให้ท่านสำหรับการเชิญชวนผู้ใช้ให้ยืนยันตัวตนเพื่อรับ
World ID
หาก
World Assets Limited
พิจารณาโดยใช้ดุลยพินิจของตนแต่เพียงผู้เดียวแล้วเห็นว่าท่านได้ละเมิดข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
2.12 WLD Grant
และ
WLD Reservation
หนึ่งในบริการของบุคคลภายนอกคือการขอใช้สิทธิรับโทเคน
WLD
เป็นจำนวนเล็กน้อยในช่วงเวลาแตกต่างกัน (“
WLD Grant”) WLD Grant
จัดหาให้โดย
World Assets Limited
ซึ่งเป็นบริษัทในเครือของ
Worldcoin Foundation
จำนวนที่แน่นอน ช่วงเวลาที่กำหนด และเวลาในการมอบ
WLD Grant
จะแสดงอยู่ใน
World App
แต่จะกำหนดโดย
World Assets Limited
แต่เพียงผู้เดียวเท่านั้น โดยสอดคล้องตามที่ระบุในข้อกำหนดเวอร์ชันก่อนหน้านี้
WLD Reservation
ที่มีอยู่ในเวลาก่อนหน้าจะไม่เป็นการรับประกันว่าท่านจะได้รับ
WLD Grant
ทั้งนี้ จำนวนที่แน่นอน ช่วงเวลาที่กำหนด และเวลาในการจองสิทธิเพื่อรับ
WLD
จะระบุใน
World App
แต่จะกำหนดโดย
World Assets Limited
แต่เพียงผู้เดียวเท่านั้น
WLD Reservation
อาจหมดอายุโดยมีหรือไม่มีการแจ้งล่วงหน้าใน
World App
ก็ได้ ไม่ว่าท่านจะได้รับ
WLD Reservation
หรือ
WLD Grant
ที่เกี่ยวข้องแล้วหรือไม่ก็ตาม
WLD Grant
และ
WLD Reservation
สามารถเพิกถอนได้ โดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของ
World Assets Limited
แต่เพียงผู้เดียว
2.13 Operator App
สำหรับ
Orb Operator
และพันธมิตรอื่น ๆ เรามี
Operator App
ที่ช่วยให้ท่านติดตามตรวจสอบกิจกรรมและสถิติที่เกี่ยวข้องกับท่านและธุรกิจของท่านในฐานะ
Orb Operator
นอกจากนี้ เรายังอาจมีฟีเจอร์บางอย่างที่ช่วยให้ท่านดำเนินธุรกิจในฐานะ
Orb Operator
2.14 Miniapps
“
Miniapps”
เป็นฟีเจอร์ของ
World App
ที่อนุญาตให้ท่านเข้าถึงแพลตฟอร์มซึ่งรวมแอปพลิเคชันขนาดเล็กที่สามารถเข้าถึงได้ภายใน
World App
เรามีสิทธิใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการกำหนดว่าจะแสดง
Miniapps
ภายใน
World App
อย่างไร ท่านต้องมีที่อยู่วอลเล็ต
World App
เพื่อเข้าถึง
Miniapps
ท่านรับทราบว่าในการแสดง
Miniapps TFH
จะให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มเทคโนโลยีที่เชื่อมต่อระหว่างผู้ใช้เท่านั้น ไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตาม
TFH
จะไม่ส่ง เก็บ ครอบครอง ดูแล หรือมีส่วนร่วมโดยประการอื่นกับ           สกุลเงินแบบดั้งเดิมหรือสกุลเงินดิจิทัลใด ๆ
TFH
จะไม่ทำธุรกรรม กระทำการในฐานะที่เป็นผู้ประมวลผลการชำระเงิน หรือมีส่วนร่วมในการประมวลผลธุรกรรมใด ๆ
TFH
ไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในธุรกรรม และ ไม่มีความรับผิดใด ๆ เกี่ยวกับธุรกรรมเหล่านี้
TFH
ไม่สามารถให้การสนับสนุนสำหรับปัญหาในการทำธุรกรรมได้
2.14.1 ธุรกรรมและการชำระเงินที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
Miniapps
Miniapps
จะแสดงอยู่ใน
World App
และอาจเสนอสินค้าหรือบริการที่ผู้ใช้
World App
สามารถซื้อได้โดยใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลในวอลเล็ต
World App
ของตน ธุรกรรมดังกล่าวจะเป็นธุรกรรมระหว่างท่านกับ
miniapp
นั้น และ
TFH
ไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในธุรกรรมดังกล่าว
ในการทำธุรกรรมดังกล่าว ท่านรับทราบว่าวอลเล็ต
World App
เป็นบริการในลักษณะที่ไม่ใช่การดูแลทรัพย์
(non-custodial) TFH
ไม่ได้จัดเก็บหรือดูแลโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านและไม่ได้ทำธุรกรรม ส่ง ถือครอง หรือมีส่วนร่วมโดยประการอื่นในการทำธุรกรรมใด ๆ โทเคนดิจิทัลจะถูกจัดเก็บและส่งบนเครือข่ายบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้องเสมอ จะไม่มีการรับประกันว่าธุรกรรมจะดำเนินการอย่างถูกต้อง
TFH
เพียงเชื่อมต่อท่านกับบุคคลภายนอกในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
เท่านั้น และไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในธุรกรรมใด ๆ
TFH
ไม่มีบทบาทในการประมวลผลการชำระเงินและกำกับดูแลค่าธรรมเนียมการคืนเงินหรือค่าธรรมเนียมการยกเลิก
เมื่อท่านตัดสินใจที่จะทำธุรกรรม ท่านต้องส่งจำนวนและประเภทของโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ตกลงกันไว้
TFH
จะไม่ประมวลผลโทเคนดิจิทัลหรือสกุลเงินแบบดั้งเดิมของผู้ใช้ และไม่ได้ทำการโอนใด ๆ ในนามของผู้ใช้
TFH
จะไม่ดำเนินการ จัดการ ดูแล ตรวจสอบ หรือให้การรับประกันเกี่ยวกับธุรกรรมใด ๆ ในกรณีที่ธุรกรรมถูกส่งไปแต่ไม่ได้รับ ถูกตีกลับ ประมวลผลไม่ถูกต้อง หรือพบข้อผิดพลาดใด ๆ โดยประการอื่น ท่านและผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกต้องดำเนินการร่วมกันเพื่อแก้ไขปัญหานั้น ข้อพิพาท สิทธิเรียกร้อง การสูญเสีย ความเข้าใจผิด ข้อผิดพลาดทางเทคนิค หรือปัญหาใด ๆ (ทั้งที่เกิดขึ้นโดยบังเอิญและโดยเจตนา) ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการชำระเงินหรือธุรกรรมต้องได้รับการจัดการโดยตรงระหว่างท่านกับผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
TFH
จะไม่รับผิดชอบใด ๆ และจะไม่เป็นคู่กรณีในข้อพิพาทหรือการหารือเกี่ยวกับการชำระเงินใด ๆ และไม่รับผิดต่อการสูญเสียหรือค่าเสียหายที่อาจมีขึ้นแก่ฝ่ายที่เกี่ยวข้อง
ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการยอมรับความเสี่ยงของความผันผวนของราคาที่เกี่ยวข้องกับมูลค่าโทเคนดิจิทัล และท่านเข้าใจว่าภายในเวลาที่ท่านทำธุรกรรมเสร็จสิ้น มูลค่าโทเคนดิจิทัลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับธุรกรรมนั้นอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงไปอย่างมาก
2.14.2 บุคคลภายนอก
ผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการที่แสดงใน
miniapp
ใด ๆ นำเสนอและจัดการโดยบุคคลภายนอก โดยการใช้แพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่า
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นข้อกำหนดระหว่างท่านกับเรา ไม่ใช่กับ
miniapp
ใด ๆ โดยเฉพาะ
ท่านกำลังเข้าถึงแอปที่พัฒนาและ/หรือจัดหาให้โดยแอปของบุคคลภายนอก โดยบุคคลดังกล่าวต้องรับผิดชอบต่อ
miniapp
แต่เพียงผู้เดียว
TFH
เพียงให้สิทธิในการเข้าถึงผู้ให้บริการด้านการชำระเงินของบุคคลภายนอกผ่านวอลเล็ต
World App
เท่านั้น และไม่ได้ประมวลผลการชำระเงินหรือถือเงินไว้ด้วยตนเอง
miniapps
อาจมีข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมซึ่งเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการของตน ซึ่งท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามหากท่านยอมรับบริการของบุคคลดังกล่าว และ
ท่านรับทราบเต็มที่และยอมรับความเสี่ยงทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวข้องกับธุรกรรมอย่างชัดแจ้ง และตกลงว่าเราจะไม่ต้องรับผิดต่อความเสี่ยงหรือผลกระทบที่ไม่พึงประสงค์ใด ๆ จากธุรกรรมดังกล่าว
นักพัฒนา
miniapp
แต่ละรายที่แสดงอยู่ในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
ต้องรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวต่อเนื้อหา ผลิตภัณฑ์ สินค้า หรือบริการที่เสนอให้ท่านโดยตรงผ่านทาง
miniapp
ที่เกี่ยวข้อง หากท่านมีข้อสงสัยหรือข้อพิพาทใด ๆ กรุณาติดต่อกับนักพัฒนาดังกล่าวโดยตรง
ผู้ใช้ยอมรับความเสี่ยงทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการทำธุรกรรม รวมถึงความเสี่ยงที่จะไม่ได้รับผลตอบแทนจากการซื้อหรือขายสินทรัพย์ ในกรณีที่มีปัญหาเกี่ยวกับธุรกรรมใด ๆ
TFH
จะไม่สามารถช่วยแก้ไขปัญหาได้ และจะไม่รับผิดต่อปัญหาที่เกิดจากธุรกรรมใด ๆ
2.14.3 ค่าธรรมเนียม
TFH
เราอาจคิดค่าธรรมเนียมสำหรับการใช้แพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
เมื่อท่านทำธุรกรรมกับนักพัฒนา จำนวนค่าธรรมเนียมนี้จะแสดงให้ท่านเห็นภายในแพลตฟอร์ม ค่าธรรมเนียมดังกล่าวจะแสดงและเป็นปัจจุบันตามที่แสดงใน
Miniapps
และอาจมีการปรับปรุงและเปลี่ยนแปลงเป็นครั้งคราว
2.14.4 ภาษี
ท่านมีความรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการพิจารณาว่าภาษีจะมีผลบังคับกับธุรกรรมที่ดำเนินการผ่าน
Miniapps
หรือธุรกรรมใด ๆ ที่ท่านดำเนินการใน
Miniapps
หรือไม่และในขอบเขตใดบ้าง รวมทั้งมีหน้าที่ในการหัก จัดเก็บ รายงาน และส่งภาษีเป็นจำนวนที่ถูกต้องไปยังหน่วยงานภาษีที่เหมาะสม
2.14.5 ไม่มีการตรวจสอบทั่วไป
TFH
ไม่มีหน้าที่ในการตรวจสอบทั่วไปเกี่ยวกับข้อมูลที่สร้างโดยผู้ใช้ และไม่มีหน้าที่แสวงหาข้อเท็จจริงหรือสถานการณ์ที่บ่งชี้ถึงกิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมายใด ๆ ภายในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
อย่างไรก็ตาม หากเราทราบไม่ว่าจะด้วยวิธีใดก็ตามว่ามีการเสนอผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมายผ่านทาง
Miniapps
ให้กับผู้ใช้ที่อยู่ในสหภาพยุโรป เราจะแจ้งให้ผู้ใช้ที่ซื้อผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมายผ่าน
Miniapps
ทราบ
2.14.6 สิ่งที่ห้ามกระทำ
ผู้ใช้บริการ
Miniapps
ตกลงว่าจะไม่โพสต์หรือเผยแพร่เนื้อหาใด ๆ ที่ละเมิดกฎหมายหรือสิทธิของบุคคลภายนอก รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา สิทธิในความเป็นส่วนตัว หรือสิทธิในการนำภาพลักษณ์ของบุคคลไปใช้ในทางพาณิชย์
นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ดำเนินการใด ๆ ซึ่ง
ผิดกฎหมาย เป็นการฉ้อโกง หรือเป็นอันตราย
รบกวนหรือขัดขวางการทำงานของ
Miniapps
ละเมิดข้อกำหนดใด ๆ ที่ระบุในแนวทางการใช้งานแอปของเรา และ
เกี่ยวข้องกับเนื้อหาที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตตามแนวทางการใช้งานแอป
2.14.7 การแจ้งเตือนเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมาย
World App
มีกลไกที่เข้าถึงได้ง่ายและใช้งานง่ายสำหรับผู้ใช้ในการแจ้งเตือนเราเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
เราจะดำเนินการตรวจสอบรายงานดังกล่าวอย่างรวดเร็ว
2.14.8
การลบเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมาย
หากเราพิจารณาแล้วเห็นว่า
miniapp
ใดมีเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายหรือเสนอผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมาย
miniapp
นั้นจะถูกลบออกจากแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
ทั้งนี้
TFH
จะจัดทำคำชี้แจงเหตุผลโดยย่อที่ชัดเจนและเฉพาะเจาะจงเพื่อแจ้งให้ผู้โพสต์เนื้อหาหรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมายทราบ
การบังคับใช้ข้อจำกัดใด ๆ โดย
World App
ต่อผู้ใช้จะดำเนินการอย่างรอบคอบ เป็นกลาง และได้สัดส่วน
ผู้ใช้ที่เชื่อว่าเนื้อหาของตนถูกลบหรือการเข้าถึงเนื้อหาถูกปิดกั้นโดยไม่เป็นธรรมสามารถติดต่อเราได้ที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
เพื่ออุทธรณ์การตัดสินใจนั้น เรามีระบบสำหรับยื่นข้อร้องเรียนทางอิเล็กทรอนิกส์โดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่าย ซึ่งช่วยให้ผู้ใช้สามารถคัดค้านการตัดสินใจของเราเกี่ยวกับการลบเนื้อหา การระงับการให้บริการ การยกเลิกบัญชี หรือการจำกัดการสร้างรายได้เนื่องจากเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายหรือการละเมิดข้อกำหนดที่มีการกล่าวอ้าง
2.14.9 การกลั่นกรองเนื้อหา
TFH
สงวนสิทธิในการระงับการให้บริการแก่ผู้ใช้ที่แสดงเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายอย่างชัดเจนบ่อยครั้งเป็นระยะเวลาตามสมควรหลังจากที่ได้ออกคำเตือนล่วงหน้าแล้วหากกฎหมายกำหนด นอกจากนี้
TFH
อาจระงับการประมวลผลการแจ้งเตือนและการร้องเรียนจากผู้ใช้ที่มีข้อกล่าวอ้างที่ไม่มีมูลความจริงบ่อยครั้งไว้เป็นการชั่วคราว
2.15 ชื่อผู้ใช้
ชื่อผู้ใช้
World App
ของท่านไม่จำเป็นต้องเป็นชื่อจริงของท่าน ในการเลือกชื่อผู้ใช้ ท่านมีหน้าที่ต้องปฏิบัติตามนโยบายเกี่ยวกับชื่อผู้ใช้ฉบับปรับปรุงล่าสุด
3. การซื้อ ค่าธรรมเนียม และภาษี
3.1 ค่าธรรมเนียมการทำธุรกรรม
โดยการใช้บริการ ท่านตกลงว่าจะชำระค่าธรรมเนียมที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด รวมถึงค่าธรรมเนียมการทำธุรกรรมสำหรับการแลกเปลี่ยนและการทำธุรกรรมเกี่ยวกับโทเคนดิจิทัล เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบถึงค่าธรรมเนียมที่ใช้บังคับก่อนที่ท่านจะทำธุรกรรม หากท่านใช้บริการชำระเงินของบุคคลภายนอก ค่าธรรมเนียมธนาคาร ค่าธรรมเนียมบัตรเครดิต และค่าธรรมเนียมบัตรเดบิตที่เรียกเก็บสำหรับการซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ อาจถูกหักออกจากจำนวนเงินที่ชำระสำหรับการซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน นอกจากนี้ ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบในการชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเพิ่มเติมใด ๆ ที่เรียกเก็บโดยผู้ให้บริการทางการเงินของท่าน
3.2 ค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่าย
การโต้ตอบกับบล็อกเชนมีค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่าย ค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่ายจะถูกเรียกเก็บโดยและชำระให้กับเครือข่ายบล็อกเชน (ไม่ใช่เรา) สำหรับการอำนวยความสะดวกในการโต้ตอบ    ใด ๆ ในบางกรณีท่านอาจมีสิทธิทำธุรกรรมโดยไม่ต้องเสียค่าธรรมเนียมการทำธุรกรรม (
gas-free transaction)
เป็นจำนวนครั้งที่กำหนดภายในระยะเวลาที่กำหนดซึ่งขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจอันเป็นที่สุดของ
TFH
ธุรกรรมดังกล่าวอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของมูลค่าการทำธุรกรรมขั้นต่ำซึ่ง
TFH
อาจปรับเปลี่ยนได้ในภายหลัง
3.3 ภาษี
ท่านมีความรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการพิจารณาว่าภาษีจะมีผลบังคับกับธุรกรรมที่ดำเนินการผ่านบริการหรือไม่และในขอบเขตใดบ้าง รวมทั้งมีหน้าที่ในการหัก จัดเก็บ รายงาน และส่งภาษีเป็นจำนวนที่ถูกต้องไปยังหน่วยงานภาษีที่เหมาะสม
3.4 การเปลี่ยนแปลง
ค่าธรรมเนียมทั้งหมดจะแสดงและเป็นปัจจุบันตามที่แสดงในบริการ และอาจมีการปรับปรุงและเปลี่ยนแปลงเป็นครั้งคราว
4. ปัจจัยเสี่ยง
4.1 ไม่ใช่เงินตราที่ใช้ชำระหนี้ได้ตามกฎหมาย
โทเคนดิจิทัลไม่ใช่เงินตราที่ใช้ชำระหนี้ได้ตามกฎหมาย ไม่ได้รับการรับรองจากรัฐบาล และบัญชีโทเคนดิจิทัลและยอดคงเหลือในบริการไม่อยู่ภายใต้การคุ้มครองของ
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
,
Securities Investor Protection Corporation
หรือการคุ้มครองที่คล้ายกันในประเทศอื่น ๆ เราไม่ใช่ธนาคารและไม่ให้บริการดูแลทรัพย์สิน (
fiduciary service
)  ธุรกรรมที่ดำเนินการผ่าน
World App
ส่วนใหญ่ไม่อยู่ภายใต้การกำกับดูแลในหลายประเทศ เราไม่รับประกันการทำงานของบล็อกเชนที่เรารับรอง ซึ่งอาจนำไปสู่ความล่าช้า การขัดกันแห่งผลประโยชน์ หรือการตัดสินใจเกี่ยวกับการดำเนินงานโดยบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งทำให้เจ้าของโทเคนดิจิทัลบางรายเสียประโยชน์ หรือทำให้ท่านไม่สามารถทำธุรกรรมผ่านทางบริการได้จนเสร็จสมบูรณ์ รายละเอียดธุรกรรมที่ท่านส่งผ่านบริการอาจไม่สมบูรณ์ หรืออาจเกิดความล่าช้าอย่างมีนัยสำคัญบนบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้อง และเราจะไม่รับผิดชอบสำหรับธุรกรรมที่ไม่ได้รับการยืนยันหรือไม่สามารถประมวลผลได้ตามที่คาดหวัง จะไม่มีการรับประกันหรือการรับรองว่าการโอนที่ดำเนินการผ่านบริการจะส่งผลให้เป็นการโอนกรรมสิทธิ์หรือสิทธิในโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ได้สำเร็จ นอกจากนี้ อาจมีความเสี่ยงเฉพาะที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลบางประเภท เช่น โทเคน
WLD
ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมเกี่ยวกับความเสี่ยงเฉพาะที่เกี่ยวข้องกับโทเคน
WLD
ได้ที่นี่
4.2 เทคโนโลยีใหม่
บริการของเราเป็นเทคโนโลยีใหม่ แม้ว่าซอฟต์แวร์นี้จะได้รับการทดสอบอย่างครอบคลุมแล้ว แต่ซอฟต์แวร์ที่ใช้สำหรับบริการยังค่อนข้างใหม่และอาจมีข้อบกพร่องหรือช่องโหว่ด้านความปลอดภัย นอกจากนี้ ซอฟต์แวร์ยังอยู่ระหว่างการพัฒนาและอาจมีการเปลี่ยนแปลงอย่างมากเมื่อเวลาผ่านไป ซึ่งอาจไม่ตรงกับความคาดหวังของผู้ใช้
4.3 ความเสี่ยงด้านความปลอดภัยของข้อมูล
โทเคนดิจิทัลและการใช้บริการอาจถูกยึดหรือโจรกรรมได้ แฮกเกอร์หรือกลุ่มหรือองค์กรผู้ไม่หวังดีอื่น ๆ อาจพยายามแทรกแซงบริการในหลายวิธี รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงการโจมตีด้วยมัลแวร์ การโจมตีโดยปฏิเสธการให้บริการ (
denial of service attack)
การโจมตีต่อระบบฉันทามติ (
consensus-based attack)
การโจมตีแบบ
Sybil
การโจมตีแบบ
smurfing
และการโจมตีแบบ
spoofing
นอกจากนี้ เนื่องจากเครือข่ายบล็อกเชนที่เรารับรอง เช่น โปรโตคอล
Ethereum
ทำงานโดยอิงตามซอฟต์แวร์โอเพ่นซอร์ส ซอฟต์แวร์ที่เป็นพื้นฐานของบริการอาจมีข้อบกพร่องหรือจุดอ่อนที่ตั้งใจหรือไม่ตั้งใจ ซึ่งอาจส่งผลกระทบต่อบริการในทางลบ หรือทำให้ผู้ใช้สูญเสียโทเคนดิจิทัลหรือสูญเสียความสามารถในการเข้าถึงหรือควบคุมวอลเล็ตของตนผ่านบริการ ในกรณีที่เกิดข้อบกพร่องหรือจุดอ่อนของซอฟต์แวร์ดังกล่าว เราอาจไม่มีวิธีการแก้ไขข้อบกพร่องหรือจุดอ่อนของซอฟต์แวร์นั้น และเราจะไม่รับประกันว่าผู้ใช้จะได้รับทางเยียวยา การคืนเงิน หรือการชดเชยใด ๆ
4.4 ความถูกต้อง
แม้ว่าเราตั้งใจที่จะมอบข้อมูลที่ถูกต้องและเป็นปัจจุบัน แต่ข้อมูลที่มอบให้ผ่านบริการ (รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงเนื้อหา) อาจไม่ถูกต้อง ครบถ้วน หรือเป็นปัจจุบันเสมอไป และอาจมีความไม่ถูกต้องทางเทคนิคหรือข้อผิดพลาดในการพิมพ์ ในความพยายามที่จะมอบข้อมูลที่ครบถ้วนและถูกต้องที่สุดเท่าที่จะเป็นไปได้ เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต ข้อมูลอาจมีการเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือปรับปรุงเป็นครั้งคราวโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบ รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับนโยบาย ผลิตภัณฑ์ และบริการของเรา ดังนั้น ท่านควรตรวจสอบข้อมูลทั้งหมดก่อนที่จะอ้างอิงข้อมูลนั้น และการตัดสินใจทั้งหมดที่อิงตามข้อมูลที่มอบให้ผ่านบริการจะถือเป็นความรับผิดชอบของท่านแต่เพียงผู้เดียว และเราจะไม่มีความรับผิดต่อการตัดสินใจดังกล่าว
4.5 ความพร้อมใช้งาน
แม้ว่าเราพยายามที่จะให้บริการที่ยอดเยี่ยมแก่ท่าน เราไม่รับประกันว่าบริการจะพร้อมใช้งานเสมอโดยไม่หยุดชะงัก บริการอาจไม่สามารถใช้งานได้ชั่วคราวเป็นครั้งคราวเพื่อทำการบำรุงรักษาหรือด้วยเหตุผลอื่น ๆ เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อข้อผิดพลาด การละเว้น การหยุดชะงัก การลบ ข้อบกพร่อง ความล่าช้าในการดำเนินการหรือการส่ง การขัดข้องของสายการสื่อสาร การโจรกรรมหรือการทำลาย หรือการเข้าถึงโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต หรือการเปลี่ยนแปลงการสื่อสารของผู้ใช้ เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อปัญหาหรือความผิดพลาดทางเทคนิคใด ๆ ของเครือข่ายหรือสายโทรศัพท์ ระบบออนไลน์ของคอมพิวเตอร์ เซิร์ฟเวอร์หรือผู้ให้บริการ อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์ ซอฟต์แวร์ ความล้มเหลวของอีเมลหรือโปรแกรมต่าง ๆ ซึ่งเกิดขึ้นจากปัญหาทางเทคนิคหรือความแออัดของการจราจรบนอินเทอร์เน็ตหรือในบริการ หรือสิ่งต่าง ๆ ข้างต้นรวมกัน รวมถึงการบาดเจ็บหรือความเสียหายต่อผู้ใช้หรือคอมพิวเตอร์ของบุคคลอื่นใดซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับหรือเกิดจากการมีส่วนร่วมกับหรือการดาวน์โหลดข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อการสูญเสียหรือความเสียหาย ค่าเสียหายทางการเงินหรือการสูญเสียผลกำไร การสูญเสียธุรกิจ หรือการบาดเจ็บส่วนบุคคลหรือการเสียชีวิตใด ๆ ซึ่งเกิดจากการที่บุคคลใดใช้บริการ เนื้อหาใด ๆ ที่โพสต์บนหรือผ่านทางบริการหรือส่งไปยังผู้ใช้ หรือการโต้ตอบใด ๆ ระหว่างผู้ใช้บริการ ไม่ว่าจะผ่านช่องทางออนไลน์หรือออฟไลน์ก็ตาม
4.6 กระบวนการแยกตัว หรือ
Fork
ซอฟต์แวร์ที่ใช้สร้าง
WLD
เป็นซอฟต์แวร์โอเพ่นซอร์สซึ่งเปิดให้บุคคลทั่วไปทำสำเนาและนำไปใช้ได้โดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่าย ซึ่งหมายความว่าทุกคนสามารถสร้าง
WLD
ฉบับดัดแปลงได้ โดยกระบวนการดังกล่าวจะเรียกว่า “กระบวนการ
fork
” ในกรณีที่เกิดกระบวนการ
fork
หรือการหยุดชะงักของเครือข่ายโทเคนดิจิทัลอื่น ๆ เราอาจไม่สามารถให้การสนับสนุนกิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับกระบวนการ
fork
ได้ ธุรกรรมอาจไม่เสร็จสมบูรณ์ เสร็จสมบูรณ์บางส่วน เสร็จสมบูรณ์อย่างไม่ถูกต้อง หรือล่าช้าอย่างมากเมื่อเกิดกระบวนการ
fork
เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อการสูญเสียใด ๆ ที่มีขึ้นแก่ท่าน ซึ่งเกิดขึ้นจากกระบวนการ
fork
หรือการหยุดชะงักของเครือข่ายอื่น ๆ ไม่ว่าทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วน
4.7 บริการของบุคคลภายนอก
ในกรณีที่ทำได้ (ดูข้อ
5)
เราอาศัยผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกในการให้บริการฟีเจอร์และฟังก์ชันบางส่วนภายในแอป เช่น ความสามารถในการซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลด้วยสกุลเงินแบบดั้งเดิม หรือความสามารถในการแลกเปลี่ยนสินทรัพย์ดิจิทัลหนึ่งเป็นอีกสินทรัพย์หนึ่ง เราไม่ได้เป็น              ผู้ให้บริการดังกล่าวและไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในการทำธุรกรรมดังกล่าว ท่านต้องพึ่งพาผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกในการใช้บริการนั้น และท่านต้องมีบัญชีกับผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกและยอมรับข้อกำหนดของบุคคลภายนอกนั้น เราไม่สามารถช่วยเหลือท่านได้หากท่านพบปัญหาในการใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอก และเราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อธุรกรรมใด ๆ ที่ท่านดำเนินการโดยใช้ผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
5. ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา
5.1 การเป็นเจ้าของ
ซอฟต์แวร์ แอปพลิเคชัน บริการ เนื้อหา เครื่องหมาย (ตามคำจำกัดความด้านล่างนี้) และการออกแบบของเรา และการเลือก และการจัดเรียงเนื้อหาในบริการ (“ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา”) ได้รับการคุ้มครองโดยลิขสิทธิ์ เครื่องหมายการค้า สิทธิบัตร และสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาอื่น ๆ และกฎหมายของสหรัฐอเมริกาและประเทศอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้อง ท่านตกลงว่าจะปฏิบัติตามสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาและกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด รวมถึงประกาศหรือข้อจำกัดเกี่ยวกับเครื่องหมายการค้าหรือลิขสิทธิ์ที่แสดงอยู่ในข้อตกลงหรือบริการ ท่านต้องไม่ลบประกาศเกี่ยวกับลิขสิทธิ์ เครื่องหมายการค้า หรือสิทธิความเป็นเจ้าของ ใด ๆ ที่แสดงอยู่ในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา
5.2 เครื่องหมายการค้า
ชื่อ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
โลโก้
World App
และโลโก้และสโลแกนที่เกี่ยวข้องทั้งหมดเป็นเครื่องหมายการค้าหรือเครื่องหมายบริการของ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
หรือผู้อนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิของ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
(“เครื่องหมาย”) ท่านต้องไม่คัดลอก เลียนแบบ หรือใช้เครื่องหมายทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรจากเรา เครื่องหมายการค้า ชื่อ หรือโลโก้อื่น ๆ ทั้งหมดที่กล่าวถึงในบริการเป็นทรัพย์สินของเจ้าของสิทธิที่เกี่ยวข้อง และท่านต้องไม่คัดลอก เลียนแบบ หรือใช้สิ่งเหล่านั้นทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรจากเจ้าของเครื่องหมายการค้าที่เกี่ยวข้อง การแสดงเครื่องหมายของบุคคลอื่นในบริการจะไม่ถือเป็นการอนุมัติ การรับรอง หรือการแนะนำโดยเราแต่อย่างใด
6. การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิและข้อจำกัด
6.1 การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิ
โดยมีเงื่อนไขว่าท่านมีสิทธิใช้บริการและท่านปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ เราอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิอันจำกัดในการเข้าถึงและใช้บริการ
6.2 ข้อจำกัดของการอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิ
ท่านต้องไม่นำเนื้อหาไปเผยแพร่ซ้ำผ่านทางเว็บไซต์ใด ๆ บนอินเทอร์เน็ต อินทราเน็ต หรือเอ็กซ์ทราเน็ต หรือนำข้อมูลไปรวมในฐานข้อมูลหรือการรวบรวมข้อมูลอื่น ๆ และต้องไม่นำเนื้อหาไปใช้ในลักษณะอื่นใดที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตโดยเด็ดขาด ท่านต้องไม่ใช้บริการในลักษณะอื่นใดนอกเหนือจากที่ได้รับอนุญาตอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้โดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรล่วงหน้าจากเราโดยเด็ดขาด และการดำเนินการดังกล่าวจะทำให้การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธินี้สิ้นสุดลง การใช้บริการในลักษณะที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตดังกล่าวอาจเป็นการละเมิดกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงกฎหมายลิขสิทธิ์และเครื่องหมายการค้า และข้อบังคับและกฎหมายว่าด้วยการสื่อสารที่ใช้บังคับ เว้นแต่เมื่อระบุไว้อย่างชัดเจนในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ ไม่มีส่วนใดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่สามารถตีความได้ว่าเป็นการอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา ไม่ว่าจะตามหลักกฎหมายปิดปาก หรือโดยปริยาย หรือโดยประการอื่น เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราสามารถเพิกถอนการอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธินี้ได้ตลอดเวลาโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบล่วงหน้า ไม่ว่าจะโดยมีเหตุหรือไม่มีเหตุก็ตาม
6.3 รัฐบาล
หากท่านเป็นผู้ใช้ปลายทางซึ่งเป็นรัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกา เราอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิในการใช้บริการในลักษณะที่เป็น “สินค้าพาณิชย์ (
Commercial Item)
” ตามคำจำกัดความในประมวลข้อบังคับของรัฐบาลกลางสหรัฐอเมริกา (
S. Code of Federal Regulations)
(ดู
48 C.F.R. § 2.101)
และสิทธิที่เรามอบให้ท่านในการใช้บริการเป็นสิทธิเดียวกันกับที่เรามอบให้กับผู้ใช้รายอื่นตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
7. การใช้งานที่อนุญาต
7.1 ท่านต้องใช้บริการเพื่อการใช้งานส่วนบุคคลของท่านเองเท่านั้น เราสงวนสิทธิไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตามโดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการตรวจสอบ ยกเลิก หรือระงับสิทธิของท่านในการเข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ รายการการใช้งานที่ไม่อนุญาตเป็นเพียงตัวอย่างเท่านั้น และไม่ใช่รายการที่ครบถ้วนสมบูรณ์ เราอาจใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการเพิ่มหรือลบการใช้งานที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
7.2 การใช้งานที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตรวมถึง
กิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมาย
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่ละเมิดหรืออำนวยความสะดวกในการละเมิดมาตรการลงโทษซึ่งบังคับใช้โดย
OFAC
ละเมิดหรืออำนวยความสะดวกในการละเมิดกฎหมายใด ๆ ในประเทศที่เราดำเนินธุรกิจ มีความเกี่ยวข้องกับรายได้จากกิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมายใด ๆ หรือเป็นการตีพิมพ์หรือเผยแพร่วัสดุหรือข้อมูลที่ผิดกฎหมายใด ๆ
การใช้งานที่มากเกินไปหรือการแฮ็ก
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่ก่อให้เกิดภาระที่ไม่สมเหตุสมผลหรือมากเกินไปต่อโครงสร้างพื้นฐานของเรา แทรกแซงในทางที่ก่อให้เกิดความเสียหาย ขัดขวางการทำงาน หรือเข้ายึดระบบ ข้อมูล หรือสารสนเทศใด ๆ ส่งหรืออัปโหลดเนื้อหาใด ๆ ไปยังบริการที่มีไวรัส โทรจัน เวิร์ม หรือโปรแกรมที่เป็นภัยหรือเป็นอันตรายอื่น ๆ หรือพยายามเข้าถึงระบบคอมพิวเตอร์หรือเครือข่ายที่เชื่อมต่อกับบริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
การละเมิดผู้อื่น
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่แทรกแซงการเข้าถึงหรือการใช้บริการของบุคคลอื่น หมิ่นประมาท ละเมิด  ขู่กรรโชก คุกคาม สะกดรอย ข่มขู่ หรือฝ่าฝืนความเป็นส่วนตัว ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา หรือสิทธิตามกฎหมาย
อื่น ๆ ของบุคคลอื่น ยุยง ข่มขู่ กระตุ้น ส่งเสริม หรือสนับสนุนความเกลียดชัง การแบ่งแยกเชื้อชาติ หรือการกระทำที่รุนแรงต่อผู้อื่น หรือเก็บเกี่ยว สกัด หรือเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลของผู้ใช้อื่นจากบริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
การฉ้อโกงและการปฏิบัติทางการค้าที่ไม่เป็นธรรมอื่น ๆ
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่ดำเนินการเพื่อฉ้อโกงเรา ผู้ใช้ของเรา หรือบุคคลอื่นใด มอบข้อมูลที่เป็นเท็จ ไม่ถูกต้อง หรือทำให้เข้าใจผิดแก่เรา สัญญาผลตอบแทนที่สูงเกินไปหรือขายบริการที่ไม่มีประโยชน์ที่แท้จริงแก่ผู้ซื้อ หรือส่งเสริมการปฏิบัติที่เป็นการเอารัดเอาเปรียบและหลอกลวงอื่น ๆ รวมถึงสลากกินแบ่ง การจับฉลาก การประมูลแบบมีค่าธรรมเนียมการเสนอราคา (
bidding fee auction)
การแข่งขัน การชิงโชค การพนัน หรือเกมเสี่ยงโชคอื่น ๆ ที่ผิดกฎหมาย
การละเมิดทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการขาย การเผยแพร่ หรือการอนุญาตให้เข้าถึงเพลง ภาพยนตร์ หรือซอฟต์แวร์ปลอมแปลง หรือเนื้อหาที่มีลิขสิทธิ์อื่น ๆ โดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตอย่างถูกต้องจากผู้ถือสิทธิ ใช้ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา (รวมถึงเครื่องหมาย) โดยไม่ได้รับความยินยอมอย่างชัดแจ้งหรือในลักษณะที่ทำให้เราหรือแบรนด์ของเราเสียหาย แสดงโดยนัยถึงการรับรองหรือความสัมพันธ์กับเราโดยไม่เป็นความจริง หรือละเมิดลิขสิทธิ์ เครื่องหมายการค้า สิทธิในการนำภาพลักษณ์ของบุคคลไปใช้ในทางพาณิชย์หรือความเป็นส่วนตัว หรือสิทธิความเป็นเจ้าของอื่นใดตามกฎหมาย
8. Orb Operator
เราเป็นพันธมิตรกับผู้รับจ้างอิสระในประเทศที่เรียกว่า “
Orb Operator”
ซึ่งอำนวยความสะดวกในการลงทะเบียนผู้ใช้และช่วยตอบคำถามที่ท่านอาจมีเกี่ยวกับเรา
Orb Operator
เหล่านี้ได้รับการฝึกอบรมและมีความรู้เกี่ยวกับ
World Network
เป็นอย่างดี อย่างไรก็ตาม เราไม่มีอำนาจควบคุม
Orb Operator
และปฏิเสธความรับผิดทั้งหมดสำหรับสิ่งที่
Orb Operator
กล่าวและความประพฤติของ
Orb Operator
Orb Operator
ไม่ใช่ตัวแทนหรือพนักงานของเราไม่ว่าในทางใดก็ตาม การดำเนินการ ฟีเจอร์ กระบวนการ นโยบาย มาตรฐาน หรือความพยายามอื่น ๆ ที่ดำเนินการโดย
TFH
เพื่อประโยชน์ของผู้ใช้ไม่ได้บ่งบอกถึงความสัมพันธ์ในลักษณะของการจ้างงานหรือตัวการ/ตัวแทนกับ
Orb Operator
แต่อย่างใด
9. การระงับ
เราอาจระงับและจำกัดสิทธิของท่านในการเข้าถึงบริการ (
i)
หากเราจำเป็นต้องดำเนินการดังกล่าวตามหมายเรียก คำสั่งศาล หรือคำสั่งที่มีผลผูกพันของหน่วยงานของรัฐ ซึ่งมีผลบังคับตามที่ปรากฏในเอกสาร
(ii)
หากเรามีเหตุให้สงสัยได้ว่าท่านใช้บริการในลักษณะที่เป็นการใช้งานที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
(iii)
หากการใช้บริการของท่านอยู่ภายใต้การดำเนินคดี การสอบสวน หรือการดำเนินการโดยหน่วยงานรัฐซึ่งอยู่ระหว่างการดำเนินการ และ/หรือเราเห็นว่ามีความเสี่ยงสูงที่จะเกิดการไม่ปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายหรือข้อบังคับซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับการดำเนินการของท่าน
(iv)
หากพันธมิตรทางธุรกิจซึ่งให้การสนับสนุนบริการของเราไม่สามารถสนับสนุนการใช้งานของท่านได้
(v)
หากท่านดำเนินการใด ๆ ที่เราเห็นว่าเป็นการหลบเลี่ยงการควบคุมของเรา (รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงการพยายามสร้างบัญชีหลายบัญชี)
10. ไม่ใช่การเสนอขายหลักทรัพย์หรือประโยชน์ที่อ้างอิงกับสินค้าโภคภัณฑ์
เนื้อหาของบริการไม่ถือเป็นการเสนอซื้อหรือเสนอขาย หรือการชักชวนให้ซื้อหรือขายการลงทุน หลักทรัพย์ ผลประโยชน์ในการเป็นหุ้นส่วน สินค้าโภคภัณฑ์ หรือเครื่องมือทางการเงินอื่น ๆ นอกจากนี้ เนื้อหาหรือบริการจะไม่ถือเป็นและต้องไม่ถูกใช้เพื่อหรือในลักษณะที่เป็นการเสนอหรือการชักชวนโดยบุคคลใดก็ตามในรัฐหรือประเทศใด ๆ ที่การเสนอหรือการชักชวนดังกล่าวไม่ได้รับอนุญาตหรือไม่สามารถทำได้ หรือการเสนอหรือการชักชวนต่อบุคคลใด ซึ่งการเสนอหรือการชักชวนต่อบุคคลนั้นไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
11. เนื้อหา
11.1 การอ้างอิงเนื้อหา การเปลี่ยนแปลงบริการ
ข้อมูลและเนื้อหาที่เรามอบให้ท่านผ่านบริการ (“เนื้อหา”) มีวัตถุประสงค์เพื่อเป็นข้อมูลทั่วไปเท่านั้น และเท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราไม่รับประกันความถูกต้อง ประโยชน์ หรือความครบถ้วนของเนื้อหานั้น ท่านต้องรับความเสี่ยงจากการอ้างอิงเนื้อหาของเราด้วยตัวท่านเอง เราจะไม่รับผิดหรือรับผิดชอบต่อการกระทำใด ๆ ที่ท่านได้ดำเนินการไปหรือไม่ได้ดำเนินการเนื่องจากเนื้อหานั้น หรือต่อบุคคลที่ได้รับการแบ่งปันเนื้อหาจากท่าน คำแถลงของผู้ใช้รายอื่นที่อธิบายถึงการใช้บริการของเราซึ่งแสดงอยู่ในบริการหรือที่อื่น ๆ จะไม่ถือเป็นการที่เรารับรองคำแถลงของบุคคลดังกล่าวหาก
คำแถลงนั้นไม่สอดคล้องกับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้หรือเนื้อหาของเรา เราอาจปรับปรุงเนื้อหาเป็นครั้งคราว
แต่เนื้อหาดังกล่าวอาจไม่ครบถ้วนหรือเป็นปัจจุบัน และเราไม่มีหน้าที่ต่อท่านในการปรับปรุงเนื้อหาหรือส่วนอื่น ๆ ของบริการ เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือยุติการจัดหาเนื้อหาหรือบริการส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งหรือทั้งหมดไม่ว่าชั่วคราวหรือถาวรโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้า เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราจะไม่รับผิดต่อการเปลี่ยนแปลง การระงับ หรือการยุติการจัดหาเนื้อหาหรือบริการส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งหรือทั้งหมด
11.2 บริการและเนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอก
เราอาจแสดงลิงก์ที่นำไปยังสื่อการเรียนรู้ การสัมมนาผ่านเว็บ การพบปะ และการประชาสัมพันธ์บนแพลตฟอร์มสื่อสังคมออนไลน์ (“บริการของบุคคลภายนอก”) ซึ่งช่วยให้เกิดการแบ่งปันและการทำงานร่วมกันระหว่างผู้ใช้กับบุคคลภายนอก หากท่านแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล รูปภาพ ความคิดเห็น เนื้อหา หรือข้อมูลอื่น ๆ บนบริการของบุคคลภายนอก ท่านต้องรับความเสี่ยงจากการดำเนินการดังกล่าวด้วยตัวเอง และการใช้บริการดังกล่าวจะอยู่ภายใต้ข้อกำหนดการใช้งานและนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของบริการของบุคคลภายนอก ไม่ใช่ของเรา ท่านควรตรวจสอบข้อกำหนดการให้บริการที่ใช้บังคับกับบริการของบุคคลภายนอกแต่ละรายเพื่อทำความเข้าใจสิทธิของท่านและวิธีที่แพลตฟอร์มเหล่านั้นใช้ข้อมูลของท่าน เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อการสูญเสีย การโจรกรรม การละเมิด หรือการใช้ข้อมูลของท่านในทางที่ผิดใด ๆ ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับบริการของบุคคลภายนอก (รวมถึงความประมาทเลินเล่อ)
เว้นแต่ในกรณีที่เราไม่สามารถจำกัดความรับผิดได้ตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ ท่านต้องใช้ข้อมูลใด ๆ ที่จัดหาให้โดยบริการของบุคคลภายนอก (“เนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอก”) โดยรับความเสี่ยงด้วยตัวท่านเอง และเราไม่ให้คำมั่นใด ๆ กับท่านว่าเนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอกจะถูกต้อง ครบถ้วน เป็นความจริง หรือเหมาะสมกับสถานการณ์ส่วนบุคคลของท่าน เนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอกรวมถึงข้อมูลที่จัดหาให้โดยผู้ใช้รายอื่นที่ไม่ได้รับการรับรองจากเราโดยเฉพาะ
11.3 เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้
ในฐานะที่เป็นส่วนหนึ่งของชุมชน
Worldcoin
ท่านอาจโพสต์ข้อความ ข้อมูล ซอฟต์แวร์ รูปภาพ วิดีโอ หรือเนื้อหาอื่น ๆ (“เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้”) บนกระดานสนทนา บล็อก บัญชีสื่อสังคมออนไลน์ที่เราเป็นเจ้าของ รวมถึงพื้นที่สาธารณะอื่น ๆ ที่อยู่ในบริการ พื้นที่เหล่านี้อาจจัดให้โดยเราหรือ
ผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกในนามของเรา ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ทั้งหมดที่ท่านส่ง อัปโหลด โพสต์ หรือจัดเก็บผ่านทางบริการ ท่านต้องแสดงคำเตือน ข้อมูล และการเปิดเผยข้อมูลที่จำเป็นและเหมาะสมทั้งหมดเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ของท่าน เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ใด ๆ ที่ท่านส่งผ่านทางบริการ
11.4 การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิในเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้
โดยการส่งเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ให้กับเรา ท่านรับรองว่าท่านมีสิทธิที่จำเป็นทั้งหมดในเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ และท่านอนุญาตให้เรามีสิทธิตลอดไป ในทั่วโลก โดยไม่จำกัดแต่เพียง
ผู้เดียว ไม่มีค่าสิทธิ สามารถอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิช่วงได้ และสามารถโอนได้ในการใช้ ทำซ้ำ เผยแพร่ จัดทำงานสร้างสรรค์ต่อเนื่อง แก้ไข แสดง และดำเนินการต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนในลักษณะที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการทำการตลาดและการส่งเสริมการขายของเรา และเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ทางธุรกิจที่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายอื่นใดที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ เราอาจนำงานสร้างสรรค์ต่อเนื่องทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนซึ่งจัดทำขึ้นจากเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ของท่านไปเผยแพร่ซ้ำในรูปแบบสื่อและผ่านช่องทางใดก็ตามที่เราเลือก นอกจากนี้ โดยข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขฉบับนี้ ท่านยังอนุญาตให้เราและผู้ใช้รายอื่นมีสิทธิที่ไม่จำกัดเพียงผู้เดียวในการใช้ เข้าถึง ทำซ้ำ เผยแพร่ แก้ไข แสดง และดำเนินการต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ของท่านผ่านทางบริการ ข้อ
4
นี้จะมีผลบังคับใช้เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด
11.5 ข้อจำกัดเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้
ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ใช้หรืออนุญาตให้บุคคลภายนอกใช้บริการในการโพสต์หรือส่งเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ใด ๆ ซึ่ง (ก
)
เป็นการหมิ่นประมาทหรือใส่ร้าย หรือเปิดเผยเรื่องส่วนตัวหรือข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเกี่ยวกับบุคคลใด ๆ
(
ข
)
มีลักษณะลามก อนาจาร คุกคาม ข่มขู่ ดูถูก เกลียดชัง หรือเป็นการเหยียดเชื้อชาติหรือชาติพันธุ์ ส่งเสริมการกระทำที่ถือเป็นความผิดทางอาญา ก่อให้เกิดความรับผิดทางแพ่ง หรือละเมิดกฎหมายใด ๆ หรือไม่เหมาะสมในทางอื่นใด
(
ค
)
จะละเมิดสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาของผู้อื่น รวมถึงการใช้ข้อความ รูปภาพ หรือโปรแกรมที่มีลิขสิทธิ์โดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต ความลับทางการค้าหรือข้อมูลที่มีกรรมสิทธิ์ที่เป็นความลับอื่น ๆ หรือเครื่องหมายการค้าหรือเครื่องหมายบริการที่ใช้ในลักษณะที่เป็นการละเมิด หรือ (ง
)
แทรกแซงการใช้บริการของผู้ใช้อื่นอย่างไม่สมเหตุสมผล ท่านรับรองต่อเราว่าท่านโพสต์เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ไปยังบริการโดยสมัครใจ ดังนั้น การโพสต์เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้จะไม่ก่อให้เกิดความสัมพันธ์ในลักษณะนายจ้างกับลูกจ้างระหว่างท่านกับเรา ท่านต้องไม่คัดลอกหรือใช้ที่อยู่อีเมล หมายเลขโทรศัพท์มือถือ ยอดคงเหลือ ชื่อผู้ใช้ หรือข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลอื่น ๆ เกี่ยวกับผู้ใช้รายอื่นโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต การส่งอีเมล จดหมาย การโทรศัพท์ หรือการสื่อสารอื่น ๆ ไปยังผู้ใช้รายอื่นผ่านทางบริการหรือในช่องทางอื่นใดโดยไม่ได้รับการร้องขอเป็นสิ่งที่ห้ามกระทำ
11.6 ข้อร้องเรียนและการลบเนื้อหาตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมาย
DMCA
หากท่านเชื่อว่าเครื่องหมายการค้าหรืองานอันมีลิขสิทธิ์ของท่านถูกละเมิดโดยเนื้อหาของเราหรือเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ที่แสดงอยู่ในบริการ หรือถูกเผยแพร่ในลักษณะที่แสดงเป็นนัยถึงการรับรองหรือความสัมพันธ์กับเรา โปรดส่งอีเมลถึงเราที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
โดยระบุหัวข้อดังนี้ “[
Trademark/Copyright] Complaint”
(แล้วแต่กรณี) เพื่อให้ข้อร้องเรียนของท่านมีผลบังคับและเพื่อให้เราสามารถดำเนินการตามกฎหมาย
Digital Millennium Copyright Act
(“กฎหมาย
DMCA”)
ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมดโดยแสดงข้อมูลต่อไปนี้ในอีเมลของท่าน
ระบุงานอันมีลิขสิทธิ์หรือเครื่องหมายที่กล่าวอ้างว่าถูกละเมิดให้ชัดเจน รวมถึงหมายเลขการจดทะเบียนลิขสิทธิ์หากงานนั้นได้รับการจดทะเบียน
ระบุงานหรือเครื่องหมายที่กล่าวอ้างว่าละเมิดซึ่งท่านต้องการให้ลบออก รวมทั้ง
URL
หรือข้อมูลที่ชัดเจนอื่น ๆ ซึ่งช่วยให้เราสามารถค้นหาเนื้อหาที่กล่าวอ้างว่าละเมิดได้
ที่อยู่อีเมล ที่อยู่ไปรษณีย์ และหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่าน และ
คำแถลงฉบับลงลายมือชื่อซึ่งระบุว่าท่านเชื่อโดยสุจริตว่าเนื้อหานั้นละเมิดสิทธิอื่น ข้อมูลที่ท่านให้เป็นข้อมูลที่ถูกต้อง และท่านเป็นเจ้าของหรือได้รับอนุญาตให้เป็นตัวแทนของเจ้าของเนื้อหานั้น
ท่านควรทราบด้วยว่าตามกฎหมายแพ่งและอาญาที่เกี่ยวข้อง บุคคลใดที่ร้องเรียนเรื่องการละเมิดที่ไม่มีมูลความจริงโดยตั้งใจอาจต้องมีความรับผิดในการชดใช้ค่าเสียหาย ดังนั้นโปรดอย่าส่งข้อเรียกร้องที่เป็นเท็จ เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลหรือการติดต่อใด ๆ ที่ท่านส่งถึงเราให้กับบุคคลภายนอก รวมถึงบุคคลที่อัปโหลดเนื้อหาที่กล่าวอ้างว่าละเมิดไปยังบริการ
เมื่อได้รับการแจ้งเตือนเรื่องการละเมิดโดยสุจริต เราจะดำเนินการตามนโยบายโดย (ก
)
ลบหรือปิดการเข้าถึงเนื้อหาที่ละเมิดทันที
(
ข
)
แจ้งบุคคลที่อัปโหลดเนื้อหาที่เป็นการละเมิดว่าเราได้ลบหรือปิดการเข้าถึงเนื้อหานั้นแล้ว และ (ค
)
ในกรณีของผู้กระทำผิดซ้ำ เราจะยกเลิกสิทธิในการเข้าถึงบริการของบุคคลนั้น หากเราได้รับหนังสือโต้แย้งข้อกล่าวอ้างเรื่องการละเมิดจากบุคคลดังกล่าว เราอาจส่งสำเนาหนังสือโต้แย้งนั้นให้แก่ท่านเพื่อชี้แจงว่าเราอาจนำเนื้อหาที่ถูกลบกลับมาเผยแพร่ดังเดิมหรือยกเลิกการปิดการเข้าถึงเนื้อหานั้นใน
10
วันทำการ เว้นแต่ท่านจะยื่นฟ้องเพื่อขอให้ศาลมีคำสั่งต่อเราหรือบุคคลที่อัปโหลดเนื้อหา เราจะเปิดให้สามารถเข้าถึงเนื้อหาที่ถูกลบใหม่ใน
10
ถึง
14
วันทำการหรือนานกว่านั้นหลังจากได้รับหนังสือโต้แย้งข้อกล่าวอ้างเรื่องการละเมิด โดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของเรา
12. การปฏิเสธการรับประกัน
12.1 ท่านต้องใช้บริการด้วยความเสี่ยงของตนเอง บริการ
WLD
เนื้อหา และทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาอื่น ๆ ทั้งหมดจัดหาให้ “ตามสภาพ” และ “ตามที่มี” โดยไม่มีการรับรองหรือการรับประกันใด ๆ ไม่ว่าจะโดยชัดแจ้ง โดยปริยาย หรือตามกฎหมาย เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด เราขอปฏิเสธการรับประกันโดยปริยายอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงเกี่ยวกับกรรมสิทธิ์ การใช้สอยสินค้าสมประโยชน์ตามวิสัยของการใช้ทั่วไป
(merchantability)
การใช้สอยสินค้าสมประโยชน์หรือความมุ่งหมายโดยเฉพาะ
(fitness for a particular purpose)
หรือการไม่ละเมิดสำหรับฟีเจอร์ เนื้อหา หรือทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาอื่น ๆ ที่มีอยู่ในบริการ บางประเทศไม่อนุญาตให้มีข้อยกเว้นว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธการรับประกันโดยปริยาย ดังนั้นข้อยกเว้นว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธการรับประกันข้างต้นอาจไม่ใช้บังคับกับท่าน เราไม่รับรอง รับประกัน หรือรับผิดชอบต่อโฆษณา ข้อเสนอ หรือคำแถลงใด ๆ ที่จัดทำโดยบุคคลภายนอก รวมถึงผู้ใช้รายอื่น ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ
12.2 เราไม่รับรองหรือรับประกันว่า (ก
)
ท่านจะสามารถเข้าถึงบริการส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งหรือทั้งหมดได้อย่างต่อเนื่อง โดยไม่หยุดชะงัก ภายในเวลาที่กำหนด อย่างปลอดภัย หรือโดยปราศจากข้อผิดพลาด
(
ข
)
บริการหรือเนื้อหาจะถูกต้อง ครบถ้วน เชื่อถือได้ หรือเป็นปัจจุบัน
(
ค
)
บริการจะไม่มีไวรัสหรือส่วนประกอบที่เป็นอันตรายอื่น ๆ หรือ (ง
)
บริการหรือเนื้อหาจะตรงตามความต้องการ ความจำเป็น หรือความคาดหวังของท่าน
12.3 นอกจากนี้ เราไม่ให้การรับรองหรือการรับประกันใด ๆ เกี่ยวกับความถูกต้องตามกฎหมายของบริการหรือ
WLD
สำหรับการใช้งานในกรณีใด ๆ และไม่รับรองหรือรับประกันว่าบริการหรือ
WLD
จะเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดด้านการปฏิบัติตามกฎระเบียบหรือการปฏิบัติตามกฎหมาย ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบในการพิจารณาและปฏิบัติตามข้อจำกัดและข้อกำหนดด้านกฎหมายและกฎระเบียบทั้งหมดที่อาจใช้บังคับกับการใช้บริการหรือ
WLD
ยกเว้นคำแถลงที่ระบุไว้อย่างชัดแจ้งในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าท่านไม่ได้อ้างอิงคำแถลงหรือความเข้าใจอื่นใด ไม่ว่าจะทำไว้เป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรหรือให้ไว้ด้วยวาจา ในการเข้าถึงและใช้บริการหรือ
WLD
12.4 เราไม่ได้กระทำการและไม่สามารถกระทำการในฐานะที่ปรึกษาของท่านเกี่ยวกับเรื่องการเงิน กฎหมาย การลงทุน หรือภาษี เนื้อหาใด ๆ มีผลเฉพาะในวันที่ระบุเท่านั้น การคาดการณ์ การประมาณการ การพยากรณ์ เป้าหมาย และ/หรือความคิดเห็นใด ๆ ที่แสดงในที่นี้อยู่ภายใต้ความเสี่ยง ความไม่แน่นอน และสมมติฐาน และอาจไม่ถูกต้องและอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงได้โดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบ ท่านไม่ควรอ้างอิงเนื้อหาในการตัดสินใจใด ๆ
ข้อมูลบางส่วนในที่นี้อาจได้รับมาจากแหล่งข้อมูลของบุคคลภายนอก แม้ว่าเราจะเชื่อว่าแหล่งข้อมูลดังกล่าวสามารถเชื่อถือได้ แต่เราไม่ได้ตรวจสอบข้อมูลทั้งหมดด้วยตนเองและจะไม่รับรองความถูกต้องของข้อมูลนั้น เราไม่ได้เป็นนายหน้าผู้ค้า หรือที่ปรึกษาทางการเงินที่ที่ได้ขึ้นทะเบียน เราไม่ให้การรับรองใด ๆ และขอปฏิเสธการรับประกันทั้งหมดอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจง ไม่ว่าจะเป็นการรับประกันโดยชัดแจ้ง โดยปริยาย หรือตามกฎหมาย เกี่ยวกับความถูกต้อง ความเป็นปัจจุบัน หรือความครบถ้วนของเนื้อหาใด ๆ ที่มีอยู่ในบริการ เนื้อหาของเรามีไว้เพื่อเป็นข้อมูลทั่วไปเท่านั้น และท่านมีหน้าที่แต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการตัดสินใจว่าจะใช้บริการหรือไม่ ท่านรับทราบว่าการซื้อขาย การใช้ และการถือครองโทเคนดิจิทัลมีความเสี่ยงโดยลักษณะของธุรกรรมดังกล่าวอยู่แล้ว ท่านอาจสูญเสียเงินทั้งหมดในวอลเล็ตของท่าน ท่านรับทราบว่าบริการอาจอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของข้อจำกัดด้านการส่งออกและมาตรการลงโทษทางเศรษฐกิจที่กำหนดโดยกฎหมายของสหรัฐอเมริกา
12.5 เราจะไม่รับผิดต่อท่านหรือบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ สำหรับการแก้ไขหรือการยกเลิกบริการ หรือการระงับหรือการยกเลิกสิทธิในการเข้าถึงบริการของท่าน
13. การจำกัดความรับผิด
13.1 เราจะไม่มีข้อยกเว้นความรับผิดหรือจำกัดความรับผิดที่เรามีต่อท่านในกรณีที่การดำเนินการดังกล่าวอาจไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย ในประเทศที่ไม่อนุญาตให้มีข้อยกเว้นว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธความรับผิดในลักษณะต่อไปนี้ เราจะรับผิดชอบในการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายแก่ท่านสำหรับการสูญเสียและความเสียหายซึ่งเป็นผลที่คาดการณ์ได้ตามสมควรจากการที่เราไม่ใช้ความระมัดระวังและทักษะความสามารถตามสมควรหรือจากการที่เราละเมิดสัญญาที่เข้าทำกับท่านเท่านั้น ข้อกำหนดนี้จะไม่กระทบต่อสิทธิของผู้บริโภคที่ไม่สามารถสละสิทธิหรือจำกัดความรับผิดได้โดยสัญญาหรือข้อตกลงใด ๆ
13.2 เท่าที่กฎหมายอนุญาต ท่านตกลงว่าไม่ว่าในกรณีใดก็ตาม เราหรือเจ้าหน้าที่ กรรมการ พนักงาน ผู้รับจ้าง ตัวแทน บริษัทในเครือ หรือบริษัทสาขาใด ๆ ของเรา (“คู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH”)
จะไม่มีความรับผิดในการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายแก่ท่านสำหรับค่าเสียหายทางอ้อม ค่าเสียหายเชิงลงโทษ ค่าเสียหายอันเนื่องมาจากการผิดสัญญา (
incidental damages
) ค่าเสียหายจำเพาะ
(special damages)
ค่าเสียหายที่เป็นผลสืบเนื่อง
(consequential damages)
หรือค่าเสียหายเพื่อเป็นเยี่ยงอย่าง
(exemplary damages)
รวมถึงความเสียหายจากการสูญเสียผลกำไร ค่าความนิยม การใช้ประโยชน์ ข้อมูล หรือทรัพย์สินที่ไม่มีตัวตนอื่น ๆ ไม่ว่าการเรียกร้องให้รับผิดดังกล่าวจะตั้งอยู่บนพื้นฐานของการละเมิดหรือโดยประการอื่น และไม่ว่าคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
จะได้รับแจ้งถึงความเป็นไปได้ที่ความเสียหายจะเกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับสิ่งต่อไปนี้หรือไม่ก็ตามเกี่ยวกับ (ก
)
การที่ท่านใช้หรือไม่สามารถใช้บริการ โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน หรือ
World Network (
ข
)
การไม่สามารถเข้าถึงหรือการยกเลิกบริการ
(
ค
)
การแฮ็ก การแทรกแซง การเข้าถึงโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต หรือการเปลี่ยนแปลงธุรกรรมหรือข้อมูลของท่าน
(
ง
)
ธุรกรรมหรือข้อตกลงใด ๆ ที่ท่านทำกับบุคคลภายนอกผ่านบริการ
(
จ
)
กิจกรรมหรือการสื่อสารใด ๆ ของบุคคลภายนอก
(
ฉ
)
การกระทำของ
Orb Operator (
ช
)
การสูญเสียมูลค่าของโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ
(
ซ
)
เนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอกที่เข้าถึงได้บนบริการหรือผ่านทางบริการ
(
ฌ
)
ข้อผิดพลาด ความผิดพลาด หรือความไม่ถูกต้องในเนื้อหาของเรา
(
ญ
)
การบาดเจ็บส่วนบุคคลหรือความเสียหายต่อทรัพย์สินไม่ว่าในลักษณะใด ๆ ซึ่งเกิดจากการเข้าถึงหรือการใช้บริการ
(
ฎ
)
ไวรัส โทรจัน หรือสิ่งอื่นในทำนองเดียวกันที่อาจถูกส่งไปยังหรือผ่านทางบริการ หรือ (ฏ
)
การกระทำของบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ ที่เป็นการหมิ่นประมาท สร้างความไม่พอใจ หรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด การจำกัดความรับผิดนี้จะมีผลบังคับ ไม่ว่าความเสียหายจะเกิดจากการใช้บริการ การใช้บริการในทางที่ผิด หรือการอ้างอิง
TFH
หรือบริการ แม้ว่าทางเยียวยาอันจำกัดที่มอบให้จะไม่สามารถบรรลุวัตถุประสงค์ที่ถือเป็นสาระสำคัญของทางเยียวยานั้นก็ตาม
13.3 ไม่ว่าในกรณีใดก็ตาม คู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
จะไม่ต้องรับผิดต่อท่านสำหรับการเรียกร้อง การดำเนินการ ความรับผิด หน้าที่ ค่าเสียหาย การสูญเสีย หรือค่าใช้จ่ายโดยตรงใด ๆ ที่มีจำนวนเกินกว่า
00
ดอลลาร์สหรัฐ หากท่านไม่พอใจกับบริการ ท่านตกลงว่าทางเยียวยาเพียงสิ่งเดียวที่เฉพาะเจาะจงที่ท่านมีคือการหยุดใช้บริการ การจำกัดความรับผิดนี้จะมีผลบังคับใช้เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด
13.4 การปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดและการชดใช้ค่าเสียหาย
ท่านตกลงว่าจะปกป้อง ชดใช้ค่าเสียหาย และคุ้มครองคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
ไม่ให้ได้รับความเสียหายจากการเรียกร้อง ค่าเสียหาย ต้นทุน ความรับผิด ค่าทนายความตามสมควร และค่าใช้จ่ายใด ๆ ที่บุคคลภายนอกมีข้อเรียกร้องต่อคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
ซึ่งเกิดจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับ (ก
)
การที่ท่านใช้บริการ
(
ข
)
การที่ท่านละเมิดข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
(
ค
)
การที่ท่านละเมิดสิทธิของบุคคลอื่น
(
ง
)
การกระทำของท่านที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ หรือ (จ
)
การที่ท่านใช้
WLD
โทเคนดิจิทัล หรือเครือข่าย
Worldcoin
ในบางประเทศมีการจำกัดขอบเขตของข้อกำหนดว่าด้วยการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายของผู้บริโภค ดังนั้นข้อกำหนดว่าด้วยการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายในข้อนี้อาจไม่มีผลบังคับกับท่านไม่ว่าทั้งหมดหรือเป็นบางส่วน หากท่านมีหน้าที่ชดใช้ค่าเสียหายให้กับคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
เราขอสงวนสิทธิในการใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการควบคุมการดำเนินคดีหรือการดำเนินการใด ๆ และในการตัดสินใจว่าจะระงับข้อพิพาทหรือไม่และตามเงื่อนไขใด
หากท่านเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนีย ท่านสละสิทธิในการได้รับประโยชน์และการคุ้มครองจากข้อกำหนดของ
California Civil Code § 1542
ซึ่งระบุว่า “[ก
]
การปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดทั่วไปจะไม่ครอบคลุมถึงสิทธิเรียกร้องที่เจ้าหนี้หรือฝ่ายที่ปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดไม่ทราบว่ามีหรือไม่สงสัยว่ามีอยู่ในทางที่เป็นประโยชน์แก่ตนในเวลาที่ตกลงปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดนั้น ซึ่งหากเจ้าหนี้หรือฝ่ายที่ปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดทราบว่ามี จะมีผลกระทบอย่างมีนัยสำคัญต่อการทำข้อตกลงกับลูกหนี้หรือฝ่ายที่ได้รับการปลดเปลื้องความรับผิด”
14. กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
กฎหมายของรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียจะใช้บังคับกับข้อตกลงนี้และข้อพิพาทใด ๆ ที่เกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับข้อตกลงนี้ กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับที่ระบุในส่วนนี้จะมีผลบังคับโดยไม่คำนึงถึงหลักการขัดกันแห่งกฎหมาย นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงว่าบริการจะอยู่ภายใต้บังคับแห่งกฎหมายของรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียเท่านั้น และตกลงว่าแม้ว่าอาจมีการจัดหาบริการให้ในประเทศเขตแดนอื่น ๆ การจัดหาบริการดังกล่าวจะไม่ทำให้ศาลใด ๆ ซึ่งอยู่นอกรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียเป็นศาลที่มีเขตอำนาจทั่วไปหรือเขตอำนาจเฉพาะเจาะจงเหนือตัวบุคคลแต่อย่างใด
15. การระงับข้อพิพาท การอนุญาโตตุลาการ และการสละสิทธิในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม
15.1 โปรดอ่านเนื้อหาส่วนนี้อย่างละเอียด เนื้อหาส่วนนี้กำหนดให้ท่านระงับข้อพิพาทกับเราผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการเป็นรายบุคคลต่อหน้าอนุญาโตตุลาการเพียงคนเดียว และไม่ใช่ในฐานะสมาชิกกลุ่มในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม การอนุญาโตตุลาการป้องกันไม่ให้ท่านฟ้องร้องดำเนินคดีต่อเราในศาลหรือผ่านการพิจารณาคดีโดยคณะลูกขุน แม้ว่าท่านอาจนำข้อพิพาทไปฟ้องร้องดำเนินคดีต่อศาลที่มีเขตอำนาจพิจารณาคดีมโนสาเร่ได้หากท่านมีคุณสมบัติตามข้อกำหนด
15.2 เราจะใช้ความพยายามอย่างดีที่สุดในการระงับข้อพิพาทใด ๆ ที่อาจมีผ่านการเจรจาอย่างไม่เป็นทางการโดยสุจริต หากเกิดข้อพิพาทขึ้น ท่านต้องติดต่อเราโดยส่งอีเมลไปที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
เพื่อที่เราจะสามารถพยายามระงับข้อพิพาทนั้นได้โดยไม่ต้องเข้าสู่กระบวนการระงับข้อพิพาทอย่างเป็นทางการ หากเราไม่สามารถระงับข้อพิพาทอย่างไม่เป็นทางการได้ภายใน
60
วันนับจากวันที่ท่านส่งอีเมล และท่านเลือกที่จะใช้สิทธิเรียกร้องตามกฎหมายของรัฐบาลกลางหรือรัฐ เรียกร้องตามกฎหมายคอมมอนลอว์ เรียกร้องตามสัญญา เรียกร้องตามฐานการละเมิด การฉ้อโกง การแถลงข้อความอันเป็นเท็จ หรือทฤษฎีทางกฎหมายอื่น ๆ หรือดำเนินกระบวนการทางกฎหมายอย่างเป็นทางการในลักษณะอื่น ซึ่งเกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ เนื้อหา หรือบริการ (แต่ละข้อจะเรียกว่า “ข้อพิพาท”) ท่านตกลงว่าจะระงับข้อพิพาทผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการเป็นรายบุคคลที่มีผลผูกพันตามข้อกำหนดต่อไปนี้ (เรียกรวมกันว่า “สัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ”):
กระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการจะดำเนินการในลักษณะที่เป็นความลับโดยอนุญาโตตุลาการเพียงคนเดียวโดยใช้ภาษาอังกฤษ อนุญาโตตุลาการจะใช้อายุความตามที่กฎหมายกำหนดและใช้กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด และจะเคารพเอกสิทธิ์ที่ได้รับการยอมรับตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
ข้อพิพาทจะถูกระงับจนถึงที่สุดผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่ดำเนินการโดย
JAMS
ตามข้อบังคับการอนุญาโตตุลาการแบบเร่งรัดของ
JAMS
(
JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules
) เท่านั้น เว้นแต่เมื่อจำนวนทุนทรัพย์ที่พิพาทมีจำนวนรวมกัน
250
,
000
ดอลลาร์สหรัฐขึ้นไป ซึ่งในกรณีดังกล่าวจะดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการตามข้อบังคับการอนุญาโตตุลาการแบบครอบคลุมของ
JAMS
(
JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules
) การอนุญาโตตุลาการจะดำเนินการที่ซานฟรานซิสโก รัฐแคลิฟอร์เนีย เว้นแต่เมื่อเราตกลงกันให้ดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่อื่น ท่านตกลงว่าศาลรัฐบาลกลางและศาลมลรัฐในซานฟรานซิสโก รัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียเป็นศาลที่เหมาะสมสำหรับการอุทธรณ์คำชี้ขาดของอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือการดำเนินกระบวนการทางศาลในกรณีที่ข้อตกลงว่าด้วยการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่มีผลผูกพันตามสัญญานี้ถูกตัดสินว่าไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้
ในการดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการไม่ว่าในสถานที่ใดก็ตาม คู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่ายต้องไม่ร้องขอให้มีการแสวงหาพยานหลักฐานที่จะนำมาใช้ในการพิจารณาคดีจากอีกฝ่าย และอนุญาโตตุลาการจะไม่อนุญาตให้คู่พิพาทร้องขอให้มีการแสวงหาพยานหลักฐานที่จะนำมาใช้ในการพิจารณาคดีจากอีกฝ่าย แต่แทนที่จะดำเนินการดังกล่าว ให้คู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่ายจะเปิดเผยพยานหลักฐานที่สนับสนุนข้อกล่าวอ้างของตนในวันและเวลาที่ตกลงร่วมกันก่อนการสืบพยานของอนุญาโตตุลาการในนัดสุดท้าย
สัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้มีผลบังคับครอบคลุมถึงความสามารถในการบังคับใช้ การเพิกถอน ขอบเขต และการมีผลบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ รวมทั้งข้อพิพาทอื่น ๆ ทั้งหมดที่เกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับการตีความหรือการใช้บังคับสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ และประเด็นทั้งหมดดังกล่าวจะตัดสินชี้ขาดโดยอนุญาโตตุลาการ ไม่ใช่โดยศาลหรือผู้พิพากษา
หากอนุญาโตตุลาการกำหนดให้ท่านชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเริ่มต้นหรือค่าใช้จ่ายในการบริหารคดีอื่น ๆ เมื่อท่านร้องขอ เราจะคืนเงินส่วนต่างให้ท่านในกรณีที่ค่าธรรมเนียมหรือค่าใช้จ่ายดังกล่าวอาจมีจำนวนเกินกว่าที่ท่านอาจต้องจ่ายหากโดยประการอื่นท่านนำข้อพิพาทไปดำเนินคดีในศาล นอกจากนี้ เราจะจ่ายค่าธรรมเนียมหรือค่าใช้จ่ายเพิ่มเติมหากข้อบังคับของสถาบันอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนดให้ทำเช่นนั้น
เมื่อคู่พิพาทฝ่ายใดฝ่ายหนึ่งมีคำขอ การดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการทั้งหมดจะเป็นไปอย่างลับสุดยอด และในกรณีดังกล่าวอนุญาโตตุลาการจะรับ พิจารณา และเก็บรักษาเอกสาร คำให้การ และบันทึกทั้งหมดในลักษณะที่เป็นความลับโดยอยู่ภายใต้ข้อตกลงว่าจะไม่นำข้อมูลดังกล่าวไปเปิดเผย โดยเอกสาร คำให้การ และบันทึกดังกล่าวจะเปิดให้ตรวจสอบได้โดยคู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่าย ทนายความ ผู้เชี่ยวชาญ ที่ปรึกษา หรือพยานของคู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่ายซึ่งได้ตกลงล่วงหน้าเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรว่าจะรับข้อมูลดังกล่าวทั้งหมดในลักษณะที่เป็นความลับเพื่อใช้สำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ในการอนุญาโตตุลาการเท่านั้น
นอกเหนือจากการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่มและทางเยียวยาที่กล่าวถึงในสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ อนุญาโตตุลาการยังมีอำนาจในการมีคำชี้ขาดเกี่ยวกับทางเยียวยาใด ๆ ที่ศาลอาจมีคำสั่งได้โดยประการอื่น
คู่พิพาทอาจขอให้ศาลใด ๆ ที่มีเขตอำนาจมีคำพิพากษาตามคำชี้ขาดของอนุญาโตตุลาการได้
หากข้อกำหนดให้ระงับข้อพิพาทโดยการดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการ หรือข้อกำหนดห้ามไม่ให้ดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม รวมทั้งข้อกำหนดเกี่ยวกับข้อพิพาทอื่น ๆ ที่มีขึ้นในนามของบุคคลภายนอกที่ระบุในสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ ถูกตัดสินว่าไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ ให้ถือว่าเฉพาะข้อกำหนดที่ไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ดังกล่าวถูกลบออกจากข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และหน้าที่ส่วนอื่นทั้งหมดที่เหลืออยู่ในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้จะยังคงมีผลบังคับใช้อย่างเต็มที่ต่อไป
15.3 สิทธิในการเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการภายใน
30
วัน (
Opt Out
)
ท่านมีสิทธิเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับและผลผูกพันของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้โดยส่งอีเมลจากที่อยู่อีเมลที่ท่านใช้ในการลงทะเบียนเพื่อใช้แอปพลิเคชันไปที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
โดยระบุหัวเรื่องว่า: “
ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT”
ท่านต้องส่งอีเมลดังกล่าวภายใน
30
วันนับจากวันที่ท่านตกลงยอมรับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ มิฉะนั้นท่านจะอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของข้อกำหนดในการระงับข้อพิพาทโดยการอนุญาโตตุลาการตามข้อกำหนดของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ หากท่านเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ เราจะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการเช่นกัน
15.4 การเปลี่ยนแปลงสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้
เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้า
30
วันเกี่ยวกับการเปลี่ยนแปลงใด ๆ ในส่วนของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่มีหัวข้อว่า “
การระงับข้อพิพาท การอนุญาโตตุลาการ และการสละสิทธิในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม
” โดยส่งคำบอกกล่าวถึงท่าน และการเปลี่ยนแปลงนั้นจะมีผลบังคับใช้
30
วันหลังจากที่ท่านได้รับคำบอกกล่าวจากเรา ข้อกำหนดที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงในหัวข้อ
การระงับข้อพิพาท การอนุญาโตตุลาการ และการสละสิทธิในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม
จะมีผลบังคับกับข้อพิพาทที่เกิดขึ้นหลังจากวันที่
30
เท่านั้น หากศาลหรืออนุญาโตตุลาการตัดสินว่าข้อกำหนดที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงในหัวข้อนี้ไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้หรือไม่มีผลบังคับ ให้ข้อกำหนดที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงถูกแยกออกจากข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และศาลหรืออนุญาโตตุลาการจะบังคับใช้ข้อกำหนดของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการฉบับแรกที่มีผลบังคับใช้หลังจากที่ท่านเริ่มใช้บริการ ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิในการเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการฉบับใหม่ได้ โดยปฏิบัติตามขั้นตอนที่ระบุไว้ในข้อด้านบนที่มีหัวข้อว่า “สิทธิในการเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการภายใน 30 วัน”
สัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้จะยังคงมีผลบังคับใช้ต่อไปหลังจากที่ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และการใช้บริการของท่านสิ้นสุดลง
โดยไม่คำนึงถึงข้อกำหนดใด ๆ ในสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ที่กำหนดเป็นอย่างอื่น คู่สัญญาแต่ละฝ่ายสามารถฟ้องร้องดำเนินคดีเพื่อขอให้ศาลมีคำสั่งคุ้มครองชั่วคราวให้หยุดการใช้บริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตหรือการใช้บริการในทางที่ผิด หรือการละเมิดสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา (เช่น เครื่องหมายการค้า ความลับทางการค้า ลิขสิทธิ์ สิทธิบัตร หรือสิทธิอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา) โดยไม่ต้องเข้าสู่กระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือกระบวนการระงับข้อพิพาทอย่างไม่เป็นทางการที่อธิบายไว้ข้างต้นก่อน
16. ข้อกำหนดทั่วไป
16.1 ไม่ถือเป็นการสละสิทธิ การแยกจากกันได้ของสัญญา การห้ามโอนสิทธิ
การที่เราไม่บังคับตามข้อกำหนดข้อใดข้อหนึ่งจะไม่ถือเป็นการสละสิทธิในการบังคับตามข้อกำหนดนั้นในภายหลัง หากข้อกำหนดข้อใดข้อหนึ่งถูกตัดสินว่าไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ ข้อกำหนดส่วนที่เหลือของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้จะยังคงมีผลบังคับใช้อย่างเต็มที่ต่อไป และข้อกำหนดที่ไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้นั้นจะถูกแทนที่ด้วยข้อกำหนดที่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ ซึ่งแสดงถึงเจตนาของเราได้ใกล้เคียงที่สุดเท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต ท่านต้องไม่โอนสิทธิใด ๆ ของท่านตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และความพยายามในการโอนสิทธิดังกล่าวจะตกเป็นโมฆะ เราอาจโอนสิทธิของเราให้กับบริษัทในเครือหรือบริษัทสาขาใด ๆ ของเรา หรือผู้สืบสิทธิใด ๆ ที่ได้รับโอนธุรกิจที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ
16.2 ข้อตกลงทั้งหมด
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นคำแถลงที่ครบถ้วนสมบูรณ์เพียงฉบับเดียวเกี่ยวกับข้อตกลงระหว่างท่านกับเราในเรื่องของบริการ และมีผลบังคับแทนที่ความเข้าใจ ข้อตกลง คำรับรอง และคำรับประกันทั้งหมดเกี่ยวกับบริการที่มีอยู่ก่อนหน้านี้และในเวลาเดียวกัน ทั้งที่เป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรและให้ไว้ด้วยวาจา หัวข้อในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้มีไว้เพื่อความสะดวกในการอ้างอิงเท่านั้น และจะไม่มีผลบังคับต่อความหมายหรือการตีความของข้อกำหนดใด ๆ
16.3 การมีผลบังคับต่อไป
ข้อกำหนดทั้งหมดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการระงับหรือการยกเลิก หนี้ที่ค้างชำระต่อ
TFH
การใช้บริการทั่วไป ข้อพิพาทกับ
TFH
รวมถึงข้อกำหนดที่โดยลักษณะแล้วจะมีผลบังคับต่อไปหลังจากการสิ้นสุดระยะเวลาหรือการบอกเลิกข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ จะยังคงมีผลบังคับต่อไปแม้ว่าข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้จะสิ้นผลบังคับแล้วก็ตาม
16.4 ความสัมพันธ์ระหว่างคู่สัญญาทั้งสองฝ่าย
ไม่มีส่วนใดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่ถือได้ว่าเป็นการก่อให้เกิดหรือมีเจตนาให้ถือได้ว่าเป็นการก่อให้เกิด และจะไม่มีการก่อให้เกิดความสัมพันธ์ระหว่างท่านกับ
TFH
ในลักษณะของหุ้นส่วน ผู้ร่วมทุน หรือผู้ร่วมงานเพื่อผลกำไร และท่านและ
TFH
จะไม่ถือเป็นตัวแทนของอีกฝ่าย นอกจากนี้ ไม่มีส่วนใดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่ก่อให้เกิดหรือมีเจตนาที่จะก่อให้เกิดความสัมพันธ์ในการจ้างงานระหว่างท่านกับ
TFH
16.5 ไม่ถือเป็นคำแนะนำของผู้ประกอบวิชาชีพหรือหน้าที่ในการดูแลผลประโยชน์
(fiduciary duty)
เนื้อหาทั้งหมดที่เราจัดหาให้มีไว้เพื่อเป็นข้อมูลเท่านั้นและไม่ควรตีความว่าเป็นคำแนะนำของผู้ประกอบวิชาชีพ ท่านไม่ควรดำเนินการหรือละเว้นการดำเนินการใด ๆ โดยอ้างอิงจากข้อมูลใด ๆ ที่มีอยู่ในบริการ ก่อนที่ท่านจะตัดสินใจในเรื่องการเงิน กฎหมาย หรือเรื่องอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการหรือโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ท่านควรขอคำแนะนำของผู้ประกอบวิชาชีพอิสระจากบุคคลที่มีใบอนุญาตและมีคุณสมบัติในการให้คำแนะนำในสาขาที่เกี่ยวข้อง ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ไม่ได้มีเจตนาและจะไม่ก่อให้เกิดหรือกำหนดหน้าที่ในการดูแลผลประโยชน์ใด ๆ ต่อเรา เท่าที่กฎหมายอนุญาตสูงสุด ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าเราไม่มีหน้าที่ในการดูแลผลประโยชน์หรือความรับผิดใด ๆ ต่อท่านหรือบุคคลอื่นใด และในกรณีที่หน้าที่หรือความรับผิดดังกล่าวอาจมีอยู่ตามกฎหมายหรือตามหลักยุติธรรม เราขอปฏิเสธ สละสิทธิ และยกเลิกหน้าที่และความรับผิดชอบดังกล่าวอย่างไม่สามารถเพิกถอนได้ นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงอีกด้วยว่าหน้าที่และความรับผิดชอบเดียวที่เรามีต่อท่านคือหน้าที่และความรับผิดชอบที่ระบุไว้อย่างชัดแจ้งในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
16.6 การเปลี่ยนแปลงการควบคุม
ในกรณีที่เราถูกเข้าซื้อกิจการโดยหรือควบรวมกิจการกับนิติบุคคลอื่นที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก หรือมอบหมายหน้าที่บางอย่างให้กับบริษัทในเครือ หรือผู้สืบสิทธิ หรือนิติบุคคลอื่นที่เราเห็นว่าจะเกิดประโยชน์ต่อผู้ใช้สูงสุด เราสงวนสิทธิในกรณีใด ๆ ดังกล่าวในการโอนหรือโอนสิทธิในข้อมูลที่เราได้เก็บรวบรวมจากท่านเพื่อเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของการควบรวมกิจการ การเข้าซื้อกิจการ การขาย หรือการเปลี่ยนแปลงการควบคุมอื่น ๆ ตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
16.7 เหตุสุดวิสัย
เราจะไม่มีความรับผิดสำหรับความล่าช้า การไม่สามารถปฏิบัติหน้าที่ หรือการหยุดชะงักของบริการที่เกิดขึ้นโดยตรงหรือโดยอ้อมจากความผันผวนที่มีนัยสำคัญของตลาดโทเคนดิจิทัล เหตุสุดวิสัยทางธรรมชาติ
(act of God)
การกระทำของหน่วยงานพลเรือนหรือทหาร การกระทำของผู้ก่อการร้าย การก่อความไม่สงบ สงคราม การนัดหยุดงาน ภาวะฉุกเฉินด้านสุขภาพ ข้อพิพาทด้านแรงงาน ไฟไหม้ การหยุดชะงักในการสื่อสารโทรคมนาคม หรือบริการอินเทอร์เน็ต หรือบริการของผู้ให้บริการเครือข่าย ความล้มเหลวของอุปกรณ์หรือซอฟต์แวร์ หรือสาเหตุหรือเงื่อนไขใด ๆ ที่อยู่นอกเหนือการควบคุมตามสมควรของเรา (แต่ละข้อเรียกว่า “เหตุสุดวิสัย”) การเกิดขึ้นของเหตุสุดวิสัยจะไม่ส่งผลกระทบต่อความสมบูรณ์และการบังคับใช้ข้อกำหนดส่วนที่เหลือของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
16.8 App Store
เมื่อท่านดาวน์โหลดแอปของเราจาก
app store
หรือแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันอื่น ๆ นอกเหนือจาก
Apple App Store
รวมถึง
Google Play Store (“
แพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน”) ท่านตกลงว่า
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นข้อตกลงระหว่างท่านกับเรา ไม่ใช่กับผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน (“ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน”) การใช้แอปของท่านต้องเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันของผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันซึ่งมีผลบังคับในเวลาดังกล่าว ทั้งนี้ ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันเป็นเพียงผู้จัดหาแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันที่ท่านใช้ในการดาวน์โหลดแอปเท่านั้น
เรา (ไม่ใช่ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน) มีความรับผิดชอบต่อแอปแต่เพียงผู้เดียว
ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันไม่มีหน้าที่หรือความรับผิดต่อท่านเกี่ยวกับแอปหรือข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และ
ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันเป็นผู้ได้รับผลประโยชน์ที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ในส่วนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับแอป
16.9 Apple App Store
ข้อกำหนดส่วนนี้จะมีผลบังคับในกรณีที่ท่านดาวน์โหลดแอปจาก
Apple App Store
ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นข้อตกลงระหว่างท่านกับเราเท่านั้น ไม่ใช่กับ
Apple Inc. (“Apple”)
และท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่า
Apple
ไม่มีความรับผิดชอบต่อแอปหรือเนื้อหาของแอป การใช้แอปของท่านต้องเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการของ
App Store
ท่านรับทราบว่า
Apple
ไม่มีหน้าที่ในการให้บริการบำรุงรักษาและการสนับสนุนใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวกับแอป ในกรณีที่แอปไม่เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการรับประกันใด ๆ ท่านสามารถแจ้งให้
Apple
ทราบได้ และ
Apple
จะคืนเงินค่าซื้อแอปให้ท่าน (ถ้ามี) เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด
Apple
จะไม่มีหน้าที่ในการรับประกันอื่นใดที่เกี่ยวกับแอปอีก และการใช้สิทธิเรียกร้อง การสูญเสีย ความรับผิด ค่าเสียหาย ต้นทุน หรือค่าใช้จ่ายอื่นใดที่เกิดจากการที่แอปไม่เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการรับประกันใด ๆ จะอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกับเราในฐานะผู้ให้บริการแอปเท่านั้น
ท่านรับทราบว่า
Apple
ไม่มีความรับผิดชอบในการดำเนินการเกี่ยวกับการใช้สิทธิเรียกร้องใด ๆ ของท่านหรือบุคคลภายนอกที่เกี่ยวข้องกับแอปหรือการที่ท่านครอบครองและ/หรือใช้แอป รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียง (
i)
การใช้สิทธิเรียกร้องเกี่ยวกับความรับผิดที่เกิดจากผลิตภัณฑ์
(ii)
ข้อเรียกร้องใด ๆ ว่าแอปไม่เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายหรือข้อบังคับที่ใช้บังคับ และ (
iii)
สิทธิเรียกร้องที่เกิดขึ้นตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองผู้บริโภคหรือกฎหมายอื่นที่คล้ายกัน และสิทธิเรียกร้องทั้งหมดดังกล่าวจะอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกับเราในฐานะผู้ให้บริการซอฟต์แวร์เท่านั้น
ท่านรับทราบว่า ในกรณีที่บุคคลภายนอกกล่าวอ้างว่าแอปหรือการครอบครองและการใช้แอปของท่านละเมิดสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาของบุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าว
TFH
(ไม่ใช่
Apple
) จะเป็นผู้รับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการตรวจสอบ การต่อสู้คดี การระงับข้อพิพาท และการปลดเปลื้องสิทธิเรียกร้องเกี่ยวกับการละเมิดทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาดังกล่าวเท่าที่กำหนดไว้ในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
ท่านรับรองและรับประกันว่า (
i)
ท่านไม่ได้อยู่ในประเทศที่อยู่ภายใต้มาตรการลงโทษเกี่ยวกับการห้ามส่งสินค้าของรัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกา หรือประเทศที่รัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกากำหนดว่าเป็นประเทศที่สนับสนุนการก่อการร้าย และ (
ii)
ท่านไม่มีรายชื่อในบัญชีบุคคลที่ถูกห้ามหรือจำกัดของรัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกา
ท่านและ
TFH
รับทราบและตกลงว่า
Apple
และบริษัทในเครือของ
Apple
เป็นผู้รับผลประโยชน์ที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการในส่วนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิในการใช้แอป และเมื่อท่านยอมรับข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขของข้อกำหนดการให้บริการ
Apple
จะมีสิทธิ (และจะถือว่าได้ยอมรับสิทธิ) ในการบังคับตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการในส่วนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิในการใช้แอปต่อท่านในฐานะผู้รับผลประโยชน์บุคคลภายนอก
TFHUSERTOS20241112
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Nutzungsbedingungen von Tools For Humanity
Willkommen bei World App! Diese Bedingungen zwischen Ihnen und der Tools for Humanity Corporation, einem Unternehmen aus Delaware („TFH“, „wir“ oder „uns“), regeln Ihre Nutzung und den Zugriff auf unsere Websites und Anwendungen, einschließlich World App und der Operator App (zusammen die „Apps“), sowie auf alle damit verbundenen Funktionen, Inhalte und Dienste, die wir Ihnen (zusammen die „Dienste“ oder „unsere Dienste“) im Zusammenhang mit dem World Network („World Network“) und dem Ökosystem zur Verfügung stellen.
Bitte lesen Sie sich diese Bedingungen aufmerksam durch, bevor Sie die Dienste nutzen oder darauf zugreifen. Durch den Zugriff auf oder die Nutzung der von uns bereitgestellten Dienste erklären Sie sich mit Ihrer expliziten Zustimmung zu diesen Bedingungen ausdrücklich damit einverstanden, an diese Bedingungen und an unsere Datenschutzerklärung gebunden zu sein, die als Teil dieser Bedingungen aufgenommen wurde.  Bitte beachten Sie diese besonders wichtigen Teile dieser Bedingungen:
Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass Streitfälle zwischen Ihnen und TFH durch ein verbindliches Schiedsverfahren und nicht vor Gericht beigelegt werden. Wenn Sie in Südkorea wohnen, können Sie sich stattdessen dafür entscheiden, den Streitfall vor einem zuständigen örtlichen Gericht beizulegen. Einzelheiten entnehmen Sie bitte Abschnitt 15 unten.
Kryptoprodukte, einschließlich digitaler Token, sind weitgehend unreguliert und können sehr riskant sein. Es kann sein, dass für Verluste aus solchen Transaktionen keine regulatorischen Regressmöglichkeiten bestehen.
Die Dienste stellen weder ein Angebot zum Verkauf noch eine Aufforderung zum Kauf von Wertpapieren oder digitalen Token dar. Die Dienste stellen keine Anlageberatung dar. Der Besitz, der Kauf oder Verkauf von digitalen Token (wie in Abschnitt 2.1 unten definiert) ist an Ihrem Wohnort möglicherweise nicht gestattet, und es liegt in Ihrer Verantwortung, alle geltenden Gesetze einzuhalten. Bitte prüfen Sie, ob der Kauf, Verkauf, die Verwendung oder der Besitz von digitalen Token angesichts Ihrer finanziellen Umstände und Ihres Verständnisses von digitalen Token für Sie geeignet ist. Der Wert von digitalen Token kann sich schnell ändern und sie können ihren Wert vollkommen verlieren.
Darüber hinaus sind Worldcoin-Token („WLD“) nicht für die Verwendung, den Kauf oder den Zugriff durch US-Personen vorgesehen, einschließlich US-Bürgern, Einwohnern oder Personen in den Vereinigten Staaten oder Unternehmen, die in den Vereinigten Staaten gegründet wurden oder ihren Sitz oder einen registrierten Vertreter in den Vereinigten Staaten haben. Wir bieten WLD nicht für solche US-Personen an. Darüber hinaus verpflichten Sie sich, WLD nicht an US-Personen zu verkaufen, zu übertragen oder zugänglich zu machen. Weitere Informationen zu Risiken im Zusammenhang mit WLD finden Sie hier.
1. Geltungsbereich der Bedingungen
1.1 Datenschutz und Ihre Daten
. Wenn Sie auf die Apps zugreifen, stellen Sie uns möglicherweise Kategorien personenbezogener Daten, wie Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer, zur Verfügung. Wenn Sie Informationen zur Verfügung stellen, um Ihren Proof of Personhood (Menschlichkeitsnachweis) zu erbringen und Ihre WLD-Token zu beanspruchen, stellen Sie möglicherweise besondere Kategorien sensibler personenbezogener Daten, wie z. B. Ihre biometrischen Informationen, zur Verfügung. In unserer Datenschutzerklärung wird beschrieben, welche Daten wir von Ihnen erheben und wie wir diese nutzen. Bitte nutzen Sie die Dienste nicht, wenn Sie nicht möchten, dass wir Ihre Daten in der in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Weise erheben oder nutzen.
1.2 Berechtigung.
Webseiten, auf denen unsere Dienstleistungen beschrieben werden, sind möglicherweise weltweit zugänglich. Dies bedeutet jedoch nicht, dass alle Dienste oder Funktionen in Ihrem Land legal oder verfügbar sind. Sie dürfen kein VPN oder ähnliche Tools verwenden, um Einschränkungen zu umgehen. Es liegt in Ihrer Verantwortung sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste dort, wo Sie sie nutzen, legal ist. Unsere Dienste sind nicht in allen Sprachen verfügbar. Unsere Dienste sind dort, wo Sie sie nutzen, legal. Unsere Dienste sind nicht in allen Sprachen verfügbar. Um die Dienste nutzen zu können, müssen Sie diese Bedingungen und alle geltenden Gesetze einhalten. Sie dürfen unsere Dienste nicht dazu nutzen, illegale oder rechtswidrige Aktivitäten durchzuführen, zu fördern oder anderen dabei zu helfen.
Darüber hinaus müssen Sie alle der folgenden Kriterien erfüllen:
Sie sind mindestens 18 Jahre alt; und
Sie befinden sich
nicht
in einem der folgenden Länder bzw. Orte oder unterliegen deren Kontrolle oder sind Staatsangehöriger oder Einwohner eines der folgenden Länder bzw. Orte: Syrien, die Krim, den Regionen Donezk, Luhansk, Cherson und Saporischschja in der Ukraine, Russland, Nordkorea, Iran, Kuba oder einem anderen Land oder einer anderen Region, aus dem/der die Vereinigten Staaten, die Europäische Union oder ein anderes Land oder eine andere Rechtsordnung den Zugriff auf die Dienste verboten hat;
Sie sind vom U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control („OFAC“) oder den Sanktionslisten eines anderen Landes nicht zu einem „Specially Designated National“ erklärt worden und Ihr Name steht nicht auf der Denied Persons List des U.S. Department of Commerce oder den Listen verbotener Personen eines anderen Landes.
Wenn Sie nicht alle diese Anforderungen erfüllen, dürfen Sie nicht auf die Dienste zugreifen oder diese nutzen, und dementsprechend können wir Ihre Möglichkeiten, auf die Dienste zuzugreifen oder diese zu nutzen, einschränken.
Wenn Sie in Deutschland ansässig oder niedergelassen sind oder dort Ihren gewöhnlichen Wohnsitz oder eingetragenen Firmensitz haben, dürfen Sie außerdem nicht auf Drittanbieterdienste im Sinne von Abschnitt 2.5 oder dezentralisierte Anwendungen im Sinne von Abschnitt 2.8 zugreifen oder diese nutzen. Diese Funktionen sind für Sie nicht verfügbar.
1.3 Verfügbarkeit
. Webseiten, die die Dienste beschreiben, sind weltweit zugänglich, aber dies bedeutet nicht, dass alle Dienste oder Dienstfunktionen in Ihrem Land legal oder verfügbar sind. Der Zugang zu bestimmten Diensten (oder bestimmten Funktionen von Diensten) in bestimmten Ländern kann von uns oder von Regierungen blockiert werden. Sie dürfen kein VPN oder ähnliche Tools verwenden, um Einschränkungen zu umgehen. Der Zugriff auf die Apps und bestimmte Funktionen innerhalb der Apps kann je nach Ihrem Standort nicht verfügbar oder eingeschränkt sein.
Es liegt in Ihrer Verantwortung, sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzung der Dienste dort, wo Sie sie nutzen, legal ist.
Die Dienste sind nicht in allen Sprachen verfügbar.
1.4 Aktualisierungen
. Wir können diese Bedingungen von Zeit zu Zeit ändern. Wenn wir dies tun, werden wir die aktualisierten Bedingungen auf den Diensten zur Verfügung stellen und, sofern dies nach geltendem Recht erforderlich ist, werden wir Sie vor der Vornahme von Änderungen benachrichtigen, und wenn solche Änderungen für Sie besonders wesentlich oder nachteilig sein könnten, werden wir Sie zusätzlich vorher benachrichtigen, sofern dies nach geltendem Recht erforderlich ist. Sie nehmen zur Kenntnis und erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass Ihre fortgesetzte Nutzung der Dienste nach Vornahme solcher Änderungen und ohne ausdrücklichen Widerspruch Ihrerseits als Zustimmung zu den aktualisierten Bedingungen gilt. Sie können die Nutzung der Dienste jederzeit einstellen, wenn Sie diesen Bedingungen nicht zustimmen. Da sich die Dienste im Laufe der Zeit weiterentwickeln, können wir die Dienste jederzeit und ohne Vorankündigung nach eigenem Ermessen ganz oder teilweise ändern oder einstellen, soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist.
1.5 Zusätzliche Bedingungen.
Für bestimmte Anwendungen, Inhalte, Funktionen oder Teile der Dienste können zusätzliche Bedingungen gelten, und alle diese zusätzlichen Bedingungen, die wir Ihnen zur Verfügung stellen, sind Teil der vorliegenden Bedingungen.
2. Dienste
2.1 Non-Custodial Wallet.
World App enthält ein nicht gehostetes und Non-Custodial Wallet (nur Sie haben die Schlüssel) für unterstützte Kryptowährungen, digitale Währungen oder digitale Token (einschließlich WLD und zusammenfassend „digitale Token“). Sie haben die Kontrolle über die in Ihrem Wallet gespeicherten digitalen Token. Mit der World App werden die privaten Schlüssel (die das Passwort für den Zugriff auf die digitalen Token darstellen) direkt auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert. Sie können Ihre digitalen Token jederzeit, vorbehaltlich des Internetzugangs und der Überlastung der Blockchain, zurückziehen, indem Sie sie an eine andere Blockchain-Adresse senden. Wenn Sie Ihre digitalen Token in Ihrem Wallet aufbewahren, behalten wir keine Kontrolle über Ihr Wallet, Ihre digitalen Token oder Ihre privaten Schlüssel. Die Nutzer sind für das Risiko des Verlusts ihrer privaten Schlüssel verantwortlich, und weder TFH noch die World App können die Schlüssel wiederherstellen.
Da es sich bei der World App um ein Non-Custodial Wallet handelt, erhalten Sie eine Wallet-Adresse, die angibt, wo sich Ihre digitalen Token in der entsprechenden Blockchain befinden. Wir haben keine Möglichkeit, auf Ihre digitalen Token zuzugreifen.
2.2 Unterstützte digitale Token.
Die World App unterstützt bestimmte ERC-20-Token. Wir können in Zukunft möglicherweise weitere digitale Token unterstützen. World App zeigt unterstützte digitale Token an.
Überprüfen Sie unbedingt, welche Token und Netzwerke in der World App unterstützt werden, bevor Sie Ihre digitalen Token hinterlegen oder abheben. Wir können Ihre digitalen Token nicht wiederherstellen, wenn Sie nicht unterstützte Token senden oder digitale Token an die falsche Wallet-Adresse senden.
Sie sind sich darüber im Klaren, dass das Senden nicht unterstützter digitaler Token an eine Wallet-Adresse von World App dazu führen kann, dass Sie den Zugriff auf diese digitalen Token vollständig verlieren. Wir haben keine Möglichkeit, digitale Token wiederherzustellen. Bitte stellen Sie sicher, dass Sie immer die richtigen digitalen Token an die richtige Wallet-Adresse senden. Sie können eine Transaktion mit einer kleinen Menge digitaler Token testen.
2.3 Angebote und Zugriff.
Wenn Sie mit Ihren digitalen Token interagieren – z. B. indem Sie sie an eine andere Wallet-Adresse senden oder eine Verbindung zu einer verteilten Anwendung herstellen – und dabei die Dienste nutzen, müssen Sie die Interaktion über die Geräte genehmigen oder „unterzeichnen“, die Sie während des Onboarding-Prozesses identifiziert haben. Die Apps sind vollständig auf Ihre Genehmigungen von diesen Geräten angewiesen, um Interaktionen mit der entsprechenden Blockchain einzuleiten. Sie verstehen, dass Sie direkt mit der entsprechenden Blockchain interagieren, wenn Sie diese Interaktionen durchführen, und dass wir nicht für die Übermittlung von Aufträgen in Ihrem Namen verantwortlich sind.
2.4 Informationen von Dritten.
Durch die Nutzung der Dienste erhalten Sie möglicherweise Zugriff auf Informationen, die sich auf Ihre digitalen Token beziehen, wie unter anderem deren aktuellen Marktwert. Die Präsentation dieser Informationen impliziert keine Verbindung mit Dritten oder eine Empfehlung Dritter, selbst wenn bestimmte Funktionalitäten, die in Verbindung mit den Diensten bereitgestellt werden, die Verwendung von Produkten Dritter erfordern. Der Inhalt der Drittanbieterdienste und -produkte, der über die Dienste angegeben wird, beruht auf Informationen, die allgemein verfügbar sind oder uns von den Dritten zur Verfügung gestellt werden, und wir erteilen daher keinerlei Zusicherungen oder Gewährleistungen für die Zuverlässigkeit der Drittanbieterdienste oder produktbezogenen Informationen von Dritten.
2.5 Drittanbieterdienste
Nutzer, die in Deutschland ansässig sind oder dort ihren gewöhnlichen Wohnsitz oder eingetragenen Firmensitz haben, können Drittanbieterdienste nicht nutzen, um ihre digitalen Token gemäß diesem Abschnitt zu verkaufen oder auszutauschen.
Sofern verfügbar, können die Dienste Ihnen Links zu externen Auftragsverarbeitern zur Verfügung stellen, um Transaktionen wie den Kauf von digitalen Token, den Verkauf von digitalen Token, den Austausch von digitalen Token und andere Funktionen, die in Zukunft verfügbar sein können, zu verarbeiten. Sie können sehen, welche Drittanbieterdienste in der World App verfügbar sind. Wenn Sie diese Transaktionen ausführen, tätigen Sie Transaktionen mit Dritten und nicht mit uns. Sie müssen die entsprechenden Anweisungen des Drittanbieters befolgen und dessen Nutzungsbedingungen akzeptieren. Wir übernehmen zu keiner Zeit die Kontrolle über Ihre Gelder oder digitalen Token, während wir Ihnen unsere Dienste bereitstellen oder wenn Sie auf Drittanbieterdienste zugreifen.
2.6 Peer-to-Peer-Transaktionen.
Die Dienste bieten eine Kommunikationsplattform, über die Sie unterstützte digitale Token an andere Wallets in der Blockchain senden oder von diesen anfordern, empfangen und speichern können, unabhängig davon, ob diese von Ihnen oder von Dritten kontrolliert werden. Die Übertragung von unterstützten digitalen Token zwischen Ihren anderen Blockchain-Wallets und an und von Dritten ist eine Übertragung. Die Partei, die die Übertragung veranlasst, ist allein für die ordnungsgemäße Durchführung der Transaktion verantwortlich, was unter anderem die Zahlung ausreichender Netzwerk- oder Miner-Gebühren beinhalten kann, damit die Transaktion erfolgreich durchgeführt werden kann. Unzureichende Netzwerkgebühren können dazu führen, dass eine Übertragung ausstehend bleibt, und zu Verzögerungen oder Verlusten infolge eines Fehlers bei der Einleitung der Transaktion führen. Wir sind nicht verpflichtet, bei der Behebung solcher Transaktionen zu helfen. Wenn Sie ein digitales Token aus Ihrem Wallet an ein anderes Blockchain-Wallet senden, werden die Übertragungen von Ihnen in der Chain ausgeführt und stehen nicht unter unserer Kontrolle. Sie sollten alle Transaktionsinformationen verifizieren, bevor Sie sie bestätigen. Wir übernehmen keine Haftung oder Verantwortung für den Fall, dass Sie eine falsche Blockchain-Zieladresse eingeben. Übertragungen von digitalen Token können nicht rückgängig gemacht werden, sobald sie an das entsprechende Blockchain-Netzwerk gesendet wurden, auch wenn sie ausstehend bleiben können und entsprechend gekennzeichnet sind, während die Transaktion von Netzwerkbetreibern bearbeitet wird. Wir haben keine Kontrolle über das Netzwerk und garantieren nicht, dass eine Übertragung durch das Netzwerk bestätigt wird.
2.7 Tresor
2.7.1 Allgemeine Informationen
.World App bietet Nutzern die Schnittstelle zu einem dezentralisierten „Tresor“ für Ihre digitalen Token („Tresor“). Mit der Nutzung des Tresors erkennen Sie die Bedingungen an, die für den Tresor gelten, sowie alle zusätzlichen Bedingungen, die von Dritten bereitgestellt werden, die Funktionen entwickelt haben oder bereitstellen, die sich auf die Nutzung des Tresors beziehen oder daraus resultieren.
Der Tresor unterstützt nur bestimmte digitale Token. Diese digitalen Token gelten nicht als Asset-Referenz-Token oder E-Geld-Token im Sinne der Verordnung (EU) 2023/1114 des Europäischen Parlaments und des Rates vom 31. Mai 2023 über Märkte für Krypto-Anlagen. Die unterstützten digitalen Token werden in der World App angezeigt, wenn Sie auf Ihren Tresor zugreifen. Die vom Tresor unterstützten digitalen Token können sich von Zeit zu Zeit ändern, und es gibt keine Garantie dafür, dass die unterstützten digitalen Token weiterhin für die Verwendung im Tresor verfügbar sind.
Der Tresor wird in Verbindung mit Smart Contracts von Dritten bereitgestellt. Keine andere Person oder Organisation außer Ihnen hat die Möglichkeit, mit Ihrem Tresor oder den digitalen Token in Ihrem Tresor zu interagieren. Weder TFH noch Dritte haben administrative Schlüssel oder Zugriff (privilegiert oder nicht) auf Ihren Tresor oder die zugehörigen Smart Contracts. Eine Hinterlegung in den Tresor oder eine Abhebung von digitalen Token für Ihr Konto kann nur erfolgen, wenn die betreffende Transaktion mit Ihrem/Ihren entsprechenden privaten Schlüssel(n), wie in Abschnitt 2.1 dieser Bedingungen beschrieben, signiert ist. Das bedeutet, dass Sie bei Verlust des Zugriffs auf oder der Kontrolle über Ihre(n) privaten Schlüssel keine Hinterlegungen oder Abhebungen von digitalen Token aus dem Tresor vornehmen können und keine andere Partei in der Lage ist, Ihnen zu helfen oder dies in Ihrem Namen zu tun. Dementsprechend bietet Ihnen die Nutzung des Tresors keine Verwahrungs-, Kautions- oder Transferdienste von TFH oder eines anderen Dritten in Bezug auf digitale Token, die Sie mit Hilfe des Tresors auf Ihrem Konto sperren.
Der Smart Contract, der die Tresorfunktionen für WLD-Token regelt, kann hier über die Blockchain eingesehen werden. Aus Gründen der Klarheit unterliegt die Nutzung dieser und anderer damit verbundener Tresor-Funktionen demselben Haftungsausschluss, der in Abschnitt 12 dieser Bedingungen enthalten ist.
2.7.2 Tresor-Funktionen
. Der Tresor bietet derzeit die folgenden Funktionen, die von TFH oder Dritten geändert, entfernt oder ergänzt werden können:  Sperren, Rendite, Abhebung und Sicherheitszeitraum, Überweisungen in den Tresor.
2.7.3 Sperren
. Durch die Verwendung des Tresors erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, Ihre digitalen Token für eine bestimmte Frist lang zu sperren. Das Sperren digitaler Token mit Hilfe Ihres Tresors überträgt diese digitalen Token von Ihrem Non-Custodial Wallet auf einen dezentralisierten Smart Contract. Bei der Übertragung werden diese digitalen Token im Tresor „gesperrt“. Dies umfasst die Frist, in der sie im Tresor hinterlegt bleiben, sowie eine vorher festgelegte Dauer, die als „Sicherheitsfrist“ bezeichnet wird und weiter unten näher beschrieben wird. Solange Ihre digitalen Token gesperrt sind, können Sie nicht auf sie zugreifen, sie übertragen oder andere Transaktionen mit ihnen durchführen, bis Sie die Abhebung der Token beantragt haben und die entsprechende Sicherheitsfrist verstrichen ist. Niemand, auch nicht TFH oder der Drittanbieter, ist in der Lage, Ihre gesperrten digitalen Token zu entsperren, zu verwahren, zu kontrollieren, abzuheben oder zu übertragen. Das Einbringen Ihrer digitalen Token in den Tresor und die Unterwerfung unter die Sperr- und Abhebungsbeschränkungen stellt keinen Verkauf, kein Darlehen und keine Übertragung von Rechten, Eigentum oder Anteilen an den digitalen Token an TFH oder einen anderen Dritten dar.
Das Sperren Ihrer digitalen Token im Tresor garantiert nicht die sichere Verwahrung oder Aufbewahrung Ihrer digitalen Token. Für Ihre digitalen Token gilt keine Hinterlegungssicherung oder ein ähnlicher Schutz, und der Wert und/oder der Nutzen der von Ihnen gesperrten digitalen Token kann während der Dauer der Sicherheitsfrist steigen oder fallen. Das bedeutet, dass der Wert oder der Nutzen aller digitalen Token, die Sie in Ihrem Tresor aufbewahren, während der Sicherheitsfrist sinken oder auf Null gehen kann. Sie erkennen an und erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass jedwede Abhebung von digitalen Token auf Ihrem Konto nach der geltenden Sicherheitsfrist dazu führen kann, dass Sie digitale Token zurückerhalten, die verglichen mit dem Zeitpunkt, als Sie sie in Ihrem Tresor eingeschlossen haben, einen geringeren oder gar keinen Wert mehr haben und dass weder die TFH noch ein Dritter das Risiko oder die Verantwortung für eine etwaige Wertminderung trägt.
2.7.4 Rendite
. Sie können auch berechtigt sein, eine Rendite auf bestimmte digitale Token in Ihrem Tresor zu erwirtschaften, die für die Zwecke dieses Produkts als „Rendite“ bezeichnet wird. Diese Rendite, die die Form von zusätzlichen digitalen Token annehmen kann, wird von einem Dritten über eine separate Reihe von Smart-Contract-Operationen bereitgestellt, auf die Sie über die in der World App bereitgestellte Schnittstelle zugreifen können. Weder TFH noch ein Dritter nutzt Ihre digitalen Token, übernimmt die Kontrolle darüber, erhält eine Gutschrift dafür oder verfügt anderweitig über sie. Die Rendite ist also kein Zins, der an etwas anderes gebunden ist oder durch etwas anderes erzeugt wird als durch die Sperrung Ihrer digitalen Token gemäß den angegebenen Bedingungen und Spezifikationen. Jede Rendite, die Sie möglicherweise erhalten, wird Ihnen von dem Dritten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Entscheidung, digitale Token im Tresor zu speichern, als Grant gewährt. Die Spezifikationen, die die Generierung von Renditen bestimmen, einschließlich des generierten Betrags oder des Zeitraums, in dem er anfallen kann, können jederzeit nach dem Ermessen des Drittanbieters geändert oder aufgehoben werden.
Es kann eine maximale Rendite geben, die Sie verdienen können. Diese Angaben werden neben Ihrem Tresor und über alle zusätzlichen Bedingungen angezeigt, die von den Dritten (in der World App als „Anbieter“ bezeichnet), der die Rendite bereitstellt, zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Diese zusätzlichen Bedingungen werden ebenfalls in diese Bedingungen einbezogen. Die Rendite wird nicht von TFH bereitgestellt oder verwaltet.
Auflaufende Renditen werden erst nach Abschluss der Abhebung von renditegenerierenden digitalen Token aus dem Tresor an Sie ausgeschüttet, was erst nach Ablauf der jeweiligen Sicherheitsfrist geschieht. Diese Abhebung ist die letzte Bedingung für den Grant von Renditen, d. h. Sie haben kein Recht, keinen Anspruch und kein Interesse an Renditen, die generiert wurden oder noch generiert werden, es sei denn, die Renditen sind in Ihrem nicht Non-Custodial Wallet eingegangen. Das bedeutet auch, dass Sie bei Verlust des Zugriffs auf oder der Kontrolle über Ihre(n) privaten Schlüssel keine Abhebungen vornehmen können, die Sie zum Erhalt von Renditen berechtigen.
2.7.5 Abhebung und Sicherheitsfrist
. Sie können jederzeit eine Abhebung Ihrer digitalen Token aus Ihrem Tresor einleiten. Die digitalen Token, die Sie aus Ihrem Tresor abgehoben haben, werden Ihnen nach Ablauf einer festgelegten Zeitspanne, der „Sicherheitsfrist“, zurückgegeben. Jedes Mal, wenn Sie eine Abhebung von digitalen Token aus dem Tresor veranlassen, beginnt eine neue Sicherheitsfrist, in der die Zeit bis zur Rückgabe dieser digitalen Token an Sie heruntergezählt wird. Während dieser Zeit bleiben die digitalen Token, die Sie zur Abhebung ausgewählt haben, gesperrt, und Sie können Ihre Abhebung auch abbrechen. Sobald die Sicherheitsfrist verstrichen ist, ist Ihre Auszahlung abgeschlossen und die digitalen Token werden zusammen mit den eventuell angefallenen Renditen an Ihr Wallet gesendet. Die Dauer der Sicherheitsfrist wird in der World App angezeigt, wenn Sie auf Ihren Tresor zugreifen.
2.7.6 Grants an Tresor
. Wenn Sie diese Funktion auswählen, können Sie WLD-Grants automatisch direkt in den Tresor Ihres Kontos und nicht in Ihr Wallet senden. Sie können diese Einstellung jederzeit ändern.
2.7.7 TFH und Tresor
. Der Zugriff auf diese Funktion erfolgt über die World App. TFH kann jedoch nur zugehörige Daten lesen und Ihnen anzeigen. TFH kann keine Ihrer digitalen Token übertragen, abheben oder hinterlegen und hat keinen Zugriff auf Ihren Tresor.
2.8 Dezentrale Anwendungen
Dieser Abschnitt gilt nicht für in Deutschland niedergelassene oder ansässige Nutzer, die ihren gewöhnlichen Wohnsitz oder eingetragenen Firmensitz dort haben:
Sofern verfügbar
, können wir Ihnen Funktionen anbieten, die es Ihnen ermöglichen, Ihr Wallet mit verschiedenen dezentralisierten Anwendungen zu verbinden. Sie tragen die alleinige Verantwortung dafür, die Sicherheit dieser Drittanbieteranwendungen zu gewährleisten. Wir haben keine Kontrolle über Anwendungen von Drittanbietern und können keine Unterstützung für Probleme bieten, die bei der Verbindung mit Anwendungen von Drittanbietern möglicherweise auftreten.
2.9 Nutzer-Support
. Wir stellen Ihnen Nutzer-Support zur Verfügung, um Sie bei bestimmten Funktionen in Verbindung mit den Diensten zu unterstützen. Um sich mit uns in Verbindung zu setzen, wählen Sie „Support“ aus dem In-App-Menü oder über support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 World ID-Schnittstelle
. Die Worldcoin Foundation, und nicht TFH, verwaltet das World ID Protokoll und kontrolliert die Orb-bezogene Datenverarbeitung zur Verifizierung einer World ID. Wir können Ihnen Ihre World ID (als Schnittstelle) über den Dienst zur Verfügung stellen. Mit dem World ID-Protokoll können Sie beweisen, dass Sie ein echter und unverwechselbarer Mensch sind, und gleichzeitig Ihre Privatsphäre schützen.
2.11 Invite-Programm
. Sofern verfügbar, stellen wir Ihnen möglicherweise die Funktion „Invite“ (Einladen) zur Verfügung. Mit der Invite-Funktion können Sie Freunde und Familienmitglieder einladen, die World App herunterzuladen und sich für World ID verifizieren zu lassen. Wenn Sie Invite nutzen, erklären Sie sich mit den folgenden Geschäftsbedingungen einverstanden:
Die Prämien für die Teilnahme an Invite werden von World Assets Limited bereitgestellt. World Assets Limited kann Ihnen nach eigenem Ermessen eine Prämie für das Einladen von Nutzern anbieten, die ihre World ID erfolgreich verifiziert haben. Um den Reward zu erhalten, müssen Sie bestimmte Bedingungen erfüllen, die Ihnen in World App erklärt werden. Es besteht eine Höchstgrenze für die Anzahl der Nutzer, die Sie zur World App einladen können. Diese Höchstgrenze wird in der World App angezeigt.
Für die Inanspruchnahme der Invite-Funktion ist kein Kauf erforderlich. Das Invite-Programm ist nur für den persönlichen, nicht kommerziellen Gebrauch verfügbar. Sie dürfen die Invite-Funktion nur in gutem Glauben für rechtmäßige Zwecke verwenden. Sie dürfen: (a) das Invite-Programm oder die Dienste nicht auf irreführende, betrügerische oder rechtswidrige Weise nutzen; (b) nichts tun, um unsere Marke, unseren Firmenwert oder unseren Ruf zu schädigen; (c) keine unaufgeforderten  oder nicht autorisierten Werbematerialien versenden; (d) keine falschen oder irreführenden Behauptungen machen; (e) keine bezahlte Suche, bezahlte Medien oder andere ähnliche Aktivitäten verwenden, um Nutzer über das Invite-Programm zu werben; und (f) das Invite-Programm nicht verwenden, um zu versuchen, personenbezogene Daten von anderen Nutzern zu erhalten.
Das Invite-Programm ist nicht in allen Ländern oder an allen Standorten und nicht für alle Nutzer verfügbar. Die Teilnahme am Invite-Programm ist nicht in Rechtsgebieten verfügbar, in denen diese Funktion oder ein Teil davon gegen gesetzliche Anforderungen verstoßen könnte (oder dazu führen könnte, dass wir gegen gesetzliche Anforderungen verstoßen). Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, das Invite-Programm nicht zu verwenden, wenn die Invite-Funktion nicht im Einklang mit den an Ihrem Standort geltenden Gesetzen steht.
Das Invite-Programm wird nach unserem alleinigen Ermessen zur Verfügung gestellt. Wir können die Funktion jederzeit ändern, modifizieren, aussetzen und beenden. World Assets Limited kann es ablehnen, Ihnen einen Reward für die Einladung von Nutzern zur Verifizierung ihrer World ID anzubieten, wenn World Assets Limited nach eigenem Ermessen feststellt, dass Sie gegen diese Bedingungen verstoßen haben.
2.12 WLD-Grants und -Reservierungen
. Einer der Drittanbieterdienste besteht darin, in verschiedenen Abständen einen kleinen Betrag an WLD einzufordern („WLD-Grants“). WLD-Grants werden von World Assets Limited, einer Tochtergesellschaft der Worldcoin Foundation, bereitgestellt. Die genauen Beträge, Intervalle und Zeitpunkte der WLD-Grants werden in der World App angegeben, werden aber ausschließlich von World Assets Limited festgelegt. In Übereinstimmung mit früheren Versionen dieser Bedingungen garantieren die zuvor verfügbaren WLD-Reservierungen nicht, dass Sie WLD-Grants in beliebiger Höhe erhalten. Die genauen Beträge, Intervalle und Zeitpunkte der WLD-Reservierungen werden in der World App angegeben, aber ausschließlich von World Assets Limited festgelegt. WLD-Reservierungen können mit oder ohne vorherige Ankündigung in der World App ablaufen, unabhängig davon, ob Sie bereits eine WLD-Reservierung vorgenommen oder den zugehörigen WLD-Grant erhalten haben. Sie sind nach dem alleinigen Ermessen von World Assets Limited widerrufbar.
2.13 Operator App
. Für Orb Operators und andere Partner stellen wir eine Operator App zur Verfügung, mit der Sie bestimmte Aktivitäten und Statistiken überwachen können, die für Sie und Ihr Unternehmen als Orb Operators relevant sind. Wir können Ihnen auch bestimmte Funktionen zur Verfügung stellen, die Sie bei Ihren Geschäften als Orb Operator unterstützen.
2.14. Miniapps
. „Miniapps“ ist eine Funktion von World App, die es Ihnen ermöglicht, auf eine Plattform von Minianwendungen zuzugreifen, auf die innerhalb von World App zugegriffen werden kann. Es liegt in unserem alleinigen Ermessen, wie Miniapps innerhalb von World App angezeigt werden.Sie müssen über eine World App-Wallet-Adresse verfügen, um auf Miniapps zugreifen zu können.
Sie nehmen zur Kenntnis, dass TFH mit der Anzeige von Miniapps lediglich eine Technologieplattform zur Verfügung stellt, die Nutzer miteinander verbindet. TFH wird zu keinem Zeitpunkt traditionelle oder digitale Währungen übertragen, aufbewahren, in Besitz nehmen, verwahren oder anderweitig mit ihnen handeln. TFH verarbeitet keine Transaktionen, agiert nicht als Zahlungsabwickler oder ist anderweitig an der Abwicklung von Transaktionen beteiligt. TFH ist nicht an den Transaktionen beteiligt und übernimmt keine Haftung in Bezug auf diese Transaktionen. TFH ist nicht in der Lage, Unterstützung bei Transaktionsproblemen zu leisten.
2.14.1 Transaktionen und Zahlungen im Zusammenhang mit Miniapps
. Miniapps werden in der World App angezeigt und können Waren oder Dienste anbieten, die World App-Nutzer mit digitalen Token in ihren World App Wallets kaufen können. Diese Transaktionen finden zwischen Ihnen und der Miniapp statt.  TFH ist nicht an einer solchen Transaktion beteiligt.
In Bezug auf solche Transaktionen nehmen Sie zur Kenntnis, dass es sich bei der World App-Wallet um einen Non-Custodial-Dienst handelt, dass TFH Ihre digitalen Token nicht speichert oder verwahrt und dass TFH keine Transaktionen durchführt, überträgt, in Besitz nimmt oder anderweitig an der Durchführung von Transaktionen beteiligt ist. Digitale Token werden immer auf ihren jeweiligen Blockchain-Netzwerken gespeichert und übertragen. Es gibt keine Garantie dafür, dass die Transaktionen korrekt abgewickelt werden.
TFH verbindet Sie nur mit einem Dritten auf der Miniapps-Plattform und ist nicht an den Transaktionen beteiligt. TFH spielt keine Rolle bei der Verarbeitung von Zahlungen und der Regelung von Rückerstattungs- oder Stornierungsgebühren.
Sobald Sie sich für eine Transaktion entscheiden, müssen Sie den vereinbarten Betrag und die Art der digitalen Token senden. TFH verarbeitet weder die digitalen Token der Nutzer noch traditionelle Währungen und führt keine Übertragungen im Namen der Nutzer durch. TFH übernimmt keine Abwicklung, Verwaltung, Beaufsichtigung, Verifizierung oder Garantie für Transaktionen.  Falls die Transaktion nicht ankommt, rückgängig gemacht wird, nicht ordnungsgemäß verarbeitet wird oder anderweitig ein Fehler auftritt, müssen Sie und die Drittanbieter zusammenarbeiten, um alle Probleme zu lösen. Alle Streitigkeiten, Ansprüche, Verluste, Missverständnisse, technischen Fehler oder Probleme jeglicher Art (sowohl versehentlich als auch mutmaßlich absichtlich) im Zusammenhang mit Zahlungen oder Transaktionen müssen direkt zwischen Ihnen und dem Drittanbieter geklärt werden.  TFH trägt keinerlei Verantwortung und ist weder an Streitigkeiten oder Diskussionen im Zusammenhang mit Zahlungen beteiligt, noch haftet TFH für etwaige Verluste oder Schäden, die den beteiligten Parteien entstehen könnten.
Sie sind allein dafür verantwortlich, das Risiko etwaiger Preisschwankungen in Bezug auf den Wert der digitalen Token zu akzeptieren, und verstehen, dass sich der Wert der an der Transaktion beteiligten digitalen Token zum Zeitpunkt des Abschlusses der Transaktion erheblich verändert haben kann.
2.14.2 Dritte
. Produkte und Dienste, die in einer Miniapp angezeigt werden, werden von Dritten angeboten und verwaltet. Durch die Nutzung von Miniapps nehmen Sie Folgendes zur Kenntnis und erklären sich damit einverstanden:
Diese Bedingungen gelten zwischen Ihnen und uns und nicht für eine bestimmte Miniapp;
Sie greifen auf eine App zu, die von einem Dritten entwickelt und/oder angeboten wird, der allein für die Miniapp verantwortlich ist;
TFH stellt über die World App-Wallet nur den Zugang zu Drittanbietern von Zahlungen zur Verfügung und wickelt selbst keine Zahlungen ab und verwahrt keine Gelder;
die Miniapps können zusätzliche Bedingungen als Teil ihrer Produkte oder Dienste enthalten, die Sie einhalten müssen, wenn Sie deren Dienste annehmen; und
Sie erkennen alle Risiken im Zusammenhang mit den Transaktionen an und erklären sich ausdrücklich damit einverstanden, dass wir nicht für Risiken oder nachteilige Folgen haften, die sich aus solchen Transaktionen ergeben.
Die einzelnen Entwickler der bei „Miniapps“ verfügbaren Miniapps sind allein für die Inhalte, Produkte, Waren oder Dienste verantwortlich, die Ihnen direkt über ihre jeweiligen Miniapps zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Bei Fragen oder Streitigkeiten müssen Sie sich direkt an den jeweiligen Entwickler wenden.
Die Nutzer akzeptieren alle Risiken, die mit einer Transaktion verbunden sind, einschließlich des Risikos, dass sie den Erlös aus ihrem Kauf oder Verkauf nicht erhalten. Im Falle eines Problems im Zusammenhang mit einer Transaktion ist TFH nicht in der Lage, bei der Lösung zu helfen, und übernimmt keine Haftung für Probleme, die sich aus Transaktionen ergeben.
2.14.3 TFH-Gebühren
. Wir erheben möglicherweise eine Gebühr für die Nutzung von Miniapps, wenn Sie eine Transaktion mit einem Entwickler durchführen. Die Höhe dieser Gebühr wird Ihnen auf der Plattform angezeigt. Alle diese Gebühren werden in Miniapps angezeigt und können von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisiert und geändert werden.
2.14.4 Steuern
. Es liegt in Ihrer alleinigen Verantwortung, festzustellen, ob und in welchem Umfang Steuern auf eine Transaktion über Miniapps oder auf Transaktionen, die Sie dort tätigen, anfallen, und den korrekten Steuerbetrag einzubehalten, zu erfassen, zu melden und an die zuständigen Steuerbehörden abzuführen.
2.14.5 Keine allgemeine Überwachung.
TFH ist nicht verpflichtet, die von Nutzern generierten Informationen generell zu überwachen oder aktiv nach Fakten oder Umständen zu suchen, die auf eine illegale Aktivität innerhalb von Miniapps hinweisen.
Sollten wir jedoch unabhängig von den verwendeten Mitteln Kenntnis davon erlangen, dass ein illegales Produkt oder ein illegaler Dienst über Miniapps Nutzern in der Europäischen Union angeboten wurde, werden wir die Nutzer, die das illegale Produkt oder den illegalen Dienst über Miniapps erworben haben, darüber informieren
.
2.14.6 Verbotene Aktivitäten
. Nutzer der Dienste von Miniapps verpflichten sich, keine Inhalte einzustellen oder zu verbreiten, die gegen Gesetze verstoßen oder die Rechte Dritter verletzen, einschließlich, aber nicht beschränkt auf Rechte an geistigem Eigentum, Datenschutzrechte oder das Recht auf Öffentlichkeit.
Außerdem verpflichten Sie sich, sich nicht an Aktivitäten zu beteiligen, die:
ungesetzlich, betrügerisch oder schädlich sind;
den Betrieb von Miniapps stören oder unterbrechen;
gegen unsere App-Richtlinien verstoßen; und
Inhalte enthalten, die nach den App-Richtlinien nicht erlaubt sind.
2.14.7 Kennzeichnung von illegalen Inhalten
. World App verfügt über leicht zugängliche und nutzerfreundliche Mechanismen für Nutzer, um uns illegale Inhalte auf der Miniapps-Plattform zu melden. Wir werden solche Meldungen schnellstmöglich überprüfen.
2.14.8 Entfernung von illegalen Inhalten
. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Miniapp illegale Inhalte enthält oder illegale Produkte oder Dienste anbietet, wird sie von Miniapps entfernt. TFH wird jedem Inserenten von illegalen Inhalten oder Diensten eine kurze, klare und spezifische Begründung zukommen lassen.
Jede Einschränkung, die World App seinen Nutzern auferlegt, wird sorgfältig, objektiv und verhältnismäßig durchgeführt.
Nutzer, die der Meinung sind, dass ihre Inhalte zu Unrecht entfernt oder der Zugang zu ihnen gesperrt wurde, können sich über
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
an uns wenden, um die Entscheidung anzufechten. Wir stellen ein kostenloses elektronisches Beschwerdesystem zur Verfügung, mit dem Nutzer unsere Entscheidungen in Bezug auf die Entfernung von Inhalten, die Aussetzung von Diensten, die Beendigung von Konten oder Monetarisierungsbeschränkungen aufgrund von angeblich illegalen Inhalten oder Verstößen gegen die Nutzungsbedingungen anfechten können.
2.14.9 Moderation von Inhalten
. TFH behält sich das Recht vor, die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste für Nutzer, die häufig offensichtlich rechtswidrige Inhalte bereitstellen, für einen angemessenen Zeitraum und nach vorheriger Abmahnung auszusetzen, sofern dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist. TFH kann auch die Bearbeitung von Hinweisen und Beschwerden von Nutzern, die häufig unbegründete Forderungen stellen, vorübergehend aussetzen.
2.15. Nutzernamen
. Ihr World App-Nutzername muss nicht Ihr richtiger Name sein. Wenn Sie einen Nutzernamen wählen, verpflichten Sie sich, die
Richtlinie für Nutzernamen
in ihrer aktuellsten Fassung einzuhalten.
3. Käufe, Gebühren und Steuern
3.1 Transaktionsgebühren
. Durch die Nutzung der Dienste erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, alle anfallenden Gebühren zu zahlen, einschließlich Transaktionsgebühren für den Tausch von digitalen Token und zugehörige Transaktionen. Wir werden Sie über alle anfallenden Gebühren informieren, bevor Sie eine Transaktion ausführen. Wenn Sie einen Zahlungsdienst eines Drittanbieters nutzen, können Bankgebühren, Kreditkarten- und Debitkartengebühren, die für Käufe von digitalen Token erhoben werden, mit dem für Ihre Käufe von digitalen Token beglichenen Betrag saldiert werden. Sie sind auch für die Zahlung aller zusätzlichen Gebühren verantwortlich, die von Ihrem Finanzdienstleister erhoben werden.
3.2 Netzwerkgebühr
. Für Interaktionen mit der Blockchain wird ebenfalls eine Netzwerkgebühr erhoben. Die Netzwerkgebühr wird vom Blockchain-Netzwerk, nicht uns, für die Ermöglichung von Interaktionen in Rechnung gestellt und an dieses gezahlt. In einigen Fällen können Sie innerhalb eines bestimmten Zeitraums, der von TFH nach eigenem Ermessen festgelegt wird, zu einer begrenzten Anzahl von kostenlosen Transaktionen berechtigt sein. Für solche Transaktionen gilt ein Mindesttransaktionswert, den TFH anpassen kann.
3.3 Steuern
. Es liegt in Ihrer alleinigen Verantwortung, festzustellen, ob und in welchem Umfang Steuern für Transaktionen über die Dienste anfallen, und den richtigen Steuerbetrag einzubehalten, zu erfassen, zu melden und an die zuständigen Steuerbehörden abzuführen.
3.4 Aktualisierungen
. Alle Gebühren werden in den Diensten zum aktuellen Wert angegeben und können von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisiert und geändert werden.
4. Risikofaktoren
4.1 Kein gesetzliches Zahlungsmittel.
Digitale Token sind kein gesetzliches Zahlungsmittel, werden von keiner Regierung unterstützt und für Konten und Wertsalden zu digitalen Token in den Diensten bestehen keine Schutzmaßnahmen der Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, der Securities Investor Protection Corporation oder ähnliche Schutzmaßnahmen, die in anderen Ländern zu finden sind. Wir sind keine Bank und bieten keine treuhänderischen Dienstleistungen an. Transaktionen, die über die World App getätigt werden, sind in vielen Ländern weitgehend unreguliert. Wir übernehmen keine Garantie für die Funktionalität der von uns unterstützten Blockchains, die unter anderem zu Verzögerungen, Interessenkonflikten oder operativen Entscheidungen durch Dritte führen könnten und für bestimmte Eigentümer von digitalen Token ungünstig sind oder zur Unmöglichkeit der Ausführung einer Transaktion mithilfe der Dienste führen könnten. Die Transaktionsdetails, die Sie über die Dienste übermitteln, werden möglicherweise nicht abgeschlossen oder verzögern sich auf der entsprechenden Blockchain erheblich, und wir übernehmen keine Verantwortung dafür, dass eine Transaktion nicht wie erwartet bestätigt oder verarbeitet wird. Es gibt keine Gewährleistungen oder Garantien dafür, dass eine über die Dienste eingeleitete Übertragung zur erfolgreichen Übertragung des Eigentums oder Anspruchs an einem digitalen Token führt. Darüber hinaus kann die Verwendung bestimmter digitaler Token, wie z. B. WLD, mit besonderen Risiken verbunden sein. Weitere Informationen zu WLD-spezifischen Risiken finden Sie hier .
4.2 Neue Technologie.
Die Dienste sind neu. Obwohl diese Software umfassend getestet wurde, ist die für die Dienste verwendete Software immer noch relativ neu und könnte Fehler oder Sicherheitsschwachstellen aufweisen. Darüber hinaus befindet sich die Software noch in der Entwicklung und kann im Laufe der Zeit erheblichen Änderungen unterzogen werden, die möglicherweise nicht den Erwartungen der Nutzer entsprechen.
4.3 Informationssicherheitsrisiko.
Digitale Token und die Nutzung der Dienste können entwendet oder gestohlen werden. Hacker oder andere böswillige Gruppen oder Organisationen können versuchen, die Dienste auf verschiedene Weise zu stören, wie unter anderem durch Malware-Angriffe, Denial-of-Service-Angriffe, konsensbasierte Angriffe, Sybil-Angriffe, Smurfing und Spoofing. Da die von uns unterstützten Blockchain-Netzwerke, wie z. B. das Ethereum-Protokoll, auf Open-Source-Software beruhen, kann die den Diensten zugrunde liegende Software ferner absichtliche oder unbeabsichtigte Fehler oder Schwächen enthalten, die die Dienste beeinträchtigen oder zum Verlust der digitalen Token von Nutzern oder zum Verlust der Möglichkeit der Nutzer, über die Dienste auf ihr Wallet zuzugreifen oder dieses zu kontrollieren, führen können. Im Falle eines solchen Softwarefehlers oder einer solchen Schwäche gibt es möglicherweise keine Abhilfe und den Nutzern wird keine Abhilfe, Rückerstattung oder Entschädigung garantiert.
4.4 Genauigkeit.
Obwohl wir beabsichtigen, über die Dienste genaue und zeitnahe Informationen (wie unter anderem den Inhalt) bereitzustellen, sind diese möglicherweise nicht immer genau, vollständig oder aktuell und können auch technische Ungenauigkeiten oder Schreibfehler beinhalten. In dem Bestreben, Ihnen auch weiterhin möglichst vollständige und genaue Informationen zur Verfügung zu stellen, können die Informationen, soweit gesetzlich zulässig, von Zeit zu Zeit ohne Vorankündigung geändert oder aktualisiert werden, einschließlich, aber nicht beschränkt auf Informationen zu unseren Richtlinien, Produkten und Dienstleistungen. Dementsprechend sollten Sie alle Informationen verifizieren, bevor Sie sich auf sie verlassen, und alle Entscheidungen, die auf Informationen beruhen, die über die Dienste bereitgestellt werden, liegen in Ihrer alleinigen Verantwortung und wir haften nicht für solche Entscheidungen.
4.5 Verfügbarkeit
. Obwohl wir uns bemühen, Ihnen einen ausgezeichneten Service zu bieten, garantieren wir nicht, dass die Dienste ohne Unterbrechung verfügbar sein werden. Die Dienste können von Zeit zu Zeit aus Wartungs- oder anderen Gründen vorübergehend nicht verfügbar sein. Wir übernehmen keine Verantwortung für Fehler, Unterlassungen, Unterbrechungen, Löschungen, Mängel, Verzögerungen beim Betrieb oder der Übertragung, Ausfall der Kommunikationsverbindung, Diebstahl oder Vernichtung oder unbefugten Zugriff oder Veränderung von Nutzerkommunikationen. Wir sind nicht verantwortlich für Probleme oder technische Störungen von Telefonnetzwerken oder -leitungen, Computer-Online-Systemen, Servern oder Providern, Computerausrüstungen, Software, Ausfälle von E-Mails oder Playern aufgrund von technischen Problemen oder Verkehrsstaus im Internet oder bei den Diensten oder einer Kombination davon, einschließlich Verletzungen oder Schäden an Nutzern oder Computern anderer Personen, die mit der Teilnahme oder dem Herunterladen von Materialien in Verbindung mit den Diensten zusammenhängen oder daraus resultieren. Wir sind nicht verantwortlich für Verluste oder Schäden, finanzielle Schäden oder entgangene Gewinne, entgangene Aufträge oder Personenschäden oder Todesfälle, die sich aus der Nutzung des Dienstes, Inhalten, die auf oder über den Dienst veröffentlicht oder an Nutzer übermittelt werden, oder Interaktionen zwischen Nutzern der Dienste, ob online oder offline, ergeben.
4.6 Abspaltungen
. Die Software, mit der WLD erstellt wird, ist quelloffen und kann von jedermann frei kopiert und verwendet werden. Das bedeutet, dass jeder eine modifizierte Version von WLD erstellen kann, auch bekannt als „Fork“ bzw. „Abspaltung“. Im Falle einer Abspaltung oder einer anderen Unterbrechung des Netzwerks der digitalen Token sind wir möglicherweise nicht in der Lage, Aktivitäten im Zusammenhang mit der Abspaltung zu unterstützen. Wenn eine Abspaltung auftritt, werden Transaktionen möglicherweise nicht, nur teilweise, falsch oder mit erheblicher Verzögerung abgeschlossen. Wir sind nicht verantwortlich für Verluste, die Ihnen ganz oder teilweise durch eine Abspaltung oder eine andere Netzwerkstörung entstehen.
4.7 Drittanbieterdienste.
Soweit verfügbar (siehe insbesondere Abschnitt 2.5), greifen wir auf Drittanbieterdienste zurück, um einige Merkmale und Funktionen innerhalb der Apps bereitzustellen, z. B. die Möglichkeit, digitale Token mit Fiat-Währung zu kaufen oder einen digitalen Vermögenswert gegen einen anderen zu tauschen. Wir erbringen diese Dienstleistungen nicht und sind nicht an einer solchen Transaktion beteiligt. Für diese Dienste sind Sie ausschließlich auf Drittanbieter angewiesen, bei denen Sie ein Konto haben und deren Bedingungen Sie zustimmen müssen. Wir
sind nicht in der Lage, Ihnen zu helfen, wenn Sie Probleme bei der Nutzung dieses Dienstes haben, und wir sind nicht verantwortlich für Transaktionen, die Sie mit Drittanbietern durchführen.
5. Geistiges Eigentum.
5.1 Eigentum
. Unsere Software, die Anwendung, die Dienste, der Inhalt, die Marken (wie unten definiert) und das Design, die Auswahl und die Anordnung des Inhalts in den Diensten (das „geistige Eigentum“) sind durch Urheberrechte, Markenzeichen, Patente und andere geistige Eigentumsrechte und Gesetze der Vereinigten Staaten und anderer Länder geschützt. Sie verpflichten sich, alle geltenden Rechte und Gesetze des geistigen Eigentums sowie alle im Vertrag oder den Diensten enthaltenen Hinweise auf Markenzeichen oder Urheberrechte oder Beschränkungen zu beachten. Sie dürfen Urheberrechts-, Marken- oder andere Eigentumshinweise, die im geistigen Eigentum enthalten sind, nicht entfernen.
5.2 Markenzeichen.
Der Name Tools for Humanity Corporation, das World App-Logo und alle damit verbundenen Logos und Slogans sind Marken oder Dienstmarken der Tools for Humanity Corporation oder ihrer Lizenzgeber (die „Marken“). Sie dürfen die Marken ohne unsere schriftliche Genehmigung weder ganz noch teilweise kopieren, nachahmen oder verwenden. Alle anderen Marken, Namen oder Logos, die in Verbindung mit den Diensten erwähnt werden, sind Eigentum der jeweiligen Inhaber und Sie dürfen sie ohne die schriftliche Genehmigung des jeweiligen Markeninhabers weder ganz noch teilweise kopieren, nachahmen oder verwenden. Die Aufnahme von Marken Dritter in die Dienste stellt keine Genehmigung, Befürwortung oder Empfehlung unsererseits dar.
6. Lizenz und Beschränkungen
6.1 Lizenz
. Unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie berechtigt sind, die Dienste zu nutzen, und vorbehaltlich der Einhaltung dieser Bedingungen Ihrerseits gewähren wir Ihnen hiermit eine beschränkte Lizenz für den Zugriff und die Nutzung der Dienste.
6.2 Lizenzbeschränkungen
. Sie dürfen Inhalte nicht erneut auf Internet-, Intranet- oder Extranet-Websites veröffentlichen oder die Informationen in eine andere Datenbank oder Sammlung integrieren, und jede andere Nutzung der Inhalte ist strengstens untersagt. Jede Nutzung der Dienste, die hierin nicht ausdrücklich erlaubt wird, ist ohne unsere vorherige schriftliche Genehmigung streng verboten und beendet die hierin gewährte Lizenz. Eine solche unbefugte Nutzung kann auch gegen geltende Gesetze verstoßen, wie unter anderem Urheberrechts- und Markengesetze sowie geltende Kommunikationsvorschriften und -gesetze. Sofern nicht ausdrücklich hierin angegeben, wird nichts in diesen Bedingungen so ausgelegt, dass eine Lizenz an Rechten des geistigen Eigentums gewährt wird, sei es durch Rechtsverwirkung, Implikation oder anderweitig. Diese Lizenz kann von uns jederzeit ohne Vorankündigung und mit oder ohne Grund widerrufen werden, soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist.
6.3 Regierung
. Wenn Sie ein Endnutzer der US-Regierung sind, lizenzieren wir Ihnen die Dienste als kommerziellen Artikel („Commercial Item“) im Sinne des U.S. Code of Federal Regulations (siehe 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), und die Rechte, die wir Ihnen an den Diensten gewähren, sind dieselben Rechte, die wir allen anderen gemäß diesen Bedingungen gewähren.
7. Akzeptable Nutzung
7.1
Sie dürfen die Dienste nur für Ihren eigenen persönlichen Gebrauch nutzen. Wir behalten uns das Recht vor, jederzeit und nach unserem alleinigen Ermessen Ihren Zugang zu den Diensten oder deren Nutzung in Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht zu überprüfen, zu kündigen oder auszusetzen. Die Punkte auf der Liste der verbotenen Nutzungen sind nur Beispiele und die Liste ist nicht erschöpfend; wir können nach eigenem Ermessen und in Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht verbotene Nutzungen hinzufügen oder entfernen.
7.2 Verbotene Nutzungen umfassen:
Illegale Aktivität:
Aktivitäten, die gegen von der OFAC verwaltete Sanktionsprogramme verstoßen oder zu einem Verstoß gegen sie beitragen; Aktivitäten, die gegen Gesetze in den Ländern, in denen wir tätig sind, verstoßen oder zu einem Verstoß gegen sie beitragen; Aktivitäten, die mit Erträgen aus illegalen Aktivitäten verbunden sind; oder die Veröffentlichung, Verteilung oder Verbreitung von illegalem Material oder Informationen.
Übermäßige Nutzung oder Hacking:
Handlungen, die unsere Infrastruktur unangemessen oder unverhältnismäßig stark belasten oder Systeme, Daten oder Informationen beeinträchtigen, abfangen oder entwenden; die Übermittlung oder das Hochladen von Material, das Viren, Trojaner, Würmer oder andere schädliche oder löschende Programme enthält, in die Dienste; oder der Versuch, sich unbefugten Zugriff auf die Computersysteme oder Netzwerke zu verschaffen, die mit den Diensten verbunden sind.
Missbrauch von anderen:
Jegliche Aktivität, die den Zugang einer anderen Person zu den Diensten oder deren Nutzung beeinträchtigt; die die Privatsphäre, das geistige Eigentum oder andere gesetzliche Rechte einer anderen Person verleumdet, missbraucht, erpresst, belästigt, stalkt, bedroht oder anderweitig verletzt; die zu Hass, rassistischer Intoleranz oder gewalttätigen Handlungen gegen andere aufstachelt, bedroht, erleichtert, fördert oder ermutigt; oder
Daten eines anderen Nutzers aus den Diensten ohne Erlaubnis sammeln, auslesen oder erheben.
Betrug und andere unlautere Geschäftspraktiken:
Handlungen, die darauf abzielen, uns, unsere Nutzer oder andere Personen zu betrügen, uns falsche, ungenaue oder irreführende Informationen zur Verfügung zu stellen, unangemessen hohe Belohnungen zu versprechen oder eine Dienstleistung ohne zusätzlichen Nutzen für den Käufer zu verkaufen, oder andere räuberische und betrügerische Praktiken, wie unrechtmäßige Lotterien, Auslosungen, Bietgebührauktionen, Wettbewerbe, Verlosungen, Wetten oder andere Glücksspiele.
Verletzung von Rechten des geistigen Eigentums:
Handlungen, die den Verkauf, den Vertrieb oder den Zugang zu gefälschter Musik, Filmen, Software oder anderen lizenzierten Materialien ohne die entsprechende Genehmigung des Rechteinhabers beinhalten; die Verwendung des geistigen Eigentums (einschließlich der Marken) ohne unsere ausdrückliche Zustimmung oder in einer Weise, die uns oder unserer Marke anderweitig schadet; eine Handlung, die eine unwahre Empfehlung unsererseits oder eine unwahre Verbindung mit uns impliziert; oder Handlungen, die ein Urheberrecht, ein Markenzeichen, ein Recht auf Öffentlichkeit oder Privatsphäre oder ein anderes gesetzlich geschütztes Recht verletzen oder missachten.
8. Orb Operators
Wir arbeiten mit lokalen unabhängigen Auftragnehmern zusammen, die als „Orb Operators“ bezeichnet werden und die die Registrierungen von Nutzern erleichtern und bei der Beantwortung von Fragen helfen, die Sie möglicherweise über uns haben. Diese Orb Operators sind geschult und verfügen über fundierte Kenntnisse des World Network. Wir haben jedoch keine Kontrolle über das, was sie sagen oder wie sie sich verhalten, und übernehmen hierfür keine Haftung.
Orb Operators sind in keiner Weise unsere Vertreter oder Mitarbeiter. Aus etwaigen Bemühungen, Funktionen, Prozesse, Richtlinien, Standards oder anderen Bemühungen, die von TFH im Interesse seiner Nutzer unternommen werden, geht keinesfalls ein Beschäftigungs- oder Vertretungsverhältnis mit einem Orb Operator hervor.
9. Vorläufige Sperrung
In folgenden Fällen können wir Ihren Zugang zu den Diensten aussetzen und einschränken: (i) Wir werden durch eine faktisch gültige Vorladung, einen Gerichtsbeschluss oder eine verbindliche Anordnung einer Regierungsbehörde dazu aufgefordert; (ii) wir haben den begründeten Verdacht, dass Sie den Dienst im Zusammenhang mit einer verbotenen Nutzung verwenden; (iii) Ihre Nutzung der Dienste ist Gegenstand eines anhängigen Rechtsstreits, einer Untersuchung oder eines behördlichen Verfahrens und/oder wir sehen ein erhöhtes Risiko der Nichteinhaltung rechtlicher oder behördlicher Vorschriften im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Aktivität; (iv) unsere Dienstpartner sind nicht in der Lage, Ihre Nutzung zu unterstützen; (v) Sie ergreifen Maßnahmen, die wir als Umgehung unserer Kontrollen ansehen (wie z. B. der Versuch, mehrere Konten zu erstellen).
10. Kein Angebot von Wertpapieren oder Rohstoffen
Der Inhalt der Dienste ist kein Kauf- oder Verkaufsangebot oder eine Aufforderung zur Abgabe eines Kauf- oder Verkaufsangebots für Wertpapiere, Geschäftsanteile, Rohstoffe oder andere Finanzinstrumente; der Inhalt oder die Dienste stellt auch kein Angebot oder eine Aufforderung durch jemanden in einem Staat oder Land, in dem ein solches Angebot oder eine solche Aufforderung nicht erlaubt oder zulässig ist, oder an Personen, gegenüber denen es rechtswidrig ist, ein solches Angebot oder eine solche Aufforderung abzugeben, dar und darf hierfür oder in Verbindung damit nicht verwendet werden.
11. Inhalt
11.1 Vertrauen auf Inhalt; Änderungen an den Diensten.
Die Informationen und Materialien, die wir Ihnen über die Dienste zur Verfügung stellen („Inhalte“), dienen ausschließlich allgemeinen Informationszwecken, und wir übernehmen keine Garantie für ihre Richtigkeit, Nützlichkeit oder Vollständigkeit, soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist. Wenn Sie auf unsere Inhalte vertrauen, tun Sie dies auf Ihr eigenes Risiko. Wir übernehmen keine Haftung oder Verantwortung für Handlungen, die Sie aufgrund des Inhalts vornehmen oder unterlassen, oder für Personen, mit denen Sie den Inhalt teilen. Äußerungen anderer Nutzer, die ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste in den Diensten oder an anderer Stelle beschreiben, sollten nicht als unsere Billigung ihrer Äußerungen angesehen werden, wenn die Äußerungen im Widerspruch zu diesen Bedingungen oder unserem Inhalt stehen. Wir können den Inhalt von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren, aber dieser Inhalt ist möglicherweise nicht vollständig oder aktuell, und wir sind Ihnen gegenüber nicht verpflichtet, den Inhalt oder einen anderen Teil der Dienste zu aktualisieren. Wir sind berechtigt, Teile oder den gesamten Inhalt oder die Dienste ohne vorherige Ankündigung zu ändern oder einzustellen, soweit dies gesetzlich zulässig ist. Wir haften nicht für Änderungen, Aussetzungen oder die Einstellung eines Teils oder der Gesamtheit des Inhalts oder der Dienste, soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist.
11.2 Dienste und Inhalte Dritter
. Wir können auf Social-Media-Plattformen („Drittanbieterdienste“) Links zu Bildungsmaterialien, Webinaren, Treffen und Werbeaktionen bereitstellen, die den Austausch und die Zusammenarbeit zwischen Nutzern und anderen ermöglichen. Wenn Sie personenbezogene Informationen, Bilder, Meinungen, Inhalte oder andere Daten auf diesen Diensten veröffentlichen, tun Sie dies auf eigenes Risiko, und Ihre Nutzung dieser Dienste unterliegt den Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien dieser Dienste und nicht unseren. Sie sollten die Nutzungsbedingungen der einzelnen Drittanbieterdienste lesen, um Ihre Rechte und die Art und Weise, wie diese Plattformen Ihre Daten verwenden, besser zu verstehen. Wir sind nicht verantwortlich für den Verlust, Diebstahl, die Kompromittierung oder den Missbrauch Ihrer Daten in Verbindung mit einem Drittanbieterdienst (einschließlich
Fahrlässigkeit), außer in dem Umfang, in dem eine solche Haftung nach geltendem Recht nicht beschränkt werden kann. Die Nutzung von Informationen, die von einem Drittanbieterdienst zur Verfügung gestellt werden („Inhalte von Drittanbietern“), erfolgt auf Ihr eigenes Risiko, und wir versprechen Ihnen nicht, dass die Inhalte von Drittanbietern richtig, vollständig, authentisch oder für Ihre persönlichen Umstände geeignet sind. Zu den Inhalten von Drittanbietern gehören Informationen, die von anderen, von uns nicht ausdrücklich unterstützen Nutzern zur Verfügung gestellt werden.
11.3 Nutzerinhalte
. Als Mitglied der Worldcoin-Community können Sie Nachrichten, Daten, Software, Bilder, Videos oder andere Inhalte („Nutzerinhalte“) auf schwarzen Brettern, in Blogs, in unseren Social-Media-Konten und an verschiedenen anderen öffentlich zugänglichen Stellen der Dienste veröffentlichen. Diese Foren können von uns oder in unserem Auftrag von einem unserer Drittanbieter gehostet werden. Sie sind für alle Nutzerinhalte verantwortlich, die Sie über die Dienste einreichen, hochladen, veröffentlichen oder speichern. Sie müssen alle erforderlichen und angemessenen Warnungen, Informationen und Offenlegungen bezüglich Ihrer Nutzerinhalte bereitstellen. Wir sind nicht verantwortlich für Nutzerinhalte, die Sie über die Dienste übermitteln.
11.4 Lizenz für Nutzerinhalte
. Indem Sie uns Nutzerinhalte übermitteln, versichern Sie, dass Sie über alle erforderlichen Rechte an den Nutzerinhalten verfügen, und Sie gewähren uns damit eine unbefristete, weltweite, nicht ausschließliche, gebührenfreie, unterlizenzierbare und übertragbare Lizenz zur Nutzung, Reproduktion, Verbreitung, Erstellung abgeleiteter Werke, Änderung, Anzeige und Vorführung aller oder eines Teils der Nutzerinhalte in Verbindung mit unserer Vermarktung und Werbung sowie für alle sonstigen legitimen Geschäftszwecke im Zusammenhang mit den Diensten. Wir sind berechtigt, Ihre Nutzerinhalte in allen Medienformaten und über alle Medienkanäle, die wir auswählen, ganz oder teilweise weiterzuverbreiten und daraus abgeleitete Werke zu erstellen. Sie gewähren uns und anderen Nutzern hiermit auch eine nicht ausschließliche Lizenz für die Nutzung, den Zugriff, die Reproduktion, die Verbreitung, die Änderung und Anzeige Ihrer Nutzerinhalte über die Dienste und zur Vorführung dieser. Abschnitt 11.4 gilt im größtmöglichen gesetzlich zulässigen Umfang.
11.5 Beschränkungen der Nutzerinhalte
. Sie verpflichten sich, die Dienste nicht zu nutzen oder Dritten die Nutzung zu gestatten, um Nutzerinhalte einzustellen oder zu übermitteln, die: (a) verleumderisch oder diffamierend sind oder private oder persönliche Angelegenheiten einer Person offenlegen; (b) unanständig, obszön, pornografisch, belästigend, bedrohend, beleidigend, hasserfüllt, rassistisch oder ethnisch anstößig sind; zu einem Verhalten ermutigen, das als Straftat gilt, zu einer zivilrechtlichen Haftung führt oder gegen ein Gesetz verstößt, oder anderweitig unangemessen ist; (c) das geistige Eigentum anderer verletzen, einschließlich nicht genehmigter urheberrechtlich geschützter Texte, Bilder oder Programme, Geschäftsgeheimnisse oder anderer vertraulicher geschützter Informationen oder in verletzender Weise genutzter Marken oder Dienstleistungsmarken; oder (d) andere Nutzer bei der Nutzung der Dienste unangemessen stören. Sie versichern uns, dass Sie Nutzerinhalte freiwillig in die Dienste einstellen. Demzufolge begründet das Einstellen von Nutzerinhalten kein Arbeitsverhältnis zwischen Ihnen und uns. Sie dürfen keine E-Mail-Adressen, Mobiltelefonnummern, Salden, Nutzernamen oder andere personenbezogene Daten über andere Nutzer ohne deren Erlaubnis kopieren oder verwenden. Unaufgeforderte E-Mails, Postsendungen, Telefonanrufe oder andere Mitteilungen an andere Nutzer über die Dienste oder einen anderen Kanal sind verboten.
11.6 Beschwerden und Entfernung nach dem DMCA.
Wenn Sie der Meinung sind, dass Ihre Marke oder Ihr urheberrechtlich geschütztes Werk durch unsere Inhalte oder Nutzerinhalte in den Diensten verletzt wird oder anderweitig auf eine Art und Weise veröffentlicht wird, die eine Befürwortung oder Zugehörigkeit zu uns suggeriert, senden Sie uns je nach Sachlage bitte eine E-Mail an legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com mit der Betreffzeile „Markenbeschwerde“ bzw. „Urheberrechtsbeschwerde“. Damit Ihre Beschwerde wirksam ist und wir im Rahmen des Digital Millennium Copyright Act („DMCA“) Maßnahmen ergreifen können, müssen Sie alle DMCA-Anforderungen erfüllen, indem Sie die folgenden Informationen in Ihre E-Mail aufnehmen:
Eindeutige Identifizierung des urheberrechtlich geschützten Werks oder der Marke, deren Verletzung behauptet wird, einschließlich der Urheberrechtsregistrierungsnummer, falls das Werk registriert ist;
Identifizierung des Werks oder der Marke, das/die als verletzend angesehen wird und das/die entfernt werden soll;
die URL oder andere eindeutige Hinweise, die es uns ermöglichen, den mutmaßlich rechtsverletzenden Inhalt zu finden;
Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Postanschrift und Telefonnummer; und
eine unterzeichnete Erklärung, dass Sie in gutem Glauben davon ausgehen, dass der Inhalt eine Verletzung darstellt, dass die von Ihnen gemachten Angaben richtig sind und dass Sie der Eigentümer des Inhalts sind oder befugt sind, den Eigentümer des Inhalts zu vertreten.
Sie sollten sich auch darüber im Klaren sein, dass gemäß Abschnitt 512(f) des DMCA jede Person, die wissentlich unbegründete Mitteilungen über Rechtsverletzungen versendet, für Schäden haftbar gemacht werden kann. Bitte tätigen Sie daher keine falschen Behauptungen. Wir können alle Informationen oder Korrespondenz, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen, an Dritte weitergeben, einschließlich der Person, die das mutmaßlich rechtsverletzende Material in den Service hochgeladen hat.
Wenn wir eine gutgläubige Mitteilung über eine Rechtsverletzung erhalten, ist es unser Grundsatz, dass wir: (a) den verletzenden Inhalt sofort entfernen oder den Zugang dazu sperren; (b) die Person, die das verletzende Material hochgeladen hat, darüber informieren, dass wir das Material entfernt oder den Zugang dazu gesperrt haben; und (c) bei
Wiederholungstätern den Zugriff auf die Dienste für die Person sperren. Wenn wir eine Erwiderung von der Person erhalten, können wir Ihnen eine Kopie dieser Erwiderung zusenden, in der wir Ihnen erklären, dass wir das entfernte Material innerhalb von 10 Werktagen wieder in die Dienste aufnehmen oder die Deaktivierung beenden können. Sofern Sie gegen uns oder gegen die Person, die den Inhalt hochgeladen hat, nicht gerichtlich vorgehen, stellen wir den Zugang zu dem entfernten Material nach unserem Ermessen innerhalb von 10 bis 14 Werktagen oder mehr nach Erhalt der Erwiderung wieder her.
12. GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS
12.1 Die Nutzung der Dienste erfolgt auf Ihr eigenes Risiko. Die Dienste, WLD, der Inhalt und das sonstige geistige Eigentum werden „im Ist-Zustand“ und je nach Verfügbarkeit zur Verfügung gestellt, ohne jegliche ausdrückliche, stillschweigende oder gesetzliche Zusicherung oder Gewährleistung. Soweit es nach geltendem Recht gestattet ist, schließen wir ausdrücklich jegliche stillschweigende Gewährleistungen zu Eigentum, Marktgängigkeit, Eignung für einen bestimmten Zweck oder Nichtverletzung von Rechten in Bezug auf die Funktionen, Inhalte oder sonstiges in den Diensten enthaltenes geistiges Eigentum aus. In einigen Rechtsordnungen ist der Ausschluss stillschweigender Gewährleistungen nicht zulässig, sodass die oben genannten Ausschlüsse möglicherweise nicht auf sie zutreffen. Wir erteilen keine Empfehlung oder Garantie und übernehmen keine Verantwortung für Werbung, Angebote oder Aussagen Dritter, einschließlich anderer Nutzer bezüglich der Dienste.
12.2 Wir erteilen keine Zusicherungen oder Gewährleistungen dahingehend, dass (a) der Zugriff auf die Dienste ganz oder teilweise durchgehend, ununterbrochen, rechtzeitig, sicher oder fehlerfrei ist; (b) die Dienste oder Inhalte genau, vollständig, zuverlässig oder aktuell sind; (c) die Dienste frei von Viren oder anderen schädlichen Komponenten sind oder (d) die Dienste oder Inhalte Ihren Anforderungen, Bedürfnissen oder Erwartungen entsprechen.
12.3 Darüber hinaus erteilen wir keine Zusicherungen oder Gewährleistungen in Bezug auf die Rechtmäßigkeit der Dienste oder WLD für einen bestimmten Anwendungsfall oder dahingehend, dass die Dienste den aufsichtsrechtlichen und gesetzlichen Anforderungen entsprechen. Sie sind auch dafür verantwortlich, alle rechtlichen und behördlichen Beschränkungen und Anforderungen zu ermitteln und einzuhalten, die für die Nutzung der Dienste oder von WLD gelten können. Mit Ausnahme der ausdrücklichen Erklärungen in diesen Bedingungen bestätigen Sie hiermit und erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass Sie sich in Bezug auf den Zugriff und die Nutzung der Dienste und von WLD nicht auf andere Erklärungen oder Vereinbarungen, ob schriftlich oder mündlich, verlassen haben.
12.4 Wir handeln nicht und können nicht als Ihr Berater in Bezug auf finanzielle, rechtliche, investitionsbezogene oder steuerliche Angelegenheiten handeln. Die Inhalte gelten mit Stand zum angegebenen Datum. Alle hier geäußerten Prognosen, Schätzungen, Vorhersagen, Ziele und/oder Meinungen unterliegen Risiken, Unsicherheiten und Annahmen und können daher falsch sein und sich ohne Vorankündigung ändern. Sie sollten sich nicht auf irgendwelche Inhalte verlassen.
Bestimmte hier aufgeführte Informationen stammen möglicherweise aus externen Quellen. Auch wenn diese Quellen für glaubwürdig gehalten werden, haben wir nicht alle solchen Informationen unabhängig verifiziert und erteilen keine Zusicherungen bezüglich ihrer Richtigkeit. Wir sind kein registrierter Börsenmakler oder Anlageberater. Wir erteilen keine Zusicherungen und schließen insbesondere alle ausdrücklichen, stillschweigenden oder gesetzlichen Gewährleistungen in Bezug auf die Richtigkeit, Aktualität oder Vollständigkeit von in den Diensten enthaltenen Materialien aus. Unsere Inhalte dienen nur der allgemeinen Information, und Sie sind allein dafür verantwortlich, zu entscheiden, ob sie die Dienste nutzen wollen oder nicht. Sie erkennen an, dass der Handel, die Verwendung und der Besitz von digitalen Token von Natur aus mit Risiken verbunden sind. Sie können alle in Ihrem Wallet enthaltenen Gelder verlieren. Sie erkennen an, dass der Dienst Exportbeschränkungen und Wirtschaftssanktionen nach US-Recht unterliegen kann.
12.5 Wir haften Ihnen oder Dritten gegenüber nicht für eine Änderung oder Beendigung der Dienste oder eine Aussetzung oder Beendigung Ihres Zugangs zu den Diensten.
13. BESCHRÄNKUNG DER HAFTUNG
13.1 Wir schließen unsere Haftung Ihnen gegenüber nicht aus oder beschränken sie, wenn dies nicht rechtmäßig wäre. In Ländern, in denen die folgenden Arten von Ausschlüssen nicht zulässig sind, sind wir Ihnen gegenüber nur für Verluste und Schäden verantwortlich, die eine vernünftigerweise vorhersehbare Folge unseres Versäumnisses sind, angemessene Sorgfalt und Kompetenz walten zu lassen, oder die aus unserem Verstoß gegen unseren Vertrag mit Ihnen resultieren. Dieser Absatz hat keine Auswirkungen auf Verbraucherrechte, deren Verzicht oder Einschränkung durch Verträge oder Vereinbarungen nicht möglich ist.
13.2 Soweit rechtlich zulässig, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass wir oder etwaige unserer leitenden Angestellten, Geschäftsführer, Mitarbeiter, Auftragnehmer, Vertreter, verbundenen Unternehmen oder Tochtergesellschaften (die „TFH-Parteien“) Ihnen gegenüber unter keinen Umständen für indirekte Schäden, Strafschadensersatz, beiläufige, besondere, Folgeschäden oder exemplarischen Schadensersatz haften, einschließlich Schäden für entgangenen Gewinn, Firmenwert, entgangene Nutzung, Daten oder anderes immaterielles Eigentum, unabhängig davon, ob eine solche Haftung auf der Grundlage einer unerlaubten Handlung oder anderweitig geltend gemacht wird, und unabhängig davon, ob die TFH-Parteien auf die Möglichkeit von Schäden hingewiesen wurden, die sich aus oder in Verbindung mit Folgendem ergeben: (a) der Nutzung oder Unmöglichkeit der Nutzung der Dienste, Ihrer digitalen Token oder des Worldcoin-Netzwerks; (b) der Unzugänglichkeit oder Beendigung der Dienste; (c) Hacking, Manipulation, unbefugtem Zugriff oder Veränderung von Transaktionen oder Ihren Daten; (d) jeglicher Transaktion oder Vereinbarung, die Sie mit Dritten über die Dienste eingegangen sind; (e) jeglicher Aktivität oder Kommunikation Dritter; (f) den Handlungen von Orb Operators; (g) jeglichem Wertverlust von digitalen
Token; (h) jeglichen Inhalten von Drittanbietern, auf die über die Dienste zugegriffen wird; (i) Fehler, Irrtümer oder Ungenauigkeiten in unseren Inhalten; (j) Personen- oder Sachschäden jeglicher Art, die aus dem Zugriff oder der Nutzung der Dienste resultieren; (k) Viren, Trojaner oder Ähnliches, das an oder durch die Dienste übertragen wird; oder (l) diffamierenden, beleidigenden oder illegalen Verhalten Dritter. Diese Haftungsbeschränkung gilt unabhängig davon, ob die Schäden aus der Nutzung oder dem Missbrauch von TFH oder den Diensten oder aus dem Vertrauen auf TFH oder die Dienste entstehen, selbst wenn eine beschränkte Abhilfe ihren wesentlichen Zweck nicht erfüllt und im größtmöglichen gesetzlich zulässigen Umfang.
13.3 Unter keinen Umständen haften die TFH-Parteien Ihnen gegenüber für direkte Ansprüche, Verfahren, Verbindlichkeiten, Verpflichtungen, Schäden, Verluste oder Kosten von über 100,00 US-Dollar. Sollten Sie mit den Diensten unzufrieden sein, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass Ihre einzige und ausschließliche Abhilfe darin besteht, die Nutzung der Dienste einzustellen. Diese Haftungsbeschränkung gilt im größtmöglichen Umfang, der nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist.
13.4 Haftungsentlassung und Freistellung.
Sie verpflichten sich, die TFH-Parteien hinsichtlich jeglicher Ansprüche, Schäden, Kosten, Haftungsfälle, angemessenen Anwaltsgebühren und Ausgaben, die von einem Dritten gegen eine TFH-Partei geltend gemacht werden und sich aus oder im Zusammenhang mit (a) der Nutzung der Dienste Ihrerseits, (b) einer Verletzung dieser Bedingungen Ihrerseits, (c) einer Verletzung von Rechten anderer Personen Ihrerseits, (d) Ihrem Verhalten im Zusammenhang mit den Diensten oder (e) der Nutzung von WLD, digitalen Token oder dem Worldcoin-Netzwerk Ihrerseits ergeben, zu verteidigen, freizustellen und schadlos zu halten. Einige Rechtsordnungen schränken die Freistellung seitens von Verbrauchern ein, sodass möglicherweise einige oder alle Freistellungsbestimmungen in diesem Absatz nicht auf Sie anwendbar sind. Wenn Sie verpflichtet sind, eine der TFH-Parteien freizustellen, behalten wir uns das Recht vor, nach unserem alleinigen Ermessen jede Klage oder jedes Verfahren zu kontrollieren und zu entscheiden, ob und zu welchen Bedingungen wir einen Vergleich schließen.
WENN SIE IN KALIFORNIEN WOHNEN, verzichten Sie auf die Vorteile und den Schutz des § 1542 des California Civil Code, der vorsieht: „[Eine] allgemeine Freistellung erstreckt sich nicht auf Ansprüche, von denen der Gläubiger oder die freistellende Partei zum Zeitpunkt der Ausfertigung der Freistellung nicht weiß oder vermutet, dass sie zu ihren Gunsten bestehen, und die, wenn sie ihm oder ihr bekannt gewesen wären, seinen oder ihren Vergleich mit dem Schuldner oder der freigestellten Partei wesentlich beeinflusst hätten.“
14. Anwendbares Recht
Die Gesetze des US-Bundesstaats Kalifornien finden Anwendung auf diesen Vertrag und alle Streitigkeiten, die sich aus diesem Vertrag ergeben oder mit ihm in Zusammenhang stehen. Das in diesem Abschnitt genannte anwendbare Recht gilt unabhängig von den Grundsätzen des Kollisionsrechts. Sie erklären sich ferner damit einverstanden, dass angenommen wird, dass der Dienst seinen Sitz ausschließlich im US-Bundesstaat Kalifornien hat, und seine Verfügbarkeit, auch wenn die Dienste in anderen Rechtsordnungen verfügbar sein können, keinen allgemeinen oder besonderen persönlichen Gerichtsstand in einem Forum außerhalb des US-Bundesstaats Kalifornien begründet.
15. STREITBEILEGUNG, SCHIEDSGERICHTSBARKEIT UND VERZICHT AUF SAMMELKLAGEN
15.1 LESEN SIE SICH BITTE DIE FOLGENDEN ABSÄTZE AUFMERKSAM DURCH. SIE VERLANGEN VON IHNEN, DASS SIE STREITFÄLLE MIT UNS DURCH EIN INDIVIDUELLES SCHIEDSVERFAHREN VOR EINEM EINZELSCHIEDSRICHTER UND NICHT ALS BETEILIGTER EINER SAMMELKLAGE BEILEGEN. DAS SCHIEDSVERFAHREN HINDERT SIE DARAN, GERICHTLICH GEGEN UNS VORZUGEHEN ODER EIN SCHWURGERICHTSVERFAHREN ZU BEANTRAGEN, MIT DER AUSNAHME, DASS SIE EINEN RECHTSSTREIT GEGEN UNS VOR EINEM BAGATELLGERICHT FÜHREN KÖNNEN, WENN SIE DAZU BERECHTIGT SIND.
15.2 Wir werden uns nach besten Kräften bemühen, mögliche Streitigkeiten durch informelle, gutgläubige Verhandlungen beizulegen. Wenn ein möglicher Streitfall auftritt, müssen Sie uns per E-Mail an legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com kontaktieren, damit wir versuchen können, den Streitfall zu lösen, ohne auf eine formelle Streitbeilegung zurückzugreifen. Wenn wir nicht in der Lage sind, innerhalb von 60 Tagen nach Ihrer E-Mail eine informelle Lösung herbeizuführen, und Sie sich dafür entscheiden, einen bundes- oder einzelstaatlichen gesetzlichen Anspruch, einen Anspruch nach dem Gewohnheitsrecht, einen Anspruch aufgrund eines Vertrags, einer unerlaubten Handlung, eines Betrugs, einer Falschdarstellung oder einer anderen Rechtstheorie oder ein anderes formelles Verfahren, das sich aus diesen Bedingungen, den Inhalten oder den Diensten ergibt oder mit diesen in Zusammenhang steht (jeweils ein „Streitfall“), einzuleiten, dann erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, den Streitfall durch ein verbindliches Schiedsverfahren auf individueller Basis gemäß den folgenden Bedingungen (zusammenfassend als „Schiedsvereinbarung“ bezeichnet) beizulegen:
Das Schiedsverfahren wird vertraulich von einem einzigen Schiedsrichter geführt. Der Schiedsrichter wendet die geltenden Verjährungsfristen und alle geltenden Gesetze an und wird die nach geltendem Recht anerkannten Privilegierungsansprüche respektieren.
Die Streitigkeit wird ausschließlich und endgültig durch ein von JAMS geführtes Schiedsverfahren in Übereinstimmung mit den JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules beigelegt, es sei denn, der Gesamtbetrag der Streitigkeit beläuft sich auf 250.000 US-Dollar oder mehr; in diesem Fall gelten die JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules. Das Schiedsgerichtsverfahren findet in San Francisco, Kalifornien, statt, es sei denn, Sie und wir vereinbaren, es an einem anderen Ort zu führen. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass die Gerichte in San Francisco, Kalifornien, USA, für Berufungen gegen einen Schiedsspruch oder für Gerichtsverfahren, falls die verbindliche Schiedsverfahrensklausel dieses Vertrags für nicht durchsetzbar befunden wird, zuständig sind.
In jeglichem Schiedsverfahren, unabhängig von dessen Ort, werden die Parteien nicht versuchen, sich gegenseitig Beweise zu beschaffen, und der Schiedsrichter wird den Parteien nicht gestatten, sich auf Beweise einzulassen; vielmehr wird jede Partei die Beweise, die ihre Positionen untermauern, zu einem einvernehmlich festgelegten Zeitpunkt vor der abschließenden Schiedsverhandlung offenlegen.
Diese Schiedsvereinbarung gilt für die Durchsetzbarkeit, Widerrufbarkeit, den Gegenstand und die Gültigkeit der Schiedsvereinbarung oder eines Teils der Schiedsvereinbarung sowie alle anderen Streitfälle, die sich aus der Auslegung oder Anwendbarkeit der Schiedsvereinbarung ergeben oder damit zusammenhängen; und alle diese Angelegenheiten werden vom Schiedsrichter und nicht von einem Gericht oder Richter entschieden.
Wenn der Schiedsrichter oder der Schiedsgerichtsverwalter Ihnen Bearbeitungsgebühren oder andere Verwaltungskosten auferlegt, erstatten wir Ihnen auf Anfrage diese Gebühren oder Kosten in dem Umfang, der die Kosten übersteigt, die Sie andernfalls zahlen müssten, wenn Sie stattdessen ein Gerichtsverfahren anstrengen würden. Wir werden auch zusätzliche Gebühren oder Kosten zahlen, wenn die Regeln des Schiedsgerichtsverwalters oder das geltende Recht dies verlangen.
Auf Antrag einer der Parteien werden alle Schiedsverfahren unter strengster Geheimhaltung durchgeführt. In diesem Fall werden alle Dokumente, Zeugenaussagen und Aufzeichnungen vom Schiedsrichter unter Verschluss gehalten und können nur von den Parteien, ihren jeweiligen Anwälten und ihren jeweiligen Sachverständigen, Beratern oder Zeugen eingesehen werden, die sich im Voraus schriftlich damit einverstanden erklärt haben, alle diese Informationen als vertraulich zu erhalten und ausschließlich für die Zwecke des Schiedsverfahrens zu verwenden.
Abgesehen von den in dieser Schiedsvereinbarung besprochenen Sammelverfahren und Rechtsbehelfen ist der Schiedsrichter befugt, jeden Rechtsbehelf zu gewähren, der auch vor Gericht zur Verfügung stehen würde.
Ein Urteil über den Schiedsspruch des Schiedsrichters kann von jedem zuständigen Gericht erlassen werden.
Sollte sich die in dieser Schiedsvereinbarung enthaltene Verpflichtung zum Schiedsverfahren oder das Verbot von Sammelklagen und anderen Streitfällen im Namen Dritter als nicht durchsetzbar erweisen, gelten nur die nicht durchsetzbaren Bestimmungen als aus diesen Bedingungen entfernt und alle verbleibenden Verpflichtungen in diesen Bedingungen bleiben in vollem Umfang in Kraft.
15.3 30-tägiges Widerrufsrecht
. Sie haben das Recht, von dieser Schiedsvereinbarung zurückzutreten und nicht an diese gebunden zu sein, indem Sie eine E-Mail von der Adresse, die Sie für Ihre Anmeldung verwendet haben, mit folgender Betreffzeile an legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com senden: „AUSSCHLUSS VON SCHIEDSVERFAHREN UND SAMMELKLAGENVERBOT“. Sie müssen Ihre E-Mail innerhalb von 30 Tagen ab Zustimmung zu diesen Bedingungen senden, andernfalls sind Sie verpflichtet, Streitfälle gemäß den Bedingungen dieser Schiedsvereinbarung beizulegen. Wenn Sie sich gegen diese Schiedsvereinbarung entscheiden, sind wir auch nicht an die Schiedsvereinbarung gebunden.
15.4 Änderungen dieser Schiedsvereinbarung.
Wir werden Sie mit einer Frist von 30 Tagen über Änderungen des Abschnitts „
Streitbeilegung, Schiedsgerichtsbarkeit und Verzicht auf Sammelklagen
“ dieser Bedingungen informieren, und Änderungen treten 30 Tage nach Erhalt der Mitteilung von uns in Kraft. Änderungen des Abschnitts
Streitbeilegung, Schiedsgerichtsbarkeit und Verzicht auf Sammelklagen
gelten ansonsten mit Wirkung für die Zukunft nur für Streitfälle, die nach dem 30. Tag auftreten. Sollte ein Gericht oder ein Schiedsrichter entscheiden, dass die Änderungen dieses Abschnitts nicht durchsetzbar oder gültig sind, werden die Änderungen von diesen Bedingungen abgetrennt und das Gericht oder der Schiedsrichter wendet die Bedingungen der ersten Schiedsvereinbarung an, die wirksam war, als Sie begonnen haben, die Dienste zu nutzen. Sie können von Ihrem Recht Gebrauch machen, die neuen Bedingungen der Schiedsvereinbarung abzulehnen, indem Sie die im obigen Abschnitt „30-tägiges Ausschlussrecht“ beschriebenen Verfahren befolgen.
Diese Schiedsvereinbarung gilt auch nach Beendigung dieser Vereinbarung und nach Beendigung der Nutzung der Dienste Ihrerseits.
Ungeachtet anderslautender Bestimmungen in dieser Schiedsvereinbarung kann jede Partei eine Unterlassungsverfügung beantragen, um die unbefugte Nutzung oder den Missbrauch der Dienste oder die Verletzung von Rechten an geistigem Eigentum (z. B. Marken-, Geschäftsgeheimnis-,
Urheber- oder Patentrechte) zu unterbinden, ohne zuvor ein Schiedsverfahren oder das oben beschriebene informelle Streitbeilegungsverfahren einzuleiten.
16. Allgemeine Bestimmungen
16.1 Keine Verzichtserklärung; salvatorische Klausel; Abtretungsverbot
. Versäumen wir es, eine Bestimmung durchzusetzen, verzichten wir damit nicht auf unser Recht, dies später zu tun. Sollte sich eine Bestimmung als nicht durchsetzbar erweisen, bleiben die übrigen Bestimmungen dieser Bedingungen in vollem Umfang wirksam und werden durch eine durchsetzbare Bestimmung ersetzt, die unsere Absicht so genau wie möglich wiedergibt, soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist. Sie dürfen keine Ihrer Rechte gemäß diesen Bedingungen abtreten, und ein solcher Versuch ist ungültig. Wir können unsere Rechte an unsere verbundenen Unternehmen oder Tochtergesellschaften oder an einen Rechtsnachfolger eines mit den Diensten verbundenen Unternehmens abtreten.
16.2 Gesamte Vereinbarung
. Diese Bedingungen stellen die gesamte und ausschließliche Vereinbarung zwischen Ihnen und uns in Bezug auf die Dienste dar und ersetzen alle früheren und gleichzeitigen Absprachen, Vereinbarungen, Zusicherungen und Gewährleistungen, sowohl schriftliche als auch mündliche, in Bezug auf die Dienste. Die Überschriften der Abschnitte in diesen Bedingungen dienen nur der Übersichtlichkeit und sind nicht maßgeblich für die Bedeutung oder Auslegung einer Bestimmungen.
16.3 Fortbestand.
Alle Bestimmungen dieser Bedingungen, die sich auf die Aussetzung oder Beendigung, Schulden gegenüber TFH, die allgemeine Nutzung der Dienste, Streitfälle mit TFH und Bestimmungen beziehen, die ihrer Natur nach über den Ablauf oder die Kündigung dieser Bedingungen hinausgehen, bestehen auch nach Kündigung oder Ablauf dieser Bedingungen fort.
16.4 Verhältnis zwischen den Parteien.
Nichts in diesen Bedingungen gilt oder bezweckt oder begründet ein Verhältnis zwischen Gesellschaftern, Gemeinschaftsunternehmenspartnern oder anderweitig als gemeinsame Partner mit Gewinnabsicht zwischen Ihnen und TFH, und weder Sie noch TFH werden als Vertreter des jeweils anderen behandelt. Dies schließt die Tatsache ein, dass nichts in diesen Bedingungen ein Arbeitsverhältnis zwischen Ihnen und TFH begründet oder bezweckt.
16.5 Keine professionelle Beratung oder treuhänderische Pflichten.
Alle von uns bereitgestellten Inhalte dienen ausschließlich Informationszwecken und sollten nicht als professionelle Beratung verstanden werden. Sie sollten auf der Grundlage von Informationen, die in den Diensten enthalten sind, keine Handlungen vornehmen oder unterlassen. Bevor Sie finanzielle, rechtliche oder andere Entscheidungen im Zusammenhang mit den Diensten oder digitalen Token treffen, sollten Sie eine unabhängige professionelle Beratung durch eine Person in Anspruch nehmen, die in dem Bereich, für den eine solche Beratung angemessen wäre, zugelassen und qualifiziert ist. Diese Bedingungen zielen nicht darauf ab, uns treuhänderische Pflichten aufzuerlegen, und tun dies auch nicht. Im größtmöglichen gesetzlich zulässigen Umfang erkennen Sie an und erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass wir Ihnen oder anderen Parteien keine treuhänderischen Pflichten oder Verbindlichkeiten schulden, und dass in dem Umfang, in dem solche Pflichten oder Verbindlichkeiten nach dem Gesetz oder nach Billigkeitsrecht bestehen könnten, diese Pflichten und Verbindlichkeiten hiermit unwiderruflich abgelehnt, aufgehoben und beseitigt werden. Sie erklären sich ferner damit einverstanden, dass die einzigen Aufgaben und Verpflichtungen, die wir Ihnen schulden, die sind, die ausdrücklich in diesen Bedingungen aufgeführt sind.
16.6 Kontrollwechsel.
Für den Fall, dass wir von einem Drittunternehmen übernommen werden oder mit einem solchen fusionieren oder auf andere Weise bestimmte Funktionen an ein verbundenes Unternehmen, ein Nachfolgeunternehmen oder ein anderes Unternehmen übertragen, das nach unserer Einschätzung im besten Interesse der Nutzer liegt, behalten wir uns das Recht vor, die von Ihnen erhobenen Daten im Rahmen einer solchen Fusion, Übernahme, eines Verkaufs oder eines anderen Kontrollwechsels in Übereinstimmung mit dem geltenden Recht zu übertragen oder abzutreten.
16.7 Höhere Gewalt.
Wir haften nicht für Verzögerungen, Leistungsausfälle oder Unterbrechungen von Diensten, die direkt oder indirekt auf eine erhebliche Marktvolatilität bei digitalen Token, höhere Gewalt, zivile oder militärische Handlungen, terroristische Handlungen, Unruhen, Krieg, Streiks, gesundheitliche Notfälle, Arbeitskämpfe, Brände, Unterbrechungen von Telekommunikations- oder Internetdiensten oder von Diensten von Netzwerkanbietern, Ausfälle von Geräten oder Software oder andere Ursachen oder Bedingungen zurückzuführen sind, die sich unserer Kontrolle entziehen (jeweils ein „Ereignis höherer Gewalt“). Das Auftreten eines Ereignisses höherer Gewalt hat keinen Einfluss auf die Gültigkeit und Durchsetzbarkeit der übrigen Bestimmungen dieser Bedingungen.
16.8 App Stores.
Wenn Sie unsere Apps von einem anderen App Store oder einer anderen Vertriebsplattform als dem Apple App Store herunterladen, einschließlich des Google Play Store, (die „Vertriebsplattform“) erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass:
die Bedingungen zwischen Ihnen und uns gelten und nicht gegenüber dem Anbieter der Vertriebsplattform („Store-Anbieter“); Ihre Nutzung der Apps mit den jeweils aktuellen Geschäftsbedingungen des Store-Anbieters für die Vertriebsplattform übereinstimmen muss; der Store-Anbieter nur ein Anbieter der Vertriebsplattform ist, über die Sie die Apps erhalten haben;
wir und nicht der Store-Anbieter die alleinige Verantwortung für die Apps tragen;
der Store-Anbieter Ihnen gegenüber keine Verpflichtung oder Haftung in Bezug auf die Apps oder die Bedingungen übernimmt und
Sie anerkennen und damit einverstanden sind, dass der Store-Anbieter ein Drittbegünstigter aus den Bedingungen, die sich auf die Apps beziehen, ist.
16.9 Apple App Store
. Dieser Abschnitt findet Anwendung, wenn die Apps im Apple App Store erworben wurden. Sie erkennen an und erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass die Bedingungen ausschließlich zwischen Ihnen und uns und nicht zwischen der Apple, Inc. („Apple“) gelten und dass Apple keine Verantwortung für die Apps oder deren Inhalt trägt. Sie müssen die Apps gemäß den Nutzungsbedingungen des App Store nutzen.
Sie erkennen an, dass Apple keinerlei Verpflichtung hat, Wartungs- und Supportdienste in Bezug auf die Apps bereitzustellen. Erfüllen die Apps eine geltende Gewährleistung nicht, können Sie Apple benachrichtigen, und (gegebenenfalls) wird Apple Ihnen den Kaufpreis für die Apps erstatten; soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist, obliegt Apple keinerlei sonstigen Gewährleistungspflicht in Bezug auf die Apps, und etwaige sonstigen Ansprüche, Verluste, Verbindlichkeiten, Schäden, Kosten oder Ausgaben, die auf die Verletzung einer Gewährleistung zurückzuführen sind, unterliegen ausschließlich den Bedingungen und den Gesetzen, die für uns als Anbieter der Apps gelten.
Sie erkennen an, dass Apple nicht für die Bearbeitung von Ansprüchen Ihrerseits oder seitens Dritter in Bezug auf die Apps oder Ihren Besitz und/oder Ihre Nutzung der Apps verantwortlich ist, wie unter anderem für: (i) Produkthaftungsansprüche; (ii) jegliche Behauptung, dass die Apps nicht den geltenden gesetzlichen oder behördlichen Anforderungen entsprechen; und (iii) Ansprüche aus Verbraucherschutz- oder ähnlichen Gesetzen; und alle derartigen Ansprüche unterliegen ausschließlich den Bedingungen und den Gesetzen, die für uns als Anbieter der Software gelten.
Sie erkennen an, dass im Falle eines Anspruchs Dritter dahingehend, dass die Apps oder Ihr Besitz und Ihre Nutzung dieser Apps die Rechte des geistigen Eigentums dieses Dritten verletzen, TFH, nicht Apple, die alleinige Verantwortung für die Untersuchung, Verteidigung, Beilegung und Begleichung eines solchen Anspruchs wegen Verletzung von geistigem Eigentum trägt, soweit dies gemäß den Bedingungen erforderlich ist.
Sie versichern und gewährleisten, dass (i) Sie sich nicht in einem Land befinden, das einem Embargo der US-Regierung unterliegt oder das von der US-Regierung als „Terrorismus unterstützendes“ Land eingestuft wurde, und (ii) Sie nicht auf einer Liste der US-Regierung mit verbotenen oder eingeschränkten Parteien aufgeführt sind.
Sie und TFH erkennen an und stimmen zu, dass Apple und die Tochtergesellschaften von Apple Drittbegünstigte aus Nutzungsbedingungen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Lizenz für die Apps sind und dass Apple nach Annahme der Nutzungsbedingungen Ihrerseits das Recht hat (und es wird angenommen, dass Apple das Recht angenommen hat), die Nutzungsbedingungen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Lizenz für die Apps als Drittbegünstigter gegen Sie durchzusetzen.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Condiciones para el usuario de Tools For Humanity
¡Bienvenido a World App! Estas Condiciones quedan establecidas entre usted y Tools for Humanity Corporation, una corporación de Delaware (“TFH”, “nosotros” o “nos”) y regulan su uso y acceso a nuestros sitios web y aplicaciones, incluidas la World App y la aplicación para operadores (en conjunto, las “Aplicaciones”), y a todas las funcionalidades, contenido y servicios asociados que le ofrecemos (en conjunto, los “Servicios” o “nuestros Servicios”) en relación con la red mundial (“Red mundial”) y su ecosistema.
Lea atentamente estas Condiciones antes de usar o acceder a los Servicios. Al acceder o usar cualquiera de los Servicios que prestamos, junto con su consentimiento explícito a las presentes Condiciones, usted acepta expresamente quedar obligado por estas Condiciones y por nuestra Declaración de privacidad, que se incorpora como parte de estas Condiciones. Tenga en cuenta estas partes especialmente importantes de estas Condiciones:
Usted acepta resolver toda disputa entre usted y TFH mediante arbitraje vinculante y no en los tribunales. Si reside en Corea del Sur, puede decidir resolver la disputa ante un tribunal local competente. Revise el apartado 15 a continuación para obtener más detalles.
Los productos de criptomonedas, incluidos los Tokens digitales, son un sector en el que no hay prácticamente ninguna regulación y pueden suponer un alto riesgo. Es posible que la regulación no ofrezca ningún remedio para cualquier pérdida derivada de dichas transacciones.
Nada de lo contenido en los Servicios constituye una oferta de venta ni publicidad sobre una oferta de compra de valores o Tokens digitales. Los Servicios no constituyen asesoramiento en materia de inversión. Es posible que donde viva no se permita tener, comprar o vender Tokens digitales (según se define en el apartado 2.1 a continuación), y es responsabilidad suya cumplir con toda legislación aplicable. Considere si comprar, vender, usar o tener Tokens digitales, es adecuado para usted en vista de sus circunstancias financieras y su comprensión de los Tokens digitales. El valor de los Tokens digitales puede cambiar rápidamente y pueden perder todo su valor.
Además, los tokens Worldcoin (“WLD”) no están destinados a estar disponibles para su uso, compra o acceso por parte de personas en los Estados Unidos, incluidos ciudadanos estadounidenses, residentes o personas en los Estados Unidos, o empresas constituidas, ubicadas o residentes en los Estados Unidos, o que tengan un agente registrado en los Estados Unidos. No ponemos WLD a disposición de dichas personas estadounidenses. Además, usted acepta que no venderá, transferirá ni pondrá WLD a disposición de personas de los EE. UU. Puede encontrar más información sobre los riesgos asociados a WLD aquí.
1.
Alcance de las Condiciones
1.1 Privacidad y sus datos.
Al acceder a las Aplicaciones, puede proporcionarnos categorías de información personal, como su nombre o número de teléfono. Si facilita información como prueba de condición de persona y para solicitar sus tokens WLD, es posible que proporcione categorías especiales de datos personales sensibles, como su información biométrica. Nuestra Declaración de privacidad describe los datos que recopilamos de usted y cómo los usamos. No utilice los Servicios si no desea que recopilemos o utilicemos sus datos de la forma descrita en la Declaración de privacidad.
1.2 Elegibilidad.
Es posible que se pueda acceder a páginas web que describan nuestros Servicios desde cualquier parte del mundo, pero esto no significa que todos los Servicios o funciones de servicio sean legales o estén disponibles en su país. No puede usar VPN ni herramientas similares con el fin de eludir restricciones. Es su responsabilidad asegurarse de que usa nuestros Servicios conforme a la legalidad cuando los utilice. Nuestros Servicios no están disponibles en todos los idiomas. Nuestros Servicios son legales donde los usa. Nuestros Servicios no están disponibles en todos los idiomas. Para usar los Servicios, debe cumplir con estas Condiciones y con todas las leyes aplicables. No puede usar nuestros Servicios para llevar a cabo, promover o ayudar a otros a llevar a cabo ninguna actividad ilegal o ilícita.
Además, debe cumplir todos los criterios siguientes:
tener 18 años o más; y
no está
radicado en, bajo el control de, ni es un ciudadano o residente de: Siria, las regiones de Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson y Zaporizhzhia de Ucrania, Rusia, Corea del Norte, Irán, Cuba o cualquier otro país o región con los que Estados Unidos, la Unión Europea o cualquier otro país o jurisdicción haya restringido el acceso de los servicios;
no es un “Ciudadano especialmente designado” según la Oficina de control de activos extranjeros (OFAC, por sus siglas en inglés) del Departamento del Tesoro de los EE. UU. ni las listas de sanciones de ningún otro país, y su nombre no figura en la Lista de personas denegadas del Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. ni en las listas de personas prohibidas de ningún otro país.
Si no cumple con todos estos requisitos, no se le permite acceder o usar los Servicios y, en consecuencia, podemos restringir su capacidad para acceder o usar los Servicios.
Además, si usted está establecido o situado en Alemania o tiene allí su residencia habitual o su domicilio social, no se le permite acceder ni usar servicios de terceros según se definen en la sección 2.5 o aplicaciones descentralizadas según se definen en la sección 2.8. Estas características no están disponibles para usted.
1.3 Disponibilidad.
Puede accederse a las páginas web que describen los Servicios desde cualquier parte del mundo, pero esto no significa que todos los Servicios o funciones de servicio sean legales o estén disponibles en su país. El acceso a ciertos Servicios (o ciertas funciones del Servicio) en determinados países puede verse bloqueado por nosotros o por las autoridades. No puede usar VPN ni herramientas similares con el fin de eludir restricciones. Es posible que el acceso a las Aplicaciones, y ciertas funciones dentro de las Aplicaciones, no esté disponible o esté restringido, dependiendo de su ubicación.
Es su responsabilidad asegurarse de que usa los Servicios conforme a la legalidad cuando los utilice
. Los servicios no están disponibles en todos los idiomas.
1.4 Actualizaciones.
Podemos cambiar en estas Condiciones según sea necesario. En ese caso, pondremos a su disposición los términos actualizados en los Servicios y, cuando lo exija la legislación aplicable, le notificaremos antes de realizar cualquier cambio y, cuando dichos cambios puedan ser especialmente importantes o poco favorecedores para usted, proporcionaremos un aviso previo adicional si lo exige la legislación aplicable. Usted entiende y acepta que el hecho de continuar usando los Servicios después de que las hayamos cambiado y cuando usted no haya planteado sus objeciones expresamente significa que acepta las Condiciones actualizadas. Puede dejar de usar los Servicios en cualquier momento si no acepta las Condiciones. Debido a que los Servicios evolucionan con el tiempo, podemos cambiar o interrumpir la totalidad o parte de estos, en cualquier momento y sin previo aviso, a nuestra entera discreción, en la medida que lo permita la legislación aplicable.
1.5 Condiciones adicionales.
Las condiciones adicionales pueden regir para aplicaciones, contenido, funciones o partes específicas de los Servicios, y todas esas condiciones adicionales que le indiquemos formarán parte de las presentes Condiciones.
2. Servicios
2.1 Billetera no custodiada.
La World App incluye una billetera no alojada y no custodiada para mantener criptomonedas compatibles, monedas digitales o activos digitales (incluidos WLD y, en conjunto, “Tokens digitales”). Usted tiene el control sobre los Tokens digitales guardados en su billetera. Con la World App, las claves privadas (que representan la contraseña para acceder a los Tokens digitales) se almacenan directamente en su dispositivo. En cualquier momento, a condición de tener acceso a Internet y dependiendo de la congestión en la cadena de bloques, puede retirar sus Tokens digitales si los envía a una dirección de cadena de bloques diferente. Si mantiene sus Tokens digitales en su billetera, Worldcoin no controla su billetera, sus Tokens digitales ni sus claves privadas. Los usuarios son responsables del riesgo de pérdida de sus claves privadas y ni TFH ni la World App pueden recuperarlas.
Dado que la World App es una billetera no custodiada, se le dará una dirección de billetera que especifica dónde se guardan sus Tokens digitales en la cadena de bloques correspondiente. Nosotros no podemos acceder a sus Tokens digitales.
2.2 Tokens digitales compatibles.
La World App admite ciertos tokens ERC-20. Es posible que en el futuro añadamos compatibilidad con otros Tokens digitales. La World App muestra los Tokens digitales compatibles.
Asegúrese de comprobar qué tokens y redes son compatibles con World App antes de depositar o retirar sus Tokens digitales. No podemos recuperar sus Tokens digitales si envía tokens no compatibles o envía Tokens digitales a la dirección de billetera incorrecta.
Usted entiende que enviar Tokens digitales no compatibles a la dirección de su billetera World App puede implicar la pérdida total del acceso a esos Tokens digitales. No tenemos forma de recuperar Tokens digitales. Asegúrese en todo momento de enviar los Tokens digitales correctos a la dirección de billetera correcta. Es posible que desee probar una transacción con una pequeña cantidad de Tokens digitales.
2.3 Ofertas y acceso.
Cuando interactúe con sus Tokens digitales mediante los Servicios, por ejemplo, enviándolos a otra dirección de billetera o conectándose a una aplicación distribuida, se le pedirá que apruebe o “firme” la interacción a través de los dispositivos que haya indicado durante el proceso de integración. Las Aplicaciones confían plenamente en sus aprobaciones de estos dispositivos para iniciar interacciones con la cadena de bloques pertinente. Usted entiende que está interactuando directamente con la cadena de bloques pertinente cuando realiza estas interacciones, y que no somos responsables de transmitir órdenes en su nombre.
2.4 Información de terceros.
Al usar los Servicios, puede tener acceso a información relativa a sus Tokens digitales, como, entre otros, su valor de mercado actual. La presentación de esta información no implica ninguna asociación ni aval de terceros, incluso aunque ciertas funcionalidades ofrecidas en relación con los Servicios requieran el uso de productos de dichos terceros. El contenido de los servicios y productos de esos terceros, según se establece a través de los Servicios, se basa en información puesta a disposición del público o que esos terceros nos comuniquen y, por lo tanto, no hacemos declaraciones ni garantías sobre la precisión de un determinado servicio o de información relacionada con productos de terceros.
2.5 Servicios de pago externos
Los usuarios establecidos o situados en Alemania o que tengan su residencia ordinaria o domicilio social allí no pueden usar Servicios de terceros para vender o intercambiar sus Tokens digitales en virtud de la presente Sección.
Allá donde estén disponibles, los Servicios pueden ofrecerle enlaces a procesadores externos para procesar transacciones como compras fiduciarias de Tokens digitales, venta de Tokens digitales, intercambio de Tokens digitales y otras funcionalidades que puedan estar disponibles en el futuro. Puede comprobar qué servicios de terceros están disponibles en World App. Cuando realiza estas transacciones, está realizando transacciones con terceros y no con nosotros. Debe seguir las instrucciones pertinentes facilitadas por el proveedor externo y aceptar sus condiciones de servicio. En ningún momento mientras prestamos los Servicios o cuando usted accede a servicios de terceros tomamos el control ni transmitimos sus fondos o Tokens digitales.
2.6 Transacciones entre pares.
Los Servicios proporcionan una plataforma de comunicaciones a través de la cual usted puede enviar, solicitar, recibir y almacenar Tokens digitales compatibles de otras billeteras de cadena de bloques, ya sea controladas por usted o por terceros. Su transferencia de Tokens digitales compatibles entre sus demás billeteras de cadena de bloques y con origen y destino en terceros constituye una transferencia. La parte que inicia la transacción es la única responsable de ejecutarla correctamente, lo que puede incluir, entre otras cosas, el pago de suficientes tarifas de red o de minería para que la transacción se confirme. Si los cargos de red son insuficientes, el estado de una transferencia podría permanecer pendiente y dar lugar a demoras o pérdidas incurridas como resultado de un error en el inicio de la transacción. No tenemos obligación de ayudar en la subsanación de dichas transacciones. Cuando envía un Token digital desde su billetera a otra billetera de cadena de bloques, es usted quien ejecuta dichas transferencias en cadena y no están bajo nuestro control. Debe verificar toda la información de la transacción antes de enviarla. No asumimos ninguna responsabilidad en caso de que introduzca una dirección de cadena de bloques de destino incorrecta. Las transferencias de Tokens digitales no se pueden anular una vez que se han difundido a la red de cadena de bloques pertinente, aunque puede que estén en estado pendiente y designadas en consecuencia, mientras los operadores de red procesan la transacción. No controlamos la red ni garantizamos que la red confirme una determinada transferencia.
2.7 Depósito
2.7.1 Información general
. La World App ofrece la interfaz de usuario para acceder a un “depósito” descentralizado para sus Tokens digitales (“Depósito”). Su uso del Depósito constituye su reconocimiento y aceptación de los términos que rigen el Depósito, así como cualquier término adicional dispuesto por terceros que hayan desarrollado o proporcionen características relacionadas con, o que surjan de, su uso del Depósito.
El Depósito solo admite ciertos Tokens digitales. Estos Tokens digitales no se consideran Tokens referenciados a activos o Tokens de dinero electrónico, en los términos establecidos por el Reglamento (UE) 2023/1114 del Parlamento Europeo y del Consejo, de 31 de mayo de 2023, relativo a los mercados de criptoactivos. Los Tokens digitales compatibles se mostrarán en World App cuando acceda a su Depósito. Los Tokens digitales compatibles con el Depósito pueden cambiar de vez en cuando, y no hay garantía de que los Tokens digitales compatibles continúen estado disponibles para su uso en el Depósito.
El Depósito se proporciona en relación con smart contract de terceros. Ninguna otra persona o entidad, aparte de usted, tiene la capacidad de interactuar con su Depósito o los Tokens digitales dentro de su Depósito. Ni TFH ni ningún tercero tiene claves administrativas o acceso (con privilegios o de otro tipo) a su Depósito o a los smart contracts asociados. El depósito o retirada de cualquier Token digital del Depósito de su cuenta solo puede realizarse si dicha transacción está firmada con su(s) correspondiente(s) clave(s) privada(s) descrita(s) en la Sección 2.1 de estas Condiciones. Esto significa que si pierde el acceso o el control de su(s) clave(s) privada(s), no podrá realizar ningún depósito o retirada de Tokens digitales del Depósito y nadie podrá ayudarle o hacerlo en su nombre. En consecuencia, el uso del Depósito no le proporciona, ni puede proporcionarle, ningún servicio de custodia, fianza o transferencia por parte de TFH o cualquier otro tercero con respecto a cualquier Token digital que usted bloquee usando el Depósito en su cuenta.
El smart contract que rige las funciones del Depósito para tokens WLD se puede ver usando la cadena de bloques que hay aquí. Para mayor claridad, el uso de estas y otras funciones relacionadas del Depósito está sujeto a la misma Exención de garantías contenida en la Sección 12 de estas Condiciones.
2.7.2 Funciones del Depósito.
Actualmente, el Depósito ofrece las siguientes características, que pueden ser alteradas, eliminadas o añadidas por TFH o terceros: Bloqueo, Rendimiento, Periodo de retirada y garantía, Grants al Depósito.
2.7.3 Bloqueo
. Al usar el Depósito, acepta bloquear sus Tokens digitales durante un periodo de tiempo determinado. El bloqueo de Tokens digitales mediante su Depósito transferirá esos Tokens digitales de su billetera no custodiada a un smart contract descentralizado. Tras la transferencia, estos Tokens digitales quedarán “bloqueados” en el depósito, lo que incluye el período durante el cual permanecen depositados en el Depósito, así como una duración predeterminada denominada “Período de seguridad”, que se describe con más detalle a continuación. Mientras sus Tokens digitales estén bloqueados, no podrá acceder, transferir ni realizar ninguna otra transacción con ellos hasta que haya solicitado retirarlos y haya permitido que transcurra el Período de seguridad aplicable. Nadie, ni si quiera TFH o el Proveedor externo, tiene la capacidad de desbloquear, custodiar, controlar, retirar o transferir sus Tokens digitales bloqueados. Colocar sus Tokens digitales en el Depósito y someterlos a las restricciones de bloqueo y retirada no constituye una venta, préstamo o transferencia de ningún derecho, título o interés sobre los Tokens digitales a TFH ni a ningún otro tercero.
Bloquear sus Tokens digitales en el Depósito no garantiza la protección o custodia de sus Tokens digitales. No se aplica a sus Tokens digitales ningún plan de seguro de depósito, ni ninguna protección similar, y el valor y/o la utilidad de cualquier Token digital que haya bloqueado puede aumentar o disminuir a lo largo de la duración del Período de seguridad. Esto significa que el valor o la utilidad de cualquier Token digital que bloquee en su Depósito puede disminuir, o llegar a cero durante el Período de seguridad. Usted reconoce y acepta que cualquier retirada de Tokens digitales en su cuenta después del Período de seguridad correspondiente puede dar lugar a la devolución de Tokens digitales que tengan un valor inferior al que tenían en el momento en que los bloqueó en su Depósito, o ningún valor, y que TFH ni ningún tercero asumen el riesgo o la responsabilidad de cualquier disminución del valor que pueda ocurrir.
2.7.4 Rendimiento
. También puede usted ser apto o apta para generar lo que, para los fines de este producto, se denomina “rendimiento” en ciertos Tokens digitales en su Depósito. Este rendimiento, que puede adoptar la forma de Tokens digitales adicionales, lo proporciona un tercero a través de una serie separada de operaciones del smart contract a las que puede acceder usando la interfaz proporcionada dentro de World App. Ni TFH ni ningún tercero usan, asumen el control, reciben ningún crédito ni disponen de otro modo de sus Tokens digitales. Como tal, el rendimiento no es un interés vinculado o generado por nada que no sea el bloqueo de sus Tokens digitales de acuerdo con las condiciones y especificaciones indicadas. Cualquier rendimiento que pueda recibir se le proporciona como una grant por parte del tercero en función de sus decisiones de almacenar Tokens digitales usando el Depósito. Las especificaciones que determinan la generación de un rendimiento, incluido el importe generado o el tiempo durante el cual puede acumularse, pueden modificarse o cancelarse en cualquier momento, a discreción del Proveedor externo.
Es posible que haya una cantidad máxima de rendimiento que pueda obtener. Estos detalles se mostrarán junto con su Depósito y a través de cualquier condición adicional que disponga el tercero (identificado como el “Proveedor” dentro de World App) que proporcione el rendimiento. Estas condiciones adicionales también se incorporan a estas Condiciones. TFH no proporciona ni administra el rendimiento.
Cualquier rendimiento que se acumule solo se le distribuirá tras la finalización de la retirada del Depósito de cualquier Token digital que genere rendimiento, que se produce solo después de que expire el Período de seguridad correspondiente. Esta retirada es la condición final de cualquier grant de rendimiento, lo que significa que usted no posee ningún derecho, título o interés sobre ningún rendimiento que se haya generado o se vaya a generar, a menos que, y hasta el momento en que, el rendimiento haya sido recibido en su billetera no custodiada. Esto también significa que si pierde el acceso o el control de su(s) clave(s) privada(s), no podrá realizar ninguna retirada que le dé derecho a recibir un rendimiento.
2.7.5 Periodo de retirada y seguridad.
Puede iniciar la retirada de sus Tokens digitales de su Depósito en cualquier momento. Los Tokens digitales que haya solicitado retirar de su Depósito se le devolverán después de que haya transcurrido una duración preestablecida llamada “Período de seguridad”. Cada vez que inicie una retirada de Tokens digitales del Depósito, comenzará un nuevo Periodo de seguridad y correrá el tiempo hasta que se le devuelvan esos Tokens digitales. Durante este tiempo, los Tokens digitales que haya seleccionado para su retirada permanecerán bloqueados y también puede cancelar su retirada. Una vez que haya transcurrido el Período de Seguridad, su retirada se completará y los Tokens digitales, junto con cualquier rendimiento generado que pueda haberse acumulado, se enviarán a su billetera. La duración del Período de seguridad se indicará en World App cuando acceda a su Depósito.
2.7.6 Grants al Depósito.
Esta función, una vez seleccionada, le permite enviar automáticamente las Grants WLD directamente al Depósito de su cuenta en lugar de a su billetera. Puede cambiar este ajuste en cualquier momento.
2.7.7 TFH y Depósito.
El acceso a esta función se realiza a través de World App. Sin embargo, TFH solo podrá leer los datos relacionados y mostrárselos. TFH no puede transferir, retirar ni depositar ninguno de sus Tokens digitales y no tiene acceso a su Depósito.
2.8 Aplicaciones descentralizadas
Esta sección no se aplica a los usuarios establecidos o situados en Alemania o que tengan allí su residencia habitual o su domicilio social:
Allá donde estén disponibles
, es posible que tengamos funciones que le permitan conectar su billetera con diversas aplicaciones descentralizadas. Usted es el único responsable de garantizar la seguridad de estas aplicaciones de terceros. No tenemos control sobre aplicaciones de terceros ni podemos ofrecer asistencia para ningún problema que se encuentre al conectarse con aplicaciones de terceros.
2.9 Soporte técnico al usuario.
Ofrecemos Soporte técnico al usuario para ciertas características y funciones en relación con los Servicios. Para ponerse en contacto, seleccione “Soporte” en el menú de la aplicación o a través de support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Interfaz de World ID
. La Worldcoin Foundation, y no TFH, administra el Protocolo de World ID y controla el procesamiento de datos relacionados con Orb para verificar un World ID. Podemos poner a su disposición su World ID (como interfaz) a través del Servicio. El Protocolo de World ID le permite demostrar que es un ser humano real y único, a la vez que protege su privacidad.
2.11 Programa de invitación.
Allá donde esté disponible, podremos poner a su disposición la función Invitar. Usando dicha función puede invitar a amigos y familiares a descargar la World App y obtener la verificación de World ID. Si usa la función Invitar, acepta los siguientes términos y condiciones:
World Assets Limited proporciona las recompensas por participar en la función Invitar. World Assets Limited puede, a su entera discreción, ofrecerle una recompensa por invitar a usuarios que verifiquen con éxito su World ID. Para recibir la recompensa, debe usted cumplir ciertas condiciones, que le serán explicadas en World App. Tiene un límite máximo de cuántos usuarios puede remitir a World App. Este límite se muestra en World App.
No es necesaria ninguna compra para participar en la función Invitar. La invitación solo está disponible para uso personal y no comercial. Solo puede usar la función Invitar de buena fe y con fines legales. Usted no podrá: (a) usar Invitar o los Servicios de forma engañosa, fraudulenta o ilegal; (b) hacer nada que dañe nuestra marca, fondo de comercio o reputación; (c) transmitir publicidad o material promocional no solicitado o no autorizado; (d) hacer afirmaciones falsas o engañosas; (e) usar búsquedas de pago, medios de comunicación de pago u otra actividad similar para solicitar usuarios a través de Invite; y (f) usar Invitar para intentar obtener información personal de otros usuarios.
La función Invitar no está disponible en todos los países o ubicaciones, ni está disponible para todos los usuarios. La participación en Invitar no está disponible en ninguna jurisdicción en la que la totalidad o parte de esta función pueda infringir (o hacer que infrinjamos) cualquier requisito legal. Usted acepta no usar la Invitación si la función de Invitar no cumple con la legislación aplicable en su ubicación.
La función Invitar se pone a disposición a nuestra entera discreción. Podremos cambiar, modificar, suspender y cancelar la función en cualquier momento. World Assets Limited puede negarse a ofrecerle una recompensa por invitar a usuarios a verificar su identificación mundial cuando determine, a su entera discreción, que usted ha infringido estos Términos.
2.12 Grants y reservas de WLD.
Uno de los servicios de Terceros reclama una pequeña cantidad de WLD a diferentes intervalos (“Grants de WLD”). Los Grants de WLD los proporciona World Assets Limited, una subsidiaria de la Worldcoin Foundation. Los importes, intervalos y plazos exactos de los Grants de WLD se especificarán en World App, pero los determinará únicamente World Assets Limited. De acuerdo con las versiones anteriores de estos términos, las Reservas de WLD disponibles anteriormente no garantizan que recibirá ninguna cantidad de Grants de WLD. Los importes, intervalos y plazos exactos de las Reservas de WLD se especificarán en World App, pero los determinará únicamente World Assets Limited. Las Reservas de WLD pueden caducar, con o sin previo aviso en World App, independientemente de si ya ha realizado una Reserva de WLD o ha recibido el Bono de WLD asociado. Son revocables a discreción exclusiva de World Assets Limited.
2.13 Aplicación para operadores.
Para los operadores de Orb y otros socios, ponemos a su disposición una aplicación para operadores que le permite supervisar cierta actividad y estadísticas relevantes para usted y su negocio como operador de Orb. También podemos proporcionar ciertas funciones para ayudarle a llevar a cabo su negocio como operador de Orb.
2.14. Miniaplicaciones
. “Miniaplicaciones” es una función de World App que permite acceder a una plataforma de miniaplicaciones a la que se puede acceder desde World App. Tenemos el criterio exclusivo de determinar cómo se muestran las Miniaplicaciones dentro de World App. Debe tener una dirección de billetera de World App para acceder a Miniaplicaciones.
Usted reconoce que al mostrar Miniaplicaciones, TFH proporciona una plataforma tecnológica que solo conecta a los usuarios. En ningún momento TFH transmite, almacena, toma posesión, custodia ni se involucra de otro modo con ninguna divisa tradicional o digital. TFH no procesa transacciones, actúa como procesador de pagos ni participa de otro modo en el procesamiento de transacciones. TFH no es parte de las transacciones y no tiene responsabilidad alguna con respecto a estas transacciones. TFH no puede proporcionar soporte técnico con respecto a los problemas de transacciones.
2.14.1 Transacciones y pagos relacionados con Miniaplicaciones.
Las Miniaplicaciones se muestran dentro de World App y pueden ofrecer bienes o servicios que los usuarios de World App pueden comprar usando Tokens digitales en sus billeteras de World App. Estas transacciones se producen entre usted y la Miniaplicación. TFH no es parte de ninguna transacción de ese tipo.
Con respecto a dichas transacciones, usted reconoce que la billetera World App es un servicio que no es de custodia, que TFH no almacena ni custodia sus Tokens digitales y que no realiza transacciones, transmite, toma posesión de ellos ni tiene ninguna otra implicación en la realización de transacciones. Los Tokens digitales siempre se almacenan y transmiten en sus respectivas redes de cadena de bloques. No hay garantías de que las transacciones se procesen correctamente.
TFH solo le conecta a un tercero en la plataforma de Miniaplicaciones y no es parte de ninguna transacción. TFH no tiene ninguna función en el procesamiento de pagos ni en la regulación de los cargos por reembolso o cancelación.
Una vez que decida participar en una transacción, debe enviar la cantidad y el tipo acordados de Tokens digitales. TFH no procesa los Tokens digitales ni la moneda tradicional del usuario y no realiza ninguna transferencia en nombre de los usuarios. TFH no gestiona, supervisa, vigila ni verifica ni proporciona ningún tipo de garantía sobre ninguna transacción. En caso de que la transacción no se reciba, anule, procese incorrectamente o se produzca algún otro error, usted y los proveedores externos deberán colaborar para resolver cualquier problema. Cualquier disputa, reclamación, pérdida, malentendido, error técnico o problema de cualquier tipo (tanto accidental como supuestamente intencional) en relación con el pago o transacciones debe tratarse directamente entre usted y el proveedor externo. TFH no asume responsabilidad alguna y no será parte de ninguna disputa o discusión relacionada con los pagos, ni es responsable de ninguna pérdida o daño en que puedan incurrir las partes involucradas.
Usted es el único responsable de aceptar el riesgo de cualquier fluctuación de precios relativo al valor de Tokens digitales, y entiende que en el momento en que complete una transacción, el valor de los Tokens digitales implicados en la misma puede haber cambiado significativamente.
2.14.2 Terceros
. Los productos y servicios mostrados en cualquier miniaplicación son ofrecidos y gestionados por terceros. Al usar las Miniaplicaciones, usted reconoce y acepta que:
Estas Condiciones se establecen entre usted y nosotros, y no con ninguna miniaplicación específica;
Está accediendo a una aplicación desarrollada y/o proporcionada por una aplicación de terceros, la cual es la única responsable de la miniaplicación;
TFH solo proporciona acceso a proveedores de pagos externos a través de la billetera World App, y no procesa pagos ni retiene fondos;
Las miniaplicaciones pueden tener términos adicionales como parte de sus productos o servicios que usted debe cumplir si acepta su servicio; y
Usted reconoce y asume explícitamente todos y cada uno de los riesgos relacionados con las transacciones, y acepta que no seremos responsables de ningún riesgo o consecuencia adversa que surja de dichas transacciones.
Los Desarrolladores individuales de las miniaplicaciones disponibles en Miniaplicaciones son los únicos responsables del contenido, productos, bienes o servicios que se ponen a su disposición directamente a través de sus respectivas miniaplicaciones. Para cualquier consulta o disputa, deberá ponerse en contacto directamente con el Desarrollador correspondiente.
Los Usuarios aceptan todos los riesgos relacionados con la realización de una transacción, incluido el riesgo de que no reciban los ingresos de su compra o venta. En caso de un problema con respecto a cualquier transacción, TFH no puede ayudar con una resolución, ni asume ninguna responsabilidad por los problemas que surjan de cualquier transacción.
2.14.3 Tarifas de TFH.
Podemos añadir una tarifa por usar Miniaplicaciones cuando realice una transacción con un Desarrollador. La cantidad de esta tarifa se le mostrará dentro de la plataforma. Todas las tarifas se muestran y actualizan según se reflejan en las Miniaplicaciones y pueden actualizarse y modificarse según sea necesario.
2.14.4 Impuestos.
Es responsabilidad suya en exclusiva determinar si, y en qué medida, se aplica algún impuesto a una transacción a través de Miniaplicaciones o transacciones que haya realizado en ellas, y retener, cobrar, informar y remitir el importe de impuestos correcto a las autoridades tributarias correspondientes.
2.14.5 Sin supervisión general.
TFH no tendrá ninguna obligación general de supervisar la información generada por los usuarios, ni de buscar activamente hechos o circunstancias que indiquen cualquier actividad ilegal dentro de Miniaplicaciones.
Sin embargo, si tenemos conocimiento, independientemente de los medios usados, de que se ha ofrecido un producto o servicio ilegal a través de Miniaplicaciones a usuarios ubicados en la Unión Europea, informaremos a los usuarios que hayan comprado el producto o servicio ilegal a través de Miniaplicaciones
.
2.14.6 Actividades prohibidas.
Los usuarios de los Servicios de Miniaplicaciones acuerdan no publicar ni distribuir ningún contenido que infrinja leyes o derechos de terceros, incluidos, entre otros, derechos de propiedad intelectual, derechos de privacidad o derechos de publicidad.
Además, acepta no participar en ninguna actividad que:
sea ilegal, fraudulenta o perjudicial;
interfiera o interrumpa el funcionamiento de Miniaplicaciones;
infrinja los términos establecidos en nuestras Directrices de la Aplicación; y
incluya contenido no permitido en virtud de las Directrices de la aplicación.
2.14.7 Señalización de contenido ilegal.
World App tiene mecanismos fáciles de acceder y fáciles de usar para que los usuarios nos notifiquen contenido ilegal en la plataforma de Miniaplicaciones. Actuaremos rápidamente para revisar dichos informes.
2.14.8 Eliminación de contenido ilegal.
Si determinamos que cualquier miniaplicación contiene contenido ilegal u ofrece productos o servicios ilegales, se eliminará de las Miniaplicaciones. TFH proporcionará una declaración breve, clara y específica de los motivos a cualquier póster de contenido o servicios ilegales.
Cualquier restricción aplicada por World App a sus usuarios se hará de forma diligente, objetiva y proporcional.
Los usuarios que crean que su contenido se ha eliminado o que el acceso a él se ha desactivado injustificadamente pueden ponerse en contacto con nosotros a través de
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
para apelar la decisión. Proporcionamos un sistema de quejas electrónico gratuito que permite a los usuarios cuestionar nuestras decisiones relacionadas con la eliminación de contenido, la suspensión del servicio, la finalización de la cuenta o las restricciones de monetización debido a presuntas infracciones de contenido o términos ilegales.
2.14.9 Moderación del contenido.
TFH se reserva el derecho de suspender, durante un período de tiempo razonable y después de haber emitido una advertencia previa cuando la ley lo exija, la prestación de nuestros servicios a usuarios que frecuentemente proporcionan contenido manifiestamente ilegal. TFH también puede suspender temporalmente la tramitación de notificaciones y quejas de usuarios que envíen con frecuencia reclamaciones infundadas.
2.15. Nombres de usuario
. Su nombre de usuario de World App no tiene por qué ser su nombre real. Al elegir un nombre de usuario, está obligado a cumplir con la
Política de nombres de usuario
en su versión más reciente.
3. Compras, cargos e impuestos
3.1 Cargos por transacción.
Al usar los Servicios, usted acepta pagar todas los cargos correspondientes, incluidos los cargos de transacción para permutas (swaps) y transacciones de Tokens digitales. Le informaremos de cualquier cargo aplicable antes de que efectúe una transacción. Si usa un servicio de pago externo, los cargos bancarios, así como los cargos de tarjeta de crédito y débito que se cobren por cualquier compra de Tokens digitales, quizá se compensen restándolos a la cantidad liquidada que supongan sus compras de Tokens digitales. Usted también es responsable de pagar cualquier cargo adicional que cobre su proveedor de servicios financieros.
3.2 Cargo de red.
Las interacciones con la cadena de bloques también incurren en un cargo de red. El cargo de red se cobra y se abona a la red de cadena de bloques, no a nosotros, por facilitar las interacciones. En algunos casos, usted puede cumplir los requisitos para un número limitado de transacciones sin coste dentro de un período de tiempo determinado a su entera discreción por TFH. Dichas transacciones están sujetas a un valor mínimo de transacción que TFH puede ajustar.
3.3 Impuestos
. Es responsabilidad suya en exclusiva determinar si, y en qué medida, se aplica algún impuesto a una transacción a través de los Servicios, y retener, cobrar, informar y remitir el importe de impuestos correcto a las autoridades tributarias correspondientes.
3.4 Actualizaciones
. Todos los cargos se muestran y actualizan según se reflejan en los Servicios y pueden actualizarse y modificarse según sea necesario.
4. Factores de riesgo
4.1 No es moneda de curso legal.
Los Tokens digitales no son una moneda de curso legal, no están avalados por ningún gobierno, y las cuentas de Tokens digitales y los saldos de valor en los Servicios no cuentan con las protecciones del Organismo federal de garantía de depósitos, del Organismo de protección de inversiones en valores ni protecciones similares existentes en otros países. No somos un banco ni ofrecemos servicios fiduciarios. Las transacciones realizadas a través de World App no están prácticamente reguladas en muchos países. No garantizamos la funcionalidad de las cadenas de bloques que admitimos, lo que podría, entre otras cosas, provocar retrasos, conflictos de intereses o decisiones operativas por parte de terceros que sean desfavorables para ciertos propietarios de Tokens digitales, o imposibilitar que usted complete una transacción a través de los Servicios. Es posible que los detalles de la transacción que envíe a través de los Servicios no se completen, o que se retrasen sustancialmente en la cadena de bloques aplicable, y no asumimos ninguna responsabilidad por el hecho de que una transacción no se confirme o procese según lo esperado. No existen garantías de que una transferencia iniciada a través de los Servicios consiga transferir la titularidad o el derecho en un Token digital. Además, puede haber riesgos específicos para el uso de ciertos Tokens digitales, como WLD. Puede encontrar más información sobre los riesgos específicos de WLD aquí.
4.2 Nueva tecnología.
Los Servicios son nuevos. Aunque se ha probado ampliamente, el software usado para los Servicios sigue siendo relativamente nuevo y podría presentar errores o vulnerabilidades de seguridad. Además, el software todavía está en desarrollo y podría sufrir cambios significativos con el tiempo que quizá no satisfagan las expectativas de los usuarios.
4.3 Riesgo de seguridad de la información.
Los Tokens digitales y el uso de los Servicios podrían sufrir expropiación o robo. Los hackers y demás grupos u organizaciones malintencionadas pueden intentar interferir con los Servicios de diversas maneras, como, entre otras, con ataques de malware, ataques de denegación de servicio, ataques basados en algoritmos de consenso, ataques Sybil, smurfing y spoofing. Además, debido a que las redes de cadena de bloques que admitimos, como el protocolo Ethereum, se basan en software de código abierto, el software subyacente a los Servicios puede contener errores o debilidades, intencionales o no, que quizá afecten negativamente a los Servicios o den lugar a la pérdida de los Tokens digitales del usuario o a que este no pueda acceder o controlar su billetera a través de los Servicios. En caso de que se produzca un error o una debilidad en el software, es posible que no exista ningún recurso y que no se garantice a los usuarios ninguna solución, reembolso o compensación.
4.4 Precisión.
Aunque pretendemos facilitar información precisa y oportuna a través de los Servicios (incluido, entre otros, el contenido) puede que no sea siempre totalmente precisa, completa o actual, y que incluya inexactitudes técnicas o errores tipográficos. En un esfuerzo por continuar proporcionándole la información más completa y precisa posible, la información, en la medida permitida por la legislación aplicable, podría modificarse o actualizarse ocasionalmente sin previo aviso, lo que incluye, de manera no taxativa, la información sobre nuestras políticas, productos y servicios. En consecuencia, debe verificar toda la información antes de confiar en ella, y todas las decisiones basadas en información facilitada a través de los Servicios serán responsabilidad suya en exclusiva, sin que tengamos nosotros ninguna responsabilidad por tales decisiones.
4.5 Disponibilidad.
Aunque nos esforzamos por ofrecerle un servicio excelente, no garantizamos que los Servicios estén disponibles sin interrupción. Es posible que los Servicios no estén disponibles temporalmente, por motivos de mantenimiento u otros. No asumimos ninguna responsabilidad por ningún error, omisión, interrupción, eliminación, defecto, retraso en el funcionamiento o la transmisión, fallo de la línea de comunicaciones, robo o destrucción, acceso no autorizado o alteración de las comunicaciones del usuario. No somos responsables de ningún problema o mal funcionamiento técnico de ninguna red o línea telefónica, sistemas informáticos en línea, servidores o proveedores, equipos informáticos, software, fallo de correo electrónico o de los actores debido a problemas técnicos o congestión de tráfico en Internet o en los Servicios o su combinación, incluidos daños o perjuicios a los usuarios o al ordenador de cualquier otra persona por la participación o descarga de materiales, o resultantes de estas, en relación con los Servicios. No somos responsables de ninguna pérdida o daño, perjuicio financiero o pérdida de beneficios, lucro cesante ni lesiones físicas o muerte, resultantes del uso del Servicio por parte de cualquier persona, de cualquier Contenido publicado en o a través del Servicio o transmitido a los usuarios, o de cualquier interacción entre usuarios de los Servicios, ya sea en Internet o en persona.
4.6 Forks.
El software usado para crear WLD es de código abierto y gratuito para que cualquier persona lo copie y lo utilice. Esto significa que cualquier persona puede crear una versión modificada de WLD, también conocida como bifurcación o “Fork”. En caso de una Fork o cualquier otra perturbación de una red de Tokens digitales, es posible que nuestro software no sea compatible con las actividades relacionadas con la Fork. Las transacciones podrían no completarse, completarse parcialmente, completarse incorrectamente o retrasarse sustancialmente cuando se produce una Fork. No somos responsables de ninguna pérdida en la que incurra cuya causa sea total o parcialmente una Fork u otra perturbación de la red.
4.7 Servicios de pago externos.
Allá donde estén disponibles (consulte en particular la sección 2.5), dependemos de proveedores de servicios externos para proporcionar algunas características y funcionalidades dentro de las Aplicaciones, por ejemplo, la capacidad de comprar Tokens digitales con moneda fiduciaria o la capacidad de intercambiar un Activo digital por otro. No proporcionamos estos servicios y no somos parte de ninguna transacción de este tipo. Usted depende únicamente de proveedores externos para estos servicios, y debe tener una cuenta con los proveedores externos y aceptar sus términos. No podemos
ayudarle si tiene problemas para usar su servicio, y no somos responsables de ninguna transacción que realice con proveedores externos.
5. Propiedad intelectual.
5.1 Titularidad.
Nuestro software, la aplicación, los Servicios, el Contenido, las Marcas de (según se definen a continuación) y el diseño, la selección y la disposición del Contenido en los Servicios (la “PI”) están protegidos por derechos de autor, marcas comerciales, patentes y demás derechos y leyes de propiedad intelectual en los Estados Unidos y demás países correspondientes. Usted acepta cumplir con todos los derechos y leyes de propiedad intelectual correspondientes, así como con cualquier aviso o restricción de marca comercial o derechos de autor contenidos en el Contrato o los Servicios. No puede eliminar ningún aviso de derechos de autor, marca comercial o propiedad contenidos en la PI.
5.2 Marcas comerciales.
El nombre de Tools for Humanity Corporation, el logotipo de World App y todos los logotipos y eslóganes relacionados son marcas comerciales o marcas de servicio de Tools for Humanity Corporation o sus licenciantes (“Marcas”). No puede copiar, imitar ni usar las Marcas, en su totalidad o en parte, sin nuestro permiso por escrito. Todas las demás marcas comerciales, nombres o logotipos mencionados en relación con los Servicios son propiedad de sus respectivos propietarios y usted no puede copiarlos, imitarlos ni usarlos, en su totalidad ni en parte, sin el permiso por escrito del propietario de la marca comercial correspondiente. La inclusión de cualquier marca de terceros en los Servicios no constituye una aprobación, un aval ni una recomendación por nuestra parte.
6. Licencia y restricciones
6.1 Licencia.
Siempre que sea elegible para usar los Servicios y que cumpla estas Condiciones, por la presente le otorgamos una licencia limitada para acceder y usar los Servicios.
6.2 Restricciones de licencia.
No puede volver a publicar Contenido en ningún sitio de Internet, Intranet o Extranet ni incorporar la información en ninguna otra base de datos o compilación, y está terminantemente prohibido cualquier otro uso del Contenido. Se prohíbe terminantemente todo uso de los Servicios que no sea el específicamente autorizado en el presente documento y sin nuestro permiso previo por escrito. El incumplimiento de lo anterior dará lugar a la rescisión de la licencia otorgada en el presente documento. Dicho uso no autorizado también podría infringir las leyes aplicables, incluidas, entre otras, las leyes de derechos de autor y marcas comerciales o las normativas y reglamentaciones aplicables en materia de comunicaciones. A menos que se indique explícitamente en el presente documento, nada de lo contenido en estas Condiciones se interpreta como una concesión de licencia sobre derechos de propiedad intelectual, ya sea en virtud de la doctrina de actos propios, por inferencia o de otro modo. Esta licencia es revocable por nuestra parte en cualquier momento sin previo aviso y con o sin causa justificada en la medida permitida por la legislación aplicable.
6.3 Gobierno.
Si usted es un usuario final del Gobierno de los EE. UU., le otorgamos la licencia de los Servicios como un “Artículo comercial”, conforme se define ese término en el Código de Reglamentos Federales de los EE. UU. (consulte el título 48 del C.F.R., apdo. 2.101), y los derechos que le otorgamos a los Servicios son los mismos que los derechos que concedemos a todos los demás en virtud de estas Condiciones.
7. Uso aceptable
7.1
Puede usar los Servicios solo para su propio uso personal. Nos reservamos el derecho, en todo momento y a nuestra entera discreción, de revisar, cancelar o suspender su acceso o uso de los Servicios de conformidad con la legislación aplicable. Los elementos de la lista de usos prohibidos son meros ejemplos, la lista no es exhaustiva; añadiremos o eliminaremos usos prohibidos a nuestra entera discreción de conformidad con la legislación aplicable.
7.2 Los Usos prohibidos incluyen:
Actividad ilegal:
Toda actividad que vulnere o contribuya a la vulneración de cualquier programa de sanciones administrado por la OFAC; vulnere o contribuya a la vulneración de cualquier ley en los países donde operamos; implique ganancias fruto de cualquier actividad ilegal; o publique, distribuya o difunda material o información ilegal.
Uso excesivo o pirateo:
Toda actividad que imponga una carga irrazonable o desproporcionadamente grande a nuestra infraestructura; interfiera, intercepte o expropie cualquier sistema, dato o información; transmita o cargue material a los Servicios que contenga virus, troyanos, gusanos o cualquier otro programa perjudicial o dañino; o intente obtener acceso no autorizado a los sistemas informáticos o redes conectados a los Servicios.
Abuso sobre los demás:
Toda actividad que interfiera con el acceso o uso de los Servicios por parte de otra persona; difame, abuse, extorsione, acose, aceche, amenace o infrinja de otro modo la privacidad, la propiedad intelectual o cualquier otro derecho de otra persona contemplado por la legislación; incite, amenace, facilite, promueva o fomente actos violentos, de odio o de intolerancia racial contra otros; o
recopile, extraiga o recoja datos de otro usuario de los Servicios sin permiso.
Fraude y demás prácticas comerciales desleales:
Toda actividad que opere para defraudarnos a nosotros, a nuestros usuarios o a cualquier otra persona; que nos proporcione información falsa, inexacta o engañosa; que prometa recompensas irrazonablemente altas o venda un servicio sin beneficio adicional para el comprador; o promueva otras prácticas depredadoras y engañosas, incluidas loterías ilegales, sorteos, subastas de tarifas al mejor postor, concursos, tómbolas, juegos de azar o cualquier otro juego de suerte.
Infracción de la propiedad intelectual:
Toda actividad que implique vender, distribuir o dar acceso a música, películas, software u otros materiales con licencia que estén falsificados y carezcan de la autorización adecuada del titular de los derechos; utilice la PI (incluidas las Marcas) sin consentimiento expreso o de una manera que nos dañe o dañe nuestra marca; de a entender falsamente la existencia de un aval o afiliación con nosotros; o infrinja o vulnere cualquier derecho de autor, marca comercial, derecho de publicidad o privacidad, o cualquier otro derecho de propiedad en virtud de la ley.
8. Operadores de Orb
Nos asociamos con contratistas locales independientes, llamados “Operadores de Orb”, que facilitan el registro de usuarios y ayudan a responder las preguntas que usted pueda tener sobre nosotros. Estos Operadores de Orb han recibido formación y conocen la Red mundial. Sin embargo, no tenemos control sobre ellos y renunciamos a toda responsabilidad por lo que digan o cómo se comporten.
Los Operadores de Orb no son nuestros representantes ni empleados bajo ningún supuesto. Ninguna iniciativa, función, proceso, política, norma ni demás proyectos que TFH lleve a cabo en interés de sus usuarios será indicio de una relación de empleo ni representación con un Operador de Orb.
9. Suspensión
Podremos suspender y restringir su acceso a los Servicios: i) si así nos lo exige una citación, orden judicial u orden vinculante de una autoridad gubernamental aparentemente válidas; ii) si sospechamos, dentro de lo razonable, que usa el Servicio en relación con un Uso prohibido; iii) si el uso que usted hace de los Servicios está sujeto a algún litigio pendiente, investigación o procedimiento gubernamental o percibimos un mayor riesgo de incumplimiento de la legislación o la normativa asociado con su actividad; iv) si nuestros socios de servicio no admiten su uso; v) si usted toma cualquier medida que consideremos que elude nuestros controles (como, entre otras, intentar crear múltiples cuentas).
10. No es una oferta de valores o participación en materias primas
El contenido de los Servicios no constituye una oferta para comprar o vender, ni publicidad de una oferta para comprar o vender, inversiones, valores, participaciones de sociedad, materias primas ni ningún otro instrumento financiero. El contenido o los Servicios tampoco constituyen una oferta o publicidad, ni se pueden usar para ofrecer ni publicitar ni en relación con ello, por parte de ninguna persona, ni en ningún estado o jurisdicción en la que dicha oferta o publicidad no esté autorizada o permitida, tampoco para ninguna persona a la que resulte ilegal ofrecerlo o publicitarlo.
11. Contenido
11.1 Confianza en el contenido y cambios en los Servicios.
La información y el material que le proporcionamos a través de los Servicios (“Contenido”) tiene únicamente fines de información general, y no garantizamos su exactitud, utilidad o integridad, en la medida permitida por la legislación aplicable. Cualquier confianza que deposite en nuestro Contenido es estrictamente a su cuenta y riesgo. No tenemos ninguna responsabilidad por ninguna medida que usted tome o deje de tomar debido al Contenido, ni ante ninguna persona con la que usted comparta el Contenido. Si otros usuarios describen su uso de nuestros Servicios, y así lo afirman en los Servicios o en cualquier otro lugar, esto no debe considerarse como que nosotros avalamos esas afirmaciones si estas no son congruentes con las presentes Condiciones o con nuestro Contenido. Podremos actualizar el Contenido según sea necesario, pero es posible que dicho Contenido no esté completo o vigente, y no tenemos ninguna obligación para con usted de actualizar el Contenido ni ninguna otra parte de los Servicios. Podremos igualmente modificar o interrumpir, temporal o permanentemente, cualquier parte o todo el Contenido o los Servicios sin previo aviso, en la medida permitida por la legislación aplicable. No seremos responsables de ninguna modificación, suspensión o interrupción de parte o de la totalidad del Contenido o los Servicios, en la medida permitida por la legislación aplicable.
11.2 Servicios y contenido de terceros.
Podremos facilitar enlaces a materiales educativos, seminarios web, reuniones y promociones en plataformas de redes sociales (“Servicios de terceros”) que permitan compartir y colaborar entre usuarios y otros terceros. Si comparte cualquier información personal, imágenes, opiniones, contenido o cualquier otro dato sobre esos servicios, lo hace a su propio riesgo. El uso que usted haga de esos servicios se rige por las condiciones de uso y las políticas de privacidad de esos servicios, y no los nuestros. Debe revisar las condiciones de los servicios de cada Servicio de terceros para comprender mejor sus derechos y la forma en la que usan sus datos esas plataformas. No somos responsables de ninguna pérdida, robo, riesgo o uso indebido de sus datos relacionados con un Servicio de terceros (incluida
la negligencia), excepto en la medida en que dicha responsabilidad no pueda limitarse porque así lo estipule la legislación aplicable. Si usa información proporcionada por un Servicio de terceros (“Contenido de terceros”) lo hace a su propio riesgo, y no le prometemos que el Contenido de terceros sea preciso, completo, auténtico o adecuado para sus circunstancias personales. El Contenido de terceros incluye información facilitada por otros usuarios que no avalamos específicamente.
11.3 Contenido de usuario.
Como parte de la comunidad de Worldcoin puede publicar mensajes, datos, software, imágenes, vídeos u otro contenido (“Contenido de usuario”) en paneles de mensajes, blogs, cuentas de redes sociales de nuestra propiedad, así como otras ubicaciones públicamente disponibles en los Servicios. Estos foros pueden estar alojados por nosotros o por un Proveedor de servicios externo en nuestro nombre. Usted es responsable de todo el Contenido de usuario que envíe, cargue, publique o almacene a través de los Servicios. Debe facilitar todas las advertencias, información y divulgaciones necesarias y apropiadas con respecto a su Contenido de usuario. No somos responsables de ningún Contenido de usuario que envíe a través de los Servicios.
11.4 Licencia de Contenido de usuario.
Al enviarnos Contenido de usuario, usted declara que dispone de todos los derechos necesarios sobre el Contenido de usuario y, por lo tanto, nos otorga una licencia perpetua, mundial, no exclusiva, sin regalías, sublicenciable y transferible para usar, reproducir, distribuir, preparar obras derivadas, modificar, mostrar y ejecutar la totalidad o parte del Contenido de usuario en relación con nuestro marketing y promociones, y para cualquier otro fin comercial legítimo relacionado con los Servicios. Podremos redistribuir parte o la totalidad de los trabajos derivados de su Contenido de usuario en cualquier formato y a través de cualquier canal que elijamos. Por el presente documento, también nos otorga a nosotros y a otros usuarios una licencia no exclusiva para usar, acceder, reproducir, distribuir, modificar y mostrar su Contenido de usuario a través de los Servicios. La sección 11.4 se aplicará en la máxima medida permitida por la legislación aplicable.
11.5 Restricciones al Contenido de usuario.
Usted acepta no usar, ni permitir que terceros utilicen, los Servicios para publicar o transmitir Contenido de usuario que: a) sea calumnioso o difamatorio, o revele asuntos privados o personales relativos a cualquier persona; b) sea indecente, obsceno, pornográfico, intimidatorio, amenazante, abusivo, incite al odio, ofensivo para una raza o etnia; que fomente una conducta que se consideraría un delito penal, daría lugar a responsabilidades civiles, que vulnere cualquier ley o sea inapropiado en general; c) infrinja los derechos de propiedad intelectual de terceros, incluido el uso no autorizado de textos, imágenes o programas con derechos de autor, secretos comerciales u otra información confidencial reservada, o marcas comerciales o marcas de servicio usadas de forma infractora; o d) interfiera injustificadamente con el uso de los Servicios por parte de otro usuario. Usted declara que publica Contenido de usuario en los Servicios voluntariamente; en consecuencia, publicar Contenido de usuario no crea una relación de empleador y empleado entre nosotros. No puede copiar ni usar direcciones de correo electrónico, números de teléfono móvil, saldos, nombres de usuario ni ninguna otra información personal sobre otros usuarios sin su permiso. Se prohíben los correos electrónicos, correo postal, llamadas telefónicas u otras comunicaciones no solicitadas a otros usuarios a través de los Servicios o en cualquier otro canal.
11.6 Reclamaciones y retiradas en virtud de la DMCA.
Si cree que su marca comercial o trabajo protegido por derechos de autor es objeto de infracción por nuestro Contenido o Contenido de usuario en los Servicios o se está publicando en general de manera que sugiera algún aval o afiliación con nosotros, envíenos un correo electrónico a legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com con el asunto “Reclamación de [Marca comercial/derecho de autor]”, según sea el caso. Para que su queja sea efectiva y podamos tomar medidas en virtud de la Ley sobre Derechos de Autor en el Milenio Digital (Digital Millennium Copyright Act, “DMCA”), debe cumplir con todos los requisitos de la DMCA e incluir en su correo electrónico la siguiente información:
identificación clara de la obra protegida por derechos de autor o marca que se alega que se ha infringido, incluido el número de registro de derechos de autor si la obra está registrada;
identificación del trabajo o marca que alega ser el origen de la infracción y que desea eliminar;
la URL u otra dirección clara que nos permita localizar el contenido presuntamente infractor;
su dirección de correo electrónico, dirección postal y número de teléfono; y
una declaración firmada de que usted cree, de buena fe, que el contenido tiene carácter infractor, que la información que proporciona es correcta y que usted es el propietario o está autorizado a representar al propietario del contenido.
También debe tener en cuenta que, en virtud del apartado 512(f) de la DMCA, cualquier persona que envíe a sabiendas avisos de infracción infundados puede ser responsable por daños y perjuicios, por lo que le rogamos no envíe ninguna alegación falsa. Podremos compartir con terceros, incluida la persona que cargó el material presuntamente infractor en el Servicio, cualquier información o correspondencia que usted nos proporcione.
Cuando recibimos un aviso de infracción presentado de buena fe, nuestra política es: a) eliminar o deshabilitar inmediatamente el acceso al contenido infractor; b) notificar a la persona que cargó el material infractor que hemos eliminado o deshabilitado el acceso al material; y c) para los
infractores reincidentes, rescindir el acceso de la persona a los Servicios. Si recibimos de dicha persona una notificación para argumentar en contra, podremos enviarle una copia de esta explicando que quizá restauremos el material eliminado o dejemos de deshabilitarlo dentro de 10 días hábiles. A menos que presente usted una acción para solicitar una orden judicial contra nosotros o contra la persona que cargó el contenido, restableceremos el acceso al material eliminado en un plazo de 10 a 14 días hábiles o más después de la recepción de la contranotificación, a nuestra discreción.
12. EXENCIÓN DE GARANTÍAS
12.1 Si usa los Servicios lo hace bajo su propio riesgo. Los Servicios, WLD, el contenido y toda la demás PI se ofrecen “TAL CUAL” y “SEGÚN DISPONIBILIDAD”, sin ninguna declaración ni garantía, ya sea expresa, implícita o al amparo de la legislación. En la máxima medida permitida por la legislación aplicable, denegamos específicamente toda garantía implícita de titularidad, comerciabilidad, idoneidad para un fin particular o ausencia de infracción en cuanto a las características, contenido u otra PI contenida en los Servicios. Algunas jurisdicciones no permiten la exclusión de garantías implícitas, por lo que es posible que las exclusiones anteriores no sean de aplicación en su caso. No avalamos, garantizamos ni asumimos la responsabilidad de ningún anuncio, oferta o declaración que hagan terceros, incluidos otros usuarios, en relación con los Servicios.
12.2 No declaramos ni garantizamos que: a) el acceso a la totalidad o parte de los Servicios sea continuo, ininterrumpido, pertinente, seguro o sin errores; b) que los Servicios o el contenido sean precisos, completos, fiables o actuales; c) que los Servicios no contengan virus ni otros componentes dañinos; ni d) que los Servicios o el contenido satisfagan sus requisitos, necesidades o expectativas.
12.3 Además, Worldcoin no declara ni garantiza la legalidad de los Servicios o WLD para ningún caso de uso, o que los Servicios o WLD cumplirán con cuestiones reglamentarias o de cumplimiento normativo. Usted es también responsable de determinar y cumplir con todas las restricciones y requisitos jurídicos y reglamentarios que puedan regir su uso de los Servicios o WLD. Excepto por las declaraciones expresas establecidas en estas Condiciones, por la presente reconoce y acepta que no se ha basado en ninguna otra declaración o entendimiento, ya sea escrito u oral, para acceder o usar los Servicios o WLD.
12.4 No actuamos ni podemos actuar como su asesor con respecto a ningún asunto financiero, jurídico, de inversión o fiscal. Todo contenido solo es actual en la fecha indicada. Cualquier proyección, estimación, previsión, objetivo u opinión expresados aquí está sujeto a riesgos, incertidumbres y suposiciones, por lo que pueden ser incorrectos y pueden cambiar sin previo aviso. No se debe confiar en ningún contenido.
Cierta información incluida aquí puede haberse obtenido de fuentes externas. Si bien dichas fuentes se consideran fiables, no hemos verificado de forma independiente toda esa información y no garantizamos su exactitud. No somos un corredor bursátil ni un asesor de inversiones registrado. No hacemos ninguna declaración, y renunciamos específicamente a todas las garantías, expresas, implícitas o legales, con respecto a la exactitud, pertinencia o integridad de cualquier material contenido en los Servicios. Nuestro contenido es meramente para información general, y usted es el único responsable de determinar si usa o no los Servicios. Usted reconoce que la compraventa, el uso y la tenencia de Tokens digitales conllevan un riesgo inherente. Es posible que pierda todos los fondos de su billetera. Usted reconoce que el Servicio puede estar sometido a restricciones de exportación y sanciones económicas impuestas por la legislación estadounidense.
12.5 No somos responsables ante usted ni ante ningún tercero por ninguna modificación o finalización de los Servicios, o suspensión o finalización de su acceso a los Servicios.
13. LIMITACIÓN DE RESPONSABILIDAD
13.1 No excluimos ni limitamos nuestra responsabilidad hacia usted cuando ello resulte ilegal. En los países en los que no se permiten los siguientes tipos de exclusiones, somos responsables ante usted solo por las pérdidas y daños que sean resultado previsible, dentro de lo razonable, de nuestra falta de atención y competencias razonables o de nuestro incumplimiento del contrato con usted. Este párrafo no afecta a los derechos del consumidor que un contrato o acuerdo pueda dispensar o limitar.
13.2 En la medida permitida por la legislación, usted acepta que bajo ninguna circunstancia, ni nosotros ni ninguno de nuestros directivos, consejeros, empleados, contratistas, agentes, afiliados o filiales (las “Partes de TFH”) serán responsables ante usted por ningún daño de carácter punitivo, secundario, especial, emergente o ejemplar, incluidos daños y perjuicios por lucro cesante, pérdida de fondo de comercio, de uso, de datos o de otros bienes intangibles, con independencia de si dicha responsabilidad se invoca sobre la base de un agravio o con otro fundamento, y de si las Partes de TFH han sido advertidas o no de la posibilidad de dichos daños derivados de o en relación con: a) su uso o imposibilidad de uso de los Servicios, sus Tokens digitales o la Red mundial; b) la inaccesibilidad o finalización de los Servicios; c) cualquier piratería informática, manipulación, acceso no autorizado o alteración de cualquier transacción o de sus Datos; d) cualquier transacción o acuerdo celebrado por usted con un tercero a través de los Servicios; e) cualquier actividad o comunicación de terceros; f) las acciones de los Operadores de Orb, g) cualquier pérdida del valor de Tokens
digitales; h) cualquier Contenido de terceros al que se acceda en los Servicios o a través de estos; i) errores, equivocaciones o imprecisiones en nuestro Contenido; j) lesiones personales o daños materiales de cualquier naturaleza resultantes de cualquier acceso o uso de los Servicios; k) virus, troyanos o similares que puedan transmitirse a los Servicios o a través de estos; o l) la conducta difamatoria, ofensiva o ilegal de terceros. Esta limitación de responsabilidad se aplicará tanto si los daños surgen del uso o uso indebido de TFH o de los Servicios, o a raíz de decisiones tomadas en base a ellos, sin perjuicio de haber malogrado la consecución del objeto esencial de cualquier recurso limitado y en la máxima medida permitida por la legislación aplicable.
13.3 Bajo ninguna circunstancia las Partes de TFH serán responsables ante usted por reclamaciones directas, procedimientos, responsabilidades, obligaciones, daños, pérdidas o costes por un importe superior a 100,00 USD. Si no está satisfecho con los Servicios, acepta que su único y exclusivo recurso será dejar de usarlos. Esta limitación de responsabilidad se aplicará en la máxima medida permitida por la legislación aplicable.
13.4 Indemnización y descargo de responsabilidad.
Usted acepta defender, indemnizar y eximir de responsabilidad a las Partes de TFH de y contra cualquier reclamación, daño, coste, obligación, honorarios razonables de abogados y gastos presentados contra una Parte de TFH por cualquier tercero, que surjan de, o estén relacionados con: a) su uso de los Servicios; b) su incumplimiento de estas Condiciones; c) su vulneración de cualquier derecho de otra persona; d) su conducta en relación con los Servicios; o e) su uso de WLD, cualquier Token digital o la red de Worldcoin. Algunas jurisdicciones limitan los descargos para consumidores, por lo que es posible que no le sean de aplicación ciertas o todas las disposiciones del descargo de responsabilidad de este párrafo. Si está obligado a indemnizar a alguna de las Partes de TFH, nos reservamos el derecho, a nuestra entera discreción, de controlar cualquier acción o procedimiento y determinar si se debe resolver de forma conciliatoria y en qué términos.
SI USTED ES RESIDENTE DE CALIFORNIA, renuncia a los beneficios y protecciones del Código Civil de California, apdo. 1542, que establece que: “[una] exención general no se extiende a las reclamaciones o alegaciones que el acreedor o la parte que exonera no conoce o sospecha que existen a su favor en el momento de formalizar la exención y que, de haberlas conocido, habrían afectado sustancialmente su acuerdo de conciliación con el deudor o la parte exonerada”.
14. Legislación aplicable
Se aplicarán las leyes del Estado de California a este Acuerdo y a cualquier disputa que surja esté relacionada con él. La legislación aplicable establecida en este apartado se aplicará sin tener en cuenta los principios de conflicto de leyes. Además, usted acepta que el Servicio se considerará ubicado únicamente en el Estado de California, y que aunque los Servicios pueden estar disponibles en otras jurisdicciones, su disponibilidad no da lugar a una competencia personal general o específica en ningún fuero al margen del Estado de California.
15. RESOLUCIÓN DE CONTROVERSIAS, ARBITRAJE Y RENUNCIA A DEMANDAS COLECTIVAS
15.1 LEA ATENTAMENTE LOS SIGUIENTES PÁRRAFOS. IMPONE LA OBLIGACIÓN DE QUE USTED RESUELVA SUS CONTROVERSIAS CON NOSOTROS MEDIANTE ARBITRAJE INDIVIDUAL ANTE UN ÚNICO ÁRBITRO, Y NO COMO PARTE DE UNA DEMANDA COLECTIVA. EL ARBITRAJE LE IMPIDE DEMANDARNOS ANTE UN TRIBUNAL JUDICIAL O MEDIANTE UN JUICIO CON JURADO, AUNQUE SÍ PUEDE PRESENTAR UN RECURSO CONTRA NOSOTROS EN UN JUZGADO DE PAZ, SI CUMPLE LAS CONDICIONES EXIGIDAS.
15.2 Haremos todo lo posible por resolver cualquier posible controversia mediante negociaciones informales de buena fe. Si surge una posible controversia, debe ponerse en contacto con nosotros con un correo electrónico a legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com para que podamos intentar resolverla sin recurrir a la resolución formal de controversia. Si no podemos llegar a una resolución informal en un plazo de 60 días desde su correo electrónico, y usted elige presentar una demanda al amparo de la legislación federal o estatal, una reclamación de derecho consuetudinario, una reclamación contractual, extracontractual, por fraude, tergiversación o cualquier otra teoría del Derecho, o cualquier otro procedimiento formal que surja de estas Condiciones, el Contenido, o los Servicios o esté relacionado con estos (cada uno, una “Controversia”), entonces acepta resolver la Controversia mediante arbitraje vinculante, de forma individual y de acuerdo con los siguientes términos (colectivamente, el “Acuerdo de arbitraje”):
El arbitraje se llevará a cabo de forma confidencial, por un único árbitro. El árbitro aplicará los plazos de prescripción correspondientes y toda la legislación aplicable y cumplirá las alegaciones de privilegio que reconozca el Derecho aplicable.
La Controversia se resolverá con carácter único y definitivo mediante arbitraje administrado por JAMS de acuerdo con las Reglas de Arbitraje Simplificadas de JAMS, a menos que la cantidad agregada de la Controversia sea de 250 000 USD o más, en cuyo caso se aplicarán las Reglas de Arbitraje Integrales de JAMS. El arbitraje tendrá lugar en San Francisco, California, a menos que usted y nosotros acordemos otro lugar. Usted acepta que los tribunales federales y estatales de San Francisco, California, son el foro adecuado para cualquier apelación de un laudo arbitral o para procedimientos judiciales en caso de que se determine como inaplicable la cláusula de arbitraje vinculante de este Acuerdo.
En cualquier arbitraje, independientemente de su ubicación, las partes no solicitarán la presentación y divulgación de pruebas entre sí, y el árbitro no permitirá que las partes participen en la presentación de pruebas; en su lugar, cada parte divulgará las pruebas que avalan sus posiciones en una fecha y hora mutuamente acordadas antes de la audiencia de arbitraje final.
Este Acuerdo de arbitraje cubre la aplicabilidad, revocabilidad, alcance y validez del Acuerdo de arbitraje o cualquier parte del Acuerdo de arbitraje, así como todas las demás Controversias que surjan de la interpretación o aplicabilidad del Acuerdo de arbitraje o estén relacionadas con estas; y todos estos asuntos serán decididos por el árbitro y no por un tribunal o juez.
Si el árbitro o el administrador arbitral le imponen tasas judiciales u otros costes administrativos, se lo reembolsaremos, previa solicitud, en la medida en que dichas tasas o costes excedan los que de otro modo tendría que pagar si en lugar de ello estuviera en un tribunal judicial. También pagaremos otras tasas o costes si así lo exige la normativa del administrador arbitral o la legislación aplicable.
A petición de cualquiera de las partes, todos los procedimientos de arbitraje se llevarán a cabo en el máximo secreto y, en tal caso, todos los documentos, testimonios y registros se recibirán, oirán y conservarán a manos del árbitro en secreto y precintados, disponibles para su inspección solo por las partes, sus respectivos abogados y sus respectivos peritos, consultores o testigos que hayan acordado, por adelantado y por escrito, recibir toda la información de manera confidencial para ser usada únicamente para el arbitraje.
Aparte de los procedimientos y recursos colectivos abordados en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, el árbitro tiene la autoridad de adjudicar cualquier recurso que de otro modo estaría disponible en un tribunal judicial.
La resolución del laudo dictado por el árbitro puede presentarse ante cualquier tribunal de jurisdicción competente.
Si se determina como inaplicable el requisito de arbitraje o la prohibición de demandas colectivas y demás Controversias presentadas en nombre de terceros contenidos en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, solo se considerarán suprimidas de estas Condiciones las disposiciones inaplicables, continuando todas las obligaciones restantes de las presentes Condiciones en plena vigencia y efecto.
15.3 Derecho de exclusión de 30 días.
Usted tiene derecho de exclusión y no quedar obligado por este Acuerdo de arbitraje si envía un correo electrónico desde la dirección que usó para configurar su solicitud, a legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com con el siguiente asunto: EXCLUSIÓN VOLUNTARIA DE ARBITRAJE Y RENUNCIA A DEMANDAS COLECTIVAS. Debe enviar su correo electrónico en un plazo de 30 días desde la aceptación de estas Condiciones; de lo contrario, estará obligado a arbitrar las Controversias de acuerdo con los términos de este Acuerdo de arbitraje. Si opta por no participar en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, tampoco estaremos obligados por el Acuerdo de arbitraje.
15.4 Cambios en este Acuerdo de arbitraje.
Le notificaremos mediante aviso con 30 días de antelación todo cambio en el apartado de estas Condiciones titulada “
Resolución de controversias, arbitraje y renuncia a demanda colectiva”
y los cambios entrarán en vigor 30 días después de que usted reciba nuestra notificación. De otro modo, los cambios en la sección
Resolución de controversias, arbitraje y renuncia a demandas colectivas
se aplicarán de forma prospectiva y solo a las controversias que surjan después del día 30 del plazo. Si un tribunal o árbitro decide que los cambios en este apartado no son exigibles o válidos, se suprimirán los cambios de estas Condiciones y el tribunal o árbitro aplicará los términos del primer Acuerdo de arbitraje en vigor después de que usted haya comenzado a usar los Servicios. Puede también ejercer su derecho a excluirse de los nuevos términos del Acuerdo de arbitraje mediante los procedimientos establecidos en el apartado anterior titulado “Derecho de exclusión de 30 días”.
El presente Acuerdo de arbitraje seguirá vigente tras la rescisión de estas Condiciones y su uso de los Servicios.
Sin perjuicio de cualquier disposición en contrario en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, cualquiera de las partes puede presentar una demanda únicamente con vistas a medidas cautelares para detener el uso no autorizado o el abuso de los Servicios, o la infracción de derechos de propiedad intelectual (por ejemplo, marca comercial, secreto comercial,
derechos de autor o derechos de patente), sin participar primero en el arbitraje o en el proceso informal de resolución de controversias descrito anteriormente.
16. Disposiciones generales
16.1 No renuncia; Divisibilidad; No susceptible de cesión.
El hecho de que no exijamos el cumplimiento de una disposición no constituye una renuncia a nuestro derecho a exigirlo más adelante. Si una disposición se considera inaplicable, las disposiciones restantes de estas Condiciones permanecerán en plena vigencia y se sustituirá por una condición exigible que refleje nuestra intención inicial lo más fielmente posible, en la medida permitida por la legislación aplicable. Usted no puede ceder ninguno de sus derechos incluidos en estas Condiciones, y todo intento al respecto resultará nulo y carente de efecto. Podemos ceder sus derechos a cualquiera de sus [sic: nuestras] subsidiarias o empresas afiliadas, o a cualquier sucesor en beneficio de cualquier negocio asociado con los Servicios.
16.2 Acuerdo íntegro.
Estas Condiciones constituyen la declaración completa y exclusiva del acuerdo entre usted y nosotros con respecto a los Servicios y sustituyen a todos los entendimientos, acuerdos, declaraciones y garantías anteriores y contemporáneos, tanto escritos como orales, relativos a los Servicios. Los encabezados de las secciones de estas Condiciones tienen mero efecto orientativo y no regirán el significado o la interpretación de ninguna disposición.
16.3 Perduración de vigencia.
Todas las disposiciones de estas Condiciones relativas a la suspensión o rescisión, deudas adeudadas a TFH, uso general de los Servicios, Controversias con TFH, así como las disposiciones que, por su naturaleza, se extiendan más allá del vencimiento o rescisión de estas Condiciones, continuarán tras la rescisión o vencimiento de estas.
16.4 Relación de las Partes.
Nada de lo contenido en estas Condiciones constituirá la base, ni se considerará o pretende considerarse como la base, de una relación entre usted y TFH en calidad de socios, empresas conjuntas o como socios conjuntos en general con fines de lucro, y ni usted ni TFH serán tratados como agente del otro. Esto incluye el hecho de que nada de lo contenido en estas Condiciones establece ni pretende establecer una relación laboral entre usted y TFH.
16.5 Sin asesoramiento profesional ni obligaciones fiduciarias.
Todo el Contenido que proporcionamos tiene fines informativos únicamente y no debe interpretarse como asesoramiento profesional. No debe tomar, ni abstenerse de tomar, ninguna medida basada en información contenida en los Servicios. Antes de tomar cualquier decisión financiera, jurídica o de otro tipo que implique los Servicios o cualquier Token digital, debe buscar asesoramiento profesional independiente de una persona con licencia y cualificación en el área para la que dicho asesoramiento sería adecuado. Estas Condiciones no pretenden crear ni imponernos obligaciones fiduciarias. En la máxima medida permitida por la Ley, usted reconoce y acepta que no tenemos obligaciones ni responsabilidades fiduciarias hacia usted ni ninguna otra parte y que, en la medida en que dichas obligaciones o responsabilidades puedan existir conforme a derecho o equidad, por el presente documento se renuncia, se dispensan y se eliminan dichas obligaciones y responsabilidades. Además, acepta que los únicos deberes y obligaciones que le debemos son los establecidos expresamente en estas Condiciones.
16.6 Cambio de control.
En caso de que seamos objeto de una adquisición o fusión con una entidad externa, o cedamos de otro modo ciertas funciones a una entidad afiliada o sucesora u otra entidad que determinemos en el mejor interés de los Usuarios, nos reservamos el derecho, en cualquiera de estas circunstancias, de transferir o ceder los Datos que hayamos recopilado sobre usted como parte de dicha fusión, adquisición, venta u otro cambio de control, de conformidad con la legislación aplicable.
16.7 Fuerza mayor.
No seremos responsables de retrasos, fallos de rendimiento o interrupción del servicio que resulte directa o indirectamente de una volatilidad significativa del mercado en Tokens digitales, de cualquier acto fortuito, actos de autoridades civiles o militares, actos de terroristas, disturbios civiles, guerra, huelga, emergencia sanitaria, conflicto laboral, incendios, interrupción de servicios de telecomunicaciones o de Internet o servicios de proveedores de red, fallos del equipo o software, o cualquier causa o condición ajena a nuestro control razonable (cada uno, un “Suceso de fuerza mayor”). La ocurrencia de un Suceso de fuerza mayor no afectará a la validez y aplicabilidad de ninguna de las disposiciones restantes de estas Condiciones.
16.8 Tiendas de aplicaciones.
Cuando descargue nuestras Aplicaciones desde cualquier tienda de aplicaciones o plataforma de distribución que no sea App Store de Apple, incluida Google Play Store (la “Plataforma de distribución”), usted acepta que:
las Condiciones se establecen entre usted y nosotros, y no con el proveedor de la Plataforma de distribución (“Proveedor de la tienda”); su uso de las Aplicaciones debe cumplir con los Términos de servicio de la Plataforma de distribución del Proveedor de la tienda vigentes en ese momento; el Proveedor de la tienda es solo un proveedor de la Plataforma de distribución donde usted obtuvo las Aplicaciones;
Nosotros, y no el Proveedor de la tienda, somos los únicos responsables de las Aplicaciones;
el Proveedor de la tienda no tiene obligación ni es responsable para con usted con respecto a las Aplicaciones o las Condiciones; y
usted reconoce y acepta que el Proveedor de la tienda es un tercero beneficiario de las Condiciones en lo referente a las Aplicaciones.
16.9 App Store de Apple.
Esta sección se aplica cuando las Aplicaciones se han adquirido en la App Store de Apple. Usted reconoce y acepta que las Condiciones son únicamente entre usted y nosotros, no Apple, Inc. (“Apple”) y que Apple no es responsable de las Aplicaciones ni su contenido. Su uso de las Aplicaciones debe cumplir con las Condiciones de servicio de la App Store.
Usted reconoce que Apple no tiene ninguna obligación de proporcionar ningún servicio de mantenimiento o asistencia con respecto a las Aplicaciones. En caso de que las Aplicaciones no cumplan con alguna garantía aplicable, puede informar a Apple, y (cuando proceda) Apple le reembolsará el precio de compra de las Aplicaciones; en la máxima medida permitida por la legislación aplicable, Apple no tendrá ninguna otra obligación de garantía con respecto a las Aplicaciones, y cualquier otra reclamación, pérdidas, obligaciones, daños y perjuicios, costes o gastos atribuibles a un incumplimiento de cualquier garantía se regirán únicamente por las Condiciones y por cualquier ley que nos sea de aplicación como proveedor de las Aplicaciones.
Usted reconoce que Apple no es responsable de ocuparse de ninguna reclamación suya ni de ningún tercero relacionada con las Aplicaciones o con su posesión o uso de las Aplicaciones, lo que incluye, con carácter meramente enunciativo: i) reclamaciones de responsabilidad por producto; ii) cualquier alegación de que las Aplicaciones no cumplen con algún requisito jurídico o normativo que le corresponda; y iii) reclamaciones que surjan en virtud de la legislación de protección al consumidor o similar; y todas estas reclamaciones se rigen únicamente por las Condiciones y por cualquier ley que nos sea de aplicación como proveedor del software.
Usted reconoce que, en caso de una alegación de terceros de que la Aplicación, o su posesión o uso de dicha Aplicación, infringe los derechos de propiedad intelectual de dicho tercero, TFH, no Apple, será el único responsable de la investigación, defensa, resolución y descargo de cualquier reclamación por infracción de propiedad intelectual en la medida en que lo exijan las Condiciones.
Usted declara y garantiza que i) no se encuentra en un país sujeto a embargo por parte del Gobierno de los EE. UU., o que ha sido designado por el Gobierno de los EE. UU. como país de “apoyo al terrorismo”; y ii) no está incluido en ninguna lista del Gobierno de los EE. UU. de partes prohibidas o restringidas.
Usted y TFH reconocen y aceptan que Apple, y las subsidiarias de Apple, son terceros beneficiarios de las Condiciones de servicio en relación con su licencia de la Aplicación, y que, tras su aceptación de los términos y condiciones de las Condiciones de servicio, Apple tendrá derecho (y se considerará que ha aceptado el derecho) de exigir el cumplimiento de las Condiciones de servicio en relación con su licencia de la Aplicación ante usted en calidad de tercero beneficiario de la misma.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Términos y condiciones para el usuario de Tools for Humanity
¡Bienvenido a World App! Estos Términos entre usted y Tools for Humanity Corporation, sociedad constituida en Delaware (“TFH”, “nosotros” o “nos”) regirán el uso y el acceso que usted haga con respecto a los sitios web y las aplicaciones, lo que incluye la World App y la App Operador (en forma conjunta, las “Aplicaciones”), y a toda funcionalidad, todo contenido y todo servicio asociados que le proporcionemos (en forma conjunta, los “Servicios” o “Nuestros servicios”) en relación con World Network (“World Network”) y el ecosistema.
Lea estos Términos detenidamente antes de utilizar los Servicios o acceder a ellos. Al acceder a cualquiera de los Servicios que prestamos o utilizarlos, junto con el consentimiento explícito a estos Términos, usted acepta expresamente quedar obligado por estos Términos y por nuestro Aviso de privacidad, que se incorpora a los presentes Términos. Preste atención a las siguientes partes de especial importancia de estos Términos:
Usted acepta resolver cualquier disputa entre usted y TFH por medio de un proceso de arbitraje vinculante, en lugar de ante un tribunal. Si reside en Corea del Sur, puede optar por resolver la disputa en un tribunal local competente. Lea la sección 15 más adelante para obtener detalles.
Los productos de criptomonedas, incluidos los Tokens digitales, carecen en gran medida de reglamentación y pueden presentar altos riesgos. Es posible que no exista ningún recurso regulador ante las pérdidas que surjan de dichas transacciones.
Ninguna parte de los Servicios constituirá una oferta de venta ni la promoción de una oferta de compra de valores o Tokens digitales. Los Servicios no constituirán asesoramiento de inversión. Es posible que en su lugar de residencia no se permita la tenencia, compra o venta de Tokens digitales (según se define en la sección 2.1 más adelante), y será su responsabilidad cumplir con todas las leyes aplicables. Considere si la compra, la venta, el uso o la tenencia de Tokens digitales es adecuada para usted, en función de su situación financiera y de su entendimiento de los Tokens digitales. Los Tokens digitales podrán cambiar rápidamente de valor o perder su valor por completo.
Además, los tokens de Worldcoin (“WLD”) no están destinados a estar disponibles para el uso, la compra o el acceso por parte de personas estadounidenses, lo que incluye a los ciudadanos estadounidenses, a los residentes de los Estados Unidos o a las personas que estén en los Estados Unidos, o compañías constituidas, ubicadas o residentes en los Estados Unidos, o que tengan un agente registrado en los Estados Unidos. No ponemos WLD a disposición de dichas personas en los Estados Unidos. Además, usted acepta que no venderá, transferirá WLD a personas estadounidenses ni lo pondrá a disposición de dichas personas. Puede encontrar más información sobre los riesgos asociados con WLD aquí.
1.
Alcance de los Términos
1.1 La privacidad y sus datos
. Al acceder a las Aplicaciones, es posible que nos proporcione categorías de información personal, como su nombre o número de teléfono. Si proporciona información para establecer su proof-of-personhood (prueba de individualidad) y para canjear sus tokens WLD, es posible que brinde categorías especiales de datos personales sensibles, como su información biométrica. En nuestro Aviso de privacidad se detallan los datos que usted nos proporciona que nosotros recopilamos y cómo los utilizamos. No utilice los Servicios si no desea que recopilemos o utilicemos sus datos de la manera detallada en el Aviso de privacidad.
1.2 Elegibilidad.
Es posible acceder a las páginas web que detallan nuestros servicios desde cualquier parte del mundo, pero esto no significa que todos los Servicios o las funciones del servicio sean legales o estén disponibles en el país donde reside. Usted no podrá usar una red privada virtual (Virtual Private Network, VPN) ni herramientas similares con el fin de eludir alguna restricción. Será su responsabilidad asegurarse de que el uso que hace de nuestros Servicios sea legal donde los utiliza. Nuestros servicios no están disponibles en todos los idiomas. Nuestros servicios son legales donde los utiliza. Nuestros servicios no estarán disponibles en todos los idiomas. Para utilizar los Servicios, deberá cumplir con estos Términos y con todas las leyes aplicables. Usted no podrá utilizar Nuestros Servicios para realizar, promover o ayudar a otros a llevar a cabo ninguna actividad ilegal o indebida.
Además, deberá cumplir con todos los criterios que se disponen a continuación:
tener 18 años o más; y
no
encontrarse en, no estar bajo el control de, no ser ciudadano de, ni ser residente de: Siria, la región ucraniana de Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson y Zaporizhzhia, Rusia, Corea del Norte, Irán, Cuba ni en ningún otro país o región a los cuales Estados Unidos, la Unión Europea o cualquier otro país o jurisdicción hayan restringido el acceso a los Servicios.
no ser declarado “nacional especialmente designado” por la Oficina de Control de Activos Extranjeros (Office of Foreign Assets Control, “OFAC”) del Departamento del Tesoro de los EE. UU. o las listas de sanciones de cualquier otro país, y que su nombre no se encuentre en la Lista de Personas Denegadas del Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. ni en las listas de personas prohibidas de ningún otro país.
Si no cumple con todos estos requisitos, no tiene permitido acceder o usar los Servicios y, en consecuencia, podemos restringir su capacidad para acceder a los Servicios o usarlos.
Asimismo, si usted está establecido o ubicado en Alemania o tiene su lugar de residencia habitual o sede social allí, no puede acceder a los servicios de terceros contemplados en el significado de la sección 2.5 ni a las aplicaciones descentralizadas contempladas en el significado de la sección 2.8, ni utilizar dichos servicios y aplicaciones. Estas funciones no están disponibles para usted.
1.3 Disponibilidad
. Es posible acceder a las páginas web que detallan los Servicios desde cualquier parte del mundo, pero esto no significa que todos los Servicios o las funciones del servicio sean legales o estén disponibles en el país donde reside. Podremos bloquear, tanto nosotros como los gobiernos, el acceso a determinados Servicios (o a determinadas características del Servicio) en ciertos países. Usted no podrá usar una red privada virtual (Virtual Private Network, VPN) ni herramientas similares con el fin de eludir alguna restricción. Es posible que el acceso a las Aplicaciones y ciertas funciones dentro de las Aplicaciones no esté disponible o esté restringido, según su ubicación.
Será su responsabilidad asegurarse de que el uso que hace de los Servicios sea legal donde los utiliza
. Los Servicios no estarán disponibles en todos los idiomas.
1.4 Actualizaciones
. Podemos realizar cambios en estos Términos oportunamente. Si lo hacemos, pondremos a disposición los términos actualizados en los Servicios y, cuando lo exija la legislación vigente, lo notificaremos antes de realizar cualquier cambio y, cuando dichos cambios puedan ser especialmente importantes o desventajosos para usted, le proporcionaremos un aviso previo adicional si lo exige la legislación vigente. Usted comprende y acepta que, si continúa utilizando los Servicios después de que hayamos realizado dichos cambios y cuando no haya objetado específicamente dichos cambios, usted acepta los Términos actualizados. Si no acepta estos Términos, puede dejar de usar los Servicios en cualquier momento. Debido a que los Servicios evolucionan con el tiempo, podemos cambiar o interrumpir la totalidad o parte de los Servicios, en cualquier momento y sin previo aviso, a nuestra entera discreción, en la medida permitida por la legislación vigente.
1.5 Términos adicionales.
Se podrán aplicar términos y condiciones adicionales a aplicaciones, contenidos, características o partes de los Servicios específicos, y todos esos términos y condiciones adicionales que le proporcionemos formarán parte de estos Términos.
2. Servicios
2.1 Billetera sin custodia.
World App incluye una billetera no alojada y sin custodia para la tenencia de criptomonedas compatibles, monedas digitales o Tokens digitales (incluidos WLD y, en forma conjunta, los “Tokens digitales”). Usted controla los Tokens digitales que se guardan en su billetera. Con World App, las claves privadas (que representan la contraseña para acceder a los Tokens digitales) se almacenan directamente en su dispositivo. En cualquier momento, sujeto a tener acceso a Internet y la congestión en la blockchain, podrá retirar sus Tokens digitales, mediante el envío a una dirección de blockchain diferente. Cuando tiene sus Tokens digitales en su billetera, no tenemos control sobre su billetera, sus Tokens digitales o sus claves privadas. Los usuarios son responsables del riesgo de pérdida de sus claves privadas, y ni TFH ni World App pueden recuperar dichas claves.
Dado que World App es una billetera sin custodia, se le dará una dirección de billetera que especifica dónde se guardan sus Tokens digitales en la blockchain correspondiente. No podemos acceder a sus Tokens digitales.
2.2 Tokens digitales compatibles.
World App es compatible con ciertos tokens ERC-20. Es posible que se añada compatibilidad para otros Tokens digitales en el futuro. World App muestra Tokens digitales compatibles.
Asegúrese de verificar qué tokens y redes son compatibles con World App antes de depositar o retirar sus Tokens digitales. No podemos recuperar sus Tokens digitales si envía tokens no compatibles o Tokens digitales a una dirección de billetera incorrecta.
Usted entiende que enviar Tokens digitales no compatibles a una dirección de la billetera de World App puede significar que pierda por completo el acceso a esos Tokens digitales. No tenemos forma de recuperar Tokens digitales. Asegúrese de enviar los Tokens digitales correctos a la dirección de billetera correcta en todo momento. Es posible que desee probar una transacción con una pequeña cantidad de tokens digitales.
2.3 Ofertas y acceso.
Cuando interactúe con sus Tokens digitales (por ejemplo, al enviarlos a otra dirección de la billetera o al conectarse a una aplicación distribuida) utilizando los Servicios, se le pedirá que apruebe o “firme” la interacción a través de los dispositivos que haya identificado durante el proceso de inducción. Las Aplicaciones se basan completamente en las aprobaciones de estos dispositivos para iniciar interacciones con la blockchain correspondiente. Usted comprende que está interactuando directamente con la blockchain correspondiente cuando realiza estas interacciones y que no somos responsables de transmitir órdenes en su nombre.
2.4 Información sobre terceros.
Al utilizar los Servicios, puede tener acceso a información relacionada con sus Tokens digitales, como su valor de mercado actual, entre otros. La presentación de esta información no implica ninguna asociación ni aval de terceros, incluso aunque ciertas funcionalidades proporcionadas en relación con los Servicios requieran el uso de dichos productos de terceros. El contenido de dichos servicios y productos de terceros, según lo establecido a través de los Servicios, se basa en información disponible al público o que nos proporcionan dichos terceros, y, por lo tanto, no realizamos declaraciones vinculantes ni garantías sobre la precisión de dicho servicio de terceros o información relacionada con el producto.
2.5 Servicios de terceros
Los usuarios establecidos o ubicados en Alemania o que tengan su lugar de residencia habitual o sede social allí no pueden utilizar los Servicios de terceros para vender o intercambiar sus Tokens digitales en virtud de esta sección.
Donde estuvieran disponibles, los Servicios pueden proporcionarle enlaces a procesadores externos para procesar transacciones, como compras fiduciarias de Tokens digitales, venta de Tokens digitales, intercambio de Tokens digitales y otras funcionalidades que puedan estar disponibles en el futuro. Puede ver qué servicios de terceros están disponibles dentro de World App. Cuando realiza estas transacciones, realiza transacciones con terceros y no con nosotros. Debe seguir las instrucciones pertinentes proporcionadas por el proveedor externo y aceptar sus términos de servicio. No tomamos el control de sus fondos o Tokens digitales ni los transmitimos en ningún momento durante la prestación de nuestros Servicios, o cuando usted accede a servicios de terceros.
2.6 Transacciones entre pares.
Los Servicios proporcionan una plataforma de comunicaciones a través de la cual usted puede enviar o solicitar, recibir y almacenar Tokens digitales compatibles de otras billeteras de blockchain, ya sea controladas por usted o por terceros. Las transferencias que haga de Tokens digitales compatibles entre sus otras billeteras de blockchain, así como las transferencias destinadas a terceros y provenientes de terceros, son transferencias. La parte que inicia la transferencia es el único responsable de ejecutar la transacción correctamente, lo que puede incluir, entre otras cosas, el pago de suficientes comisiones de minería o cargos de red para que la transacción sea exitosa. Los cargos de red insuficientes pueden hacer que una transferencia permanezca en estado pendiente y pueden dar lugar a demoras o pérdidas incurridas como resultado de un error en el inicio de la transacción. No tenemos obligación de ayudar en la corrección de dichas transacciones. Cuando envía cualquier Token digital de su billetera a otra billetera de blockchain, dichas transferencias son ejecutadas en cadena por usted y no dependen de nosotros. Debe verificar toda la información de la transacción antes de enviarla. No asumimos ninguna responsabilidad en caso de que ingrese una dirección de destino de blockchain incorrecta. Las transferencias de Tokens digitales no pueden revertirse una vez que se han transmitido a la red de blockchain correspondiente, aunque puedan estar en estado pendiente y designadas en consecuencia, mientras los operadores de red procesan la transacción. Nosotros no controlamos la red y no garantizamos que la red confirmará una transferencia.
2.7 Bóveda
2.7.1 Información general
. World App proporciona la interface del usuario para una “bóveda” descentralizada para sus Tokens digitales (“Bóveda”). Su uso de la Bóveda constituye su reconocimiento y aceptación de los términos que rigen la Bóveda, así como cualquier término adicional proporcionado por terceros que hayan desarrollado o proporcionen características relacionadas o derivadas de su uso de la Bóveda.
La Bóveda solo es compatible con ciertos Tokens digitales. Estos Tokens digitales no se califican como Tokens Referenciados a Activos o Tokens de Dinero Electrónico, en los términos establecidos por el Reglamento (UE) 2023/1114 del Parlamento Europeo y del Consejo del 31 de mayo de 2023, relativo a los mercados de criptoactivos. Los Tokens digitales compatibles se mostrarán en World App cuando acceda a su Bóveda. Los Tokens digitales compatibles con la Bóveda pueden cambiar de tanto en tanto, y no hay garantía de que los Tokens digitales compatibles seguirán estando disponibles para su uso en la Bóveda.
La Bóveda se proporciona en relación con contratos inteligentes de terceros. Ninguna otra persona o entidad, aparte de usted, tiene la capacidad de interactuar con su Bóveda o los Tokens digitales dentro de su Bóveda. Ni TFH ni ningún tercero tiene claves administrativas o acceso (privilegiado o de otro tipo) a su Bóveda o a los contratos inteligentes asociados. Un depósito o retiro de la Bóveda de cualquier Token digital para su cuenta solo puede ocurrir si dicha operación se firma con sus correspondientes claves privadas descritas en la Sección 2.1 de estos Términos. Esto significa que si pierde el acceso o el control de sus claves privadas, no podrá realizar ningún depósito o retiro de Tokens digitales de la Bóveda y ninguna otra parte podrá ayudarle o hacerlo en su nombre. En consecuencia, el uso de la Bóveda no le proporciona, ni puede proporcionarle, ningún servicio de custodia, fianza o transferencia por parte de TFH o cualquier otro tercero con respecto a cualquier Token digital que pueda bloquear utilizando la Bóveda en su cuenta.
El contrato inteligente que rige las funciones de la Bóveda para los tokens WLD puede verse utilizando la blockchain aquí. Para mayor claridad, el uso de estas funciones y de cualquier otra relacionada con la Bóveda está sujeto a la misma Exención de Garantías incluida en la Sección 12 de estos Términos.
2.7.2 Funciones de la Bóveda
. La Bóveda ofrece actualmente las siguientes funciones, que pueden ser modificadas, eliminadas o añadidas por TFH o terceros: bloqueo, rendimiento, retiro y período de garantía, concesiones a la bóveda.
2.7.3 Bloqueo
. Al utilizar la Bóveda, usted acepta bloquear sus Tokens digitales durante un período determinado. El bloqueo de Tokens digitales utilizando su Bóveda transferirá los Tokens digitales desde su billetera no custodiada a un contrato inteligente descentralizado. Tras la transferencia, estos Tokens digitales quedarán “bloqueados” en la Bóveda, lo que incluye el período durante el cual permanecen depositados en la Bóveda, así como una duración predeterminada denominada “Período de Garantía”, que se describe con más detalle a continuación. Mientras sus Tokens digitales estén bloqueados, no podrá acceder a ellos, transferirlos ni realizar ninguna otra transacción con ellas hasta que haya solicitado retirarlos y haya dejado transcurrir el Período de Garantía aplicable. Nadie, incluidos TFH o el Proveedor externo, tendrá la capacidad de desbloquear, custodiar, controlar, retirar o transferir sus Tokens digitales bloqueados. Colocar sus Tokens digitales en la Bóveda y someterlos a las restricciones de bloqueo y retiro no constituirá una venta, préstamo o transferencia de ningún derecho, título o interés sobre los Tokens digitales a TFH o a otro tercero.
El bloqueo de sus Tokens digitales en la Bóveda no garantiza la salvaguarda o custodia de sus Tokens digitales. No se aplica a sus Tokens digitales ningún plan de seguro de depósito, ni ninguna salvaguarda similar, y el valor o la utilidad de cualquiera de los Tokens digitales que haya bloqueado podrá aumentar o disminuir durante el Período de Garantía. Esto significa que el valor o la utilidad de los Tokens digitales que haya bloqueado en su Bóveda podrá disminuir, o llegar a cero durante el Período de Garantía. Usted reconoce y acepta que cualquier retiro de Tokens digitales de su cuenta después del Período de Garantía aplicable podrá dar lugar a la devolución de Tokens digitales que tengan un valor inferior, o ningún valor, al que tenían en el momento en que los bloqueó en su Bóveda, y que TFH ni ningún tercero asume el riesgo o la responsabilidad de alguna disminución en el valor que se produzca.
2.7.4 Rendimiento
. Usted también podrá optar por generar lo que, a efectos de este producto, se denomina “rendimiento” sobre determinados Tokens digitales de su Bóveda. Este rendimiento, que puede adoptar la forma de Tokens digitales adicionales, es proporcionado por un tercero a través de una serie independiente de operaciones de contratos inteligentes a los que puede acceder utilizando la interfaz proporcionada dentro de World App. Ni TFH ni ningún tercero utiliza, asume el control, recibe crédito alguno o dispone de otro modo de sus Tokens digitales. Como tal, el rendimiento no es un interés vinculado o generado por otra cosa que no sea el bloqueo de sus Tokens digitales de acuerdo con los términos y especificaciones proporcionados. Cualquier rendimiento que pueda recibir se le proporciona como una concesión por parte del tercero basada en sus decisiones de almacenar Tokens digitales utilizando la Bóveda. Las especificaciones que determinan la generación del rendimiento, incluida la cantidad generada o el tiempo durante el que puede acumularse, podrán modificarse o cancelarse en cualquier momento, a discreción del Proveedor externo.
Es posible que exista una cantidad máxima de rendimiento que pueda obtener. Estos detalles se mostrarán junto a su Bóveda y a través de cualquier término adicional proporcionado por el tercero (identificado como el “Proveedor” dentro de la World App) que proporciona el rendimiento. Estos términos adicionales también se incorporan a estos Términos. El rendimiento no es proporcionado ni atendido por TFH.
El rendimiento acumulado solo le será distribuido al completar el retiro de los Tokens digitales que generaron rendimiento de la Bóveda, lo que ocurre solo después de que expire cualquier Período de Garantía aplicable. El retiro es la condición final de cualquier concesión de rendimiento, lo que significa que usted no tendrá ningún derecho, título o interés sobre ningún rendimiento que se haya generado o se vaya a generar a menos y hasta el momento en que el rendimiento se haya recibido en su billetera no custodiada. Esto también significa que si pierde el acceso o el control de sus claves privadas, no podrá realizar ningún retiro que le dé derecho a recibir rendimiento.
2.7.5 Retiros y Período de Garantía
. Puede iniciar el retiro de sus Tokens digitales de su Bóveda en cualquier momento. Los Tokens digitales que haya solicitado retirar de su Bóveda le serán devueltos una vez transcurrido un período preestablecido denominado “Período de Garantía”. Cada vez que inicie un retiro de Tokens digitales de la Bóveda, se iniciará un nuevo Período de Garantía y comenzará la cuenta regresiva del tiempo que transcurrirá hasta que se le devuelvan los Tokens digitales. Durante este tiempo, los Tokens digitales que haya seleccionado para retirar permanecerán bloqueados, y también podrá cancelar su retiro. Una vez transcurrido el Período de Garantía, su retiro se habrá completado y los Tokens digitales, junto con cualquier rendimiento generado que se haya acumulado, se enviarán a su billetera. La duración del Período de Garantía se indicará dentro de World App cuando acceda a su Bóveda.
2.7.6 Concesiones a la Bóveda.
Esta función, una vez seleccionada, le permite enviar automáticamente las Concesiones WLD directamente a la Bóveda de su cuenta en lugar de a su billetera. Usted podrá cambiar esta configuración en cualquier momento.
2.7.7 TFH y la Bóveda.
El acceso a esta función se realiza a través de World App. Sin embargo, TFH solo podrá leer los datos relacionados y mostrárselos. TFH no podrá transferir, retirar o depositar ninguno de sus Tokens digitales y no tendrá ningún acceso a su Bóveda.
2.8 Aplicaciones descentralizadas
Esta sección no se aplica a usuarios establecidos o ubicados en Alemania o que tengan su lugar de residencia habitual o sede social allí:
Donde estuviera disponible,
podríamos tener una funcionalidad que le permita conectar su billetera a diversas aplicaciones descentralizadas. Usted es el único responsable de garantizar la seguridad de estas aplicaciones de terceros. No tenemos control sobre las aplicaciones de terceros y no podemos proporcionar soporte técnico para los problemas que encuentre al conectarse con aplicaciones de terceros.
2.9 Soporte al usuario
. Proporcionamos soporte al usuario para ayudar con ciertas características y funciones en relación con los Servicios. Para ponerse en contacto, seleccione “Soporte” en el menú de la aplicación o a través de support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Interfaz de World ID
. Worldcoin Foundation, y no TFH, administra el Protocolo World ID y controla el procesamiento de datos relacionados con Orb para verificar un World ID. Podemos poner su World ID a su disposición (como una interfaz) a través del Servicio. El Protocolo World ID le permite demostrar que es un ser humano único y real, y a la vez proteger su privacidad.
2.11 Programa Invite
. Donde estuviera disponible, podríamos poner a su disposición la función “Invite” (Invitación). Al usar Invite, puede invitar a amigos y familiares a descargar World App y obtener la verificación para World ID. Si está utilizando la función “Invite” (Invitación), acepta los siguientes términos y condiciones:
World Assets Limited proporciona recompensas por participar en Invite. World Assets Limited, a su exclusivo criterio, podrá ofrecerle una recompensa por invitar a usuarios que verifiquen satisfactoriamente su World ID. Para poder recibir una recompensa, debe cumplir con determinadas condiciones que serán explicadas en World App. Existe un límite máximo sobre la cantidad de usuarios a los cuales puede referir a World App. Ese límite se indica en World App.
No es necesario efectuar ninguna compra para participar en la función Invite. Invite solo está disponible para uso personal y no comercial. Solo puede usar la función Invite de buena fe, para fines legales. Usted no puede: (a) usar Invite o los Servicios de manera engañosa, fraudulenta o ilegal; (b) tomar cualquier medida que pueda dañar nuestra marca, fondo de comercio o reputación; (c) transmitir material publicitario o promocional no solicitado o no autorizado; (d) hacer afirmaciones falsas o engañosas; (e) usar búsquedas pagadas, medios pagados u otras actividades similares para captar usuarios a través de Invite; y (f) usar Invite para intentar obtener información personal de otros usuarios.
Invite no está disponible en todos los países o ubicaciones y no está disponible para todos los usuarios. La participación en Invite no está disponible en ninguna jurisdicción donde la totalidad o una parte de esta funcionalidad pueda infringir (o causar que infrinjamos) cualquier requisito legal. Usted acepta no usar Invite si la función Invite no cumple con las leyes aplicables en su ubicación.
Suministramos la función Invite a nuestra entera discreción. Podemos cambiar, modificar, suspender y cancelar la función en cualquier momento. World Assets Limited podrá negarse a ofrecerle una recompensa por invitar a usuarios a verificar su World ID cuando determine, a su entera discreción, que usted no ha cumplido con estos Términos.
2.12 Bonos y reservas de WLD
. Uno de los servicios externos está reclamando una pequeña cantidad de WLD en diferentes intervalos (“Bonos de WLD”). World Assets Limited, una subsidiaria de Worldcoin Foundation, proporciona dichos Bonos de WLD. Los montos, intervalos y plazos exactos de los Bonos de WLD se especificarán en World App y estos serán determinados por World Assets Limited, de manera exclusiva. De acuerdo con las versiones anteriores de estos términos, las Reservas de WLD disponibles anteriormente no garantizan que recibirá ningún monto de Bonos de WLD. Los montos, intervalos y plazos exactos de las Reservas de WLD se especificarán en World App y estos serán determinados por World Assets Limited, de manera exclusiva. Las Reservas de WLD pueden vencer en World App, con o sin previo aviso, independientemente de que usted haya realizado una Reserva de WLD o haya recibido el Bono de WLD relacionado. Son revocables conforme al exclusivo criterio de World Assets Limited.
2.13 App de Operador.
Para los Operadores de Orb y otros socios, ponemos a disposición una App de Operador que les permite monitorear actividades y estadísticas relevantes para ustedes y su actividad comercial como Operadores de Orb. También podemos poner algunas funciones a su disposición, a fin de ayudarles a llevar a cabo su actividad comercial como Operadores de Orb.
2.14. Miniaplicaciones
. “Miniapps” es una función de World App que le permite acceder a una plataforma de miniaplicaciones a las que se puede acceder dentro de World App. Tenemos la discreción exclusiva de determinar cómo se muestra la Miniapps dentro de World App. Debe tener una dirección de billetera de World App para acceder a Miniapps.
Usted reconoce que al mostrar Miniapps, TFH proporciona una plataforma tecnológica que conecta solo a los usuarios. En ningún momento TFH transmite, almacena, toma posesión de, custodia o interactúa de otro modo con ninguna moneda tradicional o digital. TFH no procesa transacciones, no actúa como procesador de pagos ni participa de otro modo en el procesamiento de transacciones. TFH no es parte de las transacciones y no tiene responsabilidad alguna con respecto a estas transacciones. TFH no puede brindar soporte con respecto a los problemas de transacciones.
2.14.1 Transacciones y Pagos relacionados con las Miniapps.
Las Miniapps se muestran dentro de World App y pueden ofrecer bienes o servicios que los usuarios de World App pueden comprar usando Tokens digitales en sus billeteras de World App. Estas transacciones ocurren entre usted y la miniaplicación. TFH no es parte de dicha transacción.
Con respecto a dichas transacciones, usted reconoce que la billetera de World App es un servicio sin custodia, que TFH no almacena ni custodia sus Tokens digitales y que no realiza transacciones, transmite, toma posesión ni tiene ninguna participación en la realización de ninguna transacción. Los Tokens digitales siempre se almacenan y transmiten en sus respectivas redes de blockchain. No hay garantías de que las transacciones se procesen correctamente.
TFH solo lo conecta con un tercero en la plataforma Miniapps y no es parte de ninguna transacción. TFH no tiene ninguna función en el procesamiento de pagos ni en la regulación de los cargos por reembolso o cancelación.
Una vez que decida participar en una transacción, debe enviar el monto y el tipo de Tokens digitales acordados. TFH no procesa Tokens digitales ni la moneda tradicional del usuario y no realiza ninguna transferencia en nombre de los usuarios. TFH no maneja, administra, supervisa, verifica ni proporciona ningún tipo de garantía sobre ninguna transacción. En caso de que la transacción no se reciba, se revierta, se procese indebidamente o tenga un error de otro tipo, usted y los proveedores externos deben trabajar juntos para resolver cualquier problema. Cualquier disputa, reclamación, pérdida, malentendido, error técnico o problema de cualquier tipo (tanto accidental como presuntamente intencional) relacionado con pagos o transacciones debe tratarse directamente entre usted y el proveedor externo. TFH no asume responsabilidad alguna y no será parte de ninguna disputa o conversación relacionada con el pago, ni es responsable de ninguna pérdida o daño en el que puedan incurrir las partes involucradas.
Usted es el único responsable de aceptar el riesgo de cualquier fluctuación de precios relacionados con el valor de los Tokens digitales, y comprende que, al momento de completar una transacción, el valor de los Tokens digitales involucrados en la transacción puede haber cambiado significativamente.
2.14.2 Terceros
. Los productos y servicios que se muestran en cualquier miniaplicación son ofrecidos y gestionados por terceros. Al usar Miniapps, usted reconoce y acepta que:
Estos Términos son entre usted y nosotros, y no con una miniaplicación específica.
Está accediendo a una aplicación desarrollada o proporcionada por una aplicación externa, que es la única responsable de la miniaplicación.
TFH solo proporciona acceso a proveedores de pagos externos a través de la billetera de World App y no procesa pagos ni retiene fondos.
Las miniaplicaciones pueden tener términos complementarios como parte de sus productos o servicios que usted debe cumplir si acepta su servicio.
Usted reconoce y asume explícitamente todos y cada uno de los riesgos relacionados con las transacciones, y acepta que no seremos responsables de ningún riesgo o consecuencia adversa que surja de dichas transacciones.
Los Desarrolladores individuales de las miniaplicaciones disponibles en Miniapps son los únicos responsables del contenido, los productos, los bienes o los servicios que se ponen a su disposición directamente a través de sus respectivas miniaplicaciones. Para cualquier consulta o disputa, deberá comunicarse directamente con el Desarrollador correspondiente.
Los Usuarios aceptan todos los riesgos relacionados con la realización de una transacción, incluido el riesgo de que no reciban los ingresos de su compra o venta. En caso de que surjan problemas con respecto a cualquier transacción, TFH no puede ayudar con su resolución, ni asume ninguna responsabilidad por los problemas que surjan de cualquier transacción.
2.14.3 Cargos de TFH.
Podemos agregar un cargo por usar Miniapps cuando realiza una transacción con un Desarrollador. El monto de este cargo se le mostrará dentro de la plataforma. Cualquiera de dichos cargo se mostrará y estará vigente, según se refleja en Miniapps, y podrá actualizarse y modificarse cuando se considere oportuno.
2.14.4 Impuestos
. Es su exclusiva responsabilidad determinar si se aplican impuestos a alguna transacción a través de Miniapps o cualquier transacción que realiza en esta y en qué medida, así como retener, cobrar, informar y remitir el monto correcto de impuestos a las autoridades fiscales correspondientes.
2.14.5 Monitoreo general.
TFH no tendrá ninguna obligación general de monitorear la información generada por los usuarios, ni de buscar activamente hechos o circunstancias que indiquen cualquier actividad ilegal dentro de Miniapps.
Sin embargo, si tomamos conocimiento, independientemente de los medios utilizados, de que se ha ofrecido un producto o servicio ilegal a través de Miniapps a usuarios ubicados en la Unión Europea, informaremos a los usuarios que hayan comprado el producto o servicio ilegal a través de Miniapps
.
2.14.6 Actividades prohibidas.
Los usuarios de los Servicios de Miniapps aceptan no publicar ni distribuir ningún contenido que viole alguna ley o infrinja algún derecho de terceros, incluidos, entre otros, cualquier derecho de propiedad intelectual, derecho de privacidad o derecho de publicidad.
Además, acepta no participar en ninguna actividad que:
sea ilegal, fraudulenta o perjudicial;
interfiera o interrumpa el funcionamiento de Miniapps;
viola cualquier término establecido en nuestras Pautas de la aplicación;
incluya contenido no permitido en virtud de las Pautas de la aplicación.
2.14.7 Alerta de contenido ilegal.
La World App tiene mecanismos fáciles de acceder y de usar para que los usuarios nos notifiquen sobre contenido ilegal en la plataforma de Miniapps. Actuaremos rápidamente para revisar dichos informes.
2.14.8 Eliminación de contenido ilegal
. Si determinamos que una miniaplicación contiene contenido ilegal u ofrece productos o servicios ilegales, se eliminará de Miniapps. TFH proporcionará una declaración breve, clara y específica sobre los motivos a cualquier anunciante de contenido o servicios ilegales.
Cualquier restricción aplicada por World App a sus usuarios se realizará de manera diligente, objetiva y proporcional.
Los usuarios que consideren que su contenido ha sido eliminado o que el acceso a él ha sido deshabilitado injustificadamente pueden comunicarse con nosotros a través de
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
para apelar la decisión. Proporcionamos un sistema de quejas electrónico gratuito que permite a los usuarios cuestionar nuestras decisiones relacionadas con la eliminación de contenido, la suspensión del servicio, la cancelación de la cuenta o las restricciones de monetización debido a presuntas violaciones ilegales de contenido o términos.
2.14.9 Moderación del contenido.
TFH se reserva el derecho de suspender, durante un período razonable y después de haber emitido una advertencia previa cuando la ley así lo exija, la prestación de nuestros servicios a los usuarios que con frecuencia proporcionan contenido evidentemente ilegal. TFH también puede suspender temporalmente el procesamiento de avisos y quejas de usuarios que frecuentemente presentan reclamaciones infundadas.
2.15. Nombres de usuario
. Su nombre de usuario de World App no tiene que ser su nombre real. Al elegir un nombre de usuario, usted está obligado a cumplir con la
Política de nombre de usuario
en su versión más reciente.
3. Compras, cargos e impuestos
3.1 Cargos por transacción.
Al utilizar los Servicios, usted acepta pagar todos los cargos aplicables, incluidos los cargos por transacción para intercambios y transacciones de Tokens digitales. Le informaremos sobre cualquier cargo aplicable antes de que realice una transacción. Si utiliza un servicio de pago de terceros, las comisiones bancarias y los cargos de tarjeta de crédito y débito que se cobren por alguna compra de Tokens digitales pueden compensarse del monto liquidado de sus compras de Tokens digitales. Usted también es responsable de pagar los cargos adicionales que cobre su proveedor de servicios financieros.
3.2 Cargo de red.
Las interacciones con la blockchain también generan un cargo de red. Es la red de blockchain, y no nosotros, quien cobra y a quien se debe realizar el pago del cargo de red por facilitar cualquier interacción. En algunos casos, usted puede ser elegible para una cantidad limitada de transacciones sin gas dentro de un período de tiempo determinado a entera discreción por TFH. Dichas transacciones están sujetas a un valor mínimo de transacción que TFH puede ajustar.
3.3 Impuestos
. Es su exclusiva responsabilidad determinar si se aplican impuestos a alguna transacción a través de los Servicios y en qué medida, así como retener, cobrar, informar y remitir el monto correcto de impuestos a las autoridades fiscales correspondientes.
3.4 Actualizaciones
. Todos los cargos se muestran y están vigentes, según se refleja en los Servicios, y podrán actualizarse y modificarse cuando se considere oportuno.
4. Factores de riesgo
4.1 Diferenciación de la moneda de curso legal.
Los Tokens digitales no son moneda de curso legal, no están respaldados por ningún gobierno, y las cuentas de Tokens digitales y los saldos de valor en los Servicios no están sujetos a las protecciones de la Corporación federal de seguro de depósitos (Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation), de la Corporación para la protección de inversionistas en valores (Securities Investor Protection Corporation) ni protecciones similares estipuladas en otros países. No somos un banco y no ofrecemos servicios fiduciarios. En muchos países, las transacciones realizadas por medio de World App carecen en gran medida de reglamentación. No garantizamos la funcionalidad de las blockchain que respaldamos, las cuales podrían, entre otras cosas, provocar demoras, conflictos de intereses o decisiones operativas por parte de terceros, que sean desfavorables para algunos titulares de Tokens digitales, o impedirles que puedan completar una transacción por medio de los Servicios. Es posible que los detalles de la transacción que envíe a través de los Servicios no se completen o que se retrasen sustancialmente en la blockchain aplicable, y no asumimos ninguna responsabilidad por la imposibilidad de confirmar o procesar una transacción según lo esperado. No existen garantías de que una transferencia iniciada a través de los Servicios vaya a transferir con éxito la titularidad o los derechos sobre un Token digital. Además, puede haber riesgos específicos asociados con el uso de determinados Tokens digitales, como WLD. Puede encontrar más información sobre los riesgos específicos de WLD aquí.
4.2 Nueva tecnología.
Los Servicios son nuevos. Si bien este software ha sido probado ampliamente, el software utilizado para los Servicios sigue siendo relativamente nuevo y podría tener errores o vulnerabilidades de seguridad. Además, el software aún está en desarrollo y puede sufrir cambios significativos con el tiempo que podrían no cumplir con las expectativas de los usuarios.
4.3 Riesgo de seguridad de la información.
Los Tokens digitales y el uso de los Servicios pueden verse afectados por expropiaciones o robos. Hackers informáticos u otros grupos u organizaciones malintencionados pueden intentar interferir con los Servicios de diversas maneras, lo que incluye, entre otras, ataques de malware, ataques de denegación de servicio, ataques basados en consenso, ataques de Sybil,
smurfing
y falsificación de identidad. Además, debido a que las redes de blockchain que respaldamos, como el protocolo de Ethereum, dependen de software de código abierto, el software subyacente a los Servicios puede contener errores o debilidades intencionales o no intencionales que pueden afectar los Servicios o dar lugar a la pérdida de los Tokens digitales del usuario o impedirle al usuario que controle o acceda a su billetera a través de los Servicios. En el caso de que exista tal error o punto débil de software, es posible que no exista ningún recurso y no se garantiza a los usuarios ningún recurso de reparación, reembolso ni compensación.
4.4 Precisión.
Si bien tenemos la intención de proporcionar información precisa y oportuna a través de los Servicios (lo que incluye, entre otros, el contenido), es posible que, a veces, la información no sea totalmente precisa o no esté completa o totalmente actualizada, y también puede incluir imprecisiones técnicas o errores tipográficos. En un esfuerzo por continuar proporcionándole información lo más completa y precisa posible, puede que, en la medida permitida por la ley aplicable, la información sufra cambios o actualizaciones en un determinado momento y sin previo aviso, lo que incluye, por ejemplo, información sobre nuestras políticas, productos y servicios. En consecuencia, debe verificar toda la información antes de confiar en ella, y todas las decisiones basadas en la información proporcionada a través de los Servicios serán su exclusiva responsabilidad: nosotros no tendremos responsabilidad alguna por dichas decisiones.
4.5 Disponibilidad
. Aunque nos esforzamos por brindarle un servicio excelente, no garantizamos que los Servicios vayan a estar disponibles sin interrupción. Es posible que, ocasionalmente, los Servicios no estén disponibles de manera temporal, por mantenimiento u otros motivos. No asumimos ninguna responsabilidad por errores, omisiones, interrupciones, eliminaciones, defectos, demoras en la operación o transmisión, fallas en la línea de comunicaciones, robo o destrucción, o acceso no autorizado a las comunicaciones del usuario o alteración de estas. No somos responsables de ningún problema o mal funcionamiento técnico de redes o líneas telefónicas, servidores, proveedores o sistemas informáticos en línea, equipos informáticos, software, fallas del correo electrónico o de los reproductores debido a problemas técnicos o congestión de tráfico en Internet, en los Servicios o en su combinación, incluidas las lesiones o los daños a las computadoras de los usuarios o de cualquier otra persona, relacionados con la participación en los Servicios o la descarga de materiales en relación con los Servicios, o que resulten de esta. No somos responsables de las pérdidas o daños, daños financieros o lucro cesante, pérdida de negocios, o lesiones personales o muerte, que resulten del uso del Servicio por parte de cualquier persona, del Contenido que se publique en el Servicio o a través de este o que se transmita a los usuarios, o de interacciones entre usuarios de los Servicios, ya sea en línea o fuera de línea.
4.6 Bifurcaciones
. El software utilizado para crear WLD será de código abierto y gratuito para que cualquier persona lo copie y lo use. Esto significa que cualquier persona podrá crear una versión modificada de WLD, también conocida como “Bifurcación”. En el caso de una Bifurcación o cualquier otro desvío de la red de Tokens digitales, es posible que no podamos respaldar ninguna actividad relacionada con la Bifurcación. Es posible que las transacciones no se completen, se completen de forma parcial, se completen incorrectamente o tengan un retraso sustancial cuando se realice una Bifurcación. No seremos responsables de ninguna pérdida que usted sufra a causa, de forma total o parcial, de una Bifurcación u otra interrupción de la red.
4.7 Servicios de terceros.
Donde estuvieran disponibles (consulte en particular la sección 2.5), confiamos en proveedores de servicios externos para que proporcionen algunas funciones y funcionalidades dentro de las Aplicaciones, por ejemplo, la capacidad de comprar Tokens digitales con moneda fiduciaria o la capacidad de intercambiar un Activo digital por otro. No prestamos estos servicios y no somos parte de ninguna transacción de este tipo. Usted depende únicamente de proveedores externos para estos servicios y debe tener una cuenta con los proveedores externos y aceptar sus términos. No podemos
brindarle asistencia si tiene problemas para usar el servicio de estos proveedores externos y no somos responsables de ninguna transacción que realice con ellos.
5. Propiedad intelectual.
5.1 Propiedad
. Nuestro software, la aplicación, los Servicios, el Contenido, las Marcas (según se definen a continuación) y el diseño, la selección y la disposición del Contenido en los Servicios (la Propiedad intelectual, “PI”) estarán protegidos por derechos de autor, marcas comerciales, patentes y otros derechos y leyes de propiedad intelectual en los Estados Unidos y en otros países aplicables. Usted se compromete a cumplir con todos los derechos y las leyes de propiedad intelectual aplicables, así como con cualquier aviso o restricción de marca comercial o derechos de autor que se incluyan en el Acuerdo o en los Servicios. Usted no podrá eliminar ningún derecho de autor, marca comercial o avisos de propiedad exclusiva contenidos en la PI.
5.2 Marcas comerciales.
Constituyen el nombre Tools for Humanity Corporation, el logotipo de World App y todos los logotipos relacionados y eslóganes relacionados son marcas comerciales o marcas de servicio de Tools for Humanity Corporation o sus licenciantes (las “Marcas”). Usted no podrá copiar, imitar ni usar las Marcas, en su totalidad o en parte, sin nuestro permiso por escrito. Todas las demás marcas comerciales, nombres o logotipos mencionados en relación con los Servicios serán propiedad de sus respectivos titulares y usted no podrá copiarlos, imitarlos ni usarlos, en su totalidad o en parte, sin el permiso por escrito del titular de la marca comercial correspondiente. La inclusión de cualquier marca de terceros en los Servicios no constituirá una aprobación, aval o recomendación de nuestra parte.
6. Licencia y restricciones
6.1 Licencia
. Siempre que sea elegible para usar los Servicios y sujeto a su cumplimiento de estos Términos, por el presente le otorgamos una licencia limitada para acceder a los Servicios y utilizarlos.
6.2 Restricciones de la licencia
. No puede volver a publicar Contenido en ningún sitio de Internet, Intranet o Extranet ni incorporar la información en ninguna otra base de datos o compilación, y cualquier otro uso del Contenido está estrictamente prohibido. Se prohíbe estrictamente todo uso de los Servicios que no sea el autorizado de forma específica en virtud del presente, y que no cuente con nuestro permiso otorgado previamente y por escrito. En caso de darse dicho uso no autorizado, se podrá rescindir la licencia otorgada en el presente. Asimismo, dicho uso no autorizado puede implicar el incumplimiento de las leyes aplicables, incluidas, entre otras, las leyes de derechos de autor y marcas comerciales, y las reglamentaciones y disposiciones sobre comunicaciones aplicables. A menos que se indique explícitamente en el presente, ninguna disposición de estos Términos se interpretará como una concesión de licencia sobre derechos de propiedad intelectual, ya sea por la doctrina de vinculación de los actos propios (
estoppel
), de manera implícita o de otro modo. Nosotros podremos revocar esta licencia en cualquier momento, sin previo aviso, con o sin causa, en la medida permitida por la ley aplicable.
6.3 Gobierno
. Si usted es un usuario final del Gobierno de los EE. UU., le otorgamos una licencia sobre los Servicios como “Artículo comercial”, según se define ese término en el Código de Regulaciones Federales (Code of Federal Regulations, “CFR”) de los EE. UU. (consulte el artículo 2.101, Título 48, del CFR), y los derechos que le otorgamos sobre los Servicios son los mismos que los derechos que otorgamos a todos los demás en virtud de estos Términos.
7. Uso aceptable
7.1
Usted podrá utilizar los Servicios únicamente para su propio uso personal. Nos reservamos el derecho en todo momento y a nuestra entera discreción de revisar, cancelar o suspender su acceso a los Servicios o el uso que usted hace de estos en conformidad con la legislación vigente. Los elementos de la lista de Usos prohibidos son solo ejemplos, y la lista no es exhaustiva; podemos agregar o eliminar usos prohibidos a nuestra entera discreción en conformidad con la legislación vigente.
7.2 Entre los Usos prohibidos se incluyen los siguientes:
Actividad ilegal:
cualquier actividad que infrinja o ayude a infringir algún programa de sanciones administrado por la OFAC; que infrinja o ayude a infringir cualquier otra ley en los países donde llevamos a cabo actividades comerciales; que involucre ganancias provenientes de alguna actividad ilegal; o la publicación, distribución o difusión de algún material o información ilegal.
Uso excesivo o piratería informática:
cualquier actividad que imponga una carga irrazonable o desproporcionadamente grande en nuestra infraestructura, o que interfiera de manera perjudicial, intercepte o expropie algún sistema, dato o información; transmita o cargue algún material a los Servicios que contenga virus, troyanos, gusanos o cualquier otro programa perjudicial o nocivo; o intente obtener acceso no autorizado a los sistemas informáticos o redes conectadas a los Servicios.
Uso indebido por parte de terceros:
cualquier actividad que interfiera con el acceso a los Servicios o el uso de estos por parte de otra persona; difame, abuse, extorsione, acose, aceche, amenace o viole o infrinja de alguna otra forma la privacidad, la propiedad intelectual o cualquier otro derecho legal de otra persona; incite, amenace, facilite, promueva o fomente el odio, la intolerancia racial o los actos violentos contra otros; o
recolecte, recopile o extraiga datos de otro usuario de los Servicios sin permiso.
Fraude y otras prácticas comerciales desleales:
cualquier actividad destinada a estafarnos, a estafar a nuestros usuarios o a cualquier otra persona; que nos proporcione alguna información falsa, inexacta o engañosa; prometa recompensas excesivamente altas o venda un servicio sin beneficio adicional para el comprador, u otras prácticas engañosas o desleales; o loterías, rifas, subastas de tarifas de licitación, concursos, sorteos, apuestas u otros juegos de azar ilegales.
Violación de la propiedad intelectual:
cualquier actividad que implique la venta, la distribución o el acceso a música, películas, software u otros materiales con licencia falsificada, sin la debida autorización del titular de los derechos; el uso de la propiedad intelectual (incluida la Marca) sin consentimiento expreso o de forma que nos perjudique a nosotros o a nuestra marca; que implique un respaldo falso o una afiliación con nosotros; o que infrinja o incumpla cualquier derecho de autor, marca registrada, derecho de publicidad o privacidad o cualquier otro derecho de propiedad exclusiva que establezca la ley.
8. Operadores de Orb
Nos asociamos con contratistas independientes locales, denominados “Operadores de Orb”, que facilitan el registro de los usuarios y ayudan a responder las preguntas que usted pueda tener sobre nosotros. Estos Operadores de Orb han recibido capacitación y conocen World Network. Sin embargo, no tendremos control y renunciamos a toda responsabilidad respecto de lo que digan o de cómo se comporten.
Los Operadores de Orb no son nuestros agentes ni empleados, en ningún caso. Cualquier esfuerzo, característica, proceso, política, estándar u otros esfuerzos realizados por TFH en beneficio de los usuarios no constituirán una relación laboral ni de representación con un Operador de Orb.
9. Suspensión
Podemos suspender y restringir su acceso a los Servicios: (i) si estamos obligados por una citación, orden judicial u orden vinculante de una autoridad gubernamental que sea válida a primera vista; (ii) si sospechamos razonablemente que usted utiliza el Servicio en relación con un Uso prohibido; (iii) si el uso que usted hace de los Servicios está sujeto a un litigio, una investigación, o un procedimiento gubernamental en curso o percibimos un riesgo elevado de incumplimiento legal o regulatorio asociado con su actividad; (iv) si nuestros socios de servicio no pueden respaldar el uso que usted hace de los servicios; o (v) si usted toma alguna medida que consideremos que elude nuestros controles (como, entre ellos, intentar crear múltiples cuentas).
10. No es una oferta de valores o participación en
commodities
El contenido de los Servicios no constituye una oferta de compra o venta ni una solicitud de una oferta de compra o venta de inversiones, valores, participaciones en asociaciones, commodities (objeto de las transacciones a plazo) ( o cualquier otro instrumento financiero; el contenido o los Servicios tampoco constituye y no puede utilizarse para lo siguiente o en relación con lo siguiente: una oferta o solicitud por parte de una persona en cualquier estado o jurisdicción en el que dicha oferta o solicitud no esté autorizada o permitida, o a una persona a quien sea ilegal hacerle dicha oferta o solicitud.
11. Contenido
11.1 Confianza en el contenido y cambios en los Servicios.
La información y el material que le proporcionamos a través de los Servicios (el “Contenido”) serán únicamente para fines de información general, y no garantizamos su precisión, utilidad ni integridad, en la medida permitida por la legislación vigente. El grado de confianza que usted deposite en nuestro Contenido correrá estrictamente bajo su propio riesgo. No asumiremos responsabilidad alguna respecto de las acciones que usted realice o no realice debido al Contenido, o frente a cualquier persona con la que comparta el Contenido. Las declaraciones de otros usuarios que describan su uso de nuestros Servicios que se encuentren en los Servicios o en cualquier otro lugar no deberán considerarse como nuestra aprobación de sus declaraciones si estas son incompatibles con estos Términos o nuestro Contenido. Cuando lo consideremos oportuno, podremos actualizar el Contenido, pero es posible que dicho Contenido no esté completo o actualizado, y no tendremos ninguna obligación de actualizar el Contenido ni ninguna otra parte de los Servicios. Podremos modificar o interrumpir, de forma temporal o permanente, cualquier parte o la totalidad del Contenido o de los Servicios, sin previo aviso, en la medida permitida por la legislación vigente. No seremos responsables de ninguna modificación, suspensión o interrupción de una parte o de la totalidad del Contenido o de los Servicios, en la medida permitida por la legislación vigente.
11.2 Contenido y servicios de terceros.
Podremos proporcionar enlaces a materiales educativos, seminarios web, reuniones y promociones en las plataformas de redes sociales (los “Servicios de terceros”) que permitirán compartir y colaborar entre usuarios y otros terceros. Si comparte información personal, imágenes, opiniones, contenido o cualquier otro dato sobre esos servicios, lo hará bajo su propio riesgo, y su uso de esos servicios estará sujeto a los términos de uso y las políticas de privacidad de esos servicios, y no a los nuestros. Usted deberá revisar los términos de los servicios de cada Servicio de terceros para entender mejor sus derechos y la manera en que esas plataformas utilizan sus datos. No seremos responsables de ninguna pérdida, robo, vulneración o uso indebido de sus datos en relación con ningún Servicio de terceros (lo que incluye instancias de
negligencia), excepto en la medida en que dicha responsabilidad no pueda limitarse en virtud de la ley. El uso que usted haga de cualquier información proporcionada por un Servicio de terceros (el “Contenido de terceros”) correrá bajo su propio riesgo, y no le aseguramos que determinado Contenido de terceros sea preciso, completo, auténtico o apropiado para sus circunstancias personales. El Contenido de terceros incluirá información proporcionada por otros usuarios, no específicamente avalada por nosotros.
11.3 Contenido de usuario
. Como miembro de la comunidad de Worldcoin, usted podrá publicar mensajes, datos, software, imágenes, videos u otro contenido (el “Contenido de usuario”) en tableros de anuncios, blogs, cuentas de redes sociales que sean de nuestra propiedad, además de otras ubicaciones disponibles públicamente en los Servicios. Estos foros podrán estar alojados por nosotros o por un proveedor de servicios externo en nuestro nombre. Usted será responsable de todo el Contenido de usuario que envíe, cargue, publique o almacene a través de los Servicios. Usted deberá proporcionar todas las advertencias, la información y las divulgaciones requeridas y apropiadas con respecto a su Contenido de usuario. No seremos responsables de ningún Contenido de usuario que envíe a través de los Servicios.
11.4 Licencia sobre el Contenido de usuario
. Al enviarnos Contenido de usuario, usted declara que tiene todos los derechos necesarios sobre el Contenido de usuario y que nos otorga una licencia perpetua, mundial, no exclusiva, libre de regalías, sublicenciable y transferible para usar, reproducir, distribuir, usar como base de trabajos derivados, modificar, mostrar y exhibir, en su totalidad o en parte, el Contenido de usuario en relación con nuestra actividad de mercadotecnia y promociones, y para cualquier otro propósito comercial legítimo relacionado con los Servicios. Podremos redistribuir una parte o la totalidad de los trabajos derivados de su Contenido de usuario en cualquier formato y a través de cualquier canal de medios que elijamos. Por el presente, usted también nos otorga a nosotros y a otros usuarios una licencia no exclusiva para utilizar, acceder, reproducir, distribuir, modificar, mostrar y exhibir su Contenido de usuario a través de los Servicios. La sección 11.4 se aplicará en la máxima medida permitida por la legislación vigente.
11.5 Restricciones sobre el Contenido de usuario
. Usted se compromete a no utilizar y a no permitir que un tercero utilice los Servicios para publicar o transmitir cualquier Contenido de usuario que: (a) sea calumnioso o difamatorio, o que revele asuntos privados o personales relativos a cualquier persona; (b) sea indecente, obsceno, pornográfico, incite al acoso, sea amenazante, abusivo, que incite al odio, que sea ofensivo desde el punto de vista racial o étnico; que fomente una conducta que se considere un delito, que dé lugar a una responsabilidad civil o que infrinja cualquier ley, o que sea inapropiado por cualquier otro motivo; (c) que infrinja los derechos de propiedad intelectual de otras personas, incluidos textos, imágenes o programas no autorizados con derechos de autor, secretos comerciales u otra información confidencial de propiedad exclusiva, o marcas comerciales o de servicio utilizadas de forma infractora; o (d) que interfiera en el uso de los Servicios por parte de otro usuario. Usted declara que publica el Contenido de usuario en los Servicios de forma voluntaria, por consiguiente, dicha publicación no creará una relación empleador-empleado entre usted y nosotros. Usted no podrá copiar ni usar direcciones de correo electrónico, números de teléfono móvil, saldos, nombres de usuario ni ninguna otra información personal sobre otros usuarios, sin su permiso. Estarán prohibidos los mensajes de correo electrónico, de correo postal, las llamadas telefónicas u otras comunicaciones no solicitadas a otros usuarios, por medio de los Servicios o de cualquier otro canal.
11.6 Quejas y eliminaciones de contenido, de acuerdo con la DMCA.
Si cree que su marca comercial u obra protegida por derechos de autor están siendo infringidas por nuestro Contenido o por el Contenido de usuario en los Servicios, o que se están publicando de alguna otra manera que sugiera algún tipo de respaldo por nuestra parte o afiliación con nosotros, envíenos un mensaje de correo electrónico a legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com e indique en el asunto “[Trademark/Copyright] Complaint” (Queja de [marca comercial/derechos de autor]), según sea el caso. Para que su queja sea efectiva y para que podamos tomar medidas en virtud de la Ley sobre Derechos de Autor en el Milenio Digital (Digital Millennium Copyright Act, “DMCA”), deberá cumplir con todos los requisitos de la DMCA e incluir la siguiente información en su correo electrónico:
identificación clara de la obra protegida por derechos de autor o de la marca que se alega que ha sido infringida, incluido el número de registro de derechos de autor, si la obra está registrada;
identificación de la obra o marca que se alega que es infractora y que usted desea que se elimine;
la URL u otra instrucción clara que nos permita localizar el presunto contenido infractor;
su dirección de correo electrónico, dirección postal y número de teléfono; y
una declaración firmada que indique que usted cree de buena fe que el contenido es infractor, que la información que proporciona es correcta y que usted es el propietario del contenido o está autorizado a representarlo.
También deberá tener en cuenta que, en virtud de la sección 512(f) de la DMCA, cualquier persona que, a sabiendas, envíe notificaciones de infracción sin fundamento podrá ser responsable por daños y perjuicios, por lo que le recomendamos que no presente ninguna reclamación falsa. Podremos compartir cualquier información o correspondencia que usted nos proporcione con terceros, incluida la persona que cargó el material presuntamente infractor al Servicio.
Cuando recibimos un aviso de infracción bona fide, nuestra política será: (a) eliminar o inhabilitar de inmediato el acceso al contenido infractor; (b) notificar a la persona que cargó el material infractor que hemos eliminado o inhabilitado el acceso al material; y (c) en el caso de infractores reincidentes,
cancelar el acceso de la persona a los Servicios. Si recibimos un contraaviso de dicha persona, podemos enviarle una copia en la que le explicaremos que podremos restaurar el material eliminado o dejar de inhabilitarlo en 10 días hábiles. A menos que usted presente una acción para obtener una orden judicial contra nosotros o contra la persona que cargó el contenido, restableceremos el acceso al material eliminado en un plazo de 10 a 14 días hábiles o más, tras la recepción del contraaviso, a nuestra discreción.
12. DESCARGO DE RESPONSABILIDAD DE GARANTÍAS
12.1 El uso de los Servicios correrá bajo su propio riesgo. Los Servicios, los WLD, el contenido y toda otra PI se proporcionarán “TAL CUAL SE ENCUENTRAN” y “SEGÚN DISPONIBILIDAD”, sin ninguna declaración o garantía, ya sea expresa, implícita o legal. En la medida máxima permitida por la legislación vigente, renunciamos específicamente a cualquier garantía implícita de título, comerciabilidad, idoneidad para un propósito particular o no infracción en cuanto a las características, el contenido u otra PI contenida en los Servicios. Algunas jurisdicciones no permiten la exclusión de garantías implícitas, por lo que es posible que las exclusiones anteriores no se apliquen en su caso. No avalaremos, garantizaremos ni asumimos responsabilidad alguna por ningún tipo de publicidad, oferta o declaración realizada por terceros, incluidos otros usuarios, con respecto a los Servicios.
12.2 No ofrecemos ninguna declaración ni garantía de que (a) el acceso a la totalidad o parte de los Servicios sea continuo, ininterrumpido, oportuno, seguro o sin de errores; (b) que los Servicios o el contenido sean precisos, completos, fiables o actuales; (c) que los Servicios estén libres de virus u otros componentes dañinos; o (d) que los Servicios o el contenido satisfagan sus requisitos, necesidades o expectativas.
12.3 Además, no ofrecemos ninguna declaración ni garantía con respecto a la legalidad de los Servicios o WLD para cualquier caso de uso, o que los Servicios o WLD cumplirán con los requisitos regulatorios o de cumplimiento. Usted también será responsable de determinar y cumplir con todas las restricciones y requisitos legales y reglamentarios que rijan su uso de los Servicios o WLD. A excepción de las declaraciones expresas establecidas en estos Términos, usted reconoce y acepta que no se ha basado en ninguna otra declaración o compromiso, ya sea escrito u oral, con respecto a su acceso a los Servicios o WLD y su uso de estos.
12.4 No actuaremos ni podremos actuar como su asesor con respecto a ningún asunto financiero, jurídico, de inversión o fiscal. Todo contenido se presenta como veraz y pertinente a la fecha indicada. Cualquier proyección, estimación, previsión, meta u opinión expresada aquí está sujeta a riesgos, incertidumbres y suposiciones, por lo tanto, pueden ser incorrectas y cambiar sin previo aviso. No debe tomar decisiones sobre la base de ningún contenido.
Es posible que cierta información presentada aquí se haya obtenido de fuentes externas. Si bien consideramos que estas fuentes son confiables, no hemos verificado dicha información de manera independiente y no realizamos declaración alguna sobre su exactitud. No somos un corredor de bolsa registrado ni un asesor de inversiones. No realizamos ninguna declaración y nos eximimos de manera específica con respecto a todas las garantías, expresas, implícitas o legales, con respecto a la precisión, la puntualidad o la integridad de cualquier material contenido en los Servicios. Nuestro contenido es solo para información general, y usted será el único responsable de determinar si utilizará o no los Servicios. Usted reconoce que el comercio, el uso y la tenencia de Tokens digitales serán intrínsecamente arriesgados. Usted podrá perder todos los fondos de su billetera. Usted reconoce que el Servicio podrá estar sujeto a restricciones a la exportación y a sanciones económicas impuestas por la legislación estadounidense.
12.5 No somos responsables ante usted ni ante ningún tercero por la modificación o la rescisión de los Servicios, o por la suspensión o la cancelación de su acceso a los Servicios.
13. LIMITACIÓN DE RESPONSABILIDAD
13.1 No excluiremos ni limitaremos nuestra responsabilidad ante usted cuando fuera ilegal hacerlo. En los países en los que no se permiten los siguientes tipos de exclusiones, responderemos ante usted solo por las pérdidas y los daños y perjuicios que surjan, de manera razonablemente previsible, en caso de que obremos sin diligencia y habilidad razonables o que incumplamos el contrato con usted. Este párrafo no tiene incidencia en los derechos del consumidor que no puedan ser objeto de renuncia o limitación mediante un contrato o acuerdo.
13.2 En la medida permitida por la ley, usted acepta que, en ninguna circunstancia, nosotros o ninguno de nuestros ejecutivos, directores, empleados, contratistas, agentes, filiales o subsidiarias (las “Partes de TFH”) seremos responsables ante usted por ningún daño indirecto, punitivo, incidental, especial, emergente o ejemplar, incluidos los daños por lucro cesante, fondo de comercio, uso, datos o de otra propiedad intangible, ya sea que dicha responsabilidad se afirme sobre la base de responsabilidad civil extracontractual o de otra manera, y sin perjuicio de que las Partes de TFH hayan sido advertidas de la posibilidad de tales daños que surjan o se relacionen con: (a) el uso o la imposibilidad de utilizar los Servicios, sus Tokens digitales o la World Network; (b) la inaccesibilidad o la rescisión de los Servicios; (c) cualquier tipo de piratería informática, manipulación, acceso no autorizado o alteración de cualquier transacción o de sus Datos; (d) cualquier transacción o acuerdo celebrado por usted con un tercero a través de los Servicios; (e) cualquier actividad o comunicación de terceros; (f) las acciones de los Operadores de Orb; (g) la pérdida del valor de cualquier Token digital;
(h) cualquier Contenido de terceros al que se acceda en los Servicios o a través de ellos; (i) errores, equivocaciones o inexactitudes en nuestro Contenido; (j) lesiones personales o daños a la propiedad, de cualquier naturaleza, que se deriven de cualquier acceso o uso de los Servicios; (k) virus, troyanos o elementos similares que puedan ser transmitidos a los Servicios o a través de ellos; o (l) la conducta difamatoria, ofensiva o ilegal de cualquier tercero. Esta limitación de la responsabilidad se aplicará tanto si los daños y perjuicios se derivan del uso normal o del uso incorrecto de TFH o de los Servicios, como si se confía en ellos, a pesar de cualquier fallo en el propósito esencial de cualquier recurso limitado y en la mayor medida permitida por la legislación vigente.
13.3 En ninguna circunstancia, las Partes de TFH serán responsables ante usted por ninguna reclamación directa, procedimiento, responsabilidad, obligación, daños y perjuicios, pérdidas o costos por un importe superior a $100.00. Si no está satisfecho con los Servicios, acepta que su único y exclusivo recurso será dejar de utilizarlos. Esta limitación de responsabilidad se aplicará en la máxima medida permitida por las leyes aplicables.
13.4 Exención e indemnización.
Usted se compromete a defender, indemnizar y eximir de responsabilidad a las Partes de TFH, frente a cualquier reclamo, daños, costos, responsabilidades, honorarios razonables de abogados y gastos presentados contra una Parte de TFH por cualquier tercero que surja de: (a) su uso de los Servicios; (b) una infracción por su parte de estos Términos; (c) una infracción por su parte de cualquier derecho de otra persona; (d) su conducta en relación con los Servicios; o (e) su uso de los WLD, los Tokens digitales o la red Worldcoin, o se relacione con cualquiera de los anteriores. Algunas jurisdicciones limitan las indemnizaciones a los consumidores, por lo que es posible que algunas o todas las disposiciones de indemnización de este párrafo no se apliquen en su caso. Si usted está obligado a indemnizar a alguna de las Partes de TFH, nos reservaremos el derecho, a nuestra entera discreción, de controlar cualquier acción o procedimiento, y de determinar si se establece una conciliación y en qué términos.
SI USTED ES RESIDENTE DE CALIFORNIA, renunciará a los beneficios y protecciones del Código Civil de California, art. 1542, que establece: “[una] exención general no se extiende a las reclamaciones que el acreedor o la parte exonerante no conozca o sospeche que existen a su favor al momento de firmar la exención y que, de haberlas conocido, habrían tenido una incidencia sustancial en su acuerdo con el deudor o la parte exonerada”.
14. Ley aplicable
Las leyes del estado de California se aplicarán a este Acuerdo y a cualquier disputa que surja de este Acuerdo o se relacione con este. La ley aplicable establecida en esta sección será de aplicación, sin tener en cuenta los principios de conflicto de leyes. Además, usted acepta que el Servicio se considerará basado únicamente en el estado de California, y que, aunque los Servicios puedan estar disponibles en otras jurisdicciones, su disponibilidad no dará lugar a competencia en razón de la persona general o específica en ningún foro por fuera del estado de California.
15. RESOLUCIÓN DE DISPUTAS, ARBITRAJE Y RENUNCIA A DEMANDAS COLECTIVAS
15.1 LEA ATENTAMENTE LOS SIGUIENTES PÁRRAFOS. REQUIEREN QUE USTED RESUELVA LAS DISPUTAS CON NOSOTROS MEDIANTE UN PROCEDIMIENTO DE ARBITRAJE INDIVIDUAL, ANTE UN ÚNICO ÁRBITRO, Y NO COMO MIEMBRO DE UNA DEMANDA COLECTIVA. EL ARBITRAJE LE IMPEDIRÁ DEMANDARNOS ANTE UN TRIBUNAL O TENER UN JUICIO CON JURADO, AUNQUE PODRÁ INTERPONER UN LITIGIO CONTRA NOSOTROS ANTE UN TRIBUNAL DE RECLAMACIONES DE MENOR CUANTÍA SI REÚNE LOS REQUISITOS PARA ELLO.
15.2 Haremos todo lo posible por resolver cualquier posible disputa mediante negociaciones informales y de buena fe. Si surge una posible disputa, para comunicarse con nosotros debe enviar un mensaje de correo electrónico a legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com para que podamos intentar resolverla, sin recurrir a la resolución formal de disputas. Si no podemos llegar a una resolución informal dentro de los 60 días posteriores a su correo electrónico, y usted decide presentar una reclamación legal federal o estatal; una reclamación en virtud del derecho de common law; una reclamación derivada de un contrato, responsabilidad extracontractual, fraude, tergiversación o cualquier otra teoría legal; o cualquier otro procedimiento formal que surja de estos Términos, el Contenido o los Servicios o se relacione con ellos (cada uno, una “Disputa”), usted se compromete a resolver la Disputa mediante arbitraje vinculante, en forma individual de acuerdo con los siguientes términos (en forma conjunta, el “Acuerdo de arbitraje”):
El procedimiento de arbitraje será llevado a cabo, de manera confidencial, por un solo árbitro. El árbitro aplicará las normas de prescripción aplicables y todas las leyes pertinentes, y respetará las reclamaciones de privilegio reconocidas por la ley aplicable.
La Disputa se resolverá única y definitivamente mediante arbitraje administrado por el centro de resolución alternativa de controversias JAMS, de acuerdo con las Reglas de arbitraje simplificado de JAMS (JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules), a menos que el importe total de la Disputa sea igual a 250 000 USD o más, en cuyo caso se aplicarán las Reglas de arbitraje integral de JAMS (JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules). El arbitraje se llevará a cabo en San Francisco, California, a menos que usted y nosotros acordemos realizarlo en otro lugar. Usted acepta que los tribunales federales y estatales de San Francisco, California, son el foro adecuado para cualquier apelación de un laudo arbitral o para procedimientos judiciales en caso de que se determine que la cláusula de arbitraje vinculante de este Acuerdo es inaplicable.
En cualquier arbitraje, independientemente de su ubicación, las partes no solicitarán que la otra parte presente pruebas, y el árbitro no permitirá que las partes recurran a la exhibición de pruebas; en cambio, cada parte presentará las pruebas que respalden sus posiciones en una fecha y hora mutuamente acordadas antes de la audiencia de arbitraje final.
El presente Acuerdo de arbitraje contempla la aplicabilidad, la revocabilidad, el alcance y la validez del Acuerdo de arbitraje o de cualquiera de sus partes, y todas las demás Disputas que surjan de su interpretación o aplicabilidad o se relacionen con ello; y todos estos asuntos serán decididos por el árbitro y no por un tribunal o un juez.
Si el árbitro o el administrador del arbitraje le imponen cargos de presentación u otros costos administrativos, se lo reembolsaremos, previa solicitud, en la medida en que dichos cargos o costos excedan aquellos que de otro modo tendría que pagar si estuviera en proceso en un tribunal ordinario. También pagaremos honorarios o costos adicionales si así lo exigieran las normas del administrador del arbitraje o la ley aplicable.
A petición de cualquiera de las partes, todos los procedimientos de arbitraje se llevarán a cabo bajo la más estricta confidencialidad y, en tal caso, el árbitro recibirá, escuchará y conservará todos los documentos, testimonios y registros bajo sello de forma confidencial, disponibles para inspección solo por las partes, sus respectivos abogados y sus respectivos peritos, consultores o testigos que hayan acordado, por adelantado y por escrito, recibir toda esa información con carácter confidencial para ser utilizada únicamente a efectos del arbitraje.
Además de los procedimientos y recursos de demanda colectiva analizados en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, el árbitro tendrá la autoridad de otorgar cualquier recurso que, de otro modo, estuviera disponible ante un tribunal.
Cualquier tribunal competente podrá dictar sentencia de reconocimiento sobre el laudo dictado por el árbitro.
Si se determina que el requisito de arbitraje o la prohibición de demandas colectivas y otras Disputas presentadas en nombre de terceros, conforme se dispone en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, son inaplicables, se considerará que solo las disposiciones inaplicables han sido eliminadas de estos Términos y todas las obligaciones restantes que se incluyen en estos Términos continuarán en pleno vigor y efecto.
15.3 Derecho de revocación durante 30 días
. Usted tiene derecho a excluirse y no quedar obligado por este Acuerdo de arbitraje; para ello, deberá enviar un mensaje de correo electrónico desde la dirección que utilizó para instalar su aplicación a legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com con la siguiente declaración en el Asunto: “ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT” (REVOCACIÓN VOLUNTARIA DE CONSENTIMIENTO AL PROCEDIMIENTO DE ARBITRAJE Y DEMANDA COLECTIVA). Usted deberá enviar su mensaje de correo electrónico en el término de 30 días desde que haya aceptado estos Términos; de lo contrario, estará obligado a someter las Disputas a arbitraje de acuerdo con los términos de este Acuerdo de arbitraje. Si opta por excluirse de este Acuerdo de arbitraje, nosotros tampoco estaremos obligados por el Acuerdo de arbitraje.
15.4 Cambios en este Acuerdo de arbitraje.
Le notificaremos con 30 días de anticipación sobre cualquier cambio que hagamos en la sección de estos Términos titulada “
Resolución de disputas, arbitraje y renuncia a demandas colectivas
”, y los cambios entrarán en vigor 30 días después de que reciba el aviso de nuestra parte. Los cambios introducidos en la sección titulada
Resolución de disputas, arbitraje y renuncia a demandas colectivas
se aplicarán de forma prospectiva solo a las Disputas que surjan después del día 30. Si un tribunal o árbitro decide que los cambios realizados en la sección no son aplicables o válidos, dichos cambios se separarán de estos Términos, y el tribunal o árbitro aplicará los términos del primer Acuerdo de arbitraje vigente después de que usted haya comenzado a utilizar los Servicios. Usted podrá ejercer su derecho a excluirse de los nuevos términos del Acuerdo de arbitraje a través de los procedimientos establecidos en la sección anterior titulada “Derecho de revocación durante 30 días”.
Este Acuerdo de arbitraje seguirá vigente tanto después de la rescisión de estos Términos como después de que usted use los Servicios.
Sin perjuicio de ninguna disposición en contrario en este Acuerdo de arbitraje, cualquiera de las partes podrá entablar una demanda únicamente para obtener medidas cautelares que pongan fin al uso no autorizado o al uso indebido de los Servicios, o a la infracción de los derechos de propiedad intelectual (por ejemplo, derechos de marca comercial, secreto comercial,
derecho de autor o patente), sin recurrir primero al arbitraje o al proceso informal de resolución de disputas antes descrito.
16. Disposiciones generales
16.1 Renuncias, divisibilidad y cesiones
. El hecho de que no exijamos el cumplimiento de una disposición no constituirá una renuncia a nuestro derecho a hacerlo más adelante. Si se determina que una disposición es inaplicable, las disposiciones restantes de estos Términos permanecerán en pleno vigor, y se sustituirá por un término aplicable que refleje nuestra intención con la mayor fidelidad posible, en la medida permitida por la legislación vigente. Usted no podrá ceder ninguno de sus derechos en virtud de estos Términos, y cualquier intento será nulo. Podemos ceder nuestros derechos a cualquiera de sus filiales o subsidiarias, o a cualquier sucesor respecto de cualquier actividad comercial relacionada con los Servicios.
16.2 Totalidad del acuerdo
. Estos Términos constituirán la declaración completa y exclusiva del acuerdo celebrado entre usted y nosotros con respecto a los Servicios, y reemplazarán todos los entendimientos, los acuerdos, las declaraciones y las garantías anteriores y presentes, tanto escritos como orales, con respecto a los Servicios. Los encabezados de las cláusulas de estos Términos se incluyen únicamente para facilitar la consulta y no regirán el significado ni la interpretación de ninguna de sus disposiciones.
16.3 Disposiciones que permanecerán vigentes.
Todas las disposiciones de estos Términos relacionadas con la suspensión o rescisión, las deudas contraídas con TFH, el uso general de los Servicios, las Disputas con TFH y las disposiciones que, por su naturaleza, se extiendan más allá del vencimiento o la rescisión de estos Términos seguirán vigentes después de la rescisión o del vencimiento de estos Términos.
16.4 Relación de las partes.
No se considerará que ninguna disposición de estos Términos crea ni está destinada a crear una relación entre usted y TFH como socios, empresas conjuntas o de otro modo asociados conjuntos con fines de lucro, ni hará que ni usted ni TFH serán tratados como agentes uno del otro. Esto incluye el hecho de que ninguna disposición de estos Términos establece o pretende establecer una relación laboral entre usted y TFH.
16.5 Asesoramiento profesional o deberes fiduciarios.
Todo el Contenido proporcionado por nosotros tendrá fines informativos únicamente y no deberá interpretarse como asesoramiento profesional. Usted no deberá tomar ni abstenerse de tomar ninguna medida sobre la base de información contenida en los Servicios. Antes de tomar cualquier decisión financiera, legal o de otro tipo que implique a los Servicios o a cualquiera de los Tokens digitales, deberá solicitar asesoramiento profesional independiente de una persona que esté autorizada y habilitada en el área para la cual dicho asesoramiento fuera apropiado. Estos Términos no pretenden crear ni imponer obligaciones fiduciarias sobre nosotros, ni lo hacen. En la máxima medida permitida por la ley, usted reconoce y acepta que no tenemos obligaciones ni responsabilidades fiduciarias con usted ni con ninguna otra parte, y que en la medida en que tales obligaciones o responsabilidades puedan existir conforme al derecho de common law o de equity, por este medio se renuncia a ellas y se eliminan de manera irrevocable. Asimismo, usted acepta que las únicas obligaciones y deberes que asumimos con respecto a usted serán los establecidos de forma expresa en estos Términos.
16.6 Cambio de control.
En caso de que seamos adquiridos por una entidad externa o nos fusionemos con ella, o cedamos de otro modo determinadas funciones a una entidad afiliada o sucesora o a otra entidad que determinemos, en beneficio de los Usuarios, nos reservamos el derecho, en cualquiera de estas circunstancias, de transferir o ceder los Datos que hayamos recopilado de su persona, como parte de dicha fusión, adquisición, venta u otro cambio de control, en conformidad con la legislación vigente.
16.7 Fuerza mayor.
No seremos responsables de los retrasos, fallos en la ejecución o interrupción del servicio que sean consecuencia directa o indirecta de una volatilidad significativa del mercado de los Tokens digitales, de un hecho motivado por casos fortuitos, actos de las autoridades civiles o militares, actos terroristas, disturbios civiles, guerra, huelga, emergencia sanitaria, conflicto laboral, incendio, interrupción de los servicios de telecomunicaciones o de Internet o de los servicios del proveedor de red, fallo de equipos o de software, ni de ninguna causa o condición que escape a nuestro control razonable (cada uno de ellos, “Caso de fuerza mayor”). La existencia de un Caso de fuerza mayor no tendrá incidencia en la validez y aplicabilidad de ninguna de las disposiciones restantes de estos Términos.
16.8 Tiendas de aplicaciones.
Al descargar nuestras Aplicaciones desde cualquier tienda de aplicaciones o plataforma de distribución que no sea la AppStore de Apple, lo que incluye a PlayStore de Google (la “Plataforma de Distribución”), usted acepta que:
los Términos son entre usted y nosotros, y no con el proveedor de la Plataforma de distribución (“Proveedor de la tienda”); su uso de las Aplicaciones debe cumplir con los Términos de servicio de la Plataforma de distribución del Proveedor de la tienda vigentes en ese momento; el Proveedor de la tienda es solo un proveedor de la Plataforma de distribución donde obtuvo las Aplicaciones;
Nosotros, y no el Proveedor de la tienda, somos los únicos responsables de las Aplicaciones;
el Proveedor de la tienda no tiene ninguna obligación ni responsabilidad hacia usted, con respecto a las Aplicaciones o a los Términos;
y usted reconoce y acepta que el Proveedor de la tienda es un tercero beneficiario de los Términos, en lo que respecta a las Aplicaciones.
16.9 AppStore de Apple
. Esta sección se aplicará cuando las Aplicaciones se hayan adquirido de la AppStore de Apple. Usted reconoce y acepta que los Términos se aplican únicamente entre usted y nosotros, no a Apple, Inc. (“Apple”), y que Apple no tiene responsabilidad alguna por las Aplicaciones o el contenido de estas. Su uso de las Aplicaciones debe cumplir con los términos de servicio de la AppStore.
Usted reconoce que Apple no tiene ninguna obligación de proporcionar ningún servicio de mantenimiento y soporte con respecto a las Aplicaciones. En caso de que las Aplicaciones no cumplan con alguna garantía aplicable, usted podrá notificarlo a Apple y (cuando corresponda) Apple le reembolsará el precio de la compra de las Aplicaciones. En la máxima medida permitida por la ley aplicable, Apple no tendrá ninguna otra obligación de garantía con respecto a las Aplicaciones, y cualquier otra reclamación, pérdida, pasivo, daños, costo o gasto atribuibles al incumplimiento de una garantía se regirán únicamente por los Términos y las leyes aplicables a nosotros, como proveedor de las Aplicaciones.
Usted reconoce que Apple no es responsable de resolver ninguna reclamación suya o de un tercero, relacionada con las Aplicaciones o su posesión o uso de estas, lo que incluye, sin carácter restrictivo: (i) reclamaciones de responsabilidad del producto; (ii) reclamaciones de que las Aplicaciones no cumplen con algún requisito legal o regulatorio aplicable; y (iii) reclamaciones que surjan en virtud de la legislación de protección al consumidor o similar; y todas estas reclamaciones se rigen únicamente por los Términos y las leyes aplicables a nosotros, como proveedor del software.
Usted reconoce que, en el caso de una reclamación de terceros en la que se alegue que las Aplicaciones o la posesión y uso de estas infringen los derechos de propiedad intelectual de ese tercero, TFH —no Apple— será el único responsable de la investigación, defensa, conciliación y exención de cualquier reclamación de incumplimiento de propiedad intelectual, en la medida requerida por los Términos.
Usted declara y garantiza que (i) no se encuentra en un país que está sujeto a embargo del gobierno de los EE. UU., o que fue designado por el gobierno de los EE. UU. como un país “que apoya el terrorismo”; y (ii) usted no está incluido en ninguna lista del gobierno de los EE. UU. de partes prohibidas o restringidas.
Usted y TFH reconocen y aceptan que Apple y las subsidiarias de Apple son terceros beneficiarios de los Términos de servicio, en relación con su licencia de las Aplicaciones, y que, luego de que usted acepte las condiciones de los Términos de servicio, Apple tendrá el derecho (y se considerará que ha aceptado el derecho) de exigirle a usted el cumplimiento de los Términos de servicio, en relación con su licencia de las Aplicaciones, como tercero beneficiario de estas.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Conditions générales de l’utilisateur Tools For Humanity
Bienvenue sur l’Application World ! Les présentes Conditions entre vous et Tools for Humanity Corporation, une société du Delaware (« TFH », « nous » ou « notre/nos ») régissent votre utilisation et votre accès à nos sites Web et applications, notamment l’Application World et l’Application pour les opérateurs (collectivement, les « Applications »), ainsi qu’à l’ensemble des fonctionnalités, contenu et services associés que nous vous fournissons (collectivement, les « Services » ou « Nos Services »), en lien avec le réseau World (« Réseau World ») et l’écosystème World.
Veuillez lire attentivement les présentes Conditions avant d’utiliser les Services ou d’y accéder. En accédant aux Services que nous fournissons ou en les utilisant, et en consentant explicitement à ces Conditions, vous acceptez expressément d’être lié par les présentes Conditions et par notre Avis de confidentialité, qui est incorporé aux présentes Conditions. Veuillez noter ces parties particulièrement importantes des présentes Conditions :
Vous acceptez de résoudre tout litige entre vous et TFH par l’intermédiaire d’un arbitrage contraignant plutôt que devant un tribunal. Si vous résidez en Corée du Sud, vous pouvez choisir de résoudre le litige devant un tribunal local compétent. Veuillez consulter la section 15 ci-dessous pour plus de détails.
Les produits cryptographiques, y compris les Jetons numériques, sont en grande partie non réglementés et peuvent comporter un risque très élevé. Il est possible qu’aucun recours réglementaire ne soit disponible en cas de perte résultant de telles transactions.
Aucun élément des services ne constitue une offre de vente ou la sollicitation d’une offre d’achat de titres ou Jetons numériques. Les Services ne constituent pas des conseils en investissement. La détention, l’achat ou la vente de Jetons numériques (tels que définis dans la section 2.1 ci-dessous) peuvent ne pas être autorisés dans votre lieu de résidence et il est de votre responsabilité de vous conformer à l’ensemble des lois applicables. Veuillez évaluer si l’achat, vente, utilisation ou détention de Jetons numériques vous convient compte tenu de votre situation financière et de votre compréhension des Jetons numériques. La valeur des Jetons numériques peut changer rapidement et de telles monnaies sont susceptibles de perdre toute leur valeur.
En outre, les jetons Worldcoin (« WLD ») ne sont pas destinés à être utilisés, achetés ou accessibles par des personnes des États-Unis, y compris des citoyens, résidents ou des personnes situées aux États-Unis, ou des sociétés constituées, situées ou résidant aux États-Unis, ou qui ont un agent enregistré aux États-Unis. Nous ne mettons pas WLD à la disposition de telles personnes des États-Unis. En outre, vous vous engagez à ne pas vendre, transférer ou mettre à la disposition des WLD à toute personne des États-Unis. Des informations supplémentaires sur les risques associés à WLD sont disponibles ici.
1. Portée des conditions
1.1 Protection de la vie privée et vos données.
Lorsque vous accédez aux Applications, vous pouvez nous fournir des catégories d’informations personnelles, telles que votre nom ou numéro de téléphone. Si vous fournissez des informations pour établir votre preuve de personnalité et pour réclamer vos jetons WLD, vous pouvez fournir des catégories particulières de données à caractère personnel sensibles, telles que vos informations biométriques. Notre Avis de confidentialité décrit les données que nous collectons auprès de vous et la manière dont nous les utilisons. Veuillez ne pas utiliser les Services si vous ne souhaitez pas que nous collections ou utilisions vos données de la manière décrite dans l’Avis de confidentialité.
1.2 Éligibilité.
Les pages Web décrivant nos services ont beau être accessibles dans le monde entier, cela ne signifie pas pour autant que tous les Services ou fonctionnalités de service sont légaux ou disponibles dans votre pays. Vous ne pouvez pas utiliser de VPN ou d’outils similaires dans le but de contourner une restriction. Il est de votre responsabilité de vous assurer que votre utilisation de nos services est légale lorsque vous les utilisez. Nos Services ne sont pas disponibles dans toutes les langues. Nos Services sont légaux lorsque vous les utilisez. Nos services ne sont pas disponibles dans toutes les langues. Afin d’utiliser les Services, vous devez vous conformer aux présentes Conditions et à toutes les lois applicables. Vous ne pouvez pas utiliser Nos Services pour conduire, promouvoir ou aider d’autres personnes à mener une activité illégale ou illicite.
En outre, vous devez répondre à tous les critères suivants :
vous êtes âgé(e) de 18 ans ou plus ; et
Vous n’êtes
pas
situé(e) sur le territoire de, sous le contrôle de, un ressortissant ou un résident de : la Syrie, les régions de Crimée, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson et Zaporizhzhia en Ukraine, la Russie, la Corée du Nord, l’Iran, Cuba ou tout autre pays avec lequel les États-Unis, l’Union européenne ou tout autre pays ou région ont des restrictions commerciales de biens ou de services ;
Vous n’êtes pas un « Ressortissant spécialement désigné » (Specially Designated National) tel que déclaré par le Bureau du contrôle des avoirs étrangers (Office of Foreign Assets Control, OFAC) du Département du Trésor des États-Unis ni ne figurez sur les listes de sanctions d’un autre pays, et votre nom ne figure pas sur la Liste des personnes refusées (Denied Persons List) du Département du Commerce des États-Unis, ou sur les listes de personnes interdites d’un autre pays.
Si vous ne répondez pas à toutes ces exigences, vous n’êtes pas autorisé à accéder aux Services ou à les utiliser et, par conséquent, nous pouvons restreindre votre capacité à accéder aux Services ou à les utiliser.
De plus, si vous êtes établi ou situé en Allemagne ou si vous y êtes domicilié ou y avez votre siège social, vous n’êtes pas autorisé à accéder ni à utiliser les services tiers au sens de la section 2.5, le P2P Marketplace au sens de la section 2.8. Vous n’avez pas accès aux fonctions précédentes.
1.3 Disponibilité.
Les pages Web décrivant les Services sont accessibles dans le monde entier, mais cela ne signifie pas que tous les Services ou fonctionnalités de service sont légaux ou disponibles dans votre pays. L’accès à certains Services (ou à certaines fonctionnalités du Service) dans certains pays peut être bloqué par nous ou par des gouvernements. Vous ne pouvez pas utiliser de VPN ou d’outils similaires dans le but de contourner une restriction. L’accès aux Applications et à certaines fonctionnalités des Applications peut être indisponible ou restreint, en fonction de votre emplacement.
Il est de votre responsabilité de vous assurer que votre utilisation des Services est légale lorsque vous les utilisez
. Les services ne sont pas disponibles dans toutes les langues.
1.4 Mises à jour.
Nous pouvons apporter des modifications aux présentes Conditions de temps à autre. Si nous le faisons, nous mettrons à disposition les conditions mises à jour sur les Services et, lorsque le droit applicable l’exige, nous vous en informerons avant d’apporter des modifications et dans les cas où ces modifications pourraient être particulièrement importantes ou désavantageuses pour vous, nous vous adressons un préavis supplémentaire si le droit applicable l’exige. Vous comprenez et acceptez qu’en continuant à utiliser les Services après que nous avons effectué de telles modifications et lorsque vous ne vous êtes pas opposé expressément à ces dernières, vous êtes réputé avoir accepté les Conditions mises à jour. Vous pouvez cesser d’utiliser les Services à tout moment si vous n’acceptez pas les présentes Conditions. Étant donné que les Services évoluent au fil du temps, nous pouvons modifier ou interrompre tout ou partie des Services, à tout moment et sans préavis, à notre seule discrétion, dans la mesure où le droit applicable l’autorise.
1.5 Conditions supplémentaires.
Des conditions générales supplémentaires peuvent régir des applications, du contenu, des fonctionnalités ou des parties spécifiques des Services, et l’ensemble de ces conditions générales supplémentaires que nous vous communiquerons feront partie des présentes Conditions.
2. Services
2.1 Portefeuille non-custodial
L’Application World comprend un portefeuille non hébergé et non-custodial (c.-à-d. dont le titulaire conserve la clé) aux fins de la détention de cryptomonnaies, devises numériques ou actifs numériques pris en charge (y compris WLD et collectivement, les « Jetons numériques »). Vous contrôlez les Jetons numériques contenus dans votre portefeuille. Avec l’Application World, les clés privées (qui représentent le mot de passe d’accès aux Jetons numériques) sont stockées directement sur votre appareil. À tout moment, sous réserve d’avoir un accès à Internet et de la congestion de la blockchain, vous pouvez retirer vos Jetons numériques en les envoyant à une adresse blockchain différente. Lorsque vous conservez vos Jetons numériques dans votre portefeuille, nous ne contrôlons pas votre portefeuille, vos Jetons numériques ou vos clés privées. Les utilisateurs sont responsables du risque de perte de leurs clés privées et ni TFH ni l’Application World ne sont en mesure de récupérer lesdites clés.
Étant donné que l’Application World est un portefeuille non-custodial, vous recevrez une adresse de portefeuille qui spécifie où vos Jetons numériques sont détenus sur la blockchain correspondante. Nous n’avons pas la possibilité d’accéder à vos Jetons numériques.
2.2 Jetons numériques pris en charge.
L’Application World prend en charge certains jetons ERC-20. Nous pourrons ajouter une prise en charge de Jetons numériques supplémentaires à l’avenir. L’Application World affiche les jetons numériques pris en charge.
Assurez-vous de vérifier quels jetons et réseaux sont pris en charge dans l’Application World avant de déposer ou de retirer vos Jetons numériques. Nous ne sommes pas en mesure de récupérer vos Jetons numériques si vous envoyez des jetons non pris en charge ou si vous envoyez des Jetons numériques à la mauvaise adresse de portefeuille.
Vous comprenez que l’envoi de Jetons numériques non pris en charge à une adresse de portefeuille de l’Application World peut entraîner votre perte totale d’accès auxdits Jetons numériques. Nous n’avons aucun moyen de récupérer les Jetons numériques. Assurez-vous d’envoyer les bons Jetons numériques à l’adresse correcte du portefeuille à tout moment. Vous pouvez tester une transaction avec un petit nombre de Jetons numériques.
2.3 Offres et accès.
Lorsque vous interagissez avec vos Jetons numériques, comme lorsque vous les envoyez à une autre adresse de portefeuille ou que vous vous connectez à une application distribuée, en utilisant les Services, vous devrez approuver ou « signer » l’interaction via les appareils que vous avez identifiés pendant le processus d’intégration. Les Applications s’appuient entièrement sur vos approbations desdits appareils afin d’initier des interactions avec la blockchain concernée. Vous comprenez que vous interagissez directement avec la blockchain concernée lorsque vous effectuez ces interactions, et que nous ne sommes pas responsables de la transmission des commandes en votre nom.
2.4 Informations provenant des tiers
En utilisant les Services, vous pouvez avoir accès à des informations relatives à vos Jetons numériques, comme notamment leur valeur marchande actuelle. La présentation de ces informations n’implique aucune association avec des tiers ou approbation de tiers, même si certaines fonctionnalités fournies en lien avec les Services nécessitent l’utilisation de ces produits tiers. Le contenu desdits services et produits tiers tel qu’indiqué via les Services est basé sur des informations rendues publiques ou que ces tiers nous ont fournies, et nous ne faisons donc aucune déclaration ou garantie sur l’exactitude de ces informations relatives aux services ou produits tiers.
2.5 Services tiers
Les Utilisateurs établis ou situés en Allemagne ou ayant leur résidence ou leur siège social ordinaire dans ce pays ne peuvent pas utiliser les Services tiers pour vendre ou échanger leurs Jetons numériques en vertu du présent Article.
Sous réserve de disponibilité, les Services peuvent vous fournir des liens vers des processeurs tiers pour traiter des transactions telles que des achats fiduciaires de Jetons numériques, la vente de Jetons numériques, l’échange de Jetons numériques et d’autres fonctionnalités qui pourraient être disponibles à l’avenir. Vous pouvez voir quels services tiers sont disponibles dans l’Application World. Lorsque vous effectuez ces transactions, vous effectuez des transactions avec des tiers et non avec nous. Vous devez suivre les instructions pertinentes fournies par le fournisseur tiers et accepter leurs conditions générales. Nous ne prenons pas le contrôle de vos fonds ou Jetons numériques ni ne les transmettons à aucun moment pendant la fourniture de nos Services ou lorsque vous accédez à des services tiers.
2.6 Transactions entre pairs
Les Services fournissent une plateforme de communication par laquelle vous pouvez envoyer, demander, recevoir et stocker des Jetons numériques pris en charge à partir d’autres portefeuilles blockchain, qu’ils soient contrôlés par vous ou par des tiers. Votre transfert de Jetons numériques pris en charge entre vos autres portefeuilles blockchain et vers et depuis des tiers est un transfert. La partie à l’origine du transfert est seule responsable de l’exécution correcte de la transaction, ce qui peut inclure, entre autres, le paiement de frais de réseau ou de mineurs suffisants pour que la transaction soit réussie. Des frais de réseau insuffisants peuvent entraîner le maintien d’un transfert dans un état d’attente et peuvent entraîner des retards ou des pertes en raison d’une erreur dans le lancement de la transaction. Nous n’avons aucune obligation d’aider à la correction de ces transactions. Lorsque vous envoyez un Jeton numérique de votre portefeuille à un autre portefeuille blockchain, ces transferts sont exécutés en chaîne par vous et ne sont pas sous notre contrôle. Vous devez vérifier toutes les informations de transaction avant de les soumettre. Nous déclinons toute responsabilité si vous saisissez une adresse de destination de blockchain incorrecte. Les transferts de Jetons numériques ne peuvent pas être inversés une fois qu’ils ont été diffusés sur le réseau blockchain concerné, bien qu’ils puissent être en attente et désignés en conséquence, pendant que la transaction est traitée par les opérateurs réseau. Nous ne contrôlons pas le réseau et ne garantissons pas qu’un transfert sera confirmé par le réseau.
2.7 Coffre
2.7.1 Informations générales.
L’Application World offre le moyen d’accéder à un « coffre » décentralisé pour vos Jetons numériques (« Coffre »). Votre utilisation du Coffre vaut acceptation et reconnaissance des conditions régissant le Coffre, ainsi que de toute condition supplémentaire fournie par des tiers qui ont développé ou fourni des fonctionnalités relatives à ou découlant de votre utilisation du Coffre.
Le Coffre ne prend en charge que certains Jetons numériques. Ces Jetons numériques ne sont pas considérés comme des Jetons référencés sur les actifs ou des Jetons d’argent électronique, dans les conditions fixées par le Règlement (UE) 2023/1114 du Parlement européen et du Conseil du 31 mai 2023 sur les marchés des cryptoactifs. Les Jetons numériques pris en charge s’afficheront dans World App lorsque vous accéderez à votre Coffre. Les Jetons numériques pris en charge par le Coffre peuvent changer de temps à autre, et il n’y a aucune garantie que les Jetons numériques pris en charge resteront disponibles pour une utilisation dans le Coffre.
Le Coffre est fourni dans le cadre de smart contracts tiers. Aucune autre personne ou entité, à part vous, n’a la capacité d’interagir avec votre Coffre ou les Jetons numériques à l’intérieur de votre Coffre. Ni TFH ni aucun tiers n’ont de clés administratives ou d’accès (privilégiés ou autres) à votre Coffre ou aux smart contracts associés. Un dépôt ou un retrait dans le Coffre de tout Jeton numérique pour votre compte ne peut avoir lieu que si une telle transaction est signée avec votre/vos clé(s) privée(s) correspondante(s) décrite(s) à la Section 2.1 des présentes Conditions. Cela signifie que si vous perdez l’accès ou le contrôle de votre/vos clé(s) privée(s), vous ne pourrez pas effectuer de dépôts ou de retraits de Jetons numériques du Coffre et aucune autre partie ne pourra vous aider ou le faire en votre nom. Par conséquent, l’utilisation du Coffre ne vous fournit pas, et ne peut pas fournir, de services de garde, de renflouement ou de transfert par TFH ou tout autre tiers concernant les Jetons numériques que vous pouvez bloquer en utilisant le Coffre sur votre compte.
Le smart contract régissant les fonctions Coffre pour les jetons WLD peut être consulté à l’aide de la blockchain ici. Par souci de clarté, l’utilisation de ces fonctions et de toute autre fonction de Coffre associée est soumise à la même clause de non-responsabilité des garanties contenue dans la Section 12 des présentes Conditions.
2.7.2 Fonctions du Coffre
. Le Coffre offre actuellement les fonctionnalités suivantes, qui peuvent être modifiées, supprimées ou ajoutées par TFH ou des tiers : Verrouillage, Rendement, Retrait et Période de sécurité, Subventions au Coffre.
2.7.3 Verrouillage
. En utilisant le Coffre, vous acceptez de verrouiller vos Jetons numériques pendant une période définie. Le verrouillage des Jetons numériques à l’aide de votre Coffre transférera ces Jetons numériques de votre portefeuille non dépositaire vers un smart contract décentralisé. Lors du transfert, ces Jetons numériques deviendront « verrouillés » dans le coffre, ce qui inclut la période pendant laquelle ils restent déposés dans le Coffre ainsi qu’une durée prédéterminée appelée « Période de Sécurité », qui est décrite plus en détail ci-dessous. Pendant que vos Jetons numériques sont verrouillés, vous ne pourrez pas accéder, transférer ou effectuer d’autres transactions en les utilisant tant que vous n’aurez pas demandé à les retirer et laissé expirer la Période de sécurité applicable. Personne, y compris TFH ou le Prestataire tiers, n’a la possibilité de déverrouiller, conserver, contrôler, retirer ou transférer vos Jetons numériques verrouillés. Placer vos Jetons numériques dans le Coffre et les soumettre aux restrictions de verrouillage et de retrait ne constituent pas une vente, un prêt ou un transfert de tout droit, titre ou intérêt dans les Jetons numériques à TFH ou à tout autre tiers.
Le verrouillage de vos Jetons numériques dans le Coffre ne garantit pas la conservation ou la garde de vos Jetons numériques. Aucun régime d’assurance de dépôt, ou toute autre garantie similaire, ne s’applique à vos Jetons numériques, et la valeur et/ou l’utilité de tous Jetons numériques que vous avez verrouillés peuvent augmenter ou diminuer pendant toute la durée de la Période de sécurité. Cela signifie que la valeur ou l’utilité de tous les Jetons numériques que vous verrouillez dans votre Coffre peut diminuer ou atteindre zéro pendant la Période de sécurité. Vous reconnaissez et acceptez que tout retrait de Jetons numériques sur votre compte après la Période de sécurité applicable peut entraîner le retour de Jetons numériques d’une valeur inférieure, ou nulle, à celle qu’il avait au moment où vous les avez verrouillés dans votre Coffre, et que TFH ni aucun tiers ne prennent le risque ou la responsabilité de toute diminution de valeur qui pourrait survenir.
2.7.4 Rendement.
Vous pouvez également être éligible à la génération de ce qui, aux fins de ce produit, est appelé « rendement » sur certains Jetons numériques dans votre Coffre. Ce rendement, qui peut prendre la forme de Jetons numériques supplémentaires, est fourni par un tiers via une série distincte d’opérations smart contract auxquelles vous pouvez accéder à l’aide de l’interface fournie dans World App. Ni TFH ni aucun tiers n’utilisent, n’assument le contrôle de, ne reçoivent de crédit pour ou n’éliminent autrement vos Jetons numériques. En tant que tel, le rendement n’est pas un intérêt lié ou généré par autre chose que le verrouillage de vos Jetons numériques conformément aux conditions et spécifications fournies. Tout rendement que vous pourriez recevoir vous est fourni en tant que Grant par le tiers en fonction de vos décisions de stocker des Jetons numériques à l’aide du Coffre. Le cahier des charges déterminant la génération du rendement, y compris le montant généré ou le temps sur lequel il peut s’accumuler, peut être modifié ou annulé à tout moment, à la discrétion du Prestataire tiers.
Il peut y avoir un maximum de rendement que vous pouvez gagner. Ces détails seront affichés à côté de votre Coffre et via toute condition supplémentaire fournie par le tiers (identifié comme le « Fournisseur » dans World App) générant le rendement. Ces conditions supplémentaires sont également intégrées aux présentes Conditions. Le rendement n’est pas généré ou servi par TFH.
Tout rendement qui s’accumule ne vous sera distribué qu’à la fin du retrait de tous les Jetons numériques générateurs de rendement du Coffre, ce qui se produit uniquement après l’expiration de toute Période de sécurité applicable. Ce retrait est la condition finale de tout Grant de rendement, ce qui signifie que vous n’avez aucun droit, titre ou intérêt dans tout rendement qui a généré ou sera généré, à moins et jusqu’à ce que le rendement ait été reçu dans votre portefeuille hors dépôt. Cela signifie également que si vous perdez l’accès ou le contrôle de votre/vos clé(s) privée(s), vous ne pourrez pas effectuer de retraits qui vous donneront droit à un rendement.
2.7.5 Période de retrait et de sécurité
Vous pouvez initier un retrait de vos Jetons numériques de votre Coffre à tout moment. Les Jetons numériques que vous avez demandé de retirer de votre Coffre vous seront restitués après une durée prédéfinie appelée « Période de sécurité ». Chaque fois que vous lancez un retrait de Jetons numériques du Coffre, une nouvelle Période de sécurité commencera et comptera jusqu’à ce que ces Jetons numériques vous soient retournés. Pendant cette période, les Jetons numériques que vous avez choisi de retirer resteront verrouillés, et vous pouvez également annuler votre retrait. Une fois la Période de sécurité écoulée, votre retrait sera terminé et les Jetons numériques, ainsi que tout rendement généré qui aurait pu s’accumuler, seront envoyés à votre portefeuille. La durée de la Période de sécurité sera indiquée dans World App lorsque vous accéderez à votre Coffre.
2.7.6 Subventions au Coffre
Une fois cette fonction sélectionnée, vous pouvez envoyer automatiquement les Grants WLD directement dans le Coffre de votre compte plutôt que dans votre portefeuille. Vous pouvez à tout moment changer ce paramètre.
2.7.7 TFH et Coffre.
L’accès à cette fonctionnalité est effectué via World App. Cependant, TFH ne pourra que lire les données associées et vous les présenter. TFH ne peut transférer, retirer ou déposer aucun de vos Jetons numériques et n’a pas accès à votre Coffre.
2.8 Applications décentralisées
La présente section ne s’applique pas aux utilisateurs établis ou situés en Allemagne, qui y sont domiciliés ou y ont leur siège social :
Sous réserve de disponibilité
, nous pouvons avoir des fonctionnalités vous permettant de connecter votre portefeuille à diverses applications décentralisées. Vous êtes seul responsable de la sécurité de ces applications tierces. Nous n’avons aucun contrôle sur les applications tierces et ne pouvons pas fournir d’assistance pour les problèmes que vous pouvez rencontrer lorsque vous vous connectez à des applications tierces.
2.9 Assistance à l’utilisateur
Nous fournissons une assistance à l’utilisateur pour l’assistance avec certaines fonctionnalités et fonctions en lien avec les Services. Pour nous contacter, sélectionnez « Assistance » dans le menu de l’application ou via support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Interface World ID
La Worldcoin Foundation, et non TFH, gère le protocole d’identification mondiale et contrôle le traitement des données liées à l’Orb pour vérifier un World ID. Nous pouvons mettre votre Protocole World ID à votre disposition (en tant qu’interface) par le biais du Service. Le Protocole World ID vous permet de prouver que vous êtes un être humain réel et unique tout en protégeant votre vie privée.
2.11 Programme d’invitation
Sous réserve de disponibilité, nous pouvons mettre à votre disposition la fonction « Inviter ». En utilisant la fonction Inviter, vous pouvez inviter des amis et des membres de votre famille à télécharger World App et à procéder à la vérification sur World ID. Si vous utilisez Inviter, vous acceptez les conditions générales suivantes :
Les récompenses pour la participation à la fonction Inviter sont fournies par World Assets Limited. World Assets Limited peut, à sa seule discrétion, vous offrir une récompense pour l’invitation d’utilisateurs qui procèdent avec succès à la vérification de leur World ID. Afin de recevoir la récompense, vous devez répondre à certaines conditions, qui vous seront expliquées dans World App. Vous avez une limite maximale du nombre d’utilisateurs que vous pouvez référer à l’Application World. Cette limite s’affiche dans l’Application World.
Aucun achat n’est nécessaire pour utiliser la fonction Inviter. La fonction Inviter n’est disponible qu’à des fins personnelles et non commerciales. Vous ne pouvez utiliser la fonction Inviter qu’en toute bonne foi à des fins légales. Vous ne pouvez pas : (a) utiliser la fonction Inviter ou les Services de manière trompeuse, frauduleuse ou illégale ; (b) faire quoi que ce soit pour nuire à notre marque, à notre clientèle ou à notre réputation ; (c) transmettre des supports publicitaires ou promotionnels non sollicités ou non autorisés ; (d) faire des déclarations fausses ou trompeuses ; (e) utiliser des recherches payantes, des médias payants ou toute autre activité similaire pour solliciter des utilisateurs via la fonction Inviter ; et (f) utiliser la fonction Inviter pour essayer d’obtenir des informations personnelles auprès d’autres utilisateurs.
La fonction Inviter n’est pas disponible dans tous les pays ou lieux, et n’est pas disponible pour tous les utilisateurs. La participation à la fonction Inviter n’est disponible dans aucune juridiction où tout ou partie de cette fonctionnalité peut enfreindre (ou nous amener à enfreindre) toute exigence légale. Vous acceptez de ne pas utiliser la fonction Inviter si celle-ci n’est pas conforme à la loi applicable dans votre région.
La fonction Inviter est disponible à notre seule discrétion. Nous pouvons changer, modifier, suspendre et annuler cette fonctionnalité à tout moment. World Assets Limited peut refuser de vous offrir une récompense pour avoir invité les utilisateurs à vérifier leur identifiant World ID lorsqu’elle estime, à sa seule discrétion, que vous avez enfreint les présentes Conditions.
2.12 Subventions et Réservations WLD
L’un des services tiers réclame une petite quantité de WLD à différents intervalles (« Subventions WLD »). Les Subventions WLD sont fournies par World Assets Limited, une filiale de la Worldcoin Foundation. Les montants, intervalles et délais exacts des Subventions WLD seront spécifiés dans l’Application World, mais sont déterminés uniquement par World Assets Limited. Conformément aux versions antérieures des présentes conditions, les Réservations WLD précédemment disponibles ne garantissent pas que vous recevrez des Subventions WLD, quel que soit le montant. Les montants, intervalles et délais exacts des Réservations WLD seront spécifiés dans l’Application World, mais sont déterminés uniquement par World Assets Limited. Les Réservations WLD peuvent expirer, avec ou sans préavis dans l’Application World, que vous ayez ou non déjà effectué une Réservation WLD ou reçu la Subvention WLD associée. Elles sont révocables à la seule discrétion de World Assets Limited.
2.13 Application pour les opérateurs
Pour les Opérateurs Orb et autres partenaires, nous mettons à disposition une Application pour les opérateurs qui vous permet de surveiller certaines activités et statistiques pertinentes pour vous et votre entreprise en tant qu’Opérateurs Orb. Nous pouvons également mettre certaines fonctionnalités à votre disposition pour vous aider à mener vos activités en tant qu’Opérateurs Orb.
2.14. Miniapplis
. « Miniapplis » est une fonctionnalité de World App qui vous permet d’accéder à une plateforme de mini applications accessibles dans World App. Nous avons la seule discrétion de déterminer comment les Miniapplis sont affichées dans World App. Vous devez avoir une adresse World App Wallet pour accéder à Miniapplis.
Vous reconnaissez qu’en affichant Miniapplis, TFH fournit une plateforme technologique qui connecte uniquement les utilisateurs. À aucun moment TFH ne transmet, ne conserve, ne prend possession, ne garde ou ne traite de quelque manière que ce soit avec une monnaie traditionnelle ou numérique. TFH ne traite pas les transactions, n’agit pas en tant qu’organisme de traitement des paiements ni n’est impliquée dans le traitement des transactions. TFH n’est pas partie aux transactions et n’a aucune responsabilité à leur égard. TFH n’est pas en mesure de fournir une assistance concernant les problèmes liés aux transactions.
2.14.1 Transactions et paiements liés aux Miniapplis.
Les Miniapplis sont affichées dans World App et peuvent offrir des biens ou des services que les utilisateurs de World App peuvent acheter en utilisant des Jetons numériques dans leurs portefeuilles World App. Ces transactions ont lieu entre vous et la miniappli. TFH n’est partie à aucune de ces transactions.
En ce qui concerne ces transactions, vous reconnaissez que le portefeuille World App est un service non-custodial, que TFH ne stocke pas ni ne conserve vos Jetons numériques et ne traite pas, ne transmet pas, ne prend pas possession de, ou n’a pas autrement une quelconque implication dans la réalisation des transactions. Les Jetons numériques sont toujours stockés et transmis sur leurs réseaux blockchain respectifs. Il n’y a aucune garantie que les transactions seront traitées correctement.
TFH vous connecte uniquement à un tiers sur la plateforme Miniapplis et n’est partie à aucune transaction. TFH n’a aucun rôle dans le traitement des paiements et la gouvernance des frais de remboursement ou d’annulation.
Une fois que vous avez décidé d’effectuer une transaction, vous devez envoyer le montant et le type convenus de Jetons numériques. TFH ne traite pas les Jetons numériques ou la devise traditionnelle de l’utilisateur et n’effectue aucun transfert au nom des utilisateurs. TFH ne traite pas, ne gère pas, ne supervise pas, ne vérifie pas et ne fournit aucune garantie sur les transactions. Si la transaction n’est pas reçue, si elle est annulée, si elle n’est pas traitée correctement ou si elle est entachée d’une erreur, vous et les fournisseurs tiers devez collaborer pour résoudre le problème. Tous les litiges, réclamations, pertes, malentendus, erreurs techniques ou problèmes de toute nature (à la fois accidentels et présumés intentionnels) liés aux paiements ou aux transactions doivent être traités directement entre vous et le fournisseur tiers. TFH décline toute responsabilité et ne sera pas partie à des litiges ou discussions liés au paiement, et n’est pas non plus responsable des pertes ou dommages que les parties impliquées peuvent subir.
Vous êtes seul responsable d’accepter le risque de fluctuations de prix concernant la valeur des Jetons numériques, et comprenez qu’au moment où vous effectuez une transaction, la valeur des Jetons numériques faisant l’objet de la transaction peut avoir évolué de manière significative.
2.14.2 Tiers.
Les produits et services affichés dans toute miniappli sont proposés et gérés par des tiers. En utilisant Miniapplis, vous reconnaissez et acceptez que :
Les présentes Conditions sont conclues entre vous et nous, et non avec une miniappli spécifique ;
Vous accédez à une application développée et/ou fournie par une application tierce, et ce tiers est seul responsable de la miniappli ;
TFH ne donne accès qu’à des prestataires de paiement tiers via le portefeuille de l’Application World, et ne traite pas elle-même les paiements ni ne détient de fonds ;
Les miniapplis peuvent avoir des conditions supplémentaires dans le cadre de leurs produits ou services que vous devez respecter si vous acceptez leur service ; et
Vous reconnaissez et assumez explicitement tous les risques liés aux transactions, et convenez que nous ne serons pas responsables des risques ou conséquences négatives découlant de ces transactions.
Les Développeurs individuels des miniapplis disponibles sur Miniapplis sont seuls responsables du contenu, des produits, des biens ou des services mis à votre disposition directement via leurs miniapplis respectives. Pour toute question ou litige, vous devez contacter directement le Développeur concerné.
Les utilisateurs acceptent tous les risques liés à la réalisation d’une transaction, y compris le risque qu’ils ne reçoivent pas le produit de leur achat ou de leur vente. En cas de problème concernant une transaction, TFH n’est pas en mesure d’aider à la résolution, et n’assume aucune responsabilité pour les problèmes découlant d’une transaction.
2.14.3 Frais TFH.
Nous pouvons ajouter des frais pour l’utilisation de Miniapplis lorsque vous effectuez une transaction avec un Développeur. Le montant de ces frais vous sera indiqué sur la plateforme. Tous ces frais seront affichés et à jour comme indiqué dans Miniapplis et peuvent être mis à jour et modifiés de temps à autre.
2.14.4 Taxes
. Il est de votre seule responsabilité de déterminer si, et dans quelle mesure, toute taxe s’applique à toute transaction via Miniapplis ou toute transaction que vous y effectuez, et de retenir, collecter, déclarer et verser le montant correct de la taxe aux autorités fiscales compétentes.
2.14.5 Pas de surveillance générale.
TFH n’aura aucune obligation générale de surveiller les informations générées par les utilisateurs, ni de rechercher activement des faits ou des circonstances indiquant une activité illégale au sein de Miniapplis.
Cependant, si nous apprenons, quels que soient les moyens utilisés, qu’un produit ou service illégal a été proposé via Miniapplis à des utilisateurs situés dans l’Union européenne, nous informerons les utilisateurs qui ont acheté le produit ou service illégal via Miniapplis
.
2.14.6 Activités interdites
. Les utilisateurs des Services Miniapplis acceptent de ne pas publier ou distribuer de contenu qui violerait les lois ou les droits de tiers, y compris, mais sans s’y limiter, les droits de propriété intellectuelle, les droits à la vie privée ou les droits de publicité.
De plus, vous acceptez de ne pas vous livrer à des activités qui :
sont illégales frauduleuses ou nuisibles ;
interfèrent avec le fonctionnement des Miniapplis ou les perturbent ;
violent les conditions énoncées dans nos Directives relatives aux applications ; et
renferment un contenu non autorisé en vertu des Directives de l’application.
2.14.7 Signalement du contenu illégal.
L’Application World dispose de mécanismes faciles d’accès et conviviaux permettant aux utilisateurs de nous informer du contenu illégal sur la plateforme Miniapplis. Nous agirons rapidement pour examiner ces signalements.
2.14.8 Suppression du contenu illégal.
Si nous déterminons qu’une miniappli contient du contenu illégal ou propose des produits ou services illégaux, elle sera supprimée de Miniapplis. TFH fournira une déclaration brève, claire et spécifique des raisons à toute personne ayant publié du contenu ou des services illégaux.
Toute restriction appliquée par l’Application World à ses utilisateurs sera effectuée avec diligence, objectivité et proportionnalité.
Les utilisateurs qui pensent que leur contenu a été supprimé ou que l’accès à celui-ci a été désactivé de manière injustifiée peuvent nous contacter à l’adresse
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
pour faire appel de la décision. Nous mettons à disposition un système de réclamation électronique gratuit permettant aux utilisateurs de contester nos décisions relatives à la suppression de contenu, à la suspension de service, à la résiliation de compte ou aux restrictions de monétisation en raison de violations présumées de contenu ou de conditions illégales.
2.14.9 Modération du contenu.
TFH se réserve le droit de suspendre, pendant une période raisonnable et après avoir émis un avertissement préalable lorsque la loi l’exige, la fourniture de nos services aux utilisateurs qui fournissent fréquemment du contenu manifestement illégal. TFH peut également suspendre temporairement le traitement des avis et des plaintes des utilisateurs soumettant fréquemment des réclamations non fondées.
2.15. Noms d’utilisateur
. Votre nom d’utilisateur sur l’Application World ne doit pas nécessairement être votre vrai nom. Lorsque vous choisissez un nom d’utilisateur, vous êtes tenu de respecter la
Politique relative aux noms d’utilisateur
dans sa version la plus récente.
3. Achats, frais et taxes
3.1 Frais de transaction.
En utilisant les Services, vous acceptez de payer tous les frais applicables, y compris les frais de transaction pour les échanges et transactions de Jetons numériques. Nous vous informerons de tous les frais applicables avant que vous ne réalisiez une transaction. Si vous utilisez un service de paiement tiers, les frais bancaires, les frais de carte de crédit et de carte de débit facturés pour tout achat de Jetons numériques peuvent être déduits du montant réglé de vos achats de Jetons numériques. Vous êtes également responsable du paiement des frais supplémentaires facturés par votre prestataire de services financiers.
3.2 Frais de réseau.
Les interactions avec la blockchain entraînent également des frais de réseau. Les frais de réseau sont facturés et payés au réseau blockchain, et non à nous, pour faciliter les interactions. Dans certains cas, vous pouvez être éligible à un nombre limité de transactions sans frais de gaz dans une période donnée déterminée à la discrétion absolue de TFH. Ces transactions sont soumises à une valeur de transaction minimale que TFH peut ajuster.
3.3 Taxes.
Il est de votre seule responsabilité de déterminer si, et dans quelle mesure, toute taxe s’applique à toute transaction via les Services, et de retenir, collecter, déclarer et verser le montant correct de la taxe aux autorités fiscales compétentes.
3.4 Mises à jour.
Tous les frais sont affichés et à jour comme indiqué dans les Services et peuvent être mis à jour et modifiés de temps à autre.
4. Facteurs de risque
4.1 Cours non légal.
Les Jetons numériques ne sont pas des cours légaux, ne sont soutenus par aucun gouvernement, et les comptes de Jetons numériques et les soldes de valeur sur les Services ne sont pas soumis aux protections de la Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, de la Securities Investor Protection Corporation ou à des protections similaires disponibles dans d’autres pays. Nous ne sommes pas une banque et ne proposons pas de services fiduciaires. Les transactions effectuées sur l’Application World sont en grande partie non réglementées dans de nombreux pays. Nous ne donnons aucune garantie quant à la fonctionnalité des blockchains que nous prenons en charge, ce qui pourrait, entre autres, entraîner des retards, des conflits d’intérêts ou des décisions opérationnelles par des tiers qui sont défavorables à certains propriétaires de Jetons numériques, ou entraîner votre incapacité à effectuer une transaction en utilisant les Services. Les détails de transaction que vous soumettez via les Services peuvent ne pas être réalisés, ou peuvent être substantiellement retardés sur la blockchain applicable, et nous déclinons toute responsabilité en cas d’échec de confirmation ou de traitement d’une transaction comme prévu. Il n’existe aucune garantie qu’un transfert initié via les Services transférera avec succès le titre ou le droit sur un Jeton numérique. En outre, des risques spécifiques peuvent être associés à l’utilisation de certains Jetons numériques, tels que WLD. Des informations supplémentaires sur les risques spécifiques à WLD sont disponibles ici.
4.2 Nouvelle technologie.
Les Services sont nouveaux. Bien que ce logiciel ait été largement testé, le logiciel utilisé pour les Services est encore relativement nouveau et pourrait présenter des bogues ou des vulnérabilités de la sécurité. De plus, le logiciel est toujours en cours de développement et des changements importants peuvent lui être apportés au fil du temps qui pourraient ne pas répondre aux attentes des utilisateurs.
4.3 Risque pour la sécurité des informations.
Les Jetons numériques et l’utilisation des Services peuvent faire l’objet d’une expropriation ou d’un vol. Les pirates ou autres groupes ou organisations malveillants peuvent tenter d’interférer avec les Services de diverses manières, y compris notamment par des attaques de logiciels malveillants, attaques par déni de service, attaques de consensus, attaques Sybil et l’usurpation d’identité. En outre, étant donné que les réseaux blockchain que nous prenons en charge, tels que le protocole Ethereum, reposent sur un logiciel open source, le logiciel sous-jacent aux Services peut contenir des bogues ou des faiblesses intentionnels ou involontaires qui peuvent affecter négativement les Services ou entraîner la perte des Jetons numériques de l’utilisateur ou la perte de la capacité de l’utilisateur à accéder à son portefeuille ou à le contrôler via les Services. Dans le cas d’un tel bogue ou d’une telle faiblesse du logiciel, il peut n’y avoir aucun recours et les utilisateurs ne sont pas garantis de disposer de tout recours ou d’avoir droit à tout remboursement ou toute indemnisation.
4.4 Précision.
Bien que nous cherchions à fournir des informations exactes et opportunes par le biais des Services (y compris notamment le contenu), celles-ci peuvent ne pas toujours être entièrement exactes, complètes ou à jour et peuvent également inclure des inexactitudes techniques ou des erreurs typographiques. Afin de continuer à vous fournir des informations aussi complètes et exactes que possible, les informations peuvent, dans la mesure autorisée par la loi applicable, être modifiées ou mises à jour de temps à autre sans préavis, y compris notamment les informations concernant nos politiques, produits et services. Par conséquent, vous devez vérifier toutes les informations avant de vous fonder sur celles-ci, et toutes les décisions basées sur les informations fournies par le biais des Services relèvent de votre seule responsabilité et nous n’aurons aucune responsabilité pour ces décisions.
4.5 Disponibilité.
Bien que nous nous efforcions de vous fournir un excellent service, nous ne garantissons pas que les Services seront disponibles sans interruption. Les Services peuvent être temporairement indisponibles pour des raisons de maintenance ou autres. Nous déclinons toute responsabilité en cas d’erreur, d’omission, d’interruption, de suppression, de défaut, de retard de fonctionnement ou de transmission, de défaillance de ligne de communication, de vol ou de destruction, ou d’accès non autorisé aux communications des utilisateurs ou de modification de celles-ci. Nous ne sommes pas responsables de tous problèmes ou dysfonctionnements techniques d’un réseau ou de lignes téléphoniques, de systèmes informatiques en ligne, de serveurs ou de fournisseurs, d’équipements informatiques, de logiciels, de défaillances d’e-mails ou de lecteurs en raison de problèmes techniques ou de congestions de trafic sur Internet ou sur les Services ou leur combinaison, y compris les préjudices ou dommages causés aux utilisateurs ou à l’ordinateur de toute autre personne liés à ou résultant de la participation ou du téléchargement de documents en relation avec les Services. Nous ne sommes pas responsables de toutes pertes ou tous dommages, dommages financiers ou pertes de profits, pertes d’activité, dommages corporels ou décès résultant de l’utilisation du Service par quiconque, de tout Contenu publié sur ou via le Service ou transmis aux utilisateurs, ou de toute interaction entre les utilisateurs des Services, en ligne ou hors ligne.
4.6 Forks.
Le logiciel utilisé pour créer des WLD est un logiciel libre, que chacun peut copier et utiliser gratuitement. Cela signifie que n’importe qui peut créer une version modifiée de WLD, autrement désignée comme un « Fork ». Dans l’éventualité d’un Fork ou de toute autre perturbation du réseau de Jetons numériques, nous pourrions ne pas être en mesure de soutenir toute activité liée au Fork. Les transactions peuvent ne pas être terminées, être partiellement ou incorrectement complétées, ou considérablement retardées lorsqu’un Fork se produit. Nous ne sommes pas responsables des pertes que vous subissez qui sont causées en tout ou partie par un Fork ou une autre perturbation du réseau.
4.7 Services tiers.
Le cas échéant (cf. section 2.5), nous nous appuyons sur des prestataires de services tiers afin de fournir certaines fonctionnalités au sein des Applications, par exemple la possibilité d’acheter des Actifs numériques en devise fiduciaire, ou la possibilité d’échanger un Jeton numérique pour un autre. Nous ne fournissons pas les services précités, et nous ne sommes pas parties à une telle transaction. Vous vous appuyez uniquement sur des prestataires tiers pour de tels services, et vous devez avoir un compte auprès des prestataires tiers et accepter leurs conditions. Nous
Nous ne sommes pas en mesure de vous aider si vous rencontrez des problèmes en utilisant leur service, et nous ne sommes responsables d’aucune transaction que vous effectuez avec des prestataires tiers.
5. Propriété intellectuelle.
5.1 Propriété.
Nos logiciels, l’application, les Services, le Contenu, les Marques (telles que définies ci-dessous) et la conception, la sélection et l’arrangement du Contenu dans les Services (la « PI ») sont protégés par des droits d’auteur, des marques commerciales, des brevets et d’autres droits de propriété intellectuelle et lois des États-Unis et d’autres pays applicables. Vous acceptez de vous conformer à tous les droits de propriété intellectuelle et lois applicables, ainsi qu’à tous les avis ou restrictions relatifs aux marques commerciales ou aux droits d’auteur contenus dans le Contrat ou les Services. Vous ne pourrez pas supprimer tout droit d’auteur, marque commerciale ou autres avis d’exclusivité figurant dans la PI.
5.2 Marques commerciales.
Le nom de Tools for Humanity Corporation, le logo World App et tous les logos et slogans connexes sont des marques commerciales ou des marques de service de Tools for Humanity Corporation ou de ses concédants (les « Marques »). Vous ne pouvez pas copier, imiter ou utiliser les Marques, en tout ou en partie, sans notre autorisation écrite. L’ensemble des autres marques commerciales, noms ou logos mentionnés en lien avec les Services sont la propriété de leurs propriétaires respectifs et vous ne pouvez pas les copier, les imiter ou les utiliser, en tout ou en partie, sans l’autorisation écrite du propriétaire de la marque commerciale concernée. L’inclusion de marques d’autrui dans les Services ne constitue pas une approbation ou une recommandation de notre part.
6. Licence et restrictions
6.1 Licence.
À condition que vous soyez éligible à l’utilisation des Services et sous réserve de votre respect des présentes Conditions, nous vous accordons par les présentes une licence limitée pour accéder aux Services et les utiliser.
6.2 Restrictions de licence.
Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à republier le Contenu sur un site Internet, Intranet ou Extranet, ni à intégrer les informations dans toute autre base de données ou compilation, et toute autre utilisation du Contenu est strictement interdite. Toute utilisation des Services autre que celle spécifiquement autorisée dans les présentes, sans notre autorisation écrite préalable, est strictement interdite et mettra fin à la licence accordée dans les présentes. Une telle utilisation non autorisée peut également enfreindre les lois applicables, y compris notamment les lois sur les droits d’auteur et les marques commerciales, ainsi que les réglementations et lois applicables en matière de communication. Sauf mention contraire explicite dans les présentes Conditions, aucune disposition ne saurait être interprétée comme conférant une licence sur les droits de propriété intellectuelle, que ce soit par préclusion, implication ou autrement. Nous pouvons révoquer cette licence à tout moment sans préavis et avec ou sans motif, dans la limite autorisée par le droit applicable.
6.3 Gouvernement.
Si vous êtes un utilisateur final du gouvernement des États-Unis, nous vous concédons sous licence les Services en tant qu’« Article commercial » tel que ce terme est défini dans le Code des règlements fédéraux (Code of Federal Regulations) des États-Unis (voir 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), et les droits que nous vous accordons à l’égard des Services sont les mêmes que les droits que nous accordons à tous les autres utilisateurs en vertu des présentes Conditions.
7. Utilisation acceptable
7.1
Vous ne pouvez utiliser les Services que pour votre usage personnel. Nous nous réservons le droit, à tout moment et à notre seule discrétion, d’examiner, d’annuler ou de suspendre votre accès aux Services ou votre utilisation des Services conformément au droit applicable. Les éléments figurant sur la liste des Utilisations interdites ne sont que des exemples et la liste n’est pas exhaustive. Nous sommes susceptibles d’ajouter ou de supprimer des types d’utilisations interdites à notre seule discrétion conformément au droit applicable.
7.2 Exemples d’utilisations interdites :
Activité illégale :
Toute activité qui enfreindrait, ou aiderait à enfreindre, tout programme de sanctions géré par l’OFAC ou toute loi dans les pays où nous exerçons nos activités, qui impliquerait le produit d’une activité illégale ou toute publication, distribution ou diffusion de ressources ou informations illégales.
Utilisation excessive ou piratage :
Toute activité qui impose une charge déraisonnable ou disproportionnée à notre infrastructure, ou qui interfère de manière préjudiciable avec des systèmes, données ou informations, qui les intercepte ou les exproprie, qui transmet ou met en ligne toute ressource sur les Services contenant des virus, chevaux de Troie, vers informatiques ou tout autre programme nuisible ou dangereux ou qui tente d’obtenir un accès non autorisé aux systèmes informatiques ou aux réseaux connectés aux Services.
Mauvais traitements à autrui :
Toute activité qui interfère avec l’accès aux Services ou avec leur utilisation par une autre personne, diffame, dénigre, extorque, harcèle, traque, menace ou viole ou enfreint autrement la vie privée, la propriété intellectuelle ou tout autre droit légal d’une autre personne, incite, menace, facilite, promeut ou encourage la haine, l’intolérance raciale ou des actes violents à l’encontre d’autres personnes ; ou
recueille, obtient par « scraping » ou collecte les données d’un autre utilisateur à partir des Services sans autorisation.
Fraude et autres pratiques commerciales déloyales :
Toute activité qui consiste à nous escroquer nous, nos utilisateurs ou toute autre personne, à nous fournir des informations fausses, inexactes ou trompeuses, à promettre des récompenses déraisonnablement élevées ou à vendre un service sans avantage supplémentaire pour l’acheteur, y compris toute autre pratique prédatrice et trompeuse, ou à promettre des loteries, tombolas, enchères, concours, tirages au sort, jeux d’argent ou tout autre jeu de hasard illégaux.
Violation de la propriété intellectuelle :
Toute activité qui implique la vente, la distribution ou le fait de fournir l’accès à de la musique, des films, des logiciels contrefaits, ou d’autres ressources sous licence sans l’autorisation appropriée du détenteur des droits, l’utilisation de la PI (y compris de la Marque) sans consentement exprès ou d’une manière qui nous porterait préjudice à nous ou notre marque, qui implique une approbation ou une affiliation mensongères avec nous ou tout qui enfreint ou viole tout droit d’auteur, marque commerciale, droit de publicité ou à la vie privée, ou tout autre droit exclusif en vertu de la loi.
8. Opérateurs Orb
Nous collaborons avec des prestataires indépendants locaux appelés « Opérateurs Orb », qui facilitent l’inscription des utilisateurs et aident à répondre aux questions que vous pourriez avoir sur nous. Ces Opérateurs Orb ont reçu une formation et connaissent bien le Réseau World. Cependant, nous n’avons aucun contrôle et déclinons toute responsabilité quant à ce qu’ils disent ou à la manière dont ils se conduisent.
Les Opérateurs Orb ne sont en aucune manière nos représentants ou employés. Tout(e) effort, fonctionnalité, processus, politique, norme ou tout autre effort entrepris par TFH dans l’intérêt de ses utilisateurs n’indiquent pas une relation d’emploi ou de mandat avec un Opérateur Orb.
9. Suspension
Nous pouvons suspendre et restreindre votre accès aux Services : (i) Nous sommes tenus de le faire par une assignation à comparaître, une ordonnance du tribunal, ou une ordonnance contraignante d’une autorité gouvernementale valable ; (ii) Nous soupçonnons raisonnablement que vous utilisez le Service dans le cadre d’une Utilisation interdite ; (iii) Votre utilisation des Services fait l’objet de tout litige, toute enquête, ou procédure gouvernementale en cours ou nous percevons un risque accru de non-conformité légale ou réglementaire associée à votre activité ; (iv) Nos partenaires de service ne sont pas en mesure de prendre en charge votre utilisation ; (v) Vous prenez toute mesure que nous considérons comme contournant nos contrôles (comme notamment la tentative de créer plusieurs comptes).
10. Ne constitue pas une offre de titres ou d’intérêts sur des marchandises
Le contenu des Services ne constitue pas une offre d’achat ou de vente ou la sollicitation d’une offre d’achat ou de vente d’investissements, de titres, de participation dans une société, de marchandises ou de tout autre instrument financier. Le contenu ou les Services ne constituent pas non plus, et ne peuvent pas être utilisés pour ou en relation avec, une offre ou une sollicitation par toute personne dans un État ou territoire dans lequel une telle offre ou sollicitation n’est pas autorisée, ou à toute personne à qui il est illégal de faire une telle offre ou sollicitation.
11. Contenu
11.1 Confiance dans le contenu et modifications apportées aux Services.
Les informations et les documents que nous vous fournissons par l’intermédiaire des Services (« Contenu ») sont uniquement fournis à des fins d’information générale et nous ne garantissons pas leur exactitude, leur utilité ou leur exhaustivité, dans la mesure autorisée par le droit applicable. Toute confiance que vous placez dans notre Contenu est strictement à vos propres risques. Nous n’avons aucune responsabilité quant aux actions que vous prenez ou ne prenez pas en raison du Contenu, ou pour toute personne avec laquelle vous partagez le Contenu. Les déclarations d’autres utilisateurs décrivant leur utilisation de nos Services trouvés sur les Services ou ailleurs ne doivent pas être considérées comme notre approbation de leurs déclarations si les déclarations sont incompatibles avec les présentes Conditions ou notre Contenu. Nous pouvons mettre à jour le Contenu de temps à autre, mais ledit Contenu peut ne pas être complet ou à jour, et nous n’avons aucune obligation envers vous de mettre à jour le Contenu ou toute autre partie des Services. Nous pouvons modifier ou interrompre, temporairement ou définitivement, tout ou partie du Contenu ou des Services sans vous en informer au préalable, dans la limite autorisée par le droit applicable. Nous ne serons pas responsables de toute modification, suspension ou interruption de tout ou partie du Contenu ou des Services, dans la limite autorisée par le droit applicable.
11.2 Services et contenu tiers.
Nous pouvons fournir des liens vers des ressources pédagogiques, des webinaires, des rencontres et des promotions sur des plateformes de réseaux sociaux (« Services tiers ») qui permettent le partage et la collaboration entre les utilisateurs et d’autres tiers. Si vous partagez des informations personnelles, des images, des opinions, du contenu ou d’autres données sur ces services, vous le faites à vos propres risques, et votre utilisation de ces services est soumise aux conditions d’utilisation et aux politiques de protection des données de ces services, et non aux nôtres. Vous devez consulter les conditions d’utilisation de chaque Service tiers pour mieux comprendre vos droits et la manière dont ces plateformes utilisent vos données. Nous ne sommes pas responsables des pertes, vols, compromissions ou utilisations abusives de vos données en lien avec tout Service tiers (y compris
la négligence), sauf dans la mesure où cette responsabilité ne peut pas être limitée en vertu des lois applicables. Vous utilisez toute information fournie par un Service tiers (« Contenu tiers ») à vos propres risques, et nous ne vous promettons pas que tout Contenu tiers est exact, complet, authentique ou approprié à votre situation personnelle. Le Contenu tiers comprend des informations fournies par d’autres utilisateurs qui ne sont pas spécifiquement approuvées par nous.
11.3 Contenu utilisateur.
En tant que membre de la communauté Worldcoin, vous pouvez publier des messages, des données, des logiciels, des images, des vidéos ou d’autres contenus (« Contenu utilisateur ») sur des forums de discussion, des blogs, des comptes de réseaux sociaux que nous détenons ainsi que divers autres emplacements accessibles au public sur les Services. Ces plateformes peuvent être hébergées par nous ou un Prestataire de services tiers en notre nom. Vous êtes responsable de l’ensemble du Contenu utilisateur que vous envoyez, mettez en ligne, publiez ou stockez à travers les Services. Vous devez fournir tous les avertissements, informations et déclarations requis et appropriés concernant votre Contenu utilisateur. Nous ne sommes pas responsables du Contenu utilisateur que vous soumettez par le biais des Services.
11.4 Licence du contenu utilisateur.
En nous envoyant du Contenu utilisateur, vous déclarez que vous disposez de tous les droits nécessaires sur le Contenu utilisateur et vous nous accordez par les présentes une licence perpétuelle, mondiale, non exclusive, libre de redevances, pouvant faire l’objet d’une sous-licence et transférable pour utiliser tout ou partie du Contenu utilisateur, le reproduire, le distribuer, préparer des œuvres dérivées de celui-ci, le modifier, l’afficher et l’exécuter en relation avec notre marketing et nos promotions, et à d’autres fins commerciales légitimes liées aux Services. Nous pouvons redistribuer tout ou partie des œuvres dérivées de votre Contenu utilisateur dans tous les formats de médias et par tous les canaux de médias que nous choisissons. Par les présentes, vous nous accordez également à nous et à d’autres utilisateurs une licence non exclusive d’utilisation, d’accès, de reproduction, de distribution, de modification et d’affichage de votre Contenu utilisateur par le biais des Services. La Section 11.4 s’appliquera dans toute la mesure permise par le droit applicable.
11.5 Restrictions du contenu utilisateur.
Vous acceptez de ne pas utiliser les Services et de ne permettre à aucun tiers de les utiliser pour publier ou transmettre tout Contenu utilisateur qui : (a) est diffamatoire, ou qui divulgue des informations privées ou personnelles concernant toute personne ; (b) est indécent, obscène, pornographique, menaçant, abusif, haineux, racialement ou ethniquement offensant ou qui constitue du harcèlement, qui encourage une conduite qui serait considérée comme une infraction pénale, qui donnerait lieu à une responsabilité civile ou enfreindrait une loi, ou qui est autrement inapproprié ; (c) qui serait en violation des droits de propriété intellectuelle d’autrui, y compris du texte protégé par droit d’auteur non autorisé, des images ou programmes, des secrets commerciaux ou d’autres informations exclusives confidentielles, ou des marques commerciales ou marques de service utilisées d’une manière illicite ; ou (d) interfère de manière déraisonnable avec l’utilisation des Services par un autre utilisateur. Vous nous déclarez que vous publiez volontairement le Contenu utilisateur sur les Services et que par conséquent, la publication du Contenu utilisateur ne crée pas de relation employeur-employé entre vous et nous. Vous ne pouvez pas copier ou utiliser des adresses e-mail, numéros de téléphone portable, soldes, noms d’utilisateur ou toute autre information personnelle concernant d’autres utilisateurs sans leur autorisation. Les e-mails, courriers, appels téléphoniques ou autres communications non sollicités adressés à d’autres utilisateurs par l’intermédiaire des Services ou sur tout autre canal sont interdits.
11.6 Plaintes et retraits en application de la loi DMCA.
Si vous pensez que votre marque commerciale ou votre œuvre protégée est violée par notre Contenu ou par un Contenu utilisateur figurant sur les Services ou qu’elle est autrement publiée d’une manière suggérant une approbation par ou une affiliation avec nous, veuillez nous envoyer un e-mail à l’adresse legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com en indiquant l’objet « Plainte [relative à une marque commerciale/un droit d’auteur] », selon le cas. Pour que votre plainte soit prise en compte et pour que nous puissions prendre des mesures en vertu du Digital Millennium Copyright Act (« DMCA »), vous devez respecter toutes les exigences du DMCA en incluant les informations suivantes dans votre e-mail :
l’identification claire de l’œuvre protégée par le droit d’auteur ou de la marque prétendument violée, y compris le numéro d’enregistrement du droit d’auteur si l’œuvre est enregistrée ;
l’identification du travail ou de la marque prétendument contrefaisants et dont vous souhaitez le retrait ;
l’URL ou une autre direction claire nous permettant de localiser le contenu prétendument contrefaisant ;
Votre adresse e-mail, votre adresse postale et votre numéro de téléphone ; et
une déclaration signée indiquant que vous croyez de bonne foi que le contenu est contrefaisant, que les informations que vous fournissez sont correctes, et que vous êtes le propriétaire ou que vous êtes autorisé à représenter le propriétaire du contenu.
Vous devez également savoir qu’en vertu de l’article 512(f) du DMCA, toute personne qui envoie sciemment des avis de violation sans fondement peut être tenue de verser des dommages-intérêts, veuillez donc ne pas faire de fausses déclarations. Nous pouvons partager toute information ou correspondance que vous nous fournissez avec des tiers, y compris la personne qui a mis en ligne le contenu prétendument contrefaisant sur le Service.
Lorsque nous recevons un avis de contrefaçon de bonne foi, notre politique nous impose de : (a) supprimer le contenu contrefaisant ou d’en désactiver immédiatement l’accès ; (b) informer la personne qui a mis en ligne le contenu contrefaisant que nous avons supprimé ledit contenu ou en avons désactivé l’accès ; et (c) pour les contrevenants
récidivistes, résilier leur accès aux Services. Si nous recevons un avis de contestation de la part de cette personne, nous pouvons vous en envoyer une copie expliquant que nous pouvons restaurer le contenu supprimé ou cesser de le désactiver dans un délai de 10 jours ouvrables. À moins que vous n’intentiez une action en justice à notre encontre ou à l’encontre de la personne qui a mis en ligne le contenu, nous rétablirons, à notre discrétion, l’accès au contenu supprimé dans un délai de 10 à 14 jours ouvrables ou plus après réception de l’avis de contestation.
12. EXCLUSION DE GARANTIES
12.1 Vous utilisez les Services à vos propres risques. Les Services, WLD, le contenu et toutes les autres PI sont fournis « EN L’ÉTAT » et « SOUS RÉSERVE DE DISPONIBILITÉ » sans aucune déclaration ou garantie, qu’elle soit expresse, implicite ou légale. Dans la mesure maximale autorisée par la loi applicable, nous déclinons spécifiquement toute garantie implicite de titre, de valeur marchande, d’adéquation à un usage particulier ou d’absence de contrefaçon quant aux caractéristiques, au contenu ou à d’autres PI figurant dans les Services. Certaines juridictions n’autorisent pas l’exclusion des garanties implicites, de sorte que les exclusions ci-dessus peuvent ne pas vous être applicables. Nous n’approuvons, ne garantissons ni n’assumons la responsabilité des publicités, offres ou déclarations faites par des tiers, y compris d’autres utilisateurs concernant les Services.
12.2 Nous ne faisons aucune déclaration ni ne donnons aucune garantie selon laquelle (a) l’accès à tout ou partie des Services sera continu, ininterrompu, opportun, sécurisé ou exempt d’erreur ; (b) les Services ou le contenu sont exacts, complets, fiables ou actuels ; (c) les Services sont exempts de virus ou d’autres composants nuisibles ; ou (d) les Services ou le contenu répondront à vos exigences, besoins ou attentes.
12.3 En outre, nous ne faisons aucune déclaration ni ne donnons aucune garantie quant à la légalité des Services ou de WLD pour tout cas d’utilisation, ou selon laquelle les Services ou WLD répondront à des besoins réglementaires ou de conformité. Vous êtes également responsable d’identifier et de respecter toutes les restrictions et exigences légales et réglementaires qui peuvent régir votre utilisation des Services ou de WLD. À l’exception des déclarations expresses énoncées dans les présentes Conditions, vous reconnaissez et acceptez par les présentes ne pas vous être fondé sur toute autre déclaration ou entente, écrite ou orale, concernant votre accès aux Services ou à WLD et leur utilisation.
12.4 Nous n’agissons pas et ne pouvons pas agir en tant que conseiller en ce qui concerne toute question financière, juridique, d’investissement ou fiscale. Tout contenu n’est valable qu’à la date indiquée. Toutes les projections, estimations, prévisions, cibles et/ou opinions exprimées ici sont soumises à des risques, incertitudes et hypothèses, et peuvent donc être incorrectes et peuvent changer sans préavis. On ne doit se fier à aucun contenu.
Certaines informations ici peuvent avoir été obtenues auprès de sources tierces. Bien que ces sources soient considérées comme fiables, nous n’avons pas vérifié de manière indépendante toutes ces informations et ne faisons aucune déclaration quant à leur exactitude. Nous ne sommes pas un courtier-négociant agréé ou un conseiller en investissement. Nous ne faisons aucune déclaration et rejetons spécifiquement toutes les garanties, expresses, implicites ou statutaires, concernant l’exactitude, la ponctualité ou l’exhaustivité de tout matériel contenu dans les Services. Notre contenu est fourni à titre d’information générale uniquement et vous êtes seul responsable de déterminer si vous souhaitez ou non utiliser les Services. Vous reconnaissez que la négociation, l’utilisation et la détention de Jetons numériques sont intrinsèquement risquées. Vous risquez de perdre tous les fonds de votre portefeuille. Vous reconnaissez que le Service peut être soumis à des restrictions à l’exportation et à des sanctions économiques imposées par le droit des États-Unis.
12.5 Nous ne sommes pas responsable envers vous ou un tiers de toute modification ou résiliation des Services, ou de la suspension ou de la résiliation de votre accès aux Services.
13. LIMITATION DE RESPONSABILITÉ
13.1 Nous n’excluons pas ni ne limitons notre responsabilité envers vous lorsqu’il serait illégal de le faire. Dans les pays où les types d’exclusions ci-dessous ne sont pas autorisés, nous ne sommes responsables envers vous que des pertes et dommages qui sont un résultat raisonnablement prévisible de notre manquement à faire preuve d’un soin et d’une compétence raisonnables ou de notre violation de notre contrat avec vous. Le présent paragraphe n’affecte pas les droits des consommateurs qui ne peuvent être annulés ou limités par un contrat ou un accord.
13.2 Dans la mesure autorisée par la loi, vous convenez qu’en aucun cas nous ou nos dirigeants, administrateurs, salariés, entrepreneurs, mandataires, sociétés affiliées, ou filiales (les « Parties TFH ») ne serons responsables envers vous en cas de dommages-intérêts indirects, punitifs, accessoires, spéciaux, consécutifs ou exemplaires, y compris les dommages-intérêts pour perte de profits, de réputation, d’utilisation, de données, ou d’autres biens incorporels, que cette responsabilité soit invoquée sur la base d’un délit ou autrement, et que les Parties TFH aient été informées ou non de la possibilité de tels dommages consécutifs ou relatifs à : (a) votre utilisation ou incapacité à utiliser les Services, vos Jetons numériques ou le Réseau World ; (b) l’inaccessibilité des Services ou leur résiliation ; (c) tout(e) piratage, falsification, accès non autorisé ou altération de toute transaction ou de vos Données ; (d) toute transaction ou tout accord conclus par vous avec un tiers par l’intermédiaire des Services ; (e) toutes activités ou communications de tiers ; (f) les actions des Opérateurs Orb ; (g) toute perte de valeur de tous Jetons
numériques ; (h) tout Contenu de tiers accessible sur ou par l’intermédiaire des Services ; (i) toute erreur, faute ou inexactitude dans notre Contenu ; (j) tout dommage corporel ou matériel de quelque nature que ce soit résultant de tout accès ou utilisation des Services ; (k) tout virus, cheval de Troie ou autre pouvant être transmis aux Services ou par l’intermédiaire de ces derniers ; ou (l) tout comportement diffamatoire, insultant ou illégal d’un tiers. Cette limitation de responsabilité s’appliquera, que les dommages résultent de l’utilisation de TFH ou des Services ou de leur utilisation abusive, ou de la confiance accordée à Worldcoin ou aux Services, nonobstant tout manquement à l’objectif essentiel de tout recours limité et dans toute la mesure permise par les lois applicables.
13.3 Les Parties TFH ne seront en aucun cas responsables envers vous des réclamations, procédures, responsabilités, obligations, dommages, pertes ou coûts directs d’un montant supérieur à 100,00 USD. Si vous n’êtes pas satisfait des Services, vous convenez que votre recours unique et exclusif sera de cesser de les utiliser. Cette limitation de responsabilité s’appliquera dans toute la mesure permise par les lois applicables.
13.4 Renonciation et indemnisation.
Vous acceptez de défendre, d’indemniser et d’exonérer les Parties TFH de toute responsabilité contre les réclamations, dommages, coûts, dettes, honoraires d’avocat raisonnables et dépenses engagées à leur encontre par un tiers consécutivement ou relativement à : (a) votre utilisation des Services ; (b) votre violation des présentes Conditions ; (c) votre violation de tout droit d’une autre personne ; (d) votre comportement en relation avec les Services ; ou (e) votre utilisation des WLD, des Jetons numériques ou du réseau Worldcoin. Certaines juridictions limitent les indemnités des consommateurs, de sorte que certaines dispositions d’indemnisation du présent paragraphe peuvent ne pas s’appliquer à vous. Si vous êtes obligé d’indemniser l’une des Parties TFH, nous nous réservons le droit, à notre seule discrétion, de contrôler toute action ou procédure et de déterminer s’il convient de mettre fin au litige et à quelles conditions.
SI VOUS ÊTES UN RÉSIDENT DE CALIFORNIE, vous renoncez à faire valoir les avantages et protections de l’article 1542 du Code civil de la Californie, qui stipule que : « [a] une renonciation générale ne couvre pas les prétentions dont le créancier ou la partie renonciatrice n’a pas connaissance ou ne soupçonne pas l’existence en sa faveur au moment de la signature de la renonciation, lesquelles, si elles avaient été connues, auraient certainement eu une incidence matérielle sur son accord avec le débiteur ou la partie déchargée. »
14. Droit applicable
Le droit de l’État de Californie s’appliquera au présent Contrat et à tout litige découlant du présent Contrat ou lié à celui-ci. Le droit applicable énoncé dans la présente section s’appliquera sans égard aux principes de conflit de lois. Vous convenez en outre que le Service sera réputé être basé uniquement dans l’État de Californie, et que même si les Services peuvent être disponibles dans d’autres juridictions, leur disponibilité ne donne pas lieu à une compétence personnelle générale ou spécifique dans tout forum en dehors de l’État de Californie.
15. RÉSOLUTION DES LITIGES, ARBITRAGE ET RENONCIATION AUX RECOURS COLLECTIFS
15.1 VEUILLEZ LIRE ATTENTIVEMENT LES PARAGRAPHES SUIVANTS. ILS EXIGENT QUE VOUS RÉGLIEZ LES LITIGES AVEC NOUS PAR VOIE D’ARBITRAGE INDIVIDUEL DEVANT UN ARBITRE UNIQUE, ET NON EN TANT QUE MEMBRE D’UN RECOURS COLLECTIF. L’ARBITRAGE VOUS EMPÊCHE DE NOUS POURSUIVRE EN JUSTICE OU D’OBTENIR UN PROCÈS DEVANT JURY, BIEN QUE VOUS PUISSIEZ INTENTER UNE ACTION CONTRE NOUS DEVANT LA COUR DES PETITES CRÉANCES SI VOUS Y AVEZ DROIT.
15.2 Nous ferons de notre mieux pour résoudre tout litige potentiel par le biais de négociations informelles de bonne foi. Si un litige potentiel survient, vous devez nous contacter en envoyant un e-mail à l’adresse legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com afin que nous puissions tenter de le résoudre sans recourir à une résolution formelle des litiges. Si nous ne sommes pas en mesure de parvenir à une résolution informelle dans un délai de 60 jours suivant votre e-mail et que vous choisissez d’introduire une réclamation statutaire fédérale ou d’État, une action en common law, une action fondée sur un contrat, un délit, une fraude, une fausse déclaration ou toute autre cause d’action, ou toute autre procédure formelle découlant des présentes Conditions, du Contenu ou des Services ou s’y rapportant (chacune, un « Litige »), alors vous acceptez de résoudre le Litige par arbitrage contraignant, individuellement, conformément aux conditions suivantes (collectivement, la « Convention d’arbitrage ») :
L’arbitrage sera mené de manière confidentielle par un seul arbitre. L’arbitre appliquera les délais de prescription applicables et toutes les lois applicables et honorera les revendications de privilège reconnues par la loi applicable.
Le Litige sera réglé uniquement et définitivement par un arbitrage administré par JAMS conformément au Règlement d’arbitrage simplifié de JAMS, à moins que le montant cumulé du Litige soit égal ou supérieur à 250 000 USD, auquel cas le Règlement d’arbitrage complet de JAMS s’appliquera. L’arbitrage aura lieu à San Francisco, en Californie, à moins que vous et nous n’acceptions de le mener ailleurs. Vous convenez que les tribunaux fédéraux et d’État de San Francisco, en Californie, sont le forum approprié pour tout appel d’une sentence arbitrale ou pour une procédure judiciaire dans le cas où la clause d’arbitrage contraignante du présent Contrat est jugée inapplicable.
Dans tout arbitrage, peu importe le lieu, les parties ne demanderont pas la communication préalable à l’autre partie, et l’arbitre ne permettra pas aux parties de s’échanger des documents au préalable ; au lieu de cela, chaque partie divulguera les preuves étayant sa position à une date et une heure convenues mutuellement avant l’audience finale de l’arbitrage.
La présente Convention d’arbitrage couvre l’applicabilité, la révocabilité, la portée et la validité de la Convention d’arbitrage ou de toute partie de celle-ci, et tous les autres Litiges découlant de ou relatifs à l’interprétation ou à l’applicabilité de la Convention d’arbitrage et toutes ces questions seront tranchées par l’arbitre et non par un tribunal ou un juge.
Si l’arbitre ou l’administrateur de l’arbitrage vous impose des frais de dépôt ou d’autres frais administratifs, nous vous rembourserons, sur demande, dans la mesure où ces frais ou coûts dépasseraient ceux que vous auriez autrement dû payer si l’instance avait eu lieu devant un tribunal. Nous paierons également des frais ou coûts supplémentaires si cela est requis par les règles de l’administrateur de l’arbitrage ou la loi applicable.
À la demande de l’une ou l’autre partie, toutes les procédures d’arbitrage seront menées dans le plus grand secret et, dans ce cas, tous les documents, témoignages et dossiers seront reçus, entendus et conservés par l’arbitre sous scellés, en toute confidentialité, ne pouvant être inspectés que par les parties, leurs avocats respectifs, et leurs experts respectifs, consultants, ou des témoins qui ont convenu, à l’avance et par écrit, de recevoir toutes ces informations comme confidentielles et de les traiter comme telles et de les utiliser uniquement aux fins de l’arbitrage.
À l’exception des procédures et recours collectifs discutés dans la présente Convention d’arbitrage, l’arbitre a le pouvoir d’accorder tout recours qui serait autrement disponible au tribunal.
Tout jugement portant sur la sentence rendue par l’arbitre peut être prononcé par tout tribunal compétent.
Si l’exigence de recourir à l’arbitrage ou l’interdiction de recours collectifs et d’autres Litiges introduits au nom de tiers figurant dans la présente Convention d’arbitrage est jugée inapplicable, alors seules les dispositions inapplicables seront réputées avoir été retirées des présentes Conditions et toutes les obligations restantes des présentes Conditions demeureront pleinement applicables.
15.3 Droit d’opposition pendant 30 jours.
Vous avez le droit de vous opposer à la présente Convention d’arbitrage et de ne pas être lié par celle-ci en envoyant un e-mail à legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com à partir de l’adresse que vous avez utilisée pour configurer votre application, en indiquant en Ligne d’objet : « OPPOSITION À L’ARBITRAGE ET À LA RENONCIATION AUX RECOURS COLLECTIFS ». Vous devez envoyer votre e-mail dans un délai de 30 jours suivant l’acceptation des présentes Conditions, sinon vous serez tenu d’arbitrer les Litiges conformément aux conditions de la présente Convention d’arbitrage. Si vous refusez la présente Convention d’arbitrage, nous ne serons pas non plus liés par la Convention d’arbitrage.
15.4 Modifications apportées à la présente Convention d’arbitrage.
En cas de modification apportée à la section des présentes Conditions intitulée «
Résolution des litiges, arbitrage et renonciation aux recours collectifs »,
nous vous transmettrons un préavis de 30 jours et les modifications prendront effet 30 jours après que vous aurez reçu la notification de notre part. Les modifications apportées à la section «
Résolution des litiges, arbitrage et renonciation aux recours collectifs
» s’appliqueront de manière prospective uniquement aux Litiges survenant après le 30e jour. Si un tribunal ou un arbitre décide que les modifications apportées à la présente section ne sont pas applicables ou valides, alors les modifications seront supprimées des présentes Conditions et le tribunal ou l’arbitre appliquera les conditions de la première Convention d’arbitrage applicable après que vous avez commencé à utiliser les Services. Vous pouvez exercer votre droit d’opposition aux nouvelles conditions de la Convention d’arbitrage en suivant les procédures énoncées dans la section ci-dessus intitulée « Droit d’opposition pendant 30 jours ».
La présente Convention d’arbitrage survivra à la résiliation des présentes Conditions et à votre utilisation des Services.
Nonobstant toute disposition contraire dans la présente Convention d’arbitrage, l’une ou l’autre des parties peut engager une poursuite uniquement pour demander une injonction afin de mettre fin à l’utilisation non autorisée ou abusive des Services, ou à la violation des droits de propriété intellectuelle (p. ex., marques commerciales, secrets commerciaux,
droits d’auteur ou brevets) sans avoir à commencer par un arbitrage ou le processus informel de résolution des litiges décrit ci-dessus.
16. Dispositions générales
16.1 Absence de renonciation, indépendance des clauses et incessibilité.
Si nous n’appliquons pas une disposition, cela ne constitue pas une renonciation à notre droit de le faire plus tard. Si une disposition est jugée inapplicable, les dispositions restantes des présentes Conditions demeureront applicables et une disposition applicable lui sera substituée, reflétant notre intention aussi étroitement que possible, dans la mesure autorisée par le droit applicable. Vous ne pourrez céder aucun de vos droits en vertu des présentes Conditions et une telle tentative sera nulle. Nous pourrons céder nos droits à l’une de nos sociétés affiliées ou filiales, ou à tout ayant droit de toute entreprise associée aux Services.
16.2 Intégralité de l’accord.
Les présentes Conditions constituent l’accord complet et exclusif entre vous et nous concernant les Services et remplacent l’ensemble des accords, ententes, déclarations et garanties antérieurs et concomitants, écrits et oraux, concernant les Services. Les titres des sections des présentes Conditions sont fournis à titre de commodité uniquement et ne régiront pas la signification ou l’interprétation de toute disposition.
16.3 Survivance.
Toutes les dispositions des présentes Conditions relatives à la suspension ou à la résiliation, aux dettes dues à TFH, à l’utilisation générale des Services, aux Litiges avec TFH ainsi qu’aux dispositions qui, de par leur nature, s’étendent au-delà de l’expiration ou de la résiliation des présentes Conditions, survivront à la résiliation ou à l’expiration des présentes Conditions.
16.4 Relation des Parties.
Aucune disposition des présentes Conditions ne sera réputée ni ne vise à être réputée vous considérer, vous et TFH, comme des partenaires, des coentrepreneurs ou autres associés dans un but lucratif, ni ne fera en sorte que vous soyez considérés comme tels, et ni vous ni TFH ne serez considérés comme le mandataire l’un de l’autre. Cela comprend le fait qu’aucune disposition des présentes Conditions n’établit une relation d’emploi entre vous et TFH, ni n’est destinée à l’établir.
16.5 Aucun conseil professionnel ou obligation fiduciaire.
Tout le Contenu que nous fournissons est fourni à titre d’information uniquement et ne doit pas être considéré comme un conseil professionnel. Vous ne devez pas prendre de mesures ni décider de ne pas en prendre sur la base d’informations contenues dans les Services. Avant de prendre toute décision financière, juridique ou autre impliquant les Services ou des Jetons numériques, vous devez demander conseil à un professionnel indépendant titulaire d’une licence et qualifié dans le domaine pour lequel ces conseils seraient appropriés. Les présentes Conditions ne sont pas destinées à créer ou à nous imposer des obligations fiduciaires, et elles n’en créent pas ni ne nous en imposent. Dans toute la mesure permise par la Loi, vous reconnaissez et acceptez que nous n’avons aucune obligation ou responsabilité fiduciaire envers vous ou toute autre partie, et que dans la mesure où ces obligations ou responsabilités peuvent exister en droit ou en équité, ces obligations et responsabilités sont irrévocablement rejetées, levées et éliminées par les présentes. Vous convenez en outre que les seuls devoirs et obligations que nous vous devons sont ceux qui sont expressément énoncés dans les présentes Conditions.
16.6 Changement de contrôle.
Si nous sommes acquis par une entité tierce ou fusionnons avec une entité tierce, ou si nous cédons autrement certaines fonctions à une entité affiliée à notre entreprise ou prenant sa suite ou à toute autre entité dont nous estimons qu’elle sert les intérêts des utilisateurs, alors nous nous réservons le droit, dans l’une quelconque de ces circonstances, de transférer ou de céder les Données que nous aurons collectées auprès de vous dans le cadre d’une telle fusion, acquisition, vente ou de tout autre changement de contrôle, conformément au droit applicable.
16.7 Force majeure.
Nous ne serons pas responsables des retards, défauts d’exécution ou interruptions de service résultant directement ou indirectement d’une volatilité significative du marché des Jetons numériques, d’une catastrophe naturelle, d’actes des autorités civiles ou militaires, d’actes de terroristes, de troubles civils, de guerre, de grève, d’urgence sanitaire, de conflit de travail, d’incendie, d’interruption des télécommunications ou des services Internet ou des services de fournisseur de réseau, de défaillances de l’équipement ou du logiciel ou de toute cause ou condition échappant à notre contrôle raisonnable (chacun, un « Cas de force majeure »). La survenance d’un Cas de force majeure n’affectera pas la validité et l’applicabilité des autres dispositions des présentes Conditions.
16.8 Magasins d’applications.
Lorsque vous téléchargez nos Applications à partir d’un magasin d’applications ou d’une plateforme de distribution autre que l’App Store d’Apple, y compris Google Play Store (la « Plateforme de distribution »), vous acceptez que :
les Conditions entre vous et nous, et non le fournisseur de la Plateforme de distribution (le « Fournisseur de magasin ») ; votre utilisation des Applications doit être conforme aux Conditions d’utilisation de la plateforme de distribution alors en vigueur du Fournisseur de magasin ; le Fournisseur de magasin n’est qu’un fournisseur de la Plateforme de distribution où vous avez obtenu les Applications ;
Nous, et non le Fournisseur de magasin, sommes seuls responsables des Applications ;
le Fournisseur de magasin n’a aucune obligation ou responsabilité envers vous en ce qui concerne les Applications ou les Conditions ; et
vous reconnaissez et acceptez que le Fournisseur de magasin est un bénéficiaire tiers des Conditions en ce qui concerne les Applications.
16.9 App Store d’Apple.
La présente section s’applique lorsque les Applications ont été acquises auprès de l’App Store d’Apple. Vous reconnaissez et acceptez que les Conditions sont uniquement entre vous et nous, et non Apple, Inc. (« Apple ») et qu’Apple n’est pas responsable des Applications ou de leur contenu. Votre utilisation des Applications doit être conforme aux Conditions de service de l’App Store.
Vous reconnaissez qu’Apple n’a aucune obligation de fournir des services de maintenance et d’assistance concernant les Applications. En cas de non-conformité des Applications à toute garantie applicable, vous pouvez en informer Apple, et (le cas échéant) Apple vous remboursera le prix d’achat des Applications. Dans la mesure maximale autorisée par la loi applicable, Apple n’aura aucune autre obligation de garantie quelle qu’elle soit en ce qui concerne les Applications, et tout(e) autre réclamation, perte, passif, dommage, coût ou dépense attribuable à un manquement à se conformer à une garantie sera uniquement régi(e) par les Conditions et toute loi nous étant applicable en tant que fournisseur des Applications.
Vous reconnaissez qu’Apple n’est pas responsable du traitement de toute réclamation que vous ou un tiers présentez concernant les Applications ou votre possession ou utilisation des Applications, y compris notamment : (i) les réclamations en responsabilité du fait des produits ; (ii) toute réclamation selon laquelle les Applications ne sont pas conformes à toute exigence légale ou réglementaire applicable ; et (iii) les réclamations découlant de la protection des consommateurs ou d’une législation similaire et l’ensemble desdites réclamations est régi uniquement par les Conditions et toute loi nous étant applicable en tant que fournisseur du logiciel.
Vous reconnaissez que, en cas de réclamation de tout tiers selon laquelle les Applications ou votre possession et utilisation desdites Applications violent les droits de propriété intellectuelle du tiers, TFH, et non Apple, sera seule responsable de l’enquête, la défense, du règlement et de la décharge de toute réclamation pour violation de propriété intellectuelle dans la mesure requise par les Conditions.
Vous déclarez et garantissez que (i) vous n’êtes pas situé(e) dans un pays soumis à un embargo du gouvernement américain, ou qui a été désigné par le gouvernement américain comme un pays « soutenant le terrorisme » ; et (ii) vous ne figurez sur aucune liste du gouvernement américain de parties interdites ou restreintes.
Vous et TFH reconnaissez et acceptez qu’Apple, et les filiales d’Apple, sont des bénéficiaires tiers des Conditions de service en ce qui concerne votre licence des Applications, et que, dès votre acceptation des conditions générales des Conditions de service, Apple aura le droit (et sera réputée avoir accepté le droit) de faire appliquer les Conditions de service en ce qui concerne votre licence des Applications à votre encontre en tant que bénéficiaire tiers de celles-ci.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Tools For Humanity उपयोगकर्ता नियम व शर्तें
World App में स्वागत है! आपके और Tools for Humanity Corporation, जो Delaware का एक कॉर्पोरेशन है ("TFH", “हम" या “हमारा/हमारी/हमारे/हमें/हमसे") के बीच की ये शर्तें World Network (“World Network”) और ईकोसिस्टम के संबंध में World App और Operator App (सामूहिक रूप से “ऐप्स”) सहित हमारी वेबसाइट्स और ऐप्लिकेशंस, और सभी संबंधित कार्यक्षमताओं, सामग्री और सेवाओं जो हम आपको प्रदान करते हैं (सामूहिक रूप से, “सेवाएँ”) के आपके उपयोग और इस तक आपकी पहुँच को नियंत्रित करती हैं।
सेवाओं का उपयोग या उन तक पहुँचने से पहले कृपया ये शर्तें ध्यानपूर्वक पढ़ें। हमारे द्वारा प्रदत्त किसी भी सेवा तक पहुँचने या उसका उपयोग करने के द्वारा, आप इन शर्तों पर आपकी स्पष्ट सहमति के साथ-साथ, इन शर्तों से और हमारी निजता सूचना, जिसे इन शर्तों के हिस्से के रूप में शामिल किया गया है, से बाध्य होने पर सुव्यक्त रूप से सहमत हैं।  कृपया इन शर्तों के इन महत्वपूर्ण भागों पर विशेष रूप से ध्यान दें:
आप आपके और TFH के बीच के किसी भी विवाद को न्यायालय की बजाए बाध्यकारी विवाचन के माध्यम से हल करने पर सहमति दे रहे हैं। यदि आप दक्षिण कोरिया के निवासी हैं, तो आप ऐसे विवाद को विवाचन की बजाए किसी सक्षम न्यायालय में हल करवाने का विकल्प चुन सकते हैं। विवरण के लिए कृपया नीचे अनुभाग 15 ध्यान से पढ़ें।
डिजिटल टोकन सहित क्रिप्टोकरेंसी उत्पाद काफी हद तक अनियमित हैं और अत्यधिक जोखिम भरे हो सकते हैं। इस तरह के लेनदेन से हुए किसी भी नुकसान के लिए संभव है कि कोई नियामक उपाय न हो।
इन सेवाओं में ऐसा कुछ भी नहीं है जो बिक्री की पेशकश हो, या कोई प्रतिभूति या डिजिटल टोकन खरीदने की पेशकश का आग्रह हो। सेवाएं, निवेश की सलाह नहीं हैं। किसी डिजिटल टोकन (जैसा कि नीचे धारा 2.1 में परिभाषित किया गया है) को वहाँ पर रखने, खरीदने या बेचने की अनुमति नहीं दी जा सकती जहाँ आप रहते हैं, और सभी लागू कानूनों का पालन करना आपकी ज़िम्मेदारी है। कृपया विचार करें कि क्या डिजिटल टोकन खरीदना, बेचना, उपयोग करना या रखना आपकी वित्तीय परिस्थितियों और डिजिटल टोकन की आपकी समझ के आलोक में आपके लिए उपयुक्त है। डिजिटल टोकनों का मूल्य तेज़ी से बदल सकता है और शून्य भी हो सकता है।
साथ ही, Worldcoin टोकन  (WLD) यूएस के व्यक्तियों, जिनमें यूएस के नागरिक, निवासी, या संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के व्यक्ति, या संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका में निगमित, स्थित या निवासी कंपनियाँ, या संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका में पंजीकृत एजेंट वाली कंपनियां शामिल हैं, द्वारा उपयोग, खरीद, या पहुँच हेतु उपलब्ध होने के लिए उद्दिष्ट नहीं हैं। हम ऐसे अमेरिकी व्यक्तियों को WLD उपलब्ध नहीं कराते हैं।  इसके अलावा, आप सहमत हैं कि आप अमेरिकी व्यक्तियों को WLD नहीं बेचेंगे, स्थानांतरित नहीं करेंगे या उपलब्ध नहीं कराएंगे। WLD से जुड़े जोखिमों के बारे में अधिक जानकारी यहाँ मिल सकती है।
1. शर्तों का दायरा
1.1 निजता और आपका डेटा
। ऐप्स को एक्सेस करते समय, आप हमें कुछ श्रेणियों की व्यक्तिगत जानकारी दे सकते हैं, जैसे आपका नाम या टेलीफोन नंबर। यदि आप अपने proof-of-personhood को स्थापित करने और अपने WLD टोकन का दावा करने के लिए जानकारी प्रदान करते हैं, तो आप संवेदनशील व्यक्तिगत डेटा की विशेष श्रेणियां प्रदान कर सकते हैं, जैसे कि आपकी बायोमेट्रिक जानकारी। हमारी निजता सूचना में यह वर्णन है कि हम आपसे कौन-कौन सा डेटा एकत्र करते हैं और हम उसका उपयोग कैसे करते हैं। यदि आप नहीं चाहते हैं कि हम निजता सूचनामें वर्णित तरीके से आपके डेटा का एकत्रण या उपयोग करें तो कृपया सेवाओं का उपयोग न करें।
1.2 योग्यता।
हमारी सेवाओं का वर्णन करने वाले वेब-पेज दुनिया भर में पहुँच-योग्य हो सकते हैं, लेकिन इसका मतलब यह नहीं है कि सभी सेवाएँ या सेवा सुविधाएँ आपके देश में वैध या उपलब्ध हैं। आप किसी भी प्रतिबंध को दरकिनार करने के उद्देश्य से VPN या इसी तरह के उपकरणों का उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं। यह सुनिश्चित करना आपकी ज़िम्मेदारी है कि आप जहाँ हमारी सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हैं वहाँ आपका यह उपयोग कानूनी हो। हमारी सेवाएँ सभी भाषाओं में उपलब्ध नहीं हैं। हमारी सेवाएँ वहाँ वैध हैं जहाँ आप उनका उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी सेवाएँ सभी भाषाओं में उपलब्ध नहीं हैं। सेवाओं का उपयोग करने के लिए, आपको इन शर्तों और सभी लागू कानूनों का पालन करना होगा। आप किसी भी अवैध या गैरकानूनी गतिविधि को करने, उसका प्रचार करने या उसे करने में दूसरों की मदद करने के लिए हमारी सेवाओं का उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं।
साथ ही, आपको निम्नलिखित सभी मानदंडों को पूरा करना होगा:
आप 18 वर्ष या इससे अधिक आयु के हैं; और
आप निम्नलिखित देश में स्थित, नियंत्रण, राष्ट्रीयता या निवासी
नहीं
हैं: सीरिया, यूक्रेन के क्रीमिया, दोनेत्स्क, लुहांस्क, खेरसन और ज़ैपोरिज़हिया क्षेत्र, रूस, उत्तरी कोरिया, ईरान, क्यूबा या ऐसा कोई अन्य देश जहां से सेवाओं की पहुँच को संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, यूरोपीय संघ या किसी अन्य देश या क्षेत्राधिकार ने प्रतिबंधित कर रखा है;
आपको अमेरिकी राजकोष विभाग (यू.एस. डिपार्टमेंट ऑफ़ द ट्रेज़री) के विदेशी आस्ति नियंत्रण कार्यालय (ऑफ़िस ऑफ़ फ़ॉरेन एसेट कंट्रोल, “OFAC”) या किसी अन्य देश की प्रतिबंध सूचियों के द्वारा “विशेषतः निर्दिष्ट नागरिक” घोषित नहीं किया गया है, और अमेरिकी वाणिज्य विभाग (यू.एस. डिपार्टमेंट ऑफ़ कॉमर्स) की निषिद्ध व्यक्ति सूची, या किसी अन्य देश की प्रतिबंधित व्यक्ति सूचियों में आपका नाम नहीं है।
यदि आप इन सभी आवश्यकताओं को संतुष्ट नहीं करते हैं, तो आपको हमारी सेवाओं तक पहुँचने या उनका उपयोग करने की अनुमति नहीं है, और तदनुसार हम हमारी सेवाओं तक पहुँचने या उनका उपयोग करने की आपकी योग्यता को प्रतिबंधित कर सकते हैं।
साथ ही, यदि आप जर्मनी में स्थापित या स्थित हैं या आपका सामान्य निवास या पंजीकृत कार्यालय वहाँ है, तो आपको अनुभाग 2.5 के अर्थ में तृतीय-पक्ष की सेवाओं तक पहुँचने या का उपयोग करने की अथवा अनुभाग 2.8 के अर्थ में विकेंद्रीकृत एप्लिकेशंस का उपयोग करने की अनुमति नहीं है। ये सुविधाएँ आपके लिए उपलब्ध नहीं हैं।
1.3 उपलब्धता
। सेवाओं का वर्णन करने वाले वेबपेज दुनिया भर में पहुँच-योग्य हैं, लेकिन इसका मतलब यह नहीं है कि सभी सेवाएं या सेवा सुविधाएं आपके देश में वैध या उपलब्ध हैं। कुछ देशों में कुछ सेवाओं (या कुछ सेवा सुविधाओं) तक पहुँच को हमारे द्वारा या सरकारों द्वारा अवरुद्ध किया जा सकता है। आप किसी भी प्रतिबंध को दरकिनार करने के उद्देश्य से VPN या इसी तरह के उपकरणों का उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं। ऐप्स, और ऐप्स के भीतर की कुछ सुविधाओं तक की पहुँच, आपके स्थान के आधार पर, अनुपलब्ध या सीमित/प्रतिबंधित हो सकती है।
यह सुनिश्चित करना आपकी जिम्मेदारी है कि आप जहां सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हैं वहां आपका उपयोग कानूनी है।
सेवाएं सभी भाषाओं में उपलब्ध नहीं हैं।
1.4 अपडेट
। हम समय-समय पर इन शर्तों में बदलाव कर सकते हैं। यदि हम ऐसा करते हैं, तो हम अपडेट की हुईं शर्तें सेवाओं पर उपलब्ध कराएँगे और जहाँ कानून द्वारा आवश्यक किया गया हो वहाँ हम कोई भी बदलाव करने से पहले आपको सूचित करेंगे और जहाँ ऐसे बदलाव विशेष रूप से महत्वपूर्ण या आपके लिए प्रतिकूल हों वहाँ हम, यदि लागू कानून द्वारा आवश्यक किया गया हो तो, आपको अतिरिक्त अग्रिम सूचना देंगे। आप यह बात समझते हैं और सहमत हैं कि हमारे द्वारा ऐसे कोई भी बदलाव किए जाने के बाद भी सेवाओं के आपके निरंतर उपयोग को और उन पर आपके द्वारा विशिष्ट रूप से आपत्ति न किए जाने को अपडेट की हुईं शर्तों पर आपकी स्वीकृति माना जाएगा। यदि आप इन शर्तों से सहमत नहीं हैं तो आप किसी भी समय सेवाओं का उपयोग बंद कर सकते हैं। सेवाएँ समय के साथ-साथ विकसित हो रही हैं इसलिए हम, लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक, हमारे विवेकाधीन किसी भी समय और बिना किसी सूचना के, सेवाओं के सभी हिस्सों या किसी भी हिस्से को बदल या बंद कर सकते हैं।
1.5 अतिरिक्त शर्तें।
विशिष्ट एप्लिकेशंस, सामग्री, सेवाओं की विशेषताओं या अंशों पर अतिरिक्त नियम एवं शर्तें लागू हो सकती हैं, और हमारे द्वारा आपको प्रदत्त ऐसे समस्त अतिरिक्त नियम एवं शर्तें इन शर्तों का भाग होंगे।
2. सेवाएँ
2.1 नॉन-कस्टोडियल वॉलेट।
World App में समर्थित क्रिप्टोकरेंसी, डिजिटल करेंसी, या डिजिटल टोकन (WLD सहित और सामूहिक रूप से, “डिजिटल टोकन”) रखने के लिए एक होस्ट-विहीन और नॉन-कस्टोडियल वॉलेट है। आपके वॉलेट में रखे डिजिटल टोकन को आप नियंत्रित करते हैं। World App के साथ, निजी कुंजियाँ (जो क्रिप्टोकरेंसी तक पहुँच प्राप्त करने के लिए पासवर्ड का प्रतिनिधित्व करती हैं) सीधे आपके डिवाइस पर संग्रहित की जाती हैं। आप जब चाहें तब अपने डिजिटल टोकन किसी अलग ब्लॉकचेन पते पर भेजकर उन्हें वापस ले सकते हैं बशर्ते आपके पास इंटरनेट की पहुँच हो और ब्लॉकचेन पर भीड़-भाड़ न हो। आपके डिजिटल टोकन को आपके वॉलेट में रखने के दौरान, हम आपके वॉलेट, डिजिटल टोकन या निजी कुंजियों पर नियंत्रण नहीं रखते हैं। उपयोगकर्ता ही अपनी निजी कुंजियों के खोने के जोखिम के लिए ज़िम्मेदार होते हैं और न तो TFH और न ही World App ऐसी कुंजियां वापस पा सकते हैं।
चूंकि World App एक नॉन-कस्टोडियल वॉलेट है, आपको एक वॉलेट पता दिया जाएगा जो यह बताएगा कि संबंधित ब्लॉकचेन पर आपके डिजिटल टोकन कहाँ रखे गए हैं। हमारे पास आपके डिजिटल टोकन तक पहुँचने की क्षमता नहीं है।
2.2 समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन।
World App में कुछ ERC-20 टोकन समर्थित हैं। हम भविष्य में अतिरिक्त डिजिटल टोकन के लिए समर्थन शामिल कर सकते हैं। World App समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन दिखाती है।
अपने डिजिटल टोकन जमा करने या निकालने से पहले यह जाँचना सुनिश्चित करें कि World App के भीतर कौनसे टोकन और नेटवर्क समर्थित हैं। यदि आप गलत वॉलेट पते पर असमर्थित टोकन या डिजिटल टोकन भेज देते हैं तो हम आपके डिजिटल टोकन वापस नहीं ला सकेंगे।
आप यह बात समझते हैं कि किसी World App वॉलेट पते पर असमर्थित डिजिटल टोकन भेजने का मतलब यह हो सकता है कि आपउन डिजिटल टोकन तक पहुँच पूरी तरह खो देंगे। हमारे पास डिजिटल टोकन वापस लाने का कोई तरीका नहीं है। कृपया हमेशा सुनिश्चित करें कि आप सही वॉलेट पते पर सही डिजिटल टोकन भेज रहे हों। आप चाहें तो पहले बहुत कम मात्रा में डिजिटल टोकन भेजकर लेनदेन परख सकते हैं।
2.3 पेशकश और पहुँच।
जब आप सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हुए अपने डिजिटल टोकन से कोई व्यवहार करते हैं - जैसे उन्हें किसी अन्य वॉलेट पते पर भेजना या किसी वितरित एप्लिकेशन से कनेक्ट करना - तो आपको ऑनबोर्डिंग प्रक्रिया के दौरान आपके द्वारा पहचाने गए उपकरणों के माध्यम से बातचीत को स्वीकृत या “हस्ताक्षरित” करने की आवश्यकता होगी। संबंधित ब्लॉकचेन से व्यवहार आरंभ करने के लिए ऐप्स उन उपकरणों से आईं आपकी स्वीकृतियों पर पूरी तरह निर्भर हैं। आप यह बात समझते हैं कि ये व्यवहार करते समय आप सीधे संबंधित ब्लॉकचेन से व्यवहार कर रहे होते हैं, और यह कि आपकी ओर से ये आदेश भेजने के लिए हम ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं।
2.4 तृतीय पक्षों से प्राप्त जानकारी।
सेवाओं का उपयोग करके आप अपने डिजिटल टोकन से संबंधित जानकारी तक पहुँच प्राप्त कर सकते हैं, जैसे कि, उनका वर्तमान बाजार मूल्य लेकिन इन तक सीमित नहीं है। इस जानकारी के प्रस्तुतीकरण का अर्थ तृतीय पक्ष के साथ कोई जुड़ाव या समर्थन नहीं है, भले ही सेवाओं के संबंध में प्रदान की गई कुछ कार्यात्मकताओं के लिए ऐसे तृतीय-पक्ष उत्पादों के उपयोग की आवश्यकता हो। ऐसी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं और उत्पादों की सामग्री, जैसा कि सेवाओं के माध्यम से कहा गया है, सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराई गई जानकारी या ऐसे तृतीय पक्षों द्वारा हमें उपलब्ध कराई गई जानकारी पर आधारित है, और इसलिए हम ऐसी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा या उत्पाद से संबंधित जानकारी की सटीकता पर कोई प्रतिनिधित्व या वारंटी नहीं देते हैं।
2.5 तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाएँ
जर्मनी में स्थापित या स्थित या सामान्य निवास अथवा पंजीकृत कार्यालय वाले उपयोगकर्ता इस अनुभाग के तहत अपने डिजिटल टोकन बेचने या उनके विनिमय के लिए तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं का उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं।
जहां उपलब्ध हो, सेवाएं आपको डिजिटल टोकन की कानूनी खरीद, डिजिटल टोकन की बिक्री, डिजिटल टोकन के आदान-प्रदान और भविष्य में उपलब्ध होने वाली अन्य कार्यक्षमताओं जैसे लेनदेन को संसाधित करने के लिए तृतीय-पक्ष के प्रोसेसर के लिंक प्रदान कर सकती हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि World App के भीतर कौन-कौन सी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाएं उपलब्ध हैं। इन लेनदेनों को करते समय आप हमसे नहीं बल्कि तृतीय पक्षों से लेनदेन कर रहे होते हैं। आपको तृतीय-पक्ष प्रदाता द्वारा प्रदत्त संबंधित निर्देशों का पालन करना होगा और उनके सेवा के नियमों को स्वीकारना होगा। हम सेवाएं प्रदान करते समय या, जब आप तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हैं तब, किसी भी समय आपके फंड या डिजिटल टोकन को नियंत्रित या प्रेषित नहीं करते हैं।
2.6 पिअर-टू-पिअर लेनदेन।
सेवाएँ एक संचार प्लेटफ़ॉर्म प्रदान करती हैं जिसके ज़रिए आप अन्य ब्लॉकचेन वॉलेट (चाहे आपके द्वारा नियंत्रित हों या तृतीय-पक्षों द्वारा) को समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन भेज सकते हैं या उनसे ऐसे टोकन पाने का अनुरोध कर सकते हैं, पा सकते हैं और भंडारित कर सकते हैं। आपके द्वारा समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन का आपके अन्य ब्लॉकचेन वॉलेट और तृतीय पक्ष से और के बीच स्थानांतरण एक हस्तांतरण है। हस्तांतरण शुरू करने वाला पक्ष लेनदेन के ठीक से निष्पादन, जिसमें अन्य चीज़ों के साथ-साथ, लेनदेन को सफल बनाने हेतु पर्याप्त नेटवर्क अथवा माइनर शुल्क का भुगतान शामिल है, के लिए पूरी तरह से ज़िम्मेदार होता है। अपर्याप्त नेटवर्क शुल्क के कारण स्थानांतरण लंबित स्थिति में रह सकता है और इसके परिणामस्वरूप लेन-देन शुरू करने में त्रुटि के परिणामस्वरूप विलंब या हानि हो सकती है। इस तरह के लेनदेन के निवारण में सहायता करने के लिए हम बाध्य नहीं है। जब आप अपने वॉलेट से किसी अन्य ब्लॉकचेन वॉलेट में कोई डिजिटल टोकन भेजते हैं, तो ऐसे हस्तांतरण आपके द्वारा चेन पर निष्पादित किए जाते हैं न कि हमारे नियंत्रण में। आपको समस्त लेन-देन की जानकारी सबमिट करने से पहले सत्यापित करनी चाहिए। यदि आप गलत ब्लॉकचेन गंतव्य पता दर्ज करते हैं तो हम कोई दायित्व या ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं लेते हैं। एक बार जब वे संबंधित ब्लॉकचेन नेटवर्क पर प्रसारित हो जाते हैं, तो डिजिटल टोकन हस्तांतरण को उलट नहीं किया जा सकता है, हालांकि वे एक लंबित स्थिति में हो सकते हैं, और तदनुसार नामित किया जा सकता है, जबकि लेनदेन नेटवर्क ऑपरेटरों द्वारा संसाधित किया जाता है। हम नेटवर्क को नियंत्रित नहीं करते और इस बात की कोई गारंटी नहीं देते कि नेटवर्क द्वारा स्थानांतरण की पुष्टि की जाएगी।
2.7 वॉल्ट
2.7.1 सामान्य जानकारी।
World App आपके डिजिटल टोकन के लिए एक विकेंद्रीकृत “वॉल्ट” (“वॉल्ट”) का यूज़र इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करती है। आपके द्वारा वॉल्ट का उपयोग वॉल्ट को नियंत्रित करने वाली शर्तों के साथ-साथ आपके द्वारा वॉल्ट के उपयोग से संबंधित या उससे उत्पन्न होने वाली सुविधाओं को विकसित या प्रदान करने वाले तीसरे पक्ष द्वारा प्रदान की गई किन्हीं भी अतिरिक्त शर्तों की आपकी स्वीकृति और स्वीकार्यता का गठन करता है।
वॉल्ट केवल कुछ डिजिटल टोकन का समर्थन करता है। इन डिजिटल टोकनों को यूरोपीय संसद के विनियमन (ईयू) 2023/1114 और क्रिप्टोकरेंसी-एसेट्स के बाजारों पर 31 मई 2023 की परिषद द्वारा निर्धारित शर्तों के अनुसार एसेट रेफरेंस टोकन या ई-मनी टोकन के रूप में आधिकारिक तौर पर मान्यता प्राप्त नहीं हैं। आपके वॉल्ट तक पहुँचने पर समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन World App में प्रदर्शित किए जाएँगे। वॉल्ट द्वारा समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन समय-समय पर बदल सकते हैं, और इस बात की कोई गारंटी नहीं है कि समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन वॉल्ट में उपयोग के लिए उपलब्ध रहेंगे।
वॉल्ट तीसरे पक्ष के स्मार्ट अनुबंध के संबंध में प्रदान किया जाता है। आपके अलावा, किसी अन्य व्यक्ति या संस्था के पास आपके वॉल्ट या आपके वॉल्ट के अंदर डिजिटल टोकन के साथ इंटरैक्ट करने की क्षमता नहीं होती है। न तो TFH और न ही किसी तीसरे पक्ष के पास आपके वॉल्ट या संबंधित स्मार्ट अनुबंध के लिए प्रशासनिक कुंजी या पहुँच (विशेषाधिकार प्राप्त या अन्यथा) होती है। आपके खाते के लिए किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन के वॉल्ट में जमा या निकासी केवल तभी हो सकती है जब इस तरह के लेन-देन पर इन शर्तों के अनुभाग 2.1 में वर्णित आपकी संबंधित निजी कुंजी (कुंजियों) के साथ हस्ताक्षर किए गए हों। इसका मतलब यह है कि यदि आप अपनी निजी कुंजी(कुंजियों) तक पहुँच या नियंत्रण खो देते हैं, तो आप वॉल्ट से डिजिटल टोकन की कोई जमा या निकासी नहीं कर पाएँगे और कोई भी अन्य पक्ष आपकी सहायता नहीं कर पाएगा या आपकी ओर से ऐसा नहीं कर पाएगा। तदनुसार, वॉल्ट का उपयोग आपको TFH या किसी अन्य तीसरे पक्ष द्वारा किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन के संबंध में कोई अभिरक्षा, जमानत या स्थानांतरण सेवाएँ प्रदान नहीं करता है, और न ही कर सकता है, जिसे आप अपने खाते पर वॉल्ट का उपयोग करके लॉक कर सकते हैं।
WLD टोकन के लिए वॉल्ट फ़ंक्शन को नियंत्रित करने वाले स्मार्ट अनुबंध को ब्लॉकचेन का उपयोग करके यहाँ देखा जा सकता है स्पष्टता के लिए, इनका और किसी भी अन्य संबंधित वॉल्ट फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग इन शर्तों के अनुभाग 12 में निहित वारंटी के समान अस्वीकरण के अधीन होता है।
2.7.2 वॉल्ट की कार्यक्षमताएँ
। वॉल्ट वर्तमान में निम्नलिखित सुविधाएँ प्रदान करता है, जिन्हें TFH या तीसरे पक्षों द्वारा बदला, हटाया या जोड़ा जा सकता है:  लॉक करना, उपज, निकासी और सुरक्षा अवधि, वॉल्ट को अनुदान।
2.7.3 लॉकिंग
। वॉल्ट का उपयोग करके, आप अपने डिजिटल टोकन को एक निश्चित समयावधि के लिए लॉक करने पर सहमत होते हैं। अपने वॉल्ट का उपयोग करके डिजिटल टोकन को लॉक करने से वे डिजिटल टोकन आपके गैर-कस्टोडियल वॉलेट से विकेन्द्रीकृत स्मार्ट अनुबंध में स्थानांतरित हो जाएँइगे। ट्रांसफर के बाद, ये डिजिटल टोकन वॉल्ट में "लॉक" हो जाएँगे, जिसमें वह अवधि शामिल है जिसके दौरान वे वॉल्ट में जमा रहते हैं और साथ ही एक पूर्व-निर्धारित अवधि भी शामिल है जिसे "सुरक्षा अवधि" कहा जाता है, जिसका नीचे अधिक विस्तार से वर्णन किया गया है। जब तक आपके डिजिटल टोकन लॉक रहेंगे, तब तक आप उन्हें एक्सेस नहीं कर पाएँगे, ट्रांसफर नहीं कर पाएँगे या उनका इस्तेमाल करके कोई अन्य लेनदेन नहीं कर पाएँगे, जब तक कि आप उन्हें वापस लेने का अनुरोध नहीं करते और लागू सुरक्षा अवधि समाप्त होने की अनुमति नहीं देते। TFH या तीसरे पक्ष प्रदाता सहित कोई भी व्यक्ति आपके लॉक किए गए डिजिटल टोकन को अनलॉक, कस्टडी, कंट्रोल, वापस लेने या ट्रांसफर करने की क्षमता नहीं रखता है। अपने डिजिटल टोकन को वॉल्ट में रखना और उन्हें लॉक करने और वापस लेने के प्रतिबंधों के अधीन करना TFH या किसी अन्य तीसरे पक्ष को डिजिटल टोकन में किसी भी अधिकार, शीर्षक या हित की बिक्री, ऋण या ट्रांसफर नहीं माना जाता है।
अपने डिजिटल टोकन को वॉल्ट में लॉक करना आपके डिजिटल टोकन की सुरक्षा या कस्टडी की गारंटी नहीं देता है। कोई भी जमा बीमा योजना या कोई भी समान सुरक्षा आपके डिजिटल टोकन पर लागू नहीं होती है, और आपके द्वारा लॉक किए गए किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन का मूल्य और/या उपयोगिता सुरक्षा अवधि की मुद्दत के दौरान बढ़ या घट सकती है। इसका मतलब है कि आपके द्वारा वॉल्ट में लॉक किए गए किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन का मूल्य या उपयोगिता सुरक्षा अवधि के दौरान घट सकती है या शून्य हो सकती है। आप स्वीकार करते हैं और सहमत हैं कि लागू सुरक्षा अवधि के बाद आपके खाते से डिजिटल टोकन की किसी भी निकासी के परिणामस्वरूप उन डिजिटल टोकनों की वापसी हो सकती है, जिनका मूल्य उस समय की तुलना में कम होगा, या कोई मूल्य नहीं होगा, जब आपने उन्हें अपने वॉल्ट में लॉक किया था, और TFH या कोई तीसरा पक्ष मूल्य में होने वाली किसी भी कमी का जोखिम या ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं उठाता है।
2.7.4 उपज
। आप इस उत्पाद के प्रयोजनों के लिए, अपने वॉल्ट में कुछ डिजिटल टोकन पर "उपज" के रूप में संदर्भित राशि उत्पन्न करने के लिए भी पात्र हो सकते हैं। यह उपज, जो अतिरिक्त डिजिटल टोकन का रूप ले सकती है, तीसरे पक्ष द्वारा स्मार्ट अनुबंध संचालन की एक अलग शृंखला के माध्यम से प्रदान की जाती है जिसे आप World App के भीतर दिए गए इंटरफ़ेस का उपयोग करके एक्सेस कर सकते हैं। न तो TFH और न ही कोई तीसरा पक्ष आपके डिजिटल टोकन का उपयोग करता है, उन पर नियंत्रण रखता है, उनके लिए कोई क्रेडिट प्राप्त करता है, या अन्यथा उनका निपटान करता है। इस प्रकार, उपज वह ब्याज नहीं है जो आपके डिजिटल टोकन को प्रदान की गई शर्तों और विनिर्देशों के अनुसार लॉक करने के अलावा किसी अन्य चीज़ से जुड़ा या उत्पन्न होता है। आपको मिलने वाली कोई भी उपज आपको वॉल्ट का उपयोग करके डिजिटल टोकन संग्रहित करने के आपके निर्णयों के आधार पर तीसरे पक्ष द्वारा अनुदान के रूप में प्रदान की जाती है। उपज की पीढ़ी को निर्धारित करने वाले विनिर्देश, जिसमें उत्पन्न राशि या वह समय शामिल है जिसके दौरान यह अर्जित हो सकता है, किसी भी समय तीसरे पक्ष के प्रदाता के विवेक पर बदला या रद्द किया जा सकता है।
आप अधिकतम एक निश्चित राशि तक उपज अर्जित कर सकते हैं। ये विवरण आपके वॉल्ट के साथ-साथ, उपज प्रदान करने वाले तीसरे पक्ष (जिसे World App के भीतर "प्रदाता" के रूप में पहचाना जाता है) द्वारा प्रदान की गई किसी भी अतिरिक्त शर्तों के माध्यम से प्रदर्शित किए जाएँगे। इन अतिरिक्त शर्तों को भी इन शर्तों में शामिल किया गया है। उपज TFH द्वारा प्रदत या सेवित नहीं होती है।
कोई भी उपज जो अर्जित होती है, वह आपको वॉल्ट से किसी भी उपज-जनरेटिंग डिजिटल टोकन के लिए निकासी के पूरा होने पर ही वितरित की जाएगी, जो किसी भी लागू सुरक्षा अवधि की समाप्ति के बाद ही होती है। यह निकासी किसी भी उपज अनुदान की अंतिम शर्त है, जिसका अर्थ है कि आपके पास किसी भी उपज में कोई अधिकार, शीर्षक या रुचि नहीं है जो उत्पन्न हुई है या उत्पन्न होगी जब तक कि आपके गैर-कस्टोडियल वॉलेट में उपज प्राप्त नहीं हो जाती। इसका यह भी अर्थ है कि यदि आप अपनी निजी कुंजी(कुंजियों) तक पहुँच या नियंत्रण खो देते हैं, तो आप कोई भी निकासी नहीं कर पाएँगे, जिससे आपको प्रतिफल प्राप्त करने का अधिकार मिल सके।
2.7.5 निकासी और सुरक्षा अवधि
। आप किसी भी समय अपने वॉल्ट से अपने डिजिटल टोकन की निकासी शुरू कर सकते हैं। आपके द्वारा अपने वॉल्ट से निकासी के लिए अनुरोध किए गए डिजिटल टोकन "सुरक्षा अवधि" नामक समय की पूर्व-निर्धारित अवधि बीत जाने के बाद आपको वापस कर दिए जाएँगे। हर बार जब आप वॉल्ट से डिजिटल टोकन की निकासी शुरू करते हैं, तो एक नई सुरक्षा अवधि शुरू होगी और उन डिजिटल टोकन के आपको वापस किए जाने तक का समय उलटी गिनती में लगेगा। इस समय के दौरान, आपके द्वारा निकासी के लिए चुने गए डिजिटल टोकन लॉक रहेंगे, और आप अपनी निकासी रद्द भी कर सकते हैं। सुरक्षा अवधि समाप्त हो जाने पर, आपकी निकासी पूरी हो जाएगी और डिजिटल टोकन, तथा अर्जित आय आपके वॉलेट में भेज दी जाएगी। जब आप अपने वॉल्ट तक पहुँचेंगे तो सुरक्षा अवधि की मुद्दत World App में बताई जाएगी।
2.7.6 वॉल्ट को अनुदान
। एक बार चयन करने पर यह सुविधा आपको WLD अनुदान को स्वचालित रूप से आपके वॉलेट के बजाय सीधे आपके खाते के वॉल्ट में भेजने की अनुमति देती है। आप इस सेटिंग को किसी भी समय बदल सकते हैं.
2.7.7 TFH और वॉल्ट
। इस सुविधा तक पहुँच World App के माध्यम से की जाती है। हालाँकि, TFH केवल संबंधित डेटा को पढ़ने और उसे आपको प्रदर्शित करने में सक्षम होगा। TFH आपके किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन को ट्रांसफर, निकाल या जमा नहीं कर सकता है और आपके वॉल्ट तक उसकी कोई पहुँच नहीं होती है।
2.8 विकेंद्रीकृत ऐप्लिकेशंस
यह अनुभाग जर्मनी में स्थापित या स्थित या सामान्य निवास अथवा पंजीकृत कार्यालय वाले उपयोगकर्ताओं पर लागू नहीं होता:
जहाँ उपलब्ध हो वहाँ,
हमारे पास ऐसी कार्यक्षमता हो सकती है जिससे आप अपने वॉलेट को विभिन्न विकेंद्रीकृत एप्लिकेशंस से जोड़ने में सक्षम हो सकते हैं। आप इन तृतीय-पक्ष एप्लिकेशन की सुरक्षा और हिफाजत को सुनिश्चित करने के लिए पूरी तरह से ज़िम्मेदार हैं। तृतीय-पक्ष एप्लिकेशन पर हमारा कोई नियंत्रण नहीं है और तृतीय-पक्ष एप्लिकेशन से कनेक्ट करते समय आपके सामने आने वाली किसी भी समस्या के लिए हम सहायता प्रदान नहीं कर सकते।
2.9 उपयोगकर्ता सहायता
। हम सेवाओं के संबंध में कुछ विशेषताओं और कार्यों में सहायता के लिए उपयोगकर्ता सहायता प्रदान करते हैं। संपर्क करने के लिए, इन-ऐप मैन्यू में से “सपोर्ट/Support” चुनें या support@toolsforhumanity.com पर संपर्क करें।
2.10 World ID इंटरफ़ेस
। World ID प्रोटोकॉल का प्रबंधन और World ID के सत्यापन हेतु Orb संबंधी डेटा डेटा प्रोसेसिंग का नियंत्रण TFH नहीं बल्कि Worldcoin Foundation करता है। हम आपके World ID को सेवा के माध्यम से आपके लिए (एक इंटरफ़ेस के रूप में) उपलब्ध करा सकते हैं। World ID प्रोटोकॉल आपकी निजता की सुरक्षा करते हुए आपको यह सिद्ध करने की सुविधा देता है कि आप एक वास्तविक और अद्वितीय मनुष्य हैं।
2.11 आमंत्रण कार्यक्रम
। जहां उपलब्ध हो, वहां हम आपके लिए आमंत्रण सुविधा उपलब्ध करा सकते हैं। आमंत्रण का उपयोग करके, आप मित्रों और परिवार को World App डाउनलोड करने और World ID के लिए सत्यापित होने के लिए आमंत्रित कर सकते हैं। यदि आप आमंत्रण का उपयोग कर रहे हैं तो आप इन नियमों और शर्तों पर सहमति देते हैं:
आमंत्रण में भाग लेने के लिए मिलने वाले पारितोषिक World Assets Limited द्वारा दिए जाते हैं। World Assets Limited, अपने निर्णय से, अपनी World ID को सफलतापूर्वक सत्यापित करने वाले उपयोगकर्ताओं को आमंत्रित करने के लिए आपको पुरस्कार की पेशकश कर सकता है। पुरस्कार प्राप्त करने के लिए, आपको कुछ शर्तों को पूरा करना होगा, जिसके बारे में आपको World App में बताया जाएगा। आपके पास अधिकतम सीमा है कि आप कितने उपयोगकर्ताओं को World App रेफर कर सकते हैं। यह सीमा World App में प्रदर्शित की गई है।
आमंत्रण सुविधा में भाग लेने के लिए कोई खरीदारी आवश्यक नहीं है। आमंत्रण केवल निजी, गैर-व्यावसायिक उपयोग के लिए उपलब्ध है। आमंत्रण सुविधा का उपयोग आप केवल वैध उद्देश्यों के लिए अच्छे विश्वास में कर सकते हैं। आप निम्नलिखित नहीं कर सकते हैं: (a) आमंत्रण या सेवाओं का उपयोग भ्रामक, कपटपूर्ण या गैरकानूनी तरीके से नहीं कर सकते; (b) हमारे ब्रांड, साख या प्रतिष्ठा को नुकसान पहुँचाने के लिए कुछ भी करना; (c) अवांछित या अनधिकृत विज्ञापन या प्रचार सामग्री प्रसारित करना; (d) झूठे या गुमराह करने वाले दावे करना; (e) आमंत्रण के माध्यम से उपयोगकर्ताओं को आकर्षित करने के लिए भुगतान की गई खोज, भुगतान मीडिया या अन्य समान गतिविधि का उपयोग करें; और (f) अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं से व्यक्तिगत जानकारी प्राप्त करने का प्रयास करने के लिए आमंत्रण का उपयोग करें।
आमंत्रण सभी देशों में या स्थानों पर उपलब्ध नहीं है और सभी उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए उपलब्ध नहीं है। आमंत्रण में भागीदारी किसी भी ऐसे क्षेत्राधिकार में उपलब्ध नहीं है जहाँ इस सुविधा का पूरा या कोई हिस्सा किसी भी कानूनी आवश्यकताओं का उल्लंघन कर सकता हो (या हमें उल्लंघन करने के लिए मजबूर कर सकता हो)। यदि आमंत्रण सुविधा आपके स्थान पर लागू कानून के अनुरूप नहीं है, तो आप आमंत्रण का उपयोग न करने पर सहमत हैं।
आमंत्रण एकमात्र हमारे विवेकाधीन के अनुसार उपलब्ध कराया जाता है। हम किसी भी समय इस सुविधा को बदल सकते हैं, संशोधित, निलंबित कर सकते हैं और रद्द कर सकते हैं। World Assets Limited उपयोगकर्ताओं को उनकी World ID सत्यापित करने के लिए आमंत्रित करने के लिए आपको पुरस्कार देने से इनकार कर सकता है, जहाँ यह अपने विवेक से यह निर्धारित करता है कि आपने इन शर्तों का उल्लंघन किया है।
2.12 WLD अनुदान और आरक्षण
। अलग-अलग अंतरालों पर WLD की छोटी-छोटी मात्राओं (“WLD अनुदान”) का दावा करना तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं में से एक है। WLD अनुदान Worldcoin Foundation की एक सहायक कंपनी World Assets Limited द्वारा प्रदान किए जाते हैं। WLD अनुदानों की सटीक मात्रा, अंतराल और समय World App में निर्दिष्ट किए जाएँगे, लेकिन वे केवल और केवल World Assets Limited द्वारा निर्धारित किए जाते हैं। इन शर्तों के पिछले संस्करणों की अनुरूपता में, पूर्व में उपलब्ध WLD आरक्षण इस बात की गारंटी नहीं हैं कि आपको WLD अनुदानों की कोई मात्रा मिलेगी। WLD आरक्षणों की सटीक मात्रा, अंतराल और समय World App में निर्दिष्ट किए जाएँगे, लेकिन वे केवल और केवल World Assets Limited द्वारा निर्धारित किए जाते हैं। World App में पूर्व सूचना के साथ या बिना, WLD आरक्षण समाप्त हो सकता है, भले ही आपने पहले से ही WLD आरक्षण किया हो या संबंधित WLD अनुदान प्राप्त किया हो। वे World Assets Limted के पूर्ण निर्णय पर रद्द किये जा सकते हैं।
2.13 Operator App
. Orb ऑपरेटरों और अन्य भागीदारों के लिए, हम एक Operator ऐप उपलब्ध कराते हैं, जो आपको Orb ऑपरेटरों के रूप में आपके और आपके व्यवसाय से संबंधित कुछ गतिविधियों और आंकड़ों की निगरानी करने देता है। हम Orb ऑपरेटरों के रूप में आपके व्यवसाय का संचालन करने में आपकी सहायता के लिए कुछ सुविधाएं भी उपलब्ध करा सकते हैं।
2.14. मिनीऐप्स
। “मिनीऐप्स” World App की एक विशेषता है जो आपको ऐसी छोटी-छोटी एप्लिकेशंस तक पहुँचने की सुविधा देती है जिन तक World App के भीतर से पहुँचा जा सकता है। World App के भीतर मिनीऐप्स कैसे दिखाई जाती हैं यह तय करने का विवेकाधिकार केवल और केवल हमारे पास है। मिनीऐप्स तक पहुँचने के लिए आपके पास एक World App वॉलेट होना आवश्यक है।
आप यह अभिस्वीकृति देते हैं कि मिनीऐप्स को दिखाने में, TFH केवल उपयोगकर्ताओं को जोड़ने वाला एक टेक्नॉलजी प्लेटफ़ॉर्म मात्र ही प्रदान कर रहा है। TFH कभी-भी किसी भी पारंपरिक या डिजिटल करेंसी के संप्रेषण, भंडारण, उसे अपने पास रखने, अपनी अभिरक्षा में लेने या अन्यथा संलग्न होने का कार्य नहीं करता है। TFH लेनदेनों को प्रोसेस नहीं करता है, भुगतान प्रोसेसर का काम नहीं करता है या लेनदेनों की प्रोसेसिंग में अन्यथा संलग्न नहीं होता है। TFH लेनदेनों का एक पक्ष नहीं है और इन लेनदेनों के संबंध में उस पर कोई भी दायित्व नहीं है। TFH लेनदेन समस्याओं के संबंध में सहायता नहीं दे सकता है।
2.14.1 मिनीऐप्स से संबंधित लेनदेन और भुगतान
। मिनीऐप्स World App के भीतर दिखाई जाती हैं और वे ऐसी वस्तुएँ या सेवाएँ पेश कर सकती हैं जिन्हें World App उपयोगकर्ता अपने World App वॉलेट में मौजूद डिजिटल टोकन के उपयोग से खरीद सकते हैं। ये लेनदेन आपके और मिनीऐप के बीच होते हैं।  TFH ऐसे किसी भी लेनदेन का एक पक्ष नहीं है।
ऐसे किसी भी लेनदेन के संबंध में, आप यह अभिस्वीकृति देते हैं कि World App वॉलेट एक नॉन-कस्टोडियल सेवा है, यह कि TFH आपके डिजिटल टोकन को भंडारित या अभिरक्षित नहीं करता है और उनसे लेनदेन नहीं करता है, उनका संप्रेषण नहीं करता है, उनको अपने कब्ज़े में नहीं लेता है या किसी भी लेनदेन को करने में किसी भी प्रकार से संलग्न नहीं होता है। डिजिटल टोकन हमेशा उनके संबंधित ब्लॉकचेन नेटवर्क पर भंडारित और संप्रेषित किए जाते हैं। इस बात की कोई गारंटी नहीं है कि लेनदेन सही से प्रोसेस होगा।
TFH आपको मिनीऐप्स प्लेटफ़ॉर्म में किसी तृतीय-पक्ष से केवल जोड़ता ही है और वह किसी भी लेनदेन का कोई पक्ष नहीं है। TFH की भुगतानों की प्रोसेसिंग में और रिफ़ंड या कैंसलेशन शुल्कों के नियंत्रण में कोई भी भूमिका नहीं है।
जब आप किसी लेनदेन में शामिल होने का निर्णय ले लें, तो आपको सम्मत प्रकार के डिजिटल टोकन सम्मत मात्रा में भेजने होंगे। TFH उपयोगकर्ता के डिजिटल टोकन या पारंपरिक करेंसी को प्रोसेस नहीं करता है और उपयोगकर्ताओं की ओर से कोई भी हस्तांतरण नहीं करता है। TFH किसी भी लेनदेन की हैंडलिंग, का प्रबंधन, पर्यवेक्षण या सत्यापन नहीं करता है या उस पर किसी भी प्रकार की वॉरंटी प्रदान नहीं करता है।  लेनदेन प्राप्त न होने, पलट जाने, गलत ढंग से प्रोसेस होने या अन्यथा कोई त्रुटि होने की दशा में जो भी समस्या हो उसे हल करने के लिए आपको और तृतीय-पक्ष प्रदाताओं को मिलकर काम करना होगा। भुगतानों या लेनदेनों के संबंध में जो भी विवाद, दावे, हानियाँ, गलतफ़हमियाँ, तकनीकी त्रुटियाँ या किसी भी प्रकार की समस्याएँ हों (भूलवश और कथित रूप से इरादतन, दोनों प्रकार की) उन्हें सीधे तौर पर आपके और तृतीय-पक्ष प्रदाता के बीच हल किया जाना होगा।  TFH किसी भी प्रकार की कोई भी ज़िम्मेदारी स्वीकार नहीं करता है और वह किसी भी भुगतान-संबंधी विवाद या चर्चा का एक पक्ष नहीं होगा और न ही वह शामिल पक्षों को हो सकने वाली हानियों या क्षतियों के लिए देनदार होगा।
डिजिटल टोकन के मूल्य के संबंध में कीमत के किन्हीं भी उतार-चढ़ावों का जोखिम स्वीकार करने के लिए एकमात्र आप ज़िम्मेदार हैं और आप यह बात समझते हैं कि जब तक आप कोई लेनदेन पूरा करते हैं तब तक लेनदेन में शामिल डिजिटल टोकन का मूल्य काफ़ी बदल सकता है।
2.14.2 तृतीय-पक्ष
। सभी मिनीऐप्स में दिखाए गए उत्पाद और सेवाओं की पेशकश और उनका प्रबंधन तृतीय-पक्षों द्वारा किया जाता है। मिनीऐप्स का उपयोग करने के द्वारा आप यह अभिस्वीकृति और सहमति देते हैं कि:
ये शर्तें आपके और हमारे बीच हैं, न कि किसी मिनीऐप विशेष के साथ;
आप एक तृतीय-पक्ष ऐप द्वारा विकसित और/या प्रदत्त ऐप तक पहुँच रहे हैं और वही पक्ष उस मिनीऐप के लिए एकमात्र रूप से ज़िम्मेदार है;
TFH World App वॉलेट के ज़रिए तृतीय-पक्ष भुगतान प्रदाताओं तक पहुँच मात्र प्रदान करता है और स्वयं न तो भुगतान प्रोसेस करता है और न ही निधियाँ अपने पास रखता है;
मिनीऐप्स की उनके उत्पादों या सेवाओं के भाग के रूप में अतिरिक्त शर्तें हो सकती हैं और यदि आप उनकी सेवा को स्वीकार कर रहे हैं तो आपको उन अतिरिक्त शर्तों का अनुपालन करना होगा; और
आप लेनदेनों से संबंधित किसी भी और सभी जोखिमों की पूर्ण अभिस्वीकृति देते हैं और उन जोखिमों को स्पष्ट रूप से ग्रहण करते हैं और आप सहमत हैं कि ऐसे लेनदेनों के किन्हीं भी जोखिमों या उनसे उत्पन्न किन्हीं भी प्रतिकूल परिणामों के लिए हम देनदार नहीं होंगे।
मिनीऐप्स में उपलब्ध मिनीऐप्स के अलग-अलग विकासकर्ता उनकी अपनी-अपनी मिनीऐप्स के ज़रिए सीधे तौर पर आपको उपलब्ध कराई गई सामग्री, उत्पादों, वस्तुओं या सेवाओं के लिए एकमात्र रूप से ज़िम्मेदार हैं। किसी भी पूछताछ या विवाद के लिए आप सीधे संबंधित विकासकर्ता से संपर्क करेंगे।
उपयोगकर्ता लेनदेन करने से संबंधित सारे जोखिम, जिनमें उन्हें उनकी खरीद या बिक्री की प्राप्ति न मिलने का जोखिम शामिल है, को स्वीकार करते हैं। किसी लेनदेन के संंबंध में कोई समस्या होने की स्थिति में, TFH न तो समाधान में कोई सहायता कर सकता है और न ही वह किसी भी लेनदेन से उत्पन्न समस्याओं के लिए कोई दायित्व रखता है।
2.14.3 TFH शुल्क
। जब आप किसी विकासकर्ता से कोई लेनदेन करते हैं तो हम मिनीऐप्स के उपयोग के लिए एक शुल्क जोड़ सकते हैं। इस शुल्क की राशि आपको प्लेटफ़ॉर्म के भीतर दिखाई जाएगी। ऐसी कोई भी शुल्क प्रदर्शित व वर्तमान किए जाएंगे जैसे मिनीऐप्स में दिखाए जाएँ, और उन्हें समय-समय पर अपडेट किया और बदला जा सकता है।
2.14.4 कर
। यह निर्धारित करना एकमात्र आपकी ज़िम्मेदारी है कि क्या, और किस हद तक, मिनीऐप्स के ज़रिए हुए किसी लेनदेन या उनके भीतर आपके द्वारा किए गए किसी भी लेनदेन पर कोई कर लागू होता है, और कर की सही राशि को रोकना, एकत्र करना और उचित कर अधिकारियों को रिपोर्ट करना व भेजना भी एकमात्र आपकी ज़िम्मेदारी है।
2.14.5 कोई सामान्य निगरानी नहीं।
TFH का उपयोगकर्ताओं द्वारा सृजित जानकारी की निगरानी करने का या मिनीऐप्स के भीतर किसी गैरकानूनी गतिविधि का संकेत देने वाले तथ्यों या परिस्थितियों की खोज करने का कोई सामान्य दायित्व नहीं होगा।
हालाँकि, यदि हमें यह पता चलता है कि यूरोपीय संघ में स्थित उपयोगकर्ताओं को मिनीऐप्स के ज़रिए कोई गैरकानूनी उत्पाद या सेवा प्रस्तुत की गई है (साधन चाहे जो हो) तो हम मिनीऐप्स के ज़रिए गैरकानूनी उत्पाद या सेवा खरीद चुके उपयोगकर्ताओं को सूचित करेंगे
।
2.14.6 निषिद्ध गतिविधियाँ
। मिनीऐप्स सेवाओं के उपयोगकर्ता सहमत हैं कि वे ऐसी कोई भी सामग्री पोस्ट या वितरित नहीं करेंगे जो किसी कानून का उल्लंघन करती है या किसी तृतीय-पक्ष अधिकार, जिसमें सभी बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकार, निजता के अधिकार या सार्वजनिकता के अधिकार शामिल हैं, का अतिक्रमण करती है।
साथ ही, आप ऐसी किसी भी गतिविधि में संलिप्त नहीं होने पर भी सहमत हैं जो:
गैरकानूनी, धोखाधड़ीपूर्ण या हानिकारक है;
मिनीऐप्स के संचालन में हस्तक्षेप या को बाधित करती है;
हमारे ऐप दिशानिर्देशों में वर्णित किसी शर्त का उल्लंघन करती है; और
ऐसी सामग्री से युक्त है जिसे ऐप दिशानिर्देशों के तहत अनुमति नहीं है।
2.14.7 गैरकानूनी सामग्री का चिह्नांकन
। World App में ऐसी सुलभ और उपयोग-में-आसान व्यवस्थाएँ हैं जिनसे उपयोगकर्ता मिनीऐप्स प्लेटफ़ॉर्म में गैरकानूनी सामग्री होने की सूचना हमें दे सकते हैं। हम ऐसी सूचनाओं की समीक्षा के लिए तेज़ी से कदम उठाएँगे।
2.14.8 गैरकानूनी सामग्री हटाना
। यदि हम यह निर्धारित करते हैं कि किसी मिनीऐप में गैरकानूनी सामग्री है या वह गैरकानूनी उत्पाद या सेवाएँ प्रस्तुत करती है, तो उसे मिनीऐप्स से हटा दिया जाएगा। TFH गैरकानूनी सामग्री या सेवाओं के पोस्टकर्ता को कारणों का एक संक्षिप्त, स्पष्ट और विशिष्ट विवरण प्रदान करेगा।
World App द्वारा उसके उपयोगकर्ताओं पर जो भी प्रतिबंध लागू किए जाएँगे वे सावधानी से, निष्पक्षता से और आनुपातिक रूप से लागू किए जाएँगे।
जिन उपयोगकर्ताओं का मानना है कि उनकी सामग्री को अनुचित ढंग से हटाया गया है या उसकी पहुँच को अनुचित ढंग से अक्षम किया गया है वे निर्णय विरुद्ध अपील के लिए हमसे
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
पर संपर्क कर सकते हैं। हम एक मुफ़्त, इलेक्ट्रॉनिक शिकायत प्रणाली प्रदान करते हैं जो उपयोगकर्ताओं को कथित गैरकानूनी सामग्री या शर्तों के उल्लंघन के कारण सामग्री हटाने, सेवा निलंबित करने, अकाउंट समाप्त करने या मौद्रीकरण पर प्रतिबंध लगाने के हमारे निर्णयों को चुनौती देने की सुविधा देती है।
2.14.9 सामग्री विमंदन
। TFH के पास प्रकट रूप से गैरकानूनी सामग्री अ्सर प्रदान करने वाले उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए हमारी सेवाओं की प्रदायगी को, जहाँ कानून आवश्यक करे वहाँ अग्रिम चेतावनी जारी कर चुकने के बाद, यथोचित समयावधि तक निलंबित करने का अधिकार सुरक्षित है। TFH अक्सर निराधार दावे भेजने वाले उपयोगकर्ताओं से आने वाली सूचनाओं और शिकायतों की प्रोसेसिंग को अस्थायी रूप से निलंबित भी कर सकता है।
2.15. यूज़रनेम
। यह ज़रूरी नहीं है कि आप अपने वास्तविक नाम को ही अपना World App यूज़रनेम बनाएँ। यूज़रनेम चुनते समय आप
यूज़रनेम नीति
के नवीनतम संस्करण का पालन करने को बाध्य हैं।
3. खरीद, शुल्क और कर
3.1 लेनदेन शुल्क
। सेवाओं का उपयोग करके, आप डिजिटल टोकन स्वैप और लेनदेन के लिए लेनदेन शुल्क सहित सभी लागू शुल्कों का भुगतान करने के लिए सहमत हैं। लेन-देन करने से पहले हम आपको किसी भी लागू शुल्क के बारे में बताएँगे। यदि आप किसी तृतीय पक्ष भुगतान सेवा का उपयोग करते हैं, तो किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन खरीद के लिए बैंक शुल्क, क्रेडिट कार्ड और डेबिट कार्ड शुल्क को आपकी डिजिटल टोकन खरीद की निर्धारित राशि से घटाया जा सकता है। आप अपने वित्तीय सेवा प्रदाता द्वारा लगाए गए किसी भी अतिरिक्त शुल्क का भुगतान करने के लिए भी ज़िम्मेदार हैं।
3.2 नेटवर्क शुल्क।
ब्लॉकचेन के साथ बातचीत करने पर नेटवर्क शुल्क भी लगता है। किसी भी बातचीत को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए ब्लॉकचेन नेटवर्क द्वारा नेटवर्क शुल्क लिया जाता है और उसे भुगतान किया जाता है, हमें नहीं। कुछ मामलों में आप TFH द्वारा पूरी तरह से स्वयं के विवेकाधीन निर्धारित एक तय समयावधि के भीतर एक सीमित संंख्या में गैस-फ़्री (शून्य लागत) लेनदेनों के पात्र हो सकते हैं। ऐसे लेनदेनों का एक न्यूनतम लेनदेन मूल्य होना आवश्यक है जिसे TFH घटा-बढ़ा सकता है।
3.3 कर
। यह निर्धारित करना आपकी एकमात्र ज़िम्मेदारी है कि क्या, और किस हद तक, सेवाओं के माध्यम से किसी भी लेन-देन पर कोई कर लागू होता है, और उचित कर अधिकारियों को कर की सही राशि को रोकना, एकत्र करना, रिपोर्ट करना और प्रेषित करना भी आपकी एकमात्र ज़िम्मेदारी है।
3.4 अपडेट
। सभी शुल्क प्रदर्शित और चालू हैं जैसा कि सेवाओं में दर्शाया गया है और समय-समय पर अपडेट और परिवर्तित किए जा सकते है।
4. जोखिम कारक
4.1 कानूनी निविदा नहीं।
डिजिटल टोकन कानूनी निविदा नहीं हैं, किसी भी सरकार द्वारा समर्थित नहीं हैं, और सेवाओं पर डिजिटल टोकन खाते और मूल्य शेष, संघीय जमा बीमा निगम, प्रतिभूति निवेशक संरक्षण निगम सुरक्षा, या अन्य देशों में पाए जाने वाले समान सुरक्षा के अधीन नहीं हैं। हम कोई बैंक नहीं हैं और प्रत्ययी सेवाएं प्रदान नहीं करते। World App पर किए गए लेनदेन काफी हद तक कई देशों में अविनियमित हैं। हम, हमारे द्वारा समर्थित ब्लॉकचेन की कार्यक्षमता के बारे में कोई गारंटी नहीं देते हैं, जो अन्य बातों के अलावा, देरी, हितों के टकराव, या तृतीय पक्ष द्वारा परिचालन निर्णय हो सकते हैं जो डिजिटल टोकन के कुछ मालिकों के प्रतिकूल हैं, या सेवाओं का उपयोग करके लेनदेन पूरा करने की आपकी अक्षमता का कारण बन सकते हैं। सेवाओं के माध्यम से आपके द्वारा सबमिट किए गए लेनदेन का विवरण पूरा नहीं हो सकता है, या लागू ब्लॉकचेन पर काफी देरी हो सकती है, और हम उम्मीद के मुताबिक पुष्टि या संसाधित होने वाले लेन-देन की विफलता के लिए कोई ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं लेते हैं। इस बात की कोई वारंटी या गारंटी नहीं है कि सेवाओं के माध्यम से शुरू किया गया स्थानांतरण किसी भी डिजिटल टोकन में शीर्षक या अधिकार को सफलतापूर्वक स्थानांतरित कर देगा । साथ ही, कुछ डिजिटल टोकन, जैसे कि WLD, के उपयोग के साथ कुछ विशिष्ट जोखिम जुड़े हो सकते हैं। WLD से जुड़े विशिष्ट जोखिमों के बारे में अधिक जानकारी यहाँ पाई जा सकती है।
4.2 नई टेक्नोलॉजी।
सेवाएं नई हैं। हालांकि इस सॉफ़्टवेयर का व्यापक परीक्षण किया गया है, सेवाओं के लिए उपयोग किया जाने वाला सॉफ़्टवेयर अभी भी अपेक्षाकृत नया है और इसमें बग या सुरक्षा कमजोरियाँ हो सकती हैं। इसके अलावा, सॉफ़्टवेयर अभी भी विकास के अधीन है और समय के साथ महत्वपूर्ण परिवर्तन हो सकते हैं जो उपयोगकर्ताओं की अपेक्षाओं को पूरा नहीं कर सकते हैं।
4.3 सूचना सुरक्षा जोखिम।
डिजिटल टोकन और सेवाओं का उपयोग ज़ब्त या चोरी के अधीन हो सकता है। हैकर्स या अन्य दुर्भावनापूर्ण समूह या संगठन विभिन्न तरीकों से सेवाओं में हस्तक्षेप करने का प्रयास कर सकते हैं, जिनमें मैलवेयर हमले, सेवा हमलों से इनकार, आम सहमति-आधारित हमले, सिबिल हमले, स्मर्फिंग और स्पूफिंग शामिल हैं, लेकिन इन्हीं तक सीमित नहीं हैं। इसके अलावा, क्योंकि हम जिस ब्लॉकचेन नेटवर्क का समर्थन करते हैं, जैसे कि एथेरियम प्रोटोकॉल, ओपन सोर्स सॉफ़्टवेयर पर निर्भर करता है, सेवाओं में अंतर्निहित सॉफ़्टवेयर में सुविचारित या अनजाने में बग या कमजोरियां हो सकती हैं जो सेवाओं को नकारात्मक रूप से प्रभावित कर सकती हैं या इसके  परिणामस्वरूप उपयोगकर्ता के डिजिटल टोकन के नुकसान हो सकता है या अपने वॉलेट तक पहुँचने या नियंत्रित करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ता की क्षमता का नुकसान हो सकता है। ऐसे सॉफ़्टवेयर बग या कमज़ोरी की स्थिति में, कोई उपाय नहीं भी हो सकता है और उपयोगकर्ताओं को किसी भी उपाय, धनवापसी या मुआवजे की गारंटी नहीं दी जाती है।
4.4 सटीकता।
यद्यपि हम सेवाओं के माध्यम से प्रदान की गई सटीक और समय पर जानकारी प्रदान करने का इरादा रखते हैं (जिसमें, बिना किसी सीमा के, सामग्री सहित) जो हमेशा पूरी तरह से सटीक, पूर्ण या ताज़ा नहीं हो सकती है और इसमें तकनीकी त्रुटियां या टाइपोग्राफ़िकल त्रुटियां भी शामिल हो सकती हैं। आपको यथासंभव पूर्ण और सटीक जानकारी प्रदान करना जारी रखने के प्रयास में, लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमत सीमा तक जानकारी को समय-समय पर बिना किसी सूचना के बदला या अपडेट किया जा सकता है, जिसमें हमारी नीतियों, उत्पादों और सेवाओं के बारे में बिना किसी सीमा के जानकारी शामिल है। तदनुसार, आपको इस पर भरोसा करने से पहले सभी सूचनाओं को सत्यापित करना चाहिए, और सेवाओं के माध्यम से प्रदान की गई जानकारी के आधार पर सभी निर्णय आपकी एकमात्र ज़िम्मेदारी हैं और ऐसे निर्णयों के लिए हमारी कोई ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं होगी।
4.5 उपलब्धता
। यद्यपि हम आपको उत्कृष्ट सेवा प्रदान करने का प्रयास करते हैं, हम गारंटी नहीं देते हैं कि सेवाएं बिना किसी रुकावट के उपलब्ध होंगी। रखरखाव या अन्य कारणों से समय-समय पर सेवाएं अस्थायी रूप से अनुपलब्ध हो सकती हैं। हम किसी भी त्रुटि, चूक, रुकावट, विलोपन, दोष, संचालन या प्रसारण में देरी, संचार लाइन की विफलता, चोरी या विनाश या अनधिकृत पहुँच, या उपयोगकर्ता संचार में परिवर्तन के लिए कोई ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं लेते हैं। हम किसी भी टेलीफोन नेटवर्क या लाइन, कंप्यूटर ऑनलाइन सिस्टम की किसी भी समस्या या तकनीकी खराबी, सर्वर या प्रदाता, कंप्यूटर उपकरण, सॉफ़्टवेयर, तकनीकी समस्याओं या इंटरनेट या सेवाओं या उसके संयोजन पर यातायात की भीड़ के कारण ईमेल या खिलाड़ियों की विफलता के लिए ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं जिसमें सेवाओं के संबंध में सामग्री में भाग लेने या डाउनलोड करने से संबंधित या इसके परिणामस्वरूप उपयोगकर्ताओं या किसी अन्य व्यक्ति के कंप्यूटर को चोट या क्षति शामिल है। हम ऐसे किसी भी नुकसान या क्षति, वित्तीय क्षति या खोए हुए लाभ, व्यवसाय की हानि, या व्यक्तिगत चोट या मृत्यु के लिए ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं, जो सेवा के किसी भी व्यक्ति द्वारा उपयोग किए जाने, सेवा पर या उसके माध्यम से पोस्ट की गई कोई सामग्री या उपयोगकर्ताओं को प्रेषित की गई सामग्री, या सेवाओं के उपयोगकर्ताओं के बीच के किसी वार्तालाप चाहे ऑनलाइन हो या ऑफलाइन, के परिणामस्वरूप होते हैं।
4.6 फ़ोर्क
। WLD की रचना हेतु प्रयुक्त सॉफ़्टवेयर ओपन-सोर्स है और किसी के भी द्वारा कॉपी या प्रयोग किए जाने के लिए मुफ़्त है। इसका यह अर्थ है कि कोई भी WLD का संशोधित संस्करण बना सकता है, जिसे अन्यथा “फ़ोर्क” के नाम से जाना जाता है। फ़ोर्क, या किसी डिजिटल टोकन के नेटवर्क में कोई अन्य व्यवधान होने की स्थिति में, हो सकता है कि हम फ़ोर्क से संबंधित किसी भी गतिविधि को समर्थन न दे सकें। जब कोई फ़ोर्क उत्पन्न होता है, तो हो सकता है कि लेनदेन पूरे न हो सकें, आंशिक रूप से पूरे हों, ग़लत ढंग से पूरे हों या उनमें अच्छी-ख़ासी देरी हो जाए। पूर्ण या आंशिक रूप से किसी फ़ोर्क या अन्य नेटवर्क व्यवधान के कारण आपको होने वाली किसी भी हानि के लिए हम ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं।
4.7 तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाएं।
जहाँ उपलब्ध हो वहाँ (विशेष रूप से अनुभाग 2.5 देखें), हम ऐप्स में कुछ सुविधाएँ और कार्यक्षमताएँ प्रदान करने के लिए तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा प्रदाताओं पर निर्भर करते हैं, जैसे फ़िएट करेंसी से डिजिटल टोकन खरीदने की क्षमता, या दो डिजिटल परिसंपत्तियों में अदल-बदल की क्षमता। हम इन सेवाओं को प्रदान नहीं करते हैं, और हम इस तरह के किसी भी लेनदेन में पक्ष नहीं हैं। आप इन सेवाओं के लिए केवल तृतीय पक्ष के प्रदाताओं पर भरोसा कर रहे हैं, और आपका तृतीय पक्ष के प्रदाताओं के साथ एक खाता होना चाहिए और उनकी शर्तों से सहमत होना चाहिए। यदि
आप उनकी सेवा का उपयोग करने में समस्याओं का सामना करते हैं, तो हम आपकी सहायता करने में असमर्थ हैं, और हम तृतीय-पक्ष प्रदाताओं का उपयोग करके आपके द्वारा किए गए किसी भी लेनदेन के लिए ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं।
5. बौद्धिक संपदा।
5.1 स्वामित्व
। हमारा सॉफ़्टवेयर, ऐप्लिकेशन, सेवाएं, सामग्री, मार्क्स (जैसे नीचे परिभाषित हैं) और सेवाओं में सामग्री की डिज़ाइन, चयन एवं व्यवस्था (“IP”) संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका व अन्य लागू देशों के कॉपीराइट, ट्रेडमार्क, पेटेंट एवं अन्य बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकारों व कानूनों द्वारा संरक्षित हैं। आप समस्त लागू बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकारों और कानूनों का, और करार या सेवाओं में जो भी ट्रेडमार्क या कॉपीराइट सूचनाएं या प्रतिबंध हों उनका पालन करने पर सहमत हैं। आप IP में मौजूद किसी भी कॉपीराइट, ट्रेडमार्क या अन्य स्वामित्वाधीन सूचनाओं को हटा नहीं सकते हैं।
5.2 ट्रेडमार्क।
Tools for Humanity Corporation का नाम, World App लोगो और सभी संबंधित लोगो, और स्लोगन, Tools for Humanity Corporation या उसके लाइसेंसदाताओं के ट्रेडमार्क या सेवा चिह्न (“मार्क्स”) हैं। आप हमारी लिखित अनुमति के बिना, मार्क्स की पूरी तरह या आंशिक रूप से कॉपी, नकल या का उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं। सेवाओं के सिलसिले में उल्लिखित अन्य सभी ट्रेडमार्क, नाम या लोगो उनके अपने-अपने स्वामियों की संपत्ति हैं और आप लागू ट्रेडमार्क स्वामी की लिखित अनुमति के बिना उनकी पूर्ण या आंशिक रूप से प्रति नहीं बना सकते हैं, उनकी नकल नहीं कर सकते हैं या उनका उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं। सेवाओं में दूसरों के किसी भी मार्क को शामिल करना, हमारे द्वारा उसका अनुमोदन, समर्थन या उसकी अनुशंसा नहीं है।
6. लाइसेंस और प्रतिबंध
6.1 लाइसेंस
। बशर्ते इसके कि आप सेवाओं का उपयोग करने के योग्य हैं और इन शर्तों के अनुपालन के अधीन, हम आपको सेवाओं तक पहुँचने और उपयोग करने के लिए एक सीमित लाइसेंस प्रदान करते हैं।
6.2 लाइसेंस प्रतिबंध
। आप किसी भी इंटरनेट, इंट्रानेट या एक्स्ट्रानेट साइट पर सामग्री को पुनर्प्रकाशित नहीं कर सकते हैं या किसी अन्य डेटाबेस या संकलन में जानकारी शामिल नहीं कर सकते हैं, और सामग्री का कोई अन्य उपयोग भी सख्त वर्जित है। हमारी पूर्व लिखित अनुमति के बिना यहां विशेष रूप से अधिकृत सेवाओं के अलावा अन्य सेवाओं का कोई भी उपयोग सख्त वर्जित है और यहां दिए गए लाइसेंस को समाप्त कर देगा। इस तरह का अनधिकृत उपयोग बिना किसी सीमा के कॉपीराइट और ट्रेडमार्क कानूनों और लागू संचार नियमों और विधियों सहित लागू कानूनों का उल्लंघन कर सकता है। जब तक यहां स्पष्ट रूप से नहीं कहा गया है, इन शर्तों में कुछ भी बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकारों के लिए किसी भी लाइसेंस को प्रदान करने के रूप में नहीं माना जाएगा, चाहे विबंधन, निहितार्थ या अन्यथा हो। यह लाइसेंस, लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक, हमारे द्वारा किसी भी समय बिना किसी सूचना के और सकारण या अकारण रद्द किया जा सकता है।
6.3 सरकार
। यदि आप यू.एस. सरकार के अंतिम उपयोगकर्ता हैं, तो हम आपको सेवाओं को "वाणिज्यिक आइटम" के रूप में लाइसेंस दे रहे हैं क्योंकि यह शब्द यू.एस. संघीय विनियम संहिता (48 सी.एफ.आर. 2.101 देखें) में परिभाषित है, और वे अधिकार जो हम आपको प्रदान करते हैं ये सेवाएं वही हैं जो हम इन शर्तों के तहत अन्य सभी को प्रदान करते हैं।
7. स्वीकार्य उपयोग
7.1
आप सेवाओं का उपयोग केवल अपने निजी उपयोग के लिए कर सकते हैं। हम हर समय और हमारे विवेकाधिकार में लागू कानून के अनुसार सेवाओं तक आपकी पहुँच या उपयोग की समीक्षा करने, उसे रद्द करने या निलंबित करने का अधिकार सुरक्षित रखते हैं। निषिद्ध उपयोग सूची के बिंदु केवल उदाहरण हैं और सूची संपूर्ण नहीं है; हम लागू कानून के अनुसार एकमात्र स्वयं के विवेकाधीन प्रतिबंधित उपयोगों को जोड़ या हटा सकते हैं।
7.2 निषिद्ध उपयोगों में शामिल हैं:
अवैध गतिविधि:
ऐसी कोई भी गतिविधि जो OFAC द्वारा प्रशासित किसी भी प्रतिबंध कार्यक्रम का उल्लंघन करती हो, या उनके उल्लंघन में सहायता देती हो; उन देशों में किसी भी कानून का उल्लंघन करती हो या उनके उल्लंघन में सहायता देती हो जहां हम व्यापार करते हैं; जिसमें किसी अवैध गतिविधि की कमाई शामिल हो; या जो किसी अवैध सामग्री या जानकारी को प्रकाशित, वितरित या प्रसारित करती हो।
अत्यधिक उपयोग या हैकिंग:
ऐसी गतिविधि जो हमारे बुनियादी ढांचे पर अनुचित या विषमानुपाती रूप से विशाल भार डालती हैं, या जो किसी सिस्टम, डेटा या जानकारी में हानिकारक ढंग से हस्तक्षेप करती हैं, उसे मार्ग में पकड़ती (इंटरसेप्ट) हैं; सेवाओं में ऐसी सामग्री संप्रेषित या अपलोड करती हैं जिनमें वायरस, ट्रोजन हॉर्स, वर्म या कोई अन्य हानिकारक या घातक प्रोग्राम हों; या सेवाओं से जुड़े कंप्यूटर सिस्टम्स अथवा नेटवर्क्स की अनधिकृत पहुंच पाने का प्रयास करती है।
दूसरों से दुर्व्यवहार:
ऐसी गतिविधि जो किसी अन्य व्यक्ति की सेवाओं की पहुँच या उपयोग में हस्तक्षेप करे; किसी अन्य व्यक्ति की मानहानि करे, उससे दुर्व्यवहार करे, ज़बरन वसूली करे, उसका उत्पीड़न करे, पीछा करे, उसे धमकाए या अन्यथा उसके निजता, बौद्धिक संपदा, या किन्हीं भी अन्य कानूनी अधिकारों का उल्लंघन या अतिक्रमण करे; दूसरों के विरुद्ध घृणा, नस्ली असहिष्णुता, या हिंसक कृत्य को उकसाए, उसकी धमकी दे, उसको बढ़ावा दे या उसको प्रोत्साहित करे; या
अनुमति के बिना सेवाओं में से किसी भी अन्य उपयोगकर्ता का ईमेल पता, स्थान या अन्य डेटा निकाले, बटोरे या एकत्र करे।
धोखाधड़ी और अन्य अनुचित व्यावसायिक कार्यप्रथाएं
:ऐसी गतिविधि जो हमें, हमारे उपयोगकर्ताओं या किसी अन्य व्यक्ति को धोखा देने हेतु संचालन करे; हमें कोई झूठी, ग़लत या भ्रामक जानकारी दे; अनुचित रूप से अत्यधिक पुरस्कारों का वचन दे या क्रेता को किसी भी वर्धित लाभ के बिना कोई सेवा बेचे, या कोई भी अन्य परभक्षी एवं कपटपूर्ण कार्यप्रथाएं; या गैरकानूनी लॉटरियां, रैफ़ल, बोली शुल्क नीलामियां, प्रतिस्पर्धाएं, स्वीपस्टेक्स, जुआ या संयोग पर आधारित अन्य कोई गेम।
बौद्धिक संपदा का उल्लंघन
:ऐसी गतिविधि जो नकली/जाली संगीत, फ़िल्मों, सॉफ़्टवेयर, या अधिकारधारक से उपयुक्त प्राधिकरण के बिना अन्य लाइसेंसशुदा सामग्री की बिक्री, वितरण या उनकी पहुँच को शामिल करने वाले संव्यवहारों में लिप्त हो; जो सुव्यक्त सहमति के बिना या हमें अथवा हमारी ब्रांड को अन्यथा हानि पहुँचाने वाले ढंग से IP (मार्क्स शामिल) का उपयोग करती हो; जो हमारे द्वारा समर्थन अथवा हमसे संबद्धता का असत्य गर्भित अर्थ रखती हो; या जो कानून के अंतर्गत किसी कॉपीराइट, ट्रेडमार्क, सार्वजनिकता या निजता के अधिकार या किसी अन्य स्वामित्वाधीन अधिकार का अतिक्रमण या उल्लंघन करती हो।
8. Orb ऑपरेटर
हम स्थानीय स्वतंत्र ठेकेदारों के साथ साझेदारी करते हैं जिन्हें “Orb ऑपरेटर” कहा जाता है; वे उपयोगकर्ता साइनअप की सुविधा प्रदान करते हैं और हमारे बारे में आपके सवालों के जवाब देने में मदद करते हैं। इन Orb ऑपरेटर ने प्रशिक्षण प्राप्त किया है और वे World Network के जानकार हैं। हालांकि, वे जो कहते हैं या वे अपने आप से कैसे व्यवहार करते हैं, उस पर हमारा कोई नियंत्रण नहीं है और हम सभी उत्तरदायित्वों को अस्वीकार करते हैं।
Orb ऑपरेटर किसी भी तरह से हमारे एजेंट या कर्मचारी नहीं हैं। TFH द्वारा अपने उपयोगकर्ताओं के हित में किए गए किसी भी प्रयास, सुविधा, प्रक्रिया, नीति, मानक या अन्य प्रयासों से किसी Orb ऑपरेटर के साथ रोज़गार या एजेंसी के संबंध का संकेत नहीं मिलता है।
9. निलंबन
हम सेवाओं तक आपकी पहुँच को निलंबित और प्रतिबंधित कर सकते हैं यदि: (i) चेहरे के आधार पर मान्य सम्मन, अदालती आदेश या सरकारी प्राधिकरण के बाध्यकारी आदेश द्वारा हमारे लिए आवश्यक किया जाए; (ii) हमें यह उचित संदेह हो कि आपने किसी निषिद्ध उपयोग के संबंध में सेवा का उपयोग किया है; (iii) आपके द्वारा सेवाओं का उपयोग किसी लंबित मुकदमेबाज़ी, जाँच, या सरकारी कार्यवाही के अधीन हो और/या हमें आपकी गतिविधि से कानूनी या नियामक अनुपालनहीनता का अधिक जोखिम दिखाई दे; (iv) हमारे सेवा भागीदार आपके उपयोग का समर्थन करने में असमर्थ हों; (v) आप कोई ऐसा कृत्य करते हैं जो हमारी नज़र में हमारे नियंत्रणों को निष्प्रभावी करता है (ऐसे कृत्य के उदाहरणों में एक से अधिक अकाउंट बनाने की कोशिश करना शामिल है पर वे इसी तक सीमित नहीं हैं)
10. प्रतिभूतियों या कमोडिटी हित की कोई पेशकश नहीं
सेवाओं की सामग्री में निवेश, प्रतिभूतियों, साझेदारी हितों, कमोडिटी या किसी भी अन्य वित्तीय साधनों को खरीदने या बेचने या खरीदने या बेचने के प्रस्ताव शामिल नहीं है; सामग्री या सेवाएं भी शामिल नहीं होती हैं, और किसी भी राज्य या अधिकार क्षेत्र में किसी के द्वारा किसी प्रस्ताव या याचना के संबंध में या उसके संबंध में उपयोग नहीं किया जा सकता है, जिसमें ऐसा प्रस्ताव या याचना अधिकृत या अनुमति नहीं है, या किसी भी व्यक्ति को करने के लिए जिनके लिए इस तरह की पेशकश या याचना करना गैरकानूनी है।
11. सामग्री
11.1 सामग्री पर निर्भरता; सेवाओं में बदलाव।
सेवाओं के माध्यम से हम आपको जो भी जानकारी व सामग्री (“सामग्री”) प्रदान करते हैं वह सिर्फ़ और सिर्फ़ सामान्य जानकारी के प्रयोजनों से है, और हम लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक उसकी शुद्धता, उपयोगिता, या पूर्णता की गारंटी नहीं देते हैं। हमारी सामग्री पर आप जो भी निर्भरता/विश्वास रखते हैं वह आपके अपने जोख़िम पर है। सामग्री के कारण आपके द्वारा, या आप जिससे सामग्री साझा करते हैं उस किसी भी व्यक्ति के द्वारा, उठाए या नहीं उठाए गए किन्हीं भी कदमों के लिए हम पर कोई भी देनदारी या ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं है। सेवाओं पर या कहीं और पाए जाने वाले हमारी सेवाओं के उनके उपयोग का वर्णन करने वाले अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं के कथन उनके कथनों के हमारे समर्थन के रूप में नहीं देखे जाने चाहिएं यदि कथन इन शर्तों या हमारी सामग्री से असंगत हैं। हम समय-समय पर सामग्री को अपडेट कर सकते हैं, पर हो सकता है कि उक्त सामग्री पूर्ण या अप-टू-डेट न हो, और हम सामग्री या सेवाओं के किसी भी अन्य भाग को अपडेट करने के लिए आपके प्रति किसी भी प्रकार से बाध्य नहीं हैं। हम, लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक, आपको अग्रिम सूचना दिए बिना सामग्री या सेवाओं के किसी भी अंश या संपूर्णांश को, अस्थायी या स्थायी रूप से, संशोधित कर सकते हैं या रोक सकते हैं। हम, लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक, सामग्री या सेवाओं के किसी भी अंश या संपूर्णांश के किसी भी संशोधन, निलंबन या उसे रोके जाने के लिए देनदार नहीं होंगे।
11.2 तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाएँ और सामग्री
। हम सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफ़ॉर्म्स पर उपस्थित ऐसी शैक्षिक सामग्री, वेबिनार्स, पूर्व-निर्धारित मुलाकातों और प्रचार-प्रसार गतिविधियों (तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाएं) के लिंक्स प्रदान कर सकते हैं जो उपयोगकर्ताओं एवं अन्य तृतीय पक्षों के बीच साझाकरण और सहयोग को संभव बनाते हैं। यदि आप उन सेवाओं पर कोई व्यक्तिगत जानकारी, चित्र, राय, सामग्री या कोई अन्य डेटा साझा करते हैं, तो आप ऐसा स्वयं के जोख़िम पर करते हैं, और आपके द्वारा उन सेवाओं का उपयोग उन सेवाओं के उपयोग की शर्तें तथा निजता नीतियों के अधीन है, न कि हमारे नियमों व नीतियों के। आपको अपने अधिकारों को, तथा वे प्लेटफ़ॉर्म जिस ढंग से आपके डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं उस ढंग को बेहतर ढंग से समझने के लिए हर तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा के सेवाओं के नियम ध्यान से पढ़ने चाहिए। हम किसी भी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा के संबंध में आपके डेटा की किसी भी हानि, चोरी, क्षति, या दुरुपयोग (लापरवाही
शामिल) के लिए उस सीमा तक को छोड़कर ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं जिस सीमा तक ऐसी देनदारी को लागू कानून के अंतर्गत सीमाबंधित नहीं किया जा सकता है। आपके द्वारा किसी भी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा द्वारा प्रदत्त किसी भी जानकारी (“तृतीय-पक्ष सामग्री”) का उपयोग स्वयं आपके जोख़िम पर है, और हम ऐसा कोई वचन नहीं देते कि कोई तृतीय-पक्ष सामग्री सही है, पूर्ण है, प्रामाणिक है, या आपकी व्यक्तिगत परिस्थितियों के लिए उपयुक्त है। तृतीय-पक्ष सामग्री में अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं द्वारा प्रदत्त ऐसी जानकारी शामिल है जो हमारे द्वारा विशिष्ट रूप से समर्थित नहीं है।
11.3 उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री
। Worldcoin समुदाय का एक सदस्य होने के नाते, आप संदेश, डेटा, सॉफ़्टवेयर, चित्र, वीडियो, या अन्य सामग्री (उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री) को संदेश बोर्ड्स ब्लॉग्स, हमारे स्वामित्व वाले सोशल मीडिया खातों के साथ-साथ सेवाओं पर सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध विभिन्न स्थानों पर पोस्ट कर सकते हैं। ये फ़ोरम हमारे द्वारा या हमारी ओर से हमारे किसी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा प्रदाता द्वारा होस्ट किए जा सकते हैं। आप सेवाओं के माध्यम से जो भी जमा, अपलोड, पोस्ट या भंडारित की गई समस्त उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री के लिए आप ज़िम्मेदार हैं। आपको अपनी उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री के संबंध में समस्त आवश्यक एवं उपयुक्त चेतावनियां, जानकारी और प्रकटन प्रदान करने होंगे। आपके द्वारा सेवाओं के माध्यम से जमा की गई किसी भी उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री के लिए हम ज़िम्मेदार नहीं हैं।
11.4 उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री लाइसेंस
। हमें उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री देने के द्वारा, आप यह अभिवेदन करते हैं कि आपके पास उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री के समस्त आवश्यक अधिकार हैं और आप हमें हमारी मार्केटिंग और प्रचार-प्रसार के संबंध में, और सेवाओं से संबंधित किसी भी अन्य वैध व्यावसायिक प्रयोजन के लिए, संपूर्ण उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री या उसके किसी भी अंश का उपयोग करने, प्रतियां बनाने या वितरण करने, उससे व्युत्पन्नी कार्य तैयार करने, उसे संशोधित करने, प्रदर्शित करने और निष्पादित करने का एक शाश्वत, विश्वव्यापी, अविशिष्ट, रॉयल्टी-मुक्त, उप-लाइसेंस योग्य और हस्तांतरणीय लाइसेंस प्रदान करते हैं। हम आपकी संपूर्ण उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री या उसके किसी अंश का और उसके व्युत्पन्नी कार्यों का किसी भी मीडिया प्रारूप में और हमारे द्वारा चुने गए किन्हीं भी मीडिया मार्गों (चैनल्स) के माध्यम से पुनर्वितरण कर सकते हैं। आप एतद्द्वारा हमें और अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं को सेवाओं के माध्यम से अपनी उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री का उपयोग करने, उस तक पहुँचने, उसकी प्रतियां बनाने, वितरित करने, संशोधित करने और प्रदर्शित करने और निष्पादित करने के लिए एक अविशिष्ट लाइसेंस प्रदान करते हैं। अनुभाग 11.4 लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य पूर्णतम सीमा तक लागू होगा।
11.5 उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री प्रतिबंध
। आप ऐसी किसी भी उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री को पोस्ट या प्रसारित करने हेतु सेवाओं का उपयोग नहीं करने, और किसी भी तृतीय-पक्ष को उपयोग की अनुमति नहीं देने पर सहमत हैं: (a) जो निंदात्मक या मानहानिकारक है, या जो किसी व्यक्ति से संबंधित निजी या व्यक्तिगत मामलों का खुलासा करती है; (b) जो अभद्र, अश्लील, अश्लील सामग्री से युक्त, उत्पीड़क, डराने-धमकाने वाली, दुर्व्यवहारी, घृणापूर्ण, नस्ली या नृजातीय रूप से आपत्तिजनक है; जो दंडनीय अपराध माने जाने वाले, नागरिक दायित्व उत्पन्न करने वाले या किसी कानून का उल्लंघन करने वाले आचरण को प्रोत्साहित करती है, या जो अन्यथा अनुपयुक्त है; (c) जो दूसरों के बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकारों का उल्लंघन करती है, इसमें अनधिकृत कॉपीराइट-अधीन पाठ्य, चित्र या प्रोग्राम, व्यापारिक रहस्य या अन्य गोपनीय स्वामित्वाधीन जानकारी, या ट्रेडमार्क अथवा सर्विस मार्क का अतिक्रमणकारी ढंग से उपयोग शामिल है; या (d) किसी अन्य उपयोगकर्ता द्वारा सेवाओं के उपयोग में हस्तक्षेप करता है। आप हमसे यह अभिवेदन करते हैं कि आप सेवाओं पर उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री स्वेच्छा से पोस्ट कर रहे हैं, और यह कि उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री पोस्ट करने से आपके और हमारे बीच किसी नियोक्ता-कर्मचारी संबंध की रचना नहीं होती है। आप अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं के ईमेल पतों, मोबाइल फोन नंबरों, खाता शेष, उपयोक्तानामों या उनसे संबंधित किसी भी अन्य व्यक्तिगत जानकारी को, उनकी अनुमति के बिना, प्रयोग या कॉपी नहीं कर सकते हैं। सेवाओं के माध्यम से या किन्हीं भी अन्य चैनल्स में अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं को अनचाही ईमेल्स, डाक, टेलीफोन कॉल, या अन्य संचार का प्रेषण निषिद्ध है।
11.6 शिकायतें एवं DMCA टेकडाउन।
यदि आपका मानना है कि सेवाओं में मौजूद हमारी सामग्री या उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री के द्वारा आपके ट्रेडमार्क या कॉपीराइट-अधीन कार्य का अतिक्रमण हुआ है या अन्यथा उसे इस तरह से प्रकाशित किया जा रहा है जिससे हमारे समर्थन या हमसे संबद्धता का कोई संकेत मिलता है, तो कृपया legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com पर विषय वाक्य में “[ट्रेडमार्क/कॉपीराइट]” शिकायत जो भी मामला हो वह लिखकर ईमेल भेजें। आपकी शिकायत प्रभावी हो और हम डिजिटल मिलेनियम कॉपीराइट एक्ट (“DMCA”) के अंतर्गत कार्रवाई कर सकें इसके लिए आपको अपनी ईमेल में निम्नलिखित जानकारी शामिल करके DMCA की समस्त आवश्यकताओं का पालन करना होगा:
उस कॉपीराइट-अधीन कार्य या मार्क की स्पष्ट पहचान जिसके अतिक्रमण का दावा किया गया है, इसमें, यदि कार्य पंजीकृत है तो, कॉपीराइट पंजीकरण संख्या शामिल है;
उस कार्य या मार्क की पहचान जो आपके दावे के अनुसार अतिक्रमणकारी है और जिसे आप हटवाना चाहते हैं;
हमें कथित अतिक्रमणकारी सामग्री का स्थान पता करने में सक्षम बनाने वाला URL या अन्य स्पष्ट निर्देश;
आपका ईमेल पता, डाक का पता, और टेलीफोन नंबर; और
एक हस्ताक्षरित वक्तव्य कि आपको सदाशय से यह विश्वास है कि सामग्री अतिक्रमणकारी है, यह कि आप जो जानकारी दे रहे हैं वह सही है, और यह कि आप सामग्री के स्वामी हैं या सामग्री के स्वामी का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए अधिकृत हैं।
आपको यह भी पता होना चाहिए कि DMCA की धारा 512(f) के अंतर्गत, जो भी व्यक्ति अतिक्रमण की गुणहीन सूचनाएं जान-बूझकर भेजता है वह क्षतियों के लिए देनदार हो सकता है, इसलिए कृपया कोई झूठा दावा न करें। आप हमें जो भी जानकारी या पत्रादि प्रदान करते हैं उन्हें हम तृतीय-पक्षों से साझा कर सकते हैं, इसमें वह व्यक्ति शामिल है जिसने कथित अवहेलना करने वाली सामग्री सेवा पर अपलोड की थी।
जब हमें कोई प्रामाणिक अतिक्रमण सूचना मिलती है तो हमारी नीति यह करने की है: (a) अतिक्रमणकारी सामग्री को तुरंत हटा देना या उसकी पहुँच अक्षम कर देना; (b) अतिक्रमणकारी सामग्री को अपलोड करने वाले व्यक्ति को सूचित करना कि हमने सामग्री को हटा दिया है या उसकी पहुँच अक्षम कर दी है; और (c) बारंबार
अपराध करने वालों के मामले में, व्यक्ति की सेवाओं की पहुँच समाप्त कर देना। यदि हमें उक्त व्यक्ति से काउंटर-नोटिस मिलती है, तो हम इस स्पष्टीकरण के साथ आपको उक्त काउंटर-नोटिस की एक प्रति भेज सकते हैं कि हम 10 कार्य दिवसों के अंदर, हटाई गई सामग्री को सेवाओं में बहाल कर सकते हैं या उसे अक्षम करना रोक सकते हैं। जब तक कि आप हमारे विरुद्ध या सामग्री अपलोड करने वाले व्यक्ति के विरुद्ध न्यायालय आदेश की मांग करने वाला कोई मुकदमा दायर नहीं करते, हम हमारे विवेकाधीन, काउंटर-नोटिस प्राप्त होने के 10 से 14 कार्य दिवसों बाद या इससे अधिक समय बाद, हटाई गई सामग्री की पहुँच बहाल कर देंगे।
12. वारंटियों का अस्वीकरण
12.1 आपके द्वारा सेवाओं का उपयोग, आपके अपने जोख़िम पर है। सेवाएं, WLD, सामग्री और अन्य समस्त IP जैसा है और जैसा उपलब्ध है आधार पर तथा किसी भी सुव्यक्त, गर्भित या सांविधिक अभिवेदन अथवा वारंटी के बिना प्रदान किए गए हैं। लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य अधिकतम सीमा तक, हम सेवाओं में मौजूद सुविधाओं, सामग्री या अन्य IP के संबंध में स्वत्वाधिकार, व्यापारिकता, किसी प्रयोजन विशिष्ट हेतु उपयुक्तता, या गैर-अतिक्रमण की समस्त गर्भित वारंटियाँ विशिष्ट रूप से अस्वीकार करते हैं। कुछ न्यायक्षेत्र निहित वारंटियों के अपवर्जन की अनुमति नहीं देते हैं, और इसलिए उपरोक्त अपवर्जन शायद आप पर लागू न हों। हम तृतीय पक्षों, जिनमें सेवाओं से संबंध रखने वाले अन्य उपयोगकर्ता शामिल हैं, के द्वारा दिए गए किसी भी विज्ञापन, पेशकश या वक्तव्य का समर्थन नहीं करते हैं, की गारंटी नहीं देते हैं या की ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं लेते हैं।
12.2 हम ऐसा कोई अभिवेदन नहीं करते या वॉरंटी नहीं देते हैं कि (a) समस्त सेवाओं या उनके अंश की पहुँच निरंतर, अबाधित, समयबद्ध, सुरक्षित या त्रुटिमुक्त होगी; (b) यह कि सेवाएँ या सामग्री सही, पूर्ण, विश्वसनीय या वर्तमान हैं; (c) यह कि सेवाएँ वायरस या अन्य हानिकारक घटकों से मुक्त हैं; या (d) यह कि सेवाएँ या सामग्री आपकी आवश्यकताओं, ज़रूरतों या अपेक्षाओं को पूरा करेंगी।
12.3 साथ ही, हम किसी भी उपयोग के मामले के लिए ऐसा कोई अभिवेदन नहीं करते या ऐसी कोई वॉरंटी नहीं देते कि सेवाएँ या WLD वैध हैं, या यह कि सेवाएँ या WLD किन्हीं भी नियामक या अनुपालन आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करेंगी। आपके द्वारा सेवाओं या WLD के उपयोग को नियंत्रित कर सकने वाले समस्त कानूनी और नियामक प्रतिबंधों तथा आवश्यकताओं को ज्ञात करना और उनका अनुपालन करना भी आपकी ज़िम्मेदारी है। इन शर्तों में वर्णित सुव्यक्त वक्तव्यों को छोड़कर, आप एतद्द्वारा यह अभिस्वीकृति और सहमति देते हैं कि आपके द्वारा सेवाओं या WLD की पहुँच और उपयोग के संबंध में आप किसी भी अन्य वक्तव्य या समझ, चाहे लिखित हो या मौखिक, पर निर्भर नहीं हुए हैं।
12.4 किसी भी वित्तीय, कानूनी, निवेश संबंधी या कर संबंधी मामले के संबंध में हम न तो आपके सलाहकार के रूप में कार्य कर रहे हैं और न कर सकते हैं। जो भी सामग्री है, वह उस पर इंगित दिनांक तक वर्तमान है। यहां जो भी पूर्वानुमान, आकलन, अनुमान, लक्ष्य और/या मत व्यक्त किए गए हैं वे जोखिमों, अनिश्चितताओं, और धारणाओं के अधीन हैं और इसलिए वे गलत हो सकते हैं और अग्रिम सूचना के बिना बदले जा सकते हैं। किसी भी सामग्री पर निर्भर नहीं किया जाना चाहिए।
यहां मौजूद कुछ जानकारी हो सकता है कि तृतीय-पक्ष स्रोतों से प्राप्त की गई हो। हालांकि ऐसे स्रोतों को विश्वसनीय माना गया है, पर हमने ऐसी सारी जानकारी का स्वतंत्र सत्यापन नहीं किया है और हम उसकी सटीकता के संबंध में कोई अभिवेदन नहीं करते हैं। हम पंजीकृत ब्रोकर-डीलर या निवेश सलाहकार नहीं हैं। हम सेवाओं में मौजूद किसी भी सामग्री की सटीकता, समयबद्धता, या पूर्णता के बारे में कोई भी अभिवेदन नहीं करते हैं और सभी सुव्यक्त, गर्भित, या सांविधिक वारंटियों को विशिष्ट रूप से अस्वीकार करते हैं। हमारी सामग्री केवल सामान्य जानकारी के लिए है, और सेवाओं का उपयोग करना है या नहीं यह तय करने की ज़िम्मेदारी एकमात्र आप पर है। आप यह अभिस्वीकृति देते हैं कि डिजिटल मुद्राओं की ट्रेडिंग करना, उनका उपयोग करना और उन्हें अपने पास रखना अंतर्निहित रूप से जोख़िम भरा है। आप अपने वॉलेट में सारा धन खो सकते हैं। आप यह अभिस्वीकृति देते हैं कि सेवा, अमेरिकी कानून द्वारा लागू किए गए निर्यात प्रतिबंधों और आर्थिक प्रतिबंधों के अधीन हो सकती है।
12.5 हम सेवाओं के किसी भी संशोधन या समाप्ति, या सेवाओं तक आपकी पहुँच के निलंबन या समाप्ति के लिए आपके या किसी तृतीय पक्ष के प्रति उत्तरदायी नहीं हैं।
13. दायित्व का सीमाबंधन
13.1 हम आपके लिए हमारी देयता को वहाँ वर्जित या सीमित नहीं करते हैं जहाँ ऐसा करना गैरकानूनी हो। उन देशों में जहां निम्न प्रकार के बहिष्करणों की अनुमति नहीं है, हम आपके लिए केवल उन नुकसानों और क्षतियों के लिए जिम्मेदार हैं जो उचित देखभाल और कौशल का उपयोग करने में हमारी विफलता या आपके साथ हमारे अनुबंध के उल्लंघन का एक उचित परिणाम है। यह अनुच्छेद ऐसे उपभोक्ता अधिकारों को प्रभावित नहीं करता है जिन्हें किसी अनुबंध या समझौते द्वारा त्यागा नहीं जा सकता है या सीमित नहीं किया जा सकता है।
13.2 कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक, आप सहमत हैं कि किसी भी परिस्थिति में हम या हमारा कोई भी अधिकारी, निदेशक, कर्मचारी, ठेकेदार, अभिकर्ता, संबद्ध या अनुषंगी (“TFH पक्ष”), किसी भी अप्रत्यक्ष, दंडात्मक, प्रासंगिक, विशेष, परिणामी या उदाहरणात्मक क्षतियों, जिनमें मुनाफ़े, साख, उपयोग, डेटा या अन्य अमूर्त संपत्ति की हानि शामिल है, के लिए आपके प्रति देनदार नहीं होंगे, भले ही उक्त देनदारी का दावा अपकृत्य के आधार पर किया जाए या अन्यथा, और भले ही TFH पक्षों को निम्नलिखित से या के संबंध में उत्पन्न होने वाली उक्त क्षतियों की संभावना के बारे में सूचित किया गया हो या नहीं: (a) आपके द्वारा सेवाओं, आपकी डिजिटल टोकनों, या World Network का उपयोग या उपयोग करने में आपकी असमर्थता; (b) सेवाओं की अगमता या उनका समापन; (c) किसी लेनदेन या आपके डेटा की कोई हैकिंग, उससे छेड़छाड़, उसकी अनधिकृत पहुँच या उसमें बदलाव; (d) सेवाओं के माध्यम से किसी तृतीय पक्ष के साथ आपके द्वारा किया गया कोई लेनदेन या करार; (e) तृतीय पक्षों की कोई गतिविधियाँ या संचार; (f) Orb ऑपरेटर के कृत्य; (g) किसी डिजिटल टोकन के मूल्य की कोई
हानि; (h) सेवाओं पर या उनके माध्यम से पहुँची गई कोई तृतीय-पक्ष सामग्री; (i) हमारी सामग्री में मौजूद त्रुटियाँ, ग़लतियाँ या खामियाँ; (j) सेवाओं की किसी पहुँच या उनके किसी उपयोग से उत्पन्न व्यक्तिगत चोट या संपत्ति को क्षति, चाहे किसी भी प्रकार की कैसी भी प्रकृति की हो; (k) सेवाओं को या उनके माध्यम से संप्रेषित हो सकने वाले वायरस, ट्रोजन हॉर्स या ऐसी ही अन्य चीजें; या (l) किसी तृतीय पक्ष का मानहानिकारक, आपत्तिजनक या गैरकानूनी आचरण। किसी भी सीमित उपाय के मूल प्रयोजन की विफलता के बावजूद, तथा कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य पूर्णतम सीमा तक, दायित्व का यह सीमाबंधन लागू रहेगा चाहे क्षतियां TFH या सेवाओं के उपयोग या गलत उपयोग से उत्पन्न हों या उस पर निर्भरता से।
13.3 किसी भी परिस्थिति में TFH पक्ष $100.00 से अधिक राशि के किसी भी प्रत्यक्ष दावे, कार्यवाही, दायित्व, बाध्यता, क्षतियों, हानियों या लागतों के लिए आपके प्रति देनदार नहीं होंगे। यदि आप सेवाओं से असंतुष्ट हैं, तो आप सहमत हैं कि आपके द्वारा सेवाओं का उपयोग रोक दिया जाना ही आपका एकमात्र एवं अनन्य उपाय होगा। दायित्व का यह सीमाबंधन लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य अधिकतम सीमा तक लागू होगा।
13.4 मोचन और क्षतिपूर्ति।
आप निम्नलिखित से उत्पन्न या उससे संबंधित, और किसी तृतीय-पक्ष द्वारा किसी TFH पक्ष के विरुद्ध दायर किए गए किन्हीं भी दावों, क्षतियों, लागतों, देनदारियों, उचित अधिवक्ता शुल्कों और व्ययों से निम्न के विरुद्ध TFH पक्षों का बचाव करने, उन्हें क्षतिपूर्ति देने और उन्हें निर्दोष ठहराने पर सहमत हैं: (a) आपके द्वारा सेवाओं का उपयोग; (b) आपके द्वारा इन शर्तों का उल्लंघन; (c) आपके द्वारा किसी अन्य व्यक्ति के किन्हीं भी अधिकारों का उल्लंघन; (d) सेवाओं के सिलसिले में आपका आचरण; या (e) आपके द्वारा WLD, किसी डिजिटल टोकन या Worldcoin नेटवर्क का उपयोग। कुछ अधिकार-क्षेत्र उपभोक्ता क्षतिपूर्तियों को सीमित करते हैं, इसलिए हो सकता है कि इस अनुच्छेद के कुछ या सभी क्षतिपूर्ति उपबंध आप पर लागू न हों। यदि आप किसी भी TFH पक्ष को क्षतिपूर्ति देने के लिए बाध्य हैं, तो हमारे पास, एकमात्र हमारे विवेकाधीन, किसी भी कार्रवाई या कार्यवाही को नियंत्रित करने का और सुलह करनी है या नहीं और किन नियमों पर करनी है यह तय करने का अधिकार सुरक्षित है।
यदि आप कैलिफ़ोर्निया के निवासी हैं, तो आप कैलिफ़ोर्निया सिविल कोड § 1542 को छोड़ देते हैं, जिसके अनुसार: "[a] सामान्य निर्मुक्ति में वे दावे शामिल नहीं होते हैं जिनकी लेनदार को निर्मुक्ति निष्पादित करते समय जानकारी नहीं है या अपने पक्ष में उनके होने का संदेह भी नहीं है, जिसकी उसे यदि जानकारी होती तो उसने देनदार के साथ उसके निपटारे को अवश्य ही काफी प्रभावित किया होता।"
14. अभिशासी कानून
इस समझौते और इस समझौते से उत्पन्न होने वाले या इससे संबंधित किसी भी विवाद पर कैलिफ़ोर्निया राज्य के कानून लागू होंगे। इस खंड में वर्णित अभिशासी कानून कानूनों के टकराव के सिद्धांतों की परवाह किए बिना लागू होगा। आप इस पर भी सहमत हैं कि यह माना जाएगा कि सेवा एकमात्र कैलिफ़ोर्निया राज्य में ही स्थित है, और यह कि हालांकि सेवाएं अन्य अधिकार-क्षेत्रों में उपलब्ध हो सकती हैं, पर उनकी उपलब्धता से कैलिफ़ोर्निया राज्य के बाहर के किसी भी मंच में सामान्य या विशिष्ट व्यक्तिगत अधिकार-क्षेत्र का सृजन नहीं होता है।
15. विवाद समाधान, विवाचन और वर्गीय कार्रवाई का अधित्याग
15.1 कृपया निम्नलिखित अनुच्छेदों को ध्यानपूर्वक पढ़ें। वे आपके लिए हमसे हुए विवादों का निपटारा किसी वर्गीय कार्रवाई के एक सदस्य के रूप में नहीं बल्कि एक एकमात्र विवाचक के समक्ष वैयक्तिक विवाचन के माध्यम से करना आवश्यक करते हैं। विवाचन आपको किसी न्यायालय में हमारे विरुद्ध मुकदमा करने से या न्यायपीठ में मुकदमा करने से तब के सिवाय रोकते हैं जब आप, यदि आप योग्य होते हैं तो, लघु दावों के न्यायालय में हमारे विरुद्ध कोई विवाद दायर करें।
15.2 हम समस्त संभावित विवादों को अनौपचारिक, सदाशयी समझौता वार्ताओं के माध्यम से हल करने की सर्वोत्तम संभव कोशिश करेंगे। यदि कोई संभावित विवाद उत्पन्न होता है, तो आपको legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com पर ईमेल भेज कर हमसे संपर्क करना चाहिए ताकि हम औपचारिक विवाद समाधान का सहारा लिए बिना उसका समाधान कर सकें। यदि हम, आपके ईमेल के 60 दिनों के अंदर किसी अनौपचारिक समाधान तक नहीं पहुंच पाते हैं, और आप कोई संघीय या राज्य सांविधिक दावा; आम कानूनी दावा; अनुबंध, अपकृत्य, धोखाधड़ी, ग़लतबयानी या किसी अन्य कानूनी सिद्धांत में आधारित दावा; या इन शर्तों, सामग्री या सेवाओं से उत्पन्न या संबंधित कोई अन्य औपचारिक कार्यवाही (प्रत्येक, एक “विवाद”) करने का विकल्प चुनते हैं, तो आप उस विवाद का समाधान बाध्यकारी विवाचन के माध्यम से, निम्नलिखित नियमों के अनुसार वैयक्तिक आधार पर करने को सहमत हैं (सामूहिक रूप से, “विवाचन करार”):
विवाचन गोपनीय रूप से एकल विवाचक द्वारा संचालित की जाएगी। विवाचक, लागू परिसीमा और सभी लागू कानूनों को लागू करेगा और लागू कानून द्वारा मान्यता प्राप्त विशेषाधिकार के दावों का सम्मान करेगा।
विवाद एकमात्र और अंतिम रूप से JAMS द्वारा प्रशासित विवाचन द्वारा JAMS सुव्यवस्थित मध्यस्थता नियमों (स्ट्रीमलाइंड आर्बिट्रेशन रूल्स) के अनुसार सुलझाया जाएगा बशर्ते विवाद की कुल राशि $250,000 या अधिक न हो; विवाद की कुल राशि इतनी या इससे अधिक होने पर JAMS व्यापक मध्यस्थता नियम (कंप्रीहेंसिव आर्बिट्रेशन रूल्स) लागू होंगे। विवाचन सेन फ़्रांसिस्को, कैलिफ़ोर्निया में होगा, बशर्ते आप और हम, दोनों ही इसे कहीं और संचालित करने पर सहमत न हों। आप सहमत हैं कि सैन फ़्रांसिस्को, कैलिफ़ोर्निया में संघीय और राज्य अदालतें मध्यस्थता पुरस्कार की किसी भी अपील के लिए या अदालती कार्यवाही के लिए उचित मंच हैं, यदि इस अनुबंध का बाध्यकारी मध्यस्थता खंड अप्रवर्तनीय पाया जाता है।
किसी भी विवाचन में, इसकी लोकेशन कोई भी हो, उभयपक्ष एक-दूसरे से अनिवार्य प्रकटीकरण की मांग नहीं करेंगे, और विवाचक उभयपक्षों को अनिवार्य प्रकटीकरण में संलग्न होने की अनुमति नहीं देगा; बल्कि, हर पक्ष अपनी-अपनी बात का समर्थन करने वाले साक्ष्य, अंतिम विवाचन सुनवाई से पहले, परस्पर सम्मति से तय किए जा सकने वाले समय और दिनांक पर प्रकट करेगा।
इस विवाचन करार में विवाचन करार की या विवाचन करार के किसी भी अंश की, और विवाचन करार की व्याख्या या अनुप्रयोज्यता से उत्पन्न या से संबंधित समस्त अन्य विवादों की प्रवर्तनीयता, प्रतिसंहरणीयता, दायरा या वैधता शामिल है; और उक्त समस्त मामलों का निर्णय विवाचक द्वारा किया जाएगा न कि किसी न्यायालय या न्यायाधीश द्वारा।
यदि विवाचक या विवाचन प्रशासक आप पर फ़ाइलिंग शुल्क या अन्य प्रशासनिक लागतें लगाता है, तो हम, अनुरोध किए जाने पर, उस सीमा तक आपको प्रतिपूर्ति देंगे जिस सीमा तक उक्त शुल्क या लागतें उन शुल्कों या लागतों से अधिक होतीं जो आपको किसी न्यायालय में कार्यवाही करने पर अन्यथा चुकानी पड़तीं है। हम अतिरिक्त शुल्कों व लागतों का भी भुगतान करेंगे बशर्ते विवाचक प्रशासक के नियमों या लागू कानून द्वारा ऐसा किया जाना आवश्यक किया जाए।
दोनों में से किसी भी पक्ष के अनुरोध पर, समस्त विवाचन कार्यवाहियां परम गोपनीयता के साथ संचालित की जाएंगी और, ऐसे मामले में, सभी दस्तावेज़, गवाहियां, और रिकॉर्ड विवाचक द्वारा मोहरबंद गोपनीयता के साथ प्राप्त किए जाएंगे, सुने जाएंगे और अनुरक्षित रखे जाएंगे, वे केवल उभयपक्षों, उनके अपने-अपने वकीलों, और उनके अपने-अपने विशेषज्ञों, परामर्शदाताओं या गवाहों द्वारा निरीक्षण के लिए उपलब्ध होंगे और वह भी तब जब वे उक्त समस्त जानकारी को एकमात्र विवाचन के प्रयोजन हेतु प्रयोग के लिए एवं गोपनीय मानने पर अग्रिम में और लिखित में सहमति दे दें।
इस विवाचन करार में वर्णित वर्गीय कार्यविधियों और उपायों को छोड़कर, विवाचक के पास ऐसा कोई भी उपाय स्वीकृत करने का प्राधिकार है जो अन्यथा न्यायालय में उपलब्ध होता है।
विवाचक द्वारा दिए गए निर्णय पर किसी भी निर्णय को सक्षम क्षेत्राधिकार के किसी भी न्यायालय में दर्ज किया जा सकता है।
यदि इस विवाचन करार में निहित तृतीय पक्षों की ओर से दायर वर्गीय कार्रवाइयों और अन्य विवादों का विवाचन करने या उन्हें निषिद्ध करने की आवश्यकता अप्रवर्तनीय पाई जाती है तो केवल तब ही यह माना जाएगा कि अप्रवर्तनीय उपबंध इन शर्तों से हटा लिए गए हैं और इन शर्तों में मौजूद अन्य सभी शेष बाध्यता पूर्ण मान्यता और प्रभाव से जारी रहेंगे।
15.3 चयन रद्दीकरण का 30 दिन का अधिकार।
आपके पास उस पते से एक ईमेल भेजकर इस विवाचन करार से बाहर निकलने और बाध्य न होने का अधिकार है, जिसका उपयोग आपने अपने आवेदन को विषय पंक्ति के साथ legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com पर भेजने के लिए किया था: “ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT” (“विवाचन एवं वर्गीय कार्रवाई अधित्याग चयन-रद्दीकरण”)। आपको अपनी ईमेल, इन शर्तों के नियमों पर सहमति देने के 30 दिनों के अंदर भेजनी होगी, अन्यथा आप इस विवाचन करार के नियमों के अनुसरण में विवादों का विवाचन करने पर बाध्य होंगे। यदि आप इस विवाचन करार का चयन रद्द करते हैं, तो हम भी विवाचन करार से बाध्य नहीं होंगे।
15.4 इस विवाचन करार में बदलाव।
हम इस करार के
“विवाद समाधान, विवाचन और वर्गीय कार्रवाई का अधित्याग”
नामक अनुभाग में होने वाले किसी भी बदलाव के लिए आपको सूचना भेजने के द्वारा 30 दिनों का नोटिस देंगे, और आपको हमारी ओर से सूचना मिल जाने के 30 दिनों बाद बदलाव प्रभावी हो जाएंगे।
विवाद समाधान, विवाचन और वर्गीय कार्रवाई का अधित्याग
नामक सेक्शन में किए गए बदलाव, उत्तरव्यापी प्रभाव से केवल उन विवादों पर अन्यथा लागू होंगे जो 30वें दिन उत्पन्न होते हैं। यदि कोई न्यायालय या विवाचक यह निर्णय करता है कि इस अनुभाग में किए गए बदलाव प्रवर्तनीय या मान्य नहीं हैं, तो उन बदलावों को इन शर्तों से पृथक कर दिया जाएगा और न्यायालय या विवाचक उस पहले विवाचन करार के नियमों को लागू करेगा जो आपके द्वारा सेवाओं का उपयोग आरंभ करने के बाद प्रभावी था। आप उपर्युक्त “चयन रद्दीकरण का 30-दिनी अधिकार” नामक अनुभाग में वर्णित कार्यविधियों का पालन करके नए विवाचन करार नियमों का चयन रद्द करने के अपने अधिकार का उपयोग कर सकते हैं।
यह विवाचन करार, इन नियमों के समापन, और आपके द्वारा सेवाओं के उपयोग के समापन के बाद भी उत्तरजीवी रहेगा।
इस विवाचन करार में मौजूद किसी भी विपरीतार्थी बात के बावजूद, प्रत्येक पक्ष सेवाओं के अनधिकृत उपयोग या दुरुपयोग को, या बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकारों (उदाहरण के लिए, ट्रेडमार्क, व्यापारिक रहस्य,
कॉपीराइट या पेटेंट अधिकार) के अतिक्रमण को रोकने के लिए, पहले ऊपर वर्णित विवाचन या अनौपचारिक विवाद समाधान प्रक्रिया में शामिल हुए बिना, एकमात्र विध्यर्थक राहत के लिए मुकदमा दायर कर सकता है।
16. सामान्य प्रावधान
16.1 कोई अधित्याग नहीं; पृथक्करणीयता; गैर-समनुदेशनीयता
। किसी प्रावधान को लागू करने में हमारी विफलता बाद में ऐसा करने के हमारे अधिकार का अधित्याग नहीं है। यदि कोई प्रावधान अप्रवर्तनीय पाया जाता है तो, लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य सीमा तक, इन शर्तों के शेष प्रावधान पूर्ण प्रभाव में रहेंगे और हमारे इरादे को यथासंभव निकट से दर्शाते हुए एक लागू करने योग्य नियम को प्रतिस्थापित किया जाएगा। हो सकता है कि आप इन शर्तों के तहत अपना कोई अधिकार निर्दिष्ट न कर सकें, और ऐसा कोई भी प्रयास अमान्य होगा। हम हमारे किसी भी सहयोगी या सहायक कंपनी या सेवाओं से जुड़े किसी भी व्यवसाय के हित में किसी भी उत्तराधिकारी को हमारे अधिकार समनुदेशित कर सकते हैं।
16.2 संपूर्ण समझौता
। ये शर्तें सेवाओं के संबंध में आपके और हमारे बीच के समझौते का पूर्ण और अनन्य विवरण बनाते हैं और यह सेवाओं से संबंधित सभी पूर्व और समसामयिक ज्ञान, समझौतों, अभ्यावेदन और वारंटी, लिखित और मौखिक दोनों का स्थान लेता है। इन शर्तों में अनुभाग शीर्षक केवल सुविधा के लिए हैं और किसी प्रावधान के अर्थ या व्याख्या को नियंत्रित नहीं करेगा।
16.3 उत्तरजीविता।
निलंबन या समापन, TFH को देय ऋणों, सेवाओं के सामान्य उपयोग, TFH के साथ विवादों से संबंध रखने वाले इन शर्तों के सभी प्रावधान, और साथ-साथवे प्रावधान जो अपनी प्रकृति के द्वारा इन शर्तों की समय-समाप्ति या समापन के परे जारी रहते हैं, इन शर्तों के समापन या की समय-समाप्ति के बाद भी उत्तरजीवी रहेंगे।
16.4 पक्षों का संबंध।
इन शर्तों में ऐसा कुछ भी नहीं है जो यह अर्थ रखता हो कि या यह अर्थ रखने के लिए उद्दिष्ट हो कि या जिसके कारण आपको और TFH को मुनाफ़े के लिए साझेदार, संयुक्त उपक्रम, या अन्यथा संयुक्त सहयोगी माना जाएगा या आपको या TFH को एक-दूसरे का अभिकर्ता माना जाएगा। इसमें यह तथ्य शामिल है कि इन शर्तों में कुछ भी आपके और TFH के बीच कोई रोजगार संबंध स्थापित नहीं करता या स्थापित करने का इरादा नहीं रखता है।
16.5 कोई पेशेवर सलाह या वैश्वासिक कर्तव्य नहीं।
हमारे द्वारा प्रदत्त समस्त सामग्री केवल जानकारी के प्रयोजनों के लिए है और उसे पेशेवर सलाह नहीं माना जाना चाहिए। आपको सेवाओं में निहित किसी जानकारी के आधार पर कोई कदम नहीं उठाना चाहिए या उठाने से बचना नहीं चाहिए। इससे पहले कि आप सेवाओं या डिजिटल टोकनों को शामिल करने वाले कोई भी वित्तीय, कानूनी या अन्य निर्णय लें, आपको किसी ऐसे व्यक्ति से स्वतंत्र पेशेवर सलाह प्राप्त करनी चाहिए जो लाइसेंस-प्राप्त हो और उस क्षेत्र में अनुज्ञप्त एवं योग्य हो जिस क्षेत्र में उक्त सलाह उपयुक्त होगी। ये शर्तें हम पर किसी भी न्यासीय कर्तव्य की रचना या उसे लागू करने के लिए उद्दिष्ट नहीं है और न ही वह ऐसा करता है। कानून द्वारा अनुमन्य अधिकतम सीमा तक, आप अभिस्वीकृति देते हैं और सहमत हैं कि हम पर आपके या किसी अन्य पक्ष के प्रति कोई न्यासीय कर्तव्य या देनदारियां नहीं हैं, और यह कि जिस सीमा तक उक्त कर्तव्य या देनदारियां कानून में या न्याय में मौजूद हो सकती हों उस सीमा तक, उक्त कर्तव्यों और देनदारियों को एतद्द्वारा अप्रतिसंहरणीय रूप से अस्वीकृत, अधित्यक्त और समाप्त किया जाता है। आप आगे इस पर भी सहमत हैं कि हम पर आपके प्रति केवल वे कर्तव्य एवं बाध्यताएं हैं जो इस करार में सुव्यक्त रूप से वर्णित हैं।
16.6 नियंत्रण का बदलाव।
यदि कोई तृतीय-पक्ष हमारा अधिग्रहण या विलय कर लेता है, या किसी संबद्ध या उत्तराधिकारी इकाई या अन्य इकाई को कुछ प्रकार्य सौंपता है जो हमारे निर्धारण के अनुसार उपयोगकर्ताओं के सर्वोत्तम हित में है, तो ऐसी दशा में हमारे पास, इनमें से किसी भी परिस्थिति में, हमारे द्वारा आपसे एकत्र किए गए डेटा को उक्त विलय, अधिग्रहण, विक्रय या नियंत्रण के अन्य बदलाव के भाग के रूप में, लागू कानून के अनुसार, हस्तांतरित या समनुदेशित करने का अधिकार सुरक्षित है।
16.7 अपरिहार्य घटना।
हम समर्थित मुद्राओं में बाज़ार के उल्लेखनीय उतार-चढ़ाव, किसी दैवी कृत्य, नागरिक (दीवानी) या सैन्य प्राधिकरणों के कृत्यों, आतंकवादियों के कृत्यों, नागरिक व्यवधानों, युद्ध, हड़ताल, स्वास्थ्य आपातकाल, श्रमिक विवाद, आग, दूरसंचार या इंटरनेट सेवाओं या नेटवर्क प्रदाता सेवाओं में व्यवधान, उपकरणों या सॉफ़्टवेयर की विफलता, या हमारे यथोचित नियंत्रण से बाहर के किसी कारण या स्थिति (प्रत्येक, एक “अपरिहार्य घटना”) के प्रत्यक्ष या अप्रत्यक्ष परिणामस्वरूप सेवा में होने वाले विलंबों या सेवा के निष्पादन में विफलता या बाधा के लिए हम देनदार नहीं होंगे।  किसी अपरिहार्य घटना का घटित होना इन शर्तों के किसी भी शेष उपबंध की मान्यता और प्रवर्तनीयता को प्रभावित नहीं करेगा।
16.8 ऐप स्टोर।
जहाँ से आप गूगल प्ले स्टोर ("वितरण प्लेटफ़ॉर्म") सहित, Apple ऐप स्टोर के अलावा किसी अन्य ऐप स्टोर या वितरण प्लेटफ़ॉर्म से हमारे ऐप्स डाउनलोड करते हैं, आप सहमत होते हैं कि:
शर्तें हमारे और आपके बीच हैं, न कि वितरण प्लेटफ़ॉर्म के प्रदाता (“स्टोर प्रदाता”) के साथ; आपके द्वारा ऐप्स के उपयोग को स्टोर प्रदाता की तत्कालीन वितरण प्लेटफ़ॉर्म सेवा की शर्तों का अनुपालन करना चाहिए; स्टोर प्रदाता केवल उस वितरण प्लेटफ़ॉर्म का प्रदाता है जहाँ से आपने ऐप्स प्राप्त किए हैं;
हम ऐप्स के लिए पूरी तरह ज़िम्मेदार हैं, न कि स्टोर प्रदाता;
स्टोर प्रदाता का ऐप्स या शर्तों के संबंध में आपके प्रति कोई बाध्यता या दायित्व नहीं है; और
आप स्वीकार करते हैं और सहमत हैं कि स्टोर प्रदाता शर्तों के लिए एक तृतीय-पक्ष लाभार्थी है चूंकि यह ऐप्स से संबंधित है।
16.9 Apple ऐप स्टोर
। यह अनुभाग तब लागू होता है जहां ऐप्स को Apple ऐप स्टोर से प्राप्त किया जाता है। आप स्वीकार करते हैं और सहमति देते हैं कि शर्तें पूरी तरह से आपके और हमारे बीच हैं, न कि Apple, Inc. ("Apple") के साथ, और यह कि Apple की ऐप्स या उसकी सामग्री के लिए कोई ज़िम्मेदारी नहीं है। आपके द्वारा ऐप्स का उपयोग ऐप स्टोर की सेवा की शर्तों के अनुपालन में होना चाहिए।
आप स्वीकार करते हैं कि ऐप्स के संबंध में किसी भी रखरखाव और समर्थन सेवाओं को प्रस्तुत करने के लिए Apple बाध्य नहीं है। किसी भी लागू वारंटी के अनुरूप ऐप्स की विफलता की स्थिति में, आप Apple को सूचित कर सकते हैं, और (जहां लागू हो) Apple आपको ऐप्स के लिए खरीद की कीमत वापस कर देगा; लागू कानून द्वारा अनुमत अधिकतम सीमा तक, ऐप्स के संबंध में Apple का कोई अन्य वारंटी बाध्य नहीं होगी, और किसी भी वारंटी का पालन में विफलता के कारण होने वाले किसी भी अन्य दावे, हानि, देनदारियों, क्षतियों, लागतों या खर्चों को ऐप के प्रदाता के रूप में हम पर लागू शर्तों और किसी भी कानून द्वारा पूरी तरह से नियंत्रित किया जाएगा।
आप स्वीकार करते हैं कि Apple ऐप्स या ऐप्स पर आपके कब्जे और/या उपयोग से संबंधित आपके या किसी तृतीय पक्ष के किसी भी दावे को संबोधित करने के लिए ज़िम्मेदार नहीं है, जिसमें निम्न शामिल है, लेकिन इन तक सीमित नहीं है: (i) उत्पाद दायित्व दावे; (ii) कोई भी दावा कि ऐप किसी भी लागू कानूनी या नियामक आवश्यकता के अनुरूप नहीं है; और (iii) उपभोक्ता संरक्षण या इसी तरह के कानून के तहत उत्पन्न होने वाले दावे; और ऐसे सभी दावे पूरी तरह से शर्तों और सॉफ़्टवेयर प्रदाता के रूप में हम पर लागू किसी भी कानून द्वारा शासित होते हैं।
आप मानते हैं कि, किसी तृतीय पक्ष के दावे की स्थिति में कि ऐप्स या उस ऐप्स का आपका अधिकार और उपयोग तृतीय पक्ष के बौद्धिक संपदा अधिकारों का उल्लंघन करता है, तो Apple नहीं बल्कि TFH ऐसी किसी भी संपत्ति के उल्लंघन के दावे की शर्तों द्वारा आवश्यक सीमा तक, ऐसे किसी भी बौद्धिक संपदा की जांच, रक्षा, निपटान और निर्वहन के लिए पूरी तरह ज़िम्मेदार होगा।
आप प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं और गारंटी देते हैं कि (i) आप ऐसे देश में नहीं हैं जो यू.एस. सरकार के प्रतिबंध के अधीन है, या जिसे यू.एस. सरकार द्वारा "आतंकवादी समर्थन" देश के रूप में नामित किया गया है; और (ii) आप प्रतिबंधित या प्रतिबंधित पार्टियों की किसी यू.एस. सरकार की सूची में सूचीबद्ध नहीं हैं।
आप और TFH स्वीकार करते हैं और सहमत हैं कि Apple और Apple की सहायक कंपनियां, ऐप्स के आपके लाइसेंस से संबंधित सेवा की शर्तों के तृतीय पक्ष के लाभार्थी हैं, और यह कि, सेवा की शर्तों के नियमों और शर्तों को स्वीकार करने पर, Apple को तृतीय पक्ष के लाभार्थी के रूप में आपके खिलाफ ऐप्स के आपके लाइसेंस से संबंधित सेवा की शर्तों को लागू करने का अधिकार होगा (और माना जाएगा कि अधिकार स्वीकार कर लिया गया है)।
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Syarat dan Ketentuan Pengguna Tools For Humanity
Selamat Datang di World App! Ketentuan antara Anda dan Tools for Humanity Corporation, perusahaan Delaware (“TFH”, “kami” atau “kita”) mengatur penggunaan dan akses Anda ke situs web dan aplikasi kami, termasuk World App dan Operator App (secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “Aplikasi Worldcoin”), serta seluruh fungsi, konten, dan layanan terkait yang kami sediakan kepada Anda (secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “Layanan” atau “Layanan Kami”) sehubungan dengan World Network (“World Network”) dan ekosistem.
Harap baca Ketentuan ini secara saksama sebelum menggunakan atau mengakses Layanan. Dengan mengakses atau menggunakan setiap Layanan yang kami sediakan, bersama persetujuan tegas Anda terhadap Ketentuan ini, Anda secara tegas menyetujui untuk terikat dengan Ketentuan ini dan oleh Pemberitahuan Privasi kami, yang tergabung sebagai bagian dari Ketentuan ini.  Harap perhatikan bagian-bagian penting dari Ketentuan ini:
Anda menyetujui untuk menyelesaikan setiap sengketa antara Anda dan TFH melalui arbitrase yang mengikat, bukan melalui persidangan. Jika Anda tinggal di Korea Selatan, Anda dapat memilih untuk menyelesaikan sengketa di pengadilan setempat yang berwenang. Harap tinjau Bagian 15 di bawah untuk mendapatkan perinciannya.
Produk mata uang kripto, termasuk Token Digital, sebagian besar tidak diatur dan dapat jadi sangat berisiko. Mungkin tidak ada jaminan berdasarkan regulasi untuk setiap kerugian dari transaksi tersebut.
Seluruh bagian dalam Layanan bukan merupakan penawaran untuk menjual, atau permintaan penawaran untuk membeli, setiap sekuritas atau Token Digital. Layanan bukan merupakan nasihat investasi. Memiliki, membeli, atau menjual Token Digital (sebagaimana didefinisikan pada Bagian 2.1 di bawah) mungkin tidak diizinkan di tempat tinggal Anda, dan Anda bertanggung jawab untuk mematuhi seluruh hukum yang berlaku. Harap pertimbangkan apakah membeli, menjual, menggunakan, atau memiliki Token Digital sesuai untuk Anda lakukan dalam kondisi keuangan dan pemahaman Anda tentang Token Digital. Nilai Token Digital dapat berubah dengan cepat dan seluruh nilainya dapat hilang.
Selain itu, token Worldcoin (“WLD”) tidak dimaksudkan untuk dapat digunakan, dibeli, atau diakses oleh warga AS, termasuk warga negara, penduduk, atau warga AS di Amerika Serikat, atau perusahaan yang didirikan, berlokasi, atau tinggal di Amerika Serikat, atau yang memiliki agen terdaftar di Amerika Serikat. Kami tidak menyediakan WLD bagi warga AS tersebut. Selain itu, Anda setuju bahwa Anda tidak akan menjual, mengalihkan, atau menyediakan WLD kepada warga Amerika Serikat. Informasi lebih lanjut mengenai risiko terkait WLD dapat ditemukan di sini.
1. Ruang Lingkup Ketentuan
1.1 Privasi dan Data Anda
. Ketika mengakses Aplikasi Worldcoin, Anda dapat memberikan kepada kami kategori informasi pribadi, seperti nama atau nomor telepon Anda. Jika Anda memberikan informasi untuk menetapkan
proof-of-personhood
Anda dan mengeklaim token WLD Anda, maka Anda dapat memberikan kategori khusus dari data pribadi yang sensitif, seperti informasi biometrik Anda. Pemberitahuan Privasi kami menjelaskan data yang kami kumpulkan dari Anda dan cara kami menggunakannya. Harap jangan menggunakan Layanan jika Anda tidak ingin kami mengumpulkan atau menggunakan data Anda dengan cara yang dijelaskan pada Pemberitahuan Privasi.
1.2 Kelayakan.
Laman web yang menjelaskan layanan kami dapat diakses di seluruh dunia, tetapi bukan berarti seluruh Layanan atau fitur layanan bersifat sah atau tersedia di negara Anda. Anda tidak boleh menggunakan VPN atau alat bantu serupa untuk tujuan menghindari pembatasan. Anda bertanggung jawab untuk memastikan bahwa penggunaan Layanan kami oleh Anda bersifat sah di tempat Anda menggunakannya. Layanan kami tidak tersedia dalam seluruh bahasa. Layanan kami bersifat sah di tempat Anda menggunakannya. Layanan kami tidak tersedia dalam seluruh bahasa. Untuk menggunakan Layanan, Anda harus mematuhi Ketentuan ini dan seluruh hukum yang berlaku. Anda tidak dapat menggunakan Layanan Kami untuk melakukan, mendorong, atau membantu pihak lain melakukan kegiatan ilegal atau tidak sah.
Selain itu, Anda harus memenuhi seluruh kriteria berikut:
Anda berusia 18 tahun ke atas; dan
Anda
tidak
berada di, di bawah kendali, merupakan warga negara atau penduduk: wilayah Suriah, Krimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson, dan Zaporizhzhia di Ukraina, Rusia, Korea Utara, Iran, Kuba, atau negara atau wilayah lain yang akses Layanannya dibatasi oleh Amerika Serikat, Uni Eropa, atau negara atau yurisdiksi lain;
Anda tidak dinyatakan sebagai “Warga Negara yang Masuk Dalam Daftar Khusus” sebagaimana dinyatakan oleh Kantor Pengendalian Aset Asing (
Office of Foreign Assets Control
, “OFAC”) Departemen Keuangan A.S. atau daftar sanksi negara lain, dan nama Anda tidak tercantum dalam Daftar Pihak yang Ditolak Departemen Perdagangan A.S., atau daftar pihak yang dilarang di negara lain.
Jika Anda tidak memenuhi seluruh persyaratan ini, Anda tidak diizinkan untuk mengakses atau menggunakan Layanan, dan, oleh karena itu, kami dapat membatasi kemampuan Anda untuk mengakses atau menggunakan Layanan.
Selain itu, jika Anda bertempat atau berlokasi di Jerman atau memiliki tempat tinggal atau kantor terdaftar di sana, Anda tidak diizinkan mengakses atau menggunakan layanan pihak ketiga yang dimaksudkan dalam Bagian 2.5 atau aplikasi terdesentralisasi yang dimaksudkan dalam Bagian 2.8. Fitur-fitur ini tidak tersedia untuk Anda.
1.3 Ketersediaan
. Laman web yang menjelaskan Layanan dapat diakses di seluruh dunia, tetapi bukan berarti seluruh Layanan atau fitur layanan bersifat sah atau tersedia di negara Anda. Akses ke Layanan tertentu (atau fitur Layanan tertentu) di negara tertentu dapat diblokir oleh kami atau pemerintah. Anda tidak boleh menggunakan VPN atau alat bantu serupa untuk tujuan menghindari pembatasan. Akses ke Aplikasi Worldcoin, dan fitur tertentu di dalam Aplikasi Worldcoin, mungkin tidak tersedia atau dibatasi, bergantung pada lokasi Anda.
Anda bertanggung jawab untuk memastikan bahwa penggunaan Layanan oleh Anda bersifat sah di tempat Anda menggunakannya
. Layanan tidak tersedia dalam seluruh bahasa.
1.4 Pembaruan
. Kami dapat melakukan perubahan pada Ketentuan ini dari waktu ke waktu. Jika kami melakukannya, kami akan menyediakan ketentuan yang diperbarui pada Layanan dan apabila diwajibkan oleh hukum yang berlaku, kami akan memberi tahu Anda sebelum melakukan perubahan dan apabila perubahan tersebut dapat sangat penting atau merugikan bagi Anda, kami akan memberikan pemberitahuan tambahan sebelumnya jika diwajibkan oleh hukum yang berlaku. Anda memahami dan menyetujui bahwa dengan terus menggunakan Layanan setelah kami melakukan perubahan dan apabila Anda tidak mengajukan penolakan terhadap perubahan tersebut, maka merupakan penerimaan oleh Anda terhadap Ketentuan yang diperbarui. Anda dapat berhenti menggunakan Layanan setiap saat jika Anda tidak menyetujui Ketentuan ini. Karena Layanan berkembang dari waktu ke waktu, kami dapat mengubah atau menghentikan seluruh atau sebagian Layanan, setiap saat dan tanpa pemberitahuan, atas kebijakan kami sendiri sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku.
1.5 Ketentuan Tambahan.
Syarat dan ketentuan tambahan dapat berlaku pada aplikasi, konten, fitur, atau bagian Layanan tertentu, serta seluruh syarat dan ketentuan tambahan tersebut yang kami berikan kepada Anda akan menjadi bagian dari Ketentuan ini.
2. Layanan
2.1 Dompet Nonkustodian.
World App mencakup dompet yang tidak dihosting dan nonkustodian untuk menyimpan mata uang kripto, mata uang digital, atau Token Digital (termasuk WLD dan secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “Token Digital”). Anda mengendalikan Token Digital yang disimpan pada dompet Anda. Dengan World App, kunci pribadi (yang merupakan kata sandi untuk mengakses Token Digital) disimpan secara langsung pada perangkat Anda. Setiap saat, bergantung pada akses internet dan kemacetan di
blockchain
, Anda dapat menarik Token Digital Anda dengan mengirimkannya ke alamat
blockchain
yang berbeda. Ketika menyimpan Token Digital Anda pada dompet Anda, kami tidak memiliki kendali atas dompet, Token Digital, atau kunci pribadi Anda. Pengguna bertanggung jawab atas risiko kehilangan kunci pribadi mereka dan baik TFH maupun World App tidak dapat memulihkan kunci tersebut.
Karena World App adalah dompet nonkustodian, Anda akan diberikan alamat dompet yang menentukan tempat Token Digital Anda disimpan pada
blockchain
yang sesuai. Kami tidak dapat mengakses Token Digital Anda.
2.2 Token Digital yang Didukung.
World App mendukung token ERC-20 tertentu. Kami dapat menambahkan dukungan untuk Token Digital tambahan di masa mendatang. World App menampilkan Token Digital yang didukung.
Pastikan untuk memeriksa token dan jaringan yang didukung dalam World App sebelum Anda menyetorkan atau menarik Token Digital Anda. Kami tidak dapat memulihkan Token Digital Anda jika Anda mengirimkan token yang tidak didukung atau mengirimkan Token Digital ke alamat dompet yang salah.
Anda memahami bahwa mengirimkan Token Digital yang tidak didukung ke alamat dompet World App Anda dapat berarti Anda akan kehilangan akses sepenuhnya ke Token Digital tersebut. Kami tidak memiliki cara untuk memulihkan Token Digital tersebut. Harap pastikan Anda mengirimkan Token Digital yang benar ke alamat dompet yang benar setiap saat. Anda mungkin ingin menguji transaksi dengan sejumlah kecil Token Digital.
2.3 Penawaran dan Akses.
Ketika Anda berinteraksi dengan Token Digital Anda - seperti mengirimkannya ke alamat dompet lain atau menghubungkan ke aplikasi terdistribusi - menggunakan Layanan, Anda akan diminta untuk menyetujui atau “menandatangani” interaksi tersebut melalui perangkat yang telah Anda identifikasi selama proses orientasi. Aplikasi Worldcoin sepenuhnya mengandalkan persetujuan Anda dari perangkat ini untuk memulai interaksi dengan
blockchain
terkait. Anda memahami bahwa Anda berinteraksi secara langsung dengan
blockchain
terkait ketika Anda melakukan interaksi ini, dan bahwa kami tidak bertanggung jawab untuk mengirimkan pesanan atas nama Anda.
2.4 Informasi tentang Pihak Ketiga.
Dengan menggunakan Layanan, Anda dapat memiliki akses ke informasi yang berkaitan dengan Token Digital Anda, seperti namun tidak terbatas pada nilai pasar saat ini. Penyajian informasi ini tidak menyiratkan hubungan dengan atau dukungan pihak ketiga, meskipun fungsi tertentu yang disediakan sehubungan dengan Layanan memerlukan penggunaan produk pihak ketiga tersebut. Konten layanan dan produk pihak ketiga tersebut sebagaimana dinyatakan melalui Layanan didasarkan pada informasi yang tersedia untuk umum atau yang disediakan oleh pihak ketiga tersebut kepada kami, dan oleh karena itu kami tidak membuat pernyataan atau jaminan atas keakuratan informasi terkait layanan atau produk pihak ketiga tersebut.
2.5 Layanan Pihak Ketiga
Pengguna yang bertempat atau berlokasi di Jerman atau memiliki tempat tinggal atau kantor terdaftar di sana tidak dapat menggunakan Layanan Pihak Ketiga untuk menjual atau menukar Token Digital mereka berdasarkan Bagian ini.
Apabila tersedia, Layanan dapat memberi Anda tautan kepada pemroses pihak ketiga untuk memproses transaksi, seperti pembelian fiat Token Digital, penjualan Token Digital, pertukaran Token Digital, dan fungsi lain yang dapat tersedia di masa mendatang. Anda dapat melihat layanan pihak ketiga yang tersedia dalam World App. Ketika Anda melakukan transaksi ini, Anda melakukan transaksi dengan pihak ketiga dan bukan dengan kami. Anda harus mengikuti instruksi terkait yang diberikan melalui penyedia pihak ketiga dan menerima ketentuan layanan mereka. Kami tidak mengendalikan atau mengirimkan dana atau Token Digital Anda setiap saat ketika menyediakan Layanan, atau ketika Anda mengakses layanan pihak ketiga.
2.6 Transaksi
Peer-to-Peer
.
Layanan menyediakan platform komunikasi tempat Anda dapat mengirimkan atau meminta, menerima, dan menyimpan Token Digital yang didukung dari dompet
blockchain
lain, baik yang dikendalikan oleh Anda maupun pihak ketiga. Pengalihan Token Digital yang didukung oleh Anda antara dompet
blockchain
Anda yang lain serta ke dan dari pihak ketiga adalah pengalihan. Pihak yang memulai pengalihan bertanggung jawab penuh untuk melaksanakan transaksi secara benar, yang dapat mencakup, antara lain, pembayaran biaya jaringan atau penambang yang memadai sehingga transaksi berhasil. Biaya jaringan yang tidak memadai dapat menyebabkan pengalihan tetap dalam keadaan tertunda dan dapat mengakibatkan penundaan atau kerugian yang timbul akibat kesalahan dalam memulai transaksi. Kami tidak memiliki kewajiban untuk membantu pemulihan transaksi tersebut. Ketika Anda mengirimkan Token Digital dari dompet Anda ke dompet
blockchain
yang lain, pengalihan tersebut dilakukan secara berantai oleh Anda dan bukan di bawah kendali kami. Anda harus memverifikasi seluruh informasi transaksi sebelum mengirimkannya. Kami tidak memiliki kewajiban atau bertanggung jawab apabila Anda memasukkan alamat tujuan
blockchain
yang salah. Pengalihan Token Digital tidak dapat dibatalkan setelah disiarkan ke jaringan
blockchain
terkait, meskipun pengalihan tersebut dapat dalam keadaan tertunda, dan ditentukan demikian, selagi transaksi diproses oleh operator jaringan. Kami tidak mengendalikan jaringan dan tidak menjamin bahwa pengalihan akan dikonfirmasi oleh jaringan.
2.7 Brankas
2.7.1 Informasi Umum
. World App menyediakan antarmuka pengguna untuk “brankas” terdesentralisasi untuk Token Digital Anda (“Brankas”). Penggunaan Brankas oleh Anda merupakan pengakuan dan penerimaan Anda atas ketentuan yang mengatur Brankas, serta ketentuan tambahan yang disediakan oleh pihak ketiga yang telah mengembangkan atau menyediakan fitur yang berkaitan dengan atau yang timbul dari penggunaan Brankas oleh Anda.
Brankas hanya mendukung Token Digital tertentu. Token Digital ini tidak memenuhi syarat sebagai Token yang Dirujuk Aset atau Token Uang Elektronik, dalam ketentuan yang ditetapkan oleh Peraturan (UE) 2023/1114 Parlemen Eropa dan Dewan pada tanggal 31 Mei 2023 tentang pasar aset mata uang kripto. Token Digital yang didukung akan ditampilkan pada World App ketika mengakses Brankas Anda. Token Digital yang didukung oleh Brankas dapat berubah dari waktu ke waktu, dan tidak ada jaminan bahwa Token Digital yang didukung akan tetap tersedia untuk digunakan di Brankas.
Brankas disediakan sehubungan dengan kontrak pintar pihak ketiga. Tidak ada orang atau entitas lain, selain Anda, yang memiliki kemampuan untuk berinteraksi dengan Brankas atau Token Digital di dalam Brankas Anda. Baik TFH maupun pihak ketiga tidak memiliki kunci administratif atau akses (baik istimewa maupun tidak) pada Brankas Anda atau kontrak pintar terkait. Setoran ke dalam, atau penarikan dari, Brankas Token Digital untuk akun Anda hanya dapat terjadi jika transaksi tersebut ditandatangani dengan kunci(-kunci) pribadi Anda yang sesuai yang dijelaskan pada Bagian 2.1 dari Ketentuan ini. Artinya, jika Anda kehilangan akses pada atau kendali atas kunci(-kunci) pribadi Anda, Anda tidak akan dapat melakukan penyetoran atau penarikan Token Digital dari Brankas dan tidak ada pihak lain yang akan dapat membantu Anda atau melakukannya atas nama Anda. Oleh karena itu, penggunaan Brankas tidak, dan tidak dapat, memberikan kepada Anda layanan penitipan, jaminan, atau pengalihan oleh TFH atau pihak ketiga lainnya sehubungan dengan Token Digital yang dapat Anda kunci menggunakan Brankas di akun Anda.
Kontrak pintar yang mengatur fungsi Brankas untuk token WLD dapat dilihat menggunakan
blockchain
di sini. Untuk memperjelas, penggunaan fungsi-fungsi ini dan fungsi Brankas terkait lainnya tunduk pada Penafian Jaminan yang sama yang terdapat dalam Bagian 12 dari Ketentuan ini.
2.7.2 Fungsi Brankas
. Brankas saat ini menawarkan fitur-fitur berikut, yang dapat diubah, dihapus, atau ditambahkan oleh TFH atau pihak ketiga:  Penguncian, Hasil, Penarikan dan Periode Keamanan, Hibah pada Brankas.
2.7.3 Penguncian
. Dengan menggunakan Brankas, Anda setuju untuk mengunci Token Digital Anda untuk serangkaian periode waktu tertentu. Penguncian Token Digital menggunakan Brankas Anda akan mengalihkan Token Digital tersebut dari dompet nonkustodian Anda ke kontrak pintar yang terdesentralisasi. Setelah dialihkan, Token Digital ini akan menjadi “terkunci” di brankas, yang mencakup periode ketika token tersebut tetap disimpan di Brankas serta durasi yang telah ditentukan sebelumnya yang disebut “Periode Keamanan”, yang dijelaskan lebih terperinci di bawah. Ketika Token Digital Anda terkunci, Anda tidak akan dapat mengakses, mengalihkan, atau melakukan transaksi lain menggunakan Token Digital tersebut hingga Anda meminta untuk menariknya dan mengizinkan Periode Keamanan yang berlaku berlalu. Tidak seorang pun, termasuk TFH maupun Penyedia pihak ketiga, memiliki kemampuan untuk membuka kunci, menyimpan, mengendalikan, menarik, atau mengalihkan Token Digital Anda yang terkunci. Menempatkan Token Digital Anda ke dalam Brankas dan tunduk pada pembatasan penguncian serta penarikan bukan merupakan penjualan, pinjaman, atau pengalihan hak, kepemilikan, atau kepentingan dalam Token Digital kepada TFH atau pihak ketiga lainnya.
Penguncian Token Digital Anda di Brankas tidak menjamin pengamanan atau penyimpanan Token Digital Anda. Tidak ada skema asuransi deposit, atau perlindungan serupa lainnya, yang berlaku untuk Token Digital Anda, dan nilai dan/atau utilitas Token Digital yang telah Anda kunci dapat meningkat atau menurun selama durasi Periode Keamanan. Artinya, nilai atau utilitas Token Digital yang Anda simpan di Brankas Anda dapat berkurang, atau menjadi nol selama Periode Keamanan. Anda mengakui dan menyetujui bahwa setiap penarikan Token Digital di akun Anda setelah Periode Keamanan yang berlaku dapat mengakibatkan kembalinya Token Digital yang memiliki nilai lebih rendah, atau tidak ada nilainya, dibandingkan saat Anda menguncinya di Brankas, dan bahwa TFH atau pihak ketiga tidak menanggung risiko atau tanggung jawab atas penurunan nilai yang dapat terjadi.
2.7.4 Hasil
. Anda juga dapat memenuhi syarat untuk menghasilkan hal yang, untuk tujuan produk ini, disebut sebagai “hasil” pada Token Digital tertentu di Brankas Anda. Hasil ini, yang dapat berupa Token Digital tambahan, disediakan oleh pihak ketiga melalui serangkaian operasi kontrak pintar terpisah yang dapat Anda akses menggunakan antarmuka yang disediakan dalam World App. Baik TFH maupun pihak ketiga tidak menggunakan, memegang kendali atas, menerima kredit, atau membuang Token Digital Anda. Dengan demikian, hasil bukan bunga yang terkait atau dihasilkan oleh segala sesuatu selain penguncian Token Digital Anda sesuai ketentuan dan spesifikasi yang diberikan. Hasil yang dapat Anda terima diberikan kepada Anda sebagai hibah oleh pihak ketiga didasarkan pada keputusan Anda untuk menyimpan Token Digital menggunakan Brankas. Spesifikasi yang menentukan perolehan hasil, termasuk jumlah yang dihasilkan atau waktu perolehannya, dapat diubah atau dibatalkan setiap saat atas kebijakan Penyedia pihak ketiga.
Mungkin ada jumlah maksimum hasil yang dapat Anda peroleh. Perincian ini akan ditampilkan di samping Brankas Anda dan melalui ketentuan tambahan yang disediakan oleh pihak ketiga (diidentifikasi sebagai “Penyedia” dalam World App) yang menyediakan hasil. Ketentuan tambahan ini juga dimasukkan dalam Ketentuan ini. Hasil tidak disediakan atau dilayani oleh TFH.
Hasil yang diperoleh hanya akan didistribusikan kepada Anda setelah selesainya penarikan Token Digital yang menghasilkan hasil dari Brankas, yang terjadi hanya setelah Periode Keamanan yang berlaku berakhir. Penarikan ini adalah syarat terakhir dari setiap pemberian hasil, yang berarti Anda tidak memiliki hak, kepemilikan, atau kepentingan atas hasil yang telah dihasilkan atau akan dihasilkan kecuali jika dan hingga hasil telah diterima di dompet nonkustodian Anda. Selain itu, berarti bahwa jika Anda kehilangan akses atau kendali atas kunci(-kunci) pribadi Anda, Anda tidak akan dapat melakukan penarikan yang akan memberikan hak kepada Anda untuk menerima hasil.
2.7.5 Penarikan dan Periode Keamanan
. Anda dapat melakukan penarikan Token Digital Anda dari Brankas Anda setiap saat. Token Digital yang Anda minta untuk ditarik dari Brankas Anda akan dikembalikan kepada Anda setelah durasi yang telah ditentukan sebelumnya yang disebut “Periode Keamanan” telah berlalu. Setiap kali Anda memulai penarikan Token Digital dari Brankas, Periode Keamanan baru akan dimulai dan menghitung mundur waktu hingga Token Digital tersebut dikembalikan kepada Anda. Selama masa ini, Token Digital yang telah Anda pilih untuk ditarik akan tetap terkunci, dan Anda juga dapat membatalkan penarikan. Setelah Periode Keamanan berlalu, penarikan Anda akan selesai dan Token Digital, bersama dengan hasil yang dihasilkan yang telah diperoleh, akan dikirimkan pada dompet Anda. Durasi Periode Keamanan akan dinyatakan dalam World App ketika Anda mengakses Brankas Anda.
2.7.6 Hibah pada Brankas
. Fitur ini, setelah dipilih, memungkinkan Anda untuk secara otomatis mengirimkan Hibah WLD secara langsung pada Brankas di akun Anda, bukan pada dompet Anda. Anda dapat mengubah pengaturan ini setiap saat.
2.7.7 TFH dan Brankas
. Akses pada fitur ini dilakukan melalui World App. Namun, TFH hanya akan dapat membaca data terkait dan menampilkannya kepada Anda. TFH tidak dapat mengalihkan, menarik, atau menyetor Token Digital Anda dan tidak memiliki akses pada Brankas Anda.
2.8 Aplikasi yang Terdesentralisasi
Bagian ini tidak berlaku untuk pengguna yang bertempat atau berlokasi di Jerman atau memiliki tempat tinggal atau kantor terdaftar di sana:
Apabila tersedia
, kami dapat memiliki fungsi agar Anda dapat menghubungkan dompet Anda ke berbagai aplikasi yang terdesentralisasi. Anda bertanggung jawab penuh untuk memastikan keselamatan dan keamanan aplikasi pihak ketiga ini. Kami tidak memiliki kendali atas aplikasi pihak ketiga dan tidak dapat memberikan dukungan untuk masalah yang dapat Anda alami ketika terhubung dengan aplikasi pihak ketiga.
2.9 Dukungan Pengguna.
Kami menyediakan dukungan pengguna untuk memberikan bantuan terkait fitur dan fungsi tertentu sehubungan dengan Layanan. Untuk menghubungi kami, pilih “Dukungan” dari menu dalam aplikasi Worldcoin atau melalui support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Antarmuka World ID
. Worldcoin Foundation, dan bukan TFH, mengelola Protokol World ID dan mengendalikan pemrosesan data terkait Orb untuk memverifikasi World ID. Kami dapat menyediakan World ID kepada Anda (sebagai antarmuka) melalui Layanan. Protokol World ID mengizinkan Anda untuk membuktikan bahwa Anda adalah manusia yang nyata dan unik sekaligus melindungi privasi Anda.
2.11 Program Undang
. Apabila tersedia, kami dapat menyediakan fitur ‘Undang’ untuk Anda. Dengan menggunakan Undang, Anda dapat mengundang teman dan keluarga untuk mengunduh World App dan mendapatkan verifikasi World ID. Jika Anda menggunakan Undang, Anda menyetujui syarat dan ketentuan berikut:
Hadiah atas partisipasi dalam Undang disediakan oleh World Assets Limited. Berdasarkan kebijakan pihaknya sendiri, World Assets Limited dapat menawarkan hadiah kepada Anda karena telah mengundang pengguna yang berhasil memverifikasi World ID mereka. Untuk menerima hadiah, Anda harus memenuhi persyaratan tertentu, yang akan dijelaskan kepada Anda di World App. Anda memiliki batas maksimum untuk jumlah pengguna yang dapat Anda rujuk ke World App. Batas ini ditampilkan pada World App.
Tidak diperlukan pembelian untuk berpartisipasi dalam fitur Undang. Undang hanya tersedia untuk penggunaan pribadi nonkomersial. Anda hanya dapat menggunakan fitur Undang dengan iktikad baik untuk tujuan yang sah. Anda tidak dapat: (a) menggunakan Undang atau Layanan secara menipu, curang, atau melanggar hukum; (b) melakukan apa pun untuk merusak merek, muhibah, atau reputasi kami; (c) mengirimkan materi periklanan atau promosi yang tidak diinginkan atau diizinkan; (d) membuat klaim palsu atau menyesatkan; (e) menggunakan pencarian berbayar, media berbayar, atau kegiatan serupa untuk membujuk pengguna melalui fitur Undang; dan (f) menggunakan Undang untuk mencoba memperoleh informasi pribadi dari pengguna lain.
Undang tidak tersedia di seluruh negara atau lokasi dan tidak tersedia untuk seluruh pengguna. Partisipasi dalam Undang tidak tersedia di yurisdiksi apabila seluruh atau setiap bagian dari fitur ini dapat melanggar (atau membuat kami melanggar) persyaratan hukum. Anda setuju untuk tidak menggunakan Undang jika fitur Undang tidak sesuai dengan hukum yang berlaku di lokasi Anda.
Undang disediakan atas kebijakan kami sendiri. Kami dapat mengubah, memodifikasi, menangguhkan, dan membatalkan fitur tersebut setiap saat. World Assets Limited dapat menolak menawarkan hadiah kepada Anda karena telah mengundang pengguna untuk memverifikasi World ID mereka apabila pihaknya menentukan, atas kebijakannya sendiri, bahwa Anda telah melanggar Ketentuan ini.
2.12 Hibah & Pemesanan WLD
. Salah satu layanan Pihak Ketiga mengeklaim sejumlah kecil WLD pada interval yang berbeda (“Hibah WLD”). Hibah WLD disediakan oleh World Assets Limited, anak perusahaan dari Worldcoin Foundation. Jumlah, interval, dan penentuan waktu yang tepat untuk Hibah WLD akan ditentukan dalam World App, tetapi ditentukan sepenuhnya oleh World Assets Limited. Sejalan dengan versi sebelumnya dari ketentuan ini, Pemesanan WLD yang tersedia sebelumnya tidak menjamin bahwa Anda akan menerima sejumlah Hibah WLD. Jumlah, interval, dan penentuan waktu yang tepat untuk Pemesanan WLD akan ditentukan dalam World App, tetapi ditentukan sepenuhnya oleh World Assets Limited. Pemesanan WLD dapat kedaluwarsa, dengan atau tanpa pemberitahuan sebelumnya di World App, terlepas dari apakah Anda telah melakukan Pemesanan WLD atau menerima Hibah WLD terkait. Keduanya dapat ditarik kembali atas kebijakan World Assets Limited sendiri.
2.13 Aplikasi Operator
. Untuk Operator Orb dan mitra lainnya, kami menyediakan Operator App yang mengizinkan Anda untuk memantau kegiatan dan statistik tertentu terkait Anda dan bisnis Anda sebagai Operator Orb. Kami juga dapat menyediakan fitur-fitur tertentu untuk membantu Anda menjalankan bisnis Anda sebagai Operator Orb.
2.14. Miniapps
. “Miniapps” adalah fitur World App yang mengizinkan Anda untuk mengakses platform aplikasi mini yang dapat diakses dalam World App. Kami memiliki kebijakan mutlak untuk menentukan cara Miniapps ditampilkan dalam World App. Anda harus memiliki alamat dompet World App untuk mengakses Miniapps.
Anda mengakui bahwa dalam menampilkan Miniapps, TFH menyediakan platform teknologi yang hanya menghubungkan pengguna. TFH tidak akan mengirimkan, menyimpan, mengambil alih, memiliki, atau terlibat dengan mata uang tradisional atau digital. TFH tidak memproses transaksi, bertindak sebagai pemroses pembayaran, atau terlibat dalam pemrosesan transaksi. TFH bukan merupakan pihak dalam transaksi dan tidak memiliki kewajiban sehubungan dengan transaksi ini. TFH tidak dapat memberikan dukungan sehubungan dengan masalah transaksi.
2.14.1 Transaksi dan Pembayaran terkait Miniapps
. Miniapps ditampilkan dalam World App dan dapat menawarkan barang atau layanan yang dapat dibeli pengguna World App menggunakan Token Digital dalam dompet World App mereka. Transaksi ini melibatkan Anda dan miniapps.  TFH bukan merupakan pihak dalam transaksi tersebut.
Sehubungan dengan transaksi tersebut, Anda mengakui bahwa dompet World App adalah layanan nonkustodian, bahwa TFH tidak menyimpan atau memiliki Token Digital Anda, serta tidak melakukan transaksi, mengirimkan, mengambil alih, atau memiliki keterlibatan dalam melakukan transaksi. Token Digital selalu disimpan dan dikirimkan pada jaringan
blockchain
masing-masing. Tidak ada jaminan bahwa transaksi akan diproses dengan benar.
TFH hanya menghubungkan Anda dengan pihak ketiga dalam platform Miniapps dan bukan merupakan pihak dalam transaksi. TFH tidak berperan dalam pemrosesan pembayaran dan pengaturan biaya pengembalian dana atau pembatalan.
Setelah Anda memutuskan untuk terlibat dalam transaksi, Anda harus mengirimkan jumlah dan jenis Token Digital yang disepakati. TFH tidak memproses Token Digital pengguna atau mata uang tradisional dan tidak melakukan pengalihan atas nama pengguna. TFH tidak menangani, mengelola, mengawasi, memverifikasi, atau memberikan jaminan atas transaksi.  Apabila transaksi tidak diterima, dibalik, diproses secara tidak pantas, atau mengalami kesalahan, Anda dan penyedia layanan pihak ketiga harus bekerja sama untuk menyelesaikan masalah. Setiap sengketa, klaim, kerugian, kesalahpahaman, kesalahan teknis, atau masalah apa pun (baik tidak disengaja maupun diduga disengaja) terkait pembayaran atau transaksi harus ditangani secara langsung antara Anda dan penyedia pihak ketiga.  TFH tidak bertanggung jawab dalam bentuk apa pun dan tidak akan menjadi pihak dalam sengketa atau diskusi terkait pembayaran, juga tidak bertanggung jawab atas kerugian atau kerusakan yang dapat diderita oleh para pihak yang terlibat.
Anda bertanggung jawab penuh untuk menerima risiko fluktuasi harga terkait nilai Token Digital, dan memahami bahwa pada saat Anda menyelesaikan transaksi, nilai Token Digital yang terlibat dalam transaksi mungkin telah berubah secara signifikan.
2.14.2 Pihak Ketiga
. Produk dan layanan yang ditampilkan dalam miniapps ditawarkan dan dikelola oleh pihak ketiga. Dengan menggunakan Miniapps, Anda mengakui dan menyetujui bahwa:
Ketentuan ini antara Anda dan kami, dan tidak dengan miniapps tertentu;
Anda mengakses aplikasi Worldcoin yang dikembangkan dan/atau disediakan oleh aplikasi Worldcoin pihak ketiga, yaitu pihak yang sepenuhnya bertanggung jawab atas miniapps;
TFH hanya menyediakan akses ke penyedia pembayaran pihak ketiga melalui dompet World App, dan tidak memproses sendiri pembayaran atau menahan dana;
Miniapps dapat memiliki ketentuan tambahan sebagai bagian dari produk atau layanan mereka yang harus Anda patuhi jika Anda menerima layanan mereka; dan
Anda sepenuhnya mengakui dan secara tegas menanggung setiap dan seluruh risiko terkait transaksi, serta menyetujui bahwa kami tidak akan bertanggung jawab atas risiko atau konsekuensi merugikan yang timbul dari transaksi tersebut.
Pengembang individu dari miniapps yang tersedia di Miniapps bertanggung jawab penuh atas konten, produk, barang, atau layanan yang tersedia untuk Anda secara langsung melalui miniapps mereka masing-masing. Anda akan menghubungi Pengembang terkait secara langsung untuk pertanyaan atau sengketa.
Pengguna menerima seluruh risiko terkait transaksi, termasuk risiko bahwa mereka tidak akan menerima hasil pembelian atau penjualan mereka. Apabila terjadi masalah sehubungan dengan transaksi, TFH tidak dapat membantu penyelesaiannya, atau bertanggung jawab atas masalah yang timbul dari transaksi.
2.14.3 Biaya TFH
. Kami dapat menambahkan biaya penggunaan Miniapps ketika Anda melakukan transaksi dengan Pengembang. Jumlah biaya ini akan ditampilkan kepada Anda dalam platform. Setiap biaya tersebut akan ditampilkan dan berlaku sebagaimana tercermin pada Miniapps serta dapat diperbarui dan diubah dari waktu ke waktu.
2.14.4 Pajak
. Anda bertanggung jawab penuh untuk menentukan apakah, dan sejauh mana, pajak berlaku untuk transaksi melalui Miniapps atau setiap transaksi yang Anda lakukan di dalamnya, serta memotong, mengumpulkan, melaporkan, dan mengirimkan jumlah pajak yang benar kepada otoritas pajak yang sesuai.
2.14.5 Tidak ada pemantauan umum.
TFH tidak memiliki kewajiban umum untuk memantau informasi yang dihasilkan oleh pengguna, atau secara aktif mencari fakta atau keadaan yang menunjukkan kegiatan ilegal dalam Miniapps.
Namun demikian, jika kami mengetahui, terlepas dari sarana yang digunakan, bahwa produk atau layanan ilegal telah ditawarkan melalui Miniapps kepada pengguna yang berlokasi di Uni Eropa, kami akan memberi tahu pengguna yang telah membeli produk atau layanan ilegal tersebut melalui Miniapps
.
2.14.6 Kegiatan Terlarang
. Pengguna Layanan Miniapps setuju untuk tidak memposting atau mendistribusikan konten yang melanggar undang-undang atau melanggar hak pihak ketiga, termasuk namun tidak terbatas pada hak atas kekayaan intelektual, hak privasi, atau hak publisitas.
Selain itu, Anda setuju untuk tidak terlibat dalam kegiatan yang:
Melanggar hukum, menipu, atau berbahaya;
Mengganggu atau mengacaukan operasi Miniapps;
Melanggar ketentuan yang ditetapkan dalam Pedoman Aplikasi Worldcoin kami; dan
Menyertakan konten yang tidak diizinkan dalam Pedoman Aplikasi Worldcoin.
2.14.7 Menandai konten ilegal
. World App memiliki mekanisme yang mudah diakses dan ramah pengguna bagi pengguna untuk memberi tahu kami tentang konten ilegal pada platform Miniapps. Kami akan bertindak cepat untuk meninjau laporan tersebut.
2.14.8 Penghapusan konten ilegal
. Jika kami menentukan bahwa miniapps memuat konten ilegal atau menawarkan produk atau layanan ilegal, miniapps tersebut harus dihapuskan dari Miniapps. TFH akan memberikan pernyataan alasan yang singkat, jelas, dan khusus kepada pihak yang memposting konten atau layanan ilegal.
Setiap pembatasan yang diberlakukan oleh World App kepada penggunanya akan dilakukan secara berkala, objektif, dan proporsional.
Pengguna yang meyakini konten mereka telah dihapuskan atau akses ke konten tersebut telah dinonaktifkan tanpa alasan dapat menghubungi kami melalui
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
untuk mengajukan banding atas keputusan tersebut. Kami menyediakan sistem keluhan elektronik gratis yang memungkinkan pengguna untuk mempertanyakan keputusan kami terkait penghapusan konten, penangguhan layanan, pengakhiran akun, atau pembatasan monetisasi akibat dugaan konten ilegal atau pelanggaran ketentuan.
2.14.9 Moderasi konten
. TFH berhak menangguhkan, selama periode waktu wajar dan setelah mengeluarkan peringatan sebelumnya apabila diwajibkan secara hukum untuk melakukannya, penyediaan layanan kami kepada pengguna yang sering kali memberikan konten yang jelas-jelas ilegal. TFH juga dapat menangguhkan sementara pemrosesan pemberitahuan dan keluhan dari pengguna yang sering kali mengajukan klaim yang tidak berdasar.
2.15. Nama Pengguna
. Anda tidak harus menggunakan nama asli untuk nama pengguna World App. Ketika memilih nama pengguna, Anda wajib mematuhi
Kebijakan Nama Pengguna
dalam versi terbarunya.
3. Pembelian, Biaya, dan Pajak
3.1 Biaya Transaksi
. Dengan menggunakan Layanan, Anda menyetujui untuk membayar seluruh biaya yang berlaku, termasuk biaya transaksi untuk pertukaran dan transaksi Token Digital. Kami akan memberi tahu Anda tentang biaya yang berlaku sebelum Anda melakukan transaksi. Jika Anda menggunakan layanan pembayaran pihak ketiga, biaya bank, biaya kartu kredit, dan biaya kartu debit yang dibebankan untuk pembelian Token Digital dapat dikurangi dari jumlah yang telah diselesaikan dari pembelian Token Digital Anda. Anda juga bertanggung jawab untuk membayar biaya tambahan yang dibebankan oleh penyedia layanan keuangan Anda.
3.2 Biaya Jaringan
. Interaksi dengan
blockchain
juga dikenakan biaya jaringan. Biaya jaringan dibebankan oleh dan dibayarkan ke jaringan
blockchain
, bukan kepada kami, untuk mempermudah interaksi. Dalam beberapa kasus, Anda dapat memenuhi syarat untuk sejumlah transaksi bebas gas dalam periode waktu tertentu yang ditentukan berdasarkan kebijakan penuh TFH. Transaksi tersebut tunduk pada nilai transaksi minimum yang dapat disesuaikan oleh TFH.
3.3 Pajak
. Anda bertanggung jawab penuh untuk menentukan apakah, dan sejauh mana, pajak berlaku untuk transaksi melalui Layanan, serta memotong, mengumpulkan, melaporkan, dan mengirimkan jumlah pajak yang benar kepada otoritas pajak yang sesuai.
3.4 Pembaruan
. Seluruh biaya ditampilkan dan berlaku sebagaimana tercermin pada Layanan dan dapat diperbarui serta diubah dari waktu ke waktu.
4. Faktor Risiko
4.1 Bukan Alat Pembayaran yang Sah.
Token Digital bukan alat pembayaran yang sah, tidak didukung oleh pemerintah, dan akun Token Digital dan saldo nilai pada Layanan tidak tunduk pada perlindungan Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Securities Investor Protection Corporation, atau perlindungan serupa yang ditemukan di negara lain. Kami bukan bank dan tidak menawarkan layanan fidusia. Transaksi yang dilakukan melalui World App sebagian besar tidak diatur di banyak negara. Kami tidak menjamin fungsi
blockchain
yang kami dukung, yang dapat, antara lain, menyebabkan penundaan, konflik kepentingan, atau keputusan operasi oleh pihak ketiga yang tidak menguntungkan pemilik Token Digital tertentu, atau menyebabkan ketidakmampuan Anda untuk menyelesaikan transaksi menggunakan Layanan. Perincian transaksi yang Anda kirimkan melalui Layanan mungkin tidak selesai, atau mungkin tertunda secara substansial pada
blockchain
yang berlaku, dan kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas kegagalan untuk mengonfirmasi atau memproses transaksi seperti yang diharapkan. Tidak ada jaminan atau garansi bahwa pengalihan yang dimulai melalui Layanan akan berhasil mengalihkan kepemilikan atau hak dalam Token Digital. Selain itu, mungkin ada risiko khusus untuk penggunaan Token Digital tertentu, seperti WLD. Informasi lebih lanjut mengenai risiko-risiko khusus untuk WLD dapat ditemukan di sini.
4.2 Teknologi Baru.
Layanan ini adalah layanan baru. Meskipun perangkat lunak ini telah diuji secara luas, perangkat lunak yang digunakan untuk Layanan masih relatif baru dan dapat memiliki
bug
atau kerentanan keamanan. Selanjutnya, perangkat lunak masih dalam pengembangan dan dapat mengalami perubahan signifikan dari waktu ke waktu sehingga mungkin tidak memenuhi harapan pengguna.
4.3 Risiko Keamanan Informasi.
Token Digital dan penggunaan Layanan dapat mengalami pengambilalihan atau pencurian. Peretas atau kelompok atau organisasi berbahaya lainnya dapat mencoba mengganggu Layanan dengan berbagai cara, termasuk namun tidak terbatas pada serangan
malware
, serangan penolakan layanan, serangan berbasis konsensus, serangan Sybil, cadangan, dan penipuan. Selain itu, karena jaringan
blockchain
yang kami dukung, seperti protokol Ethereum, terletak pada perangkat lunak sumber terbuka, perangkat lunak yang mendasari Layanan secara sengaja atau tidak disengaja dapat memuat
bug
atau kelemahan yang dapat berdampak negatif terhadap Layanan atau mengakibatkan pengguna kehilangan Token Digital atau kehilangan kemampuan pengguna untuk mengakses atau mengendalikan dompetnya melalui Layanan. Apabila terjadi
bug
atau kelemahan perangkat lunak seperti itu, mungkin tidak ada perbaikan dan pengguna tidak dijamin mendapatkan ganti rugi, pengembalian dana, atau kompensasi.
4.4 Akurasi.
Meskipun kami bermaksud untuk memberikan informasi yang akurat dan tepat waktu yang disediakan melalui Layanan (termasuk namun tidak terbatas pada konten) yang mungkin tidak selalu sepenuhnya akurat, lengkap, atau terkini dan juga dapat mencakup ketidakakuratan teknis atau kesalahan ketik. Dalam upaya terus memberikan kepada Anda informasi selengkap dan seakurat mungkin, informasi dapat, sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku, diubah atau diperbarui dari waktu ke waktu tanpa pemberitahuan, termasuk namun tidak terbatas pada informasi mengenai kebijakan, produk, dan layanan kami. Oleh karena itu, Anda harus memverifikasi seluruh informasi sebelum mengandalkannya, dan seluruh keputusan didasarkan pada informasi yang diberikan melalui Layanan adalah tanggung jawab penuh Anda dan kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas keputusan tersebut.
4.5 Ketersediaan
. Meskipun kami berusaha untuk memberi Anda layanan yang unggul, kami tidak menjamin bahwa Layanan akan tersedia tanpa gangguan. Layanan dapat menjadi tidak tersedia sementara dari waktu ke waktu karena pemeliharaan atau alasan lain. Kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas kesalahan, kelalaian, gangguan, penghapusan, kecacatan, keterlambatan operasi atau transmisi, kegagalan saluran komunikasi, pencurian atau perusakan, ataupun akses atau perubahan komunikasi pengguna tanpa izin. Kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas masalah atau kerusakan teknis dari jaringan atau saluran telepon, sistem daring dari komputer, server atau penyedia, peralatan komputer, perangkat lunak, kegagalan email atau pemutar karena masalah teknis atau kemacetan lalu lintas pada Internet atau Layanan, atau gabungan hal-hal tersebut, termasuk cedera atau kerusakan pada pengguna atau komputer pihak lain yang terkait dengan atau akibat dari partisipasi atau pengunduhan materi sehubungan dengan Layanan. Kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas kehilangan atau kerusakan, kerugian finansial atau kehilangan keuntungan, kehilangan bisnis, atau cedera pribadi atau kematian, yang diakibatkan oleh penggunaan Layanan oleh siapa pun, Konten yang diposting pada atau melalui Layanan atau dikirimkan kepada pengguna, atau interaksi antara pengguna Layanan, baik secara daring maupun luring.
4.6 Fork
. Perangkat lunak yang digunakan untuk membuat WLD bersifat sumber terbuka dan bebas disalin dan digunakan setiap orang. Artinya, setiap orang dapat membuat versi modifikasi dari WLD, yang oleh karena itu dikenal sebagai “Fork”. Apabila terjadi gangguan pada Fork atau gangguan lain pada jaringan Token Digital, kami tidak mampu mendukung segala kegiatan yang berkaitan dengan Fork. Transaksi mungkin tidak diselesaikan, diselesaikan sebagian, diselesaikan secara keliru, atau secara substansial ditunda ketika Fork terjadi. Kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas kerugian yang Anda tanggung yang disebabkan secara keseluruhan atau sebagian oleh Fork atau gangguan jaringan lain.
4.7 Layanan Pihak Ketiga.
Apabila tersedia (lihat khususnya Bagian 2.5), kami mengandalkan penyedia layanan pihak ketiga untuk menyediakan beberapa fitur dan fungsi dalam Aplikasi Worldcoin, misalnya kemampuan untuk membeli Token Digital dengan mata uang fiat, atau kemampuan untuk menukar satu Aset Digital dengan Aset Digital lainnya. Kami tidak menyediakan layanan ini, dan kami bukan merupakan pihak dalam transaksi tersebut. Anda hanya mengandalkan penyedia pihak ketiga untuk layanan ini, dan Anda harus memiliki akun dengan penyedia pihak ketiga dan menyetujui ketentuan mereka. Kami
tidak dapat membantu Anda jika Anda mengalami masalah dalam menggunakan layanan mereka, dan kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas transaksi yang Anda lakukan menggunakan penyedia pihak ketiga.
5. Kekayaan Intelektual.
5.1 Kepemilikan
. Perangkat lunak, aplikasi, Layanan, Konten, Merek kami (sebagaimana didefinisikan di bawah), serta desain, pemilihan, dan pengaturan Konten pada Layanan (“KI”) dilindungi oleh hak cipta, merek dagang, hak paten, dan hak atas kekayaan intelektual lainnya serta undang-undang Amerika Serikat dan negara lain yang berlaku. Anda menyetujui untuk mematuhi seluruh hak atas kekayaan intelektual dan hukum yang berlaku, serta pemberitahuan atau pembatasan merek dagang atau hak cipta yang tercantum dalam Perjanjian atau Layanan. Anda tidak dapat menghapus pemberitahuan hak cipta, merek dagang, atau hak milik lain yang terdapat dalam KI.
5.2 Merek Dagang.
Nama Tools for Humanity Corporation, logo World App, dan seluruh logo terkait, serta slogan adalah merek dagang atau merek layanan dari Tools for Humanity Corporation atau pemberi lisensinya (“Merek”). Anda tidak boleh menyalin, meniru, atau menggunakan Merek, secara keseluruhan atau sebagian, tanpa izin tertulis dari kami. Seluruh merek dagang, nama, atau logo lain yang disebutkan sehubungan dengan Layanan merupakan kekayaan dari pemiliknya masing-masing dan Anda tidak boleh menyalin, meniru, atau menggunakannya, secara keseluruhan atau sebagian, tanpa izin tertulis dari pemilik merek dagang yang berlaku. Pencantuman segala merek pihak lain dalam Layanan bukan merupakan persetujuan, dukungan, atau rekomendasi oleh kami.
6. Lisensi dan Pembatasan
6.1 Lisensi
. Dengan ketentuan bahwa Anda memenuhi syarat untuk menggunakan Layanan dan tunduk pada kepatuhan Anda terhadap Ketentuan ini, kami dengan ini memberi Anda lisensi terbatas untuk mengakses dan menggunakan Layanan.
6.2 Pembatasan Lisensi
. Anda tidak boleh memublikasikan ulang Konten di situs Internet, Intranet, atau Extranet atau memasukkan informasi tersebut ke dalam basis data atau kompilasi lain, dan dilarang keras menggunakan Konten dengan cara lain. Setiap penggunaan Layanan selain yang diizinkan secara khusus dalam Ketentuan ini, tanpa izin tertulis sebelumnya dari kami, sangat dilarang dan akan mengakhiri lisensi yang diberikan dalam Ketentuan ini. Penggunaan yang tidak sah tersebut juga dapat melanggar hukum yang berlaku termasuk tanpa batasan undang-undang hak cipta dan merek dagang serta peraturan dan perundangan komunikasi yang berlaku. Kecuali jika dinyatakan secara eksplisit dalam Ketentuan ini, Ketentuan ini tidak akan ditafsirkan sebagai pemberian lisensi untuk hak atas kekayaan intelektual, baik dengan
estoppel
, implikasi, maupun cara lainnya. Lisensi ini dapat dicabut oleh kami setiap saat tanpa pemberitahuan dan dengan atau tanpa penyebab, sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku.
6.3 Pemerintah
. Jika Anda adalah pengguna akhir Pemerintah A.S., kami melisensikan Layanan kepada Anda sebagai “Barang Komersial” sebagaimana istilah tersebut didefinisikan dalam Pedoman Peraturan Federal A.S. (baca 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), dan hak yang kami berikan kepada Anda untuk Layanan sama dengan hak yang kami berikan kepada seluruh pihak lain berdasarkan Ketentuan ini.
7. Penggunaan yang Dapat Diterima
7.1
Anda hanya dapat menggunakan Layanan untuk penggunaan pribadi Anda. Kami berhak setiap saat dan atas kebijakan kami sendiri meninjau, membatalkan, atau menangguhkan akses atau penggunaan Anda atas Layanan sesuai hukum yang berlaku. Poin pada daftar Penggunaan yang Dilarang hanya merupakan contoh dan daftar ini tidak lengkap; kami dapat menambah atau menghapus penggunaan yang dilarang atas kebijakan kami sendiri sesuai dengan hukum yang berlaku.
7.2 Penggunaan yang Dilarang mencakup:
Kegiatan Ilegal:
Setiap kegiatan yang akan melanggar, atau membantu pelanggaran, setiap program sanksi yang dikelola oleh OFAC; melanggar, atau membantu pelanggaran undang-undang di negara tempat kami menjalankan bisnis; melibatkan hasil kegiatan ilegal; atau penerbitan, penyaluran, atau penyebaran segala materi atau informasi ilegal.
Penggunaan Berlebihan atau Peretasan:
Setiap kegiatan yang menimbulkan beban besar yang tidak wajar atau tidak proporsional pada infrastruktur kami; mengganggu, menghalangi, atau mengambil alih sistem, data, atau informasi secara merugikan; mengirimkan atau mengunggah materi ke Layanan yang memuat virus,
trojan horse
,
worm
, atau program berbahaya atau merusak lainnya; atau berupaya mendapatkan akses tanpa izin ke sistem komputer atau jaringan yang terhubung ke Layanan.
Kekerasan terhadap Pihak Lain:
Setiap kegiatan yang mengganggu akses atau penggunaan Layanan pihak lain; mencemarkan nama baik, menyakiti, memeras, melecehkan, menguntit, mengancam, atau melanggar atau menyalahi privasi, kekayaan intelektual, atau hak hukum lain pihak lain; menghasut, mengancam, mempermudah, mempromosikan, atau mendorong kebencian, intoleransi ras, atau tindakan kekerasan terhadap pihak lain; atau
memungut, mengikis, atau mengumpulkan data pengguna lain dari Layanan tanpa izin.
Penipuan dan Praktik Bisnis Tidak Adil Lainnya:
Setiap kegiatan yang beroperasi untuk menipu kami, pengguna kami, atau pihak lain; menyediakan informasi yang salah, tidak akurat, atau menyesatkan kepada kami; menjanjikan imbalan besar secara tidak wajar atau menjual layanan tanpa manfaat tambahan kepada pembeli; atau memajukan praktik predatoris dan penipuan lainnya termasuk lotre, undian, lelang biaya penawaran, kontes, undian, perjudian, atau gim peluang lainnya yang melanggar hukum.
Pelanggaran Kekayaan Intelektual:
Setiap kegiatan yang melibatkan penjualan, penyaluran, atau penyediaan akses ke musik, film, perangkat lunak, atau materi berlisensi bajakan lainnya tanpa izin yang sesuai dari pemegang hak; penggunaan KI (termasuk Merek) tanpa persetujuan tegas atau dengan cara yang membahayakan kami atau merek kami; menyiratkan dukungan atau afiliasi yang tidak benar dengan kami; atau melanggar atau menyalahi segala hak cipta, merek dagang, hak penerbitan atau privasi, atau hak milik lain berdasarkan undang-undang.
8. Operator Orb
Kami bermitra dengan kontraktor independen setempat yang disebut “Operator Orb”, yang mempermudah pendaftaran pengguna dan membantu menjawab pertanyaan yang mungkin Anda miliki tentang kami. Operator Orb ini telah menerima pelatihan dan memiliki pengetahuan tentang World Network. Namun demikian, kami tidak memiliki kendali dan menafikan seluruh tanggung jawab atas hal yang mereka katakan atau cara mereka berperilaku.
Operator Orb bukan agen atau karyawan kami dengan cara apa pun. Setiap upaya, fitur, proses, kebijakan, standar, atau upaya lainnya yang dilakukan oleh TFH demi kepentingan penggunanya tidak menunjukkan hubungan kerja atau keagenan dengan Operator Orb.
9. Penangguhan
Kami dapat menangguhkan dan membatasi akses Anda ke Layanan jika: (i) Kami diwajibkan melakukannya oleh panggilan pengadilan yang sah, perintah pengadilan, atau perintah mengikat dari otoritas pemerintah; (ii) Kami secara wajar menduga Anda menggunakan Layanan sehubungan dengan Penggunaan yang Dilarang; (iii) Penggunaan Layanan oleh Anda tunduk pada litigasi, penyelidikan, atau proses hukum pemerintah yang tertunda dan/atau kami melihat risiko tinggi ketidakpatuhan hukum atau regulasi terkait kegiatan Anda; (iv) Mitra layanan kami tidak dapat mendukung penggunaan Anda; (v) Anda mengambil tindakan yang kami anggap mengelak dari pengendalian kami (seperti namun tidak terbatas pada mencoba membuat beberapa akun).
10. Bukan Penawaran Sekuritas atau Bunga Komoditas
Konten Layanan bukan merupakan penawaran untuk membeli atau menjual atau ajakan penawaran untuk membeli atau menjual investasi, sekuritas, kepentingan kemitraan, komoditas, atau instrumen keuangan lainnya; konten atau Layanan juga bukan merupakan, dan tidak boleh digunakan untuk atau sehubungan dengan, penawaran atau ajakan oleh siapa pun di negara bagian atau yurisdiksi yang tidak mengizinkan atau memperbolehkan penawaran atau ajakan tersebut, atau kepada siapa pun yang akan melanggar hukum jika melakukan penawaran atau ajakan tersebut.
11. Konten
11.1 Ketergantungan pada Konten; Perubahan terhadap Layanan.
Informasi dan materi yang kami sediakan untuk Anda melalui Layanan (“Konten”) sepenuhnya untuk tujuan informasi umum, dan kami tidak menjamin keakuratan, kegunaan, atau kelengkapannya, sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku. Setiap ketergantungan yang Anda terapkan pada Konten kami sepenuhnya merupakan risiko Anda. Kami tidak memiliki kewajiban atau tanggung jawab atas tindakan yang Anda ambil atau tidak Anda ambil karena Konten, atau oleh setiap orang yang menerima Konten yang Anda bagikan. Pernyataan pengguna lain yang menjelaskan penggunaan mereka atas Layanan kami yang ditemukan pada Layanan atau tempat lain tidak boleh dipandang sebagai dukungan kami atas pernyataan mereka jika pernyataan tidak sejalan dengan Ketentuan ini atau Konten kami. Kami dapat memperbarui Konten dari waktu ke waktu, namun Konten tersebut mungkin tidak lengkap atau terbaru, dan kami tidak memiliki kewajiban kepada Anda untuk memperbarui Konten atau bagian lain dari Layanan. Kami dapat mengubah atau menghentikan, sementara atau secara permanen, sebagian atau seluruh Konten atau Layanan tanpa pemberitahuan sebelumnya kepada Anda, sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku. Kami tidak akan bertanggung jawab atas setiap perubahan, penangguhan, atau penghentian sebagian atau seluruh Konten atau Layanan, sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku.
11.2 Layanan dan Konten Pihak Ketiga
. Kami dapat menyediakan tautan ke materi edukasi, webinar, pertemuan, dan promosi di platform media sosial (“Layanan Pihak Ketiga”) yang memungkinkan tindakan berbagi dan kolaborasi di antara pengguna dan pihak ketiga lain. Jika Anda membagikan informasi pribadi, gambar, opini, konten, atau data lain pada layanan tersebut, Anda melakukannya dengan risiko Anda sendiri, dan penggunaan Anda atas layanan tersebut tunduk pada ketentuan penggunaan dan kebijakan privasi layanan tersebut, bukan kami. Anda harus meninjau ketentuan layanan dari masing-masing Layanan Pihak Ketiga untuk lebih memahami hak Anda, dan cara platform tersebut menggunakan data Anda. Kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas setiap kehilangan, pencurian, pembobolan, atau penyalahgunaan data Anda sehubungan dengan Layanan Pihak Ketiga (termasuk
kelalaian) kecuali sejauh tanggung jawab tersebut tidak dapat dibatasi berdasarkan hukum yang berlaku. Penggunaan Anda atas setiap informasi yang disediakan oleh Layanan Pihak Ketiga (“Konten Pihak Ketiga”) adalah risiko Anda sendiri, dan kami tidak berjanji kepada Anda bahwa Konten Pihak Ketiga bersifat akurat, lengkap, asli, atau sesuai untuk keadaan pribadi Anda. Konten Pihak Ketiga termasuk informasi yang disediakan oleh pengguna lain yang tidak secara khusus kami dukung.
11.3 Konten Pengguna
. Sebagai anggota komunitas Worldcoin, Anda dapat memposting pesan, data, perangkat lunak, gambar, video, atau konten lain (“Konten Pengguna”) pada papan buletin, blog, akun media sosial milik kami, serta berbagai lokasi lainnya yang tersedia secara publik pada Layanan. Forum ini dapat diselenggarakan oleh kami atau Penyedia Layanan Pihak Ketiga atas nama kami. Anda bertanggung jawab atas seluruh Konten Pengguna yang Anda kirim, unggah, posting, atau simpan melalui Layanan. Anda harus menyediakan seluruh peringatan, informasi, dan pengungkapan yang diwajibkan dan sesuai terkait Konten Pengguna Anda. Kami tidak bertanggung jawab atas setiap Konten Pengguna yang Anda kirimkan melalui Layanan.
11.4 Lisensi Konten Pengguna
. Dengan mengirimkan Konten Pengguna kepada kami, Anda menyatakan bahwa Anda memiliki seluruh hak yang diperlukan demi Konten Pengguna dan Anda dengan ini memberikan kepada kami lisensi secara terus-menerus, di seluruh dunia, noneksklusif, bebas royalti, dapat disublisensikan, dan dapat dialihkan untuk menggunakan, memperbanyak, menyalurkan, menyiapkan karya turunan, memodifikasi, menampilkan, dan menjalankan seluruh atau sebagian dari Konten Pengguna sehubungan dengan pemasaran dan promosi kami, serta untuk tujuan bisnis lainnya yang sah terkait dengan Layanan. Kami dapat menyalurkan kembali sebagian atau seluruh karya turunan dari Konten Pengguna Anda dalam format media dan melalui saluran media yang kami pilih. Dengan ini, Anda juga memberi kami dan pengguna lain lisensi noneksklusif untuk menggunakan, mengakses, memperbanyak, menyalurkan, memodifikasi, dan menampilkan, serta menjalankan Konten Pengguna Anda melalui Layanan. Bagian 11.4 akan berlaku sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku.
11.5 Pembatasan Konten Pengguna
. Anda menyetujui untuk tidak menggunakan atau mengizinkan pihak ketiga untuk menggunakan Layanan untuk memposting atau mengirimkan Konten Pengguna yang: (a) memfitnah atau mencemarkan nama baik, atau mengungkapkan persoalan pribadi atau personal tentang orang; (b) tidak senonoh, cabul, pornografi, melecehkan, mengancam, kasar, penuh kebencian, menyinggung ras atau etnis; mendorong perilaku yang akan dianggap sebagai tindak pidana, menimbulkan tanggung jawab perdata, atau melanggar hukum, atau yang tidak pantas; (c) akan melanggar hak atas kekayaan intelektual pihak lain, termasuk teks, gambar, atau program berhak cipta, rahasia dagang, atau informasi kepemilikan rahasia lainnya tanpa izin, atau merek dagang atau merek layanan yang digunakan dengan cara yang melanggar; atau (d) secara tidak wajar mengganggu penggunaan Layanan oleh pengguna lainnya. Anda menyatakan kepada kami bahwa Anda memposting Konten Pengguna ke Layanan secara sukarela; oleh karena itu, memposting Konten Pengguna tidak menciptakan hubungan pemberi kerja-karyawan antara Anda dan kami. Anda tidak boleh menyalin atau menggunakan alamat email, nomor ponsel, saldo, nama pengguna, atau informasi pribadi lain tentang pengguna lainnya tanpa izin mereka. Dilarang memberikan email, surat, panggilan telepon, atau komunikasi lain yang tidak diminta kepada pengguna lainnya melalui Layanan atau saluran lainnya.
11.6 Keluhan dan Penurunan DMCA.
Jika Anda meyakini bahwa merek dagang atau karya berhak cipta Anda dilanggar oleh Konten atau Konten Pengguna kami pada Layanan atau dipublikasikan dengan cara yang mengisyaratkan beberapa dukungan atau afiliasi dengan kami, harap kirim email kepada kami di legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com dengan subjek “Pengaduan [Merek Dagang/Hak Cipta],” sesuai dengan keadaan. Agar pengaduan Anda efektif dan agar kami dapat mengambil tindakan berdasarkan Undang-Undang Hak Cipta Milenium Digital (
Digital Millennium Copyright Act
, “DMCA”), Anda harus memenuhi seluruh persyaratan DMCA dengan memasukkan informasi berikut dalam email Anda:
Identifikasi jelas dari karya berhak cipta atau merek yang diklaim dilanggar, termasuk nomor Pendaftaran Hak Cipta jika karya tersebut terdaftar;
Identifikasi dari karya atau merek yang diklaim dilanggar dan ingin Anda hapus;
URL atau arahan jelas lain yang membuat kami dapat menemukan konten yang diduga melanggar;
Alamat email, alamat surat, dan nomor telepon Anda; dan
Pernyataan yang ditandatangani bahwa Anda memiliki keyakinan dengan iktikad baik bahwa konten tersebut melanggar, bahwa informasi yang Anda berikan benar, dan bahwa Anda adalah pemilik atau berwenang untuk mewakili pemilik konten.
Anda juga harus mengetahui bahwa berdasarkan Pasal 512(f) DMCA, setiap orang yang secara sengaja mengirimkan pemberitahuan pelanggaran tidak berdasar dapat bertanggung jawab atas kerugian, oleh karena itu jangan membuat klaim palsu. Kami dapat membagikan informasi atau korespondensi yang Anda berikan kepada kami kepada pihak ketiga, termasuk pihak yang mengunggah materi yang diduga melanggar ke Layanan.
Ketika kami menerima pemberitahuan pelanggaran bonafid, kebijakan kami adalah: (a) segera menghapus atau menonaktifkan akses ke konten yang melanggar; (b) memberi tahu pihak yang mengunggah materi yang melanggar bahwa kami telah menghapus atau menonaktifkan akses ke materi tersebut; dan (c) bagi pelanggar
berulang, mengakhiri akses pihak tersebut ke Layanan. Jika kami menerima pemberitahuan balasan dari pihak tersebut, kami dapat mengirimkan salinan dari pemberitahuan balasan tersebut kepada Anda yang menjelaskan bahwa kami dapat mengembalikan materi yang dihapus atau mengaktifkannya kembali dalam waktu 10 hari kerja. Kecuali jika Anda mengajukan gugatan yang meminta putusan pengadilan terhadap kami atau terhadap pihak yang mengunggah konten tersebut, kami akan mengembalikan akses ke materi yang dihapus dalam waktu 10 hingga 14 hari kerja atau lebih setelah penerimaan pemberitahuan balasan tersebut, sesuai dengan kebijakan kami.
12. PENAFIAN JAMINAN
12.1 Anda menanggung sendiri risiko penggunaan Layanan Anda. Layanan, WLD, dan konten serta seluruh KI lainnya disediakan atas dasar “SEBAGAIMANA ADANYA” dan “SEBAGAIMANA TERSEDIA” tanpa pernyataan atau jaminan, baik secara tersirat, tersurat, maupun berdasarkan undang-undang. Sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku, kami secara khusus menafikan setiap jaminan tersirat atas kepemilikan, kelayakan barang dagangan, kecocokan untuk tujuan tertentu, atau nonpelanggaran terhadap fitur, konten, atau KI lainnya yang terdapat dalam Layanan. Beberapa yurisdiksi tidak mengizinkan pengecualian jaminan yang tersirat, sehingga pengecualian di atas mungkin tidak berlaku bagi Anda. Kami tidak mendukung, menjamin, atau mengemban tanggung jawab atas iklan, penawaran, atau pernyataan yang dibuat oleh pihak ketiga, termasuk pengguna lainnya terkait Layanan.
12.2 Kami tidak membuat pernyataan atau jaminan bahwa (a) akses ke seluruh atau sebagian Layanan akan berkelanjutan, tidak terganggu, tepat waktu, aman, atau terbebas dari kesalahan; (b) Layanan atau konten bersifat akurat, lengkap, dapat diandalkan, atau terkini; (c) Layanan terbebas dari virus atau komponen berbahaya lainnya; atau (d) Layanan atau konten akan memenuhi persyaratan, kebutuhan, atau harapan Anda.
12.3 Selain itu, kami tidak membuat pernyataan atau jaminan sehubungan dengan keabsahan Layanan atau WLD untuk kasus penggunaan, atau bahwa Layanan atau WLD akan memenuhi kebutuhan regulasi atau kepatuhan. Anda juga bertanggung jawab untuk menentukan dan mematuhi seluruh pembatasan dan persyaratan hukum dan regulasi yang dapat mengatur penggunaan Layanan atau WLD oleh Anda. Kecuali untuk pernyataan tegas yang ditetapkan dalam Ketentuan ini, Anda dengan ini mengakui dan menyetujui bahwa Anda tidak mengandalkan pernyataan atau kesepahaman lainnya, baik tertulis maupun lisan, sehubungan dengan akses dan penggunaan Layanan atau WLD oleh Anda.
12.4 Kami tidak bertindak dan tidak dapat bertindak sebagai penasihat Anda sehubungan dengan persoalan keuangan, hukum, investasi, atau pajak. Setiap konten bersifat akurat hanya pada tanggal konten diterbitkan. Setiap proyeksi, estimasi, prakiraan, target, dan/atau pendapat yang dinyatakan di sini dapat menimbulkan risiko, ketidakpastian, serta asumsi, sehingga dapat salah dan dapat berubah tanpa pemberitahuan. Anda tidak boleh mengandalkan konten.
Informasi tertentu di sini dapat diperoleh dari sumber pihak ketiga. Meskipun diambil dari sumber yang diyakini dapat diandalkan, kami belum memverifikasi seluruh informasi tersebut secara independen dan tidak bertanggung jawab atas keakuratannya. Kami bukan
broker-dealer
atau penasihat investasi terdaftar. Kami tidak membuat pernyataan, dan secara khusus menafikan seluruh jaminan, baik tersurat, tersirat, maupun menurut undang-undang, mengenai keakuratan, ketepatan waktu, atau kelengkapan materi yang tercantum dalam Layanan. Konten kami hanya untuk informasi umum, dan Anda bertanggung jawab penuh dalam menentukan apakah Anda akan menggunakan Layanan atau tidak. Anda menyatakan bahwa berdagang, menggunakan, dan menyimpan Token Digital secara inheren sangat berisiko. Seluruh dana dalam dompet Anda dapat hilang. Anda menyatakan bahwa Layanan dapat dikenakan pembatasan ekspor dan sanksi ekonomi yang dikenakan oleh hukum A.S.
12.5 Kami tidak bertanggung jawab kepada Anda atau pihak ketiga atas modifikasi atau pengakhiran Layanan, atau penangguhan atau pengakhiran akses Anda ke Layanan.
13. PEMBATASAN KEWAJIBAN
13.1 Kami tidak mengecualikan atau membatasi kewajiban kami kepada Anda apabila dengan melakukannya akan melanggar hukum. Di negara-negara yang melarang jenis pengecualian di bawah, kami hanya bertanggung jawab kepada Anda atas kerugian dan kerusakan yang merupakan akibat wajar dan dapat diperkirakan dari kegagalan kami untuk menerapkan kehati-hatian dan keterampilan yang wajar atau pelanggaran kontrak kami dengan Anda. Ayat ini tidak memengaruhi hak konsumen yang tidak dapat dikesampingkan atau dibatasi oleh kontrak atau perjanjian.
13.2 Sejauh diizinkan oleh undang-undang, Anda menyetujui bahwa dalam keadaan apa pun kami atau setiap pejabat, direktur, karyawan, kontraktor, agen, afiliasi, atau anak perusahaan kami (“Para Pihak TFH”) tidak berkewajiban kepada Anda atas segala kerugian tidak langsung, hukuman, insidental, khusus, konsekuensial, atau bersifat denda, termasuk kerugian karena kehilangan keuntungan, muhibah, penggunaan, data, atau kekayaan tidak berwujud lainnya, baik kewajiban tersebut dinyatakan atas dasar kesalahan maupun lainnya, dan baik Para Pihak TFH telah diberi tahu mengenai kemungkinan kerugian tersebut yang timbul dari atau sehubungan dengan: (a) penggunaan atau ketidakmampuan Anda dalam menggunakan Layanan, Token Digital, atau World Network; (b) tidak dapat diaksesnya atau berakhirnya Layanan; (c) peretasan, perusakan, akses ilegal, atau perubahan dari transaksi atau Data Anda; (d) transaksi atau perjanjian yang ditandatangani oleh Anda dengan pihak ketiga melalui Layanan; (e) kegiatan atau komunikasi pihak ketiga; (f) tindakan Operator Orb, (g) kehilangan nilai Token
Digital; (h) Konten Pihak Ketiga yang diakses pada atau melalui Layanan; (i) kesalahan, kekeliruan, atau ketidakakuratan dalam Konten kami; (j) cedera pribadi atau kerusakan properti bersifat apa pun yang diakibatkan oleh akses ke atau penggunaan dari Layanan; (k) virus,
trojan horse
, atau semacamnya yang dapat dikirimkan ke atau melalui Layanan; atau (l) perilaku memfitnah, menyinggung, atau ilegal dari pihak ketiga. Pembatasan kewajiban ini akan berlaku baik kerugian yang timbul dari penggunaan maupun penyalahgunaan dari, ataupun mengandalkan pada TFH atau Layanan, terlepas dari kegagalan tujuan penting upaya pemulihan terbatas dan sejauh diizinkan berdasarkan hukum yang berlaku.
13.3 Dalam keadaan apa pun, Para Pihak TFH tidak akan berkewajiban kepada Anda atas klaim langsung, proses hukum, kewajiban, tanggung jawab, kerugian, kehilangan, atau biaya yang jumlahnya melebihi $100,00. Jika Anda tidak puas dengan Layanan, Anda menyetujui bahwa pemulihan satu-satunya dan eksklusif bagi Anda adalah dengan menghentikan penggunaan Layanan. Pembatasan kewajiban ini akan berlaku sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku.
13.4 Pembebasan dan Penggantian Kerugian.
Anda menyetujui untuk membela, mengganti rugi, dan membebaskan Para Pihak TFH, dari dan terhadap setiap klaim, kerugian, ongkos, kewajiban, biaya pengacara yang wajar, dan pengeluaran yang diajukan terhadap Pihak TFH oleh pihak ketiga yang timbul dari atau sehubungan dengan: (a) penggunaan Layanan oleh Anda; (b) pelanggaran Ketentuan ini oleh Anda; (c) pelanggaran hak pihak lain; (d) perilaku Anda sehubungan dengan Layanan; atau (e) penggunaan WLD, Token Digital, atau jaringan Worldcoin oleh Anda. Beberapa yurisdiksi membatasi penggantian kerugian konsumen, sehingga beberapa atau seluruh ketentuan penggantian kerugian dalam ayat ini mungkin tidak berlaku bagi Anda. Jika Anda diwajibkan untuk mengganti rugi Para Pihak TFH, kami berhak, atas kebijakan kami, mengendalikan tindakan atau proses hukum dan menetapkan apakah kami akan menyelesaikannya dan dengan ketentuan seperti apa.
JIKA ANDA ADALAH PENDUDUK CALIFORNIA, Anda mengesampingkan manfaat dan perlindungan Kitab Undang-Undang Hukum Perdata California § 1542, yang berbunyi: “[a] pembebasan umum tidak mencakup klaim yang tidak diketahui pihak kreditur atau pembebas atau diduga akan menguntungkannya pada waktu pelaksanaan pembebasan, dan, jika diketahui, akan secara signifikan memengaruhi penyelesaian mereka dengan pihak debitur atau pihak yang dibebaskan.”
14. Hukum yang Mengatur
Hukum Negara Bagian California akan berlaku untuk Perjanjian ini dan setiap sengketa yang timbul dari atau terkait dengan Perjanjian ini. Hukum yang mengatur yang dinyatakan dalam bagian ini akan berlaku tanpa memperhatikan prinsip-prinsip pertentangan hukum. Anda selanjutnya menyetujui bahwa Layanan akan dianggap berbasis sepenuhnya di Negara Bagian California, dan bahwa meskipun Layanan dapat tersedia di yurisdiksi lain, ketersediaannya tidak menimbulkan yurisdiksi pribadi umum atau khusus di forum di luar Negara Bagian California.
15. PENYELESAIAN SENGKETA, ARBITRASE, DAN PENGESAMPINGAN GUGATAN KELOMPOK
15.1 HARAP BACA AYAT-AYAT BERIKUT SECARA SAKSAMA. AYAT-AYAT TERSEBUT MEWAJIBKAN ANDA UNTUK MENYELESAIKAN SENGKETA DENGAN KAMI MELALUI ARBITRASE INDIVIDU DI HADAPAN ARBITER TUNGGAL, DAN BUKAN SEBAGAI ANGGOTA GUGATAN KELOMPOK. ARBITRASE MENCEGAH ANDA MENUNTUT KAMI DI PENGADILAN ATAU PENGADILAN JURI, MESKIPUN ANDA DAPAT MENGAJUKAN SENGKETA ATAS KAMI DALAM PENGADILAN GUGATAN SEDERHANA JIKA ANDA MEMENUHI SYARAT.
15.2 Kami akan menggunakan upaya terbaik untuk menyelesaikan potensi sengketa melalui negosiasi informal dengan iktikad baik. Apabila timbul potensi sengketa, Anda harus menghubungi kami melalui email ke legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com, sehingga kami dapat berupaya menyelesaikannya tanpa membawanya ke jalur penyelesaian sengketa formal. Jika kami tidak mampu menyelesaikannya secara informal dalam waktu 60 hari setelah penerimaan email Anda, dan Anda memilih mengajukan gugatan hukum federal atau negara bagian, gugatan hukum umum, gugatan didasarkan pada kontrak, kesalahan, penipuan, pernyataan menyesatkan, atau teori hukum lainnya, atau proses hukum formal lainnya yang timbul dari atau sehubungan dengan Ketentuan ini, Konten, atau Layanan (masing-masing disebut sebagai “Sengketa”), maka Anda menyetujui untuk menyelesaikan Sengketa melalui arbitrase mengikat, atas dasar individu sesuai dengan ketentuan-ketentuan berikut (secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “Perjanjian Arbitrase”):
Arbitrase akan dilakukan secara rahasia oleh arbiter tunggal. Arbiter akan menerapkan perundangan pembatasan yang berlaku dan seluruh hukum yang berlaku serta akan menghormati gugatan hak istimewa yang diakui oleh hukum yang berlaku.
Sengketa akan sepenuhnya dan akhirnya diselesaikan melalui arbitrase yang dikelola oleh JAMS sesuai dengan Aturan Arbitrase yang Disederhanakan JAMS, kecuali jika jumlah keseluruhan Sengketa adalah $250.000 atau lebih, dalam hal ini Aturan Arbitrase yang Komprehensif JAMS akan berlaku. Arbitrase akan diselenggarakan di San Francisco, California, kecuali jika Anda dan kami bersama-sama menyetujui tempat penyelenggaraan lain. Anda menyetujui bahwa pengadilan federal dan negara bagian di San Fransisco, California adalah forum yang tepat untuk setiap banding atas putusan arbitrase atau untuk proses hukum pengadilan apabila klausul arbitrase yang mengikat dari Perjanjian ini ternyata tidak dapat diberlakukan.
Dalam arbitrase, terlepas dari lokasinya, para pihak tidak akan meminta keterangan informasi satu sama lain, dan arbiter tidak akan mengizinkan para pihak untuk berupaya meminta keterangan; sebaliknya, setiap pihak akan mengungkapkan bukti yang mendukung posisi mereka pada waktu dan tanggal yang telah disetujui bersama sebelum dengar pendapat final arbitrase.
Perjanjian Arbitrase ini mencakup keberlakuan, pencabutan kembali, ruang lingkup, dan keabsahan dari Perjanjian Arbitrase atau setiap bagian dari Perjanjian Arbitrase, dan seluruh Sengketa lain yang timbul dari atau sehubungan dengan penafsiran atau pemberlakuan Perjanjian Arbitrase; dan seluruh persoalan tersebut akan diputuskan oleh arbiter dan bukan oleh pengadilan atau hakim.
Jika arbiter atau administrator arbitrase mengenakan biaya pengajuan atau ongkos administratif lain kepada Anda, kami akan mengganti biaya Anda, berdasarkan permintaan, sejauh biaya atau ongkos tersebut melebihi yang seharusnya Anda bayarkan jika Anda melakukan proses hukum di pengadilan. Kami juga akan membayar biaya atau ongkos tambahan jika diwajibkan oleh aturan administrator arbitrase atau hukum yang berlaku.
Atas permintaan salah satu pihak, seluruh proses hukum arbitrase akan dilakukan secara rahasia dan, dalam hal ini, seluruh dokumen, testimoni, dan catatan akan diterima, didengarkan, dan disimpan oleh arbiter secara rahasia dengan segel, yang hanya dapat dilihat oleh para pihak, masing-masing pengacara mereka, dan masing-masing pakar, konsultan, atau saksi mereka yang telah menyetujui sebelumnya dan secara tertulis, untuk menerima seluruh informasi tersebut sebagai informasi rahasia yang akan digunakan sepenuhnya untuk tujuan arbitrase.
Selain prosedur dan pemulihan kelompok yang dibahas dalam Perjanjian Arbitrase ini, arbiter berwenang untuk memberikan pemulihan yang seharusnya tersedia di pengadilan.
Keputusan atas putusan yang dibuat oleh arbiter dapat diajukan dalam pengadilan di yurisdiksi yang berwenang.
Jika persyaratan untuk melakukan arbitrase atau pelarangan terhadap gugatan kelompok dan Sengketa lainnya yang diajukan atas nama pihak ketiga yang tercantum dalam Perjanjian Arbitrase ini dinyatakan tidak dapat diberlakukan, maka hanya ketentuan yang tidak dapat diberlakukan yang akan dianggap dihapuskan dari Ketentuan ini dan seluruh kewajiban lainnya dalam Ketentuan ini akan tetap berlaku dan memiliki kekuatan penuh.
15.3 Hak 30 Hari untuk Menolak
. Anda berhak menolak dan tidak terikat oleh Perjanjian Arbitrase ini dengan mengirimkan email dari alamat yang Anda gunakan untuk membuat permohonan Anda kepada legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com dengan Baris Subjek: “MENOLAK ARBITRASE DAN PENGESAMPINGAN GUGATAN KELOMPOK”. Anda harus mengirimkan email Anda dalam waktu 30 hari setelah menyetujui Ketentuan ini, jika tidak, Anda akan terikat untuk melakukan arbitrase Sengketa sesuai dengan ketentuan dalam Perjanjian Arbitrase ini. Jika Anda menolak Perjanjian Arbitrase ini, kami juga tidak akan terikat oleh Perjanjian Arbitrase.
15.4 Perubahan pada Perjanjian Arbitrase ini
. Kami akan melakukan pemberitahuan dalam waktu 30 hari atas segala perubahan pada bagian Ketentuan ini yang berjudul “
Penyelesaian Sengketa, Arbitrase, dan Pengesampingan Gugatan Kelompok”
melalui pemberitahuan kepada Anda, dan perubahan akan berlaku dalam waktu 30 hari setelah Anda menerima pemberitahuan dari kami. Perubahan pada bagian berjudul
Penyelesaian Sengketa, Arbitrase, dan Pengesampingan Gugatan Kelompok
akan berlaku secara prospektif hanya bagi Sengketa yang timbul setelah hari ke-30. Jika pengadilan atau arbiter menyatakan bahwa perubahan pada bagian ini tidak dapat diberlakukan atau tidak sah, maka perubahan tersebut akan dipisahkan dari Ketentuan ini dan pengadilan atau arbiter tersebut akan memberlakukan ketentuan Perjanjian Arbitrase pertama yang berlaku setelah Anda mulai menggunakan Layanan. Anda dapat menggunakan hak Anda untuk menolak ketentuan Perjanjian Arbitrase baru dengan mengikuti prosedur yang ditetapkan dalam bagian di atas berjudul “Hak 30 Hari untuk Menolak.”
Perjanjian Arbitrase ini akan tetap berlaku setelah pengakhiran Ketentuan ini, dan penggunaan Anda atas Layanan.
Tanpa mengabaikan segala hal yang bertentangan dalam Perjanjian Arbitrase ini, pihak mana pun dapat mengajukan gugatan semata-mata untuk memperoleh putusan sela ganti rugi guna menghentikan penggunaan tanpa izin atau penyalahgunaan Layanan, atau pelanggaran hak atas kekayaan intelektual (contohnya, merek dagang, rahasia dagang,
hak cipta, atau hak paten) tanpa terlebih dahulu terlibat dalam arbitrase atau proses penyelesaian sengketa informal yang dijelaskan di atas.
16. Ketentuan Umum
16.1 Larangan Pengesampingan; Keterpisahan; Larangan Penetapan
. Kegagalan kami dalam memberlakukan ketentuan bukan pengesampingan hak kami untuk melakukannya nanti. Jika terdapat ketentuan yang tidak dapat diberlakukan, ketentuan lain dalam Ketentuan ini akan tetap berlaku sepenuhnya dan ketentuan yang dapat diberlakukan akan diganti semaksimal mungkin yang mencerminkan maksud kami, sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku. Anda tidak boleh menetapkan hak Anda berdasarkan Ketentuan ini, dan setiap upaya tersebut akan batal. Kami dapat menetapkan hak kami kepada afiliasi atau anak perusahaannya, atau kepada penerusnya demi kepentingan bisnis yang terkait dengan Layanan.
16.2 Keseluruhan Perjanjian
. Ketentuan ini merupakan pernyataan perjanjian lengkap dan eksklusif antara Anda dan kami sehubungan dengan Layanan dan menggantikan seluruh kesepahaman, perjanjian, pernyataan, dan jaminan yang berlaku sebelumnya dan bersamaan, baik secara tertulis maupun lisan, sehubungan dengan Layanan. Judul bagian dalam Ketentuan ini hanya untuk kemudahan dan tidak akan mengatur makna atau penafsiran segala ketentuan ini.
16.3 Keberlanjutan.
Seluruh ketentuan dalam Ketentuan ini yang berkaitan dengan penangguhan atau pengakhiran, utang yang wajib dibayarkan kepada TFH, penggunaan umum Layanan, Sengketa dengan TFH, serta ketentuan ini yang sifatnya melampaui kedaluwarsa atau pengakhiran Ketentuan ini, akan tetap berlaku setelah pengakhiran atau kedaluwarsa Ketentuan ini.
16.4 Hubungan Para Pihak.
Ketentuan ini tidak akan dianggap atau dimaksudkan untuk dianggap, serta tidak akan menyebabkan Anda dan TFH diperlakukan sebagai mitra, pelaku usaha bersama, atau asosiasi bersama untuk mendapatkan keuntungan, dan Anda maupun TFH tidak akan diperlakukan sebagai agen satu sama lain. Termasuk fakta bahwa Ketentuan ini tidak menetapkan atau dimaksudkan untuk menetapkan segala hubungan kerja antara Anda dan TFH.
16.5 Tidak Ada Saran Profesional atau Kewajiban Fidusia.
Seluruh Konten yang diberikan oleh kami hanya untuk tujuan informasi dan tidak boleh dianggap sebagai saran profesional. Anda tidak boleh mengambil, atau menahan diri dari mengambil, segala tindakan didasarkan pada informasi yang terdapat dalam Layanan. Sebelum Anda mengambil segala keputusan keuangan, hukum, atau lainnya yang melibatkan Layanan atau segala Token Digital, Anda harus meminta saran profesional independen dari individu yang berlisensi dan berkualifikasi di bidang tersebut yang sarannya akan sesuai. Ketentuan ini tidak dimaksudkan untuk, dan tidak, membuat atau membebankan segala kewajiban fidusia kepada kami. Sejauh diizinkan oleh Undang-Undang, Anda menyatakan dan menyetujui bahwa kami tidak memiliki kewajiban fidusia atau tanggung jawab kepada Anda atau pihak lain, dan bahwa sejauh kewajiban atau tanggung jawab tersebut dapat timbul berdasarkan hukum atau dalam asas kesetaraan, kewajiban dan tanggung jawab tersebut dengan ini secara kekal dinafikan, dikesampingkan, dan dihilangkan. Anda selanjutnya menyetujui bahwa satu-satunya kewajiban dan tanggung jawab yang kami miliki kepada Anda ditetapkan secara tegas dalam Ketentuan ini.
16.6 Perubahan Kendali.
Apabila kami diakuisisi oleh atau bergabung dengan entitas pihak ketiga, atau dengan cara lain menetapkan fungsi tertentu kepada entitas afiliasi atau penerus atau entitas lain yang ditentukan oleh kami demi kepentingan terbaik Pengguna, maka kami berhak, dalam segala situasi tersebut, mengalihkan atau menetapkan Data yang telah kami kumpulkan dari Anda sebagai bagian dari merger, akuisisi, penjualan, atau perubahan kendali lainnya, sesuai dengan hukum yang berlaku.
16.7 Keadaan Kahar.
Kami tidak akan bertanggung jawab atas penundaan, kegagalan pelaksanaan, atau gangguan layanan yang secara langsung atau tidak langsung diakibatkan dari gejolak pasar Token Digital yang signifikan, bencana alam, tindakan otoritas sipil atau militer, tindakan terorisme, gangguan sipil, perang, pemogokan, keadaan darurat kesehatan, sengketa tenaga kerja, kebakaran, gangguan layanan telekomunikasi atau Internet atau layanan penyedia jaringan, kegagalan peralatan atau perangkat lunak, atau segala sebab atau kondisi di luar kendali wajar kami (masing-masing disebut sebagai “Peristiwa Keadaan Kahar”). Berlangsungnya Peristiwa Keadaan Kahar tidak akan memengaruhi keabsahan dan keberlakuan segala ketentuan lain dalam Ketentuan ini.
16.8 Toko Aplikasi Worldcoin.
Di mana pun Anda mengunduh Aplikasi Worldcoin kami baik dari toko aplikasi Worldcoin maupun platform distribusi selain dari Apple App Store, termasuk Google Play Store (“Platform Distribusi”), Anda menyetujui bahwa:
Ketentuan adalah antara Anda dengan kami, dan bukan dengan penyedia Platform Distribusi (“Penyedia Toko”); penggunaan Aplikasi Worldcoin oleh Anda harus mematuhi Ketentuan Layanan Platform Distribusi yang saat itu diberlakukan oleh Penyedia Toko; Penyedia Toko hanya penyedia Platform Distribusi tempat Anda memperoleh Aplikasi Worldcoin;
Kami, dan bukan Penyedia Toko, bertanggung jawab penuh atas Aplikasi Worldcoin;
Penyedia Toko tidak memiliki kewajiban atau tanggung jawab kepada Anda sehubungan dengan Aplikasi Worldcoin atau Ketentuan; dan
Anda mengakui dan menyetujui bahwa Penyedia Toko adalah penerima manfaat pihak ketiga dari Ketentuan yang terkait dengan Aplikasi Worldcoin.
16.9 Apple App Store
. Bagian ini berlaku apabila Aplikasi Worldcoin telah diperoleh dari Apple App Store. Anda mengakui dan menyetujui bahwa Ketentuan ini semata-mata antara Anda dan kami, bukan Apple, Inc. (“Apple”) dan bahwa Apple tidak bertanggung jawab atas Aplikasi Worldcoin atau kontennya. Penggunaan Aplikasi Worldcoin oleh Anda harus mematuhi Ketentuan Layanan Toko Aplikasi Worldcoin.
Anda mengakui bahwa Apple tidak memiliki kewajiban apa pun untuk memberikan layanan pemeliharaan dan dukungan sehubungan dengan Aplikasi Worldcoin. Dalam hal kegagalan Aplikasi Worldcoin untuk memenuhi jaminan yang berlaku, Anda dapat memberi tahu Apple, dan (apabila berlaku) Apple akan mengembalikan harga beli Aplikasi Worldcoin kepada Anda; sejauh diizinkan oleh hukum yang berlaku, Apple tidak akan memiliki kewajiban jaminan lain apa pun sehubungan dengan Aplikasi Worldcoin, dan klaim, kerugian, kewajiban, kerusakan, biaya, atau pengeluaran yang disebabkan oleh kegagalan untuk mematuhi jaminan akan sepenuhnya diatur oleh Ketentuan dan hukum yang berlaku untuk kami sebagai penyedia Aplikasi Worldcoin.
Anda mengakui bahwa Apple tidak bertanggung jawab untuk menangani gugatan dari Anda atau pihak ketiga yang terkait dengan Aplikasi Worldcoin atau kepemilikan dan/atau penggunaan Aplikasi Worldcoin oleh Anda, termasuk namun tidak terbatas pada: (i) gugatan kewajiban produk; (ii) gugatan bahwa Aplikasi Worldcoin gagal memenuhi persyaratan hukum atau regulasi yang berlaku; dan (iii) gugatan yang timbul berdasarkan perlindungan konsumen atau perundangan serupa; dan seluruh klaim tersebut hanya diatur oleh Ketentuan dan hukum yang berlaku untuk kami sebagai penyedia perangkat lunak.
Anda mengakui bahwa, apabila terdapat klaim pihak ketiga bahwa Aplikasi Worldcoin atau kepemilikan dan penggunaan Aplikasi Worldcoin oleh Anda tersebut melanggar hak atas kekayaan intelektual pihak ketiga, TFH, bukan Apple, akan bertanggung jawab penuh atas penyelidikan, pembelaan, penyelesaian, dan pelepasan dari setiap gugatan pelanggaran kekayaan intelektual sejauh yang disyaratkan oleh Ketentuan.
Anda menyatakan dan menjamin bahwa (i) Anda tidak berada di negara yang terkena embargo Pemerintah A.S., atau yang telah ditetapkan oleh Pemerintah A.S. sebagai negara “pendukung teroris”; dan (ii) Anda tidak terdaftar dalam daftar para pihak yang dilarang atau dibatasi oleh Pemerintah A.S.
Anda dan TFH mengakui serta menyetujui bahwa Apple, dan anak perusahaan Apple, adalah penerima manfaat pihak ketiga dari Ketentuan Layanan terkait lisensi Aplikasi Worldcoin Anda, dan bahwa, setelah Anda menerima ketentuan dan persyaratan Ketentuan Layanan, Apple akan memiliki hak (dan akan dianggap telah menerima hak) untuk memberlakukan Ketentuan Layanan yang terkait dengan lisensi Aplikasi Worldcoin Anda terhadap Anda sebagai penerima manfaat pihak ketiga.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Tools For Humanity
利用規約
World Appへようこそ！本規約は、お客様とデラウェア州の法人であるTools for Humanity Corporation（以下、「TFH」または「当社」）との間で締結されるものであり、World Appおよびオペレーターアプリを含む当社のウェブサイトおよびアプリケーション（以下、総称して「本アプリ」）、ならびにWorld Network（以下、「World Network」）およびエコシステムに関連して当社がお客様に提供する機能、コンテンツ、サービス（以下、総称して「本サービス」または「当社サービス」）のお客様による使用およびアクセスについて規定するものです。
本サービスにアクセスし、ご利用になる前に、本規約をよくお読みください。お客様は、当社が提供する本サービスにアクセスまたは使用することにより、本規約について明示的に承諾すると共に、当社のプライバシー通知に法的に拘束されることに明示的に同意したものとみなされます。また、このプライバシー通知はここで言及することにより本規約に組み込まれるものとします。本規約の特に重要な条項は以下のとおりです：
お客様は、お客様と
TFH
との間で何らかの紛争が生じた場合、裁判ではなく法的拘束力のある仲裁を通じて解決することに同意するものとします。お客様が韓国にお住まいの場合は、現地の管轄裁判所で紛争を解決することもできます。詳細については、下記の第
15
条をご覧ください。
暗号資産は、デジタルトークンを含め、ほぼ規制されておらず、高リスクの可能性があります。このような取引で損失を被っても、規制当局の救済手段がない場合もあります。
本サービスのいかなる内容も有価証券またはデジタルトークンの販売の申し出や購入の勧誘を構成するものではありません。本サービスは投資助言を構成するものでもありません。デジタルトークン（下記の第
2.1
項で定義）の保有、購入、売却は、お客様の居住地では許可されていない場合があり、適用されるすべての法律を遵守することはお客様の責任となります。お客様はご自身の経済状況やデジタルトークンの理解度に照らして、デジタルトークンの購入、売却、使用、保有がお客様に適しているかどうかをご検討ください。デジタルトークンの価値は急速に変動し、その価値がすべて失われる可能性もあります。
また、
Worldcoin
トークン（以下、「
WLD
」）は、米国の市民、居住者、滞在者、または米国で法人化され、所在する企業や米国に登録代理人を持つ企業など、米国人による使用、購入、アクセスを意図したものではありません。当社はそのような米国人に
WLD
を提供していません。さらに、お客様は米国人に
WLD
を販売、譲渡、提供しないことに同意するものとします。
WLD
に関連するリスクの詳細については、こちらをご覧ください。
本規約の範囲
1.1
プライバシーとお客様のデータ：
お客様は、本アプリにアクセスする際に、氏名や電話番号などの個人情報を当社に提供していただく場合があります。個人であることを証明し、WLDトークンを請求するために情報を提供する場合、お客様の生体情報など、特別なカテゴリの機微情報を求められることがあります。当社のプライバシー通知には、お客様から収集するデータとその使用方法について説明を記載しています。お客様がプライバシー通知に記載されている方法でお客様のデータを収集または使用されることを望まない場合には、本サービスのご利用をお控えください。
1.2
適格性：
本サービスについて説明しているウェブページは世界中でアクセス可能ですが、アクセスできることによって、すべての本サービスやサービス機能がお客様の国で合法である、または利用可能であることを意味するものではありません。規制を回避する目的でVPNまたは類似のツールを使用することはできません。お客様は、本サービスを利用する場所においてその利用が合法であることを確認する責任を負います。本サービスは、すべての言語で利用できるわけではありません。本サービスはお客様が使用する場所において合法です。本サービスは、すべての言語で利用できるわけではありません。本サービスをご利用になる際には、本規約およびすべての適用法を遵守する必要があります。お客様は、違法または不法な活動を実施、促進、または他人が実施するのを支援するために本サービスを利用してはなりません。
さらに、以下の基準をすべて満たす必要があります：
18歳以上であること
シリア、ウクライナのクリミア、ドネツク、ルハンスク、ヘルソン、ザポリジヤ地域、ロシア、北朝鮮、イラン、キューバ、または米国や欧州連合などの国が本サービスへのアクセスを制限している対象国／地域に所在しておらず、その統治下になく、その国民や居住者でも
ない
こと
米国財務省外国資産管理室（以下、「OFAC」）により宣言された「特別指定国民」ではなく、その他の国の制裁リストの対象者でもないこと。また、米国商務省の「取引禁止者」リストおよびその他の国の取引禁止者リストに名前が記載されていないこと
お客様がこれらの要件をすべて満たしていない場合、本サービスにアクセスし、ご利用になることはできません。当社は、お客様による本サービスのアクセスや利用を制限する場合があります。
さらに、お客様がドイツに設立もしくは所在している場合、またはドイツに通常の住居もしくは登録事業所を有している場合、第2.5項に定義するサードパーティサービスまたは第2.8項に定義する分散型アプリケーションにアクセスし、ご利用になることはできません。お客様はこれらの機能をご利用になることはできません。
1.3
利用可能性：
本サービスについて説明しているウェブページは世界中でアクセス可能ですが、アクセスできることによって、すべての本サービスやサービス機能がお客様の国で合法である、または利用可能であることを意味するものではありません。国によっては、一部の本サービス（またはサービス機能）へのアクセスが当社または政府によってブロックされる場合があります。規制を回避する目的でVPNまたは類似のツールを使用することはできません。お客様の地域によっては、本アプリへのアクセスおよび本アプリの一部の機能がご利用になれないか、制限される場合があります。
お客様は、本サービスを利用する場所においてその利用が合法であることを確認する責任を負います。
本サービスは、すべての言語で利用できるわけではありません。
1.4
更新：
当社は、本規約を随時変更することがあります。こうした変更を行う場合、更新した規定を本サービスに掲載します。また、適用法で義務付けられている場合には、変更を行う前にお客様に通知いたします。変更がお客様にとって特に重要であるか不利になる可能性があり、適用法で義務付けられている場合には、お客様に追加の事前通知を行うものとします。お客様がこうした変更後にも特に異議を申し立てず、引き続き本サービスをご利用になる場合、お客様は更新後の本規約を承諾したものとみなされることを了解し、同意するものとします。お客様が本規約に同意されない場合、いつでも本サービスのご利用を中止することができます。本サービスは時とともに進化するものであるため、当社は、その単独の裁量により、適用法で許容される範囲内でいつでも予告なしに、本サービスのすべてまたは一部を変更または中止することができるものとします。
1.5
追加条件：
特定のアプリケーション、コンテンツ、機能、または本サービスの一部には追加の条件が適用される場合があります。当社がお客様に提供する追加条件はすべて本規約の一部を構成するものとします。
2. 本サービス
2.1
自己管理ウォレット：
World Appには、対応している暗号通貨、デジタル通貨、デジタルトークン（WLDを含みます。以下、総称して「デジタルトークン」）を保有するためのアンホステッド型の自己管理ウォレットが含まれています。お客様は、ご自身のウォレットで保有するデジタルトークンを管理するものとします。World Appでは、秘密鍵（デジタルトークンにアクセスするためのパスワード）はお客様のデバイスに直接保存されます。お客様はいつでも別のブロックチェーンアドレスに送信することでデジタルトークンを引き出すことができます。ただし、インターネットのアクセス状況およびブロックチェーンの混雑状況によってはすぐにできない場合もあります。お客様のデジタルトークンをウォレットに保有する場合、当社はお客様のウォレット、デジタルトークン、秘密鍵の管理を行いません。お客様は秘密鍵の紛失リスクを負うものとし、TFHとWorld Appが秘密鍵を復元することはできません。
World Appは自己管理ウォレットであるため、お客様にはブロックチェーン上でデジタルトークンを保有する場所を指定するウォレットアドレスが与えられます。当社がお客様のデジタルトークンにアクセスすることはできません。
2.2
対応しているデジタルトークン：
World Appは一部のERC-20トークンに対応しています。当社は将来的に対応するデジタルトークンを追加する可能性があります。World Appには対応しているデジタルトークンが表示されます。
デジタルトークンを入金または出金する前に、
World App
で対応しているトークンとネットワークを必ず確認してください。お客様が対応していないトークンを送信した場合、または間違ったウォレットアドレスにデジタルトークンを送信した場合、当社はお客様のデジタルトークンを回復することはできません。
お客様は、未対応のデジタルトークンをWorld Appのウォレットアドレスに送信することで、デジタルトークンへのアクセスを完全に失う場合があることを了解するものとします。デジタルトークンを回収する方法はありません。常に正しいウォレットアドレスに正しいデジタルトークンを送信していることを確認してください。少額のデジタルトークンで取引をテストすることもできます。
2.3
サービス提供とアクセス：
お客様は、デジタルトークンを他のウォレットアドレスに送信したり、分散型アプリケーションに接続したりするなど、本サービスを利用してデジタルトークンを操作する場合、お客様がオンボーディングプロセス中に指定したデバイスでその操作を承認または「署名」する必要があります。本アプリは、このデバイスからのお客様の承認によってのみ、関連のブロックチェーンとの操作を開始します。お客様は、こうした操作を行う場合、関連のブロックチェーン上で直接実行されること、当社がお客様に代わって注文を送信する責任を負わないことを了解するものとします。
2.4
サードパーティ情報：
お客様は、本サービスをご利用になることで、ご自身のデジタルトークンに関する情報（現在の市場価値など）にアクセスできます。この情報は、たとえ本サービスに関連して提供される特定の機能がサードパーティ製品の使用を必要とする場合であっても、サードパーティとの提携または推奨を意味するものではありません。本サービスを通じて掲載されるサードパーティのサービスおよび製品の内容は、一般に公開されている情報または当該サードパーティが当社に提供する情報に基づいています。したがって、当社は、サードパーティのサービスや製品関連情報の正確性について、いかなる表明も保証も行いません。
2.5
サードパーティのサービス：
お客様がドイツに設立もしくは所在している場合、またはドイツに通常の住居もしくは登録事業所を有している場合、本項に基づきサードパーティのサービスを利用してデジタルトークンを販売または交換することはできません。
本サービスは、利用可能な場合、デジタルトークンのフィアット購入、販売、交換、および将来利用可能になる可能性のあるその他の機能などの取引を処理するために、サードパーティ処理者へのリンクをお客様に提供する場合があります。お客様はWorld Appで利用可能なサードパーティのサービスを確認することができます。これらの取引を行う場合、お客様は当社ではなくサードパーティと取引を行うことになります。お客様は、サードパーティプロバイダーが提供する指示に従い、その利用規約に同意する必要があります。当社は、本サービスを提供する間、またはお客様がサードパーティのサービスにアクセスする間、お客様の資金やデジタルトークンを管理したり、送信したりすることは一切ありません。
2.6
ピアツーピア取引：
本サービスは、お客様またはサードパーティが管理する他のブロックチェーンウォレットに対し、対応しているデジタルトークンの送信、要求、受信、保存を行うことができる通信プラットフォームを提供しています。お客様が他のブロックチェーンウォレットとの間で、またはサードパーティとの間で、対応しているデジタルトークンを送信することは、デジタルトークンの移転とみなされます。デジタルトークンを移転する場合、取引を開始する者のみが適切に実行する責任を負います。これには、取引を成功させるために必要なネットワーク手数料やマイニング手数料の支払いなどが含まれます。ネットワーク手数料が不足していると、移転が保留状態のままとなり、取引開始時のエラーの結果として遅延や損失が発生する可能性があります。当社はそのような取引の是正を支援する義務を負いません。お客様がデジタルトークンをお客様のウォレットから別のブロックチェーンウォレットに送信する場合、そのような転送はお客様がブロックチェーン上で実行するものであり、当社が管理するものではありません。お客様は、送信を行う前に、すべての取引情報を確認する必要があります。お客様が誤ったブロックチェーン宛のアドレスを入力した場合、当社はいかなる責任も負いません。デジタルトークンの移転は、関連のブロックチェーンネットワークでいったんブロードキャストされると、ネットワークオペレーターによって取引が処理されている間は保留状態と表示されますが、移転を取り消すことはできません。当社はネットワークを管理しておらず、ネットワークによって移転が確定することを保証するものではありません。
2.7 Vault
：
2.7.1
一般情報：
World Appは、お客様のデジタルトークンのための分散型「保管庫」（「Vault」）にアクセスするユーザーインターフェースを提供します。お客様はVaultを利用することで、Vaultに適用される条件について、ならびにVaultの利用に関連する、またはVaultの利用から生じる機能を開発または提供するサードパーティが定める追加条件について了承および承諾することになります。
Vaultは特定のデジタルトークンのみをサポートしています。これらのデジタルトークンは、暗号資産市場に関する2023年5月31日付欧州議会および理事会規則（EU）2023/1114で定められた用語における、資産参照トークンまたは電子マネートークンには該当しません。サポートされているデジタルトークンは、お客様のVaultにアクセスする際にWorld Appに表示されます。Vaultがサポートするデジタルトークンは随時変更される可能性があり、サポートされるデジタルトークンがVaultで利用可能であり続けるという保証はありません。
Vaultはサードパーティのスマートコントラクトに関連して提供されます。お客様以外のいかなる個人または団体も、お客様のVaultまたはVault内のデジタルトークンには関与できません。TFHまたはいかなるサードパーティも、お客様のVaultまたは関連するスマートコントラクトに対する管理鍵または管理アクセス（特権的またはその他）を有しません。お客様のアカウントにおけるデジタルトークンのVaultへの入金またはVaultからの出金は、その取引が本規約の第2.1項に記載されているお客様の対応する秘密鍵で署名されている場合にのみ発生します。これは、お客様が秘密鍵へのアクセスまたは秘密鍵の管理権限を失うと、Vaultからデジタルトークンの入出金ができなくなるとともに、他のいかなる当事者もお客様を支援したり、お客様に代わって入出金を行ったりすることができなくなることを意味します。その場合、Vaultを利用してロックしたデジタルトークンがお客様のアカウントにあったとしても、Vaultの使用を通じて、TFHやその他のサードパーティから保管、寄託、または移転に関するサービスを受けることはできず、そうしたサービスが提供されることもありません。
WLDトークンのVault機能を管理するスマートコントラクトは、こちらのブロックチェーンを使って閲覧することができます。明確を期すために付言すると、これらおよびその他の関連するVault機能の利用は、本規約の第12条に定める保証の免責の対象となります。
2.7.2 Vault
機能：
Vaultは現在、以下の機能を提供していますが、これらはTFHまたはサードパーティによって変更、削除または追加される可能性があります。ロック、利回り、出金とセキュリティ期間、Vaultへの配布。
2.7.3
ロック：
Vaultを利用することにより、お客様はデジタルトークンを一定期間ロックすることに同意したことになります。Vaultを利用してデジタルトークンをロックすると、これらのデジタルトークンを非保管ウォレットから分散型スマートコントラクトに移転します。移転されると、これらのデジタルトークンはVaultに「ロック」されます。これには、Vaultに預託されたままの期間と、以下に詳述する「セキュリティ期間」と呼ばれる事前に定められた期間が含まれます。お客様のデジタルトークンがロックされている間は、お客様がデジタルトークンの出金を要求し、該当するセキュリティ期間が経過するまで、お客様はデジタルトークンにアクセス、移転、またはそれを利用してその他の取引を実行することはできません。TFHまたはサードパーティプロバイダーを含むいかなる者も、ロックされたデジタルトークンのロック解除、保管、管理、出金または移転を行うことはできません。お客様のデジタルトークンをVaultに入れ、ロックおよび出金制限の対象とすることは、デジタルトークンの権利、権原または利益をTFHまたはその他のサードパーティに売却、貸与または移転するものではありません。
お客様のデジタルトークンをVaultにロックすることは、お客様のデジタルトークンの保護預かりまたは保管を保証するものではありません。お客様のデジタルトークンには預金保険制度または同様の保護措置は適用されず、お客様がロックしたデジタルトークンの価値および／または効用は、セキュリティ期間を通じて増減する可能性があります。これは、セキュリティ期間中に、お客様がVaultにロックしたデジタルトークンの価値または効用が減少したり、ゼロになったりする可能性があることを意味します。お客様は、適用されるセキュリティ期間後にお客様のアカウントでデジタルトークンを出金すると、お客様がデジタルトークンをVaultにロックした時点よりも低い価値、または価値がまったくないデジタルトークンが返却される可能性があること、およびTFHまたはいかなるサードパーティも、発生する可能性のある価値の減少のリスクまたは責任を負わないことを了承し、同意するものとします。
2.7.4
利回り：
また、本商品の目的上、お客様のVault内の特定のデジタルトークンに「利回り」と呼ばれるものが発生することがあります。この利回りは、追加のデジタルトークンの形をとる場合があり、World App内で提供されるインターフェースを利用してアクセスできる別の一連のスマートコントラクト操作を介してサードパーティによって提供されます。TFHまたはいかなるサードパーティも、お客様のデジタルトークンを利用、管理の引き受け、信用の受領、またはその他の方法で処分することはありません。このように、利回りは、規定された条件および仕様に従ってお客様のデジタルトークンをロックすることによってのみ発生するものであり、それ以外の何かと結びついた利息ではありません。お客様が受け取る可能性のある利回りはすべて、Vaultを利用してデジタルトークンを保管するというお客様の決定に基づくサードパーティからの付与としてお客様に提供されるものです。利回りの発生を決定する仕様（発生量または発生期間を含みます）は、サードパーティプロバイダーの裁量により、いつでも変更または中止することができます。
利回りの上限が設定されている場合もあります。これらの詳細は、お客様のVaultと共に表示され、利回りを提供するサードパーティ（World App内では「プロバイダー」として識別されます）によって提供される追加条件を通じて表示されます。これらの追加条件も本規約に組み込まれます。利回りはTFHが提供するものではありません。
発生した利回りは、適用されるセキュリティ期間が満了した後に発生する、Vaultから利回りを発生させるデジタルトークンの出金が完了したときにのみ、お客様に分配されます。この出金は利回り付与の最終的な条件であり、利回りが非保管ウォレット内で受領されない限り、発生した利回り、または発生する予定の利回りに対して、お客様はいかなる権利、権原または利益も持たないことを意味します。また、これは、秘密鍵へのアクセスまたは秘密鍵の管理権限を失うと、利回りを受け取るための出金ができなくなることを意味します。
2.7.5
出金とセキュリティ期間：
お客様は、いつでもお客様のVaultからデジタルトークンの出金を開始することができます。お客様のVaultから出金を要求したデジタルトークンは、「セキュリティ期間」と呼ばれる事前に設定された期間が経過した後、お客様に返却されます。お客様がVaultからデジタルトークンの出金を開始するたびに、新しいセキュリティ期間が開始され、デジタルトークンがお客様に返却されるまでの時間がカウントダウンされます。この間、出金を選択したデジタルトークンはロックされたままとなり、出金をキャンセルすることもできます。セキュリティ期間が経過すると、出金が完了し、デジタルトークンと発生した利回りがお客様のウォレットに送信されます。セキュリティ期間は、お客様がVaultにアクセスする際、World App内に記載されます。
2.7.6 Vault
への配布：
この機能を選択すると、WLD Grantをお客様のウォレットではなく、アカウントのVaultに直接自動送金することができます。この設定はいつでも変更できます。
2.7.7 TFH
と
Vault
：
この機能へのアクセスはWorld Appから行います。ただし、TFHは関連データを読み取り、それをお客様に表示することしかできません。TFHは、お客様のデジタルトークンを移転、出金、または入金することはできず、お客様のVaultにアクセスすることはできません。
2.8
分散型アプリケーション：
本項の規定は、お客様がドイツに設立もしくは所在している場合、またはドイツに通常の住居もしくは登録事業所を有している場合には適用されません。
当社は、
利用可能な場合
、お客様のウォレットをさまざまな分散型アプリケーションに接続する機能を提供する場合があります。お客様はこうしたサードパーティ・アプリケーションの安全性とセキュリティの確保について、単独で責任を負うものとします。当社はサードパーティのアプリケーションを管理しておらず、お客様がそのようなアプリケーションと接続して問題が発生した場合でも、サポートを提供することはできません。
2.9
カスタマーサポート：
当社は、本サービスにおける仕様や機能に関してカスタマーサポートを提供しています。お問い合わせは、アプリのメニューから「サポート」を選択するか、support@toolsforhumanity.com宛にメールを送信してください。
2.10 World ID
インターフェース：
Worldcoin Foundation（TFHではありません）は、World IDプロトコルの管理人として、World IDを検証するためのOrb関連データ処理を管理しています。当社は、本サービスを通じてお客様にWorld IDを（インターフェースとして）提供する場合があります。World IDプロトコルは、お客様のプライバシーを保護しながら、お客様が実在する固有の人間であることを証明します。
2.11
招待プログラム：
当社は、利用可能な場合、お客様に「招待」プログラムを提供する場合があります。お客様は、「招待」プログラムをご利用になることにより、お友達や家族をWorld Appのダウンロードに招待し、World IDの認証を受けるようにすることができます。お客様が「招待」プログラムをご利用になる場合、次の利用規約に同意するものとします：
「招待」プログラムへの参加報酬はWorld Assets Limitedが提供します。World Assets Limitedは、その単独の裁量により、お客様が招待したユーザーがWorld IDの検証に成功した場合、お客様に報酬を提供することができます。報酬を受け取るためには、World Appでお客様に説明する一定の条件を満たす必要があります。お客様がWorld Appに紹介できるユーザー数には上限があります。この上限値はWorld Appに表示されます。
「招待」プログラムに参加するために何かを購入する必要はありません。「招待」プログラムは個人的で非商業的な目的でのみ利用することができます。お客様は合法的な目的で誠意をもって「招待」プログラムをご利用になってください。お客様は次の行為を行ってはなりません：(a) 「招待」プログラムや本サービスを欺瞞的、詐欺的、または違法な方法で利用すること、(b) 当社のブランド、信用、または評判を傷つけること、(c) 未承諾または無許可の広告または販促資料を送信すること、(d) 虚偽または誤解を招く主張を行うこと、(e) 有料検索、有料メディア、またはその他の同様の活動を使用して「招待」プログラムを介してユーザーを勧誘すること、(f) 「招待」プログラムを利用して他のユーザーから個人情報を取得しようとすること。
「招待」プログラムは国や地域によって利用できない場合があり、すべてのユーザーが利用できるわけではありません。「招待」プログラムへの参加は、この機能のすべてまたは一部が法律に違反する（または違反する原因となる）可能性のある法域ではご利用になれません。お客様は「招待」プログラムがお客様の地域で適用される法律に準拠していない場合は、このプログラムを利用しないことに同意するものとします。
「招待」プログラムは、当社の単独の裁量により提供されるものです。当社はいつでもこのプログラムを変更、修正、中断、中止することができるものとします。World Assets Limitedは、その単独の裁量により、お客様が本規約に違反していると判断した場合、お客様がWorld IDの検証にユーザーを招待したことから得られる報酬の支払いを拒否することができます。
2.12 WLD
の付与と予約：
サードパーティサービスの1つに、少額のWLDを不定期に請求すること（以下、「WLD付与」）が挙げられます。WLD付与は、Worldcoin Foundationの子会社であるWorld Assets Limitedが提供しています。WLD付与の正確な金額、間隔、タイミングはWorld Appに表示されますが、これを決定するのはWorld Assets Limitedのみです。本規約の旧バージョンと同様に、以前に利用可能であったWLD予約は、お客様がWLD付与を受け取ることを保証するものではありません。WLD予約の正確な金額、間隔、タイミングはWorld Appに表示されますが、これを決定するのはWorld Assets Limitedのみです。WLD予約は、World Appでの事前通知、WLD予約の実行、WLD付与の受領が行われたかどうかにかかわらず、期限切れとなる場合があります。これらは、World Assets Limitedの単独の裁量により取り消すことができます。
2.13
オペレーターアプリ：
当社は、Orbオペレーターおよびその他のパートナーのために、お客様およびお客様のビジネスに関連する特定のアクティビティおよび統計情報をOrbオペレーターとして監視できるオペレーターアプリをお客様に提供しています。また、お客様がOrbオペレーターとして業務を遂行できるように特定の機能を提供することもあります。
2.14. Miniapps
：
「Miniapps」は、World Appでアクセス可能なミニアプリケーションのプラットフォームにアクセスするためのWorld Appの機能です。当社は、その単独の裁量により、World AppでMiniappsを表示する方法を決定します。Miniappsにアクセスするには、World Appウォレットのアドレスが必要です。
お客様は、
Miniapps
の表示において、
TFH
がお客様を接続する技術プラットフォームのみを提供していることを了解するものとします。
TFH
は、いかなる場合でも、従来の通貨またはデジタル通貨の送信、保存、保有、保管、またはその他の方法で関与することはありません。
TFH
は、取引を処理したり、支払処理者として機能したり、その他の方法で取引の処理に関与することはありません。
TFH
は取引の当事者ではなく、取引に関していかなる責任も負いません。また、取引で問題が生じた場合でもサポートを提供することはできません。
2.14.1 Miniapps
関連の取引および支払い：
MiniappsはWorld Appで表示され、World AppユーザーがWorld Appウォレットのデジタルトークンを使用して購入できる商品やサービスを提供します。こうした取引はお客様とMiniappsの間で行われるものであり、TFHはその取引に関与しません。
お客様は、こうした取引に関し、World Appウォレットが自己管理型サービスであり、TFHがお客様のデジタルトークンの保管・管理を行うことはなく、取引の実行、送信、保有、またはその他の方法で関与していないことを了解するものとします。デジタルトークンは常にそれぞれのブロックチェーンネットワーク上に保存され、送信されますが、取引が正しく処理される保証はありません。
TFHはお客様をMiniappsプラットフォームのサードパーティに接続するだけであり、いかなる取引にも当事者として関与しておらず、決済処理、返金、キャンセル料の管理にも関与していません。
お客様は、取引を行うことを判断した場合、合意した金額と種類のデジタルトークンを送信する必要があります。TFHはお客様のデジタルトークンまたは従来の通貨を処理せず、お客様に代わって送金を実行することもしません。TFHは、いかなる取引においても、その取扱い、管理、監視、検証、保証を行いません。取引が受領されなかった場合、取り消された場合、不適切に処理された場合、またはその他のエラーが発生した場合、お客様とサードパーティプロバイダーは協力して問題を解決する必要があります。支払いや取引に関するあらゆる紛争、請求、損失、誤解、技術的エラーなどのあらゆる種類の問題（偶発的および意図的とされるものを含みます）について、お客様とサードパーティプロバイダーとの間で直接対処する必要があります。TFHは、支払いに関する紛争や協議について、いかなる責任も負わず、当事者となることもなく、当事者が被る可能性のある損失や損害についても責任を負いません。
お客様は、デジタルトークンの価値に関わる価格変動リスクを受け入れる責任を単独で負うものとします。また、お客様が取引を完了するまでに、取引に関与するデジタルトークンの価値が大幅に変動する可能性があることを了解するものとします。
2.14.2
サードパーティ：
Miniappsに表示される商品やサービスは、サードパーティが提供し、管理するものです。お客様は、Miniappsを利用する際に、以下の事項について了解し、同意するものとします：
本規約はお客様と当社の間で締結するものであり、特定のMiniappsとの間のものではないこと
お客様はサードパーティアプリが開発／提供するアプリにアクセスしており、サードパーティはこのMiniappsに対して単独で責任を負うこと
TFHはWorld Appウォレットを通じてサードパーティ支払プロバイダーへのアクセスを提供するだけであり、自ら支払いを処理したり、資金を保有したりすることはないこと
Miniappsはその製品やサービスの一環として追加条件を課す場合があり、お客様がそのサービスを利用するのであれば、こうした追加条件を遵守しなくてはならないこと
お客様は、取引に伴うあらゆるリスクを完全に理解しており、明示的にかかるリスクを負うこと、取引から生じるリスクまたは不利な結果について当社が一切責任を負わないことに同意すること
Miniappsでアプリを提供している各デベロッパーは、それぞれのアプリを通じてお客様に直接提供しているコンテンツ、製品、商品、サービスについて単独で責任を負います。問い合わせや紛争については、それぞれのデベロッパーに直接連絡してください。
お客様は、売買代金を受け取ることができないリスクを含め、取引に関わるすべてのリスクを受け入れるものとします。お客様の取引で問題が生じた場合、TFHはその解決に協力することはできず、取引に起因して生じる問題についても一切の責任を負いません。
2.14.3 TFH
料金：
お客様がデベロッパーと取引を行う場合、当社はMiniappsの利用手数料を加算する場合があります。この手数料の金額はプラットフォームで表示されます。この手数料はMiniappsを反映して最新の値が表示され、随時更新や変更が行われる可能性があります。
2.14.4
税金：
お客様は、Miniappsを介した取引やMiniappsで実行した取引に税金が課されるのかどうか、課される場合の金額はいくらなのかを判断し、適切な税務当局に対し、正確な金額の税金を源泉徴収、徴収、申告、および送金することに単独で責任を負うものとします。
2.14.5
一般的なモニタリングの不実行：
TFHは、お客様が生成した情報を監視したり、Miniappsで違法行為を示す事実や状況を積極的に調査したりする一般的な義務を負わないものとします。
ただし、手段の如何を問わず、Miniappsを介して欧州連合に所在するお客様に違法な商品やサービスが提供されていることを当社が見つけた場合、当社は、かかる違法な商品／サービスを購入したお客様にその旨を通知するものとします。
2.14.6
禁止行為：
Miniappsサービスのお客様は、何らかの法律に違反するコンテンツ、または第三者権利（知的財産権、プライバシー権、パブリシティ権など）を侵害するコンテンツを一切投稿・配信しないことに同意するものとします。
また、以下の行為を行わないことにも同意するものとします：
違法、不正、または有害な行為
Miniappsの運営を妨害または混乱させる行為
当社のアプリガイドラインに定める条件に違反する行為
アプリガイドラインで許可されていないコンテンツを含める行為
2.14.7
違法コンテンツの報告：
World Appは、お客様がMiniappsプラットフォームで違法コンテンツを報告するための、アクセスしやすくユーザーフレンドリーなメカニズムを整備しています。当社がそのような報告を受けた場合には迅速に調査を行います。
2.14.8
違法コンテンツの削除：
ミニアプリが何らかの違法コンテンツを含んでいる、または違法な商品やサービスを提供していると当社が判断した場合、そのミニアプリはMiniappsから削除されるものとします。TFHは、違法なコンテンツやサービスを投稿する者に対して、簡潔で明確かつ具体的な理由を説明します。
World Appがお客様に対して実施するいかなる制限も、真摯に、客観的に、かつ相応に行われるものとします。
お客様がご自身のコンテンツが不当に削除またはアクセス不能にされたと考える場合、
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
までご連絡ください。当社では、疑わしい違法コンテンツや規約違反を理由にコンテンツの削除、サービスの停止、アカウントの中止、または現金化の制限について当社が決定したことに対し、お客様が異議を申し立てることができる無料の電子苦情処理システムを提供しています。
2.14.9
コンテンツの投稿監視：
TFHは、明らかに違法なコンテンツを頻繁に投稿するユーザーに対し、法律で義務付けられている場合には事前の警告を行った上で、合理的な期間、サービスの提供を停止する権利を留保します。また、根拠のないクレームが多発している場合、通知や苦情の処理を一時的に停止することがあります。
2.15.
ユーザー名：
World Appのユーザー名は本名である必要はありません。お客様がユーザー名を選択する際には、
ユーザー名ポリシー
の最新版を遵守する必要があります。
3. 購入、手数料、税金
3.1
取引手数料：
お客様は、本サービスをご利用になることにより、デジタルトークンのスワップや取引の取引手数料を含め、適用されるすべての手数料を支払うことに同意するものとします。適用される手数料については、お取引の前にお知らせいたします。お客様がサードパーティ決済サービスを使用する場合、銀行手数料やクレジットカード／デビットカードの手数料は、デジタルトークン購入の決済額から差し引かれる場合があります。また、金融サービスプロバイダーから請求される追加手数料もお客様の負担となります。
3.2
ネットワーク料金：
ブロックチェーン上の操作でもネットワーク手数料が発生します。あらゆる操作を円滑に実行するためのネットワーク手数料は、当社ではなくブロックチェーンネットワークによって請求され、ブロックチェーンネットワークに支払われるものとします。場合によっては、TFHがその全面的な裁量により決定する期間において、お客様がネットワーク手数料のかからない取引を限定的な回数で行えることもあります。そのような取引は最小取引価額（TFHが調整）を条件とします。
3.3
税金：
お客様は、本サービスを介した取引に税金が課されるのかどうか、課される場合の金額はいくらなのかを判断し、適切な税務当局に対し、正確な金額の税金を源泉徴収、徴収、申告、および送金することに単独で責任を負うものとします。
3.4
更新：
すべての手数料は本サービスを反映して最新の値が表示され、随時更新や変更が行われる可能性があります。
4. リスク要因
4.1
法定通貨ではないこと：
デジタルトークンは法定通貨ではなく、いかなる政府による裏付けもなく、本サービスにおけるデジタルトークン口座およびその残高は、連邦預金保険公社、証券投資者保護公社の保護、またはその他の国における同様の保護の対象ではありません。当社は銀行ではなく、受託サービスも提供していません。World Appで行われる取引は、多くの国でほとんど規制されていません。当社は、当社がサポートするブロックチェーンの動作について一切保証しません。これには、取引の遅延や、利害対立、デジタルトークンの一定の所有者にとって不利益となる第三者による運営上の決定が行われる可能性や、お客様が本サービスを使用して取引を完了することができなくなる可能性があります。お客様が本サービスを介して展開した取引内容がブロックチェーン上で完了しない、または大幅に遅延する可能性もあります。当社は、取引が期待通りに承認または処理されなかったことについて、一切の責任を負いません。本サービスを通じて開始されたデジタルトークンの移転において、その所有権や権利が正常に譲渡されることを保証するものではありません。さらに、WLDなど、特定のデジタルトークンの使用には特有のリスクが存在する場合もあります。WLD特有のリスクについては、こちらをご覧ください。
4.2
新技術：
本サービスは新しいものです。このソフトウェアは広範囲にわたってテストされていますが、本サービスに使用しているソフトウェアはまだ比較的新しいものであり、バグやセキュリティ上の脆弱性が存在する可能性があります。さらに、本ソフトウェアは現在も開発中であり、時間の経過とともにお客様の期待に沿えない大幅な変更が加えられる可能性があります。
4.3
情報セキュリティリスク：
デジタルトークンおよび本サービスの利用は没収や盗取の対象となる場合があります。ハッカーまたはその他の悪意ある集団や組織は、さまざまな方法で本サービスを妨害しようとする可能性があります。主な例として、マルウェア攻撃、サービス拒否攻撃、コンセンサスベース攻撃、シビル攻撃、スマーフィング、スプーフィングなどが挙げられます。さらに、イーサリアムプロトコルなど、当社がサポートするブロックチェーンネットワークは、オープンソースソフトウェアに依存しているため、本サービスに悪影響を及ぼす可能性のある意図的または非意図的なバグや脆弱性が含まれている可能性があり、その結果、ユーザーのデジタルトークンが失われたり、本サービスを介するウォレットへのアクセスや制御ができなくなったりする可能性があります。このようなソフトウェアのバグや脆弱性が発生しても救済手段が存在しない可能性があり、その場合、お客様にはいかなる救済、返金、補償も保証されません。
4.4
正確性：
当社は、本サービス（そのコンテンツを含みますが、これに限定されません）を通じて、正確かつ適時の情報を提供することを企図していますが、必ずしも完全に正確、必ずしも完全に正確で完成された最新のものではなく、技術的に不正確な記載や誤植を含む場合もあります。当社は、可能な限り完全かつ正確な情報をお客様に提供し続けるため、適用法で許容される範囲内で、当社の方針、製品、サービスに関する情報など（ただし必ずしもこれらに限定されません）、予告なしに随時変更または更新することがあります。したがって、お客様は、すべての情報を信頼する前に確認する必要があり、本サービスを通じて提供された情報に基づくすべての決定は、お客様ご自身の責任であり、当社はかかる決定について一切責任を負いません。
4.5
利用可能性：
当社は、お客様に優れたサービスを提供するよう努めていますが、本サービスが中断なく利用可能であることを保証するものではありません。本サービスはメンテナンスなどの理由により一時的に利用できない場合があります。当社は、エラー、不作為、中断、削除、欠陥、操作／送信の遅延、通信回線の障害、盗難や破壊、ユーザー通信への不正アクセスや改ざんについて、一切の責任を負いません。当社は、電話網／電話回線、コンピューターオンラインシステム、サーバー、プロバイダー、コンピューター機器、ソフトウェア、電子メールの不具合、技術的な問題によるプレーヤーの故障、インターネットや本サービスにおける混雑、これらの複合的な事情による問題や技術的誤動作（ユーザーまたはその他の者が本サービスに参加したり、関連資料をダウンロードしたりしたことに関連または起因するコンピューターの故障や損害を含みます）について一切責任を負いません。当社は、オンライン・オフラインを問わず、本サービス、本サービス上または本サービスを介して投稿されたコンテンツ、もしくはユーザーに送信されたコンテンツ、または本サービスのユーザー間の操作に起因して生じたいかなる損失、損害、金銭的損害、逸失利益、事業の喪失、人身傷害、死亡について一切責任を負いません。
4.6
フォーク：
WLDの作成に使用されるソフトウェアはオープンソースであり、誰でも無料で複製・使用することができます。これは、誰でも「フォーク」と呼ばれるWLDの改変版を作成できることを意味します。フォークまたはその他のデジタルトークンネットワークの中断が発生した場合、当社はフォークに関連する活動を支援できない可能性があります。フォークが発生した場合、取引が完了しない、部分的に完了する、誤って完了する、または大幅に遅延する可能性があります。当社は、フォークまたはその他のネットワークの中断によって全体的または部分的に生じたお客様の損失について責任を負いません。
4.7
サードパーティのサービス：
当社は、利用可能な場合（特に第2.5項を参照）、本アプリの一部の仕様や機能をサードパーティサービスプロバイダーに委託することがあります。例えば、法定通貨でデジタルトークンを購入する機能や、あるデジタル資産を別のデジタル資産と交換する機能などです。当社はこれらのサービスを提供しておらず、そのような取引の当事者でもありません。お客様は、これらのサービスをサードパーティプロバイダーのみに依存しており、サードパーティプロバイダーのアカウントを取得し、その規約に同意する必要があります。当社は、
お客様がこうしたサービスを利用する上で問題が生じたとしても、お客様をサポートすることはできません。また、お客様がサードパーティプロバイダーを利用して行ういかなる取引についても責任を負いません。
5. 知的財産
5.1
所有権：
当社のソフトウェア、アプリケーション、本サービス、コンテンツ、商標（以下に定義）、および本サービスのコンテンツのデザイン、選定、配置（以下、「IP」）は、米国およびその他の該当する国の著作権、商標権、特許権、その他の知的財産権および法律によって保護されています。お客様は、適用されるすべての知的財産権および法律、ならびに本契約または本サービスに含まれる商標や著作権に関する通知または制限を遵守することに同意するものとします。お客様は、IPに含まれる著作権、商標、または所有権表示を削除することはできません。
5.2
商標：
Tools for Humanity Corporationの社名、World Appのロゴ、および関連するすべてのロゴ、スローガンは、Tools for Humanity Corporationまたはそのライセンサーの商標またはサービスマーク（以下、「本商標」）です。お客様は、当社の書面による許可なく、本商標の全体または一部を複製、模倣、使用することはできません。本サービスに関連して言及されるその他のすべての商標、名称、ロゴは、各所有者の財産であり、当該所有者の書面による許可なく、その全体または一部を複製、模倣、使用することはできません。本サービスに他者の商標が含まれていることは、当社による承認、保証、推奨を意味するものではありません。
6. ライセンスと制限
6.1
ライセンス：
当社は、お客様が本サービスを利用する資格を有し、本規約を遵守することを条件として、本サービスにアクセスし利用するための限定的なライセンスをお客様に付与します。
6.2
ライセンスの制限：
お客様は、本コンテンツをインターネット、イントラネット、またはエクストラネット上に転載したり、他のデータベースやコンパイルに組み込んだりすることはできません。当社の書面による事前の許可なく、本規約で明確に許可されている以外の方法で本サービスを使用することは固く禁じられており、これに違反した場合は本規約で付与したライセンスを終了します。このような不正使用は、著作権法、商標法、通信規制や法令など、適用される法律への違反となることがあります。本規約に明示的に定めている場合を別として、本規約のいかなる条項も、禁反言、黙示、その他を問わず、知的財産権のライセンスを付与するものと解釈してはなりません。本ライセンスは、適用法で許容される範囲内において、理由の如何を問わず、いつでも当社によって予告なく取り消すことができます。
6.3
政府：
お客様が米国政府のエンドユーザーである場合、当社は、米国連邦規則集（48 C.F.R.§2.101を参照）に定義される「Commercial Item（商業品目）」としてお客様に本サービスのライセンスを供与しており、本サービスにおいて当社がお客様に付与する権利は、本規約に基づき当社が他のすべてのお客様に付与する権利と同じものです。
7. 利用規定
7.1
お客様は本サービスを個人的な用途でのみご利用になることができます。当社は、適用法に従い、その単独の裁量により、お客様の本サービスへのアクセスまたは利用を常に見直し、取り消し、または停止する権利を留保します。禁止用途リストの項目はあくまで一例であり、リストはすべてを網羅するものではありません。当社は、適用法に従い、その単独の裁量により、禁止用途を追加または削除することができます。
7.2
禁止用途には以下が含まれます：
違法行為：
OFACが管理する制裁プログラムに違反するまたは違反を助長させる行為、当社が事業を営む国の法律に違反するまたは違反を助長させる行為、違法行為で得る収益に関与する行為、違法な資料や情報を公開、配布、または流布する活動。
過剰な使用またはハッキング：
当社のインフラ設備に不当または不相応に大きな負荷をかける行為、システム、データ、または情報を有害に妨害、傍受、または没収する行為、ウイルス、トロイの木馬、ワーム、その他の有害なプログラムを含むマテリアルを本サービスに送信またはアップロードする行為、本サービスに接続されているコンピューターシステムまたはネットワークへの不正なアクセスを試みる行為。
他人への攻撃：
他人による本サービスへのアクセスまたはその利用を妨害する行為、他人を誹謗中傷、罵倒、恐喝、嫌がらせ、ストーカー行為、脅迫、その他他人のプライバシー、知的財産、その他の法的権利に違反または侵害する行為、他人に対する憎悪、人種的不寛容、暴力行為を扇動、脅迫、助長、促進、または奨励する行為、
本サービスから他のユーザーのデータを許可なく取得、抽出、または収集する行為。
詐欺およびその他の不公正な商慣行：
当社、当社のユーザー、またはその他の人物を詐取する行為、虚偽、不正確、または誤解を招く情報を当社に提供する行為、不当に高額な報酬を約束するか買い手に付加的な利益を与えないサービスを販売する行為、違法な宝くじ、抽選、入札手数料オークション、コンテスト、懸賞、賭博、その他の射倖性ゲームを含む略奪的かつ欺瞞的な慣行を助長させる行為。
知的財産の侵害：
権利者の適切な許可を得ずに偽造された音楽、映画、ソフトウェア、その他のライセンス対象物の販売、配布、アクセスを提供する行為、明示的な同意を得ずにまたは当社や当社のブランドを害する方法で知的財産（本商標を含む）を使用する行為、当社の推奨または提携を虚偽にほのめかす行為、著作権、商標、パブリシティ権、プライバシー権など法律に基づく所有権を侵害または違反する行為。
8. Orb
オペレーター
当社は「Orbオペレーター」と呼ばれる現地の独立した請負業者と提携しています。Orbオペレーターはユーザーのサインアップを円滑に進行させ、当社に関する質問の回答を支援しています。Orbオペレーターはトレーニングを受けており、World Networkに関する知識も豊富です。ただし、当社はOrbオペレーターの発言や行動を管理しておらず、これらについて一切責任を負いません。
Orb
オペレーターは当社の代理人でも従業員でもありません。
TFH
がユーザーの利益のために提供するあらゆる努力、機能、プロセス、ポリシー、基準その他の取り組みは、
Orb
オペレーターとの雇用関係や代理関係を示すものではありません。
9. 一時停止
当社は、次の事項に該当する場合、お客様の本サービスへのアクセスを一時停止し、制限する場合があります：(i) 当社が正式な召喚状、裁判所命令、または政府当局の拘束力のある命令により要求された場合、(ii) お客様が禁止された使用に関連して本サービスを利用していることが合理的に疑われる場合、(iii) お客様による本サービスの利用が係争中の訴訟、調査、または政府手続の対象であり、および／またはお客様の活動によって法的または規制上のコンプライアンス違反リスクが高まると当社が認識した場合、(iv) 当社のサービスパートナーがお客様の利用を支援できなくなった場合、(v) お客様が当社の規制を回避している（複数のアカウントを作成しようとする行為など）と当社が判断した場合。
10. 有価証券やコモディティ投資の勧誘ではないこと
本サービスの内容は、投資、有価証券、パートナーシップ持分、コモディティその他の金融商品の売買の申し出や勧誘を構成するものではありません。また、本コンテンツまたは本サービスは、そのような申し出や勧誘が認可または許可されていない国／法域に所在する者による申し出や勧誘、またはそのような申し出や勧誘を行うことが違法となる者に対する申し出や勧誘を構成するものではなく、そのような申し出や勧誘のために、または関連して使用してはなりません。
11. コンテンツ
11.1
コンテンツへの依拠、本サービスの変更：
当社が本サービスを通じてお客様に提供する情報およびマテリアル（以下、「本コンテンツ」）は一般的な情報提供のみを目的としたものであり、当社は、適用される法律で認められる限りにおいて、本コンテンツの正確性、有用性、完全性を保証しないものとします。お客様が本コンテンツに依拠する場合は、お客様自身の責任において行ってください。当社は、お客様が本コンテンツのために行った作為および不作為について、またはお客様が本コンテンツを共有する相手に対して、いかなる責任も負いません。他のユーザーが本サービス上またはその他の場所で本サービスの利用について述べている記述は、本規約や本コンテンツと矛盾する場合、当社がその記述を承認していると解釈されてはなりません。本コンテンツは随時更新される可能性がありますが、そのようなコンテンツは完全または最新版ではないことがあります。当社はお客様に対して本コンテンツまたは本サービスのその他の部分を更新する義務を負いません。当社は、適用法で許容される範囲内で、お客様に事前に通知することなく、一時的または恒久的に、本コンテンツまたは本サービスの一部または全体を変更または廃止することがあります。当社は、適用法で認められる限りにおいて、本コンテンツまたは本サービスの一部または全体の変更、停止、廃止について責任を負いません。
11.2
サードパーティのサービスとコンテンツ：
当社は、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォーム上で、ユーザーおよびサードパーティ間での共有やコラボレーションを可能にする教育資料、ウェビナー、集会、プロモーション（以下、「サードパーティサービス」）へのリンクを提供することがあります。お客様がこうしたサービス上で個人情報、写真、意見、コンテンツ、その他のデータを共有する場合、自己責任で行うものとし、これらのサービスの利用は、当社のものではなく、当該サービスの利用規約およびプライバシーポリシーに従うものとします。お客様は、各サードパーティサービスの利用規約を確認し、お客様の権利およびこれらのプラットフォームがお客様のデータを使用する方法について理解しておく必要があります。当社は、サードパーティサービスに関連して生じるお客様のデータの喪失、盗難、漏洩、誤用（過失によるものを含む）について、
適用法に基づき責任を制限することができない場合を除き、一切責任を負いません。お客様がサードパーティサービスで提供される情報（以下、「サードパーティコンテンツ」）を使用する場合、自己責任で行うものとします。当社は、サードパーティコンテンツが正確、完全、真正であること、お客様の個人的な状況にとって適切であることをお客様に約束することはありません。サードパーティコンテンツには、当社が特に承認したものではない、他のユーザーから提供された情報が含まれています。
11.3
ユーザーコンテンツ：
お客様は、Worldcoinコミュニティのメンバーとして、メッセージ、データ、ソフトウェア、画像、動画、その他のコンテンツ（以下、「ユーザーコンテンツ」）を、当社が管理するメッセージボード、ブログ、ソーシャルメディアアカウント、および本サービスにおいてパブリックに利用することができる他のさまざまな場所に投稿することができます。これらのフォーラムは、当社または当社に代わってサードパーティサービスプロバイダーがホストしています。お客様は本サービスを通じて送信、アップロード、投稿、保存したすべてのユーザーコンテンツについて責任を負うものとします。お客様はご自身のユーザーコンテンツに関してすべての必要かつ適切な警告、情報を提供し、開示を行わなければなりません。当社は、お客様が本サービスを通じて送信したユーザーコンテンツについて一切責任を負いません。
11.4
ユーザーコンテンツの使用許諾：
お客様は、ユーザーコンテンツを当社に送信することにより、ユーザーコンテンツに必要なすべての権利を有していることを表明し、当社のマーケティングおよびプロモーションに関連して、また本サービスに関連するその他の正当な事業目的のために、ユーザーコンテンツのすべてまたは一部を使用、複製、配布、派生物の作成、修正、表示、実行するための永続的、世界的、非独占的、ロイヤルティフリー、サブライセンス可能、および譲渡可能なライセンスを当社に付与するものとします。当社は、お客様のユーザーコンテンツの一部またはすべておよびその派生物を、当社が選択するあらゆる媒体形式および媒体チャネルを通じて再配布することができるものとします。お客様はさらに、当社および他のユーザーに対し、本サービスを通じてお客様のユーザーコンテンツを使用、アクセス、複製、配布、修正、表示、実行するための非独占的ライセンスを付与するものとします。この第11.4項の規定は、適用法で許容される最大限の範囲内で適用されます。
11.5
ユーザーコンテンツの制限：
お客様は、次に該当するユーザーコンテンツを、本サービスを使用して投稿・送信しないこと、第三者にもそのような投稿・送信を許可しないことに同意するものとします：(a) 誹謗中傷や名誉毀損となるコンテンツ、または個人に関する私的・個人的な事柄を開示するコンテンツ、(b) 下品、猥褻、ポルノ、嫌がらせ、脅迫、虐待、憎悪、人種／民族攻撃となるコンテンツ、刑事犯罪とみなされるか民事責任を生じさせる行為を助長させるコンテンツ、または法律に違反するか不適切とみなされるコンテンツ、(c) 許可なく侵害する方法で著作物、画像、プログラム、営業秘密、機密情報、商標やサービスマークを使用するなど、他人の知的財産権を侵害するコンテンツ、あるいは (d) 他のユーザーによる本サービスの利用を不当に妨害するコンテンツ。お客様は、当社に対し、自発的にユーザーコンテンツを本サービスに投稿していることを表明するものとします。従って、掲載されるユーザーコンテンツはお客様と当社との間に雇用関係を創出するものではありません。お客様は、他のユーザーの電子メールアドレス、携帯電話番号、残高、ユーザー名、その他の個人情報を、そのユーザーの許可なく複製または使用することはできません。本サービスまたはその他のいかなる経路においても、他のユーザーに対する未承諾の電子メール、郵便物、電話、その他の通信は禁じられています。
11.6
苦情と
DMCA
削除：
本サービス上の本コンテンツまたはユーザーコンテンツにより、お客様の商標または著作権が侵害されていると思われる場合、または当社との何らかの提携や推奨を示唆する形で公開されていると思われる場合は、当社まで電子メール（legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com）でご連絡ください。その際には、件名を「［商標／著作権］の苦情」としてください。お客様の苦情が有効とみなされるために、また当社がデジタルミレニアム著作権法（以下、「DMCA」）に基づき措置を講じるために、お客様のメールには次に掲げる情報を含めることで、すべてのDMCA要件を満たさなければなりません。
お客様が侵害されたと主張する著作物または商標の明確な特定（著作物が登録されている場合はその著作権登録番号を含める）
お客様が侵害していると主張し、削除されることを希望する著作物または商標の特定
侵害の疑いのあるコンテンツを特定するためのURLまたはその他の明確な指示
お客様のメールアドレス、住所、電話番号
お客様がコンテンツの侵害を誠実に確信していること、提供する情報が正確であること、お客様がコンテンツの所有者または所有者を代理する権限を有することを証する署名入りの陳述書。
なお、故意に根拠のない侵害通知を提出する者はDMCA第512(f)条に基づき損害賠償責任を負う可能性がありますので、虚偽の請求を行わないようご注意ください。当社は、お客様が当社に提供した情報または通信内容を、第三者（侵害の疑いのあるマテリアルを本サービスにアップロードした者を含む）と共有する場合があります。
当社が善意の侵害通知を受け取った場合、当社の対応方針として、(a) 侵害コンテンツを直ちに削除またはアクセス不能にする、(b) 侵害マテリアルをアップロードした者に対し、当社が当該マテリアルを削除またはアクセス不能にしたことを通知する、および (c) 侵害コンテンツを繰り返しアップロードする者に対しては、
本サービスへのアクセスを無効化することが挙げられます。当社がそのような人物から反論通知を受け取った場合、当社はお客様にその写しを送り、10営業日以内に削除したマテリアルを復元するか無効化を中止する可能性があることを説明する場合があります。お客様が当社またはコンテンツをアップロードした者に対して裁判所命令を求める訴訟を提起しない限り、当社は、自己裁量により、反論通知の受領後10～14営業日またはそれ以降に、削除したマテリアルへのアクセスを回復します。
12. 保証の否認
12.1
お客様による本サービスのご利用は自己責任で行われるものとします。本サービス、
WLD
、コンテンツ、その他すべての知的財産は、明示、黙示、法定によるものを問わず、いかなる表明や保証もなく、「現状のまま」で「利用可能な限り」提供されます。当社は、適用法で許容される最大限の範囲内で、本サービスに含まれる機能、コンテンツ、その他の知的財産に関する権原、商品性、特定目的への適合性、非侵害の黙示保証を明確に否認します。法域によっては黙示保証の除外が認められていないことがあり、上記の規定が適用されない可能性があります。当社は、本サービスに関連して他のユーザーやサードパーティが行う広告、オファー、声明について承認、保証せず、一切責任を負いません。
12.2
当社は、
(a)
本サービスのすべてまたは一部へのアクセスが中断せず継続的に適時かつ安全に行われ、エラーフリーであること、
(b)
本サービスまたはコンテンツが正確、完全で、信頼でき、最新であること、
(c)
本サービスにウイルスその他の有害なコンポーネントが含まれていないこと、
(d)
本サービスまたはコンテンツがお客様の要件、ニーズ、期待を満たすものであることについて、いかなる表明または保証も行いません。
12.3
当社はさらに、本サービスまたは
WLD
がいかなる使用においても合法であることや、本サービスまたは
WLD
があらゆる規制やコンプライアンスのニーズに適合することについて、いかなる表明または保証も行いません。また、お客様は、本サービスや
WLD
をご利用になるときに適用されるすべての法律および規制上の制限と要件を判断し、これを遵守する責任を負うものとします。お客様は、本サービスまたは
WLD
へのアクセスおよび利用に関し、書面または口頭によるものを問わず、本規約に定める明示的な規定を別として、いかなる記述や了解事項にも依拠していないことを認め、これに同意するものとします。
12.4
当社は、金融、法律、投資、税金に関する事項について、お客様のアドバイザーとして行動することはなく、行動することもできません。いかなる内容も表示した日付時点のものです。ここに記載している予測、見積り、予想、目標、および／または意見は、リスク、不確実性、および推定に左右されて不正確となる可能性があり、予告なしに変更されることがあります。従って、いかなる内容にも依拠すべきではありません。
ここに記載されている情報の一部は、サードパーティの情報源から入手したものである可能性があります。こうした情報源は信頼できるものと思われますが、当社はその情報を独自にすべて検証したわけではなく、その正確性に関していかなる表明も行いません。当社は登録ブローカーディーラーまたは投資アドバイザーではありません。当社は、本サービスに含まれるいかなるマテリアルの正確性、適時性、完全性に関しても、明示、黙示、法定によるものを問わず、いかなる表明も行わず、一切の保証を明確に否認します。当社のコンテンツは一般的な情報のみを提供するものであり、本サービスをご利用になるかどうかの判断は、お客様ご自身の責任において行っていただきます。お客様はデジタルトークンの取引、使用、保有には本質的にリスクが伴うことを了解するものとします。お客様のウォレットにある資金をすべて失う可能性があります。お客様は、本サービスが米国法によって課される輸出規制および経済制裁の対象となる可能性があることを了解するものとします。
12.5
当社は、お客様またはいかなるサードパーティに対しても、本サービスの変更や終了、または本サービスへのお客様のアクセスの一時停止や終了について一切責任を負いません。
13. 責任の制限
13.1
当社は、それが違法となる場合には、お客様に対する当社の責任を排除・制限しません。下記の責任制限事項が認められていない国では、当社が合理的な注意と技術を用いなかったこと、またはお客様との契約に違反したことから合理的に予測される結果として生じた損失および損害についてのみ、お客様に対して責任を負います。本項の規定は、いかなる契約または合意によっても放棄または制限することができない消費者の権利には影響を及ぼしません。
13.2
お客様は、法律で許容される限りにおいて、いかなる状況においても、当社または当社の役員、取締役、従業員、請負業者、代理人、関連会社、子会社（以下、総称して「
TFH
関係者」）が、利益、営業権、使用、データ、その他の無形資産の喪失に対する損害賠償を含め、いかなる間接的、懲罰的、付随的、特別的、結果的損害賠償についても、それが不法行為かその他の根拠に基づいて主張されているかどうかを問わず、また
TFH
関係者が、次に掲げる事由に起因または関連して損害が生じる可能性について認識していたかどうかを問わず、賠償する責任を負わないことについて、同意するものとします：
(a)
お客様が本サービス、お客様のデジタルトークン、または
World Network
を利用したこと、あるいは利用できなかったこと、
(b)
本サービスへのアクセスが不可能であったこと、またはこれが終了したこと、
(c)
何らかの取引またはお客様のデータに対するハッキング、改ざん、または不正なアクセスや変更があったこと、
(d)
お客様が本サービスを通じてサードパーティと締結した取引または契約、
(e)
サードパーティの活動または伝達内容、
(f) Orb
オペレーターの行為、
(g)
デジタルトークンの価値の喪失、
(h)
本サービス上で、または本サービスを介してアクセスされるサードパーティのコンテンツ、
(i)
本コンテンツにおけるエラー、過誤、または不正確な内容、
(j)
本サービスへのアクセスまたは使用に起因するあらゆる性質の人身傷害または物的損害、
(k)
本サービスに送信されるか本サービスを介して送信されるウイルスやトロイの木馬など、
(l)
第三者の名誉毀損、攻撃、または違法行為。この責任制限条項は、損害が
TFH
または本サービスの利用か誤用、あるいはそれらへの依拠に起因するかどうかにかかわらず、また、限定的な救済の本質的な目的が達成されなかったとしても、適用法で許容される最大限の範囲内で適用されるものとします。
13.3 TFH
関係者は、いかなる場合においても、
100
米ドルを超える直接的な請求、法的手続、賠償責任、義務、損害、損失、費用について、お客様に対して責任を負いません。お客様が本サービスにご満足いただけない場合、お客様の唯一かつ排他的な救済手段は本サービスの利用中止であることに同意するものとします。この責任制限条項は、適用法で許容される最大限の範囲内で適用されます。
13.4
免責および補償：
お客様は、次に掲げる事由に起因または関連して、TFH関係者に対して第三者から請求された請求、損害、費用、債務、合理的な弁護士費用、および経費について、TFH関係者を防御し、補償し、無傷に保つことに同意するものとします：(a) お客様による本サービスの利用、(b) お客様による本規約の違反、(c) お客様による他人の権利侵害、(d) お客様による本サービスに関連する行為、または (e) お客様によるWLD、デジタルトークン、またはWorldcoinネットワークの利用。一部の法域では、消費者の補償を制限しているため、本項の補償規定の一部またはすべてがお客様に適用されない場合があります。お客様がTFH関係者のいずれかを補償する義務を負う場合、当社は、その単独の裁量により、訴訟または法的手続を管理し、和解するかどうか、またいかなる条件で和解するかを決定する権利を留保します。
お客様がカリフォルニア州にお住まいの場合、お客様はカリフォルニア州民法第1542条に基づく利益と保護を放棄するものとします。同条では次のように規定されています。「一般的な免責は、債権者または免責当事者が免責の実行時に自己に有利な請求が存在することを知らず、存在することを疑っていない場合であって、かつそのことを知っていれば債務者または被免責当事者との和解に重大な影響を与えたであろう請求には及ばない」
14. 準拠法
本契約および本契約に起因または関連して生じる紛争はすべて、カリフォルニア州の法律に準拠するものとします。本条に定める準拠法は法の抵触に関する原則を考慮せず適用されます。お客様はさらに、本サービスがカリフォルニア州のみに拠点を置くとみなされること、本サービスは他の法域でも利用可能であるが、たとえ利用可能であってもカリフォルニア州以外のいかなる裁判地においても一般人的管轄権や特別人的管轄権を生じさせないことに同意するものとします。
15. 紛争解決、仲裁、集団訴訟の放棄
15.1 以下の段落を注意してお読みください。本条において、お客様に集団訴訟の当事者となることなく、1名の仲裁人による個別の仲裁を通じて当社との紛争を解決することを要求します。仲裁合意がなされた場合、お客様が当社に対して訴訟を提起すること、または陪審裁判を受けることはできませんが、要件を満たせば、少額訴訟裁判所において訴訟を提起することはできます。
15.2 当社は、非公式の誠実な交渉を通じて、潜在的な紛争を解決するために最善の努力を払います。紛争の可能性が生じた場合、正式な紛争解決に頼ることなく解決を図るため、当社（legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com）宛に電子メールを送信してご連絡ください。当社がお客様の電子メールを受け取ってから60日以内に非公式な解決に至ることができず、お客様が本規約、本コンテンツ、または本サービスに起因または関連して連邦法または州法に基づく請求、コモンローに基づく請求、契約に基づく請求、不法行為、詐欺行為、不実表明、その他の法理論に基づく請求、またはその他の公的手続（以下、各々を「紛争」）を提起することを選択した場合、お客様は、以下の条件に従い、拘束力のある仲裁を通じて紛争を個別に解決することに同意するものとします（以下、総称して「仲裁合意」）。
仲裁は1名の仲裁人によって非公開で行われるものとします。仲裁人は適用される出訴期限およびすべての法律に従い、適用法で認められる特権の請求を尊重します。
紛争は、JAMSがJAMS簡易仲裁規則に従って行う仲裁によって唯一かつ最終的に解決されるものとします。ただし、紛争の合計額が250,000ドル以上となる場合は、JAMS包括的仲裁規則が適用されます。仲裁は、お客様と当社の双方が別の場所で行うことに合意しない限り、カリフォルニア州サンフランシスコで行われるものとします。お客様は、本契約の拘束力のある仲裁条項が執行不能であると判断された場合、カリフォルニア州サンフランシスコの連邦裁判所および州裁判所が仲裁裁定に対する控訴または裁判手続の適切な裁判所となることに同意するものとします。
いかなる仲裁においても、仲裁場所にかかわらず、当事者は互いに証拠開示を求めず、仲裁人は当事者に証拠開示を認めないものとします。代わりに、各当事者は、最終的な仲裁審理に先立ち、相互に合意した日時に自らの立場を裏付ける証拠を開示します。
この仲裁合意条項は、仲裁合意または仲裁合意の一部の執行可能性、取消可能性、範囲、および有効性、ならびに仲裁合意の解釈または適用可能性に起因または関連して生じるその他すべての紛争を対象としており、かかるすべての事項は裁判所や裁判官ではなく仲裁人によって決定されるものとします。
仲裁人または仲裁管理人が申立手数料またはその他の管理費用をお客様に課す場合、当社は、お客様が裁判所で訴訟を起こした場合に支払う必要のある手数料または費用の額を超える部分を、お客様の要請があり次第、払い戻すものとします。また、仲裁管理人の規則または適用法によって要求された場合、当社は追加料金または費用を支払います。
いずれかの当事者の要請により、すべての仲裁手続が極秘裏に実施される場合、すべての文書、証言、および記録は、当事者、各々の弁護士、および仲裁の目的のみに使用する秘密情報として受領することに事前に書面で合意した各々の専門家、コンサルタント、または証人のみが閲覧可能な封印された秘密状態で、仲裁人により受領、聴取、保管されるものとします。
この仲裁合意条項で議論されている集団訴訟手続および救済措置以外に、仲裁人は裁判所で行使可能なあらゆる救済手段を認める権限を有します。
仲裁人が下した裁定に対する決定は、管轄権を有する裁判所において執行することができます。
この仲裁合意条項に含まれる仲裁要件、集団訴訟の禁止、および第三者のために提起されるその他の紛争に関するいずれかの規定が執行不能であることが判明した場合、執行不能な規定のみが本規約から削除されたものとみなし、本規約に含まれる残りの義務はすべて引き続き効力を持つものとします。
15.3 30
日間のオプトアウト権：
お客様は、申し込みを設定する際にお客様が使用したメールアドレスからlegalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com宛に電子メールを送信することにより、この仲裁合意条項に拘束されることなく、オプトアウトする権利を有します。その場合、メールの件名は「仲裁および集団訴訟の放棄に関するオプトアウト」としてください。お客様は、本規約に同意されてから30日以内に電子メールを送信する必要があります。送信しない場合は、仲裁合意条項の規定に従って紛争を仲裁することに拘束されます。お客様が仲裁合意条項をオプトアウトした場合、当社も仲裁合意条項に拘束されないことになります。
15.4
仲裁合意条項の変更：
当社が本規約の「
紛争解決、仲裁、集団訴訟の放棄
」と題する条項を変更する場合、30日前までにお客様に通知します。変更は、お客様が当社から通知を受け取ってから30日後に有効となります。「
紛争解決、仲裁、集団訴訟の放棄
」条項の変更内容は、この30日という期間が経過した後で発生する紛争のみに適用されます。裁判所または仲裁人が本条項の変更が執行不能または無効であると判断した場合、当該変更は本規約から切り離され、お客様が本サービスの利用を開始した後に有効であった最初の仲裁合意条項が適用されるものとします。お客様は、上記の「30日間のオプトアウト権」条項に記載されている手順に従って、新しい仲裁合意条項からオプトアウトする権利を行使することができます。
この仲裁合意条項は本規約の終了後およびお客様による本サービスの利用終了後も存続するものとします。
仲裁合意条項のいずれの規定にもかかわらず、いずれの当事者も、上記で述べた仲裁や非公式の紛争解決手続を開始する前に、本サービスの不正使用や悪用もしくは知的財産権（商標、営業秘密、著作権、特許権など）の侵害を阻止するために差止命令による救済のみを求める訴訟を提起することができます。
16. 総則
16.1
権利の不放棄、契約の可分性、譲渡の禁止：
当社がいずれかの規定を執行しなかったとしても、それ以降に行使する権利を放棄するものではありません。いずれかの規定が執行不能であると判断された場合、本規約の残りの規定は引き続き有効であり、執行不能となった規定は、適用法で許容される範囲内で、当社の意図を可能な限り反映した有効な規定と置き換えられるものとします。お客様は本規約に基づくいかなる権利も譲渡することは禁じられており、いかなる試みも無効とみなされます。当社は、当社の権利をその関連会社もしくは子会社、または本サービスに関連する事業の利益継承者に譲渡することができるものとします。
16.2
完全合意：
本規約は、本サービスに関するお客様と当社との完全かつ排他的な合意を構成するものであり、本サービスに関する過去および同時期の書面および口頭によるすべての会了解事項、合意、表明、および保証に優先します。本規約の各条項の見出しは便宜上のものであり、条項の意味または解釈を規定するものではありません。
16.3
存続条項：
本規約における一時停止と終了、TFHに対する債務、本サービスの一般的な利用、TFHとの紛争に関する条項、ならびにその性質上本規約の満了または終了後も適用される条項はすべて、本規約の終了または満了後も存続するものとします。
16.4
両当事者の関係：
本規約のいずれの規定も、お客様およびTFHをパートナー、合弁事業、またはその他の営利を目的とする共同事業者として取り扱うものとはみなされず、またみなされることを意図したものではありません。また、お客様とTFHのいずれも、他方当事者の代理人として扱われることはありません。これには、本規約のいずれの規定も、お客様とTFHとの間に雇用関係を成立させるものではなく、また成立させることを意図していないということが含まれます。
16.5
専門的助言および受託者義務の不存在：
当社が提供するすべてのコンテンツは、情報提供のみを目的としたものであり、専門的なアドバイスとして解釈されるべきものではありません。お客様は、本サービスに含まれる情報に基づいて行動を起こすべきではなく、そうすることを控えなくてはなりません。お客様には、本サービスまたは任意のデジタルトークンに関する財務上、法律上、またはその他の決定を下す前に、適切な分野における免許や資格を有する個人から独立した専門家としてのアドバイスを求めることをお勧めします。本規約は、当社の受託者義務を創出して課すことを意図したものではなく、実際に課すものでもありません。お客様は、適用法で許容される最大限の範囲内で、当社がお客様またはその他の当事者に対して受託者としての義務や責任を負わないこと、およびコモンロー上または衡平法上そのような義務や責任が存在する可能性がある限りにおいて、かかる義務や責任は取消不能の形で否認、放棄、排除されることを了解し、同意するものとします。お客様はさらに、当社がお客様に対して負う責任と義務は、本規約に明示的に定められているものに限られることに同意するものとします。
16.6
支配権の変更：
当社が第三者事業体によって買収されるか合併した場合、または当社がお客様の最善の利益になると判断した関連事業体、後継事業体、またはその他の事業体に何らかの部門を譲渡した場合、当社は、こうした状況のいずれにおいても、適用法に従って、かかる合併、買収、売却、またはその他の支配権の変更の一環として、当社がお客様から収集した情報を譲渡または移転する権利を留保します。
16.7
不可抗力：
当社は、デジタルトークンにおける著しい市場の変動、天災、民事または軍事当局の措置、テロリスト活動、内乱、戦争、ストライキ、医療に関わる緊急事態、労働争議、火災、電気通信／インターネットサービス／ネットワークプロバイダーサービスの中断、機器やソフトウェアの障害、その他当社の合理的な支配を超える原因または状況（以下、各々を「不可抗力事由」）から直接または間接的に生じる遅延、不履行、サービスの中断について一切責任を負いません。不可抗力事由の発生は本規約の残りの条項の有効性および執行可能性に影響を及ぼすことはありません。
16.8
アプリストア：
お客様がアップル社のApp Store以外のアプリストア（Google Play Storeなど）または配信プラットフォーム（以下、「配信プラットフォーム」）から本アプリをダウンロードする場合、以下の規定について同意するものとします：
本規約は、お客様と当社との間のものであり、配信プラットフォームの提供者（以下、「ストアプロバイダー」）との間のものではありません。お客様が本アプリをご利用になる場合、ストアプロバイダーのその時点における最新の配信プラットフォーム利用規約を遵守する必要があります。このストアプロバイダーは、お客様が本アプリを取得する配信プラットフォームを提供する者に過ぎません。
従って、ストアプロバイダーではなく、当社のみが、本アプリに関する責任を負います。
ストアプロバイダーは、本アプリや本規約に関して、お客様に対していかなる義務または責任も負わないものとします。
お客様は、ストアプロバイダーが本アプリに関連して本規約における第三者受益者であることを了解し、同意するものとします。
16.9
アップル社の
App Store
：
本項の規定は、本アプリがアップル社のApp Storeから取得された場合に適用されます。お客様は、本規約がお客様と当社との間のみのものであり、Apple, Inc.（以下、「アップル社」）との間のものではないこと、またアップル社が本アプリやそのコンテンツに一切責任を負わないことを了解し、同意するものとします。お客様が本アプリをご利用になる場合、App Store利用規約を遵守する必要があります。
お客様は、アップル社が本アプリに関するメンテナンスやサポートサービスを提供する義務を一切負わないことを了解するものとします。本アプリが適用される保証に適合しない場合、お客様は、アップル社に通知して、該当する場合には、本アプリの購入価格の払い戻しを受けることができます。アップル社は、適用法で許容される最大限の範囲内で、本アプリに関する他のいかなる保証義務も負わないものとし、保証への不適合に起因するその他の請求、損失、債務、損害、費用、経費は、本規約および本アプリの提供者である当社に適用される法律にのみ準拠するものとします。
お客様は、アップル社が、本アプリまたはお客様による本アプリの所有や利用に関連して生じるお客様または第三者の請求に対処する責任を負わないことを了解するものとします。かかる請求の主な例としては、(i) 製造物責任に基づく請求、(ii) 本アプリが適用法規の要件に適合していない旨の請求、(iii) 消費者保護法や類似の法律に基づく請求が挙げられます。お客様は、こうした請求がすべて、本規約および本アプリの提供者である当社に適用される法律のみに準拠することを了解するものとします。
お客様は、本アプリまたはお客様による本アプリの所有や利用が第三者の知的財産権を侵害しているとして、当該第三者の請求が発生した場合、アップル社ではなくTFHのみが、本規約で義務付けられている範囲内で、かかる知的財産権侵害の請求に対する調査、防御、和解、免責を行う責任を負うことについて了解するものとします。
お客様は、(i) 米国政府の禁輸措置対象国および米国政府が指定する「テロ支援国」に所在していないこと、および (ii) 米国政府の取引禁止／制限対象者リストにも記載されていないことを表明し、保証するものとします。
お客様とTFHは、アップル社およびアップル社の子会社が、本アプリにおけるお客様のライセンスに関連して利用規約の第三者受益者であること、さらに、お客様が利用規約の条件を受諾すると同時に、アップル社が第三者受益者として本アプリにおけるお客様のライセンスに関連して利用規約を執行する権利を有すること（同時に当該権利を受諾したとみなされること）を了解し、同意するものとします。
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity
사용자
이용약관
World App에 오신 것을 환영합니다! 델라웨어 법인인 Tools for Humanity Corporation(이하 “TFH” 또는 “당사”)과 귀하 간에 체결된 본 약관은 World App 및 오퍼레이터 앱을 포함한 당사의 웹사이트 및 애플리케이션(이하 “앱”으로 통칭)과 World Network(이하 “World Network”) 및 생태계와 관련하여 당사가 귀하에게 제공하는 모든 관련 기능, 콘텐츠 및 서비스(이하 “서비스” 또는 “당사 서비스”로 통칭)에 대한 귀하의 사용 및 액세스를 규율합니다.
서비스를 사용하거나 액세스하기 전에 본 약관을 주의깊게 읽어 보십시오. 본 약관에 대한 귀하의 명시적 동의와 더불어, 당사가 제공하는 서비스에 액세스하거나 이를 사용함으로써 귀하는 본 약관 및 본 약관의 일부로 통합된 당사의 개인정보 보호 고지의 구속력을 적용받다는 데 명시적으로 동의합니다. 본 약관의 특히 중요한 부분은 다음과 같습니다.
귀하는
법원이
아닌
구속력
있는
중재를
통해
귀하와
TFH
간의
모든
분쟁을
해결하는
데
동의합니다
.
귀하가
대한민국에
거주하는
경우
,
대신
관할
현지
법원에서
분쟁을
해결하기로
선택할
수
있습니다
.
자세한
내용은
아래
섹션
15
를
검토하십시오
.
디지털
토큰을
포함한
암호화폐
상품은
대부분
규제를
받지
않으며
매우
위험할
수
있습니다
.
이러한
거래로
인한
손실에
대해서는
규제상의
구제
수단이
없을
수
있습니다
.
본
서비스의
어떠한
내용도
증권
또는
디지털
토큰의
매도
제안
또는
매수
제안
권유를
구성하지
않습니다
.
서비스는
투자
자문에
해당하지
않습니다
.
디지털
토큰
(
아래
섹션
2.1
에
정의
)
을
보유
,
구매
또는
판매하는
것은
귀하가
거주하는
곳에서
허용되지
않을
수
있으며
,
모든
관련
법률을
준수하는
것은
귀하의
책임입니다
.
디지털
토큰을
구매
,
판매
,
사용
또는
보유하는
것이
귀하의
재정
상황과
디지털
토큰에
대한
이해에
비추어
귀하에게
적합한지
고려하십시오
.
디지털
토큰의
가치는
빠르게
변할
수
있으며
모든
가치를
잃을
수
있습니다
.
또한
, Worldcoin
토큰
(“WLD”)
은
미국
시민
,
거주자
또는
미국에
거주하는
개인을
포함한
미국인
,
또는
미국에
설립
,
위치
또는
주재하거나
미국에
등록된
대리인이
있는
회사가
사용
,
구매
또는
액세스할
수
있도록
의도되지
않았습니다
.
당사는
그러한
미국인에게
WLD
를
제공하지
않습니다
.
또한
귀하는
WLD
를
미국인에게
판매
,
이체
또는
제공하지
않을
것에
동의합니다
. WLD
와
관련된
위험에
대한
추가
정보는
여기에서
확인할
수
있습니다
.
1. 약관의
범위
1.1
개인정보
보호
및
귀하의
데이터
.
앱에 액세스할 때 귀하는 이름 또는 전화번호와 같은 범주의 개인정보를 당사에 제공할 수 있습니다. Proof of personhood (인격증명)를 증명하고 WLD 토큰을 청구하기 위해 정보를 제공하는 경우 생체인식 정보와 같은 특별 범주의 민감한 개인 데이터를 제공할 수 있습니다. 당사의 개인정보보호 고지는 당사가 귀하로부터 수집하는 데이터와 그 사용 방법에 대해 설명합니다. 당사가 개인정보보호 고지에 설명된 방식으로 귀하의 데이터를 수집하거나 사용하는 것을 원하지 않는 경우 서비스를 사용하지 마십시오.
1.2
자격
.
당사의 서비스를 설명하는 웹페이지는 전 세계에서 액세스할 수 있지만, 모든 서비스 또는 서비스 기능이 귀하의 국가에서 합법적이거나 사용할 수 있음을 의미하지는 않습니다. 귀하는 제한 사항을 회피하기 위한 목적으로 VPN 또는 유사한 도구를 사용할 수 없습니다. 귀하가 당사 서비스를 사용하는 지역에서 당사 서비스를 사용하는 것이 합법적인지 확인하는 것은 귀하의 책임입니다. 당사의 서비스는 모든 언어로 제공되는 것은 아닙니다. 당사의 서비스는 귀하가 서비스를 사용하는 지역에서 합법적입니다. 당사의 서비스는 일부 언어로는 제공되지 않습니다. 서비스를 이용하려면 본 약관과 모든 관련 법률을 준수해야 합니다. 귀하는 당사의 서비스를 이용하여 불법적이거나 불법적인 활동을 수행하거나, 홍보하거나, 타인이 수행하도록 도울 수 없습니다.
또한 다음 기준을 모두 충족해야 합니다.
만 18세 이상, 그리고
다음 지역에 위치하거나, 그 통제 하에 있거나, 다음 국가의 국민 또는 거주자가
아님
. 시리아, 크리미아, 우크라이나의 도네츠크, 루한스크, 헤르손, 자포리자 지역, 러시아, 북한, 이란, 쿠바 또는 미국, 유럽연합 또는 기타 국가나 관할권이 서비스 액세스를 제한한 기타 국가나 지역,
귀하는 미국 재무부 해외자산통제국(“OFAC”) 또는 기타 국가의 제재 목록에 의해 선언된 “특별지정제재대상(Specially Designated National)”이 아니며, 귀하의 이름이 미국 상무부의 거래 부적격자 목록(Denied Persons List) 또는 기타 국가의 금지 대상자 목록에 등재되어 있지 않습니다.
이러한 요구 사항을 모두 충족하지 않을 경우 서비스에 액세스하거나 서비스를 사용할 수 없으며, 따라서 당사는 서비스에 액세스하거나 서비스를 사용할 수 있는 귀하의 능력을 제한할 수 있습니다.
또한 독일에 설립되거나 소재하거나 독일에 일반 거주지나 등록 사무소가 있는 경우, 섹션 2.5의 의미 내에서 제3자 서비스에 액세스하거나 이를 사용하거나 섹션 2.8항 의미 내에서 탈중앙화 애플리케이션을 사용할 수 없습니다. 이러한 기능은 사용할 수 없습니다.
1.3
가용성
. 서비스를 설명하는 웹페이지는 전 세계에서 액세스할 수 있지만, 모든 서비스 또는 서비스 기능이 귀하의 국가에서 합법적이거나 사용할 수 있음을 의미하지는 않습니다. 특정 국가에서 특정 서비스(또는 특정 서비스 기능)에 대한 액세스는 당사 또는 정부에 의해 차단될 수 있습니다. 귀하는 제한 사항을 회피하기 위한 목적으로 VPN 또는 유사한 도구를 사용할 수 없습니다. 앱 및 앱 내의 특정 기능에 대한 액세스는 사용자의 위치에 따라 이용 불가능하거나 제한될 수 있습니다.
귀하가
당사
서비스를
사용하는
지역에서
당사
서비스를
사용하는
것이
합법적인지
확인하는
것은
귀하의
책임입니다
.
서비스는 일부 언어로 제공되지 않습니다.
1.4
업데이트
. 당사는 수시로 본 약관을 변경할 수 있습니다. 이렇게 할 경우, 당사는 서비스에서 업데이트된 약관을 이용할 수 있게 하며, 관련 법률에서 요구하는 경우, 당사는 변경하기 전에 귀하에게 통지하고, 그러한 변경이 귀하에게 특히 중대하거나 불리할 수 있는 경우, 당사는 관련 법률에서 요구하는 경우 추가 사전 통지를 제공합니다. 귀하는 당사가 그러한 변경을 한 후 귀하가 서비스를 계속 사용하고, 귀하가 이에 대해 구체적으로 이의를 제기하지 않은 경우 업데이트된 약관에 동의하는 것으로 간주됨을 이해하고 이에 동의합니다. 귀하는 본 약관에 동의하지 않는 경우 언제든지 서비스 사용을 중단할 수 있습니다. 서비스는 시간이 지남에 따라 진화하기 때문에 당사는 언제든지 통지 없이, 당사의 단독 재량으로, 해당 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서 서비스의 전부 또는 일부를 변경하거나 중단할 수 있습니다.
1.5
추가
조건
.
특정 애플리케이션, 콘텐츠, 기능 또는 서비스의 일부에 추가 약관이 적용될 수 있으며, 당사가 귀하에게 제공하는 이러한 모든 추가 약관은 본 약관의 일부를 구성합니다.
2. 서비스
2.1
비수탁
가상화폐지갑
.
World App에는 지원되는 암호화폐, 디지털 통화 또는 디지털 토큰(WLD 및 총칭하여 “디지털 토큰”)을 보유하기 위한 비호스팅 및 비수탁 가상화폐지갑이 포함됩니다. 귀하는 귀하의 가상화폐지갑에 보유한 디지털 토큰을 제어합니다. World App을 사용하면 개인 키(디지털 토큰에 액세스하기 위한 암호를 나타냄)가 장치에 직접 저장됩니다. 귀하는 언제든지 인터넷 액세스 및 블록체인의 혼잡 여부에 따라 디지털 토큰을 다른 블록체인 주소로 전송하여 이를 철회할 수 있습니다. 지갑에 디지털 토큰을 보유할 때 당사는 귀하의 가상화폐지갑, 디지털 토큰 또는 개인 키에 대한 통제권을 유지하지 않습니다. 사용자는 개인 키 손실 위험에 대한 책임이 있으며 TFH와 World App은 이러한 키를 복구할 수 없습니다.
World App은 비수탁 가상화폐지갑이므로, 해당 블록체인에서 디지털 토큰이 어디에 보관되는지를 지정하는 지갑 주소가 제공됩니다. 당사는 귀하의 디지털 토큰에 액세스할 수 없습니다.
2.2
지원되는
디지털
토큰
.
World App은 특정 ERC-20 토큰을 지원합니다. 향후에 추가 디지털 토큰에 대한 지원을 추가할 수 있습니다. World App은 지원되는 디지털 토큰을 표시합니다.
디지털
토큰을
입금하거나
출금하기
전에
World App
에서
지원되는
토큰과
네트워크를
확인하십시오
.
지원되지
않는
토큰을
보내거나
잘못된
가상화폐지갑
주소로
디지털
토큰을
보내는
경우
디지털
토큰을
복구할
수
없습니다
.
지원되지 않는 디지털 토큰을 World App 가상화폐지갑 주소로 보내면 해당 디지털 토큰에 대한 액세스 권한이 완전히 상실될 수 있음을 이해합니다. 당사는 디지털 토큰을 복구할 방법이 없습니다. 항상 올바른 디지털 토큰을 올바른 가상화폐지갑 주소로 전송해야 합니다. 소량의 디지털 토큰으로 거래를 테스트할 수 있습니다.
2.3
제공
및
접근
.
귀하가 서비스를 사용하여 디지털 토큰을 다른 가상화폐지갑 주소로 전송하거나 분산 애플리케이션에 연결하는 등 디지털 토큰과 상호 작용할 때, 귀하는 시작 프로세스 동안 귀하가 식별한 장치를 통해 상호 작용을 승인하거나 “서명”해야 합니다. 앱은 관련 블록체인과의 상호 작용을 시작하기 위해 이러한 장치의 승인을 전적으로 신뢰합니다. 귀하는 이러한 상호 작용을 수행할 때 귀하가 관련 블록체인과 직접 상호 작용하고 있으며, 당사는 귀하를 대신하여 주문을 전송할 책임이 없음을 이해합니다.
2.4
제
3
자로부터의
정보
.
서비스를 이용함으로써 귀하는 디지털 토큰과 관련된 정보에 접근할 수 있으며, 여기에는 현재 시장 가치가 포함되나 이에 국한되지 않습니다. 서비스와 관련하여 제공되는 특정 기능이 이러한 제3자 제품의 사용을 필요로 하는 경우에도, 이 정보의 제시는 제3자와의 어떠한 연관성 또는 제3자에 대한 보증을 의미하지 않습니다. 서비스를 통해 명시된 이러한 제3자 서비스 및 제품의 콘텐츠는 당사에 공개된 정보 또는 그러한 제3자가 제공한 정보를 기반으로 하며, 따라서 당사는 그러한 제3자 서비스 또는 제품 관련 정보의 정확성에 대해 어떠한 진술이나 보증도 하지 않습니다.
2.5
제
3
자
서비스
독일에
설립되거나
소재하거나
독일에
일반
거주지나
등록
사무소가
있는
사용자는
제
3
자
서비스를
사용하여
본
섹션에
따라
디지털
토큰을
판매하거나
교환할
수
없습니다
.
이용 가능한 경우, 서비스는 귀하에게 디지털 토큰의 법정화폐 구매, 디지털 토큰 판매, 디지털 토큰 교환 및 향후 이용 가능할 수 있는 기타 기능과 같은 거래를 처리하기 위한 제3자 프로세서 링크를 제공할 수 있습니다. World App에서 어떤 제3자 서비스를 이용할 수 있는지 확인할 수 있습니다. 이러한 거래를 수행할 때 귀하는 당사가 아닌 제3자와 거래를 하는 것입니다. 귀하는 제3자 제공자가 제공한 관련 지침을 따르고 서비스 약관에 동의해야 합니다. 당사는 당사 서비스를 제공하는 동안 또는 귀하가 제3자 서비스에 액세스할 때 귀하의 자금 또는 디지털 토큰을 통제하거나 전송하지 않습니다.
2.6 P2P(
개인
간
)
거래
.
서비스는 귀하 또는 제3자가 통제하는지 여부와 관계없이 귀하가 다른 블록체인 가상화폐지갑으로부터 지원되는 디지털 토큰을 전송하거나 요청, 수신 및 저장할 수 있는 통신 플랫폼을 제공합니다. 지원되는 디지털 토큰을 귀하의 다른 블록체인 가상화폐지갑과 제3자 간에 전송하는 것은 이체입니다. 이체를 개시하는 당사자는 거래를 적절히 실행할 전적인 책임이 있으며, 여기에는 특히 거래가 성공하기 위해 충분한 네트워크 또는 채굴자 수수료의 지급이 포함될 수 있습니다. 불충분한 네트워크 수수료는 이체를 보류 상태로 유지할 수 있으며, 거래 개시 오류의 결과로 발생하는 지연 또는 손실을 초래할 수 있습니다. 당사는 그러한 거래의 시정을 지원할 의무가 없습니다. 귀하가 가상화폐지갑에서 다른 블록체인 가상화폐지갑으로 디지털 토큰을 보내는 경우, 그러한 전송은 당사가 통제하지 않고 귀하가 체인으로 실행합니다. 모든 거래 정보를 제출하기 전에 인증해야 합니다. 당사는 귀하가 잘못된 블록체인 목적지 주소를 입력하는 경우 어떠한 책임도 지지 않습니다. 디지털 토큰 전송은 네트워크 오퍼레이터가 거래를 처리하는 동안 보류 상태에 있을 수 있고 그에 따라 지정될 수 있지만 관련 블록체인 네트워크로 브로드캐스트된 후에는 되돌릴 수 없습니다. 당사는 네트워크를 제어하지 않으며, 네트워크에 의해 이체가 확인될 것이라는 보장을 하지 않습니다.
2.7
볼트
2.7.1
일반
정보
.
World App은 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 위한 탈중앙화된 “볼트”(“볼트”)에 대한 사용자 인터페이스를 제공합니다. 귀하가 볼트를 사용하는 것은 볼트에 적용되는 약관뿐만 아니라 볼트 사용과 관련하여 또는 볼트 사용으로 인해 생성되는 기능을 개발하거나 제공하는 제3자가 제공하는 추가 약관을 인정하고 수락하는 것으로 간주됩니다.
볼트는 특정 디지털 토큰만 지원합니다. 이러한 디지털 토큰은 유럽연합(EU)의 암호자산시장에 관한 규정(Regulation (EU) 2023/1114 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 31 May 2023 on markets in crypto-assets, MiCA)에서 정한 조건에 따라 자산준거토큰(Asset Referenced Tokens) 또는 이머니토큰(E-Money Tokens)으로 인정되지 않습니다. 지원되는 디지털 토큰은 볼트에 액세스할 때 World App에 표시됩니다. 볼트에서 지원하는 디지털 토큰은 수시로 변경될 수 있으며, 지원되는 디지털 토큰이 볼트에서 계속 사용 가능하다는 보장은 없습니다.
볼트는 제3자 스마트 계약과 관련하여 제공됩니다. 귀하 외에 다른 사람이나 단체는 귀하의 볼트 또는 볼트 내 디지털 토큰과 상호 작용할 수 없습니다. TFH나 제3자는 귀하의 볼트 또는 관련 스마트 계약에 대한 관리 키 또는 액세스(권한 또는 기타)를 갖고 있지 않습니다. 귀하 계정의 디지털 토큰을 볼트에 입금하거나 볼트에서 출금하는 것은 본 약관의 섹션 2.1에 설명된 해당 개인 키로 해당 거래에 서명하는 경우에만 가능합니다. 이는 귀하가 개인 키에 대한 액세스 또는 통제권을 상실하는 경우 볼트에서 디지털 토큰을 입금 또는 출금할 수 없으며, 다른 당사자가 귀하를 지원하거나 귀하를 대신하여 이를 수행할 수 없음을 의미합니다. 따라서 귀하가 볼트를 사용한다고 해서 귀하의 계정에서 볼트를 사용하여 잠글 수 있는 디지털 토큰에 대해 TFH 또는 기타 제3자가 보관, 위탁 또는 이체 서비스를 제공하는 것은 아니며, 제공할 수도 없습니다.
WLD 토큰의 볼트 기능을 관리하는 스마트 계약은 여기에서 블록체인을 사용하여 확인할 수 있습니다. 명확하게 설명하자면, 이러한 기능 및 기타 관련된 볼트 기능의 사용에는 본 약관의 섹션 12에 포함된 동일한 보증 부인 조항이 적용됩니다.
2.7.2
볼트
기능
. 볼트는 현재 잠금, 수익, 출금 및 보안 기간, 금고에 대한 grant와 같은 기능을 제공하며, 이러한 기능은 TFH 또는 제3자에 의해 변경, 제거 또는 추가될 수 있습니다.
2.7.3
잠금
(Locking)
. 볼트를 사용함으로써 귀하는 일정 기간 동안 디지털 토큰을 잠그는 데 동의하게 됩니다. 볼트를 사용하여 디지털 토큰을 잠그면 해당 디지털 토큰이 비수탁 가상화폐지갑에서 탈중앙화된 스마트 계약으로 이체됩니다. 이체가 완료되면 해당 디지털 토큰은 볼트에서 “잠금” 상태가 되며, 여기에는 아래에 더 자세히 설명되어 있는 “보안 기간”이라고 하는 사전 결정된 기간과 함께 볼트에 입금되어 있는 기간이 포함됩니다. 디지털 토큰이 잠겨 있는 동안에는, 귀하가 출금을 요청한 후 해당 보안 기간이 경과할 때까지 디지털 토큰을 사용하여 다른 거래에 액세스하거나 이체하거나 기타 거래를 수행할 수 없습니다. TFH 또는 제3자 제공자를 포함한 그 누구도 잠금 상태인 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 잠금 해제, 수탁, 통제, 출금 또는 이체할 수 있는 권한이 없습니다. 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 볼트에 넣고 잠금 및 출금 제한을 적용하는 것은 디지털 토큰에 대한 권리, 소유권 또는 이권을 TFH 또는 기타 제3자에게 판매, 대여 또는 양도하는 것으로 간주되지 않습니다.
디지털 토큰을 볼트에 잠가두는 것이 디지털 토큰의 보호 또는 보관을 보장하는 것은 아닙니다. 귀하의 디지털 토큰에는 예금 보험 제도 또는 이와 유사한 보호 장치가 적용되지 않으며, 귀하가 잠근 디지털 토큰의 가치 및/또는 유용성은 보안 기간 동안 증가하거나 감소할 수 있습니다. 이는 귀하가 볼트에 잠근 디지털 토큰의 가치 또는 유용성이 보안 기간 동안 감소하거나 0이 될 수 있음을 의미합니다. 귀하는 해당 보안 기간 이후에 귀하의 계정에서 디지털 토큰을 출금할 경우 귀하가 볼트에 디지털 토큰을 잠글 당시보다 가치가 낮거나 가치가 없는 디지털 토큰이 반환될 수 있으며, TFH나 제3자가 가치 하락에 대한 책임 또는 위험을 부담하지 않는다는 것을 인정하고 이에 동의합니다.
2.7.4
수익
(Yield)
. 또한 귀하는 본 상품의 목적상 귀하의 볼트에 있는 특정 디지털 토큰에 대해 “수익”이라고 하는 것을 생성할 자격이 있을 수 있습니다. 추가 디지털 토큰의 형태를 취할 수 있는 이 수익은 귀하가 World App 내에서 제공되는 인터페이스를 사용하여 액세스할 수 있는 일련의 별도 스마트 계약 작업을 통해 제3자가 제공합니다. TFH 또는 제3자는 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 사용하거나, 통제하거나, 이에 대한 크레딧을 받거나, 달리 처분하지 않습니다. 따라서 수익은 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 제공된 약관 및 명세 사항에 따라 잠그는 것 이외의 다른 것에 의해 생성되거나 연계된 이자가 아닙니다. 귀하가 받을 수 있는 모든 수익은 볼트를 사용하여 디지털 토큰을 저장하기로 한 귀하의 결정에 따라 제3자가 귀하에게 Grant로 제공합니다. 생성되는 양 또는 발생하는 기간을 포함하여 수익 생성을 결정하는 명세 사항은 제3자 제공자의 재량에 따라 언제든지 변경되거나 취소될 수 있습니다.
얻을 수 있는 수익에 최대 한도가 있을 수 있습니다. 이러한 세부 정보는 수익을 제공하는 제3자(World App 내에서 “제공자”로 식별됨)가 제공하는 추가 약관을 통해 귀하의 볼트와 함께 표시됩니다. 이러한 추가 약관은 본 약관에도 통합되어 있습니다. TFH는 수익을 제공하거나 서비스하지 않습니다.
발생하는 모든 수익은 볼트에서 수익을 생성하는 디지털 토큰의 출금이 완료된 경우에만 귀하에게 교부되며, 이는 해당 보안 기간이 만료된 후에만 이루어집니다. 이 출금은 수익 Grant를 교부받는 최종 조건이므로, 귀하는 비수탁 가상화폐지갑에 수익이 입금될 때까지 생성된 수익 또는 생성될 수익에 대해 어떠한 권리, 소유권 또는 이권도 갖지 않습니다. 이는 또한 귀하가 개인 키에 대한 액세스나 통제권을 상실할 경우, 수익을 수령할 자격을 주는 출금을 할 수 없다는 의미이기도 합니다.
2.7.5
출금
(Withdrawal)
및
보안
기간
(Security Period)
. 귀하는 언제든지 볼트에서 디지털 토큰 출금을 시작할 수 있습니다. 귀하가 볼트에서 출금을 요청한 디지털 토큰은 “보안 기간”이라는 사전 설정된 기간이 경과한 후 귀하에게 반환됩니다. 볼트에서 디지털 토큰 출금을 시작할 때마다 새로운 보안 기간이 시작되고 해당 디지털 토큰이 귀하에게 반환될 때까지 시간이 카운트다운됩니다. 이 기간 동안, 귀하가 출금하기로 선택한 디지털 토큰은 잠금 상태로 유지되며 출금을 취소할 수도 있습니다. 보안 기간이 경과하면 출금이 완료되며, 발생했을 수 있는 생성된 수익과 함께 디지털 토큰이 귀하의 가상화폐지갑으로 이체됩니다. 보안 기간은 귀하가 볼트에 액세스할 때 World App에 명시됩니다.
2.7.6
금고에
대한
Grants(Grants to Vault)
. 이 기능을 선택하면 WLD Grant를 귀하의 가상화폐지갑 대신 계정의 볼트로 직접 자동 전송할 수 있습니다. 이 설정은 언제든지 변경할 수 있습니다.
2.7.7 TFH
및
볼트
. 이 기능에 대한 액세스는 World App을 통해 가능합니다. 그러나, TFH는 관련 데이터를 읽고 귀하에게 표시할 수만 있을 뿐입니다. TFH는 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 이체, 출금 또는 입금할 수 없으며 귀하의 볼트에 액세스할 수 없습니다.
2.8
탈중앙화
애플리케이션
본
섹션은
독일에
설립되거나
소재하거나
일반
거주지
또는
등록
사무소를
둔
사용자에게는
적용되지
않습니다
.
가능한
경우
,
당사는 귀하가 가상화폐지갑을 다양한 탈중앙화 애플리케이션에 연결할 수 있는 기능을 가질 수 있습니다. 귀하는 이러한 제3자 애플리케이션의 안전과 보안을 보장할 전적인 책임이 있습니다. 당사는 제3자 애플리케이션에 대한 통제권이 없으며 제3자 애플리케이션과 연결할 때 발생할 수 있는 문제에 대한 지원을 제공할 수 없습니다.
2.9
사용자
지원
. 당사는 서비스와 관련된 특정 기능에 대한 지원을 위해 사용자 지원을 제공합니다. 연락하려면 앱 내 메뉴 또는 support@toolsforhumanity.com을 통해 “지원”을 선택하십시오.
2.10 World ID
인터페이스
. TFH가 아닌 Worldcoin 재단은 World ID 프로토콜을 관리하고, World ID를 인증하기 위해 Orb 관련 데이터 처리를 통제합니다. 당사는 서비스를 통해 귀하의 World ID를 (인터페이스로) 귀하에게 제공할 수 있습니다. World ID 프로토콜을 사용하면 개인정보를 보호하면서도 실존하고 고유한 사람임을 증명할 수 있습니다.
2.11
초대
프로그램
. 이용 가능한 경우, 당사는 “초대” 기능을 귀하에게 제공할 수 있습니다. 초대를 사용하면 친구와 가족을 초대하여 World App을 다운로드하고 World ID 인증을 받을 수 있습니다. 초대를 사용하는 경우 다음 이용 약관에 동의하게 됩니다.
초대 참여에 대한 보상은 World Assets Limited에서 제공합니다. World Assets Limited는 단독 재량으로 World ID를 성공적으로 인증한 사용자를 초대한 것에 대한 보상을 제공할 수 있습니다. 보상을 받으려면 특정 조건을 충족해야 하며, 이는 World App에서 설명됩니다. World App을 추천할 수 있는 사용자 수에는 최대 한도가 있습니다. 이 한도는 World App에 표시됩니다.
초대 기능에 참여하기 위해 구매할 필요는 없습니다. 초대는 개인적, 비상업적 용도로만 사용할 수 있습니다. 귀하는 합법적인 목적을 위해서만 선의로 초대 기능을 사용할 수 있습니다. 귀하는 (a) 기만적, 사기적 또는 불법적인 방식으로 초대 또는 서비스를 이용하거나, (b) 당사의 브랜드, 영업권 또는 평판을 훼손하기 위해 어떠한 행위를 하거나, (c) 요청하지 않았거나 승인되지 않은 광고 또는 홍보 자료를 전송하거나, (d) 허위 또는 오해의 소지가 있는 주장을 하거나, (e) 유료 검색, 유료 미디어 또는 기타 유사한 활동을 이용하여 초대를 통해 사용자를 유도하거나, (f) 다른 사용자로부터 개인정보를 얻기 위해 초대를 이용할 수 없습니다.
초대는 일부 국가 또는 지역에서는 사용할 수 없으며 모든 사용자가 사용할 수 있는 것은 아닙니다. 이 기능의 전부 또는 일부가 법적 요건을 위반(또는 위반을 야기)할 수 있는 관할권에서는 초대에 참여할 수 없습니다. 초대 기능이 해당 지역의 관련 법률에 부합하지 않는 경우 귀하는 초대를 사용하지 않는 데 동의합니다.
초대는 당사의 단독 재량에 따라 제공됩니다. 당사는 언제든지 기능을 변경, 수정, 일시 중지 및 취소할 수 있습니다. World Assets Limited는 단독 재량으로 귀하가 본 약관을 위반했다고 판단한 경우 사용자가 World ID를 인증하도록 초대하는 것에 대한 보상을 제공하기를 거부할 수 있습니다.
2.12 WLD Grants
및
예약
. 제3자 서비스 중 하나가 다른 간격으로 소량의 WLD를 청구하고 있습니다(“WLD Grants”). WLD Grants는 Worldcoin 재단의 자회사인 World Assets Limited가 제공합니다. 두 WLD Grants의 정확한 금액, 간격 및 시기는 World App에 명시되지만 World Assets Limited에 의해서만 결정됩니다. 본 약관의 이전 버전과 마찬가지로, 이전에 사용 가능한 WLD 예약은 귀하가 WLD Grants를 받을 것이라는 보장을 하지 않습니다. 정확한 WLD 예약 금액, 간격 및 시기는 World App에 명시되어 있지만 World Assets Limited에 의해서만 결정됩니다. WLD 예약은 귀하가 이미 WLD 예약을 했는지 또는 관련 WLD grant를 받았는지 여부에 관계없이 World App에서 사전 통지 여부와 관계없이 만료될 수 있습니다. 이는 World Assets Limited의 단독 재량에 따라 취소 가능합니다.
2.13
오퍼레이터
앱
. Orb 오퍼레이터 및 기타 파트너의 경우, 당사는 귀하가 Orb 오퍼레이터로서 귀하 및 귀하의 비즈니스와 관련된 특정 활동 및 통계를 모니터링할 수 있는 오퍼레이터 앱을 제공합니다. 또한 당사는 귀하가 Orb 오퍼레이터로서 비즈니스를 수행하는 데 도움이 되는 특정 기능을 제공할 수 있습니다.
2.14. Miniapps
. “Miniapps”는 World App의 기능으로, World App 내에서 액세스할 수 있는 미니 애플리케이션 플랫폼에 액세스할 수 있습니다. 당사는 World App 내에서 Miniapps가 어떻게 표시되는지 결정할 단독 재량이 있습니다.  Miniapps에 액세스하려면 World App 가상화폐지갑 주소가 있어야 합니다.
귀하는
Miniapps
를
표시할
때
TFH
가
사용자를
연결하는
기술
플랫폼만
제공한다는
것을
인정합니다
. TFH
는
어떠한
경우에도
기존
화폐
또는
디지털
화폐를
전송
,
저장
,
소유
,
수탁
또는
달리
관여하지
않습니다
. TFH
는
거래를
처리하거나
,
결제
처리자
역할을
하거나
,
달리
거래
처리에
관여하지
않습니다
. TFH
는
거래의
당사자가
아니며
이러한
거래와
관련하여
어떠한
책임도
지지
않습니다
. TFH
는
거래
문제와
관련하여
지원을
제공할
수
없습니다
.
2.14.1 Miniapps
관련
거래
및
지급
. Miniapps는 World App 내에 표시되며, World App 사용자가 자신의 World App 가상화폐지갑에서 디지털 토큰을 사용하여 구매할 수 있는 상품 또는 서비스를 제공할 수 있습니다. 이러한 거래는 귀하와 miniapp 간에 발생합니다. TFH는 그러한 거래의 당사자가 아닙니다.
그러한 거래와 관련하여, 귀하는 World App 가상화폐지갑이 비수탁 서비스이며, TFH가 귀하의 디지털 토큰을 저장하거나 수탁하지 않으며, 거래, 전송, 소유 또는 달리 거래 수행에 관여하지 않음을 인정합니다. 디지털 토큰은 항상 각각의 블록체인 네트워크에 저장되고 전송됩니다. 거래가 올바르게 처리될 것이라는 보장은 없습니다.
TFH는 귀하를 Miniapps 플랫폼의 제3자에게만 연결하며 거래의 당사자가 아닙니다. TFH는 결제를 처리하고 환불 또는 취소 수수료를 관리하는 역할을 하지 않습니다.
거래에 참여하기로 결정한 후에는 합의된 금액과 유형의 디지털 토큰을 보내야 합니다. TFH는 사용자의 디지털 토큰 또는 기존 통화를 처리하지 않으며 사용자를 대신하여 이체를 수행하지 않습니다. TFH는 어떤 거래에 대해서도 어떠한 종류의 보증도 처리, 관리, 감독, 인증 또는 제공하지 않습니다. 거래가 수신되지 않거나, 취소되거나, 부적절하게 처리되거나, 다른 방식으로 오류가 발생하는 경우, 귀하와 제3자 제공자는 모든 문제를 해결하기 위해 협력해야 합니다. 지급 또는 거래와 관련된 모든 분쟁, 청구, 손실, 오해, 기술적 오류 또는 모든 종류의 문제(우발적 및 의도적인 것으로 추정되는 것)는 귀하와 제3자 제공자 간에 직접 처리해야 합니다. TFH는 어떠한 책임도 지지 않으며, 어떠한 지급 관련 분쟁 또는 논의의 당사자가 되지 않을 것이며, 관련 당사자들이 입을 수 있는 어떠한 손실 또는 손해에 대해서도 책임을 지지 않습니다.
디지털 토큰의 가치에 관한 가격 변동의 위험을 수락할 책임은 전적으로 귀하에게 있으며, 거래를 완료할 때까지 거래에 관련된 디지털 토큰의 가치가 크게 변했을 수 있음을 이해합니다.
2.14.2
제
3
자
. Miniapp에 표시되는 제품 및 서비스는 제3자가 제공하고 관리합니다. Miniapps를 사용함으로써 귀하는 다음 사항을 인정하고 동의합니다.
본 약관은 특정 miniapp이 아닌 귀하와 당사 간에 체결됩니다.
귀하는 miniapp에 대한 전적인 책임이 있는 제3자 앱에서 개발 및/또는 제공하는 앱에 액세스합니다.
TFH는 World App 가상화폐지갑을 통해서만 제3자 결제 제공자에 대한 액세스를 제공하며, 그 자체로 결제를 처리하거나 자금을 보유하지 않습니다.
Miniapp은 귀하가 서비스를 수락하는 경우 준수해야 하는 제품 또는 서비스의 일부로 추가 조건이 있을 수 있습니다.
귀하는 거래와 관련된 모든 위험을 완전히 인정하고 명시적으로 책임지며, 당사는 그러한 거래로 인해 발생하는 위험 또는 부정적인 결과에 대해 책임을 지지 않는다는 데 동의합니다.
Miniapps에서 이용 가능한 miniapp의 개별 개발자는 각 miniapp을 통해 직접 이용 가능한 콘텐츠, 제품, 상품 또는 서비스에 대해 전적으로 책임을 집니다. 질문이나 분쟁이 있는 경우 해당 개발자에게 직접 연락해야 합니다.
사용자는 구매 또는 판매 수익금을 받지 못할 위험을 포함하여 거래와 관련된 모든 위험을 수락합니다. 어떠한 거래와 관련하여 문제가 발생하는 경우, TFH는 해결을 지원할 수 없으며, 모든 거래로부터 발생하는 문제에 대해 어떠한 책임도 지지 않습니다.
2.14.3 TFH
수수료
. 당사는 귀하가 개발자와 거래할 때 Miniapps 사용에 대한 수수료를 추가할 수 있습니다. 이 수수료 금액은 플랫폼 내에서 귀하에게 표시됩니다. 이러한 수수료는 Miniapps에 반영된 대로 표시되며 수시로 업데이트 및 변경될 수 있습니다.
2.14.4
세금
.
Miniapps를 통한 모든 거래 또는 귀하가 Miniapps에서 수행하는 모든 거래에 대해 세금이 적용되는지 여부와 그 정도를 결정하고, 정확한 세금 금액을 원천징수, 보고 및 해당 세무 당국에 송금하는 것은 전적으로 귀하의 책임입니다.
2.14.5
일반
모니터링
없음
.
TFH는 사용자가 생성한 정보를 모니터링하거나 Miniapps 내에서 불법 활동이 있음을 나타내는 사실 또는 상황을 적극적으로 찾을 일반적인 의무가 없습니다.
그러나 사용된 수단과 관계없이, 불법 제품이나 서비스가 Miniapps를 통해 유럽연합에 위치한 사용자에게 제공되었다는 사실을 알게 되는 경우, 당사는 Miniapps를 통해 불법 제품이나 서비스를 구매한 사용자에게 이를 알려야 합니다
.
2.14.6
금지된
활동
. Miniapps 서비스 사용자는 모든 지식재산권, 개인정보 보호 권리 또는 퍼블리시티권을 포함하되 이에 국한되지 않는 모든 법률을 위반하거나 어떠한 제3자 권리를 침해하는 어떠한 콘텐츠를 게시하거나 배포하지 않는 데 동의합니다.
또한 귀하는 다음과 같은 활동에 참여하지 않는 데 동의합니다.
불법, 사기 또는 해로운 경우
Miniapps의 운영을 방해하는 행위
당사의 앱 지침에 명시된 조건을 위반하는 행위
앱 지침에 따라 허용되지 않는 콘텐츠를 포함시킵니다.
2.14.7
불법
콘텐츠
신고
. World App은 사용자가 Miniapps 플랫폼의 불법 콘텐츠를 당사에 통지할 수 있도록 접근하기 쉽고 사용자 친화적인 메커니즘을 갖추고 있습니다. 당사는 이러한 보고서를 검토하기 위해 신속하게 조치를 취할 것입니다.
2.14.8
불법
콘텐츠
삭제
. Miniapp에 불법 콘텐츠가 포함되어 있거나 불법 제품 또는 서비스를 제공하는 것으로 판단되는 경우 Miniapps에서 제거됩니다. TFH는 불법 콘텐츠 또는 서비스의 포스터에 대한 간단하고 명확하고 구체적인 사유서를 제공합니다.
World App이 사용자에게 시행하는 모든 제한은 성실하고 객관적이며 비례적으로 수행됩니다.
자신의 콘텐츠가 제거되었거나 콘텐츠에 대한 액세스가 불합리하게 비활성화되었다고 생각하는 사용자는
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
을 통해 당사에 연락하여 결정에 이의를 제기할 수 있습니다. 당사는 사용자가 불법 콘텐츠 또는 약관 위반 혐의로 인해 콘텐츠 삭제, 서비스 중단, 계정 해지 또는 수익화 제한과 관련된 당사의 결정에 이의를 제기할 수 있는 무료 전자 불만제기 시스템을 제공합니다.
2.14.9
콘텐츠
조정
. TFH는 합당한 기간 동안, 그리고 법적으로 요구되는 경우 사전 경고를 발행한 후, 명백히 불법인 콘텐츠를 자주 제공하는 사용자에게 당사의 서비스 제공을 중단할 권리를 보유합니다. 또한 TFH는 근거 없는 청구를 자주 제출하는 사용자의 통지 및 불만 처리를 일시적으로 중단할 수 있습니다.
2.15.
사용자
이름
. World App 사용자 이름은 실명일 필요는 없습니다. 사용자 이름을 선택할 때 최신 버전의
사용자 이름 정책
을 준수해야 할 의무가 있습니다.
3. 구매
,
수수료
및
세금
3.1
거래
수수료
. 서비스를 이용함으로써 귀하는 디지털 토큰 스왑 및 거래에 대한 거래 수수료를 포함하여 모든 해당 수수료를 지불하는 데 동의합니다. 거래를 하기 전에 관련 수수료에 대해 알려드리겠습니다. 귀하가 제3자 결제 서비스를 사용하는 경우, 디지털 토큰 구매에 대해 부과되는 은행 수수료, 신용카드 및 직불카드 수수료는 디지털 토큰 구매의 정산된 금액에서 차감될 수 있습니다. 또한 귀하는 귀하의 금융 서비스 제공자가 부과하는 추가 수수료를 지불할 책임이 있습니다.
3.2
네트워크
요금
. 블록체인과의 상호 작용에도 네트워크 수수료가 발생합니다. 네트워크 수수료는 상호 작용 촉진을 위해 당사 대신 블록체인 네트워크에 의해 부과되고 지불됩니다. 일부의 경우, TFH가 전적인 재량에 따라 결정한 주어진 기간 내에 제한된 수의 가스 없는 거래를 받을 자격이 있을 수 있습니다. 이러한 거래에는 TFH가 조정할 수 있는 최소 거래 가치가 적용됩니다.
3.3
세금
. 서비스를 통한 모든 거래에 대해 세금이 적용되는지 여부와 그 정도를 결정하고, 정확한 세금 금액을 원천징수, 보고 및 해당 세무 당국에 송금하는 것은 전적으로 귀하의 책임입니다.
3.4
업데이트
. 모든 수수료는 서비스에 반영된 대로 표시되며 수시로 업데이트 및 변경될 수 있습니다.
4. 위험
요인
4.1
법적
입찰
아님
.
디지털 토큰은 법적 입찰이 아니며, 정부의 지원을 받지 않고, 디지털 토큰 계정 및 서비스의 가치 잔액은 연방예금보험공사, 증권투자자보호공사의 보호 또는 다른 국가에서 확인되는 유사한 보호의 적용을 받지 않습니다. 당사는 은행이 아니며 신탁 서비스를 제공하지 않습니다. World App을 통한 거래는 많은 국가에서 규제되지 않습니다. 당사는 당사가 지원하는 블록체인의 기능에 대해 어떠한 보장도 하지 않으며, 디지털 토큰의 특정 소유자에게 불리한 제3자의 지연, 이해 상충 또는 운영 결정으로 이어지거나 귀하가 서비스를 사용하여 거래를 완료할 수 없게 할 수 있습니다. 귀하가 서비스를 통해 제출하는 거래 세부 정보는 완료되지 않거나 해당 블록체인에서 상당히 지연될 수 있으며, 당사는 거래의 실패가 예상대로 확인되거나 처리되지 않는 것에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다. 서비스를 통해 시작된 이체가 디지털 토큰의 소유권 또는 권리를 성공적으로 양도한다는 보증이나 보장은 없습니다. 또한, WLD와 같은 특정 디지털 토큰의 사용과 관련된 위험이 있을 수 있습니다. WLD 관련 위험에 대한 추가 정보는 여기에서 확인할 수 있습니다.
4.2
신기술
.
서비스가 새로운 경우. 이 소프트웨어는 광범위하게 테스트되었지만 서비스에 사용되는 소프트웨어는 여전히 비교적 새 소프트웨어이며 버그 또는 보안 취약성이 있을 수 있습니다. 또한, 소프트웨어는 여전히 개발 중이며 시간이 지남에 따라 사용자의 기대를 충족하지 못할 수 있는 중대한 변화를 겪을 수 있습니다.
4.3
정보
보안
위험
.
디지털 토큰 및 서비스 이용은 몰수 또는 도난의 대상이 될 수 있습니다. 해커 또는 기타 악의적인 그룹 또는 조직은 멀웨어 공격, 서비스 거부 공격, 합의 기반 공격, 시빌 공격, 스머핑 및 스푸핑을 포함하되 이에 국한되지 않는 다양한 방식으로 서비스를 방해하려고 시도할 수 있습니다. 또한, 이더리움 프로토콜과 같이 당사가 지원하는 블록체인 네트워크가 오픈 소스 소프트웨어에 있기 때문에, 서비스 기반 소프트웨어에는 서비스에 부정적인 영향을 미치거나 사용자의 디지털 토큰이 손실되거나 서비스를 통해 가상화폐지갑에 액세스하거나 지갑을 제어할 수 있는 사용자의 능력을 상실할 수 있는 의도적이거나 의도하지 않은 버그 또는 약점이 포함되어 있을 수 있습니다. 이러한 소프트웨어 버그 또는 약점이 발생하는 경우, 어떠한 구제수단도 없을 수 있으며 사용자는 어떠한 구제수단, 환불 또는 보상도 보장받지 않습니다.
4.4
정확성
.
당사는 서비스를 통해 제공되는 정확하고 시기 적절한 정보(콘텐츠를 포함하되 이에 국한되지 않음)를 제공하고자 하지만, 항상 완전히 정확하거나 완전하거나 최신이 아닐 수 있으며, 기술적 부정확성 또는 오타도 포함될 수 있습니다. 가능한 한 완전하고 정확한 정보를 제공하기 위해, 관련 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서 당사의 정책, 제품 및 서비스에 관한 정보를 포함하되 이에 국한되지 않는 정보를 통지 없이 수시로 변경 또는 업데이트할 수 있습니다. 따라서, 귀하는 정보에 의존하기 전에 모든 정보를 인증해야 하며, 서비스를 통해 제공된 정보에 기반한 모든 결정은 전적으로 귀하의 책임이며 당사는 그러한 결정에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
4.5
가용성
. 당사는 귀하에게 우수한 서비스를 제공하기 위해 노력하지만, 서비스가 중단 없이 제공될 것이라고 보장하지는 않습니다. 유지보수 또는 기타 이유로 인해 때때로 서비스를 일시적으로 이용할 수 없습니다. 당사는 사용자 통신의 오류, 누락, 중단, 삭제, 결함, 작동 또는 전송 지연, 통신 회선 장애, 도난 또는 파괴, 무단 액세스 또는 변경에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다. 당사는 서비스와 관련된 자료 참여 또는 다운로드와 관련된 사용자 또는 다른 사람의 컴퓨터에 대한 손상 또는 손해를 포함하여 인터넷 또는 서비스 또는 그 조합에서 나타나는 기술적 문제 또는 트래픽 혼잡으로 인한 전화 네트워크 또는 회선, 컴퓨터 온라인 시스템, 서버 또는 공급자, 컴퓨터 장비, 소프트웨어, 이메일 또는 플레이어의 장애 또는 기술적 오작동에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다. 당사는 온라인이든 오프라인이든 타인의 서비스 사용, 서비스에 게시되거나 서비스를 통해 사용자에게 전송된 콘텐츠 또는 서비스 사용자 간의 상호 작용으로 인한 손실 또는 손해, 재정적 손해 또는 이익 손실, 사업 손실 또는 신체적 상해 또는 사망에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
4.6
포크
. WLD를 만드는 데 사용되는 소프트웨어는 오픈 소스이며 누구나 무료로 복사 및 사용할 수 있습니다. 즉, 누구든지 “포크”라고 하는 수정된 버전의 WLD를 만들 수 있습니다. 포크 또는 디지털 토큰 네트워크의 기타 중단이 발생하는 경우, 당사는 포크와 관련된 활동을 지원하지 못할 수 있습니다. 포크 발생 시 거래가 완료되지 않거나, 부분적으로 완료되거나, 잘못 완료되거나 상당히 지연될 수 있습니다. 당사는 포크 또는 기타 네트워크 중단으로 인해 전체 또는 부분적으로 발생하는 손실에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
4.7
제
3
자
서비스
.
이용 가능한 경우(특히 섹션 2.5 참조), 당사는 앱 내에서 법정화폐로 디지털 토큰을 구매할 수 있는 능력 또는 디지털 자산을 다른 것으로 교환할 수 있는 능력과 같은 일부 기능을 제공하기 위해 제3자 서비스 제공자에 의존합니다. 당사는 이러한 서비스를 제공하지 않으며 그러한 거래의 당사자가 아닙니다. 귀하는 이러한 서비스를 위해 제3자 제공자에만 의존하고 있으며, 제3자 제공자에 계정을 가지고 있어야 하고 해당 제공자의 약관에 동의해야 합니다. 당사는
귀하가 그러한 서비스 이용에 문제가 있는 경우 귀하를 지원할 수 없으며, 당사는 귀하가 제3자 제공자를 이용하여 수행하는 거래에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
5. 지식재산
.
5.1
소유권
. 당사의 소프트웨어, 애플리케이션, 서비스, 콘텐츠, 마크(아래 정의 참조) 및 서비스 콘텐츠의 디자인, 선택 및 배열(“IP”)은 미국 및 기타 해당 국가의 저작권, 상표, 특허 및 기타 지식재산권과 법률에 의해 보호됩니다. 귀하는 모든 해당 지식재산권 및 법률뿐만 아니라 본 계약 또는 서비스에 포함된 상표 또는 저작권 고지 또는 제한 사항을 준수하는 데 동의합니다. 귀하는 IP에 포함된 저작권, 상표 또는 소유권 고지를 제거할 수 없습니다.
5.2
상표
.
Tools for Humanity Corporation 이름, World App 로고 및 모든 관련 로고, 슬로건은 Tools for Humanity Corporation 또는 그 라이선스 제공자의 상표 또는 서비스 마크(“마크”)입니다. 귀하는 당사의 서면 허가 없이 마크의 전체 또는 일부를 복사, 모방 또는 사용할 수 없습니다. 서비스와 관련하여 언급된 기타 모든 상표, 이름 또는 로고는 해당 소유자의 재산이며 귀하는 해당 상표 소유자의 서면 허가 없이 전체 또는 일부를 복사, 모방 또는 사용할 수 없습니다. 서비스에 타인의 마크를 포함시킨다고 해서 당사가 승인, 보증 또는 추천하는 것은 아닙니다.
6. 라이선스
및
제한
사항
6.1
라이선스
. 귀하가 서비스를 이용할 자격이 있고 귀하가 본 약관을 준수하는 경우, 당사는 귀하에게 서비스에 액세스하고 서비스를 사용할 수 있는 제한된 라이선스를 부여합니다.
6.2
라이선스
제한
. 귀하는 인터넷, 인트라넷 또는 엑스트라넷 사이트에 콘텐츠를 다시 게시하거나 다른 데이터베이스 또는 편집물에 정보를 통합할 수 없으며, 콘텐츠의 다른 사용은 엄격히 금지됩니다. 당사의 사전 서면 허가 없이 본 계약에서 특별히 승인된 것 이외의 서비스를 사용하는 것은 엄격히 금지되며 본 계약에서 부여된 라이선스를 종료합니다. 이러한 무단 사용은 또한 저작권 및 상표법, 해당 통신 규정 및 법령을 포함하되 이에 국한되지 않는 해당 법률을 위반할 수 있습니다. 본 약관에서 명시적으로 언급하지 않는 한, 본 약관의 어떠한 내용도 금반언, 암시 또는 기타 방법으로 지식재산권에 대한 라이선스를 부여하는 것으로 해석되지 않습니다. 본 라이선스는 관련 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서, 당사가 언제든지 통지 없이, 이유 여하를 막론하고 취소할 수 있습니다.
6.3
정부
. 귀하가 미국 정부 최종 사용자인 경우, 당사는 미국 연방규정집(48 C.F.R. § 2.101 참조)에 정의된 용어에 따라 귀하에게 서비스를 “상업용 품목”으로 라이선스를 허여하고 있으며, 당사가 서비스에 대해 귀하에게 부여하는 권리는 본 약관에 따라 당사가 다른 모든 사람에게 부여하는 권리와 동일합니다.
7. 허용
가능한
사용
7.1
귀하는 자신의 개인적인 용도로만 서비스를 사용할 수 있습니다. 당사는 언제든지 단독 재량으로 관련 법률에 따라 귀하의 서비스 액세스 또는 이용을 검토, 취소 또는 중단할 권리를 보유합니다. 금지된 사용 목록의 항목은 예시일 뿐이며 목록이 완전한 것은 아닙니다. 당사는 관련 법률에 따라 단독 재량으로 금지된 사용을 추가하거나 제거할 수 있습니다.
7.2
금지된
사용에는
다음이
포함됩니다
.
불법
활동
:
OFAC가 관리하는 제재 프로그램을 위반하거나 위반을 지원하는 활동, 당사가 사업을 수행하는 국가의 법률을 위반하거나 위반을 지원하는 활동, 불법 활동의 수익금이 관련된 활동, 불법 자료 또는 정보를 게시, 배포 또는 유포하는 활동.
과도한
사용
또는
해킹
:
당사 인프라에 불합리하거나 불균형적으로 큰 부하를 가하거나, 시스템, 데이터 또는 정보를 해롭게 방해하거나, 가로채거나 도용하거나, 바이러스, 트로이 목마, 웜 또는 기타 유해하거나 유해한 프로그램이 포함된 자료를 서비스에 전송 또는 업로드하거나, 서비스에 연결된 컴퓨터 시스템 또는 네트워크에 무단 액세스를 시도하는 활동.
타인에
대한
학대
:
타인의 서비스 액세스 또는 이용을 방해하는 활동, 타인의 사생활, 지식재산권 또는 기타 법적 권리를 명예훼손, 남용, 갈취, 괴롭힘, 스토킹, 위협 또는 달리 위반하거나 침해하는 활동, 타인에 대한 증오, 인종적 편협함 또는 폭력 행위를 선동, 위협, 조장, 홍보 또는 격려하는 활동, 또는
허가 없이 서비스에서 다른 사용자의 데이터를 수집, 폐기 또는 수집하는 행위
사기
및
기타
불공정한
사업
관행
:
당사, 당사의 사용자 또는 기타 개인을 속이기 위해 운영되는 활동, 당사에 허위, 부정확하거나 또는 오해의 소지가 있는 정보를 제공하는 활동, 부당하게 높은 보상을 약속하거나 구매자에 대한 추가 혜택 없이 서비스를 판매하는 활동, 또는 불법 복권, 추첨, 입찰 수수료 경매, 콘테스트, 경품 행사, 도박 또는 기타 확률 게임을 포함한 기타 약탈적이고 기만적인 관행을 촉진하는 활동.
지식재산
침해
:
권리 보유자의 적절한 승인 없이 위조 음악, 영화, 소프트웨어 또는 기타 라이선스가 부여된 자료에 대한 판매, 배포 또는 액세스 제공과 관련된 모든 활동, 명시적 동의 없이 또는 당사나 당사 브랜드에 해를 끼치는 방식으로 IP(마크 포함)를 사용하는 행위, 당사와의 허위 보증 또는 제휴를 암시하는 활동, 또는 저작권, 상표, 퍼블리시티권 또는 개인정보 보호권 또는 법률에 따른 기타 소유권을 침해하거나 위반하는 활동.
8. Orb
오퍼레이터
당사는 “Orb 오퍼레이터”라고 하는 현지 독립 계약자와 협력하며, 이들은 사용자 등록을 용이하게 하고 귀하가 당사에 대해 가질 수 있는 질문에 답변하는 데 도움을 줍니다. 이러한 Orb 오퍼레이터는 교육을 받았으며 World Network에 대해 잘 알고 있습니다. 그러나 우리는 그들의 말이나 행동 방식을 통제할 수 없으며 모든 책임을 부인합니다.
Orb 오퍼레이터는 어떤 식으로든 당사의 대리인이나 직원이 아닙니다. TFH가 사용자의 이익을 위해 수행하는 모든 노력, 기능, 프로세스, 정책, 표준 또는 기타 노력은 Orb 오퍼레이터와의 고용 또는 에이전시 관계를 나타내지 않습니다.
9. 일시
중지
당사는 (i) 당사가 표면적으로 유효한 소환장, 법원 명령, 또는 정부 당국의 구속력 있는 명령에 의해 그렇게 요구를 받는 경우, (ii) 당사가 귀하가 금지된 사용과 관련하여 서비스를 이용한다고 합리적으로 의심하는 경우, (iii) 귀하의 서비스 이용이 계류 중인 소송, 조사, 또는 정부 절차의 대상이 되는 경우 및/또는 당사가 귀하의 활동과 관련된 법적 또는 규제 미준수의 위험이 높다고 인식하는 경우, (iv) 당사의 서비스 파트너가 귀하의 사용을 지원할 수 없는 경우, (v) 귀하가 당사가 당사의 통제를 회피하는 것으로 간주하는 어떠한 조치를 취하는 경우(예: 여러 계정을 만들려는 시도 등) 귀하의 서비스 액세스를 일시 중지하고 제한할 수 있습니다.
10. 증권
또는
상품
지분
제공
금지
서비스의 콘텐츠는 투자, 증권, 파트너십 이익, 상품 또는 기타 금융 상품의 매수 또는 매도 제안 또는 매수 또는 매도 제안의 권유를 구성하지 않습니다. 콘텐츠 또는 서비스는 또한 그러한 제안 또는 권유가 승인 또는 허용되지 않는 주 또는 관할권에 있는 사람의 제안 또는 권유를 구성하지 않고 이와 관련하여 사용될 수 없으며, 그러한 제안이나 권유를 하는 것은 불법입니다.
11. 콘텐츠
11.1
콘텐츠
의존
,
서비스
변화
.
당사가 서비스를 통해 귀하에게 제공하는 정보 및 자료(“콘텐츠”)는 일반적인 정보 목적으로만 사용되며, 당사는 관련 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서 그 정확성, 유용성 또는 완전성을 보장하지 않습니다. 귀하가 당사 콘텐츠에 의존하는 것은 전적으로 귀하의 책임입니다. 당사는 콘텐츠로 인해 귀하가 취하거나 취하지 않은 모든 조치 또는 귀하가 콘텐츠를 공유하는 모든 사람에 대해 어떠한 책임도 지지 않습니다. 서비스 또는 다른 곳에서 제공되는 당사 서비스 사용을 설명하는 다른 사용자의 진술이 본 약관 또는 당사 콘텐츠와 일치하지 않는 경우, 해당 진술을 당사가 보증하는 것으로 간주해서는 안 됩니다. 당사는 수시로 콘텐츠를 업데이트할 수 있지만, 그러한 콘텐츠는 완전하거나 최신이 아닐 수 있으며, 당사는 귀하에게 콘텐츠 또는 서비스의 다른 부분을 업데이트할 의무가 없습니다. 당사는 관련 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서 귀하에게 사전 통지 없이 콘텐츠 또는 서비스의 일부 또는 전부를 일시적으로 또는 영구적으로 수정하거나 중단할 수 있습니다. 당사는 관련 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서 콘텐츠 또는 서비스의 일부 또는 전부의 수정, 일시 중지 또는 중단에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
11.2
제
3
자
서비스
및
콘텐츠
. 당사는 사용자 및 기타 제3자 간의 공유 및 협업을 가능하게 하는 소셜 미디어 플랫폼(“제3자 서비스”)에서 교육 자료, 웨비나, 모임 및 프로모션에 대한 링크를 제공할 수 있습니다. 귀하가 그러한 서비스에 대한 개인정보, 사진, 의견, 콘텐츠 또는 기타 데이터를 공유하는 경우, 귀하는 자신의 책임 하에 그렇게 하고, 그러한 서비스의 이용에는 당사의 정책이 아닌 해당 서비스의 이용약관 및 개인정보 보호 정책이 적용됩니다. 귀하는 각 제3자 서비스의 서비스 약관을 검토하여 귀하의 권리와 해당 플랫폼이 귀하의 데이터를 사용하는 방식을 더 잘 이해해야 합니다. 당사는 제3자 서비스(과실 포함)와 관련된 데이터의 손실, 도난, 손상 또는 오용에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
단, 관련 법률에 따라 그러한 책임이 제한될 수 없는 경우는 제외됩니다. 제3자 서비스에서 제공하는 정보(“제3자 콘텐츠”)를 사용하는 것은 귀하의 책임이며, 당사는 제3자 콘텐츠가 정확하고 완전하며 진실하거나 귀하의 개인적인 상황에 적합하다는 약속을 하지 않습니다. 제3자 콘텐츠에는 당사가 특별히 보증하지 않는 다른 사용자가 제공하는 정보가 포함됩니다.
11.3
사용자
콘텐츠
. Worldcoin 커뮤니티의 회원으로서 귀하는 메시지, 데이터, 소프트웨어, 이미지, 비디오 또는 기타 콘텐츠(“사용자 콘텐츠”)를 당사가 소유한 메시지 보드, 블로그, 소셜 미디어 계정 및 서비스의 기타 공개적으로 이용 가능한 다양한 위치에 게시할 수 있습니다. 이러한 포럼은 당사 또는 당사를 대신하여 제3자 서비스 제공자가 주최할 수 있습니다. 서비스를 통해 제출, 업로드, 게시 또는 저장하는 모든 사용자 콘텐츠에 대한 책임은 귀하에게 있습니다. 귀하는 귀하의 사용자 콘텐츠에 관한 모든 필수적이고 적절한 경고, 정보 및 공개를 제공해야 합니다. 당사는 귀하가 서비스를 통해 제출하는 사용자 콘텐츠에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.
11.4
사용자
콘텐츠
라이선스
. 사용자 콘텐츠를 당사에 제출함으로써, 귀하는 사용자 콘텐츠에 필요한 모든 권리를 보유함을 진술하며, 이에 따라 귀하는 당사의 마케팅 및 프로모션과 관련하여, 그리고 서비스와 관련된 기타 모든 합법적인 사업 목적을 위해 사용자 콘텐츠의 전부 또는 일부를 사용, 복제, 배포, 파생물 준비, 수정, 표시 및 수행할 수 있는 영구적이고, 전 세계적이고, 비독점적이며, 로열티가 없고, 재라이선스가 가능하고, 양도 가능한 라이선스를 당사에 부여합니다. 당사는 귀하의 사용자 콘텐츠의 일부 또는 전부와 파생 저작물을 당사가 선택한 미디어 형식과 미디어 채널을 통해 재배포할 수 있습니다. 또한 귀하는 당사 및 다른 사용자에게 서비스를 통해 귀하의 사용자 콘텐츠를 사용, 액세스, 복제, 배포, 수정 및 표시하고 수행할 수 있는 비독점적 라이선스를 부여합니다. 섹션 11.4는 해당 법률이 허용하는 최대 범위까지 적용됩니다.
11.5
사용자
콘텐츠
제한
. 귀하는 (a) 비방하거나 명예를 훼손하는 경우, 또는 개인에 관한 사적 또는 개인적 사안을 공개하는 경우, (b) 외설적이거나, 저속하거나, 음란하거나, 괴롭히거나, 위협적이거나, 학대적이거나, 증오적이거나, 인종적 또는 민족적으로 모욕적이거나, 형사 범죄로 간주될 수 있는 행동을 장려하고, 민사 책임을 발생시키고 법을 위반할 수 있거나 달리 부적절한 경우, (c) 저작권이 있는 승인되지 않은 텍스트, 이미지 또는 프로그램, 영업 비밀 또는 기타 기밀 독점 정보 또는 침해하는 방식으로 사용된 상표 또는 서비스 마크를 포함하여 타인의 지식재산권을 침해하는 경우, 또는 (d) 다른 사용자의 서비스 사용을 부당하게 방해하는 경우에 해당하는 사용자 콘텐츠를 게시하거나 전송하기 위해 서비스를 사용하거나 제3자가 사용하도록 허용하지 않을 것에 동의합니다. 귀하는 자발적으로 서비스에 사용자 콘텐츠를 게시하고 있음을 당사에 진술합니다. 따라서 사용자 콘텐츠를 게시한다고 해서 귀하와 당사 간에 고용주-직원 관계가 형성되지는 않습니다. 귀하는 이메일 주소, 휴대폰 번호, 잔액, 사용자 이름 또는 다른 사용자의 개인정보를 그들의 허가 없이 복사하거나 사용할 수 없습니다. 서비스 또는 다른 채널을 통해 다른 사용자에게 원치 않는 이메일, 우편, 전화 통화 또는 기타 통신은 금지됩니다.
11.6
불만사항
및
DMCA
게시
중단
.
귀하의 상표 또는 저작권이 있는 저작물이 당사 콘텐츠 또는 서비스상의 사용자 콘텐츠에 의해 침해되고 있다고 생각되거나 당사와의 일부 보증 또는 제휴를 암시하는 방식으로 게시되고 있다고 생각될 경우, legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com으로 “[상표/저작권] 불만”이라는 제목의 이메일을 보내주십시오. 귀하의 불만 사항이 효력을 발휘하고 당사가 디지털 밀레니엄 저작권법(“DMCA”)에 따라 조치를 취하기 위해서는 이메일에 다음 정보를 포함하여 모든 DMCA 요건을 준수해야 합니다.
저작물이 등록된 경우 저작권 등록 번호를 포함하여 저작권이 있는 저작물 또는 침해를 주장하는 마크의 명확한 식별 정보
침해 주장이 제기되고 있으며 삭제를 원하는 작업 또는 마크의 식별
침해 주장이 제기된 콘텐츠를 찾을 수 있는 URL 또는 기타 명확한 지침
귀하의 이메일 주소, 우편 주소 및 전화번호
콘텐츠가 침해하고 있고, 귀하가 제공하는 정보가 정확하며, 귀하가 콘텐츠의 소유자이거나 소유자를 대리할 권한이 있다는 선의의 믿음을 가지고 있다는 귀하의 서명된 진술.
또한 DMCA의 512(f)항에 따라, 고의로 무의미한 침해 통지서를 보내는 사람은 손해에 대한 책임이 있을 수 있으므로 허위 청구를 하지 마십시오. 당사는 침해가 의심되는 자료를 서비스에 업로드한 사람을 포함하여 귀하가 당사에 제공한 모든 정보나 서신을 제3자와 공유할 수 있습니다.
당사가 선의의 침해 통지를 받는 경우, 당사의 정책은 (a) 침해 콘텐츠에 대한 액세스를 즉시 제거 또는 비활성화하고, (b) 침해 자료를 업로드한 사람에게 당사가 해당 자료에 대한 액세스를 제거 또는 비활성화했음을 통지하며, (c) 반복적으로
위반하는 경우, 서비스에 대한 해당 개인의 액세스를 종료합니다. 당사가 그러한 사람으로부터 반대 통지를 받는 경우, 당사는 제거된 자료를 복원하거나 영업일 기준 10일 이내에 비활성화를 중단할 수 있음을 설명하는 반대 통지 사본을 귀하에게 보낼 수 있습니다. 귀하가 당사 또는 콘텐츠를 업로드한 사람을 상대로 법원 명령을 구하는 소송을 제기하지 않는 한, 당사는 당사의 재량으로 반대 통지를 받은 후 영업일 기준 10~14일 이상 후에 제거된 자료에 대한 액세스를 복원합니다.
12. 보증 부인
12.1 서비스 이용에 따른 위험은 귀하의 책임입니다. 서비스, WLD, 콘텐츠 및 기타 모든 IP는 명시적이든 묵시적이든 법적이든 어떠한 진술이나 보증 없이 “있는 그대로” 및 “사용 가능한 대로” 제공됩니다. 관련 법률이 허용하는 최대 범위 내에서 당사는 서비스에 포함된 기능, 콘텐츠 또는 기타 IP에 대한 소유권, 상품성, 특정 목적에의 적합성 또는 비침해성에 대한 묵시적 보증을 명시적으로 부인합니다. 일부 관할권에서는 묵시적 보증의 배제를 허용하지 않으므로 위의 배제는 귀하에게 적용되지 않을 수 있습니다. 당사는 서비스와 관련된 다른 사용자를 포함하여 제3자가 제공하는 광고, 제안 또는 진술에 대해 보증, 보장 또는 책임을 지지 않습니다.
12.2 당사는 (a) 서비스의 전부 또는 일부에 대한 액세스가 연속적이거나, 중단되지 않거나, 시기적절하거나, 안전하거나, 오류가 없거나, (b) 서비스 또는 콘텐츠가 정확하거나, 완전하거나, 신뢰할 수 있거나, 최신 상태이거나, (c) 서비스에 바이러스 또는 기타 유해한 구성 요소가 없거나, (d) 서비스 또는 콘텐츠가 귀하의 요구 사항, 필요 또는 기대치를 충족할 것이라는 어떠한 진술이나 보증도 하지 않습니다.
12.3 또한 당사는 서비스 또는 WLD의 사용 사례에 대한 합법성 또는 서비스 또는 WLD가 규제 또는 규정 준수 요구를 충족할 것이라는 진술이나 보증을 하지 않습니다. 또한 귀하는 귀하의 서비스 또는 WLD 사용에 적용될 수 있는 모든 법적 및 규제적 제한과 요건을 결정하고 준수할 책임이 있습니다. 본 약관에 명시된 명시적 진술을 제외하고, 귀하는 본 서비스 또는 WLD에 대한 귀하의 액세스 및 이용과 관련하여 서면 또는 구두의 다른 진술 또는 양해에 의존하지 않았음을 인정하고 이에 동의합니다.
12.4 당사는 재무, 법률, 투자 또는 세금 문제와 관련하여 귀하의 자문 역할을 하지 않으며 그러한역할을 할 수 없습니다. 모든 내용은 명시된 날짜 기준으로만 기술되어 있습니다. 여기에 표현된 예측, 추정, 전망, 목표 및/또는 의견은 위험, 불확실성 및 가정의 대상이 되므로 부정확할 수 있으며 통지 없이 변경될 수 있습니다. 어떠한 콘텐츠도 신뢰해서는 안 됩니다.
여기에 있는 특정 정보는 제3자 출처에서 얻은 것일 수 있습니다. 그러한 출처는 신뢰할 수 있다고 생각되지만, 당사는 그러한 모든 정보를 독립적으로 검증하지 않았으며 그 정확성에 대해 어떠한 진술도 하지 않습니다. 당사는 등록된 브로커 딜러 또는 투자 자문가가 아닙니다. 당사는 서비스에 포함된 자료의 정확성, 적시성 또는 완전성에 대해 어떠한 진술도 하지 않으며, 명시적, 묵시적 또는 법적으로 모든 보증을 구체적으로 부인합니다. 당사의 콘텐츠는 일반적인 정보만을 위한 것이며, 귀하는 서비스 이용 여부를 결정할 전적인 책임이 있습니다. 귀하는 디지털 토큰을 거래, 사용 및 보유하는 것이 본질적으로 위험하다는 것을 인정합니다. 가상화폐지갑에 있는 모든 자금을 잃을 수 있습니다. 귀하는 서비스가 미국 법률에 의해 부과된 수출 제한 및 경제 제재의 대상이 될 수 있음을 인정합니다.
12.5 당사는 서비스의 수정 또는 해지, 서비스에 대한 귀하의 액세스 일시 중지 또는 해지에 대해 귀하 또는 제3자에게 책임을 지지 않습니다.
13. 책임의 제한
13.1 당사는 그렇게 하는 것이 불법인 경우 귀하에 대한 당사의 책임을 배제하거나 제한하지 않습니다. 아래 유형의 예외가 허용되지 않는 국가에서는 당사가 합리적인 주의와 기술을 사용하지 않거나 귀하와의 계약 위반으로 인해 합리적으로 예측 가능한 결과인 손실과 손해에 대해서만 귀하에게 책임을 집니다. 본 조항은 어떠한 계약이나 합의로도 포기하거나 제한할 수 없는 소비자 권리에 영향을 미치지 않습니다.
13.2 법에서 허용하는 범위 내에서, 귀하는 어떠한 경우에도 당사 또는 당사의 임원, 이사, 직원, 계약자, 대리인, 계열사, 또는 자회사(“TFH 당사자들”) 중 그 누구도 이익, 영업권, 사용, 데이터, 또는 기타 무형 자산 손실로 인한 손해를 포함하여 간접적, 징벌적, 부수적, 특수적, 결과적, 또는 예시적 손해배상에 대해 귀하에게 책임(그러한 책임이 불법 행위 또는 기타 행위를 근거로 주장된 것이든 TFH 당사자들이 (a) 귀하의 서비스 사용 또는 사용 불가, 디지털 토큰 또는 World Network (b) 서비스 접근 불가 또는 해지 (c) 해킹 조작, 거래 또는 귀하의 데이터에 대한 무단 접근 또는 변경 (d) 서비스를 통해 귀하가 제3자와 체결한 거래 또는 계약 (e) 제3자의 활동 또는 커뮤니케이션 (f) Orb 오퍼레이터의 행위, (g) 디지털 토큰 가치의 손실,
(h) 서비스에서 또는 서비스를 통해 액세스한 제3자 콘텐츠, (i) 당사 콘텐츠의 오류, 실수 또는 부정확성, (j) 서비스에 대한 액세스 또는 사용으로 인해 발생하는 모든 성격의 신체적 상해 또는 재산 피해, (k) 서비스로 또는 서비스를 통해 전송될 수 있는 바이러스, 트로이 목마 등, 또는 (l) 제3자의 명예훼손적, 공격적 또는 불법적 행위로부터 또는 이와 관련하여 발생하는 이러한 손해의 가능성에 대해 통지를 받았든)을 지지 않는 것에 동의합니다. 이러한 책임의 제한은 TFH 또는 서비스의 사용, 오용 또는 의존으로 인해 발생하는 손해에 상관없이, 그리고 관련 법률이 허용하는 최대 한도까지 적용됩니다.
13.3 어떠한 경우에도 TFH 당사자들은 $100.00을 초과하는 어떠한 직접 청구, 소송, 책임, 의무, 손해, 손실 또는 비용에 대해 귀하에게 책임을 지지 않습니다. 귀하가 서비스에 만족하지 못하는 경우, 귀하는 유일하고 배타적인 구제책이 서비스 이용을 중단하는 것임에 동의합니다. 이러한 책임 제한은 관련 법률에서 허용하는 최대 범위까지 적용됩니다.
13.4
해제
및
면책
.
귀하는 (a) 귀하의 서비스 이용, (b) 귀하가 본 약관을 위반한 경우, (c) 귀하가 다른 사람의 권리를 침해한 경우, (d) 서비스와 관련된 귀하의 행위, 또는 (e) 귀하의 WLD, 디지털 토큰 또는 Worldcoin 네트워크 이용으로 인해 또는 이와 관련하여 제3자가 TFH 당사자들을 상대로 제기한 모든 청구, 손해, 비용, 책임, 합리적인 변호사 수임료 및 경비로부터 TFH TFH 당사자들을 방어하고 면책하며 보호하는 데 동의합니다. 일부 관할권에서는 소비자 배상을 제한하므로 본 조항의 일부 또는 전체 배상 조항이 귀하에게 적용되지 않을 수 있습니다. 귀하가 TFH 당사자들을 면책해야 할 의무가 있는 경우, 당사는 단독 재량으로 모든 소송 또는 절차를 통제하고, 합의할지 여부와 그 조건을 결정할 권리를 보유합니다.
귀하가 캘리포니아 거주자인 경우, 귀하는 캘리포니아 민법 § 1542의 혜택 및 보호를 포기하며, 이는 “[a] 일반 면제는 채권자 또는 면제 당사자가 면제를 이행할 당시 자신에게 유리한지 모르거나 의심하고 있으며, 알았더라면 채무자 또는 면제 당사자와의 합의에 상당한 영향을 미쳤을 것이라는 청구에는 적용되지 않습니다.”라고 규정합니다.
14. 준거법
캘리포니아주 법률은 본 계약 및 본 계약으로 인해 또는 본 계약과 관련하여 발생하는 모든 분쟁에 적용됩니다. 본 섹션에 명시된 준거법은 국제사법 원칙에 관계없이 적용됩니다. 또한 귀하는 서비스가 캘리포니아주에만 기반을 둔 것으로 간주되며, 서비스가 다른 관할권에서 이용 가능할 수 있지만, 그 이용 가능성으로 인해 캘리포니아 주 외부의 어떤 포럼에서도 일반 또는 특정 개인 관할권이 발생하지 않는다는 데 동의합니다.
15. 분쟁
해결
,
중재
및
집단
소송
포기
15.1 다음 조항을 주의깊게 읽으십시오. 집단 소송의 구성원이 아닌 단독 중재인 앞에서 개별 중재를 통해 당사와의 분쟁을 해결하도록 요구합니다. 귀하가 자격이 있는 경우 소액 재판소에서 당사를 상대로 분쟁을 제기할 수 있지만, 중재는 귀하가 법원에서 소송을 제기하거나 배심 재판을 받는 것을 금지합니다.
15.2 당사는 비공식적인 선의의 협상을 통해 잠재적인 분쟁을 해결하기 위해 최선의 노력을 다할 것입니다. 잠재적 분쟁이 발생하는 경우, 공식 분쟁 해결 방법에 의존하지 않고 해결을 시도할 수 있도록 legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com으로 이메일을 보내 당사에 연락해야 합니다. 귀하가 이메일을 발송한 후 60일 이내에 당사가 비공식적인 해결 방법을 찾을 수 없고 귀하가 연방 또는 주 법정 청구, 관습법 청구, 계약, 불법 행위, 사기, 허위 진술 또는 기타 법적 이론에 기반한 청구를 제기하기로 선택하는 경우, 또는 본 약관, 콘텐츠, 또는 서비스로 인해 또는 이와 관련하여 발생하는 기타 공식 절차(각각 “분쟁”)를 다음 조건에 따라 개별적으로 법적 구속력이 있는 중재를 통해 분쟁을 해결하는 데 동의합니다(통칭하여 “중재 계약”).
중재는 한 명의 중재인이 기밀로 수행합니다. 중재인은 해당 공소시효 및 모든 관련 법률을 적용하고 관련 법률이 인정하는 특권의 청구를 존중합니다.
분쟁 총액이 $250,000 이상이 아닌 한, 분쟁은 JAMS가 JAMS의 간소화된 중재 규칙에 따라 관리하는 중재에 의해 전적으로 그리고 최종적으로 합의되며, 이 경우 JAMS 포괄적 중재 규칙이 적용됩니다. 귀하와 당사 모두가 다른 곳에서 중재하는 데 동의하지 않는 한, 중재는 캘리포니아주 샌프란시스코에서 이루어집니다. 귀하는 본 계약의 구속력 있는 중재 조항이 집행 불가능한 것으로 판명되는 경우 캘리포니아주 샌프란시스코의 연방 및 주 법원이 중재 판정의 항소 또는 법원 절차에 대한 적절한 재판지라는 데 동의합니다.
어느 중재에서든, 그 위치에 관계없이, 당사자들은 서로에게서 증거개시를 추구하지 않으며, 중재인은 당사자들이 증거개시에 참여하는 것을 허용하지 않습니다. 오히려, 각 당사자는 최종 중재 심리 전에 상호 합의 가능한 시간과 날짜에 자신의 입장을 뒷받침하는 증거를 공개합니다.
본 중재 합의는 중재 합의 또는 중재 합의의 일부분의 집행 가능성, 취소 가능성, 범위 및 유효성, 그리고 중재 합의의 해석 또는 적용 가능성으로 인해 또는 이와 관련하여 발생하는 기타 모든 분쟁을 다루며, 그러한 모든 문제는 법원이나 판사가 아닌 중재인이 결정합니다.
중재인 또는 중재 관리자가 귀하에게 제출 수수료 또는 기타 행정 비용을 부과하는 경우, 당사는 요청 시 그러한 수수료 또는 비용이 귀하가 법원에서 소송을 진행하는 경우 지불해야 할 금액을 초과하는 범위까지 귀하에게 상환할 것입니다. 또한 중재 관리자의 규칙 또는 관련 법률에서 요구하는 경우 추가 수수료 또는 비용을 지불할 것입니다.
양 당사자의 요청에 따라, 모든 중재 절차는 극비로 진행됩니다. 이 경우 모든 문서, 증언, 기록을 수령하고, 심리하고, 중재인이 봉인하여 비밀로 유지하며, 모든 정보를 중재 목적으로만 사용하기 위해 기밀로 받기로 사전에 서면으로 동의한 당사자들, 각자의 변호사, 전문가, 컨설턴트, 또는 증인에 의해서만 조사가 가능합니다.
본 중재 합의에서 논의된 집단 절차 및 구제책 외에, 중재인은 법원에서 달리 이용할 수 있는 구제책을 부여할 권한이 있습니다.
중재인이 내린 판정에 대한 판결은 관할 법원에 회부될 수 있습니다.
본 중재 계약에 포함된 제3자를 대신하여 제기된 집단 소송 및 기타 분쟁에 대한 중재 요건 또는 금지가 집행 불가능한 것으로 밝혀지는 경우, 집행 불가능한 조항만 본 약관에서 삭제된 것으로 간주되며 본 약관의 나머지 모든 의무는 계속해서 완전한 효력을 유지합니다.
15.3 30
일
거부권
. 귀하는 다음 제목으로 신청서를 작성하는 데 사용한 주소에서 legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com으로 이메일을 보내 본 중재 계약을 거부하고 이에 구속력을 적용받지 않을 권리가 있습니다. “중재 및 집단 소송 포기 거부. 귀하는 본 약관에 동의한 후 30일 이내에 이메일을 보내야 합니다. 그렇지 않으면 본 중재 계약의 조건에 따라 분쟁을 중재할 수 있습니다. 귀하가 본 중재 계약을 거부하는 경우, 당사는 또한 중재 계약의 구속을 받지 않습니다.
15.4
본
중재
계약의
변경
.
당사는 본 약관의 “
분쟁
해결
,
중재
및
집단
소송
포기
” 조항에 대한 변경 사항에 대해 30일 전에 귀하에게 통지할 것이며, 변경 사항은 귀하가 당사로부터 통지를 받은 날로부터 30일 후에 발효됩니다.
분쟁
해결
,
중재
및
집단
소송
포기
조항의 변경은 30일 이후에 발생하는 분쟁에만 전향적으로 적용됩니다. 법원 또는 중재인이 본 섹션의 변경이 집행 불가능하거나 유효하지 않다고 결정하는 경우, 변경 사항은 본 약관에서 분리되며 법원 또는 중재인은 귀하가 서비스 사용을 시작한 후 유효한 첫 번째 중재 계약의 조건을 적용합니다. 귀하는 위의 “30일 거부권” 조항에 명시된 절차에 따라 새로운 중재 계약 조건을 거부할 권리를 행사할 수 있습니다.
본 중재 계약은 본 약관의 해지 및 귀하의 서비스 사용 후에도 존속됩니다.
본 중재 계약의 상반되는 내용에도 불구하고, 일방 당사자는 서비스의 무단 사용 또는 남용, 또는 지식재산권 침해(예: 상표, 영업 비밀,
저작권 또는 특허권)를 중지하기 위해 먼저 중재나 위에 설명된 비공식 분쟁 해결 절차에 참여하지 않고 금지 명령 구제만을 위한 소송을 제기할 수 있습니다.
16. 일반
조항
16.1
포기
금지
,
분리
가능성
,
양도
불가
. 당사가 조항을 집행하지 않는다고 해서 나중에 그렇게 할 수 있는 당사의 권리를 포기하는 것은 아닙니다. 조항이 집행 불가능한 것으로 밝혀지는 경우, 본 약관의 나머지 조항은 완전한 효력을 유지하며, 관련 법률이 허용하는 범위 내에서 당사의 의도를 가능한 한 가깝게 반영하여 집행 가능한 조건으로 대체됩니다. 귀하는 본 약관에 따른 귀하의 권리를 양도할 수 없으며, 그러한 시도는 무효가 됩니다. 당사는 당사의 권리를 그 계열사 또는 자회사, 또는 서비스와 관련된 사업의 이익을 위한 승계인에게 양도할 수 있습니다.
16.2
전체
계약
. 본 약관은 서비스와 관련하여 귀하와 당사 간의 완전하고 배타적인 계약 진술을 구성하며, 서비스에 관한 서면 및 구두로 이루어진 모든 이전 및 현재의 양해, 계약, 진술 및 보증을 모두 대체합니다. 본 약관의 섹션 제목은 편의를 위한 것이며 조항의 의미나 해석에는 적용되지 않습니다.
16.3
존속
.
본 약관의 정지 또는 해지, TFH에 대한 채무, 서비스의 일반적인 사용, TFH와의 분쟁과 관련된 본 약관의 모든 조항 및 그 성격상 본 약관의 만료 또는 해지 이후에도 연장되는 조항은 본 약관의 해지 또는 만료 후에도 존속됩니다.
16.4
당사자들의
관계
.
본 약관의 어떠한 내용도 귀하와 TFH가 파트너, 합작 투자사 또는 기타 영리를 위한 공동 직원으로 간주되거나 간주되도록 의도되지 않으며, 파트너, 귀하와 TFH 모두 상대방의 대리인으로 간주되지 않습니다. 여기에는 본 약관의 어떠한 내용도 귀하와 TFH 간의 고용 관계를 확립하거나 확립하려는 의도가 없다는 사실이 포함됩니다.
16.5
전문
자문
또는
신탁
의무
없음
.
당사가 제공하는 모든 콘텐츠는 정보 제공 목적으로만 사용되며 전문적인 조언으로 해석되어서는 안 됩니다. 귀하는 서비스에 포함된 정보를 기반으로 어떠한 조치도 취하지 않아야 하고 삼가야 합니다. 서비스 또는 디지털 토큰과 관련된 재무, 법률 또는 기타 결정을 내리기 전에 그러한 조언이 적절한 분야에서 면허를 취득하고 자격을 갖춘 개인으로부터 독립적인 전문 자문을 구해야 합니다. 본 약관은 당사에 신탁 의무를 생성하거나 부과하기 위한 것이 아니며, 그렇게 하지도 않습니다. 법률이 허용하는 최대 범위 내에서, 귀하는 당사가 귀하 또는 다른 당사자에게 신탁 의무 또는 책임을 지지 않으며, 그러한 의무 또는 책임이 법률 또는 형평법상 존재할 수 있는 범위 내에서, 그러한 의무 및 책임이 본 계약에 따라 불가역적으로 부인, 포기 및 제거됨을 인정하고 이에 동의합니다. 또한 귀하는 당사가 귀하에게 져야 할 유일한 의무와 의무가 본 약관에 명시적으로 명시된 의무와 의무라는 데 동의합니다.
16.6
통제
변경
.
당사가 제3자 법인에 의해 인수되거나 제3자 법인과 합병되거나, 당사가 판단하기에 사용자의 최선의 이익에 부합하는 계열사 또는 승계 법인 또는 기타 법인에 특정 기능을 양도하는 경우, 당사는 이러한 상황에서 해당 법률에 따라 합병, 인수, 매각 또는 기타 통제 변경의 일환으로 귀하로부터 수집한 데이터를 이전하거나 양도할 권리를 보유합니다.
16.7
불가항력
.
당사는 지연, 고장, 디지털 토큰의 상당한 시장 변동성으로 인해 직간접적으로 발생하는 서비스 중단, 모든 자연재해, 민간 또는 군 당국의 행위, 테러리스트의 행위, 시민 소요, 전쟁, 파업, 보건 비상사태, 노동 분쟁, 화재, 통신 또는 인터넷 서비스 또는 네트워크 공급자 서비스의 중단, 장비 또는 소프트웨어의 고장, 또는 당사의 합리적인 통제를 벗어난 어떠한 원인 또는 상태(각각, “불가항력 사건”)에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다. 불가항력적 사건의 발생은 본 약관의 나머지 조항의 유효성 및 집행 가능성에 영향을 미치지 않습니다.
16.8
앱
스토어
.
귀하가 Google Play Store(“배포 플랫폼”)를 포함하여 Apple 앱 스토어 이외의 앱 스토어 또는 배포 플랫폼에서 당사 앱을 다운로드하는 경우 귀하는 다음 사항에 동의합니다.
본 약관은 귀하와 당사 간에 체결되며, 배포 플랫폼 제공자(“스토어 제공자”)와는 체결되지 않습니다. 귀하의 앱 사용은 스토어 제공자의 당시 배포 플랫폼 서비스 약관을 준수해야 합니다. 스토어 제공자는 귀하가 앱을 획득한 배포 플랫폼의 제공자일 뿐입니다.
스토어 제공자가 아닌 당사가 앱에 대해 전적인 책임을 집니다.
스토어 제공자는 앱 또는 약관과 관련하여 귀하에게 어떠한 의무나 책임도 지지 않습니다.
귀하는 스토어 제공자가 앱과 관련된 약관의 제3자 수혜자임을 인정하고 이에 동의합니다.
16.9 Apple
앱
스토어
. 이 조항은 Apple 앱 스토어에서 앱을 획득한 경우에 적용됩니다. 귀하는 본 약관이 Apple, Inc.(“Apple”)가 아닌 귀하와 당사 간에만 체결되는 것이며, Apple은 앱 또는 그 콘텐츠에 대해 어떠한 책임도 지지 않는다는 것을 인정하고 이에 동의합니다 귀하의 앱 사용은 앱 스토어 서비스 약관을 준수해야 합니다.
귀하는 Apple이 앱과 관련하여 유지 보수 및 지원 서비스를 제공할 의무가 없음을 인정합니다. 앱이 해당 보증을 준수하지 못하는 경우, 귀하는 Apple에 통지할 수 있으며 (해당되는 경우) Apple은 앱의 구매 가격을 귀하에게 환불합니다. 해당 법률이 허용하는 최대 범위까지, Apple은 앱과 관련하여 어떠한 다른 보증 의무도 지지 않으며, 기타 모든 청구, 손실, 부채, 손해, 모든 보증 불이행으로 인한 비용 또는 경비는 본 약관 및 앱 제공자로서 당사에 적용되는 모든 법률에 의해서만 규율됩니다.
귀하는 Apple이 앱 또는 귀하의 앱 소유 및/또는 사용과 관련하여 귀하 또는 제3자의 청구를 처리할 책임이 없음을 인정합니다. 여기에는 (i) 제조물 책임 청구, (ii) 앱이 해당 법률 또는 규제 요건을 준수하지 못한다는 주장 및 (iii) 소비자 보호 또는 유사한 법률에 따라 발생하는 청구를 포함하나 이에 국한되지 않으며, 이러한 모든 청구에는 본 약관과 소프트웨어 제공자로서 당사에 적용되는 법률에 의해서만 규율됩니다.
귀하는 앱 또는 앱의 소유 및 사용이 제3자의 지식재산권을 침해한다는 제3자의 주장이 있는 경우, 본 약관에서 요구하는 범위 내에서 Apple이 아닌 TFH가 그러한 지식재산권 침해 주장의 조사, 방어, 합의 및 면제에 대한 전적인 책임이 있음을 인정합니다.
귀하는 (i) 귀하가 미국 정부의 금수 조치 대상 국가 또는 미국 정부가 “테러리스트 지원 국가”로 지정한 국가에 거주하지 않으며, (ii) 미국 정부의 금지 또는 제한 대상 목록에 등재되어 있지 않음을 진술하고 보증합니다.
귀하와 TFH는 Apple 및 Apple의 자회사가 귀하의 앱 라이선스와 관련된 서비스 약관의 제3자 수혜자이며, 귀하가 서비스 약관의 조건을 수락하면 Apple은 제3자 수혜자로서 귀하의 앱 라이선스와 관련된 서비스 약관을 귀하에게 집행할 권리가 있음을(그리고 그러한 권리를 수락한 것으로 간주됨) 인정하고 이에 동의합니다.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Terma dan Syarat Pengguna Tools For Humanity
Selamat datang ke World App! Terma ini antara anda dan Tools for Humanity Corporation, sebuah syarikat Delaware (secara kolektif, "TFH" atau “kami”) mentadbir penggunaan dan akses anda ke laman web dan aplikasi kami, termasuk World App dan Operator App (secara kolektif, “Apl”), dan semua fungsi yang berkaitan, kandungan, dan perkhidmatan yang kami sediakan kepada anda (secara kolektif, “Perkhidmatan” atau “Perkhidmatan Kami”) berkaitan dengan protokol World Network (“World Network”) dan ekosistem.
Sila baca Terma ini dengan teliti sebelum menggunakan atau mengakses Perkhidmatan. Dengan mengakses atau menggunakan mana-mana Perkhidmatan yang disediakan oleh kami, bersama-sama dengan persetujuan jelas anda kepada Terma ini, anda secara nyata bersetuju untuk terikat dengan Terma ini dan dengan Notis Privasi kami, yang dimasukkan sebagai sebahagian daripada Terma ini.  Sila ambil perhatian bahagian yang sangat penting dalam Terma ini:
Anda bersetuju untuk menyelesaikan apa-apa pertikaian antara anda dan TFH bukan di mahkamah sebaliknya melalui timbang tara yang mengikat. Jika anda tinggal di Korea Selatan, anda boleh memilih untuk menyelesaikan pertikaian di mahkamah tempatan yang berwibawa. Sila semak Seksyen 15 di bawah untuk mendapatkan butiran.
Produk Kripto, termasuk Token Digital, sebahagian besarnya tidak dikawal dan boleh menjadi sangat berisiko. Risiko kerugian pada transaksi ini tidak dilindungi undang-undang.
Tiada apa-apa dalam Perkhidmatan yang membentuk tawaran untuk menjual, atau permintaan tawaran untuk membeli, apa-apa sekuriti atau Token Digital. Perkhidmatan tidak boleh dianggap sebagai nasihat pelaburan. Memegang, membeli atau menjual apa-apa Token Digital (seperti yang ditakrifkan dalam Seksyen 2.1 di bawah) mungkin tidak dibenarkan di negara kediaman anda, dan adalah menjadi tanggungjawab anda untuk mematuhi semua undang-undang yang terpakai. Sila pertimbangkan sama ada membeli, menjual, menggunakan atau memegang Token Digital adalah sesuai untuk anda berdasarkan keadaan kewangan anda dan pemahaman anda tentang Token Digital. Nilai Token Digital lain mungkin berubah dengan cepat dan mungkin kehilangan semua nilainya.
Selain itu, token Worldcoin (“WLD”) tidak bertujuan tersedia untuk digunakan, dibeli atau diakses oleh individu AS, termasuk warga AS, pemastautin atau individu di Amerika Syarikat, atau syarikat yang diperbadankan, terletak atau bermastautin di Amerika Syarikat, atau yang mempunyai ejen berdaftar di Amerika Syarikat. Kami tidak menyediakan WLD kepada individu AS sedemikian. Selain itu, anda bersetuju bahawa anda tidak akan menjual, memindahkan atau menyediakan WLD kepada orang AS. Maklumat lanjut tentang risiko yang berkaitan dengan WLD boleh didapati di sini.
1. Skop Terma
1.1 Privasi dan Data Anda
. Apabila mengakses Aplikasi, anda boleh memberikan kami kategori maklumat peribadi, seperti nama atau nombor telefon anda. Jika anda memberikan maklumat untuk menetapkan bukti identiti diri dan untuk menuntut token WLD anda, anda boleh memberikan kategori khas data peribadi yang sensitif, seperti maklumat biometrik anda. Notis Privasi kami menerangkan data yang kami kumpul daripada anda dan cara kami menggunakannya. Tolong jangan gunakan Perkhidmatan jika anda tidak mahu kami mengumpul atau menggunakan data anda mengikut cara yang diterangkan dalam Notis Privasi.
1.2 Kelayakan.
Halaman Web yang menerangkan Perkhidmatan kami boleh diakses di seluruh dunia, tetapi ini tidak bermakna semua Perkhidmatan atau ciri perkhidmatan adalah sah atau tersedia di negara anda. Anda tidak boleh menggunakan VPN atau alat yang serupa untuk mengakses perkhidmatan yang disekat di negara anda. Adalah menjadi tanggungjawab anda untuk memastikan bahawa penggunaan  Perkhidmatan kami oleh anda adalah sah di mana anda menggunakannya. Perkhidmatan Kami tidak tersedia dalam semua bahasa. Perkhidmatan kami adalah sah di mana anda menggunakannya. Perkhidmatan Kami tidak tersedia dalam semua bahasa. Untuk menggunakan Perkhidmatan, anda mesti mematuhi Terma ini dan semua undang-undang yang terpakai. Anda tidak boleh menggunakan Perkhidmatan Kami untuk menjalankan, mempromosikan, atau membantu orang lain untuk menjalankan sebarang aktiviti yang menyalahi undang-undang.
Selain itu, anda mesti memenuhi semua kriteria yang berikut:
Anda berumur 18 tahun ke atas; dan
Anda
tidak
berada di, bawah kawalan, warganegara atau pemastautin: Syria, Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson dan Zaporizhzhia wilayah Ukraine, Rusia, Korea Utara, Iran, Cuba, atau mana-mana negara atau wilayah lain yang dengannya Amerika Syarikat, Kesatuan Eropah, atau mana-mana negara atau bidang kuasa telah menyekat akses kepada Perkhidmatan;
Anda bukan seorang “Warganegara Khas yang Ditetapkan” oleh Pejabat Kawalan Aset Asing (Office of Foreign Assets Control, “OFAC”) di bawah Jabatan Kewangan Amerika Syarikat atau tersenarai dalam sekatan mana-mana negara lain, dan nama anda tidak tersenarai dalam Senarai Orang Dilarang Jabatan Perdagangan Amerika Syarikat atau senarai orang yang dilarang mana-mana negara lain.
Jika anda tidak memenuhi semua keperluan ini, anda tidak dibenarkan untuk mengakses atau menggunakan Perkhidmatan, dan, dengan itu, kami mungkin menyekat akses atau penggunaan anda terhadap Perkhidmatan.
Selain itu, jika anda menetap atau berada di Jerman atau mempunyai tempat kediaman tetap atau pejabat berdaftar di sana, anda tidak dibenarkan mengakses atau menggunakan perkhidmatan pihak ketiga yang dimaksudkan dalam Seksyen 2.5 atau aplikasi desentralisasi yang dimaksudkan dalam Seksyen 2.8. Ciri-ciri ini tidak tersedia untuk anda.
1.3 Ketersediaan
. Halaman Web yang menerangkan Perkhidmatan boleh diakses di seluruh dunia, tetapi ini tidak bermakna semua Perkhidmatan atau ciri perkhidmatan adalah sah atau tersedia di negara anda. Akses kepada Perkhidmatan tertentu (atau ciri Perkhidmatan tertentu) di negara tertentu mungkin disekat oleh kami atau kerajaan negara lain. Anda tidak boleh menggunakan VPN atau alat yang serupa untuk mengakses perkhidmatan yang disekat di negara anda. Akses kepada Aplikasi, dan ciri tertentu dalam Aplikasi, mungkin tidak tersedia atau terhad, bergantung pada lokasi anda.
Adalah menjadi tanggungjawab anda untuk memastikan bahawa penggunaan Perkhidmatan anda sah di mana anda menggunakannya
. Perkhidmatan tidak tersedia dalam semua bahasa.
1.4 Kemas Kini
. Kami boleh membuat perubahan pada Terma ini dari semasa ke semasa. Jika kami berbuat demikian, kami akan kemas kini terma yang tersedia pada Perkhidmatan dan jika dikehendaki oleh undang-undang yang terpakai, kami akan memaklumkan anda sebelum membuat sebarang perubahan dan jika perubahan tersebut mungkin penting atau merugikan anda, kami akan memberikan notis awal tambahan jika dikehendaki oleh undang-undang yang terpakai. Anda faham dan bersetuju dengan penggunaan Perkhidmatan yang berterusan oleh anda selepas kami membuat sebarang perubahan sedemikian dan di mana anda tidak membantah secara khusus perkara yang sama dianggap bahawa anda bersetuju menerima Terma yang dikemas kini. Anda boleh berhenti menggunakan Perkhidmatan pada bila-bila masa jika anda tidak bersetuju dengan Terma ini. Oleh kerana Perkhidmatan berkembang dari semasa ke semasa, kami mungkin mengubah atau menghentikan semua atau mana-mana bahagian Perkhidmatan, pada bila-bila masa dan tanpa notis, mengikut budi bicara mutlak kami, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai.
1.5 Terma Tambahan.
Terma dan syarat tambahan mungkin dikenakan pada aplikasi, kandungan, ciri atau bahagian tertentu Perkhidmatan, dan semua terma dan syarat tambahan yang kami berikan kepada anda akan menjadi sebahagian daripada Terma ini.
2. Perkhidmatan
2.1 Dompet Tanpa Penyeliaan.
World App termasuk dompet yang tidak mempunyai hos dan tidak diselia untuk memegang mata wang kripto, mata wang digital atau Token Digital yang disokong (termasuk WLD dan secara kolektif, “Token Digital”). Anda mengawal Token Digital yang disimpan dalam dompet anda. Dengan World App, kunci peribadi (yang mewakili kata laluan untuk mengakses Token Digital) disimpan terus pada peranti anda. Pada bila-bila masa, tertakluk kepada akses internet dan kesesakan pada rantaian blok, anda boleh menarik balik Token Digital anda dengan menghantarnya ke alamat rantaian blok yang berbeza. Apabila menyimpan Token Digital anda dalam dompet tersebut, kami tidak mempunyai kawalan ke atas dompet, Token Digital atau kunci peribadi anda. Pengguna bertanggungjawab terhadap risiko kehilangan kunci peribadi mereka dan TFH mahupun World App tidak dapat mendapatkan semula kunci tersebut.
Memandangkan World App ialah dompet tanpa penyeliaan, anda akan diberikan alamat dompet di mana Token Digital anda disimpan pada rantaian blok yang sepadan. Kami tidak mempunyai keupayaan untuk mengakses Token Digital anda.
2.2 Token Digital yang Disokong.
World App menyokong token ERC-20 tertentu. Kami mungkin menambah sokongan untuk Token Digital tambahan pada masa hadapan. World App memaparkan Token Digital yang disokong.
Pastikan anda menyemak token dan rangkaian mana yang disokong dalam World App sebelum anda mendeposit atau mengeluarkan Token Digital anda. Kami tidak dapat mendapatkan semula Token Digital anda jika anda menghantar token yang tidak disokong atau menghantar Token Digital ke alamat dompet yang salah.
Anda memahami bahawa menghantar Token Digital yang tidak disokong ke alamat dompet World App mungkin bermakna anda akan kehilangan akses sepenuhnya kepada Token Digital tersebut. Kami tidak boleh mendapatkan semula Token Digital. Sila pastikan anda menghantar Token Digital yang betul ke alamat dompet yang betul pada setiap masa. Anda mungkin ingin menguji transaksi dengan sejumlah kecil Token Digital.
2.3 Tawaran dan Akses.
Apabila anda berinteraksi dengan Token Digital anda - seperti menghantarnya ke alamat dompet lain atau menyambung ke aplikasi yang diedarkan - menggunakan Perkhidmatan, anda akan dikehendaki untuk meluluskan atau “menandatangani” interaksi melalui peranti yang telah anda kenal pasti semasa proses pengenalan. Aplikasi ini bergantung sepenuhnya pada kelulusan anda daripada peranti ini untuk memulakan interaksi dengan rantaian blok yang berkaitan. Anda memahami bahawa anda berinteraksi secara langsung dengan rantaian blok yang berkaitan apabila anda melakukan interaksi ini, dan kami tidak bertanggungjawab untuk menghantar pesanan bagi pihak anda.
2.4 Maklumat tentang Pihak Ketiga.
Dengan menggunakan Perkhidmatan, anda mungkin mempunyai akses kepada maklumat yang berkaitan dengan Token Digital anda, seperti, tetapi tidak terhad kepada, nilai pasaran semasa mereka. Penyampaian maklumat ini tidak bermaksud ada sebarang kaitan atau memberi sokongan kepada pihak ketiga, walaupun terdapat fungsi tertentu dalam Perkhidmatan yang memerlukan penggunaan produk daripada pihak ketiga tersebut. Kandungan perkhidmatan dan produk pihak ketiga seperti yang dinyatakan melalui Perkhidmatan ini adalah berdasarkan maklumat yang disediakan secara umum atau oleh pihak ketiga kepada kami, dan oleh itu kami tidak membuat pernyataan atau jaminan tentang ketepatan maklumat berkaitan perkhidmatan atau produk pihak ketiga tersebut.
2.5 Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga
Pengguna yang menetap atau berada di Jerman atau mempunyai tempat kediaman tetap atau pejabat berdaftar di sana tidak boleh menggunakan Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga untuk menjual atau menukar Token Digital mereka di bawah Seksyen ini.
Di mana tersedia, Perkhidmatan mungkin menyediakan pautan kepada pemproses pihak ketiga untuk memproses transaksi seperti pembelian fiat Token Digital, penjualan Token Digital, pertukaran Token Digital, dan fungsi lain yang mungkin ada pada masa akan datang. Anda boleh melihat perkhidmatan pihak ketiga yang tersedia dalam World App. Apabila anda melakukan transaksi ini, anda membuat transaksi dengan pihak ketiga dan bukan kami. Anda mesti mengikut arahan berkaitan yang diberikan oleh pembekal pihak ketiga dan menerima terma perkhidmatan mereka. Kami tidak mengawal atau menghantar dana atau Token Digital anda pada bila-bila masa semasa menyediakan Perkhidmatan kami, atau apabila anda mengakses perkhidmatan pihak ketiga.
2.6 Transaksi Sesama Rakan.
Perkhidmatan menyediakan platform komunikasi yang membolehkan anda menghantar kepada, atau meminta, menerima, dan menyimpan Token Digital yang disokong daripada, dompet rantaian blok lain, sama ada dikawal oleh anda atau pihak ketiga. Pemindahan token digital yang disokong antara dompet rantaian blok lain anda dan kepada pihak ketiga serta daripada pihak ketiga adalah dianggap sebagai pemindahan. Pihak yang memulakan transaksi bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk melaksanakan transaksi dengan betul, yang mungkin termasuk, antara lain, membayar fi rangkaian atau fi pelombong secukupnya untuk memastikan transaksi berjaya. Fi rangkaian yang tidak mencukupi boleh menyebabkan pemindahan kekal tertangguh dan boleh mengakibatkan kelewatan atau kerugian yang ditanggung akibat ralat permulaan transaksi. Kami tidak mempunyai kewajipan untuk membantu dalam pemulihan transaksi tersebut. Apabila anda menghantar sebarang Token Digital dari dompet anda ke dompet rantaian blok yang lain, pemindahan tersebut dilaksanakan secara rantaian oleh anda dan bukan di bawah kawalan kami. Anda harus mengesahkan semua maklumat transaksi sebelum menyerahkannya. Kami tidak menanggung liabiliti atau tanggungjawab sekiranya anda memasukkan alamat destinasi rantaian blok yang salah. Pemindahan Token Digital tidak boleh berbalik sebaik sahaja ia telah disiarkan ke rangkaian rantaian blok yang berkaitan, walaupun ia mungkin dalam keadaan tertangguh, dan ditetapkan dengan sewajarnya, sementara transaksi diproses oleh pengendali rangkaian. Kami tidak mengawal rangkaian dan tidak memberi jaminan bahawa pemindahan akan disahkan oleh rangkaian.
2.7 Vault
2.7.1 Maklumat umum
. World App menawarkan antara muka pengguna untuk mengakses “vault” yang desentralisasi untuk Token Digital (“Vault”) anda. Penggunaan Vault dianggap sebagai pengakuan dan penerimaan anda terhadap terma-terma yang mentadbir Vault serta apa-apa terma tambahan yang dinyatakan oleh pihak ketiga yang membangunkan atau menyediakan ciri yang berkaitan dengan atau muncul akibat penggunaan Vault oleh anda.
Vault hanya menyokong Token Digital tertentu. Token Digital ini tidak dianggap sebagai Token yang Dirujuk Aset atau Token E-Money, dalam terma yang ditetapkan oleh Peraturan (Kesatuan Eropah) 2023/1114 bagi Parlimen Eropah dan bagi Majlis 31 Mei 2023 untuk pasaran dalam aset kripto. Token Digital yang disokong akan dipaparkan dalam World App apabila anda mengakses Vault. Token Digital yang disokong oleh Vault mungkin berubah dari masa ke masa, dan tiada jaminan bahawa Token Digital yang disokong akan kekal tersedia untuk digunakan dalam Vault.
Vault disediakan dengan sambungan kepada kontrak pintar pihak ketiga. Tiada orang atau entiti lain, selain anda, yang boleh berinteraksi dengan Vault anda atau Token Digital dalam Vault anda. TFH atau pihak ketiga lain juga tidak mempunyai kunci atau akses pentadbiran (Khas atau sebaliknya) kepada Vault anda atau kontrak pintar yang berkaitan. Deposit ke dalam atau pengeluaran daripada, Vault atau mana-mana Token Digital bagi akaun anda hanya boleh berlaku, jika transaksi tersebut ditandakan dengan kunci(-kunci) peribadi anda seperti yang dinyatakan dalam Bahagian 2.1 dalam Terma-terma ini. Ini bermakna, sekiranya anda kehilangan akses atau kawalan terhadap kunci(-kunci) peribadi, anda tidak akan boleh membuat apa-apa deposit atau pengeluaran Token Digital dari Vault dan tiada pihak lain yang akan dapat membantu anda atau melakukannya bagi pihak anda. Seterusnya, penggunaan Vault tidak dan tidak boleh, memberikan anda apa-apa perkhidmatan hak jagaan, penjaminan atau pemindahan oleh TFH atau mana-mana pihak ketiga berkaitan apa-apa Token Digital yang anda mungkin telah kunci menggunakan Vault pada akaun anda.
Kontrak pintar yang mentadbir fungsi Vault bagi token WLD boleh dilihat menggunakan rantaian blok di sini. Untuk kejelasan, penggunaan dan apa-apa fungsi lain berkaitan Vault adalah tertakluk kepada Penafian Jaminan yang terkandung dalam Bahagian 12 Terma-terma ini.
2.7.2 Fungsi Vault
. Buat masa ini Vault menawarkan beberapa ciri berikut yang mungkin diubah, dikeluarkan atau ditambah oleh THF atau pihak ketiga:  Penguncian, Hasil, Pengeluaran dan Tempoh Keselamatan, Pemberian Vault.
2.7.3 Penguncian
. Dengan menggunakan Vault, anda bersetuju untuk mengunci Token Digital anda untuk satu tempoh masa. Mengunci Token Digital anda menggunakan Vault akan memindahkan Token Digital dari dompet bukan jagaan kepada kontrak pintar desentralisasi. Selepas pemindahan, Token Digital ini akan “terkunci” di dalam vault dengan tempoh ia kekal dideposit dalam Vault mengikut tempoh yang telah ditetapkan atau “Tempoh Sekuriti” yang diterangkan dengan lebih lanjut di bawah. Semasa Token Digital anda dikunci, anda tidak dapat mengakses, memindahkan atau melakukan apa-apa transaksi lain sehingga anda meminta untuk mengeluarkan token tersebut dan membenarkan Tempoh Sekuriti yang terpakai berlalu. Tiada siapa termasuk TFH atau Penyedia pihak ketiga yang boleh membuka, menjaga, mengawal, mengeluarkan atau memindahkan Token Digital anda yang dikunci. Penyimpanan Token Digital anda di dalam Vault dan menjadikannya tertakluk kepada penguncian dan sekatan pengeluaran tidak membentuk jualan, pinjaman atau pindahan apa-apa hak, pangkat atau manfaat dalam Token Digital kepada TFH atau mana-mana pihak ketiga lain.
Mengunci Token Digital anda dalam Vault tidak menjamin keselamatan atau penjagaan Token Digital anda. Tiada skim insurans deposit atau apa-apa perlindungan sama terpakai kepada Token Digital anda dan nilai dan/atau penggunaan apa-apa Token Digital yang telah anda kunci mungkin meningkat atau berkurang sepanjang Tempoh Sekuriti. Ini bermaksud nilai atau penggunaan apa-apa Token Digital yang dikunci dalam Vault boleh berkurang atau menjadi sifar semasa Tempoh Sekuriti. Anda faham dan bersetuju bahawa apa-apa pengeluaran Token Digital dari akaun anda selepas Tempoh Sekuriti yang tertakluk boleh menjadikan nilai Token Digital lebih rendah atau tiada nilai, berbanding pada waktu anda menguncinya dalam Vault anda dan TFH atau mana-mana pihak ketiga tidak menanggung risiko tanggungjawab kemerosotan nilai yang mungkin berlaku.
2.7.4 Hasil
. Anda juga mungkin layak untuk menjana apa, untuk tujuan produk ini, dirujuk sebagai “hasil” pada Token Digital tertentu dalam Vault anda. Hasil ini, iaitu dalam bentuk Token Digital tambahan disediakan oleh pihak ketiga melalui satu siri operasi kontrak pintar berasingan yang boleh anda akses menggunakan antara muka yang disediakan dalam World App. TFH atau mana-mana pihak ketiga tidak menggunakan, mengambil alih kawalan, menerima sebarang kredit untuk atau sebaliknya melupuskan Token Digital anda. Oleh itu, hasil bukanlah faedah yang terikat kepada atau dijana oleh apa-apa selain daripada mengunci Token Digital anda mengikut terma dan spesifikasi yang disediakan. Apa-apa hasil yang anda terima disediakan untuk anda sebagai pemberian oleh pihak ketiga berdasarkan keputusan anda untuk menyimpan Token Digital menggunakan Vault. Spesifikasi yang menentukan penjanaan hasil, termasuk jumlah yang dijanan atau masa di mana ia mungkin terakru, boleh berubah atau dibatalkan pada bila-bila masa atas budi bicara Penyedia pihak ketiga.
Kemungkinan terdapat jumlah maksimum hasil yang boleh anda peroleh. Butiran ini akan dipaparkan bersama-sama Vault anda dan menerusi mana-mana terma tambahan yang disediakan oleh pihak ketiga (dikenali sebagai “Penyedia” dalam World App) yang menyediakan hasil. Terma-terma tambahan ini turut dimasukkan ke dalam Terma-terma ini. Hasil tidak disediakan atau diberikan oleh TFH.
Apa-apa hasil yang terakru hanya akan diagihkan kepada anda selepas pengeluaran lengkap untuk mana-mana Token Digital yang menjana hasil dari Vault, yang berlaku hanya selepas tamat Tempoh Sekuriti. Pengeluaran ini adalah syarat akhir bagi mana-mana pemberian hasil, bermaksud anda tidak mempunyai hak, pangkat atau faedah dalam mana-mana hasil yang dijana atau akan dijana melainkan dan sehingga masa hasil telah diterima dalam dompet bukan jagaan anda. Ini juga bermaksud jika anda hilang akses atau kawalan kepada kunci(-kunci) peribadi anda, anda tidak boleh membuat pengeluaran yang melayakkan anda menerima hasil.
2.7.5 Pengeluaran dan Tempoh Sekuriti
. Anda boleh mula mengeluarkan Token Digital dari Vault anda pada bila-bila masa. Token Digital yang anda telah minta untuk dikeluarkan dari Vault akan dipulangkan kepada anda selepas berlalu satu tempoh yang telah ditetapkan terdahulu, iaitu “Tempoh Sekuriti”. Setiap kali anda membuat pengeluaran Token Digital dari Vault, Tempoh Sekuriti baharu akan bermula dan kiraan detik sehingga Token Digital dipulangkan kepada anda. Semasa tempoh ini, Token Digital anda telah pilih untuk dikeluarkan akan kekal dikunci dan anda juga boleh membatalkan pengeluaran. Selepas Tempoh Sekuriti berlalu, pengeluaran anda akan lengkap dan Token Digital bersama-sama dengan hasil yang dijana yang terakru akan dihantar ke dompet anda. Tempoh masa bagi Tempoh Sekuriti akan dinyatakan dalam World App apabila anda mengakses Vault anda.
2.7.6 Pemberian Vault
. Apabila ciri ini dipilih, ia membolehkan anda untuk menghantar Pemberian WLD secara automatik kepada Vault pada akaun anda dan bukan ke dompet. Anda boleh menukar tetapan ini pada bila-bila masa.
2.7.7 TFH dan Vault
. Akses kepada ciri ini dibuat melalui World App. Walaubagaimanapun, TFH hanya boleh membaca data berkaitan dan memaparkannya untuk anda. TFH tidak boleh memindahkan, mengeluarkan atau mendeposit mana-mana Token Digital anda dan tidak mempunyai akses kepada Vault anda.
2.8 Aplikasi Desentralisasi
Bahagian ini tidak terpakai kepada pengguna yang menetap atau berada di Jerman atau mempunyai tempat kediaman tetap atau pejabat berdaftar di sana:
Di mana tersedia,
kami mungkin mempunyai fungsi yang membolehkan anda menyambungkan dompet anda kepada pelbagai aplikasi desentralisasi. Anda bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk memastikan keselamatan dan perlindungan aplikasi pihak ketiga ini. Kami tidak mempunyai kawalan ke atas aplikasi pihak ketiga dan tidak dapat memberikan sokongan untuk sebarang masalah yang mungkin anda hadapi semasa menyambung dengan aplikasi pihak ketiga.
2.9 Sokongan Pengguna
. Kami menyediakan sokongan pengguna untuk bantuan dengan ciri dan fungsi tertentu yang berkaitan dengan Perkhidmatan. Untuk berhubung, pilih “Sokongan” daripada menu dalam apl atau melalui support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Antara muka World ID
. Worldcoin Foundation, dan bukannya TFH, mengendalikan Protokol World ID dan mengawal pemprosesan data berkaitan Orb untuk mengesahkan World ID. Kami mungkin menyediakan Protokol World ID kepada anda (sebagai antara muka) melalui Perkhidmatan. Protokol World ID membolehkan anda membuktikan diri anda sebagai manusia unik dan sebenar, di samping melindungi privasi anda.
2.11 Program Jemputan
. Jika tersedia, kami boleh menyediakan ciri ‘Jemputan’ untuk anda. Dengan Jemputan, anda boleh menjemput rakan-rakan dan keluarga untuk memuat turun World App an mendapatkan pengesahan untuk World ID. Jika anda menggunakan Jemputan, anda bersetuju dengan terma dan syarat berikut:
Ganjaran untuk menyertai Jemputan disediakan oleh World Assets Limited. World Assets Limited boleh, mengikut budi bicara mutlaknya, menawarkan ganjaran kepada anda kerana menjemput pengguna yang berjaya mengesahkan World ID mereka. Untuk menerima ganjaran, anda mesti memenuhi syarat tertentu, yang akan diterangkan kepada anda dalam World App. Anda mempunyai had maksimum untuk berapa banyak pengguna yang boleh anda rujuk ke World App. Had ini dipaparkan dalam World App.
Tiada pembelian diperlukan untuk menyertai ciri Jemputan. Jemputan hanya tersedia untuk kegunaan peribadi, bukan komersial. Anda hanya boleh menggunakan ciri Jemputan dengan niat baik untuk tujuan yang sah. Anda tidak boleh: (a) menggunakan Jemputan atau Perkhidmatan dengan cara yang menipu, membuat penipuan atau menyalahi undang-undang; (b) melakukan apa-apa yang boleh merosakkan jenama, reputasi atau imej baik kami; (c) menghantar bahan pengiklanan atau promosi yang tidak diminta atau tidak dibenarkan; (d) membuat tuntutan palsu atau mengelirukan; (e) menggunakan carian berbayar, media berbayar atau aktiviti lain yang seumpamanya untuk mendapatkan pengguna melalui Jemputan; dan (f) menggunakan Jemputan untuk mencuba mendapatkan maklumat peribadi daripada pengguna lain.
Jemputan tidak tersedia di semua negara atau lokasi dan tidak tersedia untuk semua pengguna. Penyertaan dalam Jemputan tidak tersedia dalam mana-mana bidang kuasa di mana semua atau mana-mana bahagian ciri ini mungkin melanggar (atau menyebabkan kami melanggar) sebarang keperluan undang-undang. Anda bersetuju untuk tidak menggunakan Jemputan jika ciri Jemputan tidak mengikut undang-undang yang terpakai di lokasi anda.
Jemputan disediakan mengikut budi bicara kami. Kami boleh menukar, mengubah suai, menggantung dan membatalkan ciri ini pada bila-bila masa. World Assets Limited mungkin menolak untuk memberi ganjaran kepada anda kerana mengundang pengguna untuk mengesahkan World ID mereka jika ia memutuskan, atas budi bicaranya sendiri, bahawa anda telah melanggar Terma-terma ini.
2.12 Pemberian & Tempahan WLD
. Salah satu perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga adalah menuntut sejumlah kecil WLD pada selang waktu berbeza (“Pemberian WLD”). Pemberian WLD disediakan oleh World Assets Limited, anak syarikat Worldcoin Foundation. Jumlah tepat, selang waktu dan masa kedua-dua Pemberian WLD akan dinyatakan dalam World App, tetapi ditentukan sepenuhnya oleh World Assets Limited. Selaras dengan versi terdahulu terma ini, Tempahan WLD yang tersedia sebelum ini tidak menjamin bahawa anda akan menerima sebarang jumlah Pemberian WLD. Jumlah tepat, selang waktu dan masa kedua-dua Tempahan WLD akan dinyatakan dalam World App, tetapi ditentukan sepenuhnya oleh World Assets Limited. Tempahan WLD mungkin tamat tempoh, dengan atau tanpa notis awal dalam World App, tidak kira sama ada anda telah membuat Tempahan WLD atau menerima Pemberian WLD yang berkaitan. Ia boleh dibatalkan mengikut budi bicara mutlak World Assets Limited.
2.13 Operator App
. Untuk Pengendali-pengendali Orb dan rakan kongsi lain, kami menyediakan Operator App yang membolehkan anda memantau aktiviti dan statistik tertentu yang berkaitan dengan anda dan perniagaan anda sebagai Pengendali Orb. Kami juga mungkin menyediakan ciri tertentu untuk membantu anda menjalankan perniagaan anda sebagai Pengendali Orb.
2.14. Miniapps
. "Miniapps" ialah ciri World App yang membolehkan anda mengakses platform aplikasi mini yang boleh diakses dalam World App. Kami mempunyai budi bicara mutlak untuk menentukan cara Miniapps dipaparkan dalam World App. Anda mesti mempunyai alamat dompet World App untuk mengakses Miniapps.
Anda mengakui bahawa dengan memaparkan Miniapps, TFH menyediakan platform teknologi yang hanya menghubungkan pengguna. TFH tidak pernah menghantar, menyimpan, memiliki, menjaga atau terlibat dengan mana-mana mata wang tradisional atau digital. TFH tidak memproses transaksi, bertindak sebagai pemproses pembayaran, atau sebaliknya terlibat dalam pemprosesan transaksi. TFH bukan pihak terlibat dalam transaksi dan tidak mempunyai liabiliti berhubung dengan transaksi ini. TFH tidak dapat memberikan sokongan berkaitan masalah transaksi.
2.14.1 Transaksi dan Pembayaran yang berkaitan dengan Miniapps
. Miniapps dipaparkan dalam World App dan mungkin menawarkan barangan atau perkhidmatan yang boleh dibeli Pengguna World App menggunakan Token Digital dalam dompet World App mereka. Transaksi ini berlaku antara anda dan apl mini tersebut.  TFH tidak terlibat dalam sebarang transaksi sedemikian.
Berkenaan dengan mana-mana transaksi sedemikian, anda mengakui bahawa dompet World App ialah perkhidmatan tanpa jagaan, bahawa TFH tidak menyimpan atau menjaga Token Digital anda dan tidak membuat transaksi, menghantar, memiliki, atau sebaliknya terlibat dalam proses transaksi. Token Digital sentiasa disimpan dan dihantar pada rangkaian rantaian blok masing-masing. Tiada jaminan transaksi akan diproses dengan betul.
TFH hanya menghubungkan anda dengan pihak ketiga dalam platform Miniapps dan tidak mengambil bahagian dalam sebarang transaksi. TFH tidak memproses pembayaran dan mengawal bayaran balik atau caj pembatalan.
Sebaik sahaja anda memutuskan untuk membuat transaksi, anda mesti menghantar jumlah dan jenis Token Digital yang dipersetujui. TFH tidak memproses Token Digital atau mata wang tradisional pengguna dan tidak melakukan sebarang pemindahan bagi pihak pengguna. TFH tidak mengendalikan, mengurus, mengawasi, mengesahkan atau memberikan apa-apa jenis waranti ke atas sebarang transaksi.  Sekiranya transaksi tidak diterima, diterbalikkan, tidak diproses dengan betul atau sebaliknya mempunyai masalah, anda dan penyedia pihak ketiga mesti bekerjasama untuk menyelesaikan sebarang isu. Sebarang pertikaian, tuntutan, kerugian, salah faham, kesilapan teknikal atau apa-apa jenis isu (tidak disengajakan dan kononnya disengajakan) yang berkaitan dengan pembayaran atau transaksi mesti ditangani secara langsung antara anda dan penyedia pihak ketiga.  TFH tidak bertanggungjawab ke atas perkara ini dan tidak akan menjadi pihak kepada sebarang pertikaian atau perbincangan berkaitan pembayaran, dan juga tidak bertanggungjawab ke atas sebarang kerugian atau kerosakan yang mungkin ditanggung oleh pihak terbabit.
Anda bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk menerima risiko sebarang turun naik harga berkenaan dengan nilai Token Digital, dan memahami bahawa pada masa anda menyelesaikan transaksi, nilai Token Digital yang terlibat dalam transaksi mungkin telah berubah banyak.
2.14.2 Pihak Ketiga
. Produk dan perkhidmatan yang dipaparkan dalam mana-mana apl mini ditawarkan dan diuruskan oleh pihak ketiga. Dengan menggunakan Miniapps, anda mengakui dan bersetuju bahawa:
Terma ini adalah antara anda dan kami, dan bukan dengan mana-mana apl mini tertentu;
Anda sedang mengakses apl yang dibangunkan dan/atau disediakan oleh apl pihak ketiga, pihak yang bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk apl mini itu;
TFH hanya menyediakan akses kepada penyedia pembayaran pihak ketiga melalui dompet World App, dan tidak memproses pembayaran atau menahan dana;
Apl mini tersebut mungkin mempunyai terma tambahan sebagai sebahagian daripada produk atau perkhidmatan mereka yang anda mesti patuhi jika anda menerima perkhidmatan mereka; dan
Anda mengakui sepenuhnya dan secara eksplisit menanggung mana-mana dan semua risiko berkaitan dengan transaksi, dan bersetuju bahawa kami tidak akan bertanggungjawab ke atas sebarang risiko atau akibat buruk yang timbul daripada transaksi tersebut.
Pembangun individu apl mini yang tersedia di Miniapps bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya ke atas kandungan, produk, barangan atau perkhidmatan yang disediakan kepada anda secara langsung melalui apl mini masing-masing. Untuk sebarang pertanyaan atau pertikaian, anda hendaklah hubungi terus Pembangun apl mini masing-masing.
Pengguna menerima semua risiko berkaitan dengan pelaksanaan transaksi, termasuk risiko bahawa mereka tidak akan menerima hasil pembelian atau penjualan mereka. Sekiranya berlaku masalah berhubung dengan mana-mana transaksi, TFH tidak dapat membantu menyelesaikan masalah tersebut, dan tidak bertanggungjawab untuk masalah yang timbul daripada sebarang transaksi.
2.14.3 Fi TFH
. Kami mungkin menambah fi untuk penggunaan Miniapps apabila anda membuat transaksi dengan Pembangun. Jumlah fi ini akan dipaparkan kepada anda dalam platform. Semua fi terkini akan dipaparkan seperti yang tertera dalam Miniapps dan mungkin dikemas kini serta diubah dari semasa ke semasa.
2.14.4 Cukai
. Anda bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk menentukan sama ada, dan sejauh mana, apa-apa cukai dikenakan ke atas sebarang transaksi melalui atau dalam Miniapps, serta untuk mengekalkan, mengumpul, melaporkan, dan membuat pembayaran jumlah cukai yang tepat kepada pihak berkuasa cukai yang berkaitan.
2.14.5 Tiada pemantauan am.
TFH tidak akan mempunyai kewajipan umum untuk memantau maklumat yang dijana oleh pengguna, mahupun secara aktif untuk mencari fakta atau keadaan yang menunjukkan sebarang aktiviti haram dalam Miniapps.
Walau bagaimanapun, jika kami mendapat tahu, tanpa mengira cara, bahawa produk atau perkhidmatan haram telah ditawarkan melalui Miniapps kepada pengguna yang menetap di Kesatuan Eropah, kami akan memaklumkan pengguna yang telah membeli produk atau perkhidmatan haram melalui Miniapps
.
2.14.6 Aktiviti Dilarang
. Pengguna Perkhidmatan Miniapps bersetuju untuk tidak menyiarkan atau mengedarkan sebarang kandungan yang melanggar mana-mana undang-undang atau melanggar mana-mana hak pihak ketiga, termasuk tetapi tidak terhad kepada sebarang hak harta intelek, hak privasi atau hak publisiti.
Selain itu, anda bersetuju untuk tidak terlibat dalam sebarang aktiviti yang:
Menyalahi undang-undang, berbentuk penipuan, atau berbahaya;
Mengganggu atau mengacau operasi Miniapps;
Melanggar mana-mana terma yang ditetapkan dalam Garis Panduan Apl kami; dan
Menyertakan kandungan yang tidak dibenarkan di bawah Garis Panduan Apl.
2.14.7 Kandungan haram yang dilaporkan
. World App mempunyai mekanisme yang mudah diakses dan mesra pengguna untuk pengguna melaporkan kepada kami tentang kandungan haram dalam platform Miniapps. Kami akan bertindak segera untuk menyemak laporan tersebut.
2.14.8 Mengalih keluar kandungan haram
. Jika kami menentukan bahawa mana-mana apl mini mengandungi kandungan haram atau menawarkan produk atau perkhidmatan haram, kandungan, produk atau perkhidmatan tersebut akan dialih keluar daripada Miniapps. TFH akan memberikan pernyataan sebab yang ringkas, jelas dan khusus kepada mana-mana penyiar kandungan atau perkhidmatan haram.
Sebarang sekatan yang dikuatkuasakan oleh World App kepada penggunanya akan dilakukan dengan tekun, objektif dan berkadar.
Pengguna yang percaya kandungan mereka telah dialih keluar atau akses kepadanya telah ditarik secara tidak wajar boleh menghubungi kami melalui
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
untuk membuat rayuan tentang perkara tersebut. Kami menyediakan sistem aduan elektronik percuma yang membolehkan pengguna membuat aduan tentang keputusan kami berkaitan dengan pengalihan keluar kandungan, penggantungan perkhidmatan, penamatan akaun atau sekatan pengewangan kerana kandungan yang didakwa haram atau pelanggaran terma.
2.14.9 Moderasi kandungan.
TFH berhak untuk menggantung, untuk tempoh masa yang munasabah dan selepas mengeluarkan amaran awal di mana dikehendaki di sisi undang-undang untuk berbuat demikian, penyediaan perkhidmatan kami kepada pengguna yang sering memberikan kandungan haram yang nyata. TFH juga boleh menangguhkan pemprosesan notis dan aduan daripada pengguna yang kerap mengemukakan tuntutan tidak berasas.
2.15. Nama pengguna
. Nama pengguna World App anda tidak semestinya menggunakan nama sebenar anda. Apabila memilih nama pengguna, anda diwajibkan untuk mematuhi
Dasar Nama Pengguna
dalam versi terbarunya.
3. Pembelian, Yuran, dan Cukai
3.1 Yuran Transaksi
. Dengan menggunakan Perkhidmatan, anda bersetuju untuk membayar semua yuran yang berkenaan, termasuk yuran transaksi untuk pertukaran dan transaksi Token Digital. Kami akan memberitahu anda tentang sebarang bayaran yang dikenakan sebelum anda membuat transaksi. Jika anda menggunakan perkhidmatan pembayaran pihak ketiga, fi bank, fi kad kredit dan kad debit untuk pembelian Token Digital mungkin akan ditolak daripada jumlah nilai pembelian Token Digital anda. Anda juga bertanggungjawab untuk membayar apa-apa bayaran tambahan yang dikenakan oleh pembekal perkhidmatan kewangan anda.
3.2 Fi Rangkaian
. Setiap interaksi dengan rantaian blok akan dikenakan fi rangkaian. Fi rangkaian dikenakan oleh dan dibayar kepada rangkaian rantaian blok, bukan kepada kami, untuk memudahkan sebarang interaksi. Dalam sesetengah kes, anda mungkin layak untuk jumlah terhad transaksi tanpa gas dalam tempoh masa tertentu yang ditentukan mengikut budi bicara penuh TFH. Transaksi sedemikian tertakluk kepada nilai transaksi minimum yang boleh diselaraskan oleh TFH.
3.3 Cukai
. Anda bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk menentukan sama ada, dan sejauh mana, apa-apa cukai dikenakan ke atas sebarang transaksi melalui Perkhidmatan, serta untuk mengekalkan, mengumpul, melaporkan, dan membuat pembayaran jumlah cukai yang tepat kepada pihak berkuasa cukai yang berkaitan.
3.4 Kemas Kini
. Semua fi ditunjukkkan dan adalah yang terkini seperti yang tertera dalam Perkhidmatan dan mungkin dikemas kini serta diubah dari semasa ke semasa.
4. Faktor Risiko
4.1 Bukan Tender Sah.
Token Digital bukan tender yang sah, tidak disokong oleh mana-mana kerajaan, dan akaun Token Digital dan baki nilai pada Perkhidmatan tidak tertakluk kepada Perbadanan Insurans Deposit Persekutuan, Perlindungan Perbadanan Perlindungan Pelabur Sekuriti atau perlindungan serupa yang terdapat di negara lain. Kami bukan sebuah bank dan tidak menawarkan perkhidmatan fidusiari. Transaksi yang dibuat melalui World App sebahagian besarnya tidak dikawal selia di banyak negara. Kami tidak memberi jaminan mengenai fungsi rantaian blok yang kami sokong, yang boleh menyebabkan kelewatan, konflik kepentingan, atau keputusan operasi oleh pihak ketiga yang tidak menguntungkan kepada pemilik Token Digital tertentu, atau mengakibatkan ketidakbolehan anda untuk menyelesaikan transaksi menggunakan Perkhidmatan. Butiran transaksi yang anda hantar melalui Perkhidmatan mungkin tidak lengkap, atau mungkin mengalami kelewatan yang ketara pada rangkaian rantaian blok yang berkaitan, dan kami tidak bertanggungjawab atas kegagalan transaksi untuk disahkan atau diproses seperti yang dijangkakan. Tiada waranti atau jaminan bahawa pemindahan yang dimulakan melalui Perkhidmatan akan berjaya memindahkan hak milik atau hak dalam mana-mana Token Digital. Selain itu, mungkin terdapat risiko khusus untuk penggunaan Token Digital tertentu, seperti WLD. Maklumat lanjut tentang risiko khusus untuk WLD boleh didapati di sini.
4.2 Teknologi Baharu.
Perkhidmatan adalah baharu. Walaupun perisian ini telah diuji secara meluas, perisian yang digunakan untuk Perkhidmatan masih agak baharu dan mungkin mempunyai pepijat atau kelemahan keselamatan. Selanjutnya, perisian ini masih dalam pembangunan dan mungkin menjalani penambahbaikan signifikan dari semasa ke semasa yang mungkin tidak memenuhi jangkaan pengguna.
4.3 Risiko Keselamatan Maklumat.
Token Digital dan penggunaan Perkhidmatan mungkin terdedah kepada risiko kecurian atau pengambilalihan. Penggodam atau kumpulan atau organisasi berniat jahat lain mungkin cuba mengganggu Perkhidmatan dalam pelbagai cara, termasuk, tetapi tidak terhad kepada, serangan perisian hasad, penafian serangan perkhidmatan, serangan berdasarkan konsensus, serangan Sybil, smurfing dan spoofing. Selain itu, memandangkan rangkaian rantaian blok yang kami sokong, seperti protokol Ethereum, bergantung pada perisian sumber terbuka, perisian yang mendasari Perkhidmatan mungkin mengandungi pepijat atau kelemahan yang disengajakan atau tidak disengajakan yang boleh menjejaskan Perkhidmatan secara negatif atau mengakibatkan kehilangan Token Digital pengguna atau kehilangan keupayaan pengguna untuk mengakses atau mengawal dompetnya melalui Perkhidmatan. Sekiranya terdapat pepijat atau kelemahan perisian sedemikian, mungkin tidak ada remedi dan pengguna tidak dijamin sebarang penyelesaian, bayaran balik, atau pampasan.
4.4 Ketepatan.
Walaupun kami berhasrat untuk menyediakan maklumat yang tepat dan tepat pada masanya melalui Perkhidmatan (termasuk, tanpa had, kandungan), maklumat tersebut mungkin tidak sentiasa tepat, lengkap atau terkini dan juga mungkin mengandungi ketidaktepatan teknikal atau kesilapan tipografi. Dalam usaha untuk terus memberikan anda maklumat yang selengkap dan setepat yang mungkin, maklumat boleh, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai, dipinda atau dikemas kini dari semasa ke semasa tanpa notis, termasuk tanpa had maklumat mengenai dasar, produk dan perkhidmatan. Selaras dengan itu, anda hendaklah mengesahkan semua maklumat sebelum menggunakannya, dan semua keputusan berdasarkan maklumat yang disediakan melalui Perkhidmatan adalah menjadi tanggungjawab anda sepenuhnya dan kami tidak akan bertanggungjawab atas keputusan tersebut.
4.5 Ketersediaan
. Walaupun kami berusaha untuk menyediakan perkhidmatan yang cemerlang kepada anda, kami tidak menjamin bahawa Perkhidmatan akan tersedia tanpa gangguan. Perkhidmatan mungkin terganggu sementara dari semasa ke semasa untuk kerja penyelenggaraan atau sebab lain. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab untuk apa-apa ralat, pengabaian, gangguan, pemadaman, kecacatan, kelewatan dalam operasi atau penghantaran, kegagalan talian komunikasi, kecurian atau pemusnahan atau akses tanpa kebenaran kepada, atau pengubahan, komunikasi pengguna. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab untuk apa-apa masalah atau kerosakan teknikal pada mana-mana rangkaian telefon atau talian, sistem dalam talian komputer, pelayan atau pembekal, peralatan komputer, perisian, kegagalan e-mel atau pemain disebabkan masalah teknikal atau kesesakan trafik di Internet atau di Perkhidmatan atau gabungannya, termasuk kecederaan atau kerosakan kepada pengguna atau mana-mana komputer orang lain yang berkaitan dengan atau berpunca daripada penyertaan atau memuat turun bahan berkaitan dengan Perkhidmatan. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab atas apa-apa kerugian atau kerosakan, kerugian kewangan atau kehilangan keuntungan, kerugian perniagaan, atau kecederaan peribadi atau kematian, yang berpunca daripada penggunaan Perkhidmatan oleh sesiapa sahaja, apa-apa Kandungan yang dipaparkan atau dihantar melalui Perkhidmatan kepada pengguna, atau apa-apa interaksi antara pengguna Perkhidmatan, sama ada secara dalam talian atau luar talian.
4.6 Fork
. Perisian yang digunakan untuk mencipta WLD ialah sumber terbuka dan percuma untuk disalin dan digunakan oleh sesiapa sahaja. Ini bermakna sesiapa sahaja boleh mencipta versi WLD yang diubah suai, atau dikenali sebagai “Fork.” Sekiranya berlaku Fork atau sebarang gangguan lain pada rangkaian Token Digital, kami mungkin tidak dapat menyokong sebarang aktiviti yang berkaitan dengan Fork. Apabila berlakunya Fork, transaksi mungkin gagal dilengkapkan sepenuhnya, separa lengkap, tidak dilengkapkan dengan betul, atau mengalami kelewatan yang ketara. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab ke atas apa-apa kerugian yang anda alami yang disebabkan keseluruhan atau sebahagiannya oleh Fork atau gangguan rangkaian lain.
4.7 Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga.
Di mana tersedia (lihat terutamanya Seksyen 2.5), kami bergantung kepada penyedia perkhidmatan pihak ketiga untuk menyediakan beberapa ciri dan fungsi dalam Aplikasi, seperti keupayaan untuk membeli Token Digital dengan mata wang fiat, atau keupayaan untuk menukar satu Token Digital dengan yang lain. Kami tidak menyediakan perkhidmatan ini, dan kami tidak terlibat dalam sebarang transaksi sedemikian. Anda hanya bergantung pada penyedia pihak ketiga untuk perkhidmatan ini, dan anda mesti mempunyai akaun dengan pembekal pihak ketiga dan bersetuju dengan terma mereka. Kami
tidak dapat membantu anda jika anda menghadapi masalah menggunakan perkhidmatan mereka, dan kami tidak bertanggungjawab untuk apa-apa transaksi yang anda lakukan menggunakan penyedia pihak ketiga.
5. Harta Intelek.
5.1 Pemilikan
. Perisian kami, aplikasi, Perkhidmatan, Kandungan, Tanda (seperti yang ditakrifkan di bawah) dan reka bentuk, pemilihan dan susunan Kandungan dalam Perkhidmatan (“IP”) dilindungi oleh hak cipta, tanda dagangan, paten dan hak harta intelek lain dan undang-undang Amerika Syarikat dan negara lain yang berkenaan. Anda bersetuju untuk mematuhi semua hak dan undang-undang harta intelek yang berkenaan, serta mana-mana tanda dagangan atau notis hak cipta atau sekatan yang terkandung dalam Perjanjian atau Perkhidmatan. Anda tidak boleh memadam apa-apa hak cipta, tanda dagangan atau notis proprietari yang terkandung dalam IP.
5.2 Tanda dagangan.
Nama Tools for Humanity Corporation, logo World App dan semua logo yang berkaitan dan slogan ialah tanda dagangan atau tanda perkhidmatan Tools for Humanity Corporation atau pemberi lesennya (“Tanda”). Anda tidak boleh menyalin, meniru, atau menggunakan Tanda, secara keseluruhan atau sebahagian, tanpa kebenaran bertulis kami. Semua tanda dagangan, nama atau logo lain yang disebut berkaitan dengan Perkhidmatan ialah hak milik pemilik masing-masing dan anda tidak boleh menyalin, meniru, atau menggunakannya, secara keseluruhan atau sebahagian, tanpa kebenaran bertulis daripada pemilik tanda dagangan yang berkenaan. Kemasukan mana-mana tanda lain dalam Perkhidmatan tidak membentuk kelulusan, pengesahan atau pengesyoran oleh kami.
6. Lesen dan Sekatan
6.1 Lesen
. Dengan syarat anda layak menggunakan Perkhidmatan dan tertakluk kepada pematuhan anda dengan Terma ini, kami dengan ini memberikan anda lesen terhad untuk mengakses dan menggunakan Perkhidmatan.
6.2 Sekatan Lesen
. Anda tidak boleh menerbitkan semula Kandungan di mana-mana laman Internet, Intranet atau Extranet atau memasukkan maklumat dalam mana-mana pangkalan data atau kompilasi lain, dan mana-mana penggunaan Kandungan lain dilarang sama sekali. Mana-mana penggunaan Perkhidmatan selain daripada yang dibenarkan secara khusus di sini, tanpa kebenaran bertulis kami terlebih dahulu, dilarang sama sekali dan akan menamatkan lesen yang diberikan di sini. Penggunaan tanpa kebenaran sedemikian juga mungkin melanggar undang-undang yang terpakai termasuk tanpa had hak cipta dan undang-undang tanda dagangan serta peraturan dan statut komunikasi yang terpakai. Melainkan dinyatakan secara jelas di sini, tiada apa pun dalam Terma ini ditafsirkan sebagai memberikan apa-apa lesen berkaitan dengan hak harta intelek, sama ada secara estoppel, implikasi atau sebaliknya. Lesen ini boleh dibatalkan oleh kami pada bila-bila masa tanpa notis dan dengan atau tanpa sebab, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang berkenaan.
6.3 Kerajaan
. Jika anda ialah pengguna akhir Kerajaan AS, kami melesenkan Perkhidmatan kepada anda sebagai “Item Komersial” kerana istilah tersebut ditakrifkan dalam Kod Peraturan Persekutuan AS (lihat CFR 48 § 2.101), dan hak yang kami berikan kepada anda untuk Perkhidmatan adalah sama dengan hak yang kami berikan kepada semua orang lain di bawah Terma ini.
7. Penggunaan Boleh Diterima
7.1
Anda boleh menggunakan Perkhidmatan hanya untuk kegunaan peribadi anda sendiri. Kami berhak pada setiap masa dan mengikut budi bicara mutlak kami untuk menyemak, membatalkan atau menggantung akses anda kepada atau penggunaan Perkhidmatan mengikut undang-undang yang terpakai. Item dalam senarai Penggunaan Dilarang hanyalah contoh dan senarainya tidak lengkap; kami boleh menambah atau memadam penggunaan dilarang mengikut budi bicara kami mengikut undang-undang yang terpakai.
7.2 Penggunaan Dilarang termasuk:
Aktiviti Menyalahi Undang-undang:
Apa-apa aktiviti yang akan melanggar, atau membantu dalam pelanggaran, apa-apa program sekatan yang ditadbir oleh OFAC; melanggar, atau membantu dalam pelanggaran, mana-mana undang-undang di negara mana kita menjalankan perniagaan; melibatkan hasil daripada apa-apa aktiviti tidak sah; atau menerbitkan, mengedar, atau menyebarkan apa-apa bahan atau maklumat yang menyalahi undang-undang.
Penggunaan Berlebihan atau Penggodaman:
Apa-apa aktiviti yang memberi bebanan yang tidak wajar atau tidak seimbang pada infrastruktur kami; mengganggu, memintas, atau mengambil alih secara paksa mana-mana sistem, data atau maklumat;menghantar atau memuat naik apa-apa bahan ke Perkhidmatan yang mengandungi virus, kuda trojan, cecacing, atau apa-apa program berbahaya atau merosakkan; atau percubaan untuk mendapatkan akses tanpa kebenaran kepada sistem komputer atau rangkaian yang disambungkan kepada Perkhidmatan.
Penderaan Orang Lain:
Apa-apa aktiviti yang mengganggu akses atau penggunaan orang lain terhadap Perkhidmatan  memfitnah, menyalahgunakan, memeras ugut, mengganggu, menghendap, mengancam, atau sebaliknya melanggar atau mencerobohi privasi orang lain, harta intelek atau mana-mana hak undang-undang lain; menghasut, mengancam, memudahkan, menggalakkan, atau menggalakkan kebencian, sikap intoleransi kaum, atau tindakan ganas terhadap orang lain; atau
Mengutip, mengikis atau mengumpul data pengguna lain daripada Perkhidmatan tanpa kebenaran.
Penipuan dan Amalan Perniagaan Tidak Adil Lain:
Apa-apa aktiviti yang beroperasi untuk menipu kami, pengguna kami atau mana-mana orang lain; memberikan apa-apa maklumat palsu, tidak tepat atau mengelirukan kepada kami; menjanjikan ganjaran tinggi yang tidak munasabah atau menjual perkhidmatan yang tiada manfaat tambahan kepada pembeli; atau menggalakkan amalan pemangsa dan mengelirukan lain termasuk loteri yang menyalahi undang-undang, cabutan undi, lelongan bayaran bidaan, peraduan, loteri, perjudian atau sebarang permainan peluang lain.
Pelanggaran Harta Intelek:
Apa-apa aktiviti yang melibatkan penjualan, pengedaran atau penyediaan akses kepada muzik, filem, perisian atau bahan berlesen palsu lain tanpa kebenaran yang sewajarnya daripada pemegang hak; menggunakan IP (termasuk Tanda) tanpa kebenaran jelas atau dengan cara yang sebaliknya memudaratkan kami atau jenama kami; menyiratkan penajaan palsu oleh atau kaitan dengan kami; atau melanggar hak cipta, tanda dagangan, hak publisiti atau privasi, atau mana-mana hak proprietari lain di bawah undang-undang.
8. Pengendali Orb
Kami bekerjasama dengan kontraktor bebas tempatan yang dipanggil “Pengendali Orb”, yang memudahkan pendaftaran pengguna dan membantu menjawab soalan yang anda mungkin ada tentang kami. Pengendali Orb ini telah menerima latihan dan berpengetahuan tentang World Network. Walaupun begitu, kami tidak mempunyai kawalan dan menafikan segala liabiliti atas perkataan atau tingkah laku mereka.
Pengendali Orb bukanlah ejen atau pekerja kami dalam apa jua cara. Apa-apa usaha, ciri, proses,dasar, standard, atau usaha lain yang dijalankan oleh TFH demi kepentingan penggunanya tidak menunjukkan wujudnya hubungan pekerjaan atau agensi dengan Pengendali Orb.
9. Penggantungan
Kami boleh menggantung dan menyekat akses anda kepada Perkhidmatan: (i) Jika kami dikehendaki sedemikian melalui sepina yang sah, perintah mahkamah, atau perintah berkuasa kerajaan; (ii) Kami secara munasabah mengesyaki anda menggunakan Perkhidmatan berkaitan dengan Penggunaan Dilarang; (iii) Penggunaan anda menggunakan Perkhidmatan adalah tertakluk kepada mana-mana litigasi, penyiasatan, atau prosiding kerajaan yang belum selesai dan/atau kami menjangkakan risiko tinggi ketidakpatuhan undang-undang atau peraturan yang berkaitan dengan aktiviti anda; (iv) Rakan kongsi perkhidmatan kami tidak dapat menyokong penggunaan anda; (v) Anda mengambil apa-apa tindakan yang kami anggap sebagai memintas kawalan kami (seperti tetapi tidak terhad kepada cubaan mencipta berbilang akaun).
10. Bukan Tawaran Sekuriti atau Kepentingan Komoditi
Kandungan Perkhidmatan tidak membentuk tawaran untuk membeli atau menjual atau permintaan tawaran untuk membeli atau menjual pelaburan, sekuriti, kepentingan perkongsian, komoditi atau mana-mana instrumen kewangan lain; kandungan atau Perkhidmatan juga tidak membentuk, dan tidak boleh digunakan untuk atau berkaitan dengan, tawaran atau permintaan oleh sesiapa di mana-mana negeri atau bidang kuasa di mana tawaran atau permintaan itu tidak dibenarkan atau dibenarkan, atau kepada mana-mana orang di mana tawaran atau permintaan sedemikian melanggar undang-undang.
11. Kandungan
11.1 Pergantungan pada Kandungan; Perubahan kepada Perkhidmatan.
Maklumat dan bahan yang kami berikan kepada anda melalui Perkhidmatan (“Kandungan”) adalah semata-mata untuk tujuan maklumat am, dan kami tidak menjamin ketepatan, kegunaan atau kesempurnaannya, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai. Apa-apa pergantungan yang anda letakkan pada Kandungan kami adalah atas risiko anda sendiri. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab atas apa-apa tindakan yang anda ambil atau tidak ambil disebabkan Kandungan, atau untuk sesiapa yang anda berkongsi Kandungan itu. Pernyataan pengguna lain yang menggambarkan penggunaan Perkhidmatan kami oleh mereka, yang terdapat di Perkhidmatan atau di mana-mana juga tidak patut dianggap sebagai pengesahan kami terhadap pernyataan mereka jika pernyataan tersebut tidak konsisten dengan Terma ini atau Kandungan kami. Kami mungkin mengemas kini Kandungan dari semasa ke semasa, tetapi Kandungan tersebut mungkin tidak lengkap atau terkini, dan kami tidak bertanggungjawab kepada anda untuk kemas kini Kandungan atau mana-mana bahagian lain Perkhidmatan. Kami boleh mengubah atau menghentikan, secara sementara atau selama-lamanya, sebahagian atau keseluruhan Kandungan atau Perkhidmatan tanpa notis terlebih dahulu kepada anda, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai. Kami tidak akan bertanggungjawab untuk sebarang pengubahsuaian, penggantungan atau pemberhentian sebahagian atau semua Kandungan atau Perkhidmatan, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai.
11.2 Perkhidmatan dan Kandungan Pihak Ketiga
. Kami boleh menyediakan pautan kepada bahan pendidikan, webinar, pertemuan dan promosi pada platform media sosial (“Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga”) yang membolehkan perkongsian dan kerjasama di kalangan pengguna dan pihak ketiga yang lain. Jika anda berkongsi apa-apa maklumat peribadi, gambar, pendapat, kandungan, atau mana-mana data lain di perkhidmatan tersebut, anda melakukannya atas risiko sendiri, dan penggunaan  perkhidmatan tersebut oleh anda tertakluk kepada terma penggunaan dan dasar privasi perkhidmatan tersebut, tidak kepada kami. Anda harus menyemak terma perkhidmatan setiap Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga untuk lebih memahami hak anda, dan cara platform tersebut menggunakan data anda. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab ke atas apa-apa kehilangan, pencurian, kompromi, atau penyalahgunaan data anda walau apa pun yang berkaitan dengan mana-mana Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga (termasuk
kelalaian) kecuali jika tanggungjawab tersebut tidak boleh dihadkan di bawah undang-undang yang terpakai. Penggunaan anda terhadap apa-apa maklumat yang diberikan oleh Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga (“Kandungan Pihak Ketiga”) adalah atas risiko anda sendiri, dan kami tidak memberi jaminan kepada anda bahawa mana-mana Kandungan Pihak Ketiga adalah tepat, lengkap, sahih atau sesuai untuk keadaan peribadi anda. Kandungan Pihak Ketiga termasuk maklumat yang diberikan oleh pengguna lain yang tidak disokong secara khusus oleh kami.
11.3 Kandungan Pengguna
. Sebagai ahli komuniti Worldcoin, anda boleh menyiarkan mesej, data, perisian, imej, video atau kandungan lain (“Kandungan Pengguna”) pada papan mesej, blog, akaun media sosial yang dimiliki oleh kami, serta pelbagai lokasi lain yang boleh diakses secara awam dalam Perkhidmatan tersebut. Forum ini mungkin dihoskan oleh kami atau Pembekal Perkhidmatan Pihak Ketiga bagi pihak kami. Anda bertanggungjawab untuk semua Kandungan Pengguna yang anda serahkan, muat naik, siarkan atau simpan melalui Perkhidmatan. Anda mesti memberikan semua amaran, maklumat dan pendedahan yang diperlukan dan sesuai mengenai Kandungan Pengguna anda. Kami tidak bertanggungjawab untuk apa-apa Kandungan Pengguna yang anda serahkan melalui Perkhidmatan.
11.4 Lesen Kandungan Pengguna
. Dengan menyerahkan Kandungan Pengguna kepada kami, anda memperakui bahawa anda memili semua hak yang diperlukan untuk Kandungan Pengguna dan dengan itu anda memberikan kami lesen kekal, di seluruh dunia, tidak eksklusif, bebas royalti, sub-lesen, dan boleh dipindah milik untuk menggunakan, mengeluarkan semula, mengedar, menyediakan karya terbitan daripada, mengubah suai, memaparkan dan melaksanakan semua atau mana-mana bahagian Kandungan Pengguna berkaitan dengan pemasaran dan promosi kami, dan untuk apa-apa tujuan perniagaan sah lain yang berkaitan dengan Perkhidmatan. Kami boleh mengedarkan semula sebahagian atau semua dan karya terbitan daripada Kandungan Pengguna anda dalam sebarang format media dan melalui mana-mana saluran media yang kami pilih. Anda juga dengan ini memberikan kami dan pengguna lain lesen bukan eksklusif untuk menggunakan, mengakses, menghasilkan semula, mengedar, mengubah suai dan memaparkan serta melaksanakan Kandungan Pengguna anda melalui Perkhidmatan. Seksyen 11.4 akan dikuatkuasakan setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai.
11.5 Sekatan Kandungan Pengguna
. Anda bersetuju untuk tidak menggunakan, atau membenarkan mana-mana pihak ketiga untuk menggunakan, Perkhidmatan untuk menyiarkan atau menghantar apa-apa Kandungan Pengguna yang:(a) memfitnah atau memburukkan, atau mendedahkan perkara peribadi mengenai mana-mana individu; (b) tidak senonoh, lucah, pornografi, mengganggu, mengancam, mendera, membenci, menyinggung perasaan perkauman atau etnik; menggalakkan kelakuan yang akan dianggap sebagai kesalahan jenayah, menimbulkan liabiliti sivil, atau melanggar mana-mana undang-undang, atau tidak sesuai; (c) akan melanggar hak harta intelek orang lain, termasuk teks berhak cipta yang tidak dibenarkan, imej atau program, rahsia dagangan atau maklumat proprietari sulit lain, atau tanda dagangan atau tanda perkhidmatan yang digunakan dalam cara yang melanggar hak cipta; atau (d) secara tidak munasabah mengganggu penggunaan Perkhidmatan oleh pengguna lain. Anda mengakui kepada kami bahawa anda menyiarkan Kandungan Pengguna ke Perkhidmatan secara sukarela; dengan itu, siaran Kandungan Pengguna tidak mewujudkan hubungan majikan-pekerja antara anda dan kami. Anda tidak boleh menyalin atau menggunakan alamat e-mel, nombor telefon mudah alih, baki, nama pengguna atau apa-apa maklumat peribadi lain tentang pengguna lain tanpa kebenaran mereka. E-mel, mel, panggilan telefon atau komunikasi lain yang tidak diminta kepada pengguna lain melalui Perkhidmatan atau dalam mana-mana saluran lain adalah dilarang.
11.6 Aduan dan Alih Keluar DMCA.
Jika anda percaya bahawa tanda dagangan atau karya berhak cipta anda dilanggar oleh Kandungan atau Kandungan Pengguna di Perkhidmatan kami atau diterbitkan dengan cara yang mencadangkan pengesahan atau pertalian dengan kami, sila hantar e-mel kepada kami di legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com dengan baris subjek “Aduan [Tanda Dagangan/Hak Cipta]”,  mengikut kes yang berkenaan. Untuk memastikan aduan anda berkesan dan membolehkan kami untuk mengambil tindakan mengikut Akta Hak Cipta Millenium Digital (Digital Millennium Copyright Act, “DMCA”), sila patuhi semua keperluan DMCA dengan menyertakan maklumat berikut dalam e-mel anda:
Pengenalan jelas karya berhak cipta atau tanda yang didakwa dilanggar, termasuk nombor Pendaftaran Hak Cipta jika karya itu didaftarkan;
Pengenalpastian kerja atau tanda yang didakwa melanggar dan yang anda mahu dialih keluar;
URL atau arahan jelas lain untuk membolehkan kami mengesan kandungan yang didakwa melanggar;
Alamat e-mel, alamat surat-menyurat dan nombor telefon anda; dan
Pernyataan bertandatangan yang menyatakan keyakinan anda dengan niat baik bahawa kandungan tersebut melanggar hak cipta, maklumat yang anda berikan adalah tepat, dan anda ialah pemilik atau diberi kuasa untuk mewakili pemilik kandungan tersebut.
Selain itu, sila ambil perhatian bahawa di bawah Seksyen 512(f) DMCA, sesiapa yang dengan sengaja menghantar notis pelanggaran yang tidak berasas mungkin akan perlu membayar ganti rugi. Oleh itu, sila jangan membuat apa-apa tuntutan palsu. Kami boleh berkongsi dengan pihak ketiga apa-apa maklumat atau surat-menyurat yang anda berikan kepada kami, termasuk orang yang memuat naik bahan yang didakwa melanggar kepada Perkhidmatan.
Apabila kami menerima notis pelanggaran bona fide, dasar kami adalah untuk: (a) segera mengalih keluar atau menyahaktifkan akses kepada kandungan yang melanggar; (b) memaklumkan orang yang memuat naik bahan yang melanggar bahawa kami telah mengalih keluar atau menyahaktifkan akses kepada bahan tersebut; dan (c) bagi pesalah
berulang, menamatkan akses individu tersebut kepada Perkhidmatan. Sekiranya kami menerima pemberitahuan balas daripada orang tersebut, kami mungkin akan menghantar salinan pemberitahuan balas tersebut kepada anda untuk menjelaskan bahawa kami mungkin akan memuat naik semula bahan yang dialih keluar atau berhenti penyahaktifan dalam tempoh 10 hari bekerja. Melainkan anda memfailkan tindakan untuk mendapatkan perintah mahkamah terhadap kami atau terhadap orang yang memuat naik kandungan, kami akan memulihkan akses kepada bahan yang dialih keluar dalam tempoh 10 hingga 14 hari perniagaan atau lebih selepas menerima pemberitahuan balas, mengikut budi bicara kami.
12. PENAFIAN WARANTI
12.1 Penggunaan anda terhadap Perkhidmatan adalah atas risiko anda sendiri. Perkhidmatan, WLD, kandungan dan semua IP lain disediakan berdasarkan “SEPERTI SEDIA ADA” dan “SEPERTI YANG TERSEDIA” tanpa apa-apa representasi atau waranti, sama ada secara jelas, tersirat atau mengikut undang-undang. Setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai, kami secara khusus menafikan apa-apa waranti tersirat mengenai hak milik, kebolehdagangan, kesesuaian untuk tujuan tertentu, atau tiada pelanggaran berkaitan dengan ciri-ciri, kandungan atau IP lain yang terkandung dalam Perkhidmatan. Sesetengah bidang kuasa tidak membenarkan pengecualian waranti tersirat, jadi pengecualian di atas mungkin tidak berkenaan dengan anda. Kami tidak menyokong, menjamin atau memikul tanggungjawab untuk apa-apa pengiklanan, tawaran atau kenyataan yang dibuat oleh pihak ketiga, termasuk pengguna lain berkenaan Perkhidmatan.
12.2 Kami tidak membuat apa-apa representasi atau jaminan bahawa (a) akses kepada semua atau sebahagian daripada Perkhidmatan akan berterusan, tidak terganggu, tepat pada masanya, selamat atau bebas daripada kesilapan; (b) bahawa Perkhidmatan atau kandungan adalah tepat, lengkap, boleh dipercayai, atau terkini; (c) bahawa Perkhidmatan adalah bebas daripada virus atau komponen berbahaya yang lain; atau (d) bahawa Perkhidmatan atau kandungan akan memenuhi keperluan, kehendak atau jangkaan anda.
12.3 Selain itu, kami tidak membuat apa-apa representasi atau jaminan berkenaan dengan kesahihan Perkhidmatan atau WLD untuk sebarang kes penggunaan, atau bahawa Perkhidmatan atau WLD akan memenuhi sebarang keperluan peraturan atau pematuhan. Anda juga bertanggungjawab untuk menentukan dan mematuhi semua sekatan dan keperluan undang-undang dan peraturan yang mungkin mengawal penggunaan anda terhadap Perkhidmatan atau WLD. Kecuali untuk pernyataan nyata yang dinyatakan dalam Terma ini, anda dengan ini mengakui dan bersetuju bahawa anda tidak bergantung pada mana-mana pernyataan atau pemahaman lain, sama ada secara bertulis atau lisan, berkenaan dengan akses anda kepada dan penggunaan Perkhidmatan atau WLD.
12.4 Kami tidak bertindak dan tidak boleh bertindak sebagai penasihat anda berkenaan dengan sebarang hal kewangan, perundangan, pelaburan atau cukai. Apa-apa kandungan hanya sah pada tarikh yang dinyatakan. Apa-apa unjuran, anggaran, ramalan, sasaran dan/atau pendapat yang dinyatakan di sini adalah tertakluk kepada risiko, ketidakpastian dan andaian, dan mungkin tidak betul dan boleh berubah tanpa notis. Tidak digalakkan untuk mempercayai kandungan.
Maklumat tertentu di sini mungkin diperoleh daripada sumber pihak ketiga. Walaupun maklumat yang disediakan mungkin daripada sumber yang dipercayai, namun kami tidak mengesahkan secara bebas dan tidak memberi representasi tentang ketepatannya. Kami bukan peniaga broker atau penasihat pelaburan berdaftar. Kami tidak membuat representasi, dan secara khusus menafikan semua waranti, nyata, tersirat, atau berkanun, mengenai ketepatan, ketepatan masa atau kesempurnaan mana-mana bahan yang terkandung dalam Perkhidmatan. Kandungan kami adalah untuk maklumat am sahaja, dan anda bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk menentukan sama ada untuk menggunakan Perkhidmatan atau tidak. Anda mengakui bahawa perdagangan, penggunaan dan pemegangan Token Digital sememangnya berisiko. Anda mungkin kehilangan semua dana dalam dompet anda. Anda mengakui bahawa Perkhidmatan mungkin tertakluk kepada sekatan eksport dan sekatan ekonomi yang dikenakan oleh undang-undang A.S.
12.5 Kami tidak bertanggunjawab ke atas anda atau mana-mana pihak ketiga untuk apa-apa pengubahsuaian atau penamatan Perkhidmatan, atau penggantungan atau penamatan akses anda kepada Perkhidmatan.
13. HAD LIABILITI
13.1 Kami tidak mengecualikan atau mengehadkan liabiliti kami terhadap anda di mana tindakan itu adalah tidak sah. Di negara di mana jenis pengecualian di bawah tidak dibenarkan, kami bertanggungjawab ke atas anda hanya untuk kerugian dan ganti rugi yang merupakan hasil yang dapat dijangka dan munasabah akibat daripada kegagalan kami untuk menggunakan ketelitian dan kemahiran yang sewajar atau pelanggaran kontrak kami dengan anda. Perenggan ini tidak menjejaskan hak pengguna yang tidak boleh diketepikan atau dihadkan oleh mana-mana kontrak atau perjanjian.
13.2 Setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang, anda bersetuju bahawa dalam apa jua keadaan kami atau mana-mana pegawai, pengarah, pekerja, kontraktor, ejen, sekutu atau anak syarikat kami (“Pihak TFH”) tidak akan bertanggungjawab kepada anda untuk apa-apa ganti rugi tidak langsung, punitif, sampingan, khas, berbangkit atau teladan, termasuk ganti rugi untuk kehilangan keuntungan, reputasi, penggunaan, data atau harta tidak ketara yang lain, sama ada liabiliti tersebut ditegaskan berdasarkan tort atau sebaliknya, dan sama ada Pihak TFH telah dinasihatkan atau tidak tentang kemungkinan ganti rugi sedemikian yang timbul daripada atau berkaitan dengan: (a) penggunaan atau ketidakupayaan anda untuk menggunakan Perkhidmatan, Token Digital anda atau World Network; (b) ketidakbolehcapaian atau penamatan Perkhidmatan; (c) apa-apa penggodaman, gangguan, akses tanpa kebenaran atau pengubahan mana-mana transaksi atau Data anda; (d) apa-apa transaksi atau perjanjian yang dibuat oleh anda dengan mana-mana pihak ketiga melalui Perkhidmatan; (e) apa-apa aktiviti atau komunikasi pihak ketiga; (f) tindakan Pengendali Orb; (g) apa-apa kehilangan nilai mana-mana Token
Digital; (h) apa-apa Kandungan Pihak Ketiga yang diakses pada atau melalui Perkhidmatan; (i) kesilapan atau ketidaktepatan dalam Kandungan kami; (j) kecederaan diri atau kerosakan harta benda dalam apa jua bentuk sekalipun akibat daripada sebarang akses kepada atau penggunaan Perkhidmatan; (k) virus, kuda trojan, atau seumpamanya yang mungkin dihantar kepada atau melalui Perkhidmatan; atau (l) kelakuan memfitnah, menyinggung perasaan atau menyalahi undang-undang yang dilakukan oleh mana-mana pihak ketiga. Had liabiliti ini akan terpakai sama ada kerosakan timbul daripada penggunaan atau penyalahgunaan, atau kebergantungan pada TFH atau Perkhidmatan, tanpa mengira kegagalan tujuan penting mana-mana remedi terhad dan setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai.
13.3 Dalam apa jua keadaan, Pihak TFH tidak akan bertanggungjawab ke atas anda untuk apa-apa tuntutan langsung, prosiding, liabiliti, tanggungjawab, ganti rugi, kerugian atau kos dalam jumlah yang melebihi $100.00. Jika anda tidak berpuas hati dengan Perkhidmatan, anda bersetuju bahawa remedi tunggal dan eksklusif anda adalah dengan menghentikan penggunaan anda terhadap Perkhidmatan tersebut. Had liabiliti ini akan terpakai setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai.
13.4 Pelepasan dan Ganti Rugi.
Anda bersetuju untuk mempertahankan, melindungi, dan tidak memudaratkan Pihak TFH daripada apa-apa tuntutan, bayaran, kos, liabiliti, bayaran guaman yang munasabah, dan perbelanjaan yang dikenakan terhadap Pihak TFH oleh pihak ketiga akibat daripada: (a) penggunaan anda terhadap Perkhidmatan; (b) pelanggaran anda terhadap Terma ini; (c) pelanggaran anda terhadap hak orang lain; (d) kelakuan anda berkaitan dengan Perkhidmatan; atau (e) penggunaan anda terhadap WLD, Token Digital, atau rangkaian Worldcoin. Sesetengah bidang kuasa mengehadkan indemniti pengguna, jadi sebahagian atau semua peruntukan indemniti dalam perenggan ini mungkin tidak terpakai kepada anda. Sekiranya anda diwajibkan untuk menanggung ganti rugi mana-mana Pihak TFH, kami berhak untuk mengawal apa-apa tindakan atau prosiding mengikut budi bicara kami sendiri, dan untuk menentukan sama ada mahu menyelesaikannya dan terma penyelesaiannya.
JIKA ANDA SEORANG PENDUDUK CALIFORNIA, anda mengetepikan manfaat dan perlindungan Kanun Sivil California § 1542, yang memperuntukkan: “[a] pelepasan am tidak meliputi tuntutan yang pemiutang atau pihak yang memberi pelepasan tidak mengetahui atau tidak syak wujud dan sekiranya diketahui, akan memberi kesan ketara kepada penyelesaian mereka dengan pemiutang atau pihak yang dilepaskan.”
14, Undang-undang Mentadbir
Undang-undang Negeri California akan terpakai pada Perjanjian ini dan apa-apa pertikaian yang timbul daripada atau berkaitan dengan Perjanjian ini. Undang-undang mentadbir yang dinyatakan dalam seksyen ini akan terpakai tanpa mengambil kira prinsip percanggahan undang-undang. Anda seterusnya bersetuju bahawa Perkhidmatan akan dianggap berpusat di Negeri California semata-mata, dan walaupun Perkhidmatan mungkin tersedia di bidang kuasa lain, ketersediaannya tidak menimbulkan bidang kuasa peribadi umum atau khusus dalam mana-mana forum di luar Negeri California.
15. PENYELESAIAN PERTIKAIAN, TIMBANG TARA DAN PENGECUALIAN TINDAKAN KELAS
15.1 SILA BACA PERENGGAN BERIKUT DENGAN TELITI. MEREKA MENGKEHENDAKI ANDA MENYELESAIKAN PERTIKAIAN DENGAN KAMI MELALUI PROSES PENYELESAIAN TIMBANG TARA INDIVIDU DENGAN SEORANG PENIMBANG TARA TUNGGAL, DAN BUKAN SEBAHAGIAN DARIPADA TINDAKAN KELAS. PROSES TIMBANG TARA MENGHALANG ANDA DARIPADA MENYAMAN KAMI DI MAHKAMAH ATAU MEMINTA PERBICARAAN DI HADAPAN JURI, NAMUN, JIKA TUNTUTAN MEMENUHI SYARAT, ANDA MASIH BOLEH MEMBAWA PERTINGKAIAN KE MAHKAMAH TUNTUTAN KECIL.
15.2 Kami akan berusaha sebaik mungkin kami untuk menyelesaikan apa-apa kemungkinan pertikaian melalui rundingan tidak formal dan berniat baik. Jika potensi pertikaian timbul, anda mesti menghubungi kami dengan menghantar e-mel ke legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com supaya kami boleh cuba menyelesaikannya tanpa menggunakan penyelesaian pertikaian rasmi. Jika kami tidak dapat mencapai penyelesaian tidak rasmi dalam masa 60 hari selepas penerimaan e-mel anda, dan anda memilih untuk mengemukakan tuntutan berkanun persekutuan atau negeri, tuntutan undang-undang am, tuntutan berdasarkan kontrak, tort, penipuan, salah nyata atau mana-mana teori undang-undang lain, atau sebarang prosiding rasmi lain yang timbul daripada atau berkaitan dengan Terma, Kandungan atau Perkhidmatan ini (masing-masing, sebagai “Pertikaian”), maka anda bersetuju untuk menyelesaikan Pertikaian melalui timbang tara yang mengikat, secara individu mengikut terma berikut (secara kolektif, “Perjanjian Timbang Tara”):
Timbang Tara akan dijalankan secara sulit oleh seorang penimbang tara. Penimbang tara akan menggunakan statut had yang terpakai dan semua undang-undang yang terpakai dan akan menghormati tuntutan keistimewaan yang diiktiraf oleh undang-undang terpakai.
Pertikaian itu akan diselesaikan sepenuhnya dan akhirnya diselesaikan melalui timbang tara yang ditadbir oleh JAMS menurut Peraturan Timbang Tara JAMS yang Diperkemas, melainkan jumlah agregat Pertikaian ialah $250,000 atau lebih, dalam hal ini Peraturan Timbang Tara Komprehensif JAMS akan terpakai. Timbang Tara akan dijalankan di San Francisco, California, melainkan anda dan kedua pihak bersetuju untuk menjalankannya di tempat lain. Anda bersetuju bahawa mahkamah persekutuan dan negeri di San Francisco, California ialah forum yang sesuai untuk apa-apa rayuan untuk keputusan timbang tara atau prosiding mahkamah sekiranya klausa timbang tara yang mengikat Perjanjian ini didapati tidak boleh dikuatkuasakan.
Dalam mana-mana timbang tara, tanpa mempertimbangkan lokasinya, kedua pihak tidak akan meminta pendedahan maklumat antara satu sama lain, dan penimbang tara tidak akan membenarkan kedua pihak untuk terlibat dalam pendedahan maklumat; sebaliknya, setiap pihak akan mendedahkan bukti yang menyokong pendirian mereka pada masa dan tarikh yang dipersetujui secara bersama sebelum perbicaraan timbang tara terakhir.
Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini meliputi kebolehkuatkuasaan, kebolehbatalan, skop, dan kesahihan Perjanjian Timbang Tara atau mana-mana bahagian Perjanjian Timbang Tara, dan semua Pertikaian lain yang timbul daripada atau berkaitan dengan tafsiran atau kebolehgunaan Perjanjian Timbang Tara; dan semua perkara tersebut akan diputuskan oleh penimbang tara dan bukan oleh mahkamah atau hakim.
Jika penimbang tara atau pentadbir timbang tara mengenakan fi pemfailan atau kos pentadbiran lain ke atas anda, kami akan membayar balik kepada anda, jika diminta, setakat fi atau kos tersebut akan melebihi jumlah yang anda perlu bayar sekiranya anda meneruskan kes ini di mahkamah. Kami juga akan membayar fi atau kos tambahan jika dikehendaki berbuat demikian oleh peraturan pentadbir timbang tara atau undang-undang yang terpakai.
Atas permintaan mana-mana pihak, semua prosiding timbang tara akan dijalankan dalam kerahsiaan sepenuhnya dan, dalam kes sedemikian, semua dokumen, keterangan dan rekod akan diterima, didengari dan diselenggarakan oleh penimbang tara secara rahsia dan dimeteraikan, tersedia untuk pemeriksaan sahaja oleh pihak, peguam masing-masing, dan pakar, perunding, atau saksi masing-masing yang telah bersetuju, terlebih dahulu dan secara bertulis, untuk menerima semua maklumat tersebut sebagai sulit untuk digunakan semata-mata untuk tujuan timbang tara.
Selain daripada prosedur kelas dan remedi yang dibincangkan dalam Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini, penimbang tara mempunyai kuasa untuk memberikan apa-apa remedi, sama seperti yang boleh diputuskan oleh mahkamah.
Apa-apa penghakiman ke atas keputusan yang diberikan oleh penimbang tara boleh dimasukkan dalam mana-mana mahkamah yang mempunyai bidang kuasa berwibawa.
Jika keperluan untuk timbang tara atau larangan terhadap tindakan kelas dan Pertikaian lain yang dibawa bagi pihak ketiga yang terkandung dalam Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini didapati tidak boleh dikuatkuasakan, maka hanya peruntukan yang tidak boleh dikuatkuasakan akan dianggap telah dikeluarkan daripada Terma ini dan semua kewajipan yang tinggal dalam Terma ini akan kekal berkuat kuasa dan berkesan sepenuhnya.
15.3 Hak 30 Hari untuk Menarik Diri
. Anda berhak untuk menarik diri dan tidak terikat dengan Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini dengan menghantar e-mel daripada alamat yang anda gunakan untuk menyediakan permohonan anda kepada legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com dengan Baris Subjek: “MENARIK DIRI DARIPADA TIMBANG TARA DAN PENGECUALIAN TINDAKAN KELAS. Anda mesti menghantar e-mel anda dalam masa 30 hari selepas bersetuju menerima Terma ini, jika tidak, anda akan terikat untuk menimbang tara Pertikaian menurut terma Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini. Jika anda menarik diri daripada Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini, kami juga tidak akan terikat dengan Perjanjian Timbang Tara.
15.4 Perubahan kepada Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini.
Kami akan memberi anda notis 30 hari tentang sebarang perubahan pada bahagian Terma ini yang bertajuk “
Penyelesaian Pertikaian, Timbang Tara dan Pengecualian Tindakan Kelas
” melalui pemberian notis kepada anda, dan perubahan itu akan berkuat kuasa 30 hari selepas anda menerima notis daripada kami. Perubahan pada bahagian
Penyelesaian Pertikaian, Timbang Tara dan Pengecualian Tindakan Kelas
sebaliknya akan terpakai secara prospektif hanya untuk Pertikaian yang timbul selepas hari ke-30. Jika mahkamah atau penimbang tara memutuskan bahawa perubahan pada bahagian ini tidak boleh dikuatkuasakan atau sah, maka perubahan itu akan digugurkan daripada Terma ini dan mahkamah atau penimbang tara akan menggunakan terma Perjanjian Timbang Tara pertama yang berkuat kuasa selepas anda mula menggunakan Perkhidmatan. Anda boleh menggunakan hak anda untuk menarik diri daripada terma Perjanjian Timbang tara yang baharu dengan mengikut prosedur yang dinyatakan dalam bahagian di atas yang bertajuk “Hak 30 Hari untuk Menarik Diri.”
Perjanjian Timbang Tara ini akan terus berkuat kuasa selepas penamatan Terma ini, dan penggunaan Perkhidmatan oleh anda.
Walau apa pun dalam Perjanjian Timbang tara ini yang bertentangan, mana-mana pihak boleh membawa tuntutan mahkamah semata-mata untuk mendapatkan perintah injunksi untuk menghentikan penggunaan atau penyalahgunaan perkhidmatan tanpa kebenaran, atau pelanggaran hak milik intelektual (contohnya, tanda dagangan, rahsia perdagangan,
hak cipta atau hak paten ) tanpa terlebih dahulu melibatkan timbang tara atau proses penyelesaian pertikaian tidak rasmi yang diterangkan di atas.
16. Peruntukan Am
16.1 Tiada Penepian; Kebolehasingan; Tidak Boleh Diserahkan Hak
. Kegagalan kami untuk menguatkuasakan peruntukan bukanlah penepian hak kami untuk berbuat demikian kemudian. Jika peruntukan didapati tidak boleh dikuatkuasakan, peruntukan lain Terma ini akan kekal berkuat kuasa sepenuhnya dan terma boleh dikuatkuasakan akan digantikan untuk mencerminkan tujuan kami setepat mungkin, setakat yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai. Anda tidak boleh menyerahkan mana-mana hak anda di bawah Terma ini, dan apa-apa cubaan sedemikian akan dianggap tidak sah. Kami boleh menyerahkan hak kami kepada mana-mana sekutu atau anak syarikatnya, atau kepada mana-mana pengganti berkepentingan dengan mana-mana perniagaan yang dikaitkan dengan Perkhidmatan.
16.2 Keseluruhan Perjanjian
. Terma-terma ini membentuk pernyataan perjanjian yang lengkap dan eksklusif antara anda dan kami berkenaan dengan Perkhidmatan dan menggantikan semua pemahaman, perjanjian, representasi dan waranti terdahulu dan serentak, secara bertulis dan lisan, mengenai Perkhidmatan. Tajuk bahagian dalam Terma ini adalah untuk kemudahan sahaja dan tidak akan mengawal makna atau tafsiran mana-mana peruntukan.
16.3 Terus Berkuat Kuasa.
Semua peruntukan dalam Terma  ini berkaitan dengan penggantungan atau penamatan, hutang yang tertunggak kepada TFH, penggunaan am Perkhidmatan, Pertikaian dengan TFH, serta peruntukan yang mengikut sifatnya berterusan selepas tamat tempoh atau penamatan Terma ini, akan terus berkuat kuasa walaupun penamatan atau tamat tempoh Terma ini.
16.4 Hubungan Para Pihak.
Tiada apa-apa dalam Terma ini akan dianggap atau dimaksudkan untuk dianggap, juga tidak akan menyebabkan anda dan TFH dianggap sebagai rakan kongsi, usahawan bersama, atau sebaliknya sebagai rakan sekutu untuk keuntungan, dan anda mahupun TFH tidak akan dianggap sebagai ejen yang mewakili yang lain. Ini termasuk fakta bahawa tiada apa-apa dalam Terma ini menetapkan atau bertujuan untuk mewujudkan sebarang hubungan pekerjaan antara anda dan TFH.
16.5 Tiada Nasihat Profesional atau Tugas Fidusiari.
Semua Kandungan yang disediakan oleh kami adalah untuk tujuan maklumat sahaja dan tidak boleh ditafsirkan sebagai nasihat profesional. Anda tidak seharusnya mengambil, atau mengelak daripada mengambil, sebarang tindakan berdasarkan apa-apa maklumat yang terkandung dalam Perkhidmatan. Sebelum membuat sebarang keputusan kewangan, undang-undang, atau lain-lain yang melibatkan Perkhidmatan atau mana-mana Token Digital, anda harus mendapatkan nasihat profesional bebas daripada individu yang berlesen dan berkelayakan dalam bidang yang sesuai untuk nasihat tersebut. Terma ini tidak bertujuan untuk, dan tidak, mencipta atau mengenakan apa-apa kewajipan fidusiari kepada kami. Setakat yang dibenarkan oleh Undang-undang, anda mengakui dan bersetuju bahawa kami tidak mempunyai tanggungjawab fidusiari atau liabiliti kepada anda atau mana-mana pihak lain, dan setakat mana kewajipan atau liabiliti sedemikian mungkin wujud dari segi undang-undang atau di bidang keadilan, kewajipan dan liabiliti tersebut dengan ini tidak boleh ditarik balik, diketepikan dan dihapuskan. Anda seterusnya bersetuju bahawa satu-satunya kewajipan dan kewajipan yang kami berhutang kepada anda adalah yang dinyatakan dengan jelas dalam Terma ini.
16.6 Perubahan Kawalan.
Sekiranya kami diambil alih oleh atau digabungkan dengan entiti pihak ketiga, atau sebaliknya menyerahkan fungsi tertentu kepada entiti sekutu atau pengganti atau entiti lain yang kami tentukan adalah untuk kepentingan terbaik Pengguna, maka kami mengekalkan hak, dalam mana-mana keadaan ini, untuk memindahkan atau menyerahkan Data yang kami telah kumpulkan daripada anda sebagai sebahagian daripada penggabungan, pemerolehan, penjualan atau perubahan kawalan lain, mengikut undang-undang yang berkenaan.
16.7 Force Majeure.
Kami tidak akan bertanggungjawab ke atas kelewatan, kegagalan dalam prestasi, atau gangguan perkhidmatan yang disebabkan secara langsung atau tidak langsung daripada turun naik pasaran yang ketara dalam Token Digital, apa-apa bencana alam, tindakan pihak berkuasa awam atau tentera, tindakan pengganas, gangguan sivil, peperangan, mogok, kecemasan kesihatan, pertikaian buruh, kebakaran, gangguan dalam telekomunikasi atau perkhidmatan Internet atau perkhidmatan pembekal rangkaian, kegagalan peralatan atau perisian, atau apa-apa sebab atau keadaan di luar kawalan munasabah kami (masing-masing, sebagai “Peristiwa Force Majeure”). Berlakunya Peristiwa Force Majeure tidak akan menjejaskan kesahihan dan kebolehkuatkuasaan mana-mana peruntukan yang selebihnya dalam Terma ini.
16.8 App Store.
Apabila anda memuat turun Apl kami daripada mana-mana kedai aplikasi atau platform pengedaran selain daripada Apple App Store, termasuk Google Play Store (“Platform Pengedaran”), anda bersetuju bahawa:
Terma adalah antara anda dan kami, dan bukan dengan pembekal Platform Pengedaran ("Pembekal Kedai"); penggunaan Apl anda mesti mematuhi Terma Perkhidmatan Platform Pengedaran semasa Pembekal Kedai; Pembekal Kedai hanyalah penyedia Platform Pengedaran di mana anda memuat turun apl;
Kami, dan bukan Pembekal Kedai, bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk Aplikasi;
Pembekal Kedai tidak mempunyai obligasi atau liabiliti kepada anda berkenaan dengan Aplikasi atau Terma; dan
anda mengakui dan bersetuju bahawa Pembekal Kedai ialah penerima pihak ketiga kepada Terma kerana ia berkaitan dengan Aplikasi.
16.9 Apple App Store
. Seksyen ini terpakai apabila Aplikasi telah diperoleh daripada Apple App Store. Anda mengakui dan bersetuju bahawa Terma tersebut adalah antara anda dan kami sahaja, bukan Apple, Inc. (“Apple”) dan bahawa Apple tidak bertanggungjawab terhadap Aplikasi atau kandungannya. Penggunaan Aplikasi anda mesti mematuhi Terma Perkhidmatan App Store.
Anda mengakui bahawa Apple tidak mempunyai kewajipan apa-apa pun untuk memberikan apa-apa perkhidmatan penyelenggaraan dan sokongan berkenaan dengan Aplikasi. Sekiranya berlaku apa-apa kegagalan Aplikasi untuk mematuhi mana-mana waranti yang berkenaan, anda boleh memberitahu Apple, dan (jika berkenaan) Apple akan membayar balik harga pembelian untuk Aplikasi kepada anda; setakat maksimum yang dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai, Apple tidak akan mempunyai kewajipan waranti lain sama sekali berkenaan dengan Aplikasi, dan apa-apa tuntutan, kerugian, liabiliti, ganti rugi, kos atau perbelanjaan lain yang dikaitkan dengan mana-mana kegagalan untuk mematuhi apa-apa waranti akan ditadbir sepenuhnya mengikut Terma dan mana-mana undang-undang yang terpakai kepada kami sebagai penyedia Aplikasi.
Anda mengakui bahawa Apple tidak bertanggungjawab untuk menangani apa-apa tuntutan anda atau mana-mana pihak ketiga yang berkaitan dengan Aplikasi atau pemilikan dan/atau penggunaan Aplikasi oleh anda, termasuk, tetapi tidak terhad kepada: (i) tuntutan liabiliti produk; (ii) apa-apa tuntutan bahawa Aplikasi gagal mematuhi mana-mana keperluan undang-undang atau peraturan yang terpakai; dan (iii) tuntutan yang timbul di bawah perlindungan pengguna atau perundangan yang seumpama; dan semua tuntutan tersebut dikawal sepenuhnya oleh Terma dan mana-mana undang-undang yang terpakai kepada kami sebagai pembekal perisian.
Anda mengakui bahawa, sekiranya berlaku apa-apa tuntutan pihak ketiga bahawa Aplikasi atau pemilikan dan penggunaan Aplikasi tersebut melanggar hak harta intelek pihak ketiga tersebut, TFH, bukan Apple, akan bertanggungjawab sepenuhnya untuk menyiasat, membela, menyelesaikan dan menanggung tuntutan pelanggaran harta intelek sedemikian setakat yang diperlukan oleh Terma.
Anda mewakili dan menjamin bahawa (i) anda tidak berada di negara yang tertakluk kepada embargo Kerajaan A.S., atau yang telah ditetapkan oleh Kerajaan A.S. sebagai negara "penyokong pengganas"; dan (ii) anda tidak disenaraikan dalam mana-mana senarai pihak yang dilarang atau dihadkan oleh Kerajaan A.S.
Anda dan TFH mengakui serta bersetuju bahawa Apple, dan anak-anak syarikat Apple, adalah pihak yang mendapat manfaat sebagai pihak ketiga daripada Terma Perkhidmatan berkaitan dengan lesen Aplikasi anda, dan apabila anda menerima terma dan syarat Terma Perkhidmatan, Apple akan mempunyai hak (dan dianggap telah menerima hak) untuk menguatkuasakan Terma Perkhidmatan berkaitan dengan lesen Aplikasi anda terhadap anda sebagai pihak ketiga yang mendapat manfaat daripadanya.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Regulamin świadczenia usług Tools For Humanity
Witamy w społeczności Worldcoin! Worldcoin jest protokołem typu open source, wspieranym przez globalną społeczność programistów, osób prywatnych i innych twórców. Tools for Humanity to globalna firma zajmująca się tworzeniem oprogramowania i sprzętu, tworząca narzędzia do dostarczania technologii i produktów blockchain i tożsamości cyfrowej miliardom ludzi, w tym poprzez wspieranie rozwoju ekosystemu Worldcoin.
Niniejszy Regulamin pomiędzy użytkownikiem a Tools for Humanity Corporation, spółką powołaną na mocy przepisów prawa stanu Delaware (łącznie z naszymi jednostkami stowarzyszonymi zwaną „TFH”, „my” lub „nas”) reguluje korzystanie przez użytkownika z naszych witryn internetowych i aplikacji oraz uzyskiwanie do nich dostępu, w tym aplikacji World App i Operator App (łącznie zwanych „Aplikacjami”), a także do wszystkich powiązanych funkcji, treści i usług, które mu świadczymy (łącznie zwanych „Usługami”) w związku z protokołem Worldcoin (zwanym dalej „Worldcoin”).
Prosimy uważnie przeczytać niniejszy Regulamin przed rozpoczęciem korzystania z Usług lub uzyskaniem do nich dostępu. Uzyskując dostęp lub korzystając z którejkolwiek ze świadczonych przez nas Usług, oprócz wyrażenia przez użytkownika wyraźnej zgody na niniejszy Regulamin, wyraża on wyraźną zgodę na przestrzeganie niniejszego Regulaminu oraz naszej
Informacji o ochronie prywatności
, która stanowi część niniejszego Regulaminu.
Proszę zwrócić uwagę na poniższe szczególnie ważne części niniejszego Regulaminu:
Użytkownik wyraża zgodę na rozstrzyganie wszelkich sporów pomiędzy nim a TFH w drodze wiążącego arbitrażu, a nie przed sądem. użytkownicy zamieszkujący w Korei Południowej mogą zamiast tego zdecydować się na rozstrzygnięcie sporu przez właściwy sąd miejscowy. Szczegółowe informacje na ten temat znajdują się w ust. 15 poniżej.
Kryptowaluta, w tym Tokeny cyfrowe, jest w dużej mierze nieuregulowana i może nieść za sobą duże ryzyko. Straty wynikające z takich transakcji mogą nie podlegać żadnym regulacjom prawnym.
Żaden z elementów Usług nie stanowi oferty sprzedaży ani zachęty do złożenia oferty kupna jakichkolwiek papierów wartościowych ani Tokenów cyfrowych. Usługi nie stanowią porady inwestycyjnej. Posiadanie, kupowanie lub sprzedawanie Tokenów cyfrowych (zgodnie z definicją w ust. 2.1 poniżej) może nie być dozwolone w miejscu zamieszkania użytkownika, a obowiązkiem użytkownika jest przestrzeganie wszystkich obowiązujących przepisów prawa. Użytkownik powinien rozważyć, czy kupowanie, sprzedawanie, używanie lub posiadanie Tokenów cyfrowych jest dla niego odpowiednie, biorąc pod uwagę jego sytuację finansową i stan wiedzy na temat Tokenów cyfrowych. Wartość Tokenów cyfrowych może się szybko zmieniać, mogą one nawet stracić całą swoją wartość.
Ponadto tokeny Worldcoin (zwane dalej „WDL”) nie są przeznaczone do użytku, zakupu ani dostępu przez podmioty amerykańskie, w tym obywateli USA, rezydentów USA lub osoby zamieszkujące w Stanach Zjednoczonych, ani przez spółki zarejestrowane, mające siedzibę lub prowadzące działalność w Stanach Zjednoczonych, lub posiadające agenta rejestrowego w Stanach Zjednoczonych. Nie udostępniamy WLD takim podmiotom amerykańskim.
Ponadto użytkownik zgadza się nie sprzedawać, nie przekazywać ani nie udostępniać WLD podmiotom amerykańskim
.
Więcej informacji na temat ryzyka związanego z WLD można znaleźć
tutaj
.
Usługi podmiotów zewnętrznych w rozumieniu ust. 2.5 i połączenia z aplikacjami zdecentralizowanymi w rozumieniu ust. 2.8 nie są przeznaczone do użytku albo uzyskiwania dostępu przez użytkowników zamieszkujących, mających siedzibę, stałe miejsce pobytu lub znajdujących się w Niemczech. Platforma P2P Marketplace w rozumieniu ust. 2.7 nie jest przeznaczona do użytku albo uzyskiwania dostępu przez użytkowników zamieszkujących, mających siedzibę, stałe miejsce pobytu lub znajdujących się w Europejskim Obszarze Gospodarczym (EOG).
1. Zakres Regulaminu
1.1 Prywatność i dane użytkownika
. Uzyskując dostęp do Aplikacji, użytkownik może przekazać nam dane osobowe takich kategorii, jak imię i nazwisko lub numer telefonu. Jeśli użytkownik poda informacje w celu ustanowienia Dowodu osobowości i odebrania tokenów WLD, może on podać wrażliwe dane osobowe należące do takich szczególnych kategorii, takie jak dane biometryczne. W naszej
Informacji o ochronie prywatności
opisano jakie dane gromadzimy od użytkowników i w jaki sposób je wykorzystujemy. Jeśli użytkownik nie chce, abyśmy gromadzili i wykorzystywali jego dane w sposób opisany w Informacji o ochronie prywatności, nie powinien korzystać z Usług.
1.2 Kryteria korzystania z Usług.
Aby korzystać z Usług, użytkownik musi przestrzegać niniejszego Regulaminu i wszystkich obowiązujących przepisów prawa. Użytkownik nie może korzystać z Usług w celu prowadzenia, promowania lub pomagania innym w prowadzeniu jakiejkolwiek nielegalnej działalności.
Ponadto użytkownik musi spełniać wszystkie poniższe kryteria:
wiek co najmniej 18 lat oraz
nieprzebywanie
w następujących krajach, niepozostawanie pod ich kontrolą ani nieposiadanie statusu obywatela albo rezydenta następujących krajów: Syria, Krym, obwody doniecki, ługański, chersoński i zaporoski na Ukrainie, Rosja, Korea Północna, Iran, Kuba lub jakikolwiek inny kraj lub region, w stosunku do którego Stany Zjednoczone, Unia Europejska lub jakikolwiek inny kraj lub jurysdykcja ograniczyły dostęp do Usług;
niefigurowanie w Wykazie specjalnie wyznaczonych obywateli zgodnie z oświadczeniem Biura Kontroli Aktywów Zagranicznych (Office of Foreign Assets Control, „OFAC”) Departamentu Skarbu Stanów Zjednoczonych lub listach podmiotów objętych sankcjami jakiegokolwiek innego kraju, oraz niefigurowanie na Liście osób objętych zakazami prowadzonej przez Departament Handlu USA ani na listach osób objętych zakazami prowadzonych w jakimkolwiek innym kraju.
Jeśli użytkownik nie spełnia wszystkich tych wymogów, nie może on uzyskać dostępu do Usług ani z nich korzystać.
Ponadto, jeśli użytkownik zamieszkuje, ma siedzibę, stałe miejsce pobytu lub znajduje się w Niemczech, nie może on uzyskiwać dostępu do usług zewnętrznych w rozumieniu ust. 2.5, platformy P2P Marketplace w rozumieniu ust. 2.7 lub aplikacji zdecentralizowanych w rozumieniu ust. 2.8 ani z nich korzystać. Te funkcje nie są dla użytkownika dostępne. W odniesieniu do platformy P2P Marketplace w rozumieniu ust. 2.7, to samo dotyczy użytkowników zamieszkujących, mających siedzibę, stałe miejsce pobytu lub znajdujących się w innym kraju na terenie EOG.
1.3 Dostępność
. Witryny internetowe opisujące Usługi są dostępne na całym świecie, ale nie oznacza to, że wszystkie Usługi lub ich funkcje są zgodne z prawem lub dostępne w kraju użytkownika. Dostęp do niektórych Usług (lub niektórych funkcji Usług) w niektórych krajach może być zablokowany przez nas lub rządy innych krajów. Dostęp do urządzenia Orb i naszych operatorów Orb nie będzie dostępny w stanach Teksas, Illinois i Waszyngton, w Portland w stanie Oregon i w Baltimore w stanie Maryland. Użytkownik nie może korzystać z VPN lub podobnych narzędzi w celu obejścia jakichkolwiek ograniczeń. Dostęp do Aplikacji i niektórych funkcji Aplikacji może być niedostępny lub ograniczony w zależności od lokalizacji użytkownika.
Obowiązkiem użytkownika jest upewnienie się, że korzystanie przez niego z Usług jest zgodne z prawem w miejscu, w którym z nich korzysta
. Usługi nie są dostępne we wszystkich językach.
1.4 Aktualizacje
. Możemy okresowo wprowadzać zmiany do tego Regulaminu. W takim przypadku udostępnimy zaktualizowane warunki w Usługach, a jeśli będzie to wymagane przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa, powiadomimy użytkownika przed wprowadzeniem jakichkolwiek zmian; jeśli takie zmiany mogą być szczególnie istotne lub niekorzystne dla użytkownika, przekażemy dodatkowe wcześniejsze powiadomienie, jeśli będzie to wymagane przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa. Użytkownik rozumie i zgadza się, że dalsze korzystanie z Usług po wprowadzeniu przez nas takich zmian i niewyrażenie wyraźnego sprzeciwu wobec nich stanowi akceptację zaktualizowanego Regulaminu. Użytkownik może zaprzestać korzystania z Usług w dowolnym momencie, jeśli nie wyraża on zgody na niniejszy Regulamin. Ze względu na to, że nasze Usługi podlegają z czasem zmianom, możemy zmienić albo zrezygnować z całości albo części Usług w dowolnym momencie, bez powiadomienia, wedle naszego wyłącznego uznania w zakresie dozwolonym obowiązującymi przepisami prawa.
1.5 Postanowienia dodatkowe.
Do określonych aplikacji, treści, funkcji lub części Usług mogą mieć zastosowanie dodatkowe warunki, a wszystkie takie dodatkowe warunki, które zostaną przedstawione użytkownikowi, będą stanowić część niniejszego Regulaminu.
2. Usługi
2.1 Portfel niepowierniczy
Aplikacja World App zawiera niehostowany i niepowierniczy portfel do przechowywania obsługiwanych kryptowalut, walut cyfrowych lub aktywów cyfrowych, w tym WDL (zwanych łącznie „Tokenami cyfrowymi”). Użytkownik kontroluje Tokeny cyfrowe przechowywane w portfelu. Dzięki aplikacji World App klucze prywatne (które stanowią hasło dostępu do Tokenów cyfrowych) są przechowywane bezpośrednio na urządzeniu użytkownika. Użytkownik może wycofać swoje Tokeny cyfrowe w dowolnym momencie, wysyłając je na inny adres blockchain, pod warunkiem posiadania dostępu do Internetu i przeciążenia sieci blockchain. Gdy użytkownik przechowuje Tokeny cyfrowe w portfelu, nie mamy kontroli nad jego portfelem, Tokenami cyfrowymi ani kluczami prywatnymi. Użytkownicy są odpowiedzialni za ryzyko utraty swoich kluczy prywatnych i ani TFH, ani aplikacja World App nie są w stanie odzyskać takich kluczy.
Ponieważ aplikacja World App jest portfelem niepowierniczym, użytkownik otrzyma adres portfela, określający miejsce przechowywania Tokenów cyfrowych pod odpowiednim adresem blockchain. Nie mamy możliwości uzyskania dostępu do Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika.
2.2 Obsługiwane Tokeny cyfrowe
Aplikacja World App obsługuje tokeny ERC-20. W przyszłości możemy dodać obsługę innych Tokenów cyfrowych. W aplikacji World App użytkownik może sprawdzić, które Tokeny cyfrowe są przez nas obsługiwane.
Przed zdeponowaniem lub wypłaceniem Tokenów cyfrowych należy sprawdzić,
które tokeny i sieci są obsługiwane przez aplikację World App. Użytkownik nie jest w stanie odzyskać swoich Tokenów cyfrowych, jeśli wyśle on nieobsługiwane tokeny na niewłaściwy adres portfela.
Użytkownik ma świadomość, że wysłanie nieobsługiwanych Tokenów cyfrowych na adres portfela World App może oznaczać całkowitą utratę dostępu do tych Tokenów cyfrowych. Nie mamy możliwości odzyskania Tokenów cyfrowych wysłanych na niewłaściwy adres portfela. Zawsze należy upewniać się, że Tokeny cyfrowe wysyłane są na prawidłowy adres portfela i zawsze należy dokonywać transakcji testowej z niewielką ilością Tokenów cyfrowych.
2.3 Oferta i dostęp
Podczas interakcji z Tokenami cyfrowymi – np. wysyłania ich na inny adres blockchain lub łączenia się z aplikacją zdecentralizowaną – za pomocą Usług, wymagane będzie zatwierdzenie lub „podpisanie” interakcji za pośrednictwem urządzeń wskazanych podczas konfiguracji. Aplikacje zawsze wymagają zatwierdzenia użytkownika na tych urządzeniach w celu zainicjowania interakcji z odpowiednią siecią blockchain. Użytkownik potwierdza, że podczas wykonywania tych interakcji wchodzi on w bezpośrednią interakcję z odpowiednią siecią blockchain i że nie mamy obowiązku przekazywania poleceń w jego imieniu.
2.4 Informacje na temat podmiotów zewnętrznych
Korzystając z Usług, użytkownik może mieć dostęp do informacji dotyczących jego Tokenów cyfrowych, takich jak między innymi ich aktualna wartość rynkowa. Przedstawienie tych informacji nie oznacza żadnego powiązania z podmiotami zewnętrznymi ani ich popierania, nawet jeśli niektóre funkcje udostępniane w związku z Usługami wymagają korzystania z takich produktów podmiotów zewnętrznych. Informacje na temat takich usług i produktów podmiotów zewnętrznych podane za pośrednictwem Usług opierają się na informacjach ogólnodostępnych albo przekazanych nam przez takie podmioty zewnętrzne, w związku z czym nie składamy żadnych oświadczeń ani gwarancji dotyczących dokładności takich informacji na temat usług lub produktów podmiotów zewnętrznych.
2.5 Usługi podmiotów zewnętrznych
Niniejszy ustęp nie ma zastosowania do użytkowników zamieszkujących, mających siedzibę, stałe miejsce pobytu lub znajdujących się w Niemczech:
Gdy to możliwe, w Usługach mogą być dostępne łącza do zewnętrznych podmiotów przetwarzających w celu przetwarzania transakcji, takich jak zakupy, sprzedaż i wymiana Tokenów cyfrowych za walutę fiducjarną i inne funkcje, które mogą być dostępne w przyszłości. Użytkownik może sprawdzić, jakie usługi podmiotów zewnętrznych są dostępne w aplikacji World App. Dokonując tych transakcji, użytkownik dokonuje transakcji z podmiotami zewnętrznymi, a nie z nami. Należy przestrzegać odpowiednich instrukcji przekazanych przez zewnętrznego usługodawcę i zaakceptować
regulamin świadczenia usług. Nie przejmujemy kontroli nad środkami ani Tokenami cyfrowymi użytkownika ani nie przekazujemy ich w żadnym momencie świadczenia naszych Usług ani gdy uzyskuje on dostęp do usług podmiotów zewnętrznych.
2.6 Transakcje społecznościowe
W ramach Usług możliwe jest wysyłanie obsługiwanych Tokenów cyfrowych do podmiotów zewnętrznych oraz żądanie, otrzymywanie i przechowywanie obsługiwanych Tokenów cyfrowych od podmiotów zewnętrznych poprzez inicjowanie transakcji za pośrednictwem Usług. Przeniesienie przez użytkownika obsługiwanych Tokenów cyfrowych do innego portfela blockchain oraz do podmiotów zewnętrznych lub od nich to transfer. Gdy użytkownik lub podmiot zewnętrzny wysyła Tokeny cyfrowe na adres portfela, osoba inicjująca transakcję ponosi wyłączną odpowiedzialność za prawidłowe wykonanie transakcji, co może obejmować między innymi uiszczenie odpowiednich opłat sieciowych lub opłat za kopanie kryptowalut w celu pomyślnego przeprowadzenia transakcji. Niewystarczające opłaty sieciowe mogą spowodować, że przelew nie dojdzie do skutku i może spowodować opóźnienia lub straty poniesione w wyniku błędu w inicjacji transakcji. Nie mamy obowiązku pomagać w przeprowadzeniu takich transakcji. Kiedy użytkownik wysyła dowolny Token Cyfrowy ze swojego portfela do innego portfela blockchain, takie transfery są wykonywane przez niego w łańcuchu i nie są pod naszą kontrolą. Użytkownik powinien zweryfikować wszystkie informacje dotyczące transakcji przed ich przesłaniem. Nie ponosimy żadnej odpowiedzialności w przypadku wprowadzenia przez użytkownika nieprawidłowego adresu docelowego blockchain. Transferów Tokenów cyfrowych nie można cofnąć po ich przesłaniu do odpowiedniej sieci blockchain, chociaż mogą one być w toku i odpowiednio oznaczone podczas przetwarzania transakcji przez operatorów sieci. Nie kontrolujemy sieci i nie gwarantujemy, że przelew zostanie potwierdzony przez sieć.
2.7 Sejf Worldcoin
Informacje ogólne
Aplikacja World App oferuje możliwość dostępu do zdecentralizowanego „sejfu” dla Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika (zwanego dalej „Sejfem”). Korzystanie przez użytkownika z Sejfu oznacza przyjęcie do wiadomości i akceptację regulaminu Sejfu, jak również wszelkich dodatkowych regulaminów podmiotów zewnętrznych, które opracowały lub dostarczają funkcje związane z korzystaniem z Sejfu.
Sejf obsługuje tylko niektóre Tokeny cyfrowe. Te Tokeny cyfrowe nie kwalifikują się jako Tokeny powiązane z aktywami lub Tokeny będące e-pieniądzem, zgodnie z warunkami określonymi w Rozporządzeniu Parlamentu Europejskiego i Rady (UE) 2023/1114 z dnia 31 maja 2023 r. w sprawie rynków kryptoaktywów. Obsługiwane Tokeny cyfrowe będą wyświetlane w aplikacji World App podczas uzyskiwania dostępu do Sejfu. Tokeny cyfrowe obsługiwane przez Sejf mogą okresowo ulegać zmianie i nie ma gwarancji, że obsługiwane Tokeny cyfrowe w Sejfie pozostaną dostępne do użytku.
Sejf jest dostarczany w związku z inteligentnymi umowami podmiotów zewnętrznych. Żadna inna osoba ani podmiot, poza użytkownikiem, nie ma możliwości interakcji z jego Sejfem lub Tokenami cyfrowymi znajdującymi się w jego Sejfie. Ani TFH, ani żaden podmiot zewnętrzny nie posiadają kluczy administracyjnych ani dostępu (uprzywilejowanego lub innego) do Sejfu użytkownika lub powiązanych z nim inteligentnych umów. Zdeponowanie w Sejfie lub wypłata z Sejfu jakichkolwiek Tokenów cyfrowych na konto użytkownika może nastąpić tylko wtedy, gdy taka transakcja zostanie podpisana odpowiednim kluczem prywatnym zgodnie z opisem w ust. 2.1 niniejszego Regulaminu. Oznacza to, że jeśli użytkownik utraci dostęp do swoich kluczy prywatnych lub kontrolę nad nimi, nie będzie on mógł deponować Tokenów cyfrowych w Sejfie ani wypłacać ich z Sejfu i żaden inny podmiot nie będzie w stanie mu pomóc ani zrobić tego w jego imieniu. W związku z tym korzystanie ze Sejfu nie obejmuje i nie może obejmować żadnych usług przechowywania, powierzania lub przekazywania przez TFH lub jakikolwiek podmiot zewnętrzny jakichkolwiek Tokenów cyfrowych, które może on zablokować za pomocą Sejfu na swoim koncie.
Inteligentną umowę regulującą funkcje Sejfu dla tokenów WLD można wyświetlić za pomocą sieci blockchain
tutaj
. Celem uniknięcia wątpliwości, korzystanie z tych i wszelkich innych powiązanych funkcji Sejfu podlega Wyłączeniu odpowiedzialności z tytułu gwarancji zawartemu w ust. 12 niniejszego Regulaminu.
Funkcje Sejfu
Sejf oferuje obecnie następujące funkcje, które mogą być zmieniane, usuwane lub dodawane przez TFH lub podmioty zewnętrzne:
Blokowanie
Generowanie zysku
Wypłaty i okres zabezpieczenia
Wpłaty do Sejfu
Blokowanie
Korzystając z Sejfu, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na zablokowanie swoich Tokenów cyfrowych na określony czas. Zablokowanie Tokenów cyfrowych w Sejfie spowoduje przeniesienie tych Tokenów cyfrowych z niepowierniczego portfela użytkownika do zdecentralizowanych inteligentnych umów. Po przekazaniu te Tokeny cyfrowe zostaną zablokowane w Sejfie przez okres obejmujący czas zdeponowania ich w Sejfie oraz przez z góry określony okres zwany Okresem zabezpieczenia, który opisano bardziej szczegółowo poniżej. Gdy Tokeny cyfrowe użytkownika będą zablokowane, nie będzie on mógł uzyskać do nich dostępu, dokonać ich transferu ani wykonać żadnej innej transakcji z ich użyciem, dopóki nie zażąda ich wypłaty i nie upłynie odpowiedni Okres zabezpieczenia. Nikt, w tym TFH lub zewnętrzny Dostawca, nie będzie mieć możliwości odblokowania, przechowywania, kontrolowania, wypłaty lub przekazywania zablokowanych Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika. Umieszczenie Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika w Sejfie i zablokowanie możliwości wypłaty nie stanowi sprzedaży, pożyczki ani przeniesienia jakichkolwiek praw, tytułów lub udziałów w Tokenach cyfrowych na TFH lub jakikolwiek inny podmiot zewnętrzny.
Zablokowanie Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika w Sejfie nie gwarantuje ich bezpieczeństwa ani nadzoru na nimi. Żaden system ubezpieczenia depozytów ani żadne podobne zabezpieczenie nie ma zastosowania do Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika, a wartość lub użyteczność zablokowanych przez niego Tokenów cyfrowych może wzrosnąć lub spaść w trakcie trwania Okresu zabezpieczenia. Oznacza to, że wartość lub użyteczność wszelkich Tokenów cyfrowych, które użytkownik zablokuje w Sejfie, może zmniejszyć się lub spaść do zera w Okresie zabezpieczenia. Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości i potwierdza, że każda wypłata Tokenów cyfrowych z jego konta po upływie obowiązującego Okresu zabezpieczenia może skutkować zwrotem Tokenów cyfrowych, które mają niższą wartość niż w momencie zablokowania ich w jego Sejfie, oraz że ani TFH ani żaden podmiot zewnętrzny nie ponosi ryzyka ani odpowiedzialności za jakiekolwiek ewentualne zmniejszenie wartości tokenów.
Generowanie zysku
Użytkownik może również mieć możliwość generowania tego, co dla celów tego produktu określa się jako zysk z niektórych Tokenów cyfrowych w Sejfie. Ten zysk, który może przybrać formę dodatkowych Tokenów cyfrowych, jest dostarczany przez podmiot zewnętrzny za pomocą oddzielnej serii operacji inteligentnych umów, do których można uzyskać dostęp za pomocą interfejsu udostępnionego w aplikacji World App. Ani TFH, ani żaden podmiot zewnętrzny nie wykorzystują ani nie kontrolują Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika, nie otrzymują żadnych zysków z nich ani w żaden inny sposób nie rozporządzają nimi. Zysk nie stanowi odsetka powiązanego z innymi operacjami lub generowanego przez operacje inne niż zablokowanie Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika zgodnie z regulaminem i specyfikacjami. Wszelkie zyski, które użytkownik może otrzymać, są przyznawane przez podmiot zewnętrzny na podstawie jego decyzji o przechowywaniu Tokenów cyfrowych w Sejfie. Specyfikacje określające generowanie zysku, w tym wygenerowaną kwotę lub okres, w którym może on zostać naliczony, mogą zostać zmienione lub anulowane w dowolnym momencie, według uznania zewnętrznego Usługodawcy.
Może zostać określona maksymalna kwota zysku, jaką można uzyskać. Dane te będą wyświetlane obok Sejfu użytkownika i we wszelkich dodatkowych warunkach przekazanych przez podmiot zewnętrzny (zwany „Usługodawcą” w aplikacji World App) zapewniający zysk. Te dodatkowe warunki są również włączone do niniejszego Regulaminu. Zysk nie jest dostarczany ani obsługiwany przez TFH.
Wszelkie naliczone zyski zostaną użytkownikowi wypłacone dopiero po wypłacie z Sejfu wszelkich generujących zyski Tokenów cyfrowych, co nastąpi dopiero po zakończeniu obowiązującego Okresu zabezpieczenia. Ta wypłata jest ostatecznym warunkiem przyznania zysku, co oznacza, że użytkownik nie ma żadnych praw, tytułów ani udziałów w żadnym zysku, który został lub zostanie wygenerowany, do momentu wypłaty zysku do jego portfela niepowierniczego. Oznacza to również, że w przypadku utraty dostępu lub kontroli nad kluczami prywatnymi, użytkownik nie będzie w stanie dokonać żadnych wypłat, które uprawniałyby go do otrzymania zysku.
Wypłaty i okres zabezpieczenia
Użytkownik może zainicjować wypłatę swoich Tokenów cyfrowych z Sejfu w dowolnym momencie. Tokeny cyfrowe będące przedmiotem żądanej wypłaty z Sejfu zostaną przekazane użytkownikowi po upływie ustalonego czasu zwanego Okresem zabezpieczenia. Za każdym razem, gdy użytkownik zainicjuje wypłatę Tokenów cyfrowych z Sejfu, rozpocznie się nowy okres zabezpieczenia i zacznie się odliczanie czasu do momentu, w którym te Tokeny cyfrowe zostaną mu zwrócone. W tym okresie Tokeny cyfrowe wybrane do wypłaty pozostaną zablokowane, a użytkownik może również anulować wypłatę. Po upływie Okresu zabezpieczenia wypłata zostanie zakończona, a Tokeny cyfrowe, wraz z wygenerowanym zyskiem, który mógł zostać naliczony, zostaną przesłane do portfela użytkownika. Czas trwania Okresu zabezpieczenia zostanie podany w aplikacji World App, gdy użytkownik uzyska dostęp do Sejfu.
Wpłaty do Sejfu
Ta funkcja, po jej wybraniu, umożliwia automatyczne wysyłanie tokenów WLD bezpośrednio do Sejfu na koncie użytkownika zamiast do portfela. Ustawienie to można zmienić w dowolnym momencie.
TFH i Sejf
Dostęp do tej funkcji można uzyskać za pośrednictwem aplikacji World App. TFH będzie jednak w stanie jedynie odczytać powiązane dane i wyświetlić je użytkownikowi. TFH nie może przekazywać, wypłacać ani deponować żadnych Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika i nie ma dostępu do jego Sejfu.
2.8 Aplikacje zdecentralizowane
Niniejszy ustęp nie ma zastosowania do użytkowników zamieszkujących, mających siedzibę, stałe miejsce pobytu lub znajdujących się w Niemczech:
Gdy to możliwe,
możemy udostępniać funkcję umożliwiającą połączenie portfela użytkownika z różnymi zdecentralizowanymi aplikacjami. Na użytkowniku spoczywa wyłączny obowiązek zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa tych aplikacji zewnętrznych. Nie mamy kontroli nad aplikacjami zewnętrznymi i nie możemy zapewnić wsparcia w przypadku jakichkolwiek problemów, które użytkownik może napotkać podczas łączenia się z nimi.
2.9 Obsługa klienta
Zapewniamy obsługę klienta w celu udzielenia pomocy w zakresie niektórych opcji i funkcji związanych z Usługami. Aby się skontaktować, należy kliknąć „Pomoc” w menu aplikacji.
2.10 Protokół World ID
Fundacja Worldcoin kontroluje protokół World ID. Użytkownik może korzystać z protokołu World ID za pośrednictwem Usługi. Protokół World ID pozwala udowodnić, że użytkownik jest prawdziwym człowiekiem, jednocześnie chroniąc jego prywatność.
Rejestrując się w celu utworzenia identyfikatora World ID, użytkownik potwierdza, że nigdy wcześniej nie rejestrował się w celu utworzenia identyfikatora World ID i że rejestruje się tylko raz. Chociaż dokładamy wszelkich starań, aby zapewnić prawidłowe działanie identyfikatora World ID, nie ma gwarancji, że usługa będzie całkowicie niezawodna i dokładna. Ponadto istnieje możliwość wystąpienia fałszywego wyniku pozytywnego podczas próby zarejestrowania się w celu utworzenia identyfikatora World ID po raz pierwszy. Korzystając z identyfikatora World ID i wyrażając wyraźną zgodę na odnośne regulaminy, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na wszystkie warunki w nich zawarte, w tym postanowienia regulaminu Fundacji Worldcoin.
2.11 Program zaproszeń
Gdy to możliwe, możemy udostępniać funkcję zaproszeń. Korzystając z funkcji zaproszeń, użytkownik może zaprosić znajomych i rodzinę do pobrania aplikacji World App i uwierzytelniania w celu utworzenia identyfikatora World ID.
Nagrody za udział w Programie zaproszeń są zapewniane przez World Assets Limited. World Assets Limited może, według własnego uznania, zaoferować użytkownikowi nagrodę za zaproszenie użytkowników, którzy pomyślnie przejdą uwierzytelnianie i utworzą swój identyfikator World ID. Aby otrzymać nagrodę, należy spełnić określone warunki, które zostaną określone w aplikacji World App. Istnieje maksymalny limit liczby użytkowników, których użytkownik może zaprosić do korzystania z aplikacji World App. Limit ten jest wyświetlany w aplikacji World App.
Do korzystania z funkcji zaproszeń nie jest konieczne dokonywanie żadnego zakupu. Funkcja zaproszeń jest dostępna wyłącznie do osobistego, niekomercyjnego użytku. Użytkownik może korzystać z funkcji zaproszeń wyłącznie w dobrej wierze w celach zgodnych z prawem. Zabronione jest: (a) korzystanie z funkcji zaproszeń lub Usług w sposób wprowadzający w błąd, oszukańczy lub niezgodny z prawem; (b) podejmowanie jakichkolwiek działań mających na celu zaszkodzenie naszej marce, wartości firmy lub reputacji; (c) przesyłanie niechcianych lub nieautoryzowanych materiałów reklamowych lub promocyjnych; (d) składanie fałszywych lub wprowadzających w błąd oświadczeń; (e) korzystanie z płatnego wyszukiwania, płatnych mediów lub innych podobnych działań w celu pozyskania użytkowników za pomocą funkcji zaproszeń; oraz (f) korzystanie z funkcji zaproszeń w celu uzyskania danych osobowych od innych użytkowników.
Funkcji zaproszeń nie jest dostępna we wszystkich krajach lub lokalizacjach i nie jest dostępna dla wszystkich użytkowników. Korzystanie z funkcji zaproszeń nie jest możliwe w żadnej jurysdykcji, w której całość lub część tej funkcji może naruszać (lub spowodować naruszenie) jakichkolwiek wymogów prawnych. Użytkownik zgadza się nie korzystać z funkcji zaproszeń, jeśli nie jest ona zgodna z prawem obowiązującym w jego lokalizacji.
Funkcja zaproszeń jest udostępniana według naszego wyłącznego uznania. Możemy zmieniać, modyfikować, zawieszać i anulować tę funkcję w dowolnym momencie. World Assets Limited może odmówić zaoferowania użytkownikowi nagrody za zaproszenie użytkowników do uwierzytelniania w celu utworzenia identyfikatora World ID w przypadku, gdy stwierdzi, według własnego uznania, że naruszył on niniejszy Regulamin.
2.12 Przyznawanie i rezerwacje tokenów WLD
Po pomyślnym zarejestrowaniu identyfikatora World ID użytkownik może ubiegać się o niewielką liczbę tokenów WDL w różnych odstępach czasu („Przyznawanie tokenów WDL”). Jeśli użytkownik nie zarejestrował jeszcze identyfikatora World ID, możemy umożliwić mu wcześniejszą rezerwację tokenów WLD („Rezerwacja tokenów WLD”). Przyznawanie tokenów WLD i rezerwacje WLD dokonywane jest przez World Assets Limited, jednostkę zależną Fundacji Worldcoin. Dokładne kwoty, odstępy czasu i terminy zarówno Przyznawania tokenów WLD, jak i Rezerwacji tokenów WLD zostaną określone w aplikacji World App, ale są ustalane wyłącznie przez World Assets Limited. Zezwalając użytkownikowi na ubieganie się o Rezerwacje tokenów WLD, nie gwarantujemy, że zostaną mu przydzielone jakiekolwiek tokeny WDL. Rezerwacje tokenów WLD mogą wygasnąć, po uprzednim powiadomieniu lub bez powiadomienia w aplikacji World App, niezależnie od tego, czy użytkownik dokonał już Rezerwacji tokenów WLD lub otrzymał powiązane tokeny WLD. Mogą one być anulowane według wyłącznego uznania World Assets Limited.
2.13 Aplikacja Operator App
Dla Operatorów Orb i innych partnerów udostępniamy aplikację Operator App, która umożliwia użytkownikowi monitorowanie określonych działań i statystyk istotnych dla niego i jego działalności jako Operatora Orb. Użytkownik może również korzystać z pewnych funkcji, aby pomóc mu w prowadzeniu działalności w charakterze Operatora Orb.
3. Zakupy, opłaty i podatki
3.1 Opłaty transakcyjne
. Korzystając z Usług, użytkownik zgadza się uiścić wszystkie obowiązujące opłaty, w tym opłaty transakcyjne za wymianę Tokenów cyfrowych i transakcje z nimi związane. Użytkownik zostanie poinformowany o wszelkich obowiązujących opłatach przed dokonaniem transakcji. Jeśli użytkownik korzysta z usług zewnętrznego podmiotu obsługującego płatności, opłaty bankowe, opłaty za karty kredytowe i debetowe naliczone za wszelkie zakupy Tokenów cyfrowych mogą zostać potrącone z ustalonej kwoty zakupów Tokenów cyfrowych. Użytkownik jest również odpowiedzialny za uiszczenie wszelkich dodatkowych opłat pobieranych przez dostawcę usług finansowych.
3.2 Opłata sieciowa
. Interakcje z siecią blockchain również wiążą się z opłatą sieciową. Opłata sieciowa jest pobierana i płacona sieci blockchain za umożliwienie interakcji, a nie nam.
3.3 Podatki
. Użytkownik ponosi wyłączną odpowiedzialność za ustalenie ewentualnych podatków, które mogą mieć zastosowanie do jakiejkolwiek transakcji zawieranej za pośrednictwem Usług oraz za potrącenie, pobranie, zgłoszenie i przekazanie właściwej kwoty podatku odpowiednim organom podatkowym.
3.4 Aktualizacje
. Wszystkie aktualne opłaty są wyświetlane w Usługach i mogą być okresowo aktualizowane i zmieniane.
4. Czynniki ryzyka
4.1 Zakaz stosowania w charakterze prawnego środka płatniczego.
Tokeny cyfrowe nie są prawnym środkiem płatniczym, nie są wspierane przez żaden rząd, a konta z Tokenami cyfrowymi oraz salda w Usługach nie podlegają ochronie Federalnej Korporacji Ubezpieczeń Depozytów (Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation), Funduszowi Ochrony Inwestorów Papierów Wartościowych (Securities Investor Protection Corporation) ani podobnej ochronie zapewnianej w innych krajach. Nie jesteśmy bankiem i nie oferujemy usług powierniczych. Transakcje dokonywane za pośrednictwem aplikacji World App są w wielu krajach w dużej mierze nieuregulowane. Nie gwarantujemy funkcjonalności obsługiwanych przez nas sieci blockchain, co może między innymi prowadzić do opóźnień, konfliktów interesów lub decyzji operacyjnych podmiotów zewnętrznych, które będą niekorzystne dla niektórych właścicieli tokenów cyfrowych, lub mogą prowadzić do niemożności sfinalizowania transakcji za pomocą Usług. Transakcje zlecone przez użytkownika za pośrednictwem Usług mogą nie zostać zrealizowane lub mogą zostać znacznie opóźnione w odnośnej sieci blockchain, a my nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności za brak potwierdzenia lub przetworzenia transakcji zgodnie z jego oczekiwaniami. Nie składamy żadnych gwarancji ani zapewnień, że transfer zainicjowany za pośrednictwem Usług będzie skutkować pomyślnym przeniesieniem tytułu lub prawa do dowolnego Tokenu cyfrowego. Ponadto z korzystaniem z niektórych aktywów cyfrowych, takich jak tokeny WLD, może wiązać się pewne ryzyko. Więcej informacji na temat ryzyka związanego z tokenami WLD można znaleźć tutaj.
4.2 Nowe technologie.
Usługi są nowe. Chociaż oprogramowanie to zostało gruntownie przetestowane, oprogramowanie używane do świadczenia Usług jest wciąż stosunkowo nowe i może zawierać błędy lub luki w zabezpieczeniach. Co więcej, oprogramowanie jest nadal w fazie rozwoju i może z czasem ulec znaczącym zmianom, które mogą nie spełnić oczekiwań użytkowników.
4.3 Zagrożenia dla bezpieczeństwa informacji.
Tokeny cyfrowe i dostęp do Usług mogą podlegać przywłaszczeniu lub kradzieży. Hakerzy lub inne grupy lub organizacje podejmujące szkodliwe działania mogą próbować zakłócać działanie Usług na różne sposoby, w tym w szczególności poprzez ataki złośliwego oprogramowania, ataki typu „odmowa usługi”, ataki ingerujące w mechanizmy konsensusu, ataki Sybil, smurfing i podszywanie się pod DNS. Ponadto, ponieważ obsługiwane przez nas sieci blockchain, takie jak protokół Ethereum, opierają się na oprogramowaniu typu open source, bazowe oprogramowanie Usług może zawierać zamierzone lub niezamierzone błędy lub słabe punkty, które mogą negatywnie wpłynąć na Usługi lub spowodować utratę Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika lub utratę dostępu do portfela użytkownika lub możliwości kontrolowania go za pośrednictwem Usług. Naprawienie takiego błędu lub słabego ust. oprogramowania może nie być możliwe, a użytkownicy nie mają gwarancji naprawy, zwrotu kosztów ani odszkodowania.
4.4 Dokładność danych.
Chociaż naszym zamiarem jest dostarczanie dokładnych i aktualnych informacji za pośrednictwem Usług (w tym w szczególności treści), mogą one nie zawsze być w pełni dokładne, kompletne lub aktualne, a także mogą zawierać nieścisłości techniczne lub błędy typograficzne. W celu zapewnienia użytkownikowi jak najpełniejszych i jak najdokładniejszych informacji, informacje takie, w tym w szczególności informacje dotyczące naszych zasad, produktów i usług, być okresowo zmieniane lub aktualizowane, w zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa, bez powiadomienia. W związku z tym użytkownik powinien weryfikować wszystkie informacje przed ich wykorzystaniem, ponieważ wszelkie decyzje oparte na informacjach przekazanych za pośrednictwem Usług są podejmowane na jego wyłączną odpowiedzialność, a my nie ponosimy żadnej odpowiedzialności za takie decyzje.
4.5 Dostępność
. Chociaż staramy się zapewnić użytkownikowi doskonałą obsługę, nie gwarantujemy, że Usługi będą dostępne bez przerwy. Usługi mogą być okresowo niedostępne z powodu konserwacji lub z innych przyczyn. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności z tytułu jakichkolwiek błędów, pominięć, zakłóceń, usuniętych treści, wad, opóźnień w działaniu lub transmisji, brak działania łączy komunikacyjnych, kradzieży lub zniszczenia lub nieautoryzowanego dostępu do komunikatów użytkownika lub ich zmiany. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności z tytułu
jakichkolwiek problemów lub awarii technicznych sieci lub linii telefonicznych, internetowych systemów komputerowych, serwerów lub usługodawców, sprzętu komputerowego, oprogramowania, awarii poczty e-mail lub odtwarzaczy z powodu problemów technicznych lub przeciążenia połączenia internetowego lub Usług lub połączenia powyższych czynników, w tym z tytułu urazów lub szkód, które mogą doznać użytkownicy lub komputery innych osób związane z wykonywanie działań lub pobieraniem materiałów w związku z Usługą. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności z tytułu jakichkolwiek strat lub szkód, szkód finansowych lub utraconych zysków, utraty działalności, urazów lub śmierci wynikających z korzystania przez kogokolwiek z Usługi, jakichkolwiek Treści publikowanych w Usłudze lub za jej pośrednictwem lub przekazywanych użytkownikom, lub jakichkolwiek interakcji między użytkownikami Usług, zarówno online, jak i offline.
4.6 Forki
. Oprogramowanie używane do tworzenia tokenów WLD jest oprogramowaniem typu open-source i może być bezpłatnie kopiowane i używane przez każdego. Oznacza to, że każdy może stworzyć zmodyfikowaną wersję WLD, inaczej zwaną „Forkiem”. W przypadku Forka lub jakiegokolwiek innego zakłócenia sieci tokenów cyfrowych, możemy nie być w stanie obsługiwać żadnych działań związanych z Forkiem. W przypadku Forka transakcje mogą nie zostać zawarte, zostać zawarte częściowo lub nieprawidłowo lub być znacznie opóźnione. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności za jakiekolwiek poniesione przez użytkownika straty, które będą spowodowane w całości lub w części przez Fork lub inne zakłócenia sieci.
4.7 Usługi podmiotów zewnętrznych.
Gdy to możliwe (zob. w szczególności ust. 2.5), polegamy na zewnętrznych usługodawcach w celu zapewnienia niektórych funkcji i funkcjonalności Aplikacji, na przykład możliwości zakupu aktywów cyfrowych za walutę fiducjarną lub możliwości wymiany jednego rodzaju aktywa cyfrowego na inny. Nie świadczymy takich usług i nie jesteśmy stroną takich transakcji. Użytkownik korzysta
wyłącznie z usług zewnętrznych usługodawców i musi posiadać konto u tych zewnętrznych usługodawców i zaakceptować ich regulaminy. Nie jesteśmy w stanie pomóc użytkownikowi w przypadku napotkania problemów z korzystaniem z ich usług i nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności za jakiekolwiek transakcje dokonywane przez niego za pośrednictwem usługodawców zewnętrznych.
5. Własność intelektualna.
5.1 Własność
. Nasze oprogramowanie, aplikacja, Usługi, Treść, Znaki (zgodnie z definicją poniżej) oraz projekt, wybór i układ Treści w Usługach (zwane dalej „Własnością intelektualną”) są przepisami prawa dotyczącymi praw autorskich, znaków towarowych oraz innymi przepisami prawa obowiązującymi w Stanach Zjednoczonych i innych odnośnych krajach. Użytkownik zobowiązuje się przestrzegać wszystkich obowiązujących praw własności intelektualnej, a także wszelkich informacji lub ograniczeń dotyczących znaków towarowych lub praw autorskich zawartych w Umowie lub Usługach. Użytkownik nie może usuwać żadnych informacji o prawach autorskich, znakach towarowych lub prawach własności zawartych we Własności intelektualnej.
5.2 Znaki towarowe.
Nazwa Tools for Humanity Corporation, nazwa i projekt Worldcoin, logo „Seven Hands” i wszystkie powiązane logo oraz slogany są znakami towarowymi lub znakami usługowymi Tools for Humanity Corporation lub jej licencjodawców (zwanymi dalej „Znakami”). Zabrania się kopiowania, imitowania lub wykorzystywania Znaków, w całości lub w części, bez naszej pisemnej zgody. Wszystkie inne znaki towarowe, nazwy lub logo wymienione w związku z Usługami są własnością ich prawnych właścicieli i zabrania się ich kopiowania, imitowania lub wykorzystywania, w całości lub w części, bez pisemnej zgody prawnego właściciela znaku towarowego. Włączenie jakichkolwiek znaków innych podmiotów do Usług nie oznacza ich akceptacji, poparcia ani rekomendacji z naszej strony.
6. Licencja i ograniczenia
6.1 Licencja
. Pod warunkiem uprawnienia użytkownika do korzystania z Usług i przestrzegania przez niego niniejszego Regulaminu, niniejszym udzielamy użytkownikowi ograniczonej licencji na dostęp do Usług i korzystanie z nich.
6.2 Ograniczenia licencji
. Użytkownik nie może ponownie publikować Treści w żadnej witrynie internetowej, intranetowej lub ekstranetowej ani włączać informacji do jakiejkolwiek innej bazy danych lub kompilacji, również wszelkie inne wykorzystanie Treści jest surowo wzbronione. Jakiekolwiek korzystanie z Usług w sposób inny niż wyraźnie dozwolony w niniejszym Regulaminie, bez naszej uprzedniej pisemnej zgody, jest surowo wzbronione i spowoduje wygaśnięcie licencji udzielonej w niniejszym Regulaminie. Takie niedozwolone użytkowanie może ponadto stanowić naruszenie obowiązującego prawa, w tym w szczególności przepisów dotyczących praw autorskich i znaków towarowych, a także ustaw i przepisów dotyczących komunikacji. O ile nie zostało to wyraźnie określone w niniejszym Regulaminie, żadne z postanowień niniejszego Regulaminu nie może być intepretowana jako przyznająca jakiekolwiek licencje dotyczące jakichkolwiek praw własności intelektualnej, czy to poprzez estoppel, w sposób dorozumiany ani w inny sposób. W zakresie dozwolonym obowiązującymi przepisami prawa licencja ta może zostać odwołana przez nas w dowolnym momencie, bez wypowiedzenia i za podaniem albo bez podawania przyczyny.
6.3 Rząd
. Użytkownikom końcowym należącym do instytucji rządowej USA udzielamy licencji na Usługi jako na „Przedmiot handlowy”, zgodnie z definicją tego terminu zawartą w Kodeksie Przepisów Federalnych USA (48 C.F.R. §2.101), a prawa, które przyznajemy im do Usług, są takie same jak prawa, które przyznajemy wszystkim innym osobom na mocy niniejszego Regulaminu.
7. Dopuszczalne wykorzystanie
7.1
Użytkownik może korzystać z Usług wyłącznie na własny użytek. Zastrzegamy sobie prawo, według własnego uznania, do każdorazowego sprawdzenia,
anulowania lub zawieszenia dostępu użytkownika do Usług lub korzystania z nich zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa. Pozycje w wykazie Zabronionych zastosowań są jedynie przykładami, a wykaz ten nie jest wyczerpujący; możemy dodawać lub usuwać Zabronione zastosowania według własnego uznania zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa.
7.2 Zabronione zastosowania obejmują:
nielegalną działalność:
wszelkie działania, które naruszałyby lub pomagałyby w naruszeniu jakichkolwiek programów sankcji prowadzonych przez OFAC; naruszałyby lub pomagałyby w naruszeniu jakichkolwiek przepisów prawa obowiązujących w krajach, w których prowadzimy działalność; wiązałyby się z wpływami z jakiejkolwiek nielegalnej działalności; lub obejmowałyby publikację, rozpowszechnianie lub dystrybucję jakichkolwiek nielegalnych materiałów lub informacji;
nadmierne wykorzystanie lub hakowanie:
wszelkie działania, które powodują nieuzasadnione lub nieproporcjonalnie duże obciążenie na naszą infrastrukturę; szkodliwe zakłócanie, przechwytywanie lub przywłaszczanie dowolnego systemu, danych lub informacji; przesyłanie lub wgrywanie do Usług jakichkolwiek materiałów zawierających wirusy, konie trojańskie, robaki lub inne szkodliwe lub złośliwe programy; lub próby uzyskania nieautoryzowanego dostępu do systemów komputerowych lub sieci połączonych z Usługami;
szkodliwe działania wobec innych osób:
wszelkie działania, które zakłócają dostęp innej osoby do Usług lub uniemożliwiają korzystanie z nich; zniesławianie, znęcanie, wymuszanie, nękanie, prześladowanie, grożenie lub inne naruszenie prywatności innej osoby, jej praw własności intelektualnej lub innych praw; podżeganie, grożenie, umożliwianie, promowanie lub zachęcanie do nienawiści, nietolerancji rasowej lub aktów przemocy wobec innych osób; lub pozyskiwanie maszynowe, prowadzenie scrapingu lub gromadzenie danych innego użytkownika z Usług bez pozwolenia;
oszustwa i inne nieuczciwe praktyki biznesowe:
wszelkie działania mające na celu oszukanie nas, naszych użytkowników lub jakiejkolwiek innej osoby; dostarczanie nam fałszywych, niedokładnych lub wprowadzających w błąd informacji; obiecywanie nieuzasadnionych wysokich nagród lub sprzedaż usługi bez dodatkowych korzyści dla kupującego; lub wspieranie innych rażących i oszukańczych praktyk, w tym nielegalnych loterii, aukcji z opłatą za udział w licytacji, konkursów, hazardu lub innych gier losowych;
naruszenie praw własności intelektualnej:
wszelkie działania obejmujące sprzedaż, dystrybucję lub zapewnianie dostępu do podrobionych utworów muzycznych, filmów, oprogramowania lub innych licencjonowanych materiałów bez odpowiedniego upoważnienia ze strony posiadacza praw; wykorzystywanie Własności intelektualnej (w tym Znaku) bez wyraźnej zgody lub w sposób, który w inny sposób szkodzi nam lub naszej marce, sugeruje nasze poparcie lub powiązania z nami; lub naruszanie lub pogwałcenie praw autorskich, znaków towarowych, prawa do wizerunku lub prywatności, lub jakichkolwiek innych praw własności przysługujących na mocy prawa.
8. Operatorzy Orb
Współpracujemy z lokalnymi niezależnymi wykonawcami zwanymi „Operatorami Orb”, którzy umożliwiają użytkownikom rejestrację i pomagają odpowiedzieć na ewentualne pytania użytkowników na nasz temat. Operatorzy Orb przeszli szkolenia i posiadają wiedzę na temat Worldcoin. Nie mamy jednak kontroli nad ich wypowiedziami i postępowaniem i zrzekamy się wszelkiej odpowiedzialności z tego tytułu.
Operatorzy Orb nie występują w charakterze naszych przedstawicieli ani pracowników. Żadne działania, funkcje, procesy, polityki, standardy ani inne czynności podejmowane przez TFH w interesie użytkowników nie oznaczają istnienia stosunku pracy lub stosunku przedstawicielstwa z Operatorem Orb.
9. Zawieszenie
Możemy zawiesić i ograniczyć dostęp użytkownika do Usług, gdy: (i) będziemy do tego zobowiązani na podstawie formalnie ważnego wezwania sądowego, nakazu sądowego lub wiążącego nakazu organu rządowego; (ii) będziemy mieć uzasadnione podejrzenie, że użytkownik korzysta z Usługi w związku z Zabronionym zastosowaniem; (iii) korzystanie przez użytkownika z Usług będzie przedmiotem jakiegokolwiek toczącego się postępowania sądowego, czynności wyjaśniających lub postępowania przed organami rządowymi lub określimy zwiększone ryzyko naruszenia przepisów prawa w związku z działaniami użytkownika; (iv) nasi partnerzy serwisowi nie będą w stanie wspierać korzystania z Usług przez użytkownika; (v) użytkownik podejmie jakiekolwiek działania, które uznamy za obejście naszych mechanizmów kontrolnych (takie jak między innymi próba utworzenia wielu kont).
Brak oferty papierów wartościowych ani towarów
Treść Usług nie stanowi oferty kupna lub sprzedaży ani zaproszenia do zachęty do złożenia oferty kupna lub sprzedaży inwestycji, papierów wartościowych, udziałów w spółkach osobowych, towarów lub jakichkolwiek innych instrumentów finansowych; treść lub Usługi nie stanowią również i nie mogą być wykorzystywane w celu lub w związku z ofertą lub zachętą do złożenia oferty przez kogokolwiek w jakimkolwiek stanie lub jurysdykcji, w której taka oferta lub zachęta nie są dozwolone, lub wobec jakiejkolwiek osoby, której złożenie takiej oferty lub zachęta do jej złożenia jest niezgodne z prawem.
11. Treści
11.1 Poleganie na Treści; Zmiany w Usługach.
Informacje i materiały, które udostępniamy użytkownikowi za pośrednictwem Usług (zwane dalej „Treściami”) są udostępniane wyłącznie w ogólnych celach informacyjnych i nie gwarantujemy ich dokładności, przydatności ani kompletności, w zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa. Użytkownik polega na naszych Treściach wyłącznie na własne ryzyko. Nie ponosimy żadnej odpowiedzialności z tytułu jakichkolwiek działań podjętych lub niepodjętych przez użytkownika w związku z Treściami ani z tytułu udostępnienia Treści przez użytkownika jakimkolwiek osobom. Oświadczenia innych użytkowników opisujące korzystanie przez nich z naszych Usług, znajdujące się w Usługach lub gdziekolwiek indziej, nie powinny być postrzegane jako nasze poparcie dla ich oświadczeń, jeśli oświadczenia te są niezgodne z niniejszym Regulaminem lub naszymi Treściami. Możemy okresowo aktualizować Treści, ale takie Treści nie będą kompletne lub aktualne, i nie jesteśmy zobowiązani wobec użytkownika do aktualizowania Treści lub jakiejkolwiek innej części Usług. Możemy zmodyfikować lub zakończyć udostępnianie, tymczasowo lub na stałe, dowolnej części lub całości Treści lub Usług bez uprzedniego powiadomienia użytkownika, w zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności z tytułu jakichkolwiek modyfikacji, zawieszenia lub zaprzestania udostępniania części lub całości Treści lub Usług w zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa.
11.2 Usługi i treści podmiotów zewnętrznych
. Możemy udostępniać łącza do materiałów edukacyjnych, webinariów, spotkań i promocji na platformach mediów społecznościowych (zwanych dalej „Usługami podmiotów zewnętrznych”), które umożliwiają udostępnianie treści i współpracę pomiędzy użytkownikami i innymi podmiotami zewnętrznymi. Użytkownik udostępnia jakiekolwiek dane osobowe, zdjęcia, opinie, treści lub inne dane w tych usługach na własne ryzyko, a korzystanie z tych usług podlega warunkom korzystania i politykom prywatności tych usług, a nie naszemu Regulaminowi. Użytkownik powinien zapoznać się z regulaminami świadczenia usług każdej z Usług podmiotów zewnętrznych, aby lepiej poznać przysługujące mu prawa oraz sposób wykorzystywania jego danych przez te platformy. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności za jakąkolwiek utratę, kradzież, naruszenie bezpieczeństwa lub niewłaściwe wykorzystanie danych użytkownika w związku z jakąkolwiek Usługą zewnętrzną (w tym z tytułu zaniedbania), z wyjątkiem zakresu, w jakim taka odpowiedzialność nie może być ograniczona na mocy obowiązujących przepisów prawa. Użytkownik korzysta z jakichkolwiek informacji dostarczanych przez Usługi zewnętrzne (zwane dalej „Treściami zewnętrznymi”) na własne ryzyko, a my nie składamy żadnych obietnic, że jakiekolwiek Treści podmiotów zewnętrznych będą dokładne, kompletne, autentyczne lub odpowiednie dla jego osobistej sytuacji. Treści zewnętrzne obejmują dostarczane przez innych użytkowników informacje, które nie zostały przez nas zatwierdzone.
11.3 Treści użytkownika
. Jako członek społeczności Worldcoin użytkownik może publikować wiadomości, dane, oprogramowanie, obrazy, filmy lub inne treści (zwane dalej „Treściami użytkownika”) na forach dyskusyjnych, blogach, kontach w mediach społecznościowych należących do nas, a także w różnych innych publicznie dostępnych miejscach w Usługach. Fora te mogą być obsługiwane przez nas lub zewnętrznego usługodawcę w naszym imieniu. Użytkownik ponosi odpowiedzialność za wszystkie Treści użytkownika przesyłane, publikowane lub przechowywane za pośrednictwem Usług. Użytkownik musi zawrzeć w nich wszystkie wymagane i odpowiednie ostrzeżenia, informacje i ujawnienia dotyczące Treści użytkownika. Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności za Treści użytkownika przesyłane przez użytkownika za pośrednictwem Usług.
11.4 Licencja na Treści użytkownika
. Przesyłając nam Treści użytkownika, użytkownik oświadcza, że posiada wszelkie niezbędne prawa do Treści użytkownika i tym samym udziela nam bezterminowej, nieograniczonej terytorialnie, niewyłącznej, nieodpłatnej, podlegającej sublicencjonowaniu i zbywalnej licencji na użytkowanie, powielanie, rozpowszechnianie, tworzenie dzieł pochodnych, modyfikowanie, wyświetlanie i odtwarzanie całości lub dowolnej części Treści użytkownika w związku z naszą działalnością marketingową i promocyjną oraz w jakimkolwiek innym uzasadnionym celu biznesowym związanym z Usługami. Możemy dokonywać redystrybucji części lub całości Treści Użytkownika oraz dzieł pochodnych utworzonych na ich podstawie w dowolnych formatach multimedialnych i za pośrednictwem dowolnych wybranych przez nas kanałów multimedialnych. Niniejszym użytkownik udziela również nam i innym użytkownikom niewyłącznej licencji na użytkowanie, uzyskiwanie dostępu, powielanie, rozpowszechnianie, modyfikowanie i wyświetlanie oraz odtwarzanie Treści użytkownika za pośrednictwem Usług. Ust. 11.4 będzie mieć zastosowanie w najszerszym zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa.
11.5 Ograniczenia dotyczące Treści użytkownika
. Użytkownik zobowiązuje się nie korzystać z Usług ani nie zezwalać podmiotom zewnętrznym na korzystanie z Usług w celu publikowania lub przesyłania jakichkolwiek Treści użytkownika, które: (a) są oszczercze lub zniesławiające, lub ujawniają prywatne lub osobiste sprawy dotyczące jakiejkolwiek osoby; (b) mają charakter nieprzyzwoity, obsceniczny, pornograficzny, nękający, zawierają groźby, noszą znamiona nadużycia, są nienawistne, obraźliwe na tle rasowym lub etnicznym; zachęcają do działań, które mogłyby zostać uznane za przestępstwo, prowadzą do odpowiedzialności cywilnej lub naruszają jakiekolwiek przepisy prawa, lub są w inny sposób nieodpowiednie; (c) naruszałyby prawa własności intelektualnej innych osób, w tym zawierałyby udostępnione w sposób nieuprawniony teksty, obrazy lub oprogramowanie chronione prawem autorskim, tajemnice handlowe lub inne informacje poufne i zastrzeżone, lub znaki towarowe lub znaki usługowe używane w sposób naruszający prawo; lub (d) w nieuzasadniony sposób zakłócają korzystanie z Usług przez innego użytkownika. Użytkownik oświadcza nam, że publikuje Treści użytkownika w Usługach dobrowolnie; w związku z tym publikowanie Treści użytkownika nie tworzy stosunku zatrudnienia między użytkownikiem a nami. Użytkownik nie może kopiować ani wykorzystywać adresów e-mail, numerów telefonów komórkowych, sald, nazw użytkowników ani żadnych innych danych osobowych innych użytkowników bez ich zgody. Niechciane wiadomości e-mail, przesyłki pocztowe, rozmowy telefoniczne lub inne formy komunikacji z innymi użytkownikami za pośrednictwem Usług lub innych kanałów są zabronione.
11.6 Skargi i usuwanie treści na mocy ustawy DMCA.
Jeśli użytkownik uważa, że jego znak towarowy lub utwór chroniony prawem autorskim jest naruszany przez nasze Treści lub Treści użytkownika udostępniane w Usługach lub jest w inny sposób publikowany w sposób sugerujący nasze poparcie lub powiązanie z nami, prosimy wysłać do nas wiadomość e-mail na adres legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com z tematem „[Trademark/Copyright] Complaint”, w zależności od przypadku. Aby skarga użytkownika była skuteczna i abyśmy mogli podjąć działania zgodnie z Amerykańską ustawą o technologiach cyfrowych (Digital Millennium Copyright Act, „DMCA”), użytkownik
musi spełnić wszystkie wymogi określone w ustawie DMCA, umieszczając w wiadomości e-mail następujące informacje:
wyraźne wskazanie utworu lub znaku objętego prawami autorskimi, którego dotyczy zarzut naruszenia, w tym numer rejestracyjny praw autorskich, jeśli utwór jest zarejestrowany;
wskazanie utworu lub znaku, co do którego użytkownik twierdzi, że narusza prawo i który ma zostać usunięty;
adres URL lub inne wyraźne wskazówki umożliwiające nam zlokalizowanie treści, co do których istnieje domniemanie naruszenia;
adres e-mail użytkownika, adres pocztowy i numer telefonu; oraz
podpisane oświadczenie, że użytkownik jest w dobrej wierze przekonany, że treść narusza prawo, że podane przez niego informacje są prawdziwe oraz że jest on właścicielem lub osobą upoważnioną do reprezentowania właściciela treści.
Należy również pamiętać, że zgodnie z ust. 512(f) ustawy DMCA każda osoba, która świadomie wysyła bezpodstawne powiadomienia o naruszeniu, może ponieść odpowiedzialność z tytułu szkód, dlatego prosimy nie składać żadnych fałszywych roszczeń. Użytkownik może udostępniać wszelkie przekazane przez niego informacje lub korespondencję podmiotom zewnętrznym, w tym osobie, która przesłała do Usługi materiał, co do których istnieje domniemanie naruszenia.
Gdy otrzymamy przekazane w dobrej wierze zawiadomienie o naruszeniu, naszą polityką jest: (a) natychmiast usunąć lub uniemożliwić dostęp do treści naruszających prawo; (b) powiadomić osobę, która przesłała materiał naruszający prawo, że usunęliśmy lub zablokowaliśmy dostęp do tego materiału; oraz (c) w przypadku powtarzających się naruszeń – odebrać danej osobie dostęp do Usług. Jeśli otrzymamy od takiej osoby kontrzawiadomienie, użytkownik może otrzymać kopię kontrzawiadomienia z wyjaśnieniem, że możemy przywrócić usunięty materiał lub dostęp do niego w ciągu 10 dni roboczych. O ile użytkownik nie złoży pozwu o wydanie nakazu sądowego przeciwko nam lub przeciwko osobie, która przesłała treści, przywrócimy, według naszego uznania, dostęp do usuniętych materiałów w ciągu 10 do 14 dni roboczych lub dłużej po otrzymaniu kontrzawiadomienia.
12. WYŁĄCZENIE ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI Z TYTUŁU GWARANCJI
12.1 Użytkownik korzysta z Usług na własne ryzyko. Usługi, tokeny WLD, treści i inna Własność intelektualna są dostarczane „W STANIE TAKIM, W JAKIM SĄ DOSTĘPNE” oraz „W ZALEŻNOŚCI OD DOSTĘPNOŚCI” bez udzielania żadnych oświadczeń ani gwarancji, wyraźnych, dorozumianych ani ustawowych. W maksymalnym zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa, wyraźnie odrzucamy wszelkie dorozumiane gwarancje dotyczące tytułu prawnego, przydatności do celów handlowych, przydatności do określonego celu lub nienaruszania praw w odniesieniu do funkcji, treści lub innej własności intelektualnej zawartej w Usługach. W niektórych systemach prawnych nie jest dozwolone wyłączenie dorozumianych gwarancji, w związku z czym powyższe wyłączenie może danego użytkownika nie dotyczyć. Nie popieramy, nie gwarantujemy ani nie przyjmujemy odpowiedzialności z tytułu jakichkolwiek reklam, ofert lub oświadczeń dotyczące Usług składanych przez podmioty zewnętrzne, w tym innych użytkowników.
12.2 Nie składamy żadnych oświadczeń ani zapewnień, że (a) dostęp do całości lub części Usług będzie ciągły, nieprzerwany, terminowy, bezpieczny lub wolny od błędów; (b) Usługi lub treści są dokładne, kompletne, wiarygodne lub aktualne; (c) Usługi są wolne od wirusów lub innych szkodliwych elementów; ani (d) że Usługi lub treści spełnią wymagania, potrzeby lub oczekiwania użytkownika.
12.3 Ponadto nie składamy żadnych oświadczeń ani gwarancji w odniesieniu do zgodności z prawem Usług lub tokenów WLD dla jakiegokolwiek przypadku użycia, ani że Usługi lub tokeny WLD spełnią jakiekolwiek wymogi regulacyjne lub dotyczące zgodności. Użytkownik jest również odpowiedzialny za określenie i przestrzeganie wszelkich ograniczeń i wymogów prawnych i regulacyjnych, które mogą mieć zastosowanie do korzystanie przez użytkownika z Usług lub tokenów WLD. Z wyjątkiem wyraźnych oświadczeń określonych w niniejszym Regulaminie, użytkownik niniejszym potwierdza, że nie polegał na żadnym innym oświadczeniu lub porozumieniu, pisemnym lub ustnym, w odniesieniu do jego dostępu i korzystania z Usług lub tokenów WLD.
12.4 Nie działamy i nie możemy działać w charakterze doradcy użytkownika w odniesieniu do jakichkolwiek kwestii finansowych, prawnych, inwestycyjnych lub podatkowych. Wszelkie treści dotyczą wyłącznie wskazanej daty. Wszelkie przewidywania, szacunki, prognozy, cele lub opinie wyrażone w niniejszym dokumencie są narażone na ryzyko, wiążą się z wieloma nieprzewidywalnymi czynnikami i założeniami, a zatem mogą być nieprawidłowe i mogą ulec zmianie bez powiadomienia. Nie należy polegać na żadnych treściach.
Niektóre informacje tutaj zawarte mogą pochodzić ze źródeł zewnętrznych. Chociaż takie źródła są uważane za wiarygodne, nie zweryfikowaliśmy niezależnie wszystkich takich informacji i nie składamy żadnych oświadczeń co do ich dokładności. Nie jesteśmy zarejestrowanym brokerem ani doradcą inwestycyjnym. Nie składamy żadnych oświadczeń, a w szczególności nie udzielamy jakichkolwiek gwarancji, wyraźnych, dorozumianych lub ustawowych, dotyczących dokładności, aktualności lub kompletności jakichkolwiek materiałów zawartych w Usługach. Nasze treści mają wyłącznie charakter informacyjny, a użytkownik ponosi wyłączną odpowiedzialność za podjęcie decyzji o korzystaniu z Usług. Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości, że obrót Tokenami cyfrowymi, użytkowanie ich i posiadanie jest z natury ryzykowne. Użytkownik może stracić wszystkie środki znajdujące się w portfelu. Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości, że Usługa może podlegać ograniczeniom eksportowym i sankcjom gospodarczym nałożonym przez prawo Stanów Zjednoczonych.
12.5 Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności wobec użytkownika ani podmiotów zewnętrznych z tytułu jakichkolwiek zmian Usług lub zakończenia ich świadczenia, ani z tytułu zawieszenia lub zakończenia dostępu użytkownika do Usług.
13. OGRANICZENIE ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI
13.1 Nie wyłączamy ani nie ograniczamy naszej odpowiedzialności wobec użytkownika w przypadkach, w których byłoby to niezgodne z prawem. W krajach, w których poniższe rodzaje wyłączeń nie są dozwolone, ponosimy wobec użytkownika odpowiedzialność wyłącznie z tytułu strat i szkód, które są racjonalnie przewidywalnym skutkiem niedołożenia uzasadnionej staranności czy profesjonalizmu lub naruszenia przez nas umowy z nim. Niniejszy ustęp nie ma wpływu na prawa konsumenta, których nie można się zrzec ani ograniczyć na mocy jakiejkolwiek umowy lub porozumienia.
13.2 W zakresie dozwolonym przez prawo użytkownik zgadza się, że w żadnym wypadku my ani żaden z naszych członków zarządu, członków organów, pracowników, wykonawców, przedstawicieli, jednostek stowarzyszonych lub zależnych (zwanych dalej „Podmiotami TFH”) nie będziemy ponosić odpowiedzialności wobec użytkownika z tytułu jakichkolwiek szkód pośrednich, retorsyjnych, przypadkowych, specjalnych, wynikowych lub przykładowych, w tym szkód z tytułu utraty zysków, renomy firmy, użytkowania, danych lub innych wartości niematerialnych, niezależnie od tego, czy taka odpowiedzialność zostanie stwierdzona na podstawie odpowiedzialności deliktowej lub innej, i niezależnie od tego, czy Podmioty TFH zostały poinformowane o możliwości wystąpienia takich szkód wynikających z lub w związku z: (a) korzystaniem lub niemożnością korzystania z Usług, Tokenów cyfrowych użytkownika lub sieci Worldcoin; (b) niedostępnością lub zakończeniem świadczenia Usług; (c) jakimikolwiek przypadkami hakowania, ingerencji, uzyskania nieupoważnionego dostępu lub zmiany jakiejkolwiek transakcji lub Danych użytkownika; (d) jakimikolwiek transakcjami lub umowami zawartymi przez użytkownika z jakimkolwiek podmiotem zewnętrznym za pośrednictwem Usług; (e) jakimikolwiek działaniami lub komunikatami podmiotów zewnętrznych; (f) działaniami Operatorów Orb; (g) jakąkolwiek utratą wartości Tokenów cyfrowych; (h) jakimikolwiek Treściami zewnętrznymi, do których dostęp uzyskano w Usługach lub za ich pośrednictwem; (i) błędami, pomyłkami lub nieścisłościami w naszych Treściach; (j) urazami lub szkodami majątkowymi jakiegokolwiek rodzaju wynikającymi z dostępu do Usług lub korzystania z nich; (k) wirusami, końmi trojańskimi itp., które mogą być przesyłane do Usług lub za ich pośrednictwem; lub (l) zniesławiającym, obraźliwym lub niezgodnym z prawem postępowaniem podmiotów zewnętrznych. Powyższe ograniczenie odpowiedzialności ma zastosowanie niezależnie od tego, czy szkody wynikają z korzystania lub niewłaściwego korzystania z usług TFH lub Usług, czy też polegania na nich, niezależnie od niewypełnienia zasadniczego celu jakichkolwiek ograniczonych środków prawnych i w najszerszym zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa.
13.3 W żadnym wypadku Podmioty TFH nie będą ponosić odpowiedzialności wobec użytkownika z tytułu jakichkolwiek bezpośrednich roszczeń, postępowań, zobowiązań, obowiązków, szkód, strat lub kosztów w kwocie przekraczającej 100,00 USD. Użytkownik zgadza się, że w przypadku niezadowolenia z Usług jedynym i wyłącznym środkiem zaradczym będzie zaprzestanie korzystania z Usług. Niniejsze ograniczenie odpowiedzialności będzie miało zastosowanie w najszerszym zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa.
13.4 Zwolnienie z odpowiedzialności.
Użytkownik zgadza się zwolnić Podmioty TFH z odpowiedzialności z tytułu wszelkich roszczeń, szkód, kosztów, zobowiązań, uzasadnionych kosztów obsługi prawnej i wydatków dochodzonych od Podmiotów TFH przez jakikolwiek podmiot zewnętrzny w związku z albo w wyniku: (a) korzystanie przez użytkownika z Usług; (b) naruszenia przez użytkownika niniejszego Regulaminu; (c) naruszenia przez użytkownika jakichkolwiek praw innych osób; (d) postępowania użytkownika w związku z Usługami; lub (e) korzystania przez użytkownika z WLD, Tokenów cyfrowych lub sieci Worldcoin. Przepisy obowiązujące w niektórych jurysdykcjach ograniczają odpowiedzialność odszkodowawczą wobec konsumentów, w związku z czym niektóre lub wszystkie postanowienia dotyczące odpowiedzialności odszkodowawczej zawarte w niniejszym ustępie mogą nie mieć zastosowania do użytkownika. Jeśli użytkownik jest zobowiązany do zwolnienia z odpowiedzialności któregokolwiek z Podmiotów TFH, zastrzegamy sobie prawo, według własnego uznania, do kontrolowania wszelkiego powództwa lub postępowań oraz do decydowania o zawarciu ugody i jej warunkach.
MIESZKAŃCY STANU KALIFORNIA zrzekają się swoich uprawnień wynikających z ustępu 1542 Kodeksu cywilnego stanu Kalifornia, który stwierdza: „[a] ogólne zrzeczenie się roszczeń nie obejmuje roszczeń, które nie są wiadome wierzycielowi albo stronie zrzekającej się roszczeń ani których istnienia strona ta nie podejrzewa w momencie dokonania takiego zrzeczenia oraz które, jeżeli byłyby jej znane, miałyby istotny wpływ na ugodę z dłużnikiem albo stroną, wobec której przysługiwały roszczenia objęte zrzeczeniem”.
14. Prawo właściwe
W przypadku użytkowników zamieszkujących na terenie Europejskiego Obszaru Gospodarczego (EOG)
, do niniejszej Umowy i wszelkich sporów z niej wynikających lub z nią związanych zastosowanie ma prawo Republiki Federalnej Niemiec.
W przypadku użytkowników zamieszkujących poza EOG
, do niniejszej Umowy i wszelkich sporów wynikających z niniejszej Umowy lub z nią związanych zastosowanie będą miały przepisy prawa stanu Kalifornia. Prawo właściwe określone w niniejszym ustępie będzie miało zastosowanie z wyłączeniem norm kolizyjnych. Ponadto użytkownik potwierdza, że za główne miejsce świadczenia Usług uważany będzie stan Kalifornia i że chociaż Usługi mogą być dostępne w innych jurysdykcjach, ich dostępność nie wiąże się z powstaniem właściwości ogólnej lub szczególnej właściwości osobowej umożliwiającej rozstrzyganie sporów poza stanem Kalifornia.
15. ROZSTRZYGANIE SPORÓW, ARBITRAŻ I ZRZECZENIE SIĘ PRAWA DO POZWU ZBIOROWEGO
15.1 NALEŻY UWAŻNIE PRZECZYTAĆ PONIŻSZE AKAPITY. DOTYCZĄ ONE WYMOGU ROZSTRZYGANIA SPORÓW POMIEDZY UŻYTKOWNIKIEM A NAMI W DRODZE ARBITRAŻU INDYWIDUALNEGO
PRZED JEDYNYM ARBITREM, A NIE W RAMACH POZWU ZBIOROWEGO. ARBITRAŻ UNIEMOŻLIWIA UŻYTKOWNIKOWI WNIESIENIE POWÓDZTWA DO SĄDU LUB UDZIAŁU W PROCESIE SĄDOYM Z UDZIAŁEM ŁAWY PRZYSIĘGŁYCH, CHOCIAŻ UŻYTKOWNIK MOŻE, W STOSOWNYCH PRZYPADKACH, WNIEŚĆ PRZECIWKO NAM ROSZCZENIE DO SĄDU DS. DROBNYCH ROSZCZEŃ.
15.2 Dołożymy wszelkich starań, aby rozwiązać wszelkie potencjalne spory w drodze nieformalnych negocjacji prowadzonych w dobrej wierze. W przypadku powstania potencjalnego sporu użytkownik musi skontaktować się z nami, wysyłając wiadomość e-mail na adres legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com, abyśmy mogli podjąć próbę jego rozwiązania bez konieczności formalnego rozstrzygania sporów. Jeśli nie będziemy w stanie osiągnąć nieformalnego rozwiązania w ciągu 60 dni od wysłania wiadomości e-mail, a użytkownik zdecyduje się wnieść do sądu federalnego lub stanowego roszczenie ustawowe, roszczenie na mocy prawa zwyczajowego, roszczenie o charakterze umownym, deliktowym, wynikające z oszustwa, wprowadzenia w błąd lub jakiejkolwiek innej podstawy prawnej, lub jakiekolwiek inne formalne postępowanie wynikające z niniejszego Regulaminu, Treści lub Usług lub z nimi związane (zwane indywidualnie „Sporem”), wówczas użytkownik zgadza się na rozstrzygnięcie Sporu w drodze wiążącego arbitrażu, na zasadzie indywidualnej, zgodnie z poniższymi warunkami (łącznie zwanymi „Umową Arbitrażową”):
Arbitraż będzie prowadzony przez jednego arbitra z zachowaniem poufności. Arbiter będzie przestrzegał obowiązujących przepisów o przedawnieniu i wszystkich obowiązujących przepisów prawa oraz będzie honorował wynikające z obowiązujących przepisów prawa zasady zachowania poufności.
W przypadku użytkowników zamieszkujących na terenie EOG
Spór zostanie rozstrzygnięty wyłącznie i ostatecznie w drodze arbitrażu prowadzonego przez Niemiecki Instytut Arbitrażowy (DIS) zgodnie z Regulaminem Arbitrażowym DIS. Postępowanie arbitrażowe będzie przeprowadzane w Berlinie, w Niemczech, chyba że zarówno użytkownik, jak i my zgodzimy się na przeprowadzenie go w innym miejscu. Użytkownik zgadza się, że sądy w Berlinie (Niemcy) będą odpowiednim forum dla wnoszenia wszelkich środków odwoławczych od orzeczeń arbitrażowych lub postępowań sądowych w przypadku, gdy wiążący zapisu na sąd polubowny niniejszej Umowy zostanie uznany za niewykonalny.
W przypadku użytkowników zamieszkujących poza EOG
Spór zostanie rozstrzygnięty wyłącznie i ostatecznie w drodze arbitrażu prowadzonego przez JAMS zgodnie z Uproszczonym regulaminem arbitrażowym JAMS, chyba że łączna kwota Sporu wyniesie co najmniej 250 000 USD, w którym to przypadku zastosowanie będzie miał Pełen regulamin arbitrażowy JAMS. Postępowanie arbitrażowe będzie przeprowadzane w San Francisco w Kalifornii, chyba że zarówno użytkownik, jak i my zgodzimy się na przeprowadzenie go w innym miejscu. Użytkownik zgadza się, że sądy federalne i stanowe w San Francisco w Kalifornii będą odpowiednim forum dla wnoszenia wszelkich środków odwoławczych od orzeczeń arbitrażowych lub postępowań sądowych w przypadku, gdy wiążący zapisu na sąd polubowny niniejszej Umowy zostanie uznany za niewykonalny.
W każdym postępowaniu arbitrażowym, bez względu na jego lokalizację, strony nie będą domagać się od siebie nawzajem ujawnienia materiału dowodowego, a arbiter nie zezwoli stronom na ujawnianie materiału dowodowego; natomiast każda ze stron ujawni materiał dowodowy na poparcie swoich stanowisk we wspólnie uzgodnionym terminie przed ostatecznym posiedzeniem arbitrażowym.
Niniejsza Umowa Arbitrażowa obejmuje egzekwowalność, odwołalność, zakres i ważność Umowy Arbitrażowej lub jakiejkolwiek części Umowy Arbitrażowej oraz wszelkie inne Spory wynikające z interpretacji lub zastosowania Umowy Arbitrażowej lub z nimi związane; a wszystkie takie sprawy będą rozstrzygane przez arbitra, a nie przez sąd lub sędziego.
Jeśli arbiter lub osoba przeprowadzająca arbitraż obciąży użytkownika kosztami wniesienia roszczenia lub innymi kosztami administracyjnymi, zwrócimy je na jego żądanie w zakresie, w jakim takie koszty przekraczałyby te, które użytkownik musiałby zapłacić, gdyby wniósł powództwo do sądu. Pokryjemy również dodatkowe opłaty lub koszty, jeśli będzie to wymagane przez regulamin arbitrażu lub obowiązujące przepisy prawa.
Na żądanie którejkolwiek ze stron, wszystkie postępowania arbitrażowe będą prowadzone w ścisłej tajemnicy; wówczas arbiter będzie przyjmował wszystkie dokumenty, odbierać zeznania i przechowywać dokumentację z wyłączeniem jawności, i będą one dostępne do wglądu tylko dla stron, ich pełnomocników oraz ich odpowiednich ekspertów, konsultantów lub świadków, którzy wyrazili uprzednią pisemną zgodę na otrzymanie wszystkich takich poufnych informacji wyłącznie do wykorzystania do celów arbitrażu.
Arbiter jest uprawniony do przyznania wszelkich środków zaradczych, które byłyby dostępne w sądzie, oprócz pozwów i środków zaradczych dla spraw zbiorowych.
Każde rozstrzygnięcie podjęte przez arbitra może zostać zatwierdzone przez dowolny sąd właściwy.
Jeśli wymóg arbitrażu lub zakaz wnoszenia pozwów zbiorowych i innych Sporów w imieniu podmiotów zewnętrznych zawarty w niniejszej Umowie Arbitrażowej zostanie uznany za niewykonalny, wówczas wyłącznie niewykonalne postanowienia zostaną uznane za usunięte z niniejszego Regulaminu, a wszystkie pozostałe zobowiązania zawarte w niniejszych Warunkach pozostaną w pełnej mocy.
15.3 Możliwość rezygnacji w ciągu 30 dni
. Użytkownik ma prawo zrezygnować z niniejszej Umowy Arbitrażowej, aby nie była ona wiążąca w stosunku do niego, wysyłając z adresu użytego do skonfigurowania aplikacji wiadomość e-mail na adres legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com z tematem: REZYGNACJA Z ARBITRAŻU I ZRZECZENIA SIĘ PRAWA DO POZWU ZBIOROWEGO. Użytkownik musi wysłać wiadomość e-mail w ciągu 30 dni od wyrażenia zgody na niniejszy Regulamin, w przeciwnym razie będzie on zobowiązany do udziału w arbitrażu w sprawie Sporów zgodnie z warunkami niniejszej Umowy Arbitrażowej. Jeśli użytkownik zrezygnuje z niniejszej Umowy Arbitrażowej, nas również nie będzie ona obowiązywać.
15.4 Zmiany w niniejszej umowie o arbitraż.
Powiadomimy użytkownika z 30-dniowym wyprzedzeniem o wszelkich zmianach w ustępie niniejszego Regulaminu zatytułowanym
„Rozstrzyganie sporów, arbitraż i zrzeczenie się prawa do pozwu zbiorowego”
, a zmiany wejdą w życie 30 dni po otrzymaniu przez niego powiadomienia. Zmiany w ustępie
„Rozstrzyganie sporów, arbitraż i zrzeczenie się prawa do pozwu zbiorowego”
będą miały zastosowanie prospektywnie tylko do Sporów powstałych po 30 dniu. Jeśli sąd lub arbiter zdecydują, że zmiany w tym ustępie nie są egzekwowalne lub ważne, wówczas zmiany te zostaną uznane za odrębne od niniejszego Regulaminu, a sąd lub arbiter zastosuje warunki pierwotnej Umowy Arbitrażowej obowiązującej po rozpoczęciu korzystania przez użytkownika z Usług. Użytkownik może skorzystać z prawa do rezygnacji z nowych warunków Umowy Arbitrażowej, postępując zgodnie z procedurami określonymi w powyższym ustępie zatytułowanym „Możliwość rezygnacji w ciągu 30 dni”.
Niniejsza Umowa Arbitrażowa pozostanie w mocy po rozwiązaniu niniejszego Regulaminu oraz po zakończeniu korzystania przez użytkownika z Usług.
Bez uszczerbku dla odmiennych postanowień niniejszej Umowy Arbitrażowej, każda ze stron może złożyć pozew wyłącznie w celu zabezpieczenia roszczeń w drodze nakazu albo zakazu sądowego, aby zapobiec nieuprawnionemu korzystaniu albo niewłaściwemu korzystaniu z Usługi, albo też naruszeniu prawa własności intelektualnej (na przykład praw do znaku towarowego, tajemnicy handlowej, praw autorskich lub praw patentowych), bez wcześniejszego przystąpienia do opisanego powyżej postępowania arbitrażowego albo procedury nieformalnego rozstrzygania sporów.
16. Postanowienia ogólne
16.1 Brak zrzeczenia się postanowień; Rozdzielność postanowień; Nieprzenoszalność
. Niewyegzekwowanie przez nas któregokolwiek z postanowień nie oznacza zrzeczenia się przez nas prawa do uczynienia tego w późniejszym terminie. Jeśli postanowienie zostanie uznane za niewykonalne, pozostałe postanowienia niniejszego Regulaminu pozostaną w pełnej mocy, a niewykonalne postanowienie zostanie zastąpione wykonalnym, odzwierciedlającym jak najdokładniej nasze intencje, w zakresie dozwolonym przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa. Użytkownik nie może przenosić żadnych swoich praw wynikających z niniejszego Regulaminu, a wszelkie takie próby będą nieważne. Możemy przenieść nasze prawa na dowolną jednostkę stowarzyszoną lub zależną lub na następcę prawnego dowolnej jednostki biznesowej związanej z Usługami.
16.2 Całość porozumienia
. Niniejszy Regulamin jako jedyny odzwierciedla całość uzgodnień między użytkownikiem a nami w odniesieniu do Usług i zastępuje wszelkie wcześniejsze i równoległe porozumienia, umowy, oświadczenia i gwarancje, zarówno pisemne, jak i ustne, dotyczące Usług. Nagłówki ustępów niniejszego Regulaminu służą współpracy mają wyłącznie charakter orientacyjny i nie wpływają na znaczenie ani interpretację jakichkolwiek postanowień.
16.3 Klauzula salwatoryjna.
Wszystkie postanowienia niniejszego Regulaminu dotyczące zawieszenia lub rozwiązania, długów wobec TFH, ogólnego korzystania z Usług, Sporów z TFH, a także postanowienia, które ze względu na swój charakter wykraczają poza okres wygaśnięcia lub rozwiązania niniejszego Regulaminu, pozostaną w mocy po wygaśnięciu lub rozwiązaniu niniejszego Regulaminu.
16.4 Relacja pomiędzy stronami.
Żadne z postanowień niniejszego Regulaminu nie ma na celu ani nie spowoduje, że użytkownik i TFH będą traktowani jako partnerzy, wspólnicy wspólnego przedsięwzięcia lub inni wspólnicy w działaniach mających na celu osiągnięcie zysku, oraz ani użytkownik, ani TFH nie będą traktowani jako przedstawiciele drugiej strony. Obejmuje to fakt, że żadne z postanowień niniejszego Regulaminu nie ustanawia ani nie ma na celu ustanowienia jakiegokolwiek stosunku pracy pomiędzy użytkownikiem a TFH.
16.5 Brak porad profesjonalnych lub obowiązków powierniczych.
Wszystkie udostępniane przez nas Treści służą wyłącznie celom informacyjnym i nie należy ich uznawać za porady profesjonalne. Użytkownik nie powinien podejmować jakichkolwiek działań w oparciu o jakiekolwiek informacje zawarte w Usługach lub powstrzymywać się od ich podejmowania. Przed podjęciem jakichkolwiek decyzji finansowych, prawnych lub innych związanych z Usługami lub jakimikolwiek Tokenami cyfrowymi, należy zasięgnąć niezależnej profesjonalnej porady od osoby posiadającej uprawnienia lub kwalifikacje w stosownym obszarze. Niniejszy Regulamin nie ma na celu nałożenia na nas i nie tworzy ani nie nakłada na nas żadnych obowiązków powierniczych. W najszerszym zakresie dozwolonym przez prawo użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości i zgadza się, że nie jesteśmy zobowiązani do wypełniania jakichkolwiek obowiązków powierniczych ani zobowiązań wobec niego ani żadnej innej strony oraz że w zakresie, w jakim takie obowiązki lub zobowiązania mogą istnieć na mocy prawa lub na zasadzie słuszności, niniejszym użytkownik nieodwołalnie się ich zrzeka i zostają one uchylone i zlikwidowane. Ponadto użytkownik zgadza się, że jedynymi naszymi obowiązkami i zobowiązaniami wobec niego są te wyraźnie określone w niniejszym Regulaminie.
16.6 Przejęcie kontroli.
W przypadku, gdy zostaniemy przejęci przez podmiot zewnętrzny albo z nim połączeni, lub w inny sposób przeniesiemy określone funkcje na jednostkę stowarzyszoną lub następcę lub inny podmiot, który uznamy za działający w najlepszym interesie użytkownika, zastrzegamy sobie prawo, w każdej z tych okoliczności, do przekazania lub przeniesienia Danych, które zgromadziliśmy od użytkownika w ramach takiej fuzji, przejęcia,
sprzedaży lub innej zmiany kontroli, zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa.
16.7 Siła wyższa.
Nie ponosimy odpowiedzialności za opóźnienia, lub niewykonania usług lub przerwy w ich świadczeniu, jeżeli wynika to bezpośrednio lub pośrednio ze znacznej zmienności rynku Tokenów cyfrowych, jakiejkolwiek klęski żywiołowej, działań władz cywilnych lub wojskowych, działań terrorystycznych, niepokojów społecznych, wojny, strajku, stanu zagrożenia zdrowia, sporu pracowniczego, pożaru, przerwy w usługach telekomunikacyjnych lub internetowych lub usługach dostawcy sieci, awarii sprzętu lub oprogramowania lub jakiejkolwiek przyczyny lub okoliczności pozostających poza naszą uzasadnioną kontrolą (zwanych dalej indywidualnie „Działaniem siły wyższej”). Wystąpienie Działania siły wyższej nie będzie miało wpływu na ważność i egzekwowalność pozostałych postanowień niniejszego Regulaminu.
16.8 Sklepy z aplikacjami.
W przypadku pobrania naszych Aplikacji z dowolnego sklepu z aplikacjami lub platformy dystrybucyjnej innej niż sklep Apple, w tym sklep Google Play (zwanych dalej „Platformami dystrybucyjnymi”), użytkownik potwierdza, że:
Regulamin jest zawierany pomiędzy użytkownikiem a nami, a nie dostawcą Platformy dystrybucyjnej (zwanym dalej „Podmiotem prowadzącym sklep”); użytkownik ma obowiązek korzystać z Aplikacji zgodnie z obowiązującym w danym czasie Regulaminem Platformy dystrybucyjnej Podmiotu prowadzącego sklep; Podmiot prowadzący sklep jest jedynie dostawcą Platformy dystrybucyjnej, za pośrednictwem której użytkownik uzyskał Aplikacje;
wyłączną odpowiedzialność za Aplikacje ponosimy my, a nie Podmiot prowadzący sklep;
Podmiot prowadzący sklep nie ma wobec użytkownika żadnych zobowiązań ani nie ponosi wobec niego odpowiedzialności w związku z Aplikacjami lub Regulaminem; oraz
użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości i zgadza się, że Podmiot prowadzący sklep jest zewnętrznym beneficjentem Regulaminu w odniesieniu do Aplikacji.
16.9 Sklep Apple
. Niniejszy ustęp ma zastosowanie w przypadku, gdy Aplikacje zostały pobrane ze sklepu Apple. Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości i zgadza się, że Regulamin jest zawierany wyłącznie pomiędzy użytkownikiem a nami, a nie Apple, Inc. (zwana dalej „Apple”) oraz że Apple nie ponosi odpowiedzialności za Aplikacje ani ich zawartość. Użytkownik ma obowiązek korzystać z Aplikacji zgodnie z Regulaminem świadczenia usług sklepu Apple.
Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości, że Apple nie ma żadnego obowiązku zapewniać wsparcia i pomocy technicznej w odniesieniu do Aplikacji. W przypadku gdy Aplikacje nie działają zgodnie z którąkolwiek stosowną gwarancją, Użytkownik może powiadomić Apple, która zwróci mu (w stosownych przypadkach) równowartość ceny Aplikacji; w maksymalnym zakresie dozwolonym przez prawo Apple nie będzie mieć żadnego innego obowiązku wynikającego z gwarancji w odniesieniu do Aplikacji, a wszelkie inne roszczenia, straty, zobowiązania, szkody, koszty lub wydatki związane z niespełnieniem którejkolwiek gwarancji będą rozpatrywane w oparciu o niniejszy Regulamin i wszelkie przepisy prawa obowiązujące nas jako dostawcę Aplikacji.
Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości, że Apple nie ma obowiązku odpowiadać na żadne roszczenia wnoszone przez użytkownika ani żadne podmioty zewnętrzne w odniesieniu do Aplikacji ani posiadania przez użytkownika lub korzystania z Aplikacji, w tym w szczególności: (i) roszczenia z tytułu odpowiedzialności za wady produktu; (ii) jakiekolwiek roszczenia, według których Aplikacje nie spełniają jakiegokolwiek odnośnego wymogu prawnego albo regulacyjnego; oraz (iii) roszczenia wynikające z praw ochrony konsumentów lub podobnych praw; wszelkie takie roszczenia będą rozpatrywane wyłącznie w oparciu o niniejszy regulamin i wszelkie przepisy prawa obowiązujące nas jako dostawcę oprogramowania.
Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości, że w przypadku roszczeń jakiegokolwiek podmiotu zewnętrznego zakładających, że Aplikacje lub posiadanie przez Użytkownika i wykorzystywanie takich Aplikacji narusza prawa własności intelektualnej takiego podmiotu zewnętrznego, to obowiązek zbadania sprawy, obrony, zawarcia ugody oraz rozstrzygnięcia tego rodzaju roszczenia dotyczącego naruszenia praw własności intelektualnej będzie spoczywał wyłącznie na TFH, nie Apple, w zakresie wymaganym na mocy niniejszego Regulaminu.
Użytkownik oświadcza i gwarantuje, że (i) nie znajduje się w kraju podlegającym embargo rządu amerykańskiego ani wskazanym przez rząd amerykański jako kraj „wspierający terroryzm” ani (ii) nie znajduje się na prowadzonej przez rząd USA liście podmiotów zakazanych albo objętych zakazem współpracy.
Użytkownik oraz TFH przyjmują do wiadomości i wyrażają zgodę na to, że Apple i jej jednostki zależne są beneficjentami niebędącymi stroną umowy w odniesieniu do licencji użytkownika na Aplikacje, jak również iż po zaakceptowaniu przez użytkownika postanowień niniejszego Regulaminu świadczenia usług Apple będzie mieć prawo (i uznaje się, że przyjęła takie prawo) do dochodzenia, jako beneficjent niebędący stroną umowy, od Użytkownika wykonania niniejszego Regulaminu świadczenia usług w odniesieniu do licencji na Aplikacje.
16.10 Rozpatrywanie skarg
. Wyznaczyliśmy Specjalistę ds. skarg w Indiach zgodnie z informacjami poniżej. Prosimy pamiętać, że ze Specjalistą ds. skarg powinni kontaktować się wyłącznie użytkownicy w Indiach zgodnie z indyjskimi przepisami dotyczącymi technologii informatycznych (Wytyczne dla pośredników i Kodeks etyczny dotyczący mediów cyfrowych) z 2021 r. Może być wymagana dodatkowa weryfikacja użytkownika.
Specjalista ds. skarg: Jannick Preiwisch
EMAIL ID:
grievanceofficer@toolsforhumanity.com
TFHTOS20240722 AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Termos e Condições do Utilizador da Tools For Humanity
Bem-vindo à World App! Estes Termos acordados entre si (“utilizador”) e a Tools for Humanity Corporation, uma empresa do Delaware (“TFH”, nós ou nos) regem a sua utilização e o seu acesso aos nossos sítios web e às nossas aplicações, incluindo a World App e a Operator App (coletivamente, as “Apps”), e a todas as funcionalidades, conteúdos e serviços associados que lhe fornecemos (coletivamente, os “Serviços” ou os “Nossos Serviços”) no âmbito da World Network (“World Network”) e do ecossistema.
Leia atentamente estes Termos antes de utilizar ou aceder aos Serviços. Ao aceder ou utilizar qualquer dos Serviços que fornecemos, juntamente com o seu consentimento explícito a estes Termos, estará a aceitar expressamente ficar obrigado por estes Termos e pela nossa Declaração de Confidencialidade, que está incorporada nestes Termos e é parte integrante destes Termos. Tenha em atenção alguns pontos particularmente importantes destes Termos:
O utilizador aceita resolver quaisquer litígios entre si e a TFH através de uma arbitragem vinculativa e não através dos tribunais. Se o Cliente residir na Coreia do Sul, poderá optar por resolver o litígio num tribunal local competente. Consulte a Secção 15 abaixo para obter detalhes.
Os produtos de criptomoeda, incluindo os Tokens Digitais, não estão, regra geral, regulamentados e podem ser altamente arriscados. Pode não haver possibilidade de recurso a uma entidade reguladora em caso de qualquer perda resultante dessas transações.
Nada nos Serviços constitui uma oferta de venda ou uma solicitação de proposta de compra de quaisquer títulos ou Tokens Digitais. Os Serviços não constituem aconselhamento de investimento. A posse, compra ou venda de Tokens Digitais (tal como disposto na Secção 2.1 abaixo) pode não ser permitida no seu local de residência, sendo sua a responsabilidade de cumprir toda a legislação aplicável. O utilizador deve ponderar se a compra, venda, utilização ou posse de Tokens Digitais lhe convém à luz da sua situação financeira e do seu entendimento dos Tokens Digitais. Os Tokens Digitais podem sofrer rápidas alterações de valor e, inclusive, perder todo o seu valor.
Além disso, os tokens Worldcoin (“WLD”) não estão disponíveis para utilização, compra ou acesso por pessoas dos EUA, incluindo cidadãos dos EUA, residentes ou pessoas nos Estados Unidos, nem por empresas constituídas, localizadas ou domiciliadas nos Estados Unidos ou que tenham um agente registado nos Estados Unidos. Não disponibilizamos o WLD a essas pessoas dos EUA. Além disso, o utilizador aceita não vender, transferir ou disponibilizar WLD a pessoas dos EUA. Estão disponíveis mais informações sobre os riscos associados ao WLD aqui.
1.
Âmbito dos Termos
1.1 Privacidade e os seus dados.
. O acesso às Apps poderá implicar que nos forneça categorias de informações pessoais, como o seu nome ou o seu número de telefone. Se facultar informações a fim de permitir estabelecer a validade do seu comprovativo de individualidade (proof of personhood) e de poder reivindicar os seus tokens WLD, poderá fornecer categorias especiais de dados pessoais sensíveis, tais como as suas informações biométricas. A nossa Declaração de Confidencialidade descreve os dados que recolhemos de si e como os utilizamos. Não utilize os Serviços se não pretender que os seus dados sejam recolhidos ou utilizados por nós, conforme descrito na Declaração de Confidencialidade.
1.2 Elegibilidade.
As páginas Web que descrevem os nossos serviços podem ser acedidas em qualquer parte do mundo, o que não significa que todos os Serviços ou funcionalidades de um serviço sejam legais ou estejam disponíveis no seu país. O utilizador não pode utilizar VPN ou ferramentas semelhantes com o objetivo de contornar quaisquer restrições. É sua responsabilidade garantir que a utilização que faz dos nossos Serviços é legal quando os utiliza. Os nossos Serviços não estão disponíveis em todos os idiomas. Os nossos Serviços são legais onde os utiliza. Os nossos Serviços não estão disponíveis em todos os idiomas. Para utilizar os Serviços terá de cumprir estes Termos e todas as leis aplicáveis. Não pode utilizar os nossos Serviços para realizar, promover ou ajudar outros a realizar qualquer atividade ilegal ou ilícita.
Além disso, tem de cumprir todos os seguintes critérios:
Ter 18 anos de idade ou mais; e
não
estar localizado nos seguintes países, nem estar sob controlo dos mesmos ou nem ser cidadão ou residente dos mesmos: Síria, regiões da Crimeia, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson e Zaporizhzhia na Ucrânia, Rússia, Coreia do Norte, Irão, Cuba ou qualquer outro país ou região cujo acesso aos Serviços esteja sujeito a restrições impostas pelos Estados Unidos, pela União Europeia ou por qualquer outro país ou jurisdição;
Não é um “Cidadão Especialmente Designado”, conforme declarado pelo Departamento do Tesouro – Gabinete de Controlo de Ativos Estrangeiros dos EUA (Office of Foreign Assets Control, “OFAC”) ou pelas listas de sanções de qualquer outro país; e o seu nome não consta na Lista de Pessoas Não Admitidas [Denied Persons List] do Departamento de Comércio dos EUA, ou das listas de pessoas interditas de qualquer outro país.
Se não cumprir todos estes requisitos, não tem permissão para aceder aos Serviços ou utilizar os Serviços e, consequentemente, poderemos restringir a sua capacidade de aceder aos Serviços ou de utilizar os Serviços.
Além disso, se estiver estabelecido ou situado na Alemanha, ou se tiver a sua residência habitual ou sede social nesse país, não lhe é permitido aceder a serviços ou utilizar serviços de terceiros na aceção da Secção 2.5 ou aplicações descentralizadas na aceção da Secção 2.8. Essas funcionalidades não se encontram disponíveis para si.
1.3 Disponibilidade.
. As páginas Web que descrevem os Serviços podem ser acedidas em qualquer parte do mundo, o que não significa que todos os Serviços ou funcionalidades de um serviço sejam legais ou estejam disponíveis no seu país. O acesso a determinados Serviços (ou determinadas funcionalidades de um Serviço) em determinados países pode ser bloqueado por nós ou por governos. O utilizador não pode utilizar VPN ou ferramentas semelhantes com o objetivo de contornar quaisquer restrições. O acesso às Apps e a determinadas funcionalidades das Apps pode estar indisponível ou restringido, dependendo da sua localização.
É sua responsabilidade garantir que a utilização que faz dos Serviços é legal quando os utiliza
. Os serviços não estão disponíveis em todos os idiomas.
1.4 Atualizações.
. Poderemos introduzir alterações pontuais nestes Termos. Se o fizermos, disponibilizaremos os termos atualizados nos Serviços e, quando exigido pela legislação aplicável, notificá-lo-emos antes de efetuar quaisquer alterações e, quando tais alterações puderem ser especialmente relevantes ou desvantajosas para si, forneceremos aviso prévio adicional, se exigido pela legislação aplicável. O utilizador compreende e aceita que a sua utilização continuada dos Serviços depois de introduzidas essas alterações, e quando não tenha manifestado a sua oposição específica às mesmas, constitui a sua aceitação da versão atualizada dos Termos. Pode parar de utilizar os Serviços em qualquer momento se não concordar com estes Termos. Uma vez que os Serviços evoluem ao longo do tempo, poderemos alterar ou descontinuar a totalidade ou qualquer parte dos Serviços, a qualquer momento e sem aviso prévio, a nosso exclusivo critério, na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável.
1.5 Termos adicionais.
Podem aplicar-se termos e condições adicionais a aplicações, conteúdos, funcionalidades ou partes específicas dos Serviços, e todos esses termos e condições adicionais que lhe fornecermos farão parte destes Termos.
2. Serviços
2.1 Wallet sem custódia.
A World App inclui uma wallet independente e sem custódia que serve para guardar criptomoedas, moedas digitais ou Tokens Digitais (incluindo WLD e, coletivamente, “Tokens Digitais”) aceites. É o utilizador quem controla os Tokens Digitais que mantém na sua wallet. Na World App, as chaves privadas (que representam a palavra-passe de acesso aos Tokens Digitais) são armazenadas diretamente no seu dispositivo. O utilizador poderá a qualquer momento, dependendo do seu acesso à Internet e do congestionamento na blockchain, levantar os seus Tokens Digitais enviando-os para um endereço de blockchain diferente. Enquanto mantiver os seus Tokens Digitais na sua wallet, não temos qualquer controlo sobre a sua wallet, os Tokens Digitais ou as chaves privadas. Os utilizadores são responsáveis pelo risco de perda das suas chaves privadas, não tendo a TFH nem a World App qualquer possibilidade de as recuperar.
Uma vez que a World App é uma wallet sem custódia, ser-lhe-á atribuído um endereço de wallet que especifica onde os seus Tokens Digitais são mantidos na blockchain correspondente. Não temos capacidade para aceder aos seus Tokens Digitais.
2.2 Tokens Digitais aceites.
A World App aceita determinados tokens ERC-20. Poderemos passar a aceitar outros Tokens Digitais no futuro. A World App apresenta Tokens Digitais aceites.
Certifique-se de que verifica que tokens e redes são aceites na World App antes de depositar ou retirar os seus Ativos Digitais. Não podemos recuperar os seus Tokens Digitais se enviar tokens não aceites ou Tokens Digitais para um endereço incorreto da wallet.
O utilizador compreende que, se enviar Tokens Digitais não aceites para um endereço de wallet da World App, poderá perder totalmente o acesso a esses Tokens Digitais. Não temos forma de recuperar Tokens Digitais. Certifique-se de que envia sempre os Tokens Digitais corretos para o endereço de wallet correto. Talvez seja conveniente testar uma transação com uma pequena quantidade de Tokens Digitais.
2.3 Ofertas e acesso.
Quando interage com os seus Tokens Digitais – por exemplo, ao enviá-los para outro endereço de wallet ou ao conectar-se a uma aplicação distribuída – usando os Serviços, terá de aprovar ou “assinar” a interação através dos dispositivos que identificou durante o processo de integração. As Apps dependem totalmente das suas aprovações a partir destes dispositivos para dar início às interações com a blockchain relevante. Ao realizar estas interações, o utilizador compreende que está a interagir diretamente com a blockchain relevante e que não somos responsáveis por transmitir pedidos em seu nome.
2.4 Informações sobre terceiros.
Ao utilizar os Serviços, poderá ter acesso a informações relativas aos seus Tokens Digitais, tais como, nomeadamente, o seu valor de mercado à data. A apresentação destas informações não implica qualquer associação com terceiros ou aval de terceiros, mesmo que determinadas funcionalidades disponibilizadas no âmbito dos Serviços exijam a utilização desses produtos de terceiros. O conteúdo desses serviços e produtos de terceiros, conforme indicado através dos Serviços, baseia-se em informações disponibilizadas publicamente ou por esses terceiros à nossa empresa, pelo que não prestamos quaisquer declarações ou garantias sobre a exatidão dessas informações relacionadas com serviços ou produtos de terceiros.
2.5 Serviços de terceiros
Os utilizadores estabelecidos ou situados na Alemanha ou com a sua residência normal ou sede social nesse país não podem utilizar os Serviços de Terceiros para vender ou trocar os seus Tokens Digitais nos termos desta Secção.
Nos casos em que estiverem disponíveis, poderá encontrar nos Serviços ligações a processadores externos que tratam de transações como a compra de Tokens Digitais em moeda fiduciária, a venda de Tokens Digitais, a troca de Tokens Digitais e outras funcionalidades que poderão estar disponíveis no futuro. A World App permite-lhe ver quais os serviços de terceiros que se encontram disponíveis. Ao realizar estas transações, está a efetuar transações com terceiros e não connosco. Terá de seguir as instruções relevantes fornecidas pelo fornecedor terceiro e aceitar os seus termos de serviço. Não assumimos o controlo dos seus fundos ou Tokens Digitais e nunca os transmitimos durante o fornecimento dos nossos Serviços ou quando acede a serviços de terceiros.
2.6 Transações entre pares.
Os Serviços fornecem uma plataforma de comunicações através da qual pode enviar ou solicitar, receber e armazenar Tokens Digitais aceites de outras wallets de blockchain, quer sejam controlados por si ou por terceiros. A transferência que faça de Tokens Digitais aceites entre as suas outras wallets de blockchain, bem como de e para terceiros, constitui uma transferência. A parte que inicia a transferência é exclusivamente responsável por executar a transação adequadamente, o que pode incluir, entre outros aspetos, o pagamento de taxas suficientes de rede ou de mineração para que a transação seja bem sucedida. O pagamento insuficiente das taxas de rede pode fazer com que uma transferência permaneça em estado pendente e pode resultar em atrasos ou perdas resultantes de um erro no início da transação. Não temos qualquer obrigação de prestar assistência para resolver tais transações. Ao enviar qualquer Token Digital da sua wallet para outra wallet de blockchain, essas transferências são executadas em cadeia por si e estão fora do nosso controlo. Deve verificar todas as informações relativas à transação antes de as enviar. Não assumimos qualquer obrigação ou responsabilidade se introduzir um endereço de destino blockchain incorreto. As transferências de Tokens Digitais não podem ser revertidas depois de terem sido transmitidas para a rede blockchain relevante, mas podem permanecer no estado pendente, e ser designadas como tal, enquanto a transação estiver a ser processada pelos operadores de rede. Não controlamos a rede e não garantimos que todas as transferências sejam confirmadas pela rede.
2.7 Cofre
2.7.1 Informações gerais
. A World App fornece a interface do utilizador a um “cofre” descentralizado (“Cofre”) para os seus Tokens Digitais (“Cofre”). Ao utilizar o Cofre, o utilizador reconhece e aceita os termos que regem o Cofre, bem como quaisquer termos adicionais estabelecidos por terceiros que tenham desenvolvido ou fornecido funcionalidades relacionadas com ou decorrentes da sua utilização do Cofre.
O Cofre aceita apenas determinados Tokens Digitais. Esses Tokens Digitais não se qualificam como Tokens Referenciados a Ativos ou como Tokens de Moeda Eletrónica nos termos definidos pelo Regulamento (UE) 2023/1114 do Parlamento Europeu e do Conselho, de 31 de maio de 2023, relativo aos mercados de criptoativos. Os Tokens Digitais aceites serão apresentados na World App ao aceder ao seu Cofre. Os Tokens Digitais aceites pelo Cofre podem ser alterados ocasionalmente, não havendo qualquer garantia de que permanecerão disponíveis para uso no Cofre.
O Cofre é disponibilizado em ligação com contratos inteligentes de terceiros. Para além de si, nenhuma outra pessoa ou entidade tem a capacidade de interagir com o seu Cofre ou com os Tokens Digitais nele contidos. Nem a TFH nem qualquer terceiro possuem chaves administrativas ou acesso (privilegiado ou de outra natureza) ao seu Cofre ou aos contratos inteligentes conexos. Um depósito ou levantamento no/do Cofre de quaisquer Tokens Digitais a partir da/para a sua conta só pode ocorrer se essa transação for assinada com a(s) chave(s) privada(s) correspondente(s) descrita(s) na Secção 2.1 dos presentes Termos. Significa isto que, se perder o acesso a ou o controlo da(s) sua(s) chave(s) privada(s), não poderá efetuar quaisquer depósitos ou levantamentos de Tokens Digitais do Cofre e nenhuma outra parte poderá ajudá-lo ou fazê-lo em seu nome. Em conformidade, a utilização do Cofre não lhe fornece, nem lhe pode fornecer, quaisquer serviços de custódia, depósito ou transferência prestados pela TFH ou por qualquer outro terceiro em relação a quaisquer Tokens Digitais que possa bloquear utilizando o Cofre na sua conta.
O contrato inteligente que rege as funções do Cofre para tokens WLD pode ser visualizado aqui, usando a blockchain aqui. Por uma questão de clareza, a utilização destas e de quaisquer outras funções conexas do Cofre está sujeita à Exclusão de Garantias contida na Secção 12 dos presentes Termos.
2.7.2 Funções do cofre
. O Cofre oferece atualmente as seguintes funcionalidades, que podem ser alteradas, removidas ou adicionadas pela TFH ou por terceiros: Bloqueio, Rendimento, Levantamento e Período de Segurança, Participações para o Cofre.
2.7.3 Bloqueio
. Ao utilizar o Cofre, o utilizador concorda em bloquear os seus Tokens Digitais durante um período definido. Ao bloquear Tokens Digitais utilizando o seu Cofre, o utilizador transferirá esses Tokens Digitais da sua wallet sem custódia para um contrato inteligente descentralizado. Após a transferência, esses Tokens Digitais ficarão “bloqueados” no cofre, o que inclui o período durante o qual permanecem depositados no Cofre e um prazo pré-determinado designado por “Período de Segurança” e descrito em maior pormenor abaixo. Enquanto os seus Tokens Digitais estiverem bloqueados, não poderá aceder-lhes, transferi-los ou realizar qualquer outra transação com os mesmos até ter solicitado o seu levantamento e esperado pelo termo do Período de Segurança. Ninguém, incluindo a TFH ou o Prestador terceiro, tem a capacidade de desbloquear, exercer custódia, controlar, levantar ou transferir no que se refere aos seus Tokens Digitais bloqueados. A colocação dos seus Tokens Digitais no Cofre e a sujeição dos mesmos às restrições de bloqueio e levantamento não constitui venda, empréstimo ou transferência de quaisquer direitos, títulos ou interesses relativamente aos Tokens Digitais a favor da TFH ou de qualquer outro terceiro.
O bloqueio dos seus Tokens Digitais no Cofre não garante a salvaguarda ou custódia dos mesmos. Não se aplica aos seus Tokens Digitais qualquer sistema de seguro de depósito, ou qualquer salvaguarda semelhante, e o valor e/ou a utilidade de quaisquer Tokens Digitais que tenha bloqueado pode aumentar ou diminuir ao longo do Período de Segurança. Significa isto que o valor ou a utilidade de quaisquer Tokens Digitais que bloquear no seu Cofre podem diminuir ou tornar-se nulos durante o Período de Segurança. O utilizador reconhece e concorda que qualquer levantamento de Tokens Digitais na sua conta após o Período de Segurança aplicável pode resultar na restituição de Tokens Digitais com valor nulo ou inferior ao que tinham no momento em que os bloqueou no seu Cofre, e isenta a TFH e quaisquer terceiros do risco ou da responsabilidade de qualquer diminuição de valor que possa ocorrer.
2.7.4 Rendimento
. O utilizador também pode ser elegível para gerar aquilo que, para fins deste produto, se designa por “rendimento” sobre determinados Tokens Digitais contidos no seu Cofre. Este rendimento, que pode assumir a forma de Tokens Digitais adicionais, é fornecido por um terceiro através de um conjunto separado de operações de contratos inteligentes a que o utilizador pode aceder utilizando a interface fornecida na World App. Nem a TFH nem quaisquer terceiros utilizam, assumem o controlo, recebem qualquer crédito ou de outra forma eliminam no que se refere aos seus Tokens Digitais. Como tal, o rendimento não é um juro que esteja vinculado a algo ou seja gerado por algo que não o bloqueio dos seus Tokens Digitais de acordo com os termos e especificações fornecidos. Qualquer rendimento que possa receber é-lhe fornecido sob a forma de participação pelo terceiro, com base nas suas decisões de armazenar Tokens Digitais utilizando o Cofre. As especificações que determinam a geração de rendimento, incluindo o montante gerado ou o tempo durante o qual pode ser acumulado, podem ser alteradas ou canceladas em qualquer momento, a critério do Prestador terceiro.
O rendimento que pode obter poderá estar sujeito a um limite máximo. Esses pormenores serão apresentados juntamente com o seu Cofre e por meio de eventuais termos adicionais facultados pelo terceiro (identificado como o “Prestador” na World App) que fornece o rendimento. Esses termos adicionais também são incorporados nos presentes Termos. O rendimento não é fornecido nem administrado pela TFH.
Qualquer rendimento acumulado só será distribuído ao utilizador após a conclusão do levantamento, a partir do Cofre, de quaisquer Tokens Digitais geradores de rendimento, o que apenas ocorrerá após o termo de qualquer Período de Segurança aplicável. Este levantamento é a condição final de qualquer participação de rendimento, o que significa que o utilizador não tem qualquer direito, título ou interesse em qualquer rendimento que tenha sido ou venha a ser gerado a menos que e até que o rendimento tenha sido recebido na sua wallet sem custódia. O que precede significa igualmente que, se perder o acesso a ou o controlo da(s) sua(s) chave(s) privada(s), não poderá efetuar quaisquer levantamentos que lhe deem direito a receber rendimento.
2.7.5 Levantamento e Período de Segurança
. Pode iniciar o levantamento dos seus Tokens Digitais a partir do seu Cofre em qualquer momento. Os Tokens Digitais cujo levantamento do Cofre solicitou ser-lhe-ão devolvidos após ter decorrido um prazo predefinido, designado por “Período de Segurança”. Sempre que iniciar um levantamento de Tokens Digitais do Cofre, será iniciado um novo Período de Segurança e uma contagem decrescente até que esses Tokens Digitais lhe sejam devolvidos. Durante este período, os Tokens Digitais que selecionou para levantamento permanecerão bloqueados e também poderá cancelar o seu levantamento. Uma vez decorrido o Período de Segurança, o seu levantamento será concluído e os Tokens Digitais, juntamente com qualquer rendimento gerado que possa ter acumulado, serão enviados para a sua wallet. A duração do Período de Segurança será indicada na World App quando aceder ao seu Cofre.
2.7.6 Participações para o Cofre
. Quando selecionada, esta funcionalidade permite-lhe enviar automaticamente as Participações de WLD diretamente para o Cofre na sua conta, em vez de as enviar para a sua wallet. Pode alterar esta definição em qualquer altura.
2.7.7 TFH e Cofre
. O acesso a esta funcionalidade faz-se através da World App. No entanto, a TFH só poderá ler os dados relacionados e mostrá-los a si. A TFH não pode transferir, levantar ou depositar nenhum dos seus Tokens Digitais e não tem acesso ao seu Cofre.
2.8 Aplicações descentralizadas
Esta secção não se aplica a utilizadores estabelecidos ou situados na Alemanha ou que tenham a sua residência habitual ou sede social nesse país:
Quando disponíveis,
poderemos disponibilizar funcionalidades que lhe permitem associar a sua wallet a várias aplicações descentralizadas. Nesse caso, o utilizador é o único responsável por garantir a segurança e proteção destas aplicações de terceiros. Não temos controlo sobre as aplicações de terceiros e não podemos prestar assistência para ultrapassar quaisquer problemas com que se venha a deparar ao estabelecer a ligação com aplicações de terceiros.
2.9 Apoio ao utilizador
. Prestamos apoio ao utilizador para auxiliar a utilização de determinadas funcionalidades e funções relacionadas com os Serviços. Para entrar em contacto, selecione “Apoio ao cliente” no menu da app ou envie um e-mail para support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Interface World ID
. A Worldcoin Foundation, e não a TFH, administra o World ID Protocol e controla o tratamento de dados relacionados com o Orb para verificar uma World ID. Poderemos disponibilizar-lhe a sua World ID (como uma interface) através do Serviço. O Protocolo World ID permite-lhe provar que é um ser humano real e único, protegendo simultaneamente a sua privacidade.
2.11 Programa Convidar
. Quando disponível, poderemos colocar a funcionalidade “Convite” à sua disposição. Esta permite-lhe convidar amigos e familiares a descarregarem a World App e a procederem à verificação da World ID. Se utilizar a funcionalidade Convite, concorda com os seguintes termos e condições:
Os prémios por participar no Convite são fornecidos pela World Assets Limited. A World Assets Limited pode, a seu critério exclusivo, oferecer-lhe uma recompensa pelo facto de convidar utilizadores que verifiquem com êxito a própria World ID. Para receber a recompensa tem de satisfazer determinadas condições, que lhe serão explicadas na World App. Há um limite máximo de quantos utilizadores pode indicar para a World App. Este limite é apresentado na World App.
Não é necessário efetuar qualquer compra para participar na funcionalidade Convite. A funcionalidade Convite só se encontra disponível para utilização pessoal e não comercial. Só pode utilizar a funcionalidade Convite de boa-fé para fins legais. Não pode:(a) utilizar a funcionalidade Convite ou os Serviços de forma enganosa, fraudulenta ou ilegal; (b) agir para prejudicar a nossa marca, boa vontade ou reputação; (c) transmitir publicidade ou material promocional não solicitados ou não autorizados; (d) prestar declarações falsas ou enganosas; (e) utilizar pesquisa paga, meios pagos ou outra atividade semelhante para solicitar utilizadores através da funcionalidade Convite; e (f) utilizar a funcionalidade Convite para tentar obter informações pessoais de outros utilizadores.
A funcionalidade Convite não está disponível em todos os países ou locais e não está disponível para todos os utilizadores. A participação no Convite não está disponível em qualquer jurisdição onde toda ou qualquer parte desta funcionalidade possa violar (ou efetuar com que violemos) quaisquer requisitos legais. O utilizador concorda em não utilizar a funcionalidade Convite caso esta não esteja de acordo com a legislação aplicável na sua localização.
A funcionalidade Convite é disponibilizada a nosso exclusivo critério. Poderemos alterar, modificar, suspender e cancelar a funcionalidade em qualquer altura. A World Assets Limited pode recusar-se a oferecer-lhe uma recompensa por convidar os utilizadores a verificar a sua World ID quando determinar, a seu exclusivo critério, que violou estes Termos.
2.12 Participações e Reservas WLD
. Um dos serviços de Terceiros é reivindicar uma pequena quantidade de WLD em intervalos diferentes (“Participações WLD”). As Participações WLD são disponibilizadas pela World Assets Limited, uma subsidiária da Fundação Worldcoin. Os montantes, intervalos e prazos exatos das Participações WLD serão especificados na World App, embora sejam determinados exclusivamente pela World Assets Limited. Em conformidade com as versões anteriores destes termos, as Reservas WLD anteriormente disponíveis não garantem que receberá qualquer montante de Participações WLD. Os montantes, intervalos e prazos exatos das Reservas WLD serão especificados na World App, embora sejam determinados exclusivamente pela World Assets Limited. As Reservas WLD podem expirar, com ou sem aviso prévio na World App, independentemente de já ter feito uma Reserva WLD ou recebido a Participação WLD associada. São revogáveis a critério exclusivo da World Assets Limited.
2.13 App Operator
. No que diz respeito a Operadores Orb e outros parceiros, disponibilizamos uma App Operator que lhe permite monitorizar determinadas atividades e estatísticas relevantes para si e para o seu negócio enquanto Operador Orb. Poderemos também disponibilizar determinadas funcionalidades para o ajudar a conduzir o seu negócio enquanto Operador Orb.
2.14. Miniapps
. “Miniapps” é uma funcionalidade da World App que lhe permite aceder a uma plataforma de miniaplicações que podem ser acedidas na World App. A definição de como as Miniapps são exibidas na World App fica ao nosso exclusivo critério. O utilizador tem de ter um endereço de wallet da World App para aceder às Miniapps.
O utilizador reconhece que, ao apresentar Miniapps, a TFH está a fornecer uma plataforma tecnológica que apenas liga os utilizadores. A TFH não transmite, armazena, toma posse, guarda ou interage de outra forma com qualquer moeda tradicional ou digital. A TFH não processa transações, não atua como processadora de pagamentos e não envolve de outra forma no processamento de transações. A TFH não é parte nas transações e não tem qualquer responsabilidade relativamente a estas transações. A TFH não consegue prestar apoio ao cliente relativamente a problemas com transações.
2.14.1 Transações e pagamentos relacionados com Miniapps.
. As Miniapps são apresentadas na World App e podem oferecer artigos ou serviços que os utilizadores da World App podem comprar utilizando Tokens Digitais nas suas wallets da World App. Estas transações ocorrem entre si e a miniapp. A TFH não é parte de qualquer transação deste tipo.
Relativamente a tais transações, o utilizador reconhece que a wallet da World App é um serviço sem custódia, que a TFH não armazena ou guarda os seus Tokens Digitais e não transaciona, transmite, toma posse ou de outra forma tem qualquer participação relativamente à realização de quaisquer transações. Os Tokens Digitais são sempre armazenados e transmitidos nas suas respetivas redes blockchain. Não existem garantias de que as transações serão processadas corretamente.
A TFH apenas liga o utilizador a terceiros na plataforma Miniapps e não é parte em quaisquer transações. A TFH não desempenha qualquer papel no processamento de pagamentos e na regulação de despesas de reembolso ou cancelamento.
Depois de decidir participar numa transação, o utilizador tem de enviar o montante e o tipo de Tokens Digitais acordados. A TFH não processa os Tokens Digitais ou a moeda tradicional do utilizador e não realiza quaisquer transferências em nome dos utilizadores. A TFH não trata, gere, supervisiona, verifica ou fornece qualquer tipo de garantia relativamente a quaisquer transações. No caso de a transação não ser recebida, revertida, processada indevidamente ou caso seja detetado um erro, o utilizador e os fornecedores terceiros têm de colaborar para resolver qualquer problema. Quaisquer litígios, reclamações, perdas, mal-entendidos, erros técnicos ou questões de qualquer tipo (acidentais e alegadamente intencionais) relacionados com pagamentos ou transações têm de ser tratados diretamente entre o utilizador e o fornecedor terceiro. A TFH não assume qualquer responsabilidade e não será parte em quaisquer litígios ou discussões relacionados com pagamentos, nem é responsável por quaisquer perdas ou danos em que as partes envolvidas possam incorrer.
O utilizador é o único responsável por aceitar o risco de qualquer flutuação de preço em relação ao valor dos Tokens Digitais e entende que, no momento em que conclui uma transação, o valor dos Tokens Digitais envolvidos na transação pode ter sofrido alterações significativas.
2.14.2 Terceiros.
. Os produtos e serviços apresentados em qualquer miniapp são oferecidos e geridos por terceiros. Ao utilizar Miniapps, o utilizador reconhece e concorda que:
Estes Termos são celebrados entre o utilizador e nós e não com qualquer miniapp específica;
O utilizador está a aceder a uma app desenvolvida e/ou fornecida por uma app de terceiros, sendo essa parte a única responsável pela miniapp;
A TFH apenas fornece acesso a fornecedores de pagamentos terceiros através da wallet da World App e não processa pagamentos ou detém fundos;
As miniapps podem ter termos adicionais como parte dos respetivos produtos ou serviços, os quais tem de cumprir se aceitar o respetivo serviço; e
O utilizador reconhece e assume explicitamente todos e quaisquer riscos relacionados com as transações, e concorda que não seremos responsáveis por quaisquer riscos ou consequências adversas decorrentes de tais transações.
Os Programadores individuais das miniapps disponíveis nas Miniapps são os únicos responsáveis pelos conteúdos, produtos, bens ou serviços que lhe são disponibilizados diretamente através das respetivas miniapps. Para quaisquer questões ou litígios, terá de contactar diretamente o respetivo Programador.
Os utilizadores aceitam todos os riscos relacionados com a realização de uma transação, incluindo o risco de não receberem o produto da sua compra ou venda. Caso surja problema relativamente a qualquer transação, a TFH não pode ajudar numa resolução, nem tem qualquer responsabilidade por problemas decorrentes de quaisquer transações.
2.14.3 Taxas da TFH
. Podemos adicionar uma taxa de utilização de Miniapps quando o utilizador realiza uma transação com um Programador. O montante desta taxa ser-lhe-á apresentado na plataforma. Todas essas taxas estarão em vigor e serão apresentadas conforme constam das Miniapps, podendo ser atualizadas e alteradas ocasionalmente.
2.14.4 Impostos
. É sua exclusiva responsabilidade determinar se, e em que medida, qualquer transação efetuada através das Miniapps ou quaisquer transações que nelas efetuar estão sujeitas a impostos, e reter, cobrar, comunicar e remeter o montante correto de impostos às autoridades fiscais competentes.
2.14.5 Sem monitorização geral.
A TFH não terá qualquer obrigação geral de monitorizar as informações geradas pelos utilizadores, nem procurar ativamente factos ou circunstâncias que indiquem qualquer atividade ilegal nas Miniapps.
No entanto, se tomarmos conhecimento, independentemente dos meios utilizados, de que um produto ou serviço ilegal foi oferecido através de Miniapps a utilizadores localizados na União Europeia, informaremos os utilizadores que compraram o produto ou serviço ilegal através de Miniapps
.
2.14.6 Atividades proibidas
. Os Utilizadores dos Serviços Miniapps concordam em não publicar ou distribuir qualquer conteúdo que viole quaisquer leis ou infrinja quaisquer direitos de terceiros, incluindo, sem caráter limitativo, quaisquer direitos de propriedade intelectual, direitos de privacidade ou direitos de publicidade.
Além disso, o utilizador concorda em não se envolver em quaisquer atividades que:
Sejam ilegais, fraudulentas ou prejudiciais;
Interfiram ou perturbem o funcionamento das Miniapps;
Violem quaisquer termos estabelecidos nas nossas Diretrizes da App; e
Incluam conteúdos não permitidos nos termos das Diretrizes da App.
2.14.7 Sinalização de conteúdo ilegal.
. A World App tem mecanismos fáceis de aceder e fáceis de utilizar para que os utilizadores nos notifiquem sobre conteúdo ilegal na plataforma Miniapps. Agiremos rapidamente para analisar tais relatórios.
2.14.8 Remoção de conteúdo ilegal.
. Se determinarmos que qualquer miniapp contém conteúdo ilegal ou oferece produtos ou serviços ilegais, a mesma será removida das Miniapps. A TFH fornecerá uma declaração breve, clara e específica sobre os motivos a qualquer pessoa que tenha publicado conteúdos ou serviços ilegais.
Qualquer restrição aplicada pela World App aos seus utilizadores será feita de forma diligente, objetiva e proporcional.
Os utilizadores que acreditam que o seu conteúdo foi removido ou que o acesso ao mesmo foi desativado injustificadamente podem contactar-nos através de
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
para recorrer da decisão. Fornecemos um sistema de reclamações eletrónico gratuito que permite aos utilizadores contestar as nossas decisões relacionadas com a remoção de conteúdos, a suspensão de serviços, o encerramento de contas ou restrições à monetização devido a alegados conteúdos ilegais ou a violações de termos.
2.14.9 Moderação de conteúdos
. A TFH reserva-se o direito de suspender, por um prazo razoável e após a emissão de um aviso prévio quando legalmente exigido, a prestação dos nossos serviços aos utilizadores que forneçam frequentemente conteúdos manifestamente ilegais. A TFH também pode suspender temporariamente o processamento de notificações e reclamações de utilizadores que apresentem frequentemente reclamações infundadas.
2.15. Nomes de utilizador
. O seu nome de utilizador da World App não pode ser o seu nome real. Ao escolher um nome de utilizador, o utilizador é obrigado a cumprir a
Política de Nomes de utilizador
na sua versão mais recente.
3. Compras, taxas e impostos
3.1 Taxas de transação
. Ao utilizar os Serviços, o utilizador aceita pagar todas as taxas aplicáveis, incluindo taxas de transação relativas a trocas (“swaps”) e transações de Tokens Digitais. O utilizador será informado de qualquer taxa aplicável antes de efetuar uma transação. Se utilizar um serviço de pagamento de terceiros, as taxas bancárias, de cartão de crédito e de cartão de débito cobradas por quaisquer compras de Tokens Digitais podem ser liquidadas a partir do montante liquidado das suas compras de Tokens Digitais. O utilizador também é responsável pelo pagamento de quaisquer taxas adicionais cobradas pelo seu prestador de serviços financeiros.
3.2 Taxa de rede
. As interações com a blockchain também incorrem numa taxa de rede. A taxa de rede é cobrada e paga à rede blockchain, não a nós, a fim de facilitar quaisquer interações. Em alguns casos, o utilizador pode ser elegível para um número limitado de transações sem pagar taxas de transação, por um determinado prazo determinado a critério exclusivo da TFH. Tais transações estão sujeitas a um valor mínimo de transação que a TFH pode ajustar.
3.3 Impostos
. É sua exclusiva responsabilidade determinar se, e em que medida, qualquer transação efetuada através dos Serviços está sujeita a impostos, e reter, cobrar, comunicar e remeter o montante correto de impostos às autoridades fiscais competentes.
3.4 Atualizações
. Todas as taxas estão em vigor e são apresentadas conforme constam dos Serviços, podendo ser atualizadas e alteradas ocasionalmente.
4. Fatores de risco
4.1 Não é moeda legal.
Os Tokens Digitais não são moeda legal, não são apoiados por qualquer governo e as contas de Tokens Digitais e saldos de valor nos Serviços não estão sujeitos a medidas de proteção aplicadas pela Sociedade Federal de Seguros de Depósitos (“Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation”), pela Sociedade de Proteção ao Investidor de Títulos e Valores Mobiliários (“Securities Investor Protection Corporation”) ou por medidas de proteção semelhantes existentes noutros países. Não somos um banco e não oferecemos serviços fiduciários. As transações efetuadas através da World App não são, regra geral, regulamentadas em muitos países. Não garantimos a funcionalidade das blockchains com que somos compatíveis, o que pode, entre outras coisas, resultar em atrasos, conflitos de interesses ou decisões operacionais tomadas por terceiros que sejam desfavoráveis para determinados proprietários de Tokens Digitais, ou na impossibilidade de o utilizador concluir uma transação através dos Serviços. Os detalhes da transação que enviar através dos Serviços podem não estar completos ou podem sofrer atrasos substanciais na respetiva blockchain, pelo que não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade no caso de uma transação não ser confirmada ou processada conforme esperado. Não há qualquer garantia de que uma transferência iniciada através dos Serviços transferirá com sucesso a titularidade ou direito sobre qualquer Token Digital. Além disso, a utilização de determinados Tokens Digitais, como a WLD, pode implicar riscos específicos. Estão disponíveis mais informações sobre os riscos especificamente inerentes à WLD aqui.
4.2 Nova tecnologia.
Os Serviços são novos. Apesar de este software ter sido amplamente testado, o software utilizado para os Serviços ainda é relativamente novo e pode conter erros (“bugs”) ou vulnerabilidades de segurança. Além disso, o software ainda está em desenvolvimento e pode sofrer alterações significativas ao longo do tempo, que podem não cumprir as expetativas dos utilizadores.
4.3 Risco de segurança da informação.
Os Tokens Digitais e a utilização dos Serviços podem vir a ser expropriados ou roubados. Piratas informáticos ou outros grupos ou organizações mal intencionados podem tentar interferir nos Serviços de várias formas, incluindo, sem caráter limitativo, ataques de malware, ataques de negação de serviço, ataques a consenso, ataques Sybil, “smurfing” [branqueamento de capitais por meio de pequenas transações] e “spoofing” [disfarce da origem das comunicações]. Além disso, uma vez que as redes blockchain com que somos compatíveis, tais como o protocolo Ethereum, dependem de software open source, o software subjacente aos Serviços pode conter erros ou fraquezas intencionais ou não intencionais que podem afetar negativamente os Serviços ou resultar na perda de Tokens Digitais do utilizador ou na perda da capacidade do utilizador de aceder à sua wallet ou de controlar a sua wallet através dos Serviços. Na eventualidade de um erro ou lacuna no software, poderá não existir qualquer solução, pelo que não garantimos aos utilizadores qualquer solução, reembolso ou compensação.
4.4 Exatidão.
Apesar de ser nossa intenção facultar informações exatas e atempadas através dos Serviços (incluindo, sem limitações, o conteúdo), estas podem nem sempre ser totalmente exatas, completas ou atuais e podem também incluir imprecisões de ordem técnica ou erros tipográficos. Num esforço de continuar a oferecer-lhe informações tão completas e exatas o quanto possível, estas poderão, na medida do permitido pela legislação aplicável, ser alteradas ou atualizadas ocasionalmente sem aviso prévio, incluindo, sem limitação, informações acerca das nossas políticas e dos nossos produtos e serviços. Por conseguinte, o utilizador deve verificar todas as informações antes de confiar nas mesmas. Nesse sentido, todas as decisões baseadas nas informações fornecidas através dos Serviços são da sua exclusiva responsabilidade, pelo que não assumiremos qualquer responsabilidade por essas decisões.
4.5 Disponibilidade
. Apesar de nos esforçarmos por prestar-lhe um serviço de excelência, não garantimos que os Serviços estarão disponíveis ininterruptamente. Os Serviços podem estar temporariamente indisponíveis por motivos de manutenção ou outros. Não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade por qualquer erro, omissão, interrupção, eliminação, defeito, atraso no funcionamento ou transmissão, falha na linha de comunicações, roubo, destruição, ou acesso não autorizado ou alterações às comunicações do utilizador. Não somos responsáveis por qualquer tipo de problemas ou avarias técnicas em qualquer rede ou linhas telefónicas, sistemas informáticos online, servidores ou fornecedores, equipamento informático, software, falha em e-mail ou em leitores devido a problemas de ordem técnica ou ao congestionamento de tráfego na Internet ou nos Serviços, ou a uma combinação dos mesmos, incluindo lesões ou danos causados aos utilizadores ou ao computador de qualquer outra pessoa relacionados com ou resultantes da sua interação com os Serviços ou do descarregamento de materiais em ligação com os mesmos. Não somos responsáveis por qualquer perda ou dano, prejuízo financeiro ou lucros cessantes, perda de negócios, danos corporais ou morte, resultantes da utilização do Serviço, de qualquer Conteúdo publicado no Serviço ou através do mesmo ou transmitido aos utilizadores, ou de quaisquer interações entre os utilizadores dos Serviços, online ou offline.
4.6 Bifurcações
. O software utilizado para criar a WLD é de código fonte aberto e qualquer pessoa pode copiá-lo e utilizá-lo livremente. Isto significa que qualquer pessoa pode criar uma versão modificada da WLD, também conhecida como “Bifurcação” [do inglês “Fork”] No caso de uma Bifurcação ou qualquer outra perturbação de uma rede de Tokens Digitais, poderemos não conseguir garantir qualquer atividade relacionada com a Bifurcação. As transações podem não ser concluídas, ser parcialmente concluídas, ser incorretamente concluídas ou sofrer atrasos substanciais quando ocorrer uma Bifurcação. Não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade por perdas em que venha a incorrer, causadas, no todo ou em parte, por uma Bifurcação ou outra perturbação da rede.
4.7 Serviços de terceiros.
Quando disponíveis (ver, em especial, a Secção 2.5), contamos com fornecedores de serviços terceiros para fornecer algumas funcionalidades nas Apps – por exemplo, a capacidade de comprar Tokens Digitais com moeda fiduciária, ou a capacidade de trocar um Ativo Digital por outro. Não prestamos estes serviços e não somos parte nessas transações. O utilizador depende exclusivamente de fornecedores terceiros para usufruir destes serviços, pelo que tem de ter uma conta junto dos fornecedores terceiros e aceitar os respetivos termos. Não
poderemos ajudá-lo no caso de se deparar com problemas durante a utilização do serviço desses fornecedores terceiros e não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade pelas transações que efetuar através dos mesmos.
5. Propriedade intelectual
5.1 Titularidade
. O nosso software, a aplicação, os Serviços, o Conteúdo, as Marcas (conforme abaixo definidas) e o design, a seleção e organização do Conteúdo nos Serviços (a “PI”) estão protegidos por direitos de autor, de marca comercial, de patente e outros direitos de propriedade intelectual, e pelas leis dos Estados Unidos e de outros países aplicáveis. O utilizador aceita respeitar todos os direitos e leis de propriedade intelectual aplicáveis, bem como quaisquer avisos ou restrições de marcas comerciais ou direitos de autor previstos no Acordo ou nos Serviços. O utilizador não pode eliminar quaisquer avisos de direitos de autor, de marca comercial nem quaisquer avisos de propriedade contidos na propriedade intelectual.
5.2 Marcas comerciais.
A designação Tools for Humanity Corporation, o logótipo da World App e todos os logótipos e slogans relacionados são marcas comerciais ou marcas de serviço da Tools for Humanity Corporation ou dos seus licenciadores (as “Marcas”). O utilizador não pode copiar, imitar ou utilizar as Marcas, no todo ou em parte, sem a nossa autorização por escrito. Todas as outras marcas comerciais, nomes ou logótipos mencionados no âmbito dos Serviços são propriedade dos respetivos titulares, pelo que o utilizador não pode copiar, imitar ou utilizá-los, no todo ou em parte, sem a autorização por escrito do respetivo titular da marca comercial. A inclusão de marcas de terceiros nos Serviços não constitui uma aprovação, um aval ou recomendação da nossa parte.
6. Licença e restrições
6.1 Licença
. Desde que seja elegível para utilizar os Serviços e sob condição de cumprimento, pela sua parte, dos presentes Termos, concedemos-lhe uma licença limitada para aceder aos Serviços e utilizar os Serviços.
6.2 Restrições da licença
. O utilizador não poderá republicar o Conteúdo em qualquer sítio na Internet, em Intranet ou em Extranet, nem incorporar as informações em qualquer outra base de dados ou compilação, sendo qualquer outra utilização do Conteúdo estritamente proibida. Qualquer utilização dos Serviços além da especificamente autorizada no presente documento sem o nosso acordo prévio por escrito é estritamente proibida e levará à revogação da licença ora concedida. A utilização não autorizada pode também constituir uma violação das leis aplicáveis, incluindo, sem limitações, leis de direitos de autor e marcas comerciais, bem como regulamentos e estatutos relativos a comunicações aplicáveis. Salvo indicação expressa neste documento, nada nestes Termos deve ser interpretado como o licenciamento de direitos de propriedade intelectual, seja implicitamente, por preclusão ou de outra forma. Esta licença é revogável por nós a qualquer momento sem aviso prévio e com ou sem justa causa, na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável.
6.3 Governo
. Se for um utilizador final do Governo dos EUA, licenciamos-lhe os Serviços como um “Artigo Comercial”, conforme esse termo é definido no Código de Regulamentos Federais dos EUA (consulte 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), e os direitos que lhe concedemos relativamente aos Serviços são os mesmos que os direitos que concedemos a todos os outros nos termos destes Termos.
7. Utilização aceitável
7.1
O utilizador poderá utilizar os Serviços apenas para seu uso pessoal. Reservamo-nos o direito de rever, cancelar ou suspender o seu acesso ou utilização dos Serviços a qualquer momento e a nosso exclusivo critério, em conformidade com a legislação aplicável. Os itens que constam da lista de Utilizações Proibidas são apenas exemplos e a lista não é exaustiva; poderemos adicionar ou suprimir utilizações proibidas a nosso exclusivo critério, em conformidade com a legislação aplicável.
7.2 As Utilizações Proibidas incluem:
Atividade ilegal:
Qualquer atividade suscetível de constituir ou contribuir para a violação de quaisquer programas de sanções administrados pelo OFAC; constituir ou contribuir para a violação de quaisquer leis dos países em que realizamos a nossa atividade; envolver as receitas de qualquer atividade ilegal; ou a publicação, distribuição ou disseminação de qualquer material ou informação ilegal.
Uso excessivo ou pirataria informática:
Qualquer atividade que imponha uma carga excessiva ou desproporcionalmente grande sobre a nossa infraestrutura; que interfira negativamente, intercete ou exproprie no que se refere a qualquer sistema, dados ou informação; transmita ou carregue qualquer material para os Serviços que contenha vírus, cavalos de Troia, worms, ou quaisquer outros programas prejudiciais ou perniciosos; ou que constitua uma tentativa de obter acesso não autorizado aos sistemas ou redes de computadores ligados aos Serviços.
Abuso de terceiros:
Qualquer atividade que interfira com o acesso ou a utilização dos Serviços por parte de outrem; que difame, abuse, exturca, assedie, persiga, ameace ou de outra forma viole ou infrinja os direitos de privacidade, propriedade intelectual ou quaisquer outros direitos legais de outrem; incite, ameace, facilite, promova ou encoraje o ódio, a intolerância racial, ou atos violentos contra outrem; ou
capte, extraia, ou recolha sem autorização os dados de outro utilizador dos Serviços.
Fraude e outras práticas comerciais desleais:
Qualquer atividade executada com o intuito de nos defraudar a nós, aos nossos utilizadores ou a qualquer outra pessoa; que nos preste qualquer informação falsa, inexata ou enganosa; prometa recompensas exageradamente elevadas ou venda um serviço sem benefício adicional para o comprador; ou promova outras práticas predatórias e enganosas, incluindo lotarias ilegais, rifas, leilões de taxas de licitação, concursos, sorteios, jogos a dinheiro ou qualquer outro jogo de azar.
Violação da propriedade intelectual:
Qualquer atividade que envolva a venda, a distribuição ou o fornecimento de acesso a música, filmes e software pirateados, ou outros materiais licenciados sem a devida autorização do titular dos direitos; utilize a PI (incluindo a marca) sem um consentimento expresso ou de uma forma que nos prejudique a nós ou à nossa marca; sugira um falso aval da nossa parte ou uma falsa relação connosco; ou infrinja ou viole qualquer direito de autor, marca comercial, direito de publicidade ou privacidade, ou qualquer outro direito de propriedade nos termos da lei.
8. Operadores Orb
Estabelecemos parcerias com contratantes independentes locais que designamos por “Operadores Orb”, que facilitam as adesões dos utilizadores e ajudam a responder a perguntas que o utilizador possa ter sobre nós. Estes Operadores Orb receberam formação e têm conhecimentos sobre a World Network. No entanto, não temos controlo sobre os mesmos e isentamo-nos de qualquer responsabilidade pelo que dizem ou como se comportam.
Os Operadores Orb não são, de modo algum, nossos agentes ou empregados. Qualquer iniciativa, mecanismo, processo, política, norma ou outros esforços empreendidos pela TFH no interesse dos seus utilizadores não indica uma relação de trabalho ou de agência com um Operador Orb.
.
9. Suspensão
Poderemos suspender e restringir o seu acesso aos Serviços se: (i) formos obrigados por uma intimação, decisão judicial ou ordem vinculativa aparentemente válida de uma autoridade governamental; (ii) tivermos motivos razoáveis para suspeitar que o utilizador está a utilizar o Serviço no âmbito de uma Utilização Proibida; (iii) a utilização dos Serviços estiver a ser objeto de qualquer contencioso, investigação ou procedimentos governamentais pendentes e/ou percebermos que existe um risco elevado de não conformidade legal ou regulamentar associado à sua atividade; (iv) os nossos parceiros de serviço não puderem prestar apoio à sua utilização; (v) o utilizador empreender qualquer ação que consideramos suscetível de contornar os nossos controlos (como por exemplo, sem caráter limitativo, tentar criar várias contas).
10. Não é uma oferta títulos ou mercadorias
O conteúdo dos Serviços não constitui uma oferta de compra ou venda, ou a solicitação de uma proposta de compra ou venda de investimentos, títulos, participações em sociedades, mercadorias ou quaisquer outros instrumentos financeiros; o conteúdo ou os Serviços também não constituem, nem podem ser utilizados por ninguém para efeitos ou no âmbito de uma oferta ou solicitação num estado ou jurisdição em que essa oferta ou solicitação não seja autorizada ou permitida, ou a qualquer pessoa a quem seja ilegal efetuar tal oferta ou solicitação.
11. Conteúdo
11.1 Confiança no conteúdo; alterações aos Serviços.
As informações e materiais que lhe fornecemos através dos Serviços (“Conteúdo”) destinam-se exclusivamente a fins de informação geral e não garantimos a exatidão, a utilidade ou a integralidade dos mesmos, na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável. A confiança por si depositada no nosso Conteúdo é da sua inteira responsabilidade. Não nos responsabilizamos nem aceitamos qualquer responsabilidade por quaisquer ações realizadas ou não pelo utilizador devido ao Conteúdo, ou por qualquer pessoa com quem partilhe o Conteúdo. A declaração de outros utilizadores descrevendo a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços disponível nos Serviços ou em qualquer outro local não pode ser considerada como uma recomendação pela nossa parte da sua declaração se a mesma for inconsistente com estes Termos ou com os nossos Conteúdos. Poderemos atualizar o Conteúdo pontualmente. Contudo, o Conteúdo poderá não estar completo ou atualizado e não temos qualquer obrigação de proceder à sua atualização ou à atualização de qualquer outra parte dos Serviços. Poderemos modificar ou descontinuar, temporária ou permanentemente, qualquer parte ou a totalidade do Conteúdo ou dos Serviços sem aviso prévio, na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável. Não seremos responsáveis por qualquer modificação, suspensão ou descontinuação de parte ou da totalidade do Conteúdo ou dos Serviços, na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável.
11.2 Serviços e conteúdos de terceiros
. Poderemos disponibilizar hiperligações para materiais educativos, seminários Web, encontros e promoções em plataformas de redes sociais (“Serviços de Terceiros”) que permitem a partilha e colaboração entre utilizadores e outros terceiros. Se partilhar quaisquer informações pessoais, imagens, opiniões, conteúdos ou outros dados nesses serviços, fá-lo-á por sua conta e risco, estando a sua utilização desses serviços sujeita aos termos de utilização e políticas de privacidade desses serviços e não aos nossos. Deve consultar os termos de serviços de cada Serviço de Terceiros para compreender melhor os seus direitos e a forma como essas plataformas utilizam os seus dados. Não seremos responsáveis por qualquer perda, roubo, comprometimento ou utilização indevida dos seus dados no âmbito de qualquer Serviço de Terceiros (incluindo
negligência), salvo na medida em que tal responsabilidade não possa ser limitada nos termos das leis aplicáveis. A sua utilização de qualquer informação fornecida por um Serviço de Terceiros (“Conteúdo de Terceiros”) corre por sua conta e risco, e não assumimos qualquer compromisso de que qualquer Conteúdo de Terceiros seja preciso, completo, autêntico ou adequado às suas circunstâncias pessoais. O Conteúdo de Terceiros inclui informações fornecidas por outros utilizadores que não foram especificamente avalizados por nós.
11.3 Conteúdo do utilizador
. Enquanto membro da comunidade Worldcoin, o utilizador pode publicar mensagens, dados, programas, imagens, vídeos ou outros conteúdos (“Conteúdo de Utilizador”) em boletins informativos, blogues, contas de redes sociais detidas por nós, assim como em vários outros locais publicamente disponíveis nos Serviços. Estes fóruns podem ser alojados por nós ou por um dos nossos Prestadores de Serviços Terceiros em nosso nome. O utilizador é responsável por todo o Conteúdo de Utilizador que enviar, carregar, publicar ou armazenar através dos Serviços. O utilizador fornecer todos os avisos, informações e divulgações necessários e adequados relativamente ao seu Conteúdo de Utilizador. Não seremos responsáveis por qualquer Conteúdo de Utilizador que vier a submeter através dos Serviços.
11.4 Licença de Conteúdo de Utilizador
. Ao enviar-nos Conteúdo de Utilizador, declara que tem todos os direitos necessários relativos ao mesmo e que está a conceder-nos uma licença perpétua, mundial, não exclusiva, livre de ónus, sublicenciável e transferível para utilizar, reproduzir, distribuir, modificar, apresentar, executar e preparar trabalhos derivados a partir de toda ou qualquer parte do Conteúdo de Utilizador no âmbito da nossa atividade de marketing e promoções, e para qualquer outra finalidade comercial legítima relacionada com os Serviços. Poderemos redistribuir parte ou a totalidade do Conteúdo de Utilizador ou dos trabalhos daí derivados em qualquer formato de dados e através de quaisquer canais de comunicação escolhidos por nós. O utilizador concede-nos igualmente a nós e a outros utilizadores uma licença não exclusiva para utilizar, aceder, reproduzir, distribuir, modificar, apresentar e executar o seu Conteúdo de Utilizador através dos Serviços. A Secção 11.4 aplicar-se-á na máxima medida permitida pela legislação aplicável.
11.5 Restrições do Conteúdo de Utilizador
. O utilizador aceita não usar os Serviços, nem permitir a sua utilização por terceiros, para publicar ou transmitir Conteúdo de Utilizador que:(a) seja calunioso ou difamatório, ou divulgue assuntos pessoais ou privados de qualquer pessoa; (b) seja indecente, obsceno, pornográfico, assediador, ameaçador, abusivo, odioso, ofensivo em termos raciais ou étnicos; encoraje alguma conduta que seja considerada uma infração penal, dê origem a responsabilidade civil ou resulte na violação qualquer lei, ou que de outra forma seja inapropriada; (c) viole os direitos de propriedade intelectual de terceiros, incluindo texto, imagens ou programas, não autorizados e protegidos por direitos de autor, segredos comerciais ou outras informações exclusivas confidenciais, ou marcas comerciais ou marcas de serviço utilizadas de forma ilegal; ou (d) interfira injustificadamente na utilização dos Serviços por parte de outro utilizador. O utilizador declara que a sua publicação de Conteúdo de Utilizador nos Serviços é voluntária; por conseguinte, a publicação de Conteúdo de Utilizador não constitui o estabelecimento de uma relação empregador-empregado entre o utilizador e nós. O utilizador não pode copiar ou utilizar endereços de e-mail, números de telemóvel, saldos, nomes de utilizador ou quaisquer outras informações pessoais de outros utilizadores sem a respetiva autorização. São proibidos e-mails, correspondências, chamadas telefónicas ou outras comunicações não solicitadas para outros utilizadores através dos Serviços ou de qualquer outro canal.
11.6 Reclamação e retirada nos termos da DMCA.
Se acreditar que a sua marca comercial ou trabalho protegido por direitos de autor está a ser violado pelo nosso Conteúdo ou por Conteúdo de Utilizador existente nos Serviços ou está por qualquer outro modo a ser publicado de uma forma que sugere o nosso aval ou uma ligação connosco, pedimos que nos envie um e-mail para o endereço legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com, indicando na linha de assunto “Reclamação de [Marca Registada/Direitos de Autor]”, consoante o caso. Para que a sua reclamação seja eficaz e para que possamos agir de acordo com a Lei dos Direitos de Autor do Milénio Digital (Digital Millennium Copyright Act, “DMCA”), tem de seguir todos os requisitos da DMCA incluindo as seguintes informações no seu e-mail:
Identificação clara do trabalho protegido por direitos de autor ou marca alegadamente infringida, incluindo o número de registo de direitos de autor se o trabalho estiver registado;
Identificação do trabalho ou marca alegadamente em infração e que pretende ver retirado(a);
O URL ou outra instrução clara para nos permitir localizar o conteúdo alegadamente infrator;
O seu endereço de e-mail, o seu endereço postal e o seu número de telefone; e
Uma declaração assinada indicando de que acredita, num espírito de boa-fé, que o conteúdo está a infringir direitos de autor, que as informações que está a fornecer estão corretas e que é o proprietário do conteúdo ou está autorizado a representar o proprietário do conteúdo.
Deve também estar ciente de que, nos termos da Secção 512(f) da DMCA, qualquer pessoa que conscientemente enviar notificações de infração sem fundamento pode ser responsabilizada por danos – por isso, não faça falsas acusações. Poderemos partilhar qualquer informação ou correspondência fornecida por si com terceiros, incluindo a pessoa que carregou para o Serviço o material alegadamente infrator.
Quando recebemos uma notificação de infração feita num espírito de boa-fé, a nossa política é:(a) retirar ou desativar imediatamente o acesso ao conteúdo infrator; (b) notificar a pessoa que carregou o material infrator que retirámos ou cujo acesso desativámos; e (c) no que diz respeito a infratores
reincidentes, interromper o acesso da pessoa aos Serviços. Se recebermos uma contranotificação dessa pessoa, poderemos enviar-lhe uma cópia da mesma, explicando que poderemos repor o material removido ou cancelar a respetiva desativação no prazo de 10 dias úteis. A menos que venha a intentar uma ação judicial contra nós ou contra a pessoa que carregou o conteúdo, reporemos o acesso ao material removido no prazo de 10 a 14 dias úteis ou mais a contar da data da receção da contranotificação, a nosso critério.
12. RENÚNCIA DE GARANTIAS
12.1 A utilização que fizer dos Serviços corre por sua conta e risco. Os Serviços, a WLD, o conteúdo e toda a restante propriedade intelectual são disponibilizados “TAL COMO ESTÃO” e “DE ACORDO COM A DISPONIBILIDADE” sem qualquer declaração ou garantia, seja expressa, implícita ou legal. Na medida máxima permitida pela legislação aplicável, declinamos expressamente toda a responsabilidade por quaisquer garantias implícitas de titularidade, comerciabilidade, adequação para um fim específico ou não violação de direitos de propriedade intelectual no que diz respeito às funcionalidades, ao conteúdo ou a outra propriedade intelectual contida nos Serviços. Algumas jurisdições não permitem a exclusão de garantias implícitas, pelo que as exclusões acima podem não se aplicar a si. Não avalizamos, garantimos ou assumimos responsabilidade por quaisquer anúncios, ofertas ou declarações efetuadas por terceiros, incluindo outros utilizadores, relativamente aos Serviços.
12.2 Não prestamos quaisquer declarações ou garantias de que(a) o acesso à totalidade ou a parte dos Serviços será contínuo, ininterrupto, atempado, seguro ou isento de erros; (b) os Serviços ou o conteúdo serão exatos, completos, fiáveis ou atuais; (c) os Serviços estarão livres de vírus ou outros componentes prejudiciais; ou de que (d) os Serviços ou conteúdo irão corresponder aos seus requisitos, necessidades ou expetativas.
12.3 Além disso, não prestamos quaisquer declarações ou garantias relativamente à legalidade dos Serviços ou da WLD para qualquer situação de utilização, ou que os Serviços ou a WLD irão satisfazer quaisquer necessidades regulamentares ou de conformidade. O utilizador também é responsável por determinar e cumprir todas as restrições e requisitos legais e regulamentares que possam reger a utilização que faz dos Serviços ou da WLD. Salvo no que diz respeito às declarações expressas enunciadas nestes Termos, o utilizador reconhece e aceita que não se baseou em qualquer outra declaração ou entendimento, escrito ou oral, no que diz respeito ao seu acesso e à sua utilização dos Serviços ou da WLD.
12.4 Não atuamos e não podemos atuar como seu consultor em relação a quaisquer assuntos financeiros, legais, de investimento ou fiscais. O conteúdo refere-se apenas ao período iniciado na data indicada. Quaisquer projeções, estimativas, previsões, objetivos e/ou opiniões aqui expressos estão sujeitos a riscos, incertezas e pressupostos, e, por conseguinte, podem estar incorretos, podendo ser objeto de alterações sem aviso prévio. Nenhum conteúdo deve ser considerado fiável.
Certas informações aqui contidas podem ter sido obtidas a partir de fontes de terceiros. Embora tenham sido obtidas de fontes consideradas fidedignas, não verificámos essas informações de modo independente e não garantimos a sua exatidão. Não somos um corretor financeiro ou um consultor de investimento. Declinamos expressamente qualquer responsabilidade relativamente a todas as garantias, expressas, implícitas ou legais, relativamente à exatidão, pontualidade ou integralidade de qualquer material contido nos Serviços, e não prestamos as mesmas. O nosso conteúdo destina-se apenas a fins de informação geral, sendo o utilizador o único responsável por determinar se deve ou não utilizar os Serviços. O utilizador reconhece que negociar, usar e manter Tokens Digitais é inerentemente arriscado. Poderá perder todos os fundos na sua wallet. O utilizador reconhece que o Serviço pode estar sujeito a restrições de exportação e sanções económicas impostas pela legislação dos EUA.
12.5 Não somos responsáveis perante si ou qualquer terceiro por qualquer modificação ou cessação dos Serviços, ou suspensão ou cancelamento do seu acesso aos Serviços.
13.
LIMITAÇÃO DE RESPONSABILIDADE
13.1 Não excluímos nem limitamos a nossa responsabilidade para com o utilizador sempre que for ilegal fazê-lo. Em países onde os tipos de exclusões abaixo não são permitidos, somos responsáveis perante si apenas por perdas e danos que sejam um resultado razoavelmente previsível da não aplicação de cuidado e competências razoáveis pela nossa parte ou da violação pela nossa parte do contrato celebrado com o utilizador. Este parágrafo não afeta direitos do consumidor que não podem ser renunciados ou limitados por qualquer contrato ou acordo.
13.2 Na medida do permitido por lei, o utilizador aceita que em circunstância alguma nós ou qualquer do(a)s nosso(a)s administradores, diretores, colaboradores, contratados, agentes, empresas associadas ou subsidiárias (as “Partes TFH”) seremos responsáveis perante o utilizador por quaisquer danos indiretos, punitivos, incidentais, especiais, consequentes ou exemplares, incluindo danos por perda de lucros, fundo de comércio, utilização, dados ou outra propriedade intangível, independentemente de essa responsabilidade ser fundada em ato ilícito ou de outra forma, e quer ou não as Partes TFH tenham sido informadas da possibilidade de tais danos decorrerem ou no âmbito:(a) da sua utilização ou impossibilidade de utilizar os Serviços, os seus Tokens Digitais ou a World Network; (b) da inacessibilidade ou cessação dos Serviços; (c) de qualquer pirataria informática, adulteração, acesso não autorizado ou alteração de qualquer transação ou dos seus Dados; (d) de qualquer transação ou acordo celebrado por si com qualquer terceiro através dos Serviços; (e) de quaisquer atividades ou comunicações de terceiros; (f) das ações dos Operadores Orb; (g) de qualquer perda de valor de quaisquer Tokens
Digitais; (h) de qualquer Conteúdo de Terceiros acedido nos Serviços ou através dos mesmos; (i) de erros, lapsos ou imprecisões no nosso Conteúdo; (j) de danos corporais ou materiais de qualquer natureza que resultem de qualquer acesso aos Serviços ou utilização dos Serviços; (k) de vírus, cavalos de Tróia ou algo semelhante que possa ser transmitido aos Serviços ou através dos mesmos; ou (l) de conduta difamatória, ofensiva ou ilegal de qualquer terceiro. Na medida máxima permitida pela legislação aplicável, esta limitação de responsabilidade aplica-se quer os danos decorram da utilização normal ou indevida, ou da confiança depositada na TFH ou nos Serviços, não obstante qualquer falha no objetivo essencial de qualquer solução limitada.
13.3 As Partes TFH não serão, em circunstância alguma, responsáveis perante si por quaisquer reclamações diretas, processos, responsabilidades, obrigações, danos, perdas ou custos num montante superior a 100 dólares. Se estiver insatisfeito com os Serviços, o utilizador concorda que o seu único e exclusivo recurso será a descontinuação da sua utilização dos Serviços. Esta limitação da responsabilidade aplicar-se-á na máxima medida permitida pela legislação aplicável.
13.4 Isenção e indemnização.
O utilizador aceita defender, indemnizar e isentar as Partes TFH de responsabilidade por reclamações, danos, custos, obrigações, honorários razoáveis de advogados e despesas apresentadas por qualquer terceiro contra uma Parte TFH que decorram ou se relacionem com:(a) a sua utilização dos Serviços; (b) a sua violação destes Termos; (c) a sua violação de quaisquer direitos de outrem; (d) a sua conduta no âmbito dos Serviços; ou (e) a sua utilização do WLD, de quaisquer Tokens Digitais ou da rede Worldcoin. Algumas jurisdições impõem limites às indemnizações pelo consumidor, pelo que algumas ou todas as disposições relativas a indemnizações previstas neste parágrafo podem não aplicar-se ao seu caso. Se for obrigado a indemnizar qualquer das Partes TFH, reservamo-nos o direito, a nosso exclusivo critério, de controlar qualquer ação ou processo e determinar se chegar ou não a acordo e em que termos.
SE FOR UM RESIDENTE DA CALIFÓRNIA, renuncia aos benefícios e proteções do Código Civil da Califórnia § 1542, que prevê: “[uma] isenção geral não se estende às reivindicações que o credor ou a parte que isenta não conheça ou suspeite existir em seu favor no momento da assinatura da isenção e que, se fossem conhecidas por si, teriam afetado substancialmente o seu acordo com o devedor ou a parte isentada”
14. Legislação aplicável
As leis do Estado da Califórnia aplicar-se-ão a este Acordo e a quaisquer litígios decorrentes ou relacionados com este Acordo. A legislação aplicável indicada nesta secção será aplicada independentemente dos princípios de conflito de leis. O utilizador aceita ainda que o Serviço será considerado exclusivamente sedeado no Estado da Califórnia e que, apesar de os Serviços poderem estar disponíveis noutras jurisdições, a sua disponibilidade não dá origem a uma competência geral ou pessoal específica em qualquer foro fora do Estado da Califórnia.
15. RESOLUÇÃO DE LITÍGIOS, ARBITRAGEM E RENÚNCIA DE AÇÃO COLETIVA
15.1 LEIA ATENTAMENTE OS PARÁGRAFOS SEGUINTES. ESTES EXIGEM QUE O UTILIZADOR RESOLVA OS LITÍGIOS CONNOSCO ATRAVÉS DE ARBITRAGEM INDIVIDUAL PERANTE UM ÚNICO ÁRBITRO E NÃO COMO MEMBRO DE UMA AÇÃO COLETIVA. A ARBITRAGEM IMPEDE-O DE NOS PROCESSAR EM TRIBUNAL OU DE OBTER UM JULGAMENTO COM JÚRI, EMBORA POSSA INTENTAR UMA AÇÃO CONTRA NÓS NUM JULGADO DE PAZ, SE FOR ELEGÍVEL PARA TAL.
15.2 Envidaremos os nossos melhores esforços para resolver quaisquer potenciais litígios através de negociações informais num espírito de boa-fé. Se surgir um eventual litígio, terá de contactar-nos enviando um e-mail para legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com a fim de podermos tentar resolvê-lo sem recorrer à resolução formal de litígios. Se não conseguirmos chegar a uma resolução informal no prazo de 60 dias após o seu e-mail e optar por apresentar uma ação de reivindicação federal ou estadual; reivindicação de direito comum; reivindicação baseada em contrato, ato ilícito, fraude, declaração falsa ou qualquer outra teoria legal; ou qualquer outro procedimento formal decorrente destes Termos ou relacionado com estes Termos, com o Conteúdo ou com os Serviços (individualmente “Litígio”), o utilizador concorda em resolver o Litígio através de arbitragem vinculativa, numa base individual, de acordo com os seguintes termos (coletivamente, o “Acordo de Arbitragem”):
A arbitragem será conduzida de forma confidencial por um único árbitro. O árbitro aplicará os períodos de prescrição e toda a legislação aplicáveis e respeitará os pedidos de sigilo reconhecidos pela legislação aplicável.
O Litígio será resolvido exclusiva e definitivamente por arbitragem administrada pela JAMS de acordo com as Regras de Arbitragem Simplificadas da JAMS, a menos que o montante agregado do Litígio seja de 250.000 dólares ou mais, caso em que se aplicarão as Regras de Arbitragem Abrangente da JAMS. A arbitragem terá lugar em São Francisco, Califórnia, salvo se ambos acordarmos em realizá-la noutro local. O utilizador concorda que os tribunais federais e estaduais em São Francisco, na Califórnia, são o foro adequado para quaisquer recursos de uma sentença arbitral ou para procedimentos judiciais no caso de a cláusula de arbitragem vinculativa deste Acordo ser considerada inaplicável.
Em qualquer arbitragem, independentemente da respetiva localização, as partes não procurarão obter documentos de prova uma da outra, e o árbitro não permitirá que as partes procurem realizar obtenção de documentos de prova; em vez disso, cada parte divulgará as provas que sustentam as suas posições numa data e hora mutuamente acordadas antes da audiência de arbitragem final.
O presente Acordo de Arbitragem abrange a exequibilidade, a revogabilidade, o âmbito ou a validade do Acordo de Arbitragem ou de qualquer parte do Acordo de Arbitragem, bem como todos os outros Litígios que decorram da interpretação ou aplicabilidade do Acordo de Arbitragem ou se relacionem com a mesma. Por conseguinte, todas essas questões serão decididas pelo árbitro e não por um tribunal ou juiz.
Se o árbitro ou o administrador da arbitragem impuser ao utilizador taxas de processo ou outros custos administrativos, procederemos ao respetivo reembolso, a pedido, na medida em que o valor dessas taxas ou custos exceda aquele que o utilizador teria de pagar se o processo fosse apresentado num tribunal. Pagaremos também taxas ou custos adicionais, se tal for exigido pelas regras do administrador da arbitragem ou pela legislação aplicável.
A pedido de qualquer das partes, todos os processos de arbitragem serão conduzidos sob o mais estrito sigilo e, nesse caso, todos os documentos, testemunhos e registos serão recebidos, ouvidos e mantidos em sigilo pelo árbitro, disponibilizados para inspeção apenas pelas partes, pelos respetivos advogados e peritos destes, por consultores ou testemunhas que tenham acordado, antecipadamente e por escrito, em receber todas essas informações a título confidencial, a fim de serem utilizadas exclusivamente para efeitos da arbitragem.
À exceção das ações e medidas de reparação de natureza coletiva discutidas neste Acordo de Arbitragem, o árbitro tem autoridade para conceder qualquer medida de reparação que, de outra forma, estaria disponível em tribunal.
Qualquer juízo relativamente à sentença proferida pelo árbitro poderá ser apresentado em qualquer tribunal de jurisdição competente.
Se o requisito de arbitragem ou a proibição de ações coletivas e outros Litígios apresentados em nome de terceiros contidos neste Acordo de Arbitragem for considerado inexequível, apenas as disposições inexequíveis serão consideradas removidas destes Termos, mantendo-se em vigor e a produzir efeitos todas as restantes obrigações previstas nestes Termos.
15.3 Direito a um prazo de 30 dias para autoexclusão
. O utilizador tem o direito de optar por não ficar vinculado a este Acordo de Arbitragem, bastando para isso enviar um e-mail para legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com, a partir do endereço que utilizou para configurar a sua Aplicação, indicando, na linha de assunto: “OPÇÃO DE RENÚNCIA A ARBITRAGEM E AÇÕES COLETIVAS”. Tem de enviar o seu e-mail no prazo de 30 dias a contar da data em que aceitou estes Termos; caso contrário ficará vinculado à arbitragem de Litígios de acordo com os termos deste Acordo de Arbitragem. Se optar por não participar neste Acordo de Arbitragem, também não ficaremos vinculados pelo Acordo de Arbitragem.
15.4 Alterações a este Acordo de Arbitragem.
Receberá um aviso com 30 dias de antecedência sobre quaisquer alterações à secção destes Termos intitulada “
Resolução de Litígios, Arbitragem e Renúncia de Ação Coletiva
“ por notificação a si endereçada, e as alterações entrarão em vigor 30 dias após receber a notificação da nossa parte. As alterações na secção “
Resolução de Litígios, Arbitragem e Renúncia de Ação Coletiva
“ aplicar-se-ão somente de forma prospetiva a Litígios que surjam após o 30º dia. Se um tribunal ou árbitro decidir que as alterações a esta secção não são exequíveis ou válidas, as alterações serão excluídas destes Termos e o tribunal ou árbitro aplicará os termos do primeiro Acordo de Arbitragem em vigor à data em que o utilizador começou a utilizar os Serviços. O utilizador pode exercer o seu direito de autoexclusão dos novos termos do Acordo de Arbitragem seguindo os procedimentos previstos na secção acima intitulada “Direito de 30 dias para autoexclusão”
Este Acordo de Arbitragem continuará a vigorar após a cessação destes Termos e da sua utilização dos Serviços.
Sem prejuízo de qualquer disposição em contrário no presente Acordo de Arbitragem, qualquer uma das partes poderá intentar uma ação judicial exclusivamente a título de medida cautelar com vista a impedir a utilização não autorizada ou abusiva dos Serviços, ou a violação de direitos de propriedade intelectual (por exemplo, direitos de marca comercial, segredo comercial,
direitos de autor ou de patente) sem primeiro recorrer à arbitragem ou ao processo informal de resolução de litígios acima descrito.
16. Disposições gerais
16.1 Inexistência de renúncia; divisibilidade; inexistência de cessão
. A não aplicação, por nós, de uma disposição, não constitui uma renúncia ao nosso direito de o fazer mais tarde. Se uma disposição for considerada inexequível, as restantes disposições destes Termos permanecerão em pleno vigor, sendo a disposição inexequível substituída por um termo exequível que reflita, o mais possível, a nossa intenção, na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável. O utilizador não pode ceder qualquer um dos seus direitos nos termos destes Termos e qualquer tentativa de o fazer será nula. Poderemos ceder os nossos direitos a qualquer uma das nossas afiliadas ou subsidiárias, ou a qualquer subrogatário dos interesses de qualquer empresa associada aos Serviços.
16.2 Acordo integral
. Estes Termos constituem a declaração completa e exclusiva do acordo celebrado entre nós e o utilizador no que diz respeito aos Serviços e substituem todos os entendimentos, acordos, declarações e garantias anteriores e atuais, tanto escritos como verbais, relativamente aos Serviços. Os títulos das secções destes Termos destinam-se apenas a fins de conveniência e não regem o significado ou a interpretação de qualquer disposição.
16.3 Validade.
Todas as disposições destes Termos relativas a suspensão ou cessação, dívidas à TFH, utilização geral dos Serviços, Litígios com a TFH, assim como as disposições que, pela sua natureza, se estendem para além do termo ou cessação destes Termos, permanecem em vigor após a cessação ou termo destes Termos.
16.4 Relação entre as partes.
Nenhuma disposição nos presentes Termos pretende ser ou será entendida no sentido de que o utilizador e a TFH sejam tratados como parceiros, empresas comuns ou associados com fins lucrativos ou levará a que ocorra, e nem o utilizador nem a TFH serão tratados como o agente do outro. Isto inclui o facto de que nada nestes Termos estabelece ou se destina a estabelecer qualquer relação laboral entre si e a TFH.
16.5 Inexistência de aconselhamento profissional ou deveres fiduciários.
Todo o Conteúdo fornecido por nós destina-se apenas a fins informativos e não pode ser interpretado como aconselhamento profissional. O utilizador não pode tomar ou tem de abster-se de tomar qualquer medida com base em qualquer informação contida nos Serviços. Antes de tomar quaisquer decisões financeiras, legais ou de outro tipo que envolvam os Serviços ou quaisquer Tokens Digitais, o utilizador tem de procurar aconselhamento profissional independente de alguém credenciado e qualificado na área para a qual tal aconselhamento seria apropriado. Estes Termos não se destinam a criar ou impor quaisquer deveres fiduciários para connosco. Na medida do máximo permitido por Lei, o utilizador reconhece e concorda que não temos quaisquer obrigações ou responsabilidades fiduciárias para consigo ou qualquer outra parte, e que, na medida em que esses deveres ou responsabilidades existam por força de lei ou em equidade, rejeitamos, renunciamos e suprimimos, irrevogavelmente, esses deveres e responsabilidades. O utilizador aceita ainda que os únicos deveres e obrigações que temos para consigo são os definidos expressamente nestes Termos.
16.6 Alteração do controlo.
Na eventualidade de sermos adquiridos ou objeto de fusão com uma entidade terceira, ou de alguma forma transferirmos determinadas funções para uma entidade afiliada ou sucessora, ou para outra entidade que determinarmos ser do melhor interesse para os Utilizadores, reservamo-nos o direito, em qualquer uma destas circunstâncias, de transferir ou ceder os Dados que recolhemos junto de si como parte de tal fusão, aquisição, venda ou outra alteração do controlo, de acordo com a legislação aplicável.
16.7 Força maior.
Não seremos responsáveis por atrasos, falhas de desempenho ou interrupção do serviço que resultem direta ou indiretamente de volatilidade significativa do mercado dos Tokens Digitais, qualquer ato fortuito, atos de autoridades civis ou militares, atos de terroristas, perturbações da ordem pública, guerras, greves, emergências sanitárias, disputas laborais, incêndios, interrupção nos serviços de telecomunicações ou de Internet ou de serviços de fornecedores de rede, falha de equipamentos ou software ou qualquer causa ou condição fora do nosso controlo razoável (individualmente, “Evento de Força Maior”). A ocorrência de um Evento de Força Maior não afetará a validade e aplicabilidade de qualquer das restantes disposições destes Termos.
16.8 Lojas de Aplicações.
Sempre que descarregar as nossas Apps a partir de qualquer Loja de Aplicações ou plataforma de distribuição que não a Apple App Store, incluindo a Google Play Store (a “Plataforma de Distribuição”), o utilizador concorda que:
os Termos são celebrados entre o utilizador e nós, e não com o fornecedor da Plataforma de Distribuição (“Fornecedor da Loja”); a sua utilização das Apps tem de cumprir os Termos de Serviço da Plataforma de Distribuição em vigor à data do Fornecedor da Loja; o Fornecedor da Loja é apenas um fornecedor da Plataforma de Distribuição onde o utilizador obteve as Apps;
Somos nós, e não o Fornecedor da Loja, os únicos responsáveis pelas Apps;
o Fornecedor da Loja não tem qualquer obrigação ou responsabilidade perante o utilizador no que diz respeito às Apps ou aos Termos; e
o utilizador reconhece e concorda que o Fornecedor da Loja é um terceiro beneficiário dos Termos no que diz respeito às Apps.
16.9 Apple App Store.
. Esta secção aplica-se sempre que as Apps tenham sido adquiridas na Apple App Store. O utilizador reconhece e concorda que os Termos são celebrados unicamente entre o utilizador e nós, e não com a Apple, Inc. (“Apple”) e que a Apple não tem qualquer responsabilidade pelas Apps ou pelo conteúdo das mesmas. A utilização que fizer das Apps terá de cumprir os Termos de Serviço da Loja de Aplicações.
O utilizador reconhece que a Apple não tem qualquer obrigação de fornecer quaisquer serviços de manutenção e apoio técnico no que diz respeito às Apps. Em caso de não conformidade das Apps com qualquer garantia aplicável, o utilizador poderá notificar a Apple, a qual (se for caso disso) procederá ao reembolso do preço de compra das Apps. Na medida máxima permitida pela legislação aplicável, a Apple não terá qualquer outra obrigação de garantia relativamente às Apps, e quaisquer outras reclamações, perdas, obrigações, danos, custos ou despesas atribuíveis ao incumprimento de qualquer garantia serão regidos exclusivamente pelos Termos e por qualquer lei que nos seja aplicável, enquanto fornecedores das Apps.
O utilizador reconhece que a Apple não é responsável por dar resposta a quaisquer reclamações suas ou de terceiros relacionadas com as Apps ou com a sua posse e/ou utilização das Apps, incluindo, sem caráter limitativo: (i) reclamações de responsabilidade pelo produto; (ii) qualquer reclamação de que as Apps não cumprem qualquer requisito legal ou regulamentar aplicável; e (iii) reclamações decorrentes da legislação de defesa do consumidor ou de legislação semelhante; e que todas essas reclamações são regidas exclusivamente pelos Termos e por qualquer lei que se aplique a nós, enquanto fornecedores do software.
O utilizador reconhece que, na eventualidade de qualquer reclamação, por parte terceiros, de que as Apps ou a sua posse e utilização dessas Apps infringem os direitos de propriedade intelectual de terceiros, a TFH, e não a Apple, será a única responsável pela investigação, defesa, resolução e encerramento de qualquer reclamação por violação de propriedade intelectual na medida exigida pelos Termos.
O utilizador declara e garante que (i) não está localizado num país sujeito a embargo imposto pelo Governo dos EUA ou que tenha sido designado pelo Governo dos EUA como um país “apoiante do terrorismo”; e (ii) não consta de qualquer lista de pessoas proibidas ou sujeitas a restrições do Governo dos EUA.
O utilizador e a TFH reconhecem e concordam que a Apple e as subsidiárias da Apple são terceiros beneficiários dos Termos de Serviço no que se refere à sua licença de utilização das Apps e que, após a sua aceitação dos termos e condições dos Termos de Serviço, a Apple terá o direito (e considerar-se-á que aceitou o direito) de fazer aplicar contra si, enquanto terceiro beneficiário, os Termos de Serviço relativos à sua licença de utilização das Apps.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Termos e Condições de Usuários da Tools For Humanity
Bem-vindo ao World App! Estes Termos acordados entre o Usuário e a Tools for Humanity Corporation, uma empresa de Delaware (“TFH”, “nos”, “nós”) regem a sua utilização e acesso aos nossos
websites
e aplicativos, incluindo o World App e o Operator App (conjuntamente denominados “Aplicativos”), e a todas as funcionalidades, conteúdos e serviços associados que lhe fornecemos (conjuntamente “Serviços” ou “Nossos Serviços”) em relação ao World Network (“World Network”) e ao ecossistema.
Leia atentamente estes Termos antes de utilizar ou acessar os Serviços. Ao acessar ou utilizar quaisquer dos Serviços que prestamos, juntamente com o seu consentimento explícito a estes Termos, o Usuário concorda expressamente em ficar vinculado a estes Termos e à nossa Política de Privacidade, que é incorporada como parte integrante destes Termos.
Fique atento a estas partes particularmente importantes destes Termos:
O usuário concorda em resolver quaisquer controvérsias entre o Usuário e a TFH exclusivamente por meio de arbitragem vinculativa. Se residir na Coreia do Sul, o Usuário pode optar por resolver a controvérsia num tribunal local competente. Para mais informações, consulte a Seção 15 abaixo.
Os produtos de criptomoeda, incluindo os Tokens Digitais, não estão, regra geral, regulamentados e podem ser altamente arriscados. Pode não haver nenhum recurso regulatório em caso de qualquer perda resultante dessas transações.
Nada nos Serviços constitui uma oferta de venda, ou a solicitação de uma oferta de compra, de quaisquer valores mobiliários ou Tokens Digitais. Os Serviços não constituem aconselhamento de investimento. A posse, compra ou venda de Tokens Digitais (tal como disposto na Seção 2.1 abaixo) pode não ser permitida no seu local de residência, sendo sua a responsabilidade cumprir com toda a legislação aplicável. O Usuário deve ponderar se a compra, venda, utilização ou posse de Tokens Digitais lhe convém à luz da sua situação financeira e do seu entendimento acerca dos Tokens Digitais. Os Tokens Digitais podem sofrer rápidas alterações de valor e, inclusive, perder todo o seu valor.
Além disso, os tokens Worldcoin (“WLD”) não estão disponíveis para utilização, compra ou acesso por pessoas dos EUA, incluindo cidadãos dos EUA, residentes ou pessoas dos Estados Unidos, nem por empresas constituídas, localizadas ou domiciliadas nos Estados Unidos ou que tenham um agente registado nos Estados Unidos. Não disponibilizamos o WLD a essas pessoas dos EUA. Além disso, o Usuário concorda que não irá vender, transferir ou disponibilizar WLD para pessoas dos EUA. Informações adicionais sobre os riscos associados a WLD podem ser encontrados
aqui
.
1. Escopo dos Termos
1.1 Privacidade e os Seus Dados.
Ao acessar os Aplicativos, o Usuário poderá nos fornecer categorias de informações pessoais, como o seu nome ou número de telefone. Caso forneça informações a fim de estabelecer a validade do seu comprovante de individualidade e reivindicar seus tokens WLD, nesse caso, o Usuário poderá fornecer categorias especiais de dados pessoais sensíveis, tais como as suas informações biométricas. A nossa Política de Privacidade descreve os dados que recolhemos junto ao Usuário e como os Não utilize os Serviços se não pretender que os seus dados sejam coletados ou utilizados por nós, conforme descrito na Política de Privacidade.
1.2 Elegibilidade.
As páginas da
Web
que descrevem nossos serviços podem ser acessadas no mundo todo, mas isso não significa que todos os Serviços ou recursos de serviços sejam legais ou que estejam disponíveis em seu país. O Usuário não poderá utilizar VPN ou ferramentas similares com o propósito de burlar quaisquer restrições. É de sua responsabilidade se certificar de que a sua utilização de nossos Serviços é legal onde os Serviços estão sendo utilizados. Os nossos Serviços não estão disponíveis em todos os idiomas. Para utilizar os Serviços, o Usuário terá de cumprir estes Termos e todas as leis aplicáveis. O Usuário não pode utilizar Nossos Serviços para realizar, promover ou ajudar outros a realizar qualquer atividade ilícita.
Além disso, o Usuário tem de cumprir todos os seguintes critérios
cumulativamente
:
ter 18 anos de idade ou mais; e
não
estar localizado, sob o controle, ou ser cidadão ou residente dos seguintes países ou regiões: Síria, regiões da Crimeia, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson e Zaporizhzhia na Ucrânia, Rússia, Coreia do Norte, Irã, Cuba ou qualquer outro país ou região cujo acesso aos Serviços esteja sujeito a restrições impostas pelos Estados Unidos, pela União Europeia ou por qualquer outro país ou jurisdição;
não é um “Cidadão Especialmente Designado”, conforme designado pelo
Office of Foreign Assets Control
(“OFAC”) (Escritório de Controle de Ativos Estrangeiros do Departamento do Tesouro dos EUA) ou pelas listas de sanções de qualquer outro país; e o seu nome não consta da Lista de Pessoas Não Admitidas do Departamento de Comércio dos EUA, ou das listas de pessoas banidas de qualquer outro país.
Caso não atenda todos esses requisitos cumulativamente, o Usuário não terá permissão para acessar ou utilizar os Serviços e, assim sendo, poderemos restringir sua capacidade de acessar ou utilizar os Serviços.
Além disso, se o Usuário estiver estabelecido ou situado na Alemanha, ou se tiver a sua residência habitual ou sede social nesse país, o Usuário não terá permissão de acessar ou utilizar serviços de terceiros na acepção da Seção 2.5 ou os aplicativos descentralizados na acepção do Seção 2.8. Essas funcionalidades não se encontram disponíveis para o Usuário.
1.3 Disponibilidade
. As páginas
Web
que descrevem os Serviços podem ser acessadas em qualquer parte do mundo, o que não significa que todos os Serviços ou recursos de serviços sejam legais ou estejam disponíveis no seu país. O acesso a determinados Serviços (ou determinados recursos de Serviços) em determinados países pode ser bloqueado por nós ou pelo governo. O Usuário não pode utilizar VPN ou ferramentas semelhantes com o objetivo de burlar quaisquer restrições. O acesso aos Aplicativos, e determinados recursos nos Aplicativos, pode estar indisponível ou restringido, dependendo da sua localização.
É de sua responsabilidade se certificar de que a sua utilização dos Serviços é legal onde utilizá-los.
Os serviços não estão disponíveis em todos os idiomas.
1.4
Atualizações
. Poderemos efetuar alterações a estes Termos periodicamente. Se o fizermos, disponibilizaremos os termos atualizados nos Serviços e, sempre que exigido pela lei aplicável, iremos notificá-lo antes de efetuar quaisquer alterações e, sempre que tais alterações possam ser especialmente importantes ou desvantajosas para o Usuário, forneceremos um aviso prévio adicional, se exigido pela lei aplicável. O Usuário entende e concorda que a sua utilização continuada dos Serviços após termos efetuado quaisquer alterações e sempre que o Usuário não tenha se oposto especificamente às referidas alterações constitui a sua aceitação dos Termos atualizados. O Usuário pode deixar de utilizar os Serviços a qualquer momento se não concordar com estes Termos. Uma vez que os Serviços estão evoluindo ao longo do tempo, podemos alterar ou descontinuar todos ou qualquer parte dos Serviços, a qualquer momento e sem aviso prévio, segundo o nosso critério exclusivo, na medida do permitido pela lei aplicável.
1.5
Outros Termos
. Podem aplicar-se termos e condições adicionais a aplicativos, conteúdos, recursos ou partes específicas dos Serviços, e todos esses termos e condições adicionais que lhe fornecermos farão parte integrante destes Termos.
2. Serviços
2.1 Carteira sem custódia.
O World App inclui uma carteira independente e sem custódia que serve para guardar criptomoedas suportadas, moedas digitais ou Tokens Digitais (incluindo WLD, conjuntamente, “Tokens Digitais”). O Usuário controla os Tokens Digitais mantidos em sua carteira. Com o World App, as chaves privadas (que representam a senha de acesso aos Tokens Digitais) são armazenadas diretamente no seu dispositivo. O Usuário poderá, a qualquer momento, dependendo do seu acesso à Internet e do congestionamento na
blockchain
, levantar seus Tokens Digitais enviando-os para um endereço de
blockchain
Enquanto mantiver os seus Tokens Digitais na sua carteira, não temos qualquer controle sobre a sua carteira, Tokens Digitais ou chaves privadas. Os usuários são responsáveis pelo risco de perda das suas chaves privadas, não tendo a TFH nem o World App qualquer possibilidade de as recuperar.
Uma vez que o World App é uma carteira sem custódia, será atribuído ao Usuário um endereço de carteira que especifica em que lugar os seus Tokens Digitais são mantidos na
blockchain
correspondente. Não temos capacidade para acessar aos seus Tokens Digitais.
2.2 Tokens Digitais Suportados.
O World App suporta determinados tokens ERC-20. Poderemos acrescentar suporte para outros Tokens Digitais no futuro. O World App mostra os Tokens Digitais suportados.
Certifique-se de verificar quais tokens e redes são suportados no World App antes de depositar ou retirar seus Tokens Digitais. Não podemos recuperar seus Tokens Digitais se o Usuário enviar tokens não suportados ou Tokens Digitais para o endereço de carteira errado.
O Usuário entende que enviar Tokens Digitais não suportados para um endereço de carteira no World App poderá significar que o Usuário perderá totalmente o acesso a esses Tokens Digitais. Não temos forma de recuperar os Tokens Digitais. Sempre certifique-se de que o Usuário está enviando os Tokens Digitais corretos para o endereço de carteira correto. O Usuário pode querer testar uma transação com uma pequena quantidade de Tokens Digitais.
2.3 Ofertas e Acesso.
Quando o Usuário interage com seus Tokens Digitais – como, por exemplo, enviá-los para outro endereço de carteira ou conectar-se a uma aplicação distribuída – usando os Serviços, o Usuário terá de aprovar ou “assinar” a interação por meio dos dispositivos que identificou durante o processo de integração. Os Aplicativos dependem totalmente das suas aprovações a partir desses dispositivos para dar início às interações com a
blockchain
pertinente. O Usuário entende que está interagindo diretamente com a
blockchain
pertinente ao realizar essas interações e que não somos responsáveis por transmitir pedidos em seu nome.
2.4 Informações de Terceiros.
Ao utilizar os Serviços, o Usuário poderá ter acesso a informações relativas aos seus Tokens Digitais, tais como, entre outros, o valor de mercado atual deles. A apresentação dessas informações não implica qualquer associação ou aval de terceiros, mesmo que determinadas funcionalidades disponibilizadas no âmbito dos Serviços exijam a utilização desses produtos de terceiros. O conteúdo desses serviços e produtos de terceiros, conforme indicado por meio dos Serviços, baseia-se em informações disponibilizadas publicamente ou por esses terceiros para nós, e, portanto, não fazemos quaisquer declarações ou fornecemos garantias sobre a exatidão dessas informações relacionadas com serviços ou produtos desses terceiros.
2.5 Serviços de Terceiros.
Os usuários estabelecidos ou situados na Alemanha ou que tenham a sua residência habitual ou sede social nesse país não poderão utilizar Serviços de Terceiros para vender ou trocar seus Tokens Digitais sob esta Seção.
Quando disponíveis, os Serviços poderão lhe fornecer
links
a processadores de terceiros para processar transações como compra de Tokens Digitais em moeda fiduciária (fiat), venda de Tokens Digitais, troca de Tokens Digitais e outras funcionalidades que poderão estar disponíveis no futuro. O World App permite-lhe ver quais os serviços de terceiros que se encontram disponíveis. Ao realizar estas transações, o Usuário está efetuando transações com terceiros e não conosco. O Usuário deve seguir as instruções relevantes fornecidas pelo prestador de serviços terceiros e aceitar os termos de serviço deles. Não assumimos o controle dos seus fundos ou Tokens Digitais nem os transmitimos em momento algum durante a prestação dos nossos Serviços ou quando o Usuário acessa serviços de terceiros.
2.6 Transações entre P
Os Serviços fornecem uma plataforma de comunicações por meio da qual o Usuário pode enviar, ou solicitar, receber e armazenar Tokens Digitais suportados, outras carteiras
blockchain
, sejam controlados pelo Usuário ou por terceiros. A sua transferência de Tokens Digitais suportados entre as suas outras carteiras
blockchain
, bem como de e para terceiros constitui uma transferência. A parte que inicia a transação é responsável somente por executar a transação adequadamente, o que pode incluir, entre outros aspectos, o pagamento de taxas suficientes de rede ou de mineração para que a transação seja bem-sucedida. O pagamento insuficiente das taxas de rede pode fazer com que uma transferência permaneça pendente e pode resultar em atrasos ou perdas resultantes de um erro no início da transação. Não temos qualquer obrigação de prestar assistência na resolução dessas transações. Ao enviar qualquer Token Digital da sua carteira para outra carteira
blockchain
, essas transferências são executadas em cadeia pelo Usuário e não sob o nosso controle. O Usuário deve verificar todas as informações relativas à transação antes de as enviar. Não assumimos qualquer obrigação ou responsabilidade se o Usuário inserir um endereço de destino
blockchain
incorreto. As transferências de Tokens Digitais não podem ser revertidas depois de terem sido transmitidas para a rede
blockchain
pertinente, mas podem permanecer no estado pendente, e ser designadas como tal, enquanto a transação estiver em processamento pelos operadores de rede. Não controlamos a rede e não garantimos que toda a transferência será confirmada pela rede.
2.7 Cofre
2.7.1 Informações Gerais.
O World App oferece aos usuários interface para um “cofre” descentralizado (“Cofre”) para seus Tokens Digitais. Ao utilizar o Cofre, o Usuário reconhece e aceita os termos que regem o Cofre, bem como quaisquer termos adicionais estabelecidos por terceiros que tenham desenvolvido ou fornecido recursos relacionados com ou decorrentes da sua utilização do Cofre.
O cofre suporta somente determinados Tokens Digitais. Esses Tokens Digitais não se qualificam como Tokens Referenciados a Ativos ou Tokens E-Money, nos termos estabelecidos pelo Regulamento (UE) 2023/1114 do Parlamento Europeu e do Conselho de 31 de maio de 2023 sobre mercados em criptoativos. Os Tokens Digitais suportados serão apresentadas no World App ao acessar seu Cofre. Os Tokens Digitais suportados pelo Cofre podem ser alteradas ocasionalmente, não havendo qualquer garantia de que os Tokens Digitais suportados permanecerão disponíveis para uso no Cofre.
O Cofre é disponibilizado em ligação com contratos inteligentes de terceiros. Para além do Usuário, nenhuma outra pessoa ou entidade tem a capacidade de interagir com o seu Cofre ou com os Tokens Digitais nele contidas. Nem a TFH nem qualquer terceiro possuem chaves administrativas ou acesso (privilegiado ou de outra natureza) ao seu Cofre ou aos contratos inteligentes conexos. Um depósito ou levantamento no/do Cofre de quaisquer Tokens Digitais a partir da/para a sua conta só pode ocorrer se essa transação for assinada com a(s) sua(s) chave(s) privada(s) correspondente(s) descrita(s) na Seção 2.1 destes Termos. Isso significa que se o Usuário perder o acesso a ou o controle da(s) sua(s) chave(s) privada(s), o Usuário não conseguirá fazer quaisquer depósitos ou levantamentos de Tokens Digitais do Cofre e nenhuma outra parte poderá ajudá-lo ou fazê-lo em seu nome. Assim sendo, a utilização do Cofre não lhe fornece, nem lhe pode fornecer, quaisquer serviços de custódia, fiança (
bailment
) ou transferência pela TFH ou por qualquer outro terceiro em relação a quaisquer Tokens Digitais que possa bloquear utilizando o Cofre na sua conta.
O contrato inteligente que rege as funções do Cofre para tokens WLD pode ser visualizado aqui, usando a
blockchain
. Por uma questão de clareza, a utilização destas e de quaisquer outras funções conexas do Cofre está sujeita à Exclusão de Garantias contida na Secção 12 dos presentes Termos.
2.7.2 Funções do Cofre.
O Cofre oferece atualmente os seguintes recursos, que podem ser alterados, removidos ou adicionados pela TFH ou por terceiros: Bloqueio, Rendimento, Levantamento e Período de Segurança, Compensação para o Cofre.
2.7.3
Bloqueio.
Ao utilizar o Cofre, o Usuário concorda em bloquear seus Tokens Digitais durante um período de tempo definido. Bloquear Tokens Digitais utilizando o seu Cofre transferirá esses Tokens Digitais da sua carteira sem custódia para um contrato inteligente descentralizado. Após a transferência, esses Tokens Digitais ficarão “bloqueados” no cofre, o que inclui o período durante o qual eles permanecem depositados no Cofre, bem como uma duração pré-determinada denominada “Período de Segurança”, que está descrito com mais detalhes abaixo. Enquanto seus Tokens Digitais estiverem bloqueados, o Usuário não conseguirá acessá-los, transferi-los ou realizar qualquer outra transação com eles até ter solicitado o seu levantamento e esperado pelo término do Período de Segurança. Ninguém, incluindo a TFH ou o Prestador terceiro, tem a capacidade de desbloquear, exercer custódia, controlar, levantar ou transferir seus Tokens Digitais bloqueados. A colocação de seus Tokens Digitais no Cofre e a sujeição destas às restrições de bloqueio e levantamento não constitui uma venda, empréstimo ou transferência de quaisquer direitos, títulos ou interesses nos Tokens Digitais para a TFH ou de qualquer outro terceiro.
O bloqueio de seus Tokens Digitais no Cofre não garante sua salvaguarda ou custódia. Não se aplica qualquer sistema de seguro de depósito, ou qualquer salvaguarda semelhante, a seus Tokens Digitais, e o valor e/ou utilidade de quaisquer Tokens Digitais que tenha bloqueado pode aumentar ou diminuir ao longo do Período de Segurança. Isso significa que o valor ou a utilidade de quaisquer Tokens Digitais que forem bloqueadas em seu Cofre podem diminuir ou tornarem-se nulas durante o Período de Segurança. O Usuário reconhece e concorda que qualquer levantamento de Tokens Digitais na sua conta após o Período de Segurança aplicável pode resultar na restituição de Tokens Digitais com valor nulo ou inferior ao que tinham no momento em que o Usuário os bloqueou no seu Cofre, e isenta a TFH e quaisquer terceiros do risco ou da responsabilidade de qualquer diminuição de valor que possa ocorrer.
2.7.4 Rendimento.
O Usuário também pode ser elegível para gerar aquilo que, para fins deste produto, se designa por “rendimento” sobre determinados Tokens Digitais contidas no seu Cofre. Esse rendimento, que pode assumir a forma de Tokens Digitais adicionais, é fornecido por um terceiro por meio de um conjunto separado de operações de contratos inteligentes que o Usuário pode acessar utilizando a interface fornecida no World App. Nem a TFH nem quaisquer terceiros utilizam, assumem o controle sobre, recebem qualquer crédito por, ou de outra forma alienam seus Tokens Digitais. Como tal, o rendimento não é um juro vinculado a ou gerado por algo que não seja o bloqueio de seus Tokens Digitais de acordo com os termos e especificações fornecidos. Qualquer rendimento que o Usuário possa receber lhe será fornecido sob a forma de compensação pelo terceiro, com base nas suas decisões de armazenar Tokens Digitais utilizando o Cofre. As especificações que determinam a geração de rendimento, incluindo o montante gerado ou o tempo ao longo do qual pode ser acumulado, podem ser alteradas ou canceladas a qualquer momento, a critério do Prestador terceiro.
O rendimento que o Usuário pode obter poderá estar sujeito a um limite máximo. Esses pormenores serão apresentados juntamente com o seu Cofre e por meio de eventuais termos adicionais facultados pelo terceiro (identificado como o “Prestador” no World App) que fornece o rendimento. Esses termos adicionais também são incorporados nos presentes Termos. O rendimento não é fornecido nem administrado pela TFH.
Qualquer rendimento acumulado só será distribuído ao Usuário após a conclusão do levantamento, a partir do Cofre, de quaisquer Tokens Digitais geradoras de rendimento, o que apenas ocorre após o vencimento de qualquer Período de Segurança aplicável. Esse levantamento é a condição final de qualquer concessão de rendimento, o que significa que o Usuário não tem qualquer direito, título ou interesse em qualquer rendimento que tenha sido ou venha a ser gerado a menos que, e até que, o rendimento tenha sido recebido na sua carteira sem custódia. O que significa também que se o Usuário perder o acesso a ou o controle da(s) sua(s) chave(s) privada(s), não poderá fazer quaisquer levantamentos que lhe deem direito a receber rendimentos.
2.7.5 Levantamento
e
Período
de
Segurança.
O Usuário pode iniciar o levantamento de seus Tokens Digitais do seu Cofre a qualquer momento. Os Tokens Digitais cujo levantamento do Cofre foi solicitado serão devolvidas ao Usuário após ter decorrido um prazo predefinido, designado por “Período de Segurança”. Sempre que iniciar um levantamento de Tokens Digitais do Cofre, será iniciado um novo “Período de Segurança” e uma contagem de tempo decrescente até que esses Tokens Digitais lhe sejam devolvidas. Durante este período, os Tokens Digitais selecionados para levantamento permanecerão bloqueados e o Usuário também poderá cancelar o seu levantamento. Uma vez decorrido o “Período de Segurança”, o seu levantamento será concluído e os Tokens Digitais, juntamente com qualquer rendimento gerado que possa ter acumulado, serão enviados para a sua carteira. A duração do “Período de Segurança” será indicada no World App quando o Usuário acessar o seu Cofre.
2.7.6
Compensações
para
o
Cofre.
Quando selecionado, este recurso permite ao Usuário que envie automaticamente as Compensações de WLD diretamente para o Cofre na sua conta, em vez de enviá-las para a sua carteira. O Usuário pode alterar esta configuração a qualquer momento.
2.7.7
TFH e Cofre
. O acesso a este recurso se dá por meio do World App. No entanto, a TFH só conseguirá ler os dados relacionados e mostrá-los ao Usuário. A TFH não pode transferir, levantar ou depositar nenhum de seus Tokens Digitais e não tem qualquer acesso ao seu Cofre.
2.8 Aplicativos descentralizados
Esta seção não se aplica a usuários estabelecidos ou situados na Alemanha ou que tenham a sua residência habitual ou sede social nesse país:
Quando disponíveis
, poderemos ter funcionalidades que permitam ao Usuário conectar a sua carteira a vários aplicativos descentralizados. O Usuário é o único responsável por garantir a segurança e a proteção desses aplicativos de terceiros. Não temos nenhum controle sobre os aplicativos de terceiros e não podemos prestar assistência para quaisquer problemas que o Usuário possa encontrar ao acessar aplicativos de terceiros.
2.9 Suporte ao Usuário
. Prestamos suporte ao usuário para ajudar com determinados recursos e funções relacionadas com os Serviços. Para entrar em contato, selecione “Suporte” no menu do aplicativo ou por meio de support@tollsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Interface World ID
. A Fundação Worldcoin, e não a TFH, administra o Protocolo World ID e controla a Orb relacionada a tratamento de dados para verificar um World ID. Poderemos disponibilizar ao Usuário o Protocolo World ID (como uma interface) por meio do Serviço. O Protocolo World ID permite ao Usuário provar que é um ser humano real e único e, ao mesmo tempo, protege a sua privacidade.
2.11 Programa
Invite
(Convidar)
. Quando disponível, poderemos colocar o recurso “
Invite
” (Convidar) à sua disposição. Este recurso permite ao Usuário convidar amigos e familiares a baixarem o World App e a procederem à verificação do World ID. Caso esteja utilizando o
Invite
, o Usuário concorda com os seguintes termos e condições:
As recompensas por participar em “Invite” são oferecidas pela World Assets Limited. A World Assets Limited pode, a seu critério exclusivo, oferecer-lhe uma recompensa pelo fato de convidar usuários que verifiquem com êxito o próprio World ID. Para receber a recompensa o Usuário deve cumprir com determinadas condições, que lhe serão explicadas no World App. Há um limite máximo de usuários que o Usuário poderá indicar para o World App. Esse limite é apresentado no World App.
Não é necessário efetuar qualquer compra para participar no recurso “
Invite
”. O recurso “
Invite
” só se encontra disponível para utilização pessoal e não comercial. O Usuário só pode utilizar o recurso
Invite
de boa-fé para fins legais. O Usuário não pode: (a) utilizar o recurso
Invite
ou os Serviços de forma enganosa, fraudulenta ou ilícita; (b) fazer algo para prejudicar a nossa marca, boa-fé ou reputação; (c) transmitir publicidade ou material promocional não solicitados ou não autorizados; (d) prestar declarações falsas ou enganosas; (e) utilizar pesquisa paga, mídia paga ou outra atividade semelhante para solicitar Usuários por meio do recurso
Invite
; e (f) utilizar o recurso
Invite
para tentar obter informações pessoais de outros usuários.
O recurso
Invite
não está disponível em todos os países ou locais e não está disponível para todos os usuários. A participação no recurso
Invite
não está disponível em qualquer jurisdição onde toda ou qualquer parte desse recurso possa violar (ou fazer com que violemos) quaisquer requisitos legais. O Usuário concorda em não utilizar o recurso
Invite
caso esse recurso não se encontre de acordo com a lei aplicável na sua localização.
O recurso
Invite
é disponibilizado a nosso exclusivo critério. Poderemos alterar, modificar, suspender e cancelar o recurso a qualquer momento. A World Assets Limited pode recusar-se a oferecer ao Usuário uma recompensa por convidar os usuários ao verificar a sua World ID quando determinar, a seu exclusivo critério, que o Usuário violou estes Termos.
2.12 Fundos
e
Reservas
Um dos serviços de Terceiros está reivindicando um pequeno montante de WLD em intervalos diferentes (“Fundos WLD”). Os Fundos WLD são disponibilizados pela World Assets Limited, uma subsidiária da Fundação Worldcoin. Os montantes, intervalos e prazos exatos dos Fundos e Reservas WLD serão especificados no World App, embora sejam determinados exclusivamente pela World Assets Limited. Em conformidade com as versões anteriores destes termos, as Reservas WLD previamente disponíveis não garantem que o Usuário receberá quaisquer montantes de Fundos WLD. Os montantes, intervalos e prazos exatos das Reservas WLD serão especificados no World App, embora sejam determinados exclusivamente pela World Assets Limited. As Reservas WLD podem expirar, com ou sem aviso prévio no World App, independentemente de já ter feito uma Reserva WLD ou recebido os Fundos WLD associados. Eles são revogáveis a critério exclusivo da World Assets Limited.
2.13 Aplicativo do
No que diz respeito a Operadores Orb e outros parceiros, disponibilizamos um Aplicativo ao
Operator
que lhe permite monitorar determinadas atividades e estatísticas relevantes para o Usuário e para o seu negócio como Operadores Orb. Poderemos também disponibilizar determinados recursos para ajudá-lo a conduzir o seu negócio como Operadores Orb.
2.14 Miniaplicativo
. “Miniaplicativos” é um recurso do World App que lhe permite acessar uma plataforma de miniaplicativos que podem ser acessados no World App. Temos o critério exclusivo de determinar como os Miniaplicativos são exibidos no World App. O Usuário deve ter um endereço de carteira no World App para acessar Miniaplicativos.
O Usuário reconhece que ao exibir Miniaplicativos, a TFH está fornecendo uma plataforma de tecnologia que somente conecta usuários. Em momento nenhum a TFH transmite, armazena, toma posse de, ou custódia, ou de outra forma se envolve com qualquer moeda tradicional ou digital. A TFH não processa transações, atua como um processador de pagamento, ou de outra forma se envolve em transações de processamento. A TFH não é uma parte nas transações e não tem qualquer responsabilidade com relação a tais transações. A TFH não é capaz de fornecer suporte com relação a problemas de transação.
2.14.1
Transações e Pagamentos relacionados a Miniaplicativos
. Os miniaplicativos são exibidos no World App e podem oferecer produtos ou serviços que os usuários do World App podem comprar utilizando Tokens Digitais em suas carteiras no World App. Essas transações ocorrem entre o Usuário e o miniaplicativo. A TFH não é uma parte em quaisquer dessas transações.
Com relação a quaisquer dessas transações, o Usuário reconhece que a carteira no World App é um serviço sem custódia, que a TFH não armazena ou exerce custódia de seus Tokens Digitais e não faz transação, transmite, toma posse de, ou de outra forma tem qualquer envolvimento com realização de qualquer transação. Tokens Digitais são sempre armazenados e transmitidos em suas respectivas redes
Blockchain
. Não há garantias de que as transações serão processadas corretamente.
A TFH somente conecta o Usuário a um terceiro na plataforma de Miniaplicativos e não é uma parte em quaisquer transações. A TFH não desempenha qualquer função nos processamentos de pagamentos e no controle de reembolso ou encargos de cancelamento.
Uma vez decidido a se envolver em uma transação, o Usuário deve enviar o montante acordado e o tipo de Tokens Digitais. A TFH não processa Tokens Digitais ou moeda tradicional de usuários e não realiza quaisquer transferências em nome de usuários. A TFH não lida, administra, supervisiona, verifica ou fornece qualquer tipo de garantia com relação a quaisquer transações. Nos casos em que a transação não seja recebida, revertida, indevidamente processada, ou de outra forma seja encontrado um erro, o Usuário e os prestadores de serviços terceiros devem trabalhar juntos para resolver qualquer questão. Quaisquer controvérsias, reclamações, perdas, mal-entendidos, erros técnicos ou questões de quaisquer tipos (tanto acidental quanto alegadamente intencional) com relação a pagamentos ou transações devem ser tratados diretamente entre o Usuário e o prestador de serviços terceiro. A TFH não assume nenhuma responsabilidade e não será uma parte em quaisquer controvérsias relacionadas a pagamento, nem será responsável por quaisquer perdas ou danos que as partes envolvidas possam incorrer.
O Usuário é o único responsável por aceitar o risco de quaisquer flutuações de preço referentes ao valor dos Tokens Digitais, e entende que, quando o Usuário conclui uma transação, o valor dos Tokens Digitais envolvido na transação pode ter alterado significativamente.
2.14.2
Terceiro
. Os produtos e serviços exibidos em qualquer miniaplicativo são oferecidos e administrados por terceiros. Ao utilizar miniaplicativos, o Usuário reconhece que:
Estes termos são entre o Usuário e nós, e não com qualquer miniaplicativo específico;
Está acessando um aplicativo desenvolvido e/ou fornecido por um terceiro, cuja parte é responsável somente pelo miniaplicativo;
A TFH somente fornece acesso a prestadores de serviços de pagamento terceiros por meio da carteira no World App, e não processa pagamentos ou detém fundos;
Os miniaplicativos podem ter termos adicionais como parte de seus produtos ou serviços os quais o Usuário deve cumprir, caso esteja aceitando o serviço deles; e
O Usuário reconhece plenamente e assume de maneira explícita todos e quaisquer tipos de riscos relacionados às transações, e concorda que não devemos ser responsabilizados por quaisquer riscos ou consequências adversas decorrentes dessas transações.
Os Desenvolvedores individuais dos miniaplicativos disponíveis nos Miniaplicativos são unicamente responsáveis pelo conteúdo, produtos, bens ou serviços disponibilizados ao Usuário diretamente por meio dos respectivos miniaplicativos deles. Para obter informações sobre quaisquer consultas ou controvérsias, o Usuário deve entrar em contato diretamente com o respectivo Desenvolvedor.
Os usuários aceitam todos os riscos relacionados à realização de uma transação, incluindo o risco de que eles não receberão a receita de suas compras ou vendas. No caso de um problema com relação a qualquer transação, a TFH não terá condições de auxiliar na resolução, nem tem qualquer responsabilidade por problemas decorrentes de quaisquer transações.
2.14.3 Taxas da TFH.
Podemos acrescentar uma taxa pela utilização de Miniaplicativos quando o Usuário faz uma transação com um Desenvolvedor. O montante dessa taxa será apresentado ao Usuário na plataforma. Quaisquer dessas taxas serão apresentadas e estão em vigor conforme constam nos Miniaplicativos e poderão ser atualizadas e alteradas de tempos em tempo.
2.14.4 Impostos.
É da sua exclusiva responsabilidade determinar se, e em que medida, quaisquer impostos se aplicam a qualquer transação por meio de Miniaplicativos ou quaisquer transações que o Usuário fizer neles, e de reter, cobrar, comunicar e remeter o montante correto de tributos às autoridades fiscais competentes.
2.14.5 Ausência de Monitoramento Geral.
A TFH não terá nenhuma obrigação de monitorar as informações geradas pelos usuários, tampouco de buscar ativamente fatos ou circunstâncias que indiquem qualquer atividade ilícita nos Miniaplicativos.
Contudo, se tomarmos conhecimento, independentemente dos meios utilizados, de que um produto ou serviço ilegal foi oferecido por meio de Miniaplicativos a usuários localizados na União Europeia, devemos informar os usuários que compraram o produto ou serviço ilegal por meio de Miniaplicativos.
2.14.6 Atividades Proibidas.
Os usuários de Serviços de Miniaplicativos concordam em não publicar ou distribuir qualquer conteúdo que viole quaisquer leis ou infrinja quaisquer direitos de terceiros, incluindo, entre outros, quaisquer direitos de propriedade intelectual, direitos de privacidade ou direitos à publicidade.
Além disso, o Usuário concorda em não se envolver em qualquer atividade que:
Seja ilícita, fraudulenta ou prejudicial;
Interfira ou interrompa a operação de Miniaplicativos;
Viole quaisquer termos estabelecidos em nossas Diretrizes de Aplicativos; e
Inclua conteúdo não permitido segundo as Diretrizes de Aplicativos.
2.14.7
Sinalização de conteúdo ilegal
. World App tem fácil acesso e mecanismos simples para que usuários nos notifiquem de eventual conteúdo ilegal na plataforma de Miniaplicativos. Agiremos prontamente para revisar tais denúncias.
2.14.8
Remoção de conteúdo ilegal
. Se determinarmos que qualquer miniaplicativo contém conteúdo ilegal ou oferece produtos ou serviços ilícitos, estes devem ser removidos dos Miniaplicativos. A TFH fornecerá uma declaração breve, clara e específica dos motivos de qualquer cartaz de conteúdo ou serviços ilícitos.
Qualquer restrição imposta pelo World App a seus usuários será feita de maneira diligente, objetiva e proporcional.
Os usuários que acreditam que o conteúdo deles foi removido ou o acesso a ele foi desabilitado de maneira injustificável podem entrar em contato conosco pelo
e-mail
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
para recorrer da decisão. Fornecemos um sistema de reclamação eletrônica gratuita que permite que os usuários contestem nossas decisões relacionadas à remoção de conteúdo, suspensão de serviço, encerramento de conta ou restrições de monetização devido a suposto conteúdo ilegal ou violações de termos.
2.14.9
Moderação de Conteúdo
. A TFH reserva-se o direito de suspender, por um período razoável e após ter emitido uma advertência prévia quando obrigada legalmente a fazê-lo, a prestação de nossos serviços a usuários que frequentemente fornecem de maneira manifesta conteúdo ilegal. A TFH também poderá suspender temporariamente processamento de avisos e reclamações de usuários que apresentam com frequência reclamações sem fundamentos.
2.15
Nomes de Usuários
. Seu nome de usuário no World App não tem de ser o seu nome verdadeiro. Ao escolher um nome de usuário, o Usuário é obrigado a cumprir a
de acordo com a versão mais recente.
3. Compras, Taxas e Impostos
3.1 Taxas de transação
. Ao utilizar os Serviços, o Usuário concorda em pagar todas as taxas aplicáveis, incluindo taxas de transação relativas a trocas (“
swaps
”) e transações de Tokens Digitais. O Usuário será informado de qualquer taxa aplicável antes de efetuar uma transação. Caso utilize um serviço de pagamento de terceiros, as taxas bancárias, de cartão de crédito e de cartão de débito cobradas por quaisquer compras de Tokens Digitais podem ser liquidadas a partir do montante liquidado das suas compras de Tokens Digitais. O Usuário também é responsável pelo pagamento de quaisquer taxas adicionais cobradas pelo seu prestador de serviços financeiros.
3.2 Taxas de transação
. As interações com a
blockchain
também incorrem numa taxa de transação. A taxa de transação é cobrada e paga à rede
blockchain
, não a nós, a fim de facilitar quaisquer interações. Em alguns casos, o Usuário pode ser elegível a um número limitado de transações sem gás dentro de um período determinado a total critério da TFH. Essas transações estão sujeitas a um valor mínimo de transação que a TFH poderá ajustar.
3.3 Impostos
. É da sua exclusiva responsabilidade determinar se, e em que medida, quaisquer impostos se aplicam a qualquer transação por meio dos Serviços, e de reter, cobrar, comunicar e remeter o montante correto de tributos às autoridades fiscais competentes.
3.4 Atualizações
. Todas as taxas são apresentadas e estão em vigor conforme constam nos Serviços e podem ser atualizadas e alteradas de tempos em tempos.
4. Fatores de risco
4.1 Não é moeda corrente.
Os Tokens Digitais não são moeda corrente, não são lastreadas por qualquer governo e as contas de Tokens Digitais e saldos de valor nos Serviços não estão sujeitos a medidas de proteção aplicadas pelo Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Securities Investor Protection Corporation ou medidas de proteção semelhantes existentes em outros países. Não somos um banco e não oferecemos serviços fiduciários. As transações efetuadas por meio do World App não são, em grande medida, regulamentadas em muitos países. Não garantimos a funcionalidade dos
blockchains
que suportamos, o que pode, entre outras coisas, resultar em atrasos, conflitos de interesses ou decisões operacionais tomadas por terceiros que sejam desfavoráveis para determinados proprietários de Tokens Digitais, ou na sua impossibilidade de concluir uma transação pela utilização dos Serviços. Os detalhes da transação que o Usuário enviar por meio dos Serviços podem não estar completos ou podem sofrer atrasos substanciais na respectiva
blockchain
, pelo que não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade no caso de uma transação não ser confirmada ou processada conforme esperado. Não há qualquer garantia de que uma transferência iniciada por meio dos Serviços transferirá com sucesso a titularidade ou direito sobre qualquer Token Digital. Além disso, a utilização de determinados Ativos Digitais, como a WLD, pode implicar em riscos específicos. Informações adicionais sobre os riscos específicos à WLD podem ser encontradas
aqui
.
4.2 Nova tecnologia.
Os Serviços são novos. Apesar de este
software
ter sido amplamente testado, o
software
utilizado para os Serviços ainda é relativamente novo e pode conter erros (“
bugs
”) ou vulnerabilidades de segurança. Além disso, o
software
ainda está em desenvolvimento e pode sofrer alterações significativas ao longo do tempo, que podem não atender as expectativas dos usuários.
4.3 Risco de segurança da informação.
Os Tokens Digitais e a utilização dos Serviços podem vir a ser expropriados ou roubados. Os
hackers
ou outros grupos ou organizações mal-intencionados podem tentar interferir nos Serviços de várias formas, incluindo, entre outros, ataques de
malware
, ataques de negação de serviço, ataques consensuais, ataques
Sybil, “smurfing
” (lavagem de dinheiro por meio de pequenas transações) e “
spoofing
” (disfarce da origem das comunicações). Além disso, uma vez que as redes
blockchain
que suportamos, tais como o protocolo Ethereum, dependem de
software
de código aberto, o
software
subjacente aos Serviços pode conter erros ou debilidades intencionais ou não intencionais que podem afetar negativamente os Serviços ou resultar na perda de Tokens Digitais do Usuário ou na perda da capacidade do Usuário de acessar ou controlar a sua carteira por meio dos Serviços. Na eventualidade de um erro ou debilidade no
software
, poderá não existir qualquer solução, pelo que não garantimos aos Usuários qualquer solução, reembolso ou compensação.
4.4 Exatidão
. Apesar de ser nossa intenção fornecer informações exatas e de forma tempestiva por meio dos Serviços (incluindo, sem limitações, o conteúdo), estas podem nem sempre ser totalmente exatas, completas ou atuais e podem também incluir imprecisões de ordem técnica ou erros tipográficos. Num esforço de continuar a oferecer ao usuário informações tão completas e exatas o quanto possível, estas poderão, na medida do permitido pela legislação aplicável, ser alteradas ou atualizadas ocasionalmente sem aviso prévio, incluindo, sem limitação, informações acerca das nossas políticas, produtos e serviços. Por conseguinte, o Usuário deve verificar todas as informações antes de confiar nas mesmas. Nesse sentido, todas as decisões baseadas nas informações fornecidas por meio dos Serviços são da sua exclusiva responsabilidade, pelo que não assumiremos qualquer responsabilidade por essas decisões.
4.5 Disponibilidade
. Apesar de nos esforçarmos para prestar um serviço de excelência, não garantimos que os Serviços estarão disponíveis ininterruptamente. Os Serviços podem estar temporariamente indisponíveis por motivos de manutenção ou outros. Não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade por qualquer erro, omissão, interrupção, eliminação, defeito, atraso no funcionamento ou transmissão, falha na linha de comunicações, roubo, destruição, ou acesso não autorizado ou alterações às comunicações do Usuário. Não somos responsáveis por qualquer tipo de problemas ou mau funcionamento técnico em qualquer rede ou linhas telefônicas, sistemas informáticos
on-line
, servidores ou fornecedores, equipamento informático,
software
, falha no
e-mail
ou em leitores devido a problemas de ordem técnica ou ao congestionamento de tráfego na Internet ou nos Serviços, ou a uma combinação dos mesmos, incluindo lesões ou danos causados aos usuários ou ao computador de qualquer outra pessoa relacionados com ou resultantes da sua interação com os Serviços ou da transferência (
download
) de materiais no âmbito dos mesmos. Não somos responsáveis por qualquer perda ou dano, prejuízo financeiro ou lucros cessantes, perda de negócios, danos corporais ou morte, resultantes da utilização do Serviço, de qualquer conteúdo publicado no Serviço ou por meio do mesmo, ou transmitido aos usuários, ou de quaisquer interações entre os usuários dos Serviços,
on-line
ou
offline
.
4.6 Ramificações
. O
software
utilizado para criar a WLD é de código-fonte aberto e qualquer pessoa pode copiá-lo e utilizá-lo Isto significa que qualquer pessoa pode criar uma versão modificada da WLD, também conhecida como “Ramificação”. No caso de uma Ramificação ou qualquer outra perturbação de uma rede de Tokens Digitais, poderemos não conseguir prestar suporte a qualquer atividade relacionada com a Ramificação. As transações podem não ficar concluídas, ficar parcialmente concluídas, incorretamente concluídas ou sofrer atrasos substanciais quando ocorre uma Ramificação. Não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade por perdas em que venha a incorrer, causadas, no todo ou em parte, por uma Ramificação ou outra perturbação da rede.
4.7 Serviços de Terceiros.
Quando disponíveis (veja, em especial, a Seção 5), contamos com fornecedores de serviços terceiros para fornecer alguns recursos e funcionalidades nos Aplicativos, por exemplo, a capacidade de comprar Tokens Digitais com moeda fiduciária (fiat), ou a capacidade de trocar um Ativo Digital por outro. Não prestamos esses serviços e não somos parte nessas transações. O Usuário depende exclusivamente de prestadores de serviços terceiros para esses serviços, e o Usuário deve ter uma conta junto dos prestadores de serviços terceiros e concordar com os termos deles. Não poderemos ajudá-lo no caso de o Usuário se deparar com problemas durante a utilização do serviço desses prestadores de serviços terceiros e não assumimos qualquer responsabilidade pelas transações que o Usuário efetuar por meio de prestadores de serviços terceiros
5. Propriedade intelectual.
5.1 Titularidade.
O nosso
software
, o aplicativo, os Serviços, o Conteúdo, as Marcas (conforme abaixo definidas) e o
design
, a seleção e organização do Conteúdo nos Serviços (a “PI”) estão protegidos por direitos autorais, marca registrada, patente e outros direitos de propriedade intelectual, e pelas leis dos Estados Unidos e de outros países aplicáveis. O Usuário concorda em cumprir todos os direitos e leis de propriedade intelectual aplicáveis, bem como quaisquer avisos ou restrições de marcas registradas ou direitos autorais previstos no Contrato ou nos Serviços. O Usuário não pode eliminar quaisquer avisos de direito autoral, marca registrada ou de propriedade contidos na PI.
5.2 Marca Registrada
. A designação Tools for Humanity Corporation, o logotipo de World App e todos os logotipos e slogans relacionados são marcas registradas ou marcas de serviço da Tools for Humanity Corporation ou dos seus licenciadores (as “Marcas”). O Usuário não pode copiar, imitar ou utilizar as Marcas, no todo ou em parte, sem a nossa autorização por escrito. Todas as outras marcas registradas, nomes ou logotipos mencionados no âmbito dos Serviços são propriedade dos respectivos proprietários, pelo que o Usuário não pode copiar, imitar ou utilizá-los, no todo ou em parte, sem a autorização por escrito do respectivo proprietário da marca registrada. A inclusão de marcas de terceiros nos Serviços não constitui uma aprovação, um aval ou recomendação da nossa parte.
6. Licença e restrições
6.1 Licença.
Desde que o Usuário seja elegível para utilizar os Serviços e sob reserva do seu cumprimento destes Termos, por este instrumento, concedemos ao Usuário uma licença limitada para acessar e utilizar os Serviços.
6.2 Restrições da licença
. O Usuário não poderá republicar o Conteúdo em qualquer
site
da Internet, Intranet ou Extranet, nem incorporar as informações em qualquer outra base de dados ou compilação, sendo qualquer outra utilização do Conteúdo estritamente proibida. Qualquer utilização dos Serviços, além da especificamente autorizada no presente documento, sem a nossa prévia permissão por escrito, é estritamente proibida e levará à revogação da licença ora concedida. A utilização não autorizada pode também constituir uma violação das leis aplicáveis, incluindo, entre outros, leis de
copyright
e de marca registrada, e comunicações, regulamentos e estatutos aplicáveis. Salvo indicação expressa neste documento, nada nestes Termos deve ser interpretado como concessão de licenciamento de direitos de propriedade intelectual, seja implicitamente, por preclusão ou de outra forma. Esta licença pode ser revogada por nós a qualquer momento, sem aviso prévio e com ou sem motivo, na medida do permitido pela lei aplicável.
6.3 Governo
. Se for um usuário final do Governo dos EUA, licenciamos ao Usuário os Serviços como um “Item Comercial”, conforme esse termo é definido noS. Code of Federal Regulations (Código de Regulamentos Federais dos EUA) (consulte 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), e os direitos que lhe concedemos relativamente aos Serviços são os mesmos que os direitos que concedemos a todos os outros ao abrigo destes Termos.
7. Utilização aceitável
7.1 O Usuário poderá utilizar os Serviços apenas para seu uso Reservamo-nos o direito de, a qualquer momento e segundo o nosso critério exclusivo, rever, cancelar ou suspender o seu acesso ou utilização dos Serviços de acordo com a legislação aplicável. Os itens da lista de Utilizações Proibidas são apenas exemplos e a lista não é exaustiva; sendo que podemos considerar utilizações proibidas adicionais a nosso exclusivo critério, bem como adicionar ou remover utilizações proibidas à nossa inteira discrição, de acordo com a lei aplicável.
7.2 As Utilizações Proibidas incluem:
Atividade ilícita
: qualquer atividade que viole, ou auxilie na violação de quaisquer programas de sanções administradas pela OFAC; viole, ou auxilie na violação de quaisquer leis dos países em que desenvolvemos a nossa atividade; envolva as receitas de qualquer atividade ilícita; ou publique, distribua ou dissemine qualquer material ou informação ilegal.
Uso Abusivo ou Pirataria
: qualquer atividade que imponha uma carga excessiva ou desproporcionalmente elevada sobre a nossa infraestrutura; que intercepte, exproprie ou interfira negativamente com sistemas, dados ou informações; que transmita ou carregue por meios eletrônicos, para os Serviços, material que contenha vírus, cavalos de Troia,
worms
, ou outros programas nocivos ou nefastos; ou que constitua uma tentativa de obter acesso não autorizado aos sistemas ou redes de computadores ligados aos Serviços.
Abuso de Outros
: qualquer atividade que interfira com o acesso ou utilização dos Serviços por parte de outrem; que difame, abuse, extorque, assedie, persiga, ameace ou de outra forma viole ou infrinja os direitos de privacidade, propriedade intelectual, ou quaisquer outros direitos legais de outrem; incite, ameace, facilite, promova ou encoraje o ódio, a intolerância racial, ou atos violentos contra outrem; ou capte, extraia, ou recolha sem autorização os dados de outro Usuário dos Serviços.
Fraude e Outras Práticas Comerciais Desleais
: qualquer atividade executada com o intuito de fraudar a nós, nossos usuários ou a qualquer outra pessoa; que nos preste qualquer informação falsa, inexata ou enganosa; prometa recompensas exageradamente elevadas ou venda um serviço sem benefício adicional para o comprador; ou promova outras práticas predatórias e enganosas, incluindo loterias ilegais, rifas, leilões de taxa de licitação, concursos, sorteios, apostas ou qualquer outro jogo de azar.
Violação da propriedade intelectual
: qualquer atividade que envolva a venda, distribuição ou o fornecimento de acesso a música, filmes e
software
pirateados, ou outros materiais licenciados sem a devida autorização do titular dos direitos; utilize a PI (incluindo a Marca) sem um consentimento expresso ou de uma forma que prejudique a nós ou a nossa marca; sugira um falso aval da nossa parte ou uma falsa relação conosco; ou infrinja ou viole qualquer direito autoral, marca registrada, direito de publicidade ou privacidade, ou qualquer outro direito proprietário nos termos da lei.
8. Operadores
Orb
Estabelecemos parcerias com contratantes independentes locais que designamos por “Operadores Orb”, que facilitam as adesões dos usuários e ajudam a responder a perguntas que estes possam ter sobre nós. Esses Operadores Orb receberam treinamento e têm conhecimentos sobre a World Network. No entanto, não temos controle sobre estes e nos isentamos de qualquer responsabilidade pelo que dizem ou como se comportam.
Os Operadores Orb não são, de modo algum, nossos agentes ou funcionários. Qualquer iniciativa, mecanismo, processo, política, norma ou outros esforços empreendidos pela TFH no interesse dos seus usuários não indicam uma relação de trabalho ou de agência com um Operador Orb
.
9. Suspensão
Poderemos suspender e restringir o seu acesso aos Serviços se: (i) formos obrigados por uma intimação, decisão judicial ou ordem vinculativa válida de uma autoridade governamental; (ii) tivermos motivos razoáveis para suspeitar que o Usuário está utilizando o Serviço para a realização de uma Utilização Proibida; (iii) a utilização dos Serviços for objeto de qualquer ação judicial ou administrativa, investigação ou procedimentos governamentais pendentes e/ou percebermos que existe um risco elevado de não conformidade legal ou regulamentar associada à sua atividade; (iv) os nossos parceiros de serviço não puderem prestar suporte à sua utilização pelos Serviços; (v) tomar qualquer ação que consideremos ser uma forma de burlar os nossos controles (tal como, entre outros, tentar criar várias contas).
10. Não é uma Oferta de Valores Mobiliários ou
Commodity Interest
O conteúdo dos Serviços não constitui uma oferta de compra ou venda, ou a solicitação de uma proposta de compra ou venda de investimentos, valores mobiliários, participações em sociedades,
commodities
ou quaisquer outros instrumentos financeiros. O conteúdo ou os Serviços também não constituem, nem podem ser utilizados por ninguém para efeitos ou no âmbito de uma oferta ou solicitação num estado ou jurisdição em que essa oferta ou solicitação não seja autorizada ou permitida, ou a qualquer pessoa a quem seja ilegal fazer tal oferta ou solicitação.
11. Conteúdo
11.1 Confiança no Conteúdo; Alterações aos Serviços
. As informações e o material que fornecemos ao Usuário por meio dos Serviços ("Conteúdo") destinam-se exclusivamente a fins informativos gerais e não garantimos a sua exatidão, utilidade ou integridade, na medida do permitido pela legislação aplicável. Qualquer confiança que o Usuário deposite no nosso Conteúdo é estritamente por sua conta e risco. Não temos nenhuma obrigação ou responsabilidade por quaisquer ações que tome ou não tome devido ao Conteúdo, ou por qualquer pessoa com quem o Usuário compartilhe o Conteúdo. As declarações de outros usuários que descrevam a utilização dos nossos Serviços, encontradas nos Serviços ou em qualquer outro local, não devem ser consideradas como o nosso apoio às suas declarações, se estas forem inconsistentes com estes Termos ou com o nosso Conteúdo. Poderemos atualizar o Conteúdo periodicamente, mas esse Conteúdo poderá não estar completo ou atualizado, e não temos qualquer obrigação para com o Usuário de atualizar o Conteúdo ou qualquer outra parte dos Serviços. Podemos modificar ou descontinuar, temporária ou permanentemente, qualquer parte ou todo o Conteúdo ou Serviços sem aviso prévio ao Usuário, na medida do permitido pela lei aplicável. Não seremos responsáveis por qualquer modificação, suspensão ou descontinuação de parte ou da totalidade do Conteúdo ou dos Serviços, na medida do permitido pela lei aplicável.
11.2 Serviços e Conteúdo de Terceiros
. Poderemos disponibilizar
links
para materiais educativos,
webinars
, encontros e promoções em plataformas de redes sociais (“Serviços de Terceiros”) que permitem compartilhamento e colaboração entre usuários e outros terceiros. Se o Usuário compartilhar quaisquer informações pessoais, imagens, opiniões, conteúdos ou outros dados nestes serviços, irá fazê-lo por sua conta e risco, estando a utilização destes serviços pelo Usuário sujeita aos Termos e Condições e políticas de privacidade desses serviços e não aos nossos. O Usuário deve consultar os termos de serviços de cada Serviço de Terceiros para compreender melhor os seus direitos e a forma como essas plataformas utilizam os seus dados. Não somos responsáveis por qualquer perda, roubo, comprometimento ou utilização indevida de seus dados no âmbito de qualquer Serviço de Terceiros (incluindo negligência), salvo na medida em que tal responsabilidade não possa ser limitada nos termos das leis aplicáveis. A utilização pelo Usuário de qualquer informação fornecida por um Serviço de Terceiros (“Conteúdo de Terceiros”) corre por sua conta e risco, não assumimos qualquer compromisso de que qualquer Conteúdo de Terceiros seja preciso, completo, autêntico ou adequado às suas circunstâncias O Conteúdo de Terceiros inclui informações fornecidas por outros usuários que não foram
necessária e
especificamente endossados por nós.
11.3 Conteúdo do Usuário
. Como membro da comunidade Worldcoin, o Usuário pode publicar mensagens, dados,
software,
imagens, vídeos ou outros conteúdos (“Conteúdo do Usuário”) em quadros de mensagem,
blogs
, contas de redes sociais detidas por nós, assim como em vários outros locais publicamente disponíveis nos Serviços. Esses fóruns podem ser hospedados por nós ou por um dos nossos Prestadores de Serviços Terceiros em nosso O Usuário é responsável por todo o Conteúdo do Usuário que submeter, publicar ou armazenar por meio dos Serviços. O Usuário deve fornecer todos as advertências, informações e divulgações necessários e adequados relativamente ao seu Conteúdo do Usuário. Não seremos responsáveis por qualquer Conteúdo do Usuário que vier a submeter por meio dos Serviços.
11.4 Licença de Conteúdo do Usuário
. Ao enviar-nos Conteúdo do Usuário, o Usuário declara que tem todos os direitos necessários relativos ao mesmo e que está concedendo a nós uma licença perpétua, mundial, não exclusiva, livre de
royalty
, passível de sublicenciamento e transferível para utilizar, reproduzir, distribuir, modificar, apresentar, executar e preparar trabalhos derivados a partir de toda ou qualquer parte do Conteúdo do Usuário no âmbito da nossa atividade de
marketing
e promoções, e para qualquer outra finalidade comercial legítima relacionada com os Serviços. Poderemos redistribuir parte ou a totalidade dos trabalhos derivados de seu Conteúdo do Usuário em qualquer formato de mídia e por meio de quaisquer canais de mídia escolhidos por nós. O Usuário também, pelo presente, o concede a nós e a outros usuários uma licença não exclusiva para utilizar, acessar, reproduzir, distribuir, modificar, apresentar e executar o seu Conteúdo do Usuário através dos Serviços. A Seção 11.4 aplicar-se-á na medida máxima permitida pela legislação aplicável.
11.5 Restrições de Conteúdo do Usuário
. O Usuário concorda em não usar os Serviços, nem permitir a sua utilização por terceiros, para publicar ou transmitir Conteúdo do Usuário que: (a) seja calunioso ou difamatório, ou divulgue assuntos pessoais ou privados de qualquer pessoa; (b) seja indecente, obsceno, pornográfico, assediante, ameaçador, abusivo, contenha discurso de ódio, ofensivo em termos raciais, de gênero, orientação sexual, étnicos ou outros; que encoraje alguma conduta que seria considerada uma infração penal, daria origem à responsabilidade civil ou resultaria na violação de qualquer lei, ou que de outra forma seja inapropriado; (c) violaria os direitos de propriedade intelectual de terceiros, incluindo texto, imagens ou programas, não autorizados e protegidos por direitos autorais, segredos comerciais ou outras informações proprietárias confidenciais, ou marcas registradas ou marcas de serviço utilizadas de forma ilegal; ou (d) interfira injustificadamente com a utilização dos Serviços por parte de outro Usuário. O Usuário declara que a sua publicação de Conteúdo do Usuário nos Serviços é voluntária; por conseguinte, a publicação de Conteúdo do Usuário não constitui o estabelecimento de uma relação empregador-funcionário entre o Usuário e nós. O Usuário não pode copiar ou utilizar endereços de
e-mail
, números de celular, saldos, nomes de usuário ou quaisquer outras informações pessoais de outros usuários sem a respetiva autorização deles. São proibidos
e-mails
, correspondências, chamadas telefônicas ou outras comunicações não solicitadas para outros usuários por meio dos Serviços ou de qualquer outro canal.
11.6 Reclamações e Remoção Segundo DMCA
. Se acreditar que a sua marca registrada ou trabalho protegido por direitos autorais está sendo violado pelo nosso Conteúdo ou pelo Conteúdo do Usuário existente nos Serviços ou está por qualquer outro modo sendo publicado de uma forma que sugere o nosso aval ou uma ligação conosco, pedimos que nos envie um
e-mail
para o endereço
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com,
indicando na linha de assunto “[
Trademark/Copyright] Complaint
” (“Reclamação de [Marca Registrada/
Copyright
]”), qualquer que seja o caso. Para que a sua reclamação seja eficaz e para que possamos agir de acordo com o
Digital Millenium Copyright Act
(“DMCA”) o Usuário deve seguir todos os requisitos da DMCA incluindo as seguintes informações no seu
e-mail
:
identificação clara do trabalho protegido por direitos autorais ou marca alegadamente infringida, incluindo o número de Registo de
Copyright
se o trabalho estiver registrado;
Identificação do trabalho ou marca que se alega de infração e que pretende remover;
O URL ou outra direção clara para nos permitir localizar o conteúdo da alegada infração;
O seu endereço de
e-mail
, endereço postal e número de telefone; e
Uma declaração assinada que o Usuário acredita, de boa-fé, que o conteúdo esteja infringindo, que as informações que está fornecendo estão corretas e que o Usuário é o proprietário ou o autorizado a representar o proprietário do conteúdo.
Deve também estar ciente de que, segundo a legislação cível e criminal aplicável, qualquer pessoa que conscientemente enviar notificações de infração sem fundamento pode ser responsabilizada por danos, por isso, não faça falsas acusações. Poderemos compartilhar qualquer informação ou correspondência com terceiros que nos fornecer, incluindo a pessoa que publicou para o Serviço o material alegadamente infrator.
Quando recebemos um aviso de infração, feito de boa-fé, a nossa política é: (a) remover ou desativar imediatamente o acesso ao conteúdo infrator; (b) notificar a pessoa que publicou o material infrator de que removemos ou desativamos o acesso ao material; e (c) para infratores reincidentes, rescindir o acesso da pessoa aos Serviços. Se recebermos uma contranotificação dessa pessoa, poderemos enviar-lhe uma cópia da contranotificação, explicando que poderemos restaurar o material removido ou cancelar a respectiva desativação no prazo de 10 dias úteis. A menos que venha a ajuizar uma ação judicial contra nós ou contra a pessoa que publicou o conteúdo, iremos restaurar o acesso ao material removido no prazo de 10 a 14 dias úteis ou mais a contar da data do recebimento da notificação, a nosso critério.
12. RENÚNCIA DE GARANTIAS
12.1 A utilização que o Usuário fizer dos Serviços corre por sua conta e risco. Os Serviços, a WLD, o conteúdo e todos os outros PI são disponibilizados “TAL COMO ESTÃO” e “DE ACORDO COM A DISPONIBILIDADE” sem qualquer declaração ou garantia, seja expressa, implícita ou legal. Na medida máxima permitida pela legislação aplicável, renunciamos expressamente toda a responsabilidade por quaisquer garantias implícitas de titularidade, comercialização, adequação para um fim específico ou não violação no que diz respeito aos recursos, ao conteúdo ou a outros PIs contida nos Serviços. Algumas jurisdições não permitem a exclusão de garantias implícitas, pelo que as exclusões acima podem não se aplicar ao Usuário. Não subscrevemos, garantimos ou assumimos a responsabilidade por quaisquer anúncios, ofertas ou declarações feitas por terceiros, incluindo outros usuários, relativamente aos Serviços
.
12.2 Não fazemos quaisquer declarações ou garantias de que (a) o acesso à totalidade ou à parte dos Serviços será contínuo, ininterrupto, tempestivo, seguro ou isento de erros; (b) os Serviços ou o conteúdo serão exatos, completos, confiáveis ou atuais; (c) os Serviços estarão livres de vírus ou outros componentes prejudiciais; ou (d) os Serviços ou conteúdo irão corresponder aos requisitos, necessidades ou expetativas dos Usuários.
12.3 Além disso, não prestamos quaisquer declarações ou garantias relativamente à legalidade dos Serviços ou da WLD para qualquer situação de utilização, ou que os Serviços ou a WLD irão satisfazer quaisquer necessidades regulamentares ou de conformidade. O Usuário também é responsável por determinar e cumprir todas as restrições e requisitos legais e regulamentares que possam reger a sua utilização dos Serviços ou da WLD. Salvo no que diz respeito às declarações expressas enunciadas nestes Termos, o Usuário reconhece e concorda que não se apoiou em qualquer outra declaração ou entendimento, escrito ou oral, no que diz respeito ao seu acesso e utilização dos Serviços ou da WLD.
12.4 Não atuamos e não podemos atuar como seu consultor em relação a quaisquer assuntos financeiros, legais, de investimento ou fiscais. O conteúdo refere-se apenas ao período iniciado na data indicada. Quaisquer projeções, estimativas, previsões, objetivos
e/ou opiniões aqui expressos estão sujeitos a riscos, incertezas e pressupostos, e, por conseguinte, podem estar incorretos, podendo ser objeto de alterações sem aviso prévio. O Usuário não deve se basear em nenhum conteúdo
para qualquer tomada de decisão
.
Certas informações aqui contidas podem ter sido obtidas a partir de terceiros. Embora tenham sido obtidas de fontes consideradas fidedignas, não verificamos essas informações de modo independente e não fazemos declarações quanto a sua exatidão. Não somos uma corretora-distribuidora ou consultora de investimento registrada. Não fazemos declarações e declinamos expressamente de qualquer responsabilidade por todas as garantias, expressas, implícitas ou legais, relativamente à exatidão, pontualidade ou integralidade de qualquer material contido nos Serviços. O nosso conteúdo destina-se apenas a fins de informação geral, sendo o Usuário o único responsável por determinar se deve ou não utilizar os Serviços. O Usuário reconhece que negociar, usar e manter Tokens Digitais é inerentemente arriscado. O Usuário pode perder todos os fundos na sua carteira. O Usuário reconhece que o Serviço pode estar sujeito a restrições de exportação e sanções econômicas impostas pela lei dos EUA.
12.5 Não somos responsáveis perante o Usuário ou qualquer terceiro por qualquer modificação ou cessação dos Serviços, ou suspensão ou cancelamento do seu acesso aos Serviços.
13. LIMITAÇÃO
DE
RESPONSABILIDADE
13.1
Não excluímos nem limitamos a nossa responsabilidade para com o Usuário sempre que for ilegal fazê-lo. Em países onde os tipos de exclusões abaixo não são permitidos, somos responsáveis perante o Usuário apenas por perdas e danos que sejam um resultado razoavelmente previsível da nossa falha em aplicar cuidado e competências razoáveis ou da nossa violação do contrato celebrado com o Usuário. Este parágrafo não afeta os direitos do consumidor que não podem ser renunciados ou limitados por qualquer contrato ou acordo.
13.2
Na medida do permitido por lei, o Usuário concorda que em circunstância alguma nós ou qualquer do(a)s nosso(a)s diretores, conselheiros, funcionários, contratados, agentes, afiliadas ou subsidiárias (as “Partes TFH”) seremos responsáveis perante o Usuário por quaisquer danos indiretos, punitivos, incidentais, especiais, consequentes ou exemplares, incluindo danos por lucros cessantes, ágio, utilização, dados ou outra propriedade intangível, independentemente de essa responsabilidade ser fundada em ato ilícito ou de outra forma, e quer ou não as Partes TFH tenham sido informadas da possibilidade de tais danos decorrerem de ou no âmbito: (a) da sua utilização ou impossibilidade de utilizar os Serviços, seus Tokens Digitais ou a World Network; (b) da inacessibilidade ou cessação dos Serviços; (c) de qualquer pirataria informática, adulteração, acesso não autorizado ou alteração de qualquer transação ou dos seus Dados; (d) de qualquer transação ou acordo celebrado pelo Usuário com qualquer terceiro através dos Serviços; (e) de quaisquer atividades ou comunicações de terceiros; (f) das ações dos Operadores Or
b; (g) de qualquer perda de valor de quaisquer Tokens Digitais; (h) de qualquer Conteúdo de Terceiros acessado nos Serviços ou por meio deles; (i) de erros, lapsos ou imprecisões no nosso Conteúdo; (j) de danos corporais ou materiais de qualquer natureza que resultem de qualquer acesso ou utilização dos Serviços; (k) de vírus, cavalos de Troia, ou algo semelhante que possa ser transmitido aos Serviços ou por meio deles; ou (l) da conduta difamatória, ofensiva ou ilegal de qualquer terceiro. Na medida permitida pela legislação aplicável, esta limitação de responsabilidade aplica-se quer os danos decorram da utilização normal ou indevida, ou da confiança depositada na TFH ou nos Serviços, não obstante qualquer falha no objetivo essencial de qualquer solução
13.3 As Partes TFH
não serão, em circunstância alguma, responsáveis perante o Usuário por quaisquer reclamações diretas, processos, responsabilidades, obrigações, danos, perdas ou custos num montante superior a
R
$
5
00,00. Se estiver insatisfeito com os Serviços, o Usuário concorda que o seu único e exclusivo recurso será a descontinuação da sua utilização dos Serviços. Esta limitação da responsabilidade se aplicar na máxima medida permitida pela legislação aplicável.
13.4 Isenção e indenização
. O Usuário concorda em defender, indenizar e isentar as Partes TFH de e contra quaisquer reclamações, danos, custos, obrigações, honorários razoáveis de advogados e despesas apresentadas por qualquer terceiro contra uma Parte TFH, que decorram ou se relacionem com: (a) a sua utilização dos Serviços; (b) a sua violação destes Termos; (c) a sua violação de quaisquer direitos de outrem; (d) a sua conduta no âmbito dos Serviços; ou (e) a sua utilização do WLD, de quaisquer Tokens Digitais ou da rede Worldcoin. Algumas jurisdições impõem limites às indenizações pelo consumidor, pelo que algumas ou todas as disposições relativas a indemnizações previstas neste parágrafo podem não se aplicar ao seu caso. Se o Usuário for obrigado a indenizar qualquer das Partes TFH, reservamo-nos o direito, ao nosso exclusivo critério, de controlar qualquer ação ou processo e determinar se deve ou não chegar a acordo e em que termos.
SE FOR UM RESIDENTE DA CALIFÓRNIA, o Usuário renuncia aos benefícios e proteções do
California Civil Code
(
Código
Civil
da
Califórnia)
§
1542
, que prevê: “[uma] isenção geral não se estende às reivindicações que o credor ou a parte que isenta não conheça ou suspeite existir em seu favor no momento da assinatura da isenção e que, se fossem conhecidas por si, teriam afetado substancialmente o seu acordo com o devedor ou a parte isentada”.
14. Legislação aplicável
As leis do Estado da Califórnia se aplicarão a este Contrato e a quaisquer controvérsias decorrentes ou relacionados com este Contrato. A legislação aplicável indicada nesta seção será aplicada independentemente dos princípios de conflito de leis. O Usuário concorda também que o Serviço será considerado como estando exclusivamente sediado no Estado da Califórnia e que, apesar de os Serviços poderem estar disponíveis em outras jurisdições, a sua disponibilidade não dá origem a uma competência geral ou pessoal específica em qualquer foro fora do Estado da Califórnia.
15. RESOLUÇÃO DE CONTROVÉRSIAS, ARBITRAGEM E RENÚNCIA DE AÇÃO COLETIVA
15.1 LEIA ATENTAMENTE OS PARÁGRAFOS SEGUINTES. ESTES EXIGEM QUE O USUÁRIO RESOLVA AS CONTROVÉRSIAS CONOSCO POR MEIO DE ARBITRAGEM INDIVIDUAL PERANTE UM ÚNICO ÁRBITRO E NÃO COMO MEMBRO DE UMA AÇÃO A ARBITRAGEM IMPEDE QUE O USUÁRIO NOS PROCESSE PERANTE UM TRIBUNAL OU DE TER UM JULGAMENTO COM JÚRI, APESAR DE VOCÊ PODER AJUIZAR UMA CONTROVÉRSIA CONTRA NÓS EM TRIBUNAL DE PEQUENAS CAUSAS, CASO SE QUALIFIQUE PARA TAL.
15.2 Envidaremos os nossos melhores esforços para resolver quaisquer potenciais controvérsias por meio de negociações informais de boa-fé. Se surgir uma eventual controvérsia, o Usuário deve entrar em contato conosco enviando um
e-mail
para
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
o fim de podermos tentar resolver a questão sem recorrer à resolução formal de controvérsias. Se não conseguirmos chegar a uma resolução informal no prazo de 60 dias após o seu
e-mail
, e o Usuário optar por ingressar com uma ação judicial federal ou estadual e buscar a resolução de conflito formal baseada em contrato, ato ilícito, fraude, declaração falsa ou qualquer outra teoria legal; ou qualquer outro procedimento formal decorrente de, ou relacionado com, estes Termos, com o Conteúdo ou com os Serviços (individualmente “Controvérsia”), o Usuário concorda em resolver a Controvérsia por meio de arbitragem vinculativa, numa base individual, de acordo com os seguintes termos (conjuntamente, o “Acordo de Arbitragem”):
A arbitragem será conduzida de forma confidencial por um único árbitro
, em língua inglesa
. O árbitro aplicará os períodos de prescrição e toda a legislação aplicáveis e honrará os pedidos de sigilo reconhecidos pela legislação aplicável.
A controvérsia será resolvida exclusiva e definitivamente por arbitragem administrada pelo JAMS de acordo com as
JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules
(Regras de Arbitragem Simplificadas da JAMS), a menos que o montante agregado da Controvérsia seja U$250.000 ou mais, e nesse, caso, será aplicada a
JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules
(Regras de Arbitragem Abrangentes da JAMS). A arbitragem ocorrerá em São Francisco, Califórnia, salvo se o Usuário e nós acordarmos em realizá-la em outro local. O Usuário concorda que os tribunais federais e estaduais em São Francisco são o foro adequado para quaisquer recursos a uma sentença arbitral ou para processos judiciais no caso de a cláusula de arbitragem vinculativa deste Acordo ser considerada inaplicável.
Em qualquer arbitragem, independentemente da respetiva localização, as partes não procurarão obter documentos de prova uma da outra, e o árbitro não permitirá que as partes se envolvam na obtenção de documentos de prova; em vez disso, cada parte divulgará as provas que sustentam as suas posições em data e hora mutuamente acordadas antes da audiência final de arbitragem.
O presente Acordo de Arbitragem abrange a exequibilidade, a revogabilidade, o âmbito ou a validade do Acordo de Arbitragem ou de qualquer parte do Acordo de Arbitragem, bem como todos as outras Controvérsias que decorram de ou se relacionem com a interpretação ou aplicabilidade do Acordo de Arbitragem. Por conseguinte, todas essas questões serão decididas pelo árbitro e não por um tribunal ou juiz.
Se o árbitro da arbitragem impuser ao Usuário taxas de arquivamento ou outros custos administrativos, procederemos ao respectivo reembolso ao Usuário, mediante solicitação, na medida em que o valor dessas taxas ou custos exceda aquele que o Usuário teria de pagar se o processo fosse apresentado num tribunal. Pagaremos também taxas ou custos adicionais, se tal for exigido pelas regras do administrador da arbitragem ou pela legislação aplicável.
A pedido de qualquer uma das partes, todos os processos de arbitragem serão conduzidos sob o mais estrito sigilo e, nesse caso, todos os documentos, testemunhos e registos serão recebidos, ouvidos e mantidos em sigilo pelo árbitro, disponibilizados para inspeção apenas pelas partes, pelos respectivos advogados e peritos destes, por consultores ou testemunhas que tenham acordado, antecipadamente e por escrito, em receber todas essas informações a título confidencial, a fim de serem utilizadas exclusivamente para efeitos da arbitragem.
À exceção das ações e medidas de reparação de natureza coletiva discutidas neste Acordo de Arbitragem, o árbitro tem poderes para conceder qualquer medida de reparação que, de outra forma, estaria disponível em tribunal.
Qualquer pronunciamento relativamente à sentença proferida pelo árbitro poderá ser apresentado em qualquer tribunal de jurisdição competente.
Se o requisito de arbitragem ou a proibição de ações coletivas e outras Controvérsias apresentadas em nome de terceiros contidos neste Acordo de Arbitragem for considerado inexequível, apenas as disposições inexequíveis serão consideradas como tendo sido removidas destes Termos, mantendo-se em vigor e a produzir efeitos todas as restantes obrigações previstas nestes Termos.
15.3 Direito a um prazo de 30 dias para autoexclusão
. O Usuário tem o direito de optar por não ficar vinculado a este Acordo de Arbitragem, bastando para isso enviar um
e-mail
para
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com,
a partir do endereço que utilizou para configurar o seu aplicativo, indicando, na linha de assunto: “OPÇÃO DE RENÚNCIA A ARBITRAGEM E AÇÕES COLETIVAS”. O Usuário deve enviar o seu
e-mail
no prazo de 30 dias a contar da data em que aceitou estes Termos, caso contrário o Usuário será obrigado a arbitrar Controvérsias de acordo com os termos deste Acordo de Arbitragem. Se optar por não participar neste Acordo de Arbitragem, também não ficaremos vinculados pelo Acordo de Arbitragem.
15.4 Alterações a este Acordo de Arbitragem
. O Usuário receberá um aviso com 30 dias de antecedência sobre quaisquer alterações à seção destes Termos intitulada
“Resolução de Controvérsias, Arbitragem e Renúncia de Ação Coletiva”
por notificação ao Usuário, e as alterações entrarão em vigor 30 dias após o Usuário receber a notificação da nossa parte. As alterações previstas na seção
Resolução de Controvérsias, Arbitragem e Renúncia a Ação Coletiva
serão aplicadas apenas relativamente a Controvérsias que surjam após o 30º Se um tribunal ou árbitro decidir que as alterações a esta seção não são exequíveis ou válidas, as alterações serão excluídas destes Termos e o tribunal ou o árbitro aplicará os termos do primeiro Acordo de Arbitragem em vigor à data em que o Usuário começou a utilizar os Serviços. O Usuário pode exercer o seu direito de autoexclusão dos novos termos do Acordo de Arbitragem seguindo os procedimentos previstos na seção acima intitulada “Direito de 30 dias de prazo para autoexclusão”.
Este Acordo de Arbitragem continuará a vigorar após a cessação destes Termos e da sua utilização dos Serviços.
Sem prejuízo de qualquer disposição em contrário no presente Acordo de Arbitragem, qualquer uma das partes poderá ajuizar uma ação judicial exclusivamente a título de medida cautelar com vista a impedir a utilização não autorizada ou abusiva dos Serviços, ou a violação de direitos de propriedade intelectual (por exemplo, direitos de marca registrada, segredo comercial, direitos de
copyright
,
de patente
ou qualquer outro vinculado à propriedade intelectual
) sem primeiro recorrer à arbitragem ou ao processo informal de resolução de controvérsias acima descrito.
16. Disposições gerais
16.1 Sem renúncia; Indivisibilidade das Disposições; Não cessão
. O fato de não aplicarmos uma disposição não constitui uma renúncia ao nosso direito de o fazer mais tarde. Se uma disposição for considerada inexequível, as restantes disposições destes Termos permanecerão em pleno vigor e será substituída por um termo exequível que reflita a nossa intenção da forma mais próxima possível, na medida do permitido pela lei aplicável. O Usuário não pode ceder a qualquer um dos seus direitos ao abrigo destes Termos e qualquer tentativa de o fazer será nula. Poderemos ceder os nossos direitos a qualquer uma das nossas afiliadas ou subsidiárias, ou a qualquer sub-rogatório dos interesses de qualquer empresa associada aos Serviços.
16.2 Acordo integral
. Estes Termos constituem a declaração completa e exclusiva do acordo celebrado entre o Usuário e nós no que diz respeito aos Serviços e substituem todos os entendimentos, acordos, declarações e garantias anteriores e atuais, tanto escritos como verbais, relativamente aos Serviços. Os títulos das secções destes Termos destinam-se apenas para fins de conveniência e não regem o significado ou a interpretação de qualquer disposição.
16.3 Validade
. Todas as disposições destes Termos relativas à suspensão ou cessação, dívidas à TFH, utilização geral dos Serviços, Controvérsias com a TFH, assim como as disposições que, pela sua natureza, se estendem para além do termo ou cessação destes Termos, permanecem em vigor após a cessação ou termo destes Termos
não estarem mais vigentes
.
16.4 Relação entre as partes
. Nenhuma disposição nos presentes Termos pretende ou deve ser entendida, ou levará a que o Usuário e a TFH sejam tratados como parceiros,
joint-venturers
ou associados comuns com fins lucrativos, e nem o Usuário nem a TFH serão tratados como o agente do outro. Isto inclui o fato de que nada nestes Termos estabelece ou se destina a estabelecer qualquer relação laboral entre o Usuário e a TFH.
16.5 Ausência de Consultoria Profissional ou Deveres Fiduciários
. Todo o Conteúdo fornecido por nós destina-se apenas a fins informativos e não deve ser interpretado como consultoria
Todo o Conteúdo fornecido por nós destina-se apenas a fins informativos e não deve ser interpretado como aconselhamento profissional ou de qualquer outra espécie
O Usuário não deve tomar, ou deve abster-se de tomar, qualquer medida com base em qualquer informação contida nos Serviços. Antes de tomar quaisquer decisões financeiras, legais ou de outro tipo que envolvam os Serviços ou quaisquer Tokens Digitais, o Usuário deve procurar consultoria profissional independente de alguém credenciado e qualificado na área para a qual tal consultoria seria apropriado. Estes Termos não se destinam a criar ou impor quaisquer deveres fiduciários para conosco. Na medida do máximo permitido por Lei, o Usuário reconhece e concorda que não temos quaisquer obrigações ou responsabilidades fiduciárias para consigo ou qualquer outra parte, e que, na medida em que esses deveres ou responsabilidades existam por lei ou em equidade, rejeitamos, renunciamos e suprimimos, irrevogavelmente, esses deveres e responsabilidades. O Usuário concorda também que os únicos deveres e obrigações que temos com o Usuário são os definidos expressamente nestes Termos.
16.6 Alteração de Controle
. No caso de sermos adquiridos ou fundidos com uma entidade terceira, ou de atribuirmos determinadas funções a uma entidade afiliada ou sucessora ou a outra entidade que determinemos ser do melhor interesse dos Usuários, nos reservamos o direito, em qualquer uma destas circunstâncias, de transferir ou atribuir os Dados que recolhemos do Usuário como parte dessa fusão, aquisição, venda ou outra mudança de controle, de acordo com a legislação aplicável.
16.7 Força maior
. Não seremos responsáveis por atrasos, falhas de desempenho ou interrupção do serviço que resultem direta ou indiretamente de volatilidade significativa do mercado dos Tokens Digitais, qualquer ato fortuito, atos de autoridades civis ou militares, atos de terroristas, perturbações da ordem pública, guerras, greves, emergências sanitárias, disputas laborais, incêndios, interrupção nos serviços de telecomunicações ou de Internet ou de serviços de fornecedores de rede, falha de equipamentos ou
software
ou qualquer causa ou condição fora do nosso controle razoável (individualmente, “Evento de Força Maior”). A ocorrência de um Evento de Força Maior não afetará a validade e aplicabilidade de qualquer uma das restantes disposições destes Termos.
16.8 Lojas de Aplicativos
. Sempre que baixar nossos Aplicativos a partir de qualquer loja de aplicativos ou plataforma de distribuição que não a Apple App Store, incluindo a Google Play Store (a “Plataforma de Distribuição”), o Usuário concorda que:
os Termos são celebrados entre nós e o Usuário, e não com o fornecedor da Plataforma de Distribuição (“Fornecedor da Loja”); a sua utilização dos aplicativos deve cumprir os Termos de Serviço da Plataforma de Distribuição em vigor à data do Fornecedor da Loja; o Fornecedor da Loja é apenas um fornecedor da Plataforma de Distribuição onde o Usuário obteve os Aplicativos;
Somos nós, e não o Fornecedor da Loja, os únicos responsáveis pelos Aplicativos;
o Fornecedor da Loja não tem qualquer obrigação ou responsabilidade perante o Usuário no que diz respeito aos Aplicativos ou a esses Termos; e
o Usuário reconhece e concorda que o Fornecedor da Loja é um terceiro beneficiário desses Termos no que diz respeito aos Aplicativos.
16.9 Apple App Store
. Esta seção aplica-se sempre que os Aplicativos tenham sido adquiridos na Apple App O Usuário reconhece e concorda que os Termos são celebrados unicamente entre o Usuário e nós, e não com a Apple, Inc. (“Apple”) e que a Apple não tem qualquer responsabilidade pelos Aplicativos ou pelo conteúdo neles inserido. A utilização que o Usuário fizer dos Aplicativos deve cumprir os Termos de Serviço da Loja de Aplicativos.
O Usuário reconhece que a Apple não tem qualquer obrigação de fornecer quaisquer serviços de manutenção e suporte técnico no que diz respeito aos Aplicativos. Em caso de não conformidade dos Aplicativos com qualquer garantia aplicável, o Usuário poderá notificar a Apple, a qual (se for o caso) procederá ao reembolso do preço de compra dos Aplicativos. Na medida máxima permitida pela lei aplicável, a Apple não terá qualquer outra obrigação de garantia relativamente aos Aplicativos e quaisquer outras reclamações, perdas, obrigações, danos, custos ou despesas atribuíveis ao incumprimento de qualquer garantia serão regidos exclusivamente pelos Termos e por qualquer lei que nos seja aplicável, enquanto fornecedores dos Aplicativos.
O Usuário reconhece que a Apple não é responsável por dar resposta a quaisquer reclamações de sua parte ou de terceiros estar relacionadas com os Aplicativos ou com a sua posse e/ou utilização dos Aplicativos, incluindo, entre outros: (i) reclamações de responsabilidade pelo produto; (ii) qualquer reclamação de que os Aplicativos não cumprem qualquer requisito legal ou regulamentar aplicável; e (iii) reclamações decorrentes da legislação de defesa do consumidor ou de legislação semelhante; e que todas essas reclamações são regidas exclusivamente pelos Termos e por qualquer lei que se aplique a nós, na qualidade de fornecedores do
software
.
O Usuário reconhece que, na eventualidade de qualquer reclamação, por parte terceiros, de que os Aplicativos ou a sua posse e utilização desses Aplicativos infringem os direitos de propriedade intelectual de terceiros, a TFH, e não a Apple, será a única responsável pela investigação, defesa, resolução e encerramento de qualquer reclamação por violação de propriedade intelectual na medida exigida pelos Termos.
O Usuário declara e garante que (i) não está localizado num país sujeito a embargo imposto pelo Governo dos EUA ou que tenha sido designado pelo Governo dos EUA como um país “apoiante do terrorismo”; e (ii) não consta de qualquer lista de pessoas proibidas ou sujeitas a restrições, do Governo dos EUA.
O Usuário e a TFH reconhecem e concordam que a Apple e as subsidiárias da Apple são terceiros beneficiários dos Termos de Serviço no que se refere à sua licença de utilização dos Aplicativos e que, após a sua aceitação dos termos e condições dos Termos de Serviço, a Apple terá o direito (e irá considerar que aceitou o direito) de fazer aplicar contra o Usuário, como terceiro beneficiário, os Termos de Serviço relativos à sua licença de utilização dos Aplicativos.
TFHUSERTOS20241112 - OT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Sheria na Masharti ya Mtumiaji ya Tools For Humanity
Karibu kwenye Programu ya World! Sheria hizi baina yako na Tools for Humanity Corporation, kampuni ya Delaware ("TFH", au “sisi”) zinatawala matumizi yako na ufikiaji wako wa tovuti na programu zetu, ikijumuisha Programu ya World na Programu ya Operator (kwa pamoja, “Programu”), na utendaji, maudhui, na huduma zote husika tunazokupatia (kwa pamoja, "Huduma" au “Huduma Zetu”) kuhusiana na World Network (“World Network”) na mfumo mzima.
Tafadhali soma Sheria hizi kwa uangalifu kabla ya kutumia na kufikia Huduma. Kwa kufikia na kutumia Huduma zozote tunazotoa, pamoja na idhini yako ya Sheria hizi, moja kwa moja unakubali kuwa chini ya Sheria hizi na chini ya Ilani yetu ya Faragha, ambayo imejumuishwa kama sehemu ya Sheria hizi.  Tafadhali kumbuka sehemu hizi muhimu za Sheria hizi:
Unakubali kusuluhisha migogoro yoyote baina yako na TFH kupitia mchakato wa usuluhishaji badala ya mahakamani. Ikiwa unaishi Korea Kusini, badala yake unaweza kuchagua kusuluhisha mgogoro katika mahakama yenye ustadi nchini humo. Tafadhali pitia Sehemu ya 15 hapa chini ili kupata maelezo.
Bidhaa za Crypto, ikijumuisha Sarafu za Kidijitali, hazijawekewa sheria na zinaweza kuwa hatari sana. Kunaweza kosa suluhu ya kisheria kwa hasara zozote zinazotokana na miamala hiyo.
Hakuna kitu chochote katika Huduma kinaashiria ofa ya kuuza, au ushawishi wa ofa ya kununua, hisa au Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali. Huduma hazijumuishi ushauri wa uwekezaji. Kumiliki, kununua, au kuuza Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali (kama ilivyobainishwa katika Sehemu ya 2.1 hapa chini) huenda ikawa haijaruhusiwa mahali unakoishi, na ni wajibu wako kuambatana na sheria zote husika. Tafadhali zingatia kama utanunua, kuuza, kutumia, au kumiliki Sarafu za Kidijitali ni mwafaka kwako katika hali yako ya kifedha na uelewa wako wa Sarafu za Kidijitali. Thamani ya Sarafu za Kidijitali huenda ikabadilika kwa haraka na huenda zikapoteza thamani yake yote.
Aidha, sarafu za WLD (“WLD”) hazikusudiwi kupatikana ili kutumiwa, kununuliwa, au kufikiwa na watu wa Marekani, ikijumuisha raia wa Marekani, wakaazi au watu walio nchini Marekani, au kampuni zilizosajiliwa, zilizoko, au makao yake ni Marekani, au walio na maajenti waliosajiliwa nchini Marekani. Hatufanyi WLD kupatikana kwa watu hao wa Marekani. Zaidi ya hayo, unakubali kwamba hautawauzia, kuwatumia au kuwasaidia watu wa Marekani kupata WLD. Maelezo zaidi kuhusu hatari zinazohusishwa na WLD yanaweza kupatikana hapa.
1. Wigo wa Sheria
1.1 Faragha na Data Zako
. Unapotumia Programu, unaweza kutupatia kategoria za maelezo ya kibinafsi, kama vile jina lako au nambari ya simu. Ukitupatia maelezo ya kuthibitisha wewe ni mtu binafsi na udai sarafu zako za WLD, basi unaweza kupatiana kategoria maalum za data nyeti za kibinafsi, kama vile maelezo yako ya bayometriki. Ilani yetu ya Faragha inaelezea data tunazokusanya kutoka kwako na jinsi tuanvyozitumia. Tafadhali usitumie Huduma ikiwa hautaki tukusanye au kutumia data zako kwa njia ambayo imeelezewa katika Ilani ya Faragha.
1.2 Ustahiki.
Kurasa za wavuti zinazoelezea huduma zetu zinaweza kufikika kote ulimwenguni, lakini hii haimaanishi kwamba Huduma zote au vipengele vyote vya huduma ni halali au zinapatikana nchini mwako. Hauwezi kutumia zana za VPN au zana sawa na hizo ili kuepuka vikwazo vyovyote. Ni wajibu wako kuhakikisha kwamba matumizi yako ya Huduma zetu ni halali mahali ambako unazitumia. Huduma Zetu hazipatikani kwa lugha zote. Huduma zetu ni halali mahali ambako unazitumia. Huduma Zetu hazipatikani kwa lugha zote. Ili kutumia Huduma, ni lazima uambatane na Sheria hizi pamoja na sheria zote husika. Hauwezi kutumia Huduma Zetu kuendesha, kukuza, au kuwasaidia wengine kufanya shughuli zozote haramu au zisizo za kisheria.
Aidha, ni lazima utimize vigezo vyote vifuatavyo:
Una umri wa miaka 18 au zaidi; na
Haupo
katika, chini ya udhibiti wa, si raia, au si mkaazi wa: Syria, maeneo ya Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson na Zaporizhzhia ya Ukraine, Russia, North Korea, Iran, Cuba, au nchi nyingine yoyote au eneo lolote ambalo limezuiwa kufikia huduma na Marekani, Umoja wa Ulaya, au nchi au mamlaka nyingine yoyote;
Wewe si “Raia Mteule Maalum” kama ilivyotangazwa na Ofisi ya Kudhibiti Mali ya Kigeni (Office of Foreign Assets Control, “OFAC”) ya Idara ya Hazina ya Marekani au orodha ya vikwazo ya nchi nyingine yoyote, na jina lako lisiwe kwenye Orodha ya Watu Wanaokatazwa ya Idara ya Biashara ya Marekani au orodha za watu waliopigwa marufuku ya nchini nyingine yoyote.
Ikiwa hautimizi vigezo hivi vyote, hauruhusiwi kufikia wala kutumia Huduma, na, ifaavyo, huenda tukazuia uwezo wako wa kufikia au kutumia Huduma.
Aidha, ikiwa uko nchini Ujerumani au makazi yako ya kawaida au ofisi yako rasmi iko nchini humo, hauruhusiwi kufikia wala kutumia huduma za wahusika wengine ilivyofafanuliwa katika Sehemu ya 2.5 au programu bila mamlaka kuu ilivyofafanuliwa katika Sehemu ya 2.8. Vipengele hivi havipatikani kwako.
1.3 Upatikanaji
. Kurasa za wavuti zinazoelezea Huduma zinaweza kufikika kote ulimwenguni, lakini hii haimaanishi kwamba Huduma zote au vipengele vyote vya Huduma ni halali au zinapatikana nchini mwako. Ufikiaji Huduma fulani (au vipengele fulani vya Huduma) katika nchi fulani huenda ukazuiliwa nasi au na serikali. Hauwezi kutumia zana za VPN au zana sawa na hizo ili kuepuka vikwazo vyovyote. Ufikiaji Programu, na vipengele fulani ndani ya Programu, huenda ukakosekana au ukawekewa vikwazo, kulingana na eneo lako.
Ni wajibu wako kuhakikisha kwamba matumizi yako ya Huduma ni halali mahali ambako unazitumia
. Huduma hazipatikani kwa lugha zote.
1.4 Masasisho
. Mara kwa mara tunaweza kufanya mabadiliko kwenye Sheria hizi. Tukifanmya hivi, tutaweka sheria zilizosasishwa kwenye Huduma na ambapo inahitajika na sheria husika tutakuarifu kabla ya kufanya mabadiliko yoyote na ambapo mabadiliko hayo huenda yakawa makubwa au yanayokuathiri vibaya, tutakupa ilani ya ziada ya mapema ikiwa inahitajika na sheria husika. Unaelewa na kukubaliana kwamba matumizi yako endelevu ya Huduma baada ya sisi kufanya mabadiliko yoyote kama hayo na ambapo haujakataa mabadiliko hayo inaonyesha kwamba unakubali Sheria zilizosasishwa. Unaweza kuacha kutumia Huduma wakati wowote ikiwa haukubaliani na Sheria hizi. Kwa sababu Huduma zinabadilika kadri muda unavyosonga huenda tukabadilisha au tukasitisha sehemu ya Huduma au Huduma zote, wakati wowote na bila ilani, kwa hiari yetu pekee, kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika.
1.5 Sheria za Ziada.
Sheria na masharti ya ziada huenda yakatumika kwa matumizi, maudhui, vipengele, au sehemu maalum za Huduma, na sheria na masharti hayo yote ya ziada tutakayokupatia yatakuwa sehemu ya Sheria hizi.
2. Huduma
2.1 Pochi la Bila Umiliki.
Programu ya World inajumuisha pochi la bila umiliki la kuhifadhia sarafu za kidijitali zinazoruhusiwa au mali ya kidijitali (ikijumuisha WLD na kwa pamoja, “Sarafu za Kidijitali”). Unadhibiti Sarafu za Kidijitali zilizo ndani ya pochi lako. Unapotumia Programu ya World, funguo za kibinafsi (ambazo ni manenosiri ya kufikia Sarafu hizo za Kidijitali) zinahifadhiwa moja kwa moja kwenye kifaa chako. Wakati wowote, kulingana na uwepo wa intaneti na msongamano kwenye blockchain, unaweza kutoa Sarafu zako za Kidijitali kwa kuzituma kwenye anwani tofauti ya blockchain. Unapohifadhi Sarafu zako za Kidijitali ndani ya pochi lako hatuna udhibiti juu ya pochi lako, Sarafu zako za Kidijitali, au funguo za kibinafsi. Watumiaji wanawajibikia hasara ya kupoteza funguo zao za kibinafsi na TFH wala Programu ya World haziwezi kurejesha funguo hizo.
Kwa sababu Programu ya World ni pochi liliso na umiliki, utapatiwa anwani ya pochi ambayo inabainisha ni wapi Sarafu zako za Kidijitali zimehifadhiwa kwenye blockchain husika. Hatuna uwezo wa kufikia Sarafu zako za Kidijitali.
2.2 Sarafu za Kidijitali Zinazoruhusiwa.
Programu ya World inaruhusu sarafu fulani za ERC-20. Tunaweza kuruhusu Sarafu za Kidijitali za ziada katika siku zijazo. Programu ya World inaonyehsa Sarafu za Kidijitali zinazoruhusiwa.
Hakikisha kukagua ni sarafu na mitandao gani inaruhusiwa ndani ya Programu ya World kabla ya kuweka na kutoa Sarafu zako za Kidijitali. Ukituma sarafu zisizoruhusiwa kwenye anwani ya pochi isiyo sahihi hatuna uwezo wa kurejesha Sarafu zako za Kidijitali.
Unaelewa kwamba kutuma Sarafu za Kidijitali zisizoruhusiwa kwenye anwani ya pochi la Programu ya World kunaweza kumaanisha utapoteza kabisa uwezo wa kufikia Sarafu hizo za Kidijitali. Hatuna njia ya kufikia Sarafu za Kidijitali. Tafadhali hakikisha unatuma Sarafu sahihi za Kidijitali kwa anwani sahihi ya pochi nyakati zote. Unaweza kufanya muamala wa majaribio ukitumia kiwango kidogo cha Sarafu za Kidijitali.
2.3 Utoaji na Ufikiaji.
Unapotangamana na Sarafu zako za Kidijitali - kama vile kuzituma hadi kwenye anwani nyingine ya pochi au kuunganisha na programu iliyotolewa - ukitumia Huduma, utahitajika kuidhinisha au “kutia sahihi” utangamano huo kupitia vifaa ambavyo umetambulisha wakati wa mchakato wa usajili. Programu zinategemea kikamilifu idhini zako kwenye vifaa hizi ili kuanzisha utangamano na blockchain husika. Unaelewa kwamba unatangamana moja kwa moja na blockchain husika unapofanya utangamano huu na kwamba hatuwajibikii uwasilishaji oda kwa niaba yako.
2.4 Maelezo kuhusu Wahusika Wengine.
Kwa kutumia Huduma huenda ukafikia maelezo kuhusiana na Sarafu zako za Kidijitali, kama vile, lakini sio tu, thamani yake ya sasa sokoni. Uwasilisho wa maelezo haya hakuashirii ushirikiano au uungaji mkono wowote wa wahusika wengine, hata ikiwa utendaji fulani unaotolewa kuhusiana na Huduma unahitaji matumizi ya bidhaa hizo za wahusika wengine. Maudhui ya huduma na bidhaa hizo za wahusika wengine kama ilivyotajwa kupitia Huduma yanategemea maelezo yaliyowekwa hadharani au na wahusika hao wengine kwetu, na kwa hivyo hatutoa uwakilisho au kutoa hakikisho kuhusu usahihi wa maelezo yanayohusiana na huduma au bidhaa za wahusika wengine.
2.5 Huduma za Wahusika Wengine
Watumiaji wanaoishi nchini Ujerumani au makazi yao ya kawaida au ofisi yao rasmi iko nchini humo, hawawezi kutumia Huduma za Wahusika Wengine ili kuuza au kubadilishana Sarafu zao za Kidijitali chini ya Sehemu hii.
Zinakopatikana, Huduma zinaweza kukupa viungo elekezi vya vichakataji vya wahusika wengine ili kuchakata miamala kama vile ununuzi wa Sarafu za Kidijitali kwa kutumia pesa za kawaida, uuzaji Sarafu za Kidijitali, ubadilishanaji Sarafu za Kidijitali, na utendaji mwingine ambao unaweza kuwepo katika siku zijazo. Unaweza kuona ni huduma gani za wahusika wengine zinapatikana ndani ya Programu ya World. Unapofanya miamala hii, unafanya miamala na wahusika wengine na si sisi. Ni lazima ufuate maagizo husika yanayotokewa mtoa huduma mwingine na ukubali sheria zao za huduma. Hatuchukui udhibiti wala kutuma fedha zako au Sarafu za Kidijitali wakati wowote tunapotoa Huduma zetu, au wakati unatumia huduma za wahusika wengine.
2.6 Miamala ya Mtu-kwa-Mtu.
Huduma zinatoa jukwaa la mawasiliano kwa ambalo unaweza kutuma, kuomba, kupokea, na kuhifadhi Sarafu za Kidijitali zinazoruhusiwa kutoka kwenye, mapochi mengine ya blockchain, iwe unayadhibiti au ni ya wahusika wengine. Utumaji wako wa Sarafu za Kidijitali zinazoruhusiwa kati ya anwani nyingine zako za blockchain na hadi na kutoka kwa wahusika wengine ni utumaji. Mtu anayeanzisha muamala huo anawajibikia pekee yake utekelezaji muamala kwa nija inavyofaa, inayojumuisha, miongoni mwa mambo mengine, malipo ya ada tosha za mtandao au wathibitishaji ili muamala kufaulu. Ada za mtandao zisizotosha zinaweza kusababisha utumaji kusalia katika hali ya bila kukamilika (pending) na kunaweza kusababisha kuchelewa au hasara kutokea kwa ajili ya hitilafu katika kuanzisha muamala. Hatuna jukumu la kusaidia katika usuluhishaji miamala hiyo. Unapotuma Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali kutoka kwa pochi lako hadi pochi nyingine la blockchain, utumaji huo unautekeleza ndani ya blockchain na hatuna udhibiti. Unapaswa kuthibitisha maelezo yote ya muamala kabla ya kuyawasilisha. Hatuchukui dhima au wajibu endapo utaweka anwani pokezi isiyo sahihi ya blockchain. Utumaji Sarafu za Kidijitali hauwezi kughairiwa baada ya kuwasilishwa kwenye mtandao wa blockchain husika, ingawa huenda ikawa katika hali ya kusubiri, na kuchakatwa ifaavyo, huku miamala ikichakatwa na waendeshaji mtandao. Hatudhibiti mtandao na hatutoi hakikisho kwamba utumaji utathibitishwa na mtandao.
2.7 Vault
2.7.1 Taarifa za Jumla
. Programu ya World hutoa njia ya kufikia "vault" bila mamlaka kuu ya Sarafu zako za Kidijitali ("Vault"). Matumizi yako ya Vault yanajumuisha kutambua kwako na kukubali sheria na masharti yanayosimamia Vault, pamoja na masharti yoyote ya ziada yaliyotolewa na wahusika wengine ambao wametengeneza au kutoa vipengele vinavyohusiana au vinavyotokana na matumizi yako ya Vault.
Vault inatumia Sarafu fulani za Kidijitali pekee. Sarafu hizi za Kidijitali hazistahili kuwa Sarafu Zinazochukuliwa kama Mali au Sarafu za E-Money, kwa masharti yaliyowekwa na Kanuni ya (EU) 2023/1114 ya Bunge la Ulaya na Baraza la tarehe 31 Mei 2023 kwenye masoko ya mali ya crypto. Sarafu za Kidijitali zinatumika zitaonyeshwa katika World App unapoingia kwenye Hazina yako. Sarafu za Kidijitali zinazotumika na Vault zinaweza kubadilika mara kwa mara, na hakuna hakikisho kwamba Sarafu za Kidijitali zinazotumika zitaendelea kupatikana kwa matumizi katika Vault.
Vault hutolewa kwa uhusiano na mikataba ya wahusika wengine mahiri. Hakuna mtu mwingine au shirika, kando na wewe, lililo na uwezo wa kuingiliana na Vault yako au Sarafu za Kidijitali ndani ya Vault yako. TFH wala mhusika mwingine hawana funguo za usimamizi au ufikiaji (fursa au vinginevyo) kwa Vault yako au mikataba mahiri husika. Kuweka Amana kwenye, au kutoa kutoka kwa, Hifadhi ya Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali za akaunti yako kunaweza tu kutokea ikiwa shughuli kama hiyo imetiwa sahihi kwa ufunguo wako wa faragha unaolingana uliofafanuliwa katika Sehemu ya 2.1 ya Sheria na Masharti haya. Hii ina maana kwamba ukipoteza ufikio au udhibiti wa ufunguo wako wa faragha, hutaweza kuweka amana au kutoa Sarafu za Kidijitali zozote kutoka kwa Vault na hakuna mhusika mwingine atakayeweza kukusaidia au kufanya hivyo kwa niaba yako kwenye kifaa chako. Ipasavyo, matumizi ya Vault hayatoi, na hayawezi, kukupa ulinzi wowote, dhamana, au huduma za uhamisho na TFH au mtu mwingine yeyote kuhusiana na Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali unazoweza kuzifunga kwa kutumia Vault kwenye akaunti yako.
Mkataba mahiri unaosimamia utendakazi wa Vault kwa sarafu za WLD unaweza kutazamwa kwa kutumia blockchain hapa. Kwa ajili ya uwazi, matumizi ya vipengele hivi na vingine vyovyote vinavyohusiana na Vault yako chini ya Kanusho lilelile la Dhima lililo katika Sehemu ya 12 ya Masharti haya.
2.7.2 Utendaji wa Vault
. Vault kwa sasa inatoa vipengele vifuatavyo, ambavyo vinaweza kubadilishwa, kuondolewa au kuongezwa na TFH au wahusika wengine:  Kufunga, Mazao, Kipindi cha Uondoaji na Usalama, Ruzuku kwenye Vault.
2.7.3 Kufunga
. Kwa kutumia Vault, unakubali kufunga Sarafu zako za Kidijitali kwa muda uliowekwa. Kufunga Sarafu za Kidijitali kwa kutumia Vault yako kutahamisha Sarafu hizo za Kidijitali kutoka kwa mkoba wako usio na dhamana hadi kwenye kandarasi mahiri iliyogatuliwa. Baada ya kuhamishwa, Sarafu hizi za Kidijitali "zitafungwa" kwenye vault, wakati ambapo inajumuisha kipindi ambacho zinasalia kuhifadhiwa kwenye Vault pamoja na muda ulioamuliwa mapema unaoitwa "Kipindi cha Usalama," ambacho kimefafanuliwa kwa undani zaidi hapa chini. Ingawa Sarafu zako za Kidijitali zimefungwa, hutaweza kufikia, kuhamisha au kufanya muamala mwingine wowote ukizitumia hadi utakapoomba kuziondoa na kuruhusu Kipindi kinachotumika cha Usalama kupita. Hakuna yeyote, ikiwemo TFH au Mtoa Huduma mwingine, aliye na uwezo wa kufungua, kuhifadhi, kudhibiti, kutoa au kuhamisha Sarafu zako za Kidijitali zilizofungwa. Kuweka Sarafu zako za Kidijitali kwenye Vault na kuziwekea vikwazo vya kufunga na kuziondoa hakujumuishi mauzo, mkopo, au uhamisho wa haki zozote, hatimiliki au riba katika Sarafu za Kidijitali kwa TFH au mtu mwingine yeyote.
Kufunga Sarafu zako za Kidijitali kwenye Vault hakukuhakikishii ulinzi au ulinzi wa Sarafu zako za Kidijitali. Hakuna mpango wa bima ya amana, au ulinzi wowote kama huo, unaotumika kwa Sarafu zako za Kidijitali, na thamani na/au matumizi ya Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali ulizofunga zinaweza kuongezeka au kupungua katika muda wote wa Kipindi cha Usalama. Hii inamaanisha kuwa thamani au matumizi ya Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali utakazofungia kwenye Vault yako zinaweza kupungua, au kwenda hadi sifuri katika Kipindi cha Usalama. Unakubali na kukubali kwamba uondoaji wowote wa Sarafu za Kidijitali kwenye akaunti yako baada ya Kipindi kinachotumika cha Usalama kunaweza kusababisha kurejeshwa kwa Sarafu za Kidijitali ambazo zina thamani ya chini, au zisizo na thamani, kuliko zilivyokuwa wakati ukizifunga kwenye Vault yako, na. kwamba TFH au wahusika wengine watabeba hatari au wajibu wa kupunguzwa kwa thamani yoyote ambayo inaweza kutokea.
2.7.4 Mazao
. Unaweza pia kustahiki kuzalisha kile, kwa madhumuni ya bidhaa hii, kinajulikana kama "mazao" kwenye Sarafu fulani za Kidijitali kwenye Vault yako. Mazao haya, ambayo yanaweza kuchukua muundo wa Sarafu za ziada za Kidijitali, hutolewa na mtu mwingine kupitia mfululizo tofauti wa utendakazi mahiri wa mikataba ambayo unaweza kufikia kwa kutumia kiolesura kilichotolewa ndani ya World App. Hakuna TFH wala mtu mwingine yeyote anayetumia, kuchukua udhibiti, kupokea amana yoyote kwa, au kutupilia mbali Sarafu zako za Kidijitali. Kwa hivyo, mazao si riba ambayo inahusishwa au kuzalishwa na kitu chochote isipokuwa kufunga Sarafu zako za Kidijitali kulingana na sheria na masharti yaliyotolewa. Mazao yoyote ambayo unaweza kupokea yametolewa kwako kama ruzuku na mtu mwingine kulingana na maamuzi yako ya kuhifadhi Sarafu za Kidijitali kwa kutumia Vault. Vigezo vinavyobainisha uzalishaji wa mazao, ikijumuisha kiasi kinachozalishwa au muda ambao yanaweza kuongezeka, vinaweza kubadilishwa au kughairiwa wakati wowote, kwa hiari ya Mtoa Huduma mwingine.
Kunaweza kuwa na kiwango cha juu cha mazao unachoweza kupata. Maelezo haya yataonyeshwa kando ya Vault yako na kupitia sheria na masharti yoyote ya ziada yaliyotolewa na mtu mwingine (anayetambuliwa kama "Mtoa huduma" ndani ya World App) anayetoa mazao. Masharti haya ya ziada pia yamejumuishwa katika Masharti haya. Mazao hayatolewi au kuhudumiwa na TFH.
Mazao yoyote yatakayopatikana yatasambazwa kwako tu baada ya kukamilika kwa uondoaji kwa Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali zinazozalisha mazao kutoka kwa Vault, ambayo hutokea tu baada ya Kipindi chochote cha Usalama kinachotumika kuisha. Uondoaji huu ni sharti la mwisho la ruzuku yoyote ya mazao, kumaanisha kuwa huna haki, hatimiliki au riba katika mazao yoyote ambayo yamezalisha au yatakayotolewa isipokuwa na hadi wakati ambapo mazao yamepokelewa katika mkoba wako usio na dhamana. Hii pia inamaanisha kuwa ukipoteza ufikio au udhibiti wa ufunguo wako wa faragha, hutaweza kutoa pesa zozote ambazo zitakupa haki ya kupokea mazao.
2.7.5 Kipindi cha Uondoaji na Usalama
. Unaweza kuanzisha uondoaji wa Sarafu zako za Kidijitali kutoka kwa Vault yako wakati wowote. Sarafu za Kidijitali ambazo umeomba kuondoa kwenye Vault yako zitarejeshwa kwako baada ya muda uliowekwa awali unaoitwa "Kipindi cha Usalama" kupita. Kila wakati unapoanzisha uondoaji wa Sarafu za Kidijitali kwenye Vault, Kipindi kipya cha Usalama kitaanza na kuhesabu muda hadi Sarafu hizo za Kidijitali zitakaporejeshwa kwako. Wakati huu, Sarafu za Kidijitali ulizochagua kuondoa zitasalia zimefungwa, na unaweza pia kughairi uondoaji wako. Baada ya Kipindi cha Usalama kupita, uondoaji wako utakamilika na Sarafu za Kidijitali, pamoja na mazao yoyote ambayo huenda yamepatikana, yatatumwa kwenye mkoba wako. Muda wa Kipindi cha Usalama utabainishwa ndani ya World App utakapofikia Vault yako.
2.7.6 Ruzuku kwenye Vault
. Kipengele hiki, kikichaguliwa, hukuwezesha kutuma kiotomatiki Ruzuku za WLD moja kwa moja kwenye Vault kwenye akaunti yako badala ya kwenye pochi yako. Unaweza kubadilisha mpangilio huu wakati wowote.
2.7.7 TFH na Vault
. Ufikiaji kipengele hiki kunafanywa kupitia World App. Hata hivyo, TFH itaweza tu kusoma data husika na kuionyesha kwako. TFH haiwezi kuhamisha, kuondoa au kuweka Sarafu zako za Kidijitali na haina ufikio wowote kwa Vault yako.
2.8 Programu Bila Mamlaka Kuu
Sehemu hii haitumiki kwa watumiaji walio nchini Ujerumani au wale ambao makazi yao ya kawaida au ofisi yao rasmi iko nchini humo:
Zinakopatikana,
huenda tukawa na utendaji unaokuwezesha kuunganisha pochi lako na programu mbalimbali bila mamlaka kuu. Una wajibu wa kuhakikisha usalama wa programu hizi za wahusika wengine. Hatudhibiti programu za wahusika wengine na hatuwezi kutoa usaidizi kwa ajili ya matatizo yoyote unayoweza kupata unapounganisha na programu za wahusika wengine.
2.9 Huduma kwa Wateja
. Tunatoa usaidizi kwa wateja kuhusu vipengele na utendaji fulani unaohusiana na Huduma. Ili kuwasiliana nasi, chagua “Usaidizi” kwenye menyu ya ndani ya programu au kupitia anwani support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Kiolesura cha World ID
. Asasi ya Worldcoin Foundation, na si TFH, inaongoza Teknolojia ya World ID na kudhibiti uchakataji wa data zinazohusiana na kifaa cha Orb ili kuthibitisha World ID. Tunaweza kufanya World ID yako kupatikana kwako (kama kiolesura) kupitia Huduma. Teknolojia ya World ID inakuwezesha kuthibitisha kwamba wewe ni binadamu wa kipekee huku ikilinda faragha yako.
2.11 Mpango wa Kualika
. Inakopatikana, tunaweza kufanya huduma ya ‘Kualika’ kupatikana kwako. Kwa kutumia huduma ya Kualika, unaweza kuwaalika marafiki na familia wapakue Programu ya World na wathibitishwe ili kupata World ID. Ikiwa unatumia huduma ya Kualika unakubaliana na sheria na masharti yafuatayo:
Zawadi kwa ajili ya kushiriki kwenye huduma ya Kualika zinatolewa na World Assets Limited. World Assets Limited, kwa hiari yao, wanaweza kukupa zawadi kwa ajili ya kuwaalika watumiaji ambao wanafanikiwa kuthibitisha World ID yao. Ili kupokea zawadi hii, ni lazima utimize masharti fulani, ambayo utaelezewa kwenye Programu ya World. Una kipimo cha ni watumiaji wangapi unaweza kupendekeza kwenye Programu ya World. Kipimo hiki kimeonyeshwa kwenye Programu ya World.
Hauhitaji kufanya ununuzi wowote ili kushiriki katika kipengele cha Kualika. Huduma ya Kualika inapatikana tu kwa matumizi ya kibinafsi na yaisyo ya kibiashara. Unaweza tu kutumianhuduma ya Kualika kwa nia nzuri ya malengo ya kisheria. Hauwezi: (a) kutumia huduma ya Kualika au Huduma kwa nia ya udanganiyifu, ulaghai au isiyo ya kisheria; (b) kufanya kitu chochote kuharibu bioashara, nia au sifa yetu; (c) kuwasilisha matangazo au nyenzo za kimatangazo bila idhini; (d) kufanya madai ya uwongo au ya kupotosha; (e) kutumia utafutaji wa kulipiwa, midia ya kulipiwa au shughuli nyingine sawa ili kuwashawishi watumiaji kupitia huduma ya Kualika; na (f) kutumia huduma ya Kualika ili kujaribu kupata maelezo ya kibinafsi kutoka kwa watumiaji wengine.
Huduma ya Kualika haipatikani katika nchi zote au maeneo yote na haipatikani kwa watumiaji wote. Ushiriki katika huduma ya Kualika haupatikani katika mamlaka yoyote ambapo huduma hii yote au sehemu yake huenda inakiuka (au kutufanya kukiuka) mahitaji yoyote ya kisheria. Unakubali kutotumia huduma ya Kualika ikiwa huduma ya Kualika haiambatani na sheria husika katika eneo lako.
Huduma ya Kualika inapatikana kwa hiari yetu pekee. Tunaweza kubadilisha, kurekebisha, kusimamisha na kubatilisha huduma hii wakati wowote. World Assets Limited, kwa hiari yao, wanaweza kukataa kukupa zawadi kwa ajili ya kuwaalika watumiaji kuthibitisha World ID yao pale ambapo wamekiuka Masharti haya.
2.12 Ruzuku za WLD na Uhifadhi Ruzuku za WLD
. Mojawapi ya huduma za Wahusika Wengine inachukua kiwango kidogo cha WLD katika nyakati tofauti (“Ruzuku za WLD”). Ruzuku za WLD zinatolewa na kampuni ya World Assets Limited, kampuni tanzu ya asasi ya Worldcoin Foundation. Viwango, mipishano, na mida haswa ya Ruzuku za WLD zitabainishwa kwenye Programu ya World, lakini zinaamuliwa pekee na World Assets Limited. Ikiendana na matoleo ya hapo mbeleni ya sheria hizi, Uhifadhi Ruzuku za WLD uliopo hautoi hakikisho kwamba utapokea kiwango chochote cha Ruzuku za WLD. Viwango, mipishano, na mida haswa ya Uhifadhi Ruzuku za WLD zitabainishwa kwenye Programu ya World, lakini zinaamuliwa pekee na World Assets Limited. Uhifadhi wa Ruzuku za WLD unaweza kuishiwa na muda, kwa ilani au bila ilani kwenye Programu ya World, bila kujalisha kama tayari umefanya Uhifadhi wa Ruzuku za WLD au umepokea Ruzuku husika ya WLD. Inaweza kubatilishwa kwa hiari ya World Assets Limted.
2.13 Programu ya Operator
. Wahudumu wa Orb na washirika wengine tunawapa Programu ya Operator inayowawezesha kufuatilia shughuli na takwimu fulani zinazowahusu nyinyi na biashara zenu kama Wahudumu wa Orb. Pia tunaweza kuweka vipengele fulani vya kukusaidia kuendesha biashara zenu kama Wahudumu wa Orb.
2.14. Miniapps
. “Miniapps” ni kipengele cha Programu ya World kinachokuwezesha kufikia mfumo wa programu ndogo ambazo zinaweza kufikiwa ndani ya Programu ya World. Ni kwa hiari yetu pekee tunabainisha jinsi Miniapps zinaonyeshwa ndani ya Programu ya World. Ni lazima uwe na anwani ya pochi la Programu ya World ili kutumia Miniapps.
Inatambua kwamba katika kuonyeshana Miniapps, TFH inatoa mfumo wa teknolojia inayowaunganisha watumiaji pekee. Hakuna wakati TFH inatuma, kuhifadhi, kuchukua umiliki, kumiliki, au vinginevyo kujihusisha na rarafu yoyote ya kawaida au kidijitali.. TFH haichakati miamala, kutenda kama mnchakataji malipo, au vinginevyo kuhusika katika kuchakata miamala. TFH si mhusika kwenye miamala na hana dhima kuhusiana na miamala hii. TFH haiwezi kutoa usaidizi kuhusiana na matatizo kwenye miamala.
2.14.1 Miamala na Malipo kuhusiana na Miniapps
. Miniapps zinaonyeshwa ndani ya Programu ya World na zinaweza kutoa bidhaa au huduma ambazo watumiaji wa Programu za World huenda wakanunua wakitumia Sarafu za Kidijitali kwenye mapochi yao ya Programu ya World. Miamala hii inafanyika kati yako na miniapp husika.  TFH si mhusika kwenye muamala wowote kama huo.
Kuhusiana na miamala yoyote kama hiyo, unatambua kwamba pochi la Programu ya World ni huduma ya kutomiliki, a,mayo TFH jaihifadhi wala kumiliki Sarafu zako za Kidijitali na haifanyi miamala, kutuma, kumiliki, au vinginevyo kuhusika kwa njia yoyote katika kufanya miamala yoyote. Sarafu za Kidijitali kila wakati zinahifadhiwa na kutumwa kwenye mitandao husika ya blockchain. Hakuna hakikisho kwamba miamala itachakatwa kwa njia sahihi.
TFH inakupatanisha wewe na mhusika mwingine kwenye mfumo wa Miniapps na si mhusika kwenye miamala yoyote. TFH hainajukumu lolote katika uchakataji malipo na kusimamia urejeshaji fedha wala ada za kughairi.
Unapoamua kujihusisha katika muamala, ni lazima utume kiwango kilichokubalianwa na aina ya Sarafu za Kidijitali. TFH haichakati Sarafu za Kidijitali au za kawaida za mtumiaji na haifanyi utumaji wowote kwa niaba ya watumiaji. TFH haishughulikii, kudhibiti, kusimamia, kuthibitisha wala kutoa hakikisho lolote kuhusu miamala yoyote.  Endapo muamala haujapokea, umerejeshwa, umechakatwa vibaya, au vinginevyo umekumbwa na hitilafu, wewe na watoa huduma hao wengine ni lazima mshirikiane ili kusuluhisha suala lolote. Migogoro, madai, hasara, kutoelewana, hitilafu za kiufundi, au masuala yoyote ya aina yoyote (ya kiajali na yanayodaiwa kuwa ya kimakusudi) yanayohusiana na malipo au miamala ni lazima yashughulikiwe moja kwa moja kati yako na mtoa huduma huyo mwingine.  TFH haina wajibu wowote na haitahusika katika migogoro au majadiliano yoyote yanayohusiana na malipo, na haina dhima kwa hasara zozote ambazo huenda zikakumba wahusika.
Unawajibika pekee yako katika kukubali hatari ya mabadiliko yoyote ya bei kuhusiana na thamani ya Sarafu za Kidijitali, na unaelewa kwamba kufikia wakati unapokamilisha muamala, thamani ya Sarafu za Kidijitali zinazohusika kwenye muamala huenda ikawa imebadilika pakubwa.
2.14.2 Wahusika Wengine
. Bidhaa na huduma zinazoonyeshwa kwenye miniapp yoyote zinatolewa na kudhibitiwa na wahusika wengine. Kwa kutumia miniapps, unatambua na kukubaliana kwamba:
Sheria hizi ni kati yako na sisi, na sio na miniapp yoyote maalum;
Unatumia programu iliyotengenezwa na/au kutolewa na programu ya mhusika mwingine, ambayo mhusika huyo anawajibikia miniapp hiyo;
TFH inawezesha tu kufikia watoa huduma za malipo wengine kupitia pochi la Programu ya World, na wao wenyewe hawachakati malipo wala kuhifadhi fedha;
Miniapps zinaweza kuwa na masharti ya ziada kama sehemu ya bidhaa au huduma zao kwa ambazo ni lazima ufuate ikiwa unakubali huduma yao; na
Unatambua kikamilifu na kukubali hatari zozote na zote zinazohusiaba a miamala, na unakubali kwamba hatutakuwa na dhima kwa hatari zozote au madhara yoyote mabaya yanayoibuka kutokana na miamala hiyo.
Watengenezaji binafsi wa miniapps zinazopatikana kwenye Miniapps wanawajibikia maudhui, bidhaa, au huduma zinazopatikana kwako moja kwa moja kupitia miniapps zao husika. Ikiwa una maswali au migogoro yoyote utawasiliana na na Mtengenezaji husika moja kwa moja.
Watumiaji wanakubali hatari zote zinazohusiana na kufanya muamala, pamoja na hatari kwmba hawatapokea mapato ya uuzaji au ununuzi wao. Endapo kutakuwa na tatizo kuhusiana na muamala wowote, TFH haitaweza kusaidia katika kusuluhisha, wala kuwa na dhima yoyote kwa ajii ya matatizo yanayoibuka kutokana na miamala yoyote.
2.14.3 Ada za TFH
. Huenda tukaongeza ada za kutumia Miniapps unapofanya muamala na Mtengenezaji. Utaonyeshwa kiwango cha ada hii ndani ya mfumo. Ada zote zinaonyeshwa na ni za sasa kama inavyoonyeshwa kwenye Miniapps na huenda zikasasishwa na kubadilishwa mara kwa mara.
2.14.4 Ushuru
. Ni wajibu wako kubaini kama, na kwa kiwango gani, ushuru unatumika kwa muamala wowote kupitia Miniapps au miamala yoyote unayofanya pale, na kushikilia, kuchukua, kuripoti na kuwasilisha kiwango sahihi cha ushuru kwa mamlaka mwafaka za ushuru.
2.14.5 Hakuna usimamizi kwa ujumla.
TFH haitakuwa na jukumu jumla la kufuatilia maelezo yanayosambazwa na watumiaji, wala haitachambua maelezo au hali zinazoonyesha shughuli haramu ndani ya Miniapps.
Hata hivyo, tukifahamu, bila kujalisha mbinu iliyotumiwa, kwamba bidhaa au huduma haramu imetolewa kupitia Miniapps kwa watumiaji wanaoishi katika Umoja wa Ulaya, tutawafahamisha watumiaji hao kwamba wamenunua bidhaa au huduma haramu kupitia Miniapps
.
2.14.6 Shughuli Ziilizopigwa Marufuku
. Watumiaji wa Huduma za Miniapps wanakubali kutochapishaau kusambaza maudhui yoyote yanayokiuka sheria zozote au kukiuka haki zozote za mhusika mwingine, ukijumuisha lakini sio tu haki zozote za mali bunifu, haki zozote za faragha, au haki zozote za kutangazwa.
Pia, unakubali kutojihusisha katika shughuli zozote ambazo:
Ni haramu, za ulaghai, au zinadhuru;
Zinahitilafiana au kudakiza uendeshaji Miniapps;
Zinakiuka sheria zozote zilizobainishwa kwenye Mwongozo wetu wa Programu; na
Zinajumuisha maudhui ambayo hayajaruhusiwa chini ya Mwongozo wa Programu.
2.14.7 Kuripori maudhui haramu
. Programu ya World ina mbinu rahisi kufikia za watumiaji kuwasiliana nasi kuhusu maudhui haramu katika jukwa la Miniapps. Tutachukua hatua ya haraka ili kukagua ripoti hizo.
2.14.8 Kuondoamaudhui haramu
. Tukibaini kwamba miniapp yoyote ina maudhui haramu au inatoa bidhaa au huduma haramu, miniapp hiyo itaondolewa kwenye Miniapps. TFH itatoa kauli fupi, wazi na maalum kuhusu sababu kwa mchapishaji yeyote wa maudhui au huduma haramu.
Vikwazo vyovyote vinavyotekelezwa na Programu ya World dhidi ya watumiaji wake vitatekelezwa kwa heshima, haki na kiwango kinachofaa.
Watumiaji wanaoamini kwamba maudhui yao yameondolewa au ufikiaji wake kulemazwa kwa njia isiyo ya haki wanaweza kuwasiliana nasi kupitia
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
ili kukata rufaa kuhusu uamuzi huo. Tunatoa mfumo wa malalamishi wa kielektroniki na wa bila malipo unaowawezesha watumiaji kupinga maamuzi yetu yanayohusiana na maudhui kuondolewa, huduma kusitishwa, akaunti kufungwa, au vikwazo vya fedha kwa ajili ya madai ya maudhui haramu au ukiukaji sheria.
2.14.9 Kudhibiti Maudhui
. TFH inahifadhi haki za kusitisha, kwa kipindi cha muda na baada ya kupeana onyo ya mapema ambapo inahitajika kufanya hivyo kisheria, utoaji wa huduma zetu kwa watumiaji ambao mara nyingi wanatoa maudhui haramu. TFH pia kwa muda inaweza kusitisha uchakataji wa ilani na malalamishi kutoka kwa watumiaji ambao mara nyingi wanawasilisha madai bila ushahidi.
2.15. Majina ya Watumiaji
. Jina lako la mtumiaji la Programu ya World si lazima liwe jina lako halisi. Unapochagua jina la mtumiaji una jukumu la kufuata
Sera ya Jina la Mtumiaji
kwenye toleo lake mpya kabisa.
3. Ununuzi, Ada, na Ushuru
3.1 Ada za Miamala
. Kwa kutumia Huduma, unakubali kulipa ada zote husika pamoja na ada za miamala ya kubadilishana Sarafu za Kidijitali na miamala. Tutakuarifu kuhusu ada zozote husika kabla ya kufanya muamala. Ikiwa wewe ni huduma ya malipo ya mhusika mwingine, ada za benki, ada za kadi ya mkopo, ada za kadi ya salio zinazotozwa kwa ajili ya ununuzi wowote wa Sarafu za Kidijitali huenda zikaongezwa kwenye kiwango cha malipo unayolipia ununuzi wako wa Sarafu za Kidijitali. Pia unawajibikia ada zozote za ziada zinazotozwa na mtoa huduma za kifedha kwako.
3.2 Ada ya Mtandao
. Utangamano na blockchain pia unatoza ada ya mtandao. Ada ya mtandao inatozwa na kulipwa kwenye mtandao wa blockchain, na sio sisi, kwa kuwezesha utangamano wowote. Katika baadhi ya matukio, unaweza kustahiki kupata idadi ndogo ya miamala bila ada katika kipindi fulani kinachoamuliwa na TFH kwa hiari. Miamala hiyo inawekewa thamani ya chini zaidi ya miamala ambayo TFH inaweza kubadilisha.
3.3 Ushuru.
Ni wajibu wako kubaini kama, na kwa kiwango gani, ushuru unatumika kwa muamala wowote kupitia Huduma, na kushikilia, kuchukua, kuripoti na kuwasilisha kiwango sahihi cha ushuru kwa mamlaka mwafaka za ushuru.
3.4 Masasisho
. Ada zote zinaonyeshwa na ni za sasa kama inavyoonyeshwa katika Huduma na huenda zikasasishwa na kubadilishwa mara kwa mara.
4. Vipengele vya Hatari
4.1 Si Sarafu Rasmi Kisheria.
Sarafu za Kidijitali si sarafu rasmi kisheria, na haziungwi mkono na serikali yoyote, na akaunti za Sarafu za Kidijitali na salio la thamani kwenye Huduma haziko chini ya ulinzi wa Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Securities Investor Protection Corporation, au ulinzi kama huo ulio katika nchi nyingine. Sisi si benki na hatutoi huduma za kifedha. Miamala inayofanywa kwenye Programu ya World haidhibitiwi katika nchi nyingi. Hatutoi hakikisho lolote kuhusiana na utendaji wa blockchain tunayotumia, ambayo, miongoni mwa mambo mengin, inaweza kuchelewa, kuwa na ukinzani wa nia, au maamuzi ya kioperesheni kutoka kwa wahusika wengine ambayo si ya kuridhisha kwa wamiliki fulani wa Sarafu za Kidijitali, au kupelekea wewe kutoweja kukamilisha muamala ukitumia Huduma. Muamala unaowasilisha kupitia Huduma huenda ukakosa kukamilika, au huenda ukacheleweshwa pakubwa kwenye blockchain husika, na hatuwajibikii muamala kukosa kuthibitishwa au kusindikwa kama invyotarajiwa. Hakuna waranti wala hakikisho kwamba utumaji unaofanywa kupitia Huduma utafanikiwa kuhamisha umiliki au haki za Sarafu yoyote za Kidijitali. Aidha, kunaweza kuwa na hatari zinazohusiana na matumizi fulani ya Sarafu za Kidijitali, kama vile WLD. Maelezo zaidi kuhusu hatari zinazohusishwa haswa na WLD yanaweza kupatikana hapa.
4.2 Teknolojia Mpya.
Huduma ni mpya. Ingawa programu hii imefanyiwa majaribio ya kina, programu inayotumika kwenye Huduma bado ni mpya na huenda ikasa na kasoro au hatari za kisualama. Adja, bado programu inatengenzwa na huenda ikapitia mabadiliko makubwa kadri muda unavyosonga ambayo huenda yakakosa kutimiza matarajio ya watumiaji.
4.3 Hatari ya Uaslama wa Maelezo.
Sarafu za Kidijitali na matumizi ya Huduma huenda yakakumbwa na udukuzi au wizi. Wadukuzi au makundi au mashirika mengine yenye nia mbaya yanaweza kuhitilafiana na Huduma kwa njia mbalimbali, ikijumuisha, lakini sio tu, mashambulizi ya malware, mashambulizi ya kukataza huduma, mashambulizi ya kiidhini, mashambulizi ya Sybil, uporaji fedha kwa viwango vidogo vidogo na ulaghai wa kujifanya mtu mwingine ili kutekeleza wizi. Aidha, kwa sababu mitandao ya blockchain tunayoruhusu, kama vile mtandao wa Ethereum, inatumia programu ya “open-source”, programu ambayo ndio msingi wa Huduma huenda ikawa na kasoro za kimakusudi au zisizo za kimakusudi ambazo huenda zikaathiri vibaya Huduma au kupelekea upotezaji a Sarafu za Kidijitali za mtumiaji au mtumiaji kushindwa kufikia au kudhibiti pochi lake kupitia Huduma. Endapo kutakuwa na kasoro kama hiyo ya programu, huenda kukawa hakuna suluhu na watumiaji hawahakikishiwi suluhu yoyote, kurejeshewa fedha au fidia.
4.4 Usahihi.
Ingawa tunakusudia kutoa maelezo sahihi na kwa wakati yanayotolewa kupitia Huduma (ikijumuisha, bila kipimo, maudhui) huenda yakakosa kuwa sahihi, kamili au ya sasa kila wakati na pia inaweza kujumuisha kasoro za kiufundi na hitilafu za kimaandishi. Katika juhudi ya kuendelea kukupa maelezo kamili na sahihi kadri iwezekanavyo, kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika, maelezo yanaweza kubadilishwa au kusasishwa mara kwa mara bila ilani, ikijumuisha bila kipimo maelezo kuhusiana na sera, bidhaa na huduma zetu. Ipasavyo, unapaswa kuthibitisha maelezo yote kabla ya kuwasilisha na unawajibikia maamuzi yote kulingana na maelezo yalitopatianwa kupitia Huduma na hatutakuwa na dhima kwa ajili ya maamuzi hayo.
4.5 Upatikanaji
. Ingawa tunajitahisi kukupa huduma bora zaidi, hatutoi hakikisho kwamba Huduma zitapatikana bila kudakizwa. Huenda Huduma zinakosa kupatikana kwa muda tu mara kwa mara kwa ajili ya udumishaji au sababu nyingine. Hatuwajibikii hitilafu, kutojumuishwa, kudakizwa, kufutwa, kasoro, kuchelewa katika operesheni au utumaji, kuharibika, kuibiwa au uharibifu kwenye mitambo ya mawasiliano au mawasiliano ya mtumiaji kufikiwa bila idhini au kuhitilafiwa. Hatuwajibikii matatizo yoyote au kuharibika kwa mtandao au mtambo wowote wa simu, mifumo ya mtandaoni ya kompyuta, vifaa vya kompyuta, programu, barua pepe kufeli kwa ajili ya matatizo ya kiufundi au msongamano wa watumiaji kwenye Intaneti au kwenye Huduma au zote pamoja, ikijumuisha majeraha kwa watumiaji au kwa mtu mwingine yeyote kuhusiana au kutokana na kushiriki au kupakua nyenzo kuhusiana na Huduma. Hatuwajibikii hasara au uharibifu wowote, hasara zozote za kifedha au faida zilizopotezwa, upotezaji biashara, au jeraha la kibinafsi au kifo, zinazotokana na matumizi ya mtu yeyote ya Huduma, Maudhui yoyote yaliyochapishwa kwenye au kupitia Huduma au kuwasilishwa na watumiaji, au utangamano wowote baina ya watumaiji wa Huduma, iwe ni mtandaoni au nje ya mtandao.
4.6 Mifumo Tanzu
. Programu inayotumiwa kutengeneza WLD ni ya wazi na bila malipo kwa mtu yeyote anayetaka kuinakili na kuitumia. Hii inamaanisha kwamba mtu yeyote anaweza kutengeneza toleo lililobadilishwa la WLD, linaloitwa “Mfumo Tanzu.” Endapo kutakuwa na Mfumo Tanzu au ubadilishaji mwingine wowote wa mtandao wa Sarafu za Kidijitali, huenda hatutaweza kusaidia au kuunga mkono shughuli zozote zinazohusiana na Mfumo huo Tanzu. Miamala huenda ikakosa kukamilishwa, ikakamilishwa nusu, ikakamilishwa visivyo sahihi, au kucheleweshwa pakubwa wakati Mfumo Tanzu unapotokea. Hatuwajibikii hasara zozote zinazokukumba ambazo zinasababishwa kikamilifu au kwa sehemu tu na Mfumo Tanzu au mabadiliko mengine kwenye mtandao.
4.7 Huduma za Wahusika Wengine.
Zinakopatikana (haswa tazama Sehemu ya 2.5), tunategemea watoa huduma wengine ili kukupa baadhi ya vipengele na utendaji ndani ya Programu hizi, kwa mfano uwezo wa kununua Sarafu za Kidijitali ukitumia sarafu za kawaida, au uwezo wa kubadilisha Mali fulani ya Kidijitali ili kupata nyingine. Hatutoi huduma hizi, na hatuhusiana na muamala wowote kama huo. Unategemea tu watoa huduma wengine ili kupata huduma hizi, na ni lazima uwe na akaunti za watoa huduma hawa wengine na ukubaliane na masharti yao. Hatuwezi
kukusaidia ukikumbwa na matatizo unapotumia huduma yao, na hatuwajibikii miamala yoyote unayofanya ukitumia watoa huduma wengine.
5. Mali Bunifu.
5.1 Umiliki
. Programu yetu, programu ya kifaa tamba, Huduma, Maudhui na Alama (kama ilivyobainishwa hapa chini) na muundo, chaguo, na mpangilio wa Maudhui katika Huduma (“Mali Bunifu”) zinalindwa na hakimiliki, haki za alama za kibiashara, hataza, na haki nyingine za mali bunifu na sheria za Marekani na za nchi nyingine husika. Unakubali kuheshimu haki na sheria zote za mali bunifu, na pia ilani zozote au vikwazo vyovyote vya alama za kibiashara au hakimiliki vilivyo katika Makubaliano haya au Huduma. Hauwezi kuondoa ilani zozote za hakimiliki, alama za kibiashara, au hataza zilizo kwenye Mali Bunifu.
5.2 Alama za Kibiashara.
Jina Tools for Humanity Corporation, nembo ya Programu ya World pamoja na nembo zote husiani, na kauli mbio ni alama za kibiashara au za huduma za Tools for Humanity Corporation au wanaoipea leseni (“Alama”). Hauwezi kunakili, kuiga, au kutumia Alama, zikiwa nzima au sehemu yake, bila kibali chetu kwa maandishi. Alama za kibiashara, majina, au nembo nyingine zote zilizotajwa kuhusiana na Huduma ni mali ya wamiliki wake halisi na hauwezi kunakili, kuiga, au kuzitumia, zikiwa nzima au sehemu yake, bila kibali kwa maandishi cha mmiliki wa alama husika ya kibiashara. Ujumuishaji wa alama zozote za wahusika wengine katika Huduma hakumaanishi kwamba tunawaunga mkono, au tunawapendekeza.
6. Leseni na Vikwazo
6.1 Leseni
. Mradi iwe unastahiki kutumia Huduma na kulingana na uambatanaji wako na Sheria hizi, hapa tunakupa leseni yenye vipimo ya kufikia na kutumia Huduma.
6.2 Vikwazo vya Leseni
. Hauwezi kuchapisha Maudhui kwenye tovuti yoyote ya Intaneti, Intraneti au Extraneti au kujumuisha maelezo katika hifadhidata au maktaba nyingine yoyote, na matumizi mengine yoyote ya maudhui yamepigwa marufuku kabisa. Matumizi yoyote ya Huduma kando na yaliyoidhinishwa hapa, bila idhini ya awali kwa maandishi, yamepigwa marufuku na yatasitisha leseni inayopatianwa hapa. Matuymizi hayo bila idhini pia yanaweza kukiuka sheria husika ikijumuisha bila kipimo sheria za hakimiliki an alama za kibiashara na kanuni na sheria husika za mawasiliano. Isipokuwa iwe imebainishwa moja kwa moja hapa, hakuna chochote kilicho katika Sheria hizi kitaonekana kama kinapeana leseni kwa haki za mali bunifu, iwe ni kwa kudai, kuashiria au vinginevyo. Tunaweza kubatilisha leseni hii wakati wowote bila ilani na kukiwa na bila sababu. kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika
6.3 Serikali
. Ikiwa wewe ni mtumiaji wa Serikali ya Marekani, tunakupa leseni ya Huduma kama “Commercial Item” kama ambavyo neno hilo limefafanuliwa katika U.S. Code of Federal Regulations (tazama 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), na haki tunazokupa za Huduma ni sawa na haki tunazowapa wengine wote chini ya Sheria hizi.
7. Matumizi Yanayokubalika
7.1
Unaweza tu kutumia Huduma kwa matumizi yako ya kibinafsi pekee. Nyakati zote na kwa hiari yetu tunahifadhi haki ya kuhakiki, kughairi au kukatiza ufikiaji wako au matumizi yako ya Huduma kulingana na sheria husika. Vipengee kwenye orodha ya Matumizi Yalikatazwa ni mifano tu na orodha hii si kamilifu; huenda tukaongeza au kuondoa matumizi yaliyokatazwa kwa hiari yetu kulingana na sheria husika.
7.2 Matumizi Yaliyokatazwa yanajumuisha:
Shughuli Haramu:
Shughuli yoyote ambayo inaweza kukiuka, au kusaidia katika ukiukaji wa, vikwazo vilivyowekwa na OFAC; kukiuka, au kusaidia katika ukiukaji wa, sheria zozote katika nchi ambako tunafanya biashara; kuhusisha faida kutokana na shughuli haramu; au kuchapisha, kusambaza, au kusambaza nyenzo zozote au maelezo yoyote haramu.
Matumizi Kupindukia au Udukuzi:
Shughuli yoyote ambayo inaweka miundombinu yetu kazi nyingi kupindukia; inaathiri vibaya, kuhitilafiana, au kudhuru mfumo, data, au maelezo yoyote; inatuma au kupakia nyenzo zozote kwenye Huduma ambazo zina virusi, au programu nyingine zozote haribifu au za kufuta; au inajaribu kuingia bila idhini kwenye mifumo au mitandao ya kompyuta iliyounganishwa na huduma.
Matumizi Mabaya:
Shughuli yoyote ambayo inahitilafiana na ufikiaji au matumizi ya Huduma ya mtu mwingine; inaharibia jina, kulaghai, kunyanyasa, kumtishia, au vinginevyo kukiuka haki za faragha, mali bunifu, au haki nyingine za kisheria za mtu mwingine; inachochea, kutishia, kuwezesha, kukuza, au kuhamasisha chuki, ubaguzi wa kimbari, au matendo ya uhalifu dhidi ya wengine; au
au inavuna, kutohoa, au kukusanya data za mtumiaji mwingine kutoka kwenye Huduma bila kibali.
Ulaghai na Matendo Mengine ya Biashara isiyo ya Haki:
Shughuli yoyote ambayo inafanywa ili kutulaghai sisi, watumiaji wa wetu, au mtu mwingine yeyote; inatoa maelezo ya uwongo, yasiyo sahihi, au potovu kwetu; inaahidi faida kubwa zisizoeleweka au kuuza huduma bila manufaa kwa mnunuaji; au inaendeleza matendo mengine ya uwongo pamoja na michezo isiyo halali ya pata potea, mashindano, kamari, au michezo mingine ya bahati nasibu.
Ukiukaji Haki za Mali Bunifu:
Shughuli yoyote ambayo inahusisha mauzo, usambazaji, au ufikiaji muziki, filamu, programu ghushi, au nyenzo nyingine zinazotumia leseni bila idhini mwafaka kutoka kwa wamiliki hakimiliki; inatumia mali bunifu (pamoja na Alama) bila idhini ya moja kwa moja au kwa njia ambayo inatudhuru sisi au biashara yetu; inaashiria kwa uwongo kwamba sisi tunaunga mkono au tunahusika; au inakiuka hakimiliki, alama ya kibiashara, haki ya kuwekwa hadharani au faraghani, au haki nyingine yoyote ya hakimiliki chini ya sheria.
8. Wahudumu wa Orb
Tunashirikiana na wakandarasi huru wa nchini wanaoitwa “Wahudumu wa Orb,” ambao wanawezesha shughuli ya kuwasajili watumiaji na kusaidia kujibu maswali ambayo huenda ukawa nayo kutuhusu sisi. Wahudumu hawa wa Orb wamepokea mafunzo na wanajua mengi kuhusu World Network. Hata hivyo, hatuna udhibiti wa na tunakanusha dhima yote inayotokana na wanachosema au jinsi wanavyoendesha shughuli zao.
Wahudumu wa Orb si maajenti wala waajiriwa wetu kwa njia yoyote. Juhudi, mchakato, sera, kanuni, au jitihada zozote zinazochukuliwa na TFH kwa ajili ya maslahi ya watumiaji wake haiashirii uhusiano wa kiajira au kiajenti na Mhudumu wa Orb.
9. Uahirishaji
Huenda tukasimamisha na kuzuia ufikiaji wako wa Huduma: (i) Tunahitajika kufanya hivyo chini ya amri halali, amri ya mahakama, au amri ya kimkataba ya mamlaka ya serikali; (ii) Tuna sababu ya kutuhumia kwamba unatumia Huduma kwa Matumizi Yaliyokatazwa; (iii) Matumizi yako ya Huduma yanaathiriwa na kesi, uchunguzi au mchakato unaoendelea wa serikali na/au tunaona shughuli zako zinahusisha hatari kubwa ya kisheria au kutoambatana na kanuni za kiudhibiti; (iv) Wabia wetu wa huduma hawawezi kuendeleza matumizi yako; (v) Unachukua hatua yoyote ambayo tunaona kwamba inaepuka vidhibiti vyetu (kama vile na sio tu kujaribu kutengeneza akaunti nyingi)..
10. Si Utoaji Ofa ya Faida za Hisa au Bidhaa
Maudhui ya Huduma hayajumuishi ofa ya kununua au kuuza au ushawishi wa ofa ya kununu au kuuza uwekezaji, hisa, nia za ubia, bidhaa au vipengee vingine vyovyote vya kifedha; maudhui au Huduma pia hazijumuishi, na haziwezi kutumika katika, au kuhusiana na, ofa au ushawishi wa mtu yeyote katika jimbo au mamlaka yoyote ambako ofa au ushawishi huo haujaidhinishwa au hairuhusiwi, au kwa mtu yeyote kwa ambaye ni kinyume cha sheria kumpa ofa au ushawishi huo.
11. Maudhui
11.1 Kutegemea Maudhui; Mabadiliko kwenye Huduma.
Maelezo na nyenzo tunazokupa kupitia Huduma (“Maudhui”) ni za kimaelezo pekee, na hatutoi hakikisho kuhusiana na usahihi, umuhimu, au ukamilifu wake, kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika. Unapotegemea Maudhui yetu unafanya hivyo kwa shauri yako. Hatuna dhima wala wajibu kwa hatua zozote unazochukua au kutochukua kwa sababu ya maudhui, au kwa mtu yeyote unayemtumia Maudhui. Kauli za watumiaji wengine wakielezea jinsi wanavyotumia Huduma zilizo kwenye Huduma au mahali kwingineko hazipaswi kuchukuliwa kama tunaunga mkono kauli zao ikiwa kauli hizo haziendanishi na Sheria hizi au Maudhui yetu. Tunaweza kusasisha Maudhui mara kwa mara, lakini Maudhui hayo huenda yakakosa kuwa kamilifu au iliyosasishwa, hatuna jukumu kwako la kusasisha Maudhui au sehemu nyingine yoyote ya Huduma. Tunaweza kubadilisha au kusitisha, kwa muda tu au kabisa, Maudhui au Huduma zote au sehemu yoyote yake bila ilani ya awali kwako, kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika. Hatutakuwa na dhima kwa mabadiliko, uahirishaji, au usitishaji wowote wa Maudhui au Huduma zote au sehemu yake, kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika..
11.2 Huduma na Maudhui ya Wahusika Wengine
. Tunaweza kupatiana viungo elekezi vya nyenzo za kielimu, webinar, mikutano, na promosheni kwenye mitandao ya kijamii (Huduma za “Wahusika Wengine”) ambayo inawezesha kushiriki na ushirikiano miongoni mwa watumiaji wetu na wahusika wengine. Ukishiriki maelezo yoyote ya kibinafsi, picha, maoni, maudhui, au data nyingine zozote kwenye huduma hizo, unafanya hivyo kwa shauri yako, na matumizi yako ya huduma hizo upo chini ya sheria za matumizi na sera za faragha za huduma hizo, na sio zetu. Unapaswa kupitia sheria za matumizi za kila Huduma ya Mhusika Mwingine ili kuelewa vyema haki zako, na jinsi ambavyo majukwaa hayo yanavyotumia data zako. Hatuwajibikii hasara, udukuzi, au matumizi yoyote mabaya ya data zako vyovyote vile kuhusiana na Huduma yoyote ya Mhusika Mwingine (pamoja na
utelekezaji) isipokuwa iwe dhima hiyo haiwezi kuzuiliwa chini ya sheria husika. Matumizi yako ya maelezo yoyote yanayotolewa na Huduma ya Mhusika Mwingine (“Maudhui ya Wahusika Wengine”) ni kwa shauri yako, na hatukupi ahadi zozote kwamba Maudhui ya Wahusika Wengine ni sahihi, kamilifu, halali, au mwafaka kwa hali yako binafsi. Maudhui ya Wahusika Wengine yanajumuisha maelezo yaliyotolewa na watumiaji wengine na hatujayaunga mkono.
11.3 Maudhui ya Mtumiaji
. Kama memba wa jamii wa Worldcoin, huenda ukachapisha ujumbe, data, programu, picha, video, au maudhui mengine (“Maudhui ya Mtumiaji”) kwenye ubao wa ujumbe, blogi, akaunti za mitandao ya kijamii inayomilikiwa nasi, pamoja na maeneo mengine yanayopatikana hadharani kwenye Huduma. Majukwaa haya huenda ni sisi tunayandaa au kuandaliwa na Mtoa Huduma Mwingine kwa niaba yetu. Unawajibikia Maudhui yote ya Mtumiaji ambayo unawasilisha, kupakia, kuchapisha, au kuhifadhi kupitia Huduma. Ni lazima uto maonyo, maelezo, na ufichuaji wote unaohitajika na mwafaka kuhusiana na Maudhui yako ya Mtumiaji. Hatuwajibikii Maudhui yote ya Mtumiaji ambayo unawasilisha kupitia Huduma.
11.4 Leseni ya Maudhui ya Mtumiaji
. Kwa kuwasilisha Maudhui ya Mtumiaji kwetu, unawakilisha kwamba una haki zote zinazohitajika kwenye Maudhui hayo ya Mtumiaji na kwa hivyo kutupatia leseni ya milele, ya kote ulimwenguni, isiyo ya kipekee, bila hakimiliki, inayoweza kutolewa leseni ndogo, na inayoweza kuhamishika ya kutumia, kusambaza, kuandaa kazi tohozi, kubadilisha, kuonyeshana, na kutekeleza maudhui yote ya Mtumiaji au sehemu yake katika uuzaji na promosheni zetu, na malengo mengine halali ya kibiashara yanayohusiana na Huduma. Tunaweza kusambaza tena kazi tohozi za Maudhui yako ya Mtumiaji kwa mfumo wowote na kupitia vyombo vyovyote vya habari tunavyochagua. Hapa pia unatupatia sisi na watumiaji wengine leseni isiyo ya kipekee ya kutumia, kufikia, kuzalisha tena, kusambaza, kubadilisha, na kuonyeshana, na kutekeleza Maudhui yako ya Mtumiaji kupitia Huduma. Sehemu ya 11.4 itatumika kwa kiwango kamilifu kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika.
11.5 Vikwazo vya Maudhui ya Mtumiaji
. Unakubali kutotumia, kutoruhusu mhusika mwingine yeyote kutumia, Huduma kuchapisha au kutuma Maudhui yoyote ya Mtumiaji ambayo: (a) yanaharibiana jina au sifa, au kufichua masuala ya faraghani na ya kibinafsi kumhusu mtu yeyote; (b) ni chafu, ya uchi, ya kunyanyasa, ya kutishia, ya chuki, ya kuudhi kwa misingi ya mbari au kabila; ya kuhamasisha tabia ambayo inaweza kuchukuliwa kuwa hatia ya kijinai, inaweza kupelekea dhima ya umma, au ya kukiuka sheria yoyote, au vinginevyo haifai; (c) inaweza kukiuka haki za mali bunifu za wengine, pamoja na maandishi, ujumbe au programu, siri za kibiashara zenye hakimiliki au maelezo mengine ya hakimiliki, au alama za kibiashara au huduma zinazotumika kwa njia inayokiuka; au (d) inayohitilafiana na matumizi ya Huduma na watumiaji wengine. Unawakilisha kwetu kwamba unachapisha Maudhui ya Mtumiaji kwenye Huduma kwa hiari; kwa kuchapisha Maudhui ya Mtumiaji hakuleti uhusiano wa Mwajiri na mwajiriwa baina yako nasi. Hauwezi kunakili wala kutumia anwani za barua pepe, nambari za simu, salio, majina ya mtumiaji, au maelezo nyingine ya kibinafsi kuhusu watumiaji wengine bila kibali chao. Barua pepe, barua, simu, au mawasiliano mengine bila maana kwa watumiaji wengine kupitia Huduma au kwa mbinu nyingine yoyote kumepigwa marufuku.
11.6 Malalamishi na Maudhui Kuondolewa kwa Ajili ya DMCA.
Ikiwa unaamini kwamba alama yako ya kibiashara au kazi yenye hakimiliki imekiukwa na Maudhui yetu au Maudhui ya Mtumiaji kwenye Huduma au vinginevyo inachapishwa kwa njia ambayo inaashiriwa kwamba inaunga mkono au inahusiana nasi, tafadhali tutumie barua pepe kwa anwani legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com ikiwa na mada ya “[Trademark/Copyright] Complaint,” bila kujali tukio husika. Ili lalamishi lako liwe fanisi na ili sisi tuweze kuchukua hatua chini ya Sheria ya Hakimiliki ya Milenia ya Kidijitali (Digital Millennium Copyright Actm, “DMCA”), ni lazima ufuate mahitaji ya DMCA kwa kujumuisha maelezo yafuatayo katika barua pepe yako:
Utambuaji wazi wa kazi au alama iliyo na hakimiliki ambayo unadai imekiukwa, pamoja na nambari ya Usajili wa Hakimiliki ikiwa kazi hiyo imesajiliwa;
Utambulisho wa kazi au alama ambayounadai imekiukwa na ambayo ungependa iondolewe;
Kiungo elekezi au mwelekeo mwingine wazi wa kutuiwezesha kupata maudhui ambayo yanakiuka;
Anwani yako ya barua pepe, anwani ya barua, na nambari ya simu; na
Kauli iliyotiwa sahihi kwamba una imani kwa nia nzuri kwamba maudhui yanakiuka, kwamba maelezo unayotoa ni sahihi, na kwamba wewe ndiye mmiliki au umeidhinishwa kumwakilisha mmiliki wa maudhui hayo.
Pia unapaswa kuelewa kwamba chini ya Sehemu ya 512(f) ya DMCA, mtu yeyote ambaye anatuma ilani za uwongo za ukiukaji huenda akawa na dhima kwa hasara, kwa hivyo tafadhali usifanye madai ya uwongo. Tunaweza kushiriki maelezo au mawasiliano yoyote unatupatia uliyofanya na wahusika wengine, pamoja na mtu aliyepakia kwenye Huduma nyenzo zinazodaiwa kukiuka.
Tunapopokea ilani ya kweli ya ukiukaji, sera yetu ni: (a) kuondoa mara moja au kulemaza ufikiaji wa maudhui yanayokiuka; (b) kumwarifu mtu aliyepakia maudhui yanayokiuka kwamba tumeondoa au tumelemaza ufikiaji wa maudhui hayo; na (c) kwa wanaorudia
hatia, kusitisha uwezo wao wa kufikia Huduma. Tukipokea ilani ya kukataa kutoka kwa mtu huyo, tunaweza kukutumia nakala ya ilani hiyo ya kukataa ili kuelezea kwamba huenda tukarejesha maudhui yaliyoondolewa au tukaacha kuyalemaza ndani ya siku 10 za biashara. Isipokuwa uwasilishe kesi ukitaka amri ya mahakama dhidi yetu au dhidi ya mtu ambaye alipakia maudhui hayo, tutarejesha ufikiaji wa maudhui yaliyoondolewa ndani ya siku 10 hadi 14 za biashara au nyingi zaidi baada ya kupokea ilani ya kukataa, kwa hiari yetu.
12. KANUSHO LA HAKIKISHO
12.1 Matumizi yako ya Huduma ni kwa shauri yako. Huduma, WLD, maudhui na mali bunifu nyingine zote zinatolewa “KAMA ZILIVYO” na “KAMA ZINAVYOPATIKANA” bila uwakilisho au hakikisho lolote, iwe ni moja kwa moja, imeashiriwa, au chini ya sheria. Kwa kiwango kamili kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika, tunakanusha hakikisho zozozote zilizoashiriwa za umiliki, kibiashara, uzima kwa ajili ya dhumuni fulani, au kutokiuka kuhusiana na vipengele, maudhui, au Mali Bunifu nyingine iliyo katika Huduma. Baadhi ya maeneo ya mamlaka hayaruhusu kutojumuishwa kwa hakikisho zilizoashiriwa, kwa hivyo kutojumuishwa huku huenda kukakosa kukuathiri. Hatuungami, kuhakikishia, au kuwajibikia matangazo, ofa, au kauli zozote zinazotolewa na wahusika wengine, pamoja na watumiaji wengine kuhusiana na Huduma.
12.2 Hatutoi uwakilisho au hakikisho zozote kwamba (a) ufikiaji wa Huduma zote au sehemu yake utakuwa endelevu, bila kudakizwa, kwa wakati, salama, au bila hitilafu; (b) kwamba Huduma au maudhui ni sahihi, kamilifu, aminifu, au ya sasa; (c) kwamba Huduma hazina virusi au vipengele vingine haribifu; au (d) kwamba Huduma au maudhui yatatimiza mahitaji, au matarajio yako.
12.3 Aidha, hatutoi uwakilisho au hakikisho zozote kuhusiana na uhalali wa Huduma au WLD kwa matumizi yoyote, au kwamba Huduma au WLD zitatimiza mahitaji yoyote ya kiudhibiti au uambatanaji. Una wajibu wa kubainisha na kuambatana na vikwazo na mahitaji yote ya kisheria na kiudhibiti ambayo yanatawala matumizi yako ya Huduma au WLD. Isipokuwa kwa kauli za moja kwa moja zilizobainishwa katika Sheria hizi, hapa unakiri na kukubaliana kwamba haujategemea kauli nyingine yoyote au uelewa mwingine wowote, iwe ni kwa maandishi au matamshi, kuhusiana na ufikiaji na matumizi yako ya Huduma au WLD.
12.4 Hatutendi na hatuwezi kutenda kama mshauri wako kuhusiana na masuala yoyote au kifedha, kisheria, uwekezaji, na ushuru. Maudhui yoyote ni sahihi kuanzia tarehe iliyoonyeshwa. Mipango, makadirio, utabiri, malengo na/au maoni yoyote yaliyotolewa hapa yanakabiliwa na hatari, kutokuwa na uhakika na dhana, na kwa hivyo yanaweza kuwa si sahihi na yanaweza kubadilika bila ilani. Hakuna maudhui yanapaswa kutegemewa.
Baadhi ya maelezo yanayopatikana hapa yanaweza kuwa yamechukuliwa kutoka kwa wahusika wengine. Ijapokuwa vyanzo kama hivyo vinachukuliwa kuwa vya kuaminika, hatujathibitisha moja kwa moja maelezo hayo yote na hatutoi uwakilisho kuhusiana na usahihi wake. Hatujasajiliwa kama wauzaji hisa au washauri wa uwekezaji. Hatutoi uwakilisho, na haswa tunajitenga nahakikisho zote, za moja kwa moja, zilizoashiriwa, au za kisheria, kuhusiana na usahihi, wakati, au ukamilifu wa nyenzo zozote zilizo kwenye Huduma. Maudhui yetu yaliyotolewa ni ya kimaelezo jumla, na una wajibu wa kubaini kana kwamba utatumia Huduma au la. Unatambua kwamba kufanya biashara, kutumia, na kumiliki Sarafu za Kidijitali kuna hatari kubwa. Unaweza ukapoteza fedha zote zilizo kwenye pochi lako. Unatambua kwamba Huduma inaweza kuwa chini ya vikwazo vya uuzaji nje ya nchi na vikwazo vya kiuchumi vinavyowekwa na sheria ya Marekani.
12.5 Hatuna dhima kwako au kwa mhusika mwingine kwa ajili ya marekebisho yoyote au usitishaji wa Huduma, au uahirishaji au usitishaji wa ufikiaji wako wa Huduma.
13. KIPIMO CHA DHIMA
13.1 Hatutengi wala kuwekea kipimo dhima yetu kwako ambapo ni kinyume cha sheria kufanya hivyo. Katika nchi ambako aina za mambo yasiyojumuishwa zilizo hapa chini ambazo haziruhusiwi, tuna wajibu kwako tu kwa hasara na uharibifu ambao haungeweza kutabirika kutokana na sisi kutokuwa waangalifu na kutotumia ujuzi tosha au sisi kukiuka mkataba wetu nawe. Aya hii haiathiri haki za mtumiaji ambazo haziwezi kuondolewa au kuwekewa kipimo na mkataba au makubaliano yoyote.
13.2 Kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria, unakubaliana kwamba hakuna wakati sisi au maafisa, wakurugenzi, waajiriwa, wakandarasi, maajenti, washirika wetu, au kampuni zetu tanzu (“Wahusika wa TFH”) tutakuwa na dhima kwako kwa ajili ya hasara zozote zisizo za moja kwa moja, za kiadhabu, za bahati mbaya, maalum, zinazotokana na jambo lingine, au za kuigwa, pamoja na hasara za kupoteza faida, nia nzuri, matumizi, data, au mali nyingine isiyoweza kugusika, iwe dhima hiyo imewekwa kwa msingi wa ukiukaji au vinginevyo, au iwe Wahusika wa TFH wamefahamishwa au hawajafahamishwa kuhusu uwezekano wa hasara hizo zinazohusiana au kutokana na: (a) matumizi yako au wewe kutoweza kutumia Huduma, Sarafu zako za Kidijitali, au World Network; (b) kutoweza kufikia ua kusitishwa kwa Huduma; (c) udukuzi, hitilafu, ufikiaji bila idhini au ubadilishaji wa muamala wowote au Data zako; (d) muamala au makubaliano yoyote yanayofanyika baina yako na mhusika mwingine kupitia Huduma; (e) shughuli au mawasiliano yoyote na wahusika wengine; (f) matendo ya Wahudumu wa Orb, (g) upotezaji wowote wa thamani ya Sarafu zozote
za Kidijitali; (h) Maudhui yoyote ya Wahusika Wengine yanayofikiwa kwenye au kupitia Huduma; (i) hitilafu, makosa, au kasoro kwenye Maudhui yetu; (j) majeraha ya kibinafsi au uharibifu wa mali wa aina yoyote ile unaotokana na ufikiaji wowote na matumizi ya Huduma; (k) virusi, au virusi vinavyoweza kutumwa kwenye au kupitia Huduma; au (l) tabia ya kuharibia jina, inayodhuru, au haramu ya mhusika mwingine yeyote. Kipimo hiki cha dhima kitatumika ikiwa hasara zinaibuka kutoka na matumizi au matumizi mabaya ya, au kwa ajili ya kutegemea TFH au Huduma, bila kujali kutofaulu kwa lengo muhimu la suluhu yoyote na kwa kiwango kamili kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika.
13.3 Hakuna wakati ambapo Wahusika wa TFH watakuwa na dhima kwako kwa ajili ya madai, kesi, dhima majukumu, uharibifu, hasara, au gharama zozote za moja kwa moja kwa kiwango kinachozidi $100.00. Ikiwa haujaridhika na Huduma, unakubaliana kwamba suluhu yako pekee itakuwa ya wewe kuacha kutumia Huduma. Kipimo hiki cha dhima kitatumika kwa kiwango kamili kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika.
13.4 Kibali na Uondoaji Lawama.
Unakubali kutetea, kuondolea lawama, na kuchukulia Wahusika wa TFH kuwa wasiodhuru dhidi ya madai, hasara, gharama, dhima, na ada za wakili zinazoletwa dhidi ya Mhusika wa TFH na mhusika yeyote mwingine kuhusiana na kutokana na: (a) matumizi yako ya Huduma; (b) ukiukaji wako wa Sheria hizi; (c) ukiukaji wako wa haki za mtu mwingine; (d) tabia yako kuhusiana na Huduma; au (e) matumizi yako ya WLD, Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali, au mtandao wa Worldcoin. Baadhi ya mamlaka zinawekea kipimo kiwango cha uondoaji lawama wa watumiaji, kwa hivyo baadhi ya vipengele au vipengele vyote katika aya hii huenda visikuathiri. Ikiwa una jukumu la kumwondolea lawama Mhusika yeyote wa TFH, tunahifadhi haki, kwa hiari yetu binafsi, ya kudhibiti hatua au kesi yoyote na kubaini kana kwamba tutafidiana na kwa masharti gani.
IKIWA WEWE NI MKAAZI WA CALIFORNIA, unaondoa haki zako za kupata manufaa na kinga za sheria ya California Civil Code § 1542, ambayo inajumuisha: “[a] kibali jumla hakitumiki kwa madai kwamba mtoa kibali hajui au hadhanii kuwa angenufaika wakati alipokuwa akiidhinisha kibali na kwamba, ikiwa alikuwa anajua, ingeathiri pakubwa kiwango cha fidia kutoka kwa anayepokea kibali.”
14. Sheria Inayotawala
Sheria za Jimbo la Carlifonia zitatumika kwenye Makubaliano haya na migogoro yoyote inayoibuka kutokana au kuhusiana na Makubaliano haya. Sheria inayotawala iliyotajwa katika sehemu hii itatumika bila kujali ukinzani wa sheria. Unakubali zaidi kwamba Huduma itachukuliwa kuwa ya Jimbo la California pekee, na kwamba ingawa Huduma zinaweza kupatikana katika maeneo mengine ya mamlaka, upatikanaji wake hauibui mamlaka ya kijumla au kibinafsi katika jukwaa lolote nje ya Jimbo la California.
15. USULUHISHAJI MIGOGORO, MCHAKATO WA USULUHISHAJI NA UONDOAJI KESI YA KUNDI
15.1 TAFADHALI SOMA AYA ZIFUATAZO KWA MAKINI. ZINAKUHITAJI WEWE KUSULUHISHA MIGOGORO NASI KUPITIA MCHAKATO WA USULUHISHAJI BINAFSI MBELE YA MSULUHISHAJI MMOJA, NA SIO KAMA MMOJA YA WANAOLETA KESI YA KUNDI. MCHAKATO WA USULUHISHAJI UNAKUZUIA KUTOTUSHTAKI MAHAKAMANI AU KUTOKUWA NA KESI MBELE YA HAKIMU, INGAWA UNAWEZA KULETA MGOGORO DHIDI YETU KATIKA MAHAKAMA YA MADAI MADOGO IKIWA UNASTAHIKI.
15.2 Tutatumia jitihada zetu bora kusuluhisha migogoro yoyote inayoweza kutokea kupitia majadiliano yasiyo rasmi ya nia nzuri. Endapo mgogoro utaibuka, ni lazima uwasiliane nasi kwa kututumia barua pepe kwa anwani legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com ili tuweze kujaribu kuusuluhisha bila kutumia mchakato rasmi wa usuluhishaji migogoro. Ikiwa hatutaweza kufikia suluhu kwa njia isiyo rasmi ndani ya siku 60 za kutumiana barua pepe, na uchague kuibua dai kulingana na sheria ya shirikisho au jimbo, sheria ya kawaida, kulingana na mkataba, ukiukaji, ulaghai, maelezo potovu au msingi mwingine wowote wa kisheria, au kesi nyingine yoyote rasmi inayohusiana au kutokana na Sheria hizi, Maudhui au Huduma (kila moja, “Mgogoro”), kisha ukubali kusuluhisha Mgogoro huo kupitia mchakato wa usuluhishaji unaokufunga, kwa msingi wa mtu binafsi kulingana na masharti yafuatayo (kwa pamoja, “Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji”):
Mchakato wa usuluhishaji utaendeshwa faraghani na msuluhishaji mmoja. Msuluhishaji atatumia vipengele vya kipimo na sheria nyingine zote husika kuu na ataheshimu haki ya kutofichua maelezo fulani yanayotambuliwa na sheria husika.
Mgogoro utasuluhishwa kikamilifu na mchakato wa usuluhishaji unaoendeshwa na JAMS kulingana na Sheria za Usuluhishaji Rahisi za JAMS (JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules), isipokuwa iwe kiwango kilichokadiriwa cha Mgogoro ni $250,000 au zaidi, ambapo Sheria za Usuluhishaji Mgumu za JAMS (JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules) zitatumika. Mchakato wa usuluhishaji utafanyika mjini San Francisco, California, isipokuwa wewe na sisi tukubaliane kuufanyia kwingineko. Unakubali kwamba mahakama za serikali ya kitaifa na jimbo mjini San Francisco, California ndiko mahali kunakofaa kwa kesi zozote za rufaa za tuzo la mchakato wa usuluhishaji au kwa kesi za mahakamani endapo kifungu hiki cha mchakato wa usuluhishaji katika Makubaliano haya kinapatikana kuwa hakiwezi kutekelezeka.
Katika mchakato wowote wa usuluhishaji, bila kujali eneo lake, wahusika hawataomba kufahamishwa awali kuhusu ushahidi wa mhusika yule mwingine, naye msuluhishaji hatawaruhusu wahusika kuhusika katika kufahamishana awali kuhusu ushahidi wa kila upande; badala yake, kila mhusika atafichua ushahidi wake katika saa na tarehe itayokubalianwa kabla ya kipindi cha mwisho cha mchakato wa usuluhishaji.
Makubaliano haya ya Usuluhishaji yanasimamia uwezo wa kutekelezeka, uwezo wa kubatilishwa, wigo, na uhalali wa Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji au sehemu yoyote ya Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji, na Migogoro mingine yote inayoibuka kuhusiana au kutokana na ufafanuzi au matumizi ya Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji; na masuala hayo yote yataamuliwa na msuluhishaji na sio mahakama wala hakimu.
Ikiwa msuluhishaji au msimamizi wa mchakato wa usuluhishaji atakutoza ada za kuandikisha madai au gharama nyingine za ofisi, tutakufidia, baada ya ombi, kwa kiwango ambacho ada au gharama hizo hazitazidi zile ambazo ungelipia ikiwa ingekuwa kesi mahakamani. Pia tutalipia ada na gharama za ziada ikiwa inaagizwa na sheria za msuluhishaji au sheria husika.
Kwa ombi la mhusika yeyote, mchakato wote wa usuluhishaji utafanywa kwa usiri mkubwa na, hivyo basi, hati zote, ushahidi wote, na rekodi zote zitapokewa, kusikizwa, na kuhifadhiwa na msuluhishaji kwa siri na kufungiwa, na kuweza kufikiwa na wahusika pekee, mawakili wao husika, na wataalam wao husika, washauri, au mashahidi ambao wamekubali, hapo awali na kwa maandishi, kupokea maelezo hayo yote kama siri ili kutumiwa kwa malengo pekee ya mchakato wa usuluhishaji.
Kando na kesi za kundi na suluhu zilizojadiliwa katika Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji, msuluhishaji ana mamlaka ya kutoa suluhu yoyote ambayo vinginevyo ingepatikana mahakamani.
Uamuzi wowote wa fidia inayotuzwa na msuluhishaji unaweza kukubalika katika mahakama yoyote yenye mamlaka adilifu.
Ikiwa hitaji la kufanya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji au kukataliwa kwa kesi za kundi na Migogoro mingine iliyoletwa kwa niaba ya wahusika wengine walio katika Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji litapatikana kuwa haliwezi kutekelezeka, basi ni vipengele pekee ambavyo haviwezi kutekelezeka vitakavyochukuliwa kuwa vimeondolewa kutoka kwenye Sheria hizi na majukumu yote yanayosalia katika Sheria hizi yataendelea kutekelezwa kikamilifu.
15.3 Haki ya Kujiondoa ya Siku 30
. Una haki ya kujiondoa na kutofungwa na Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji kwa kutuma barua pepe kwa legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com kutoka kwa anwani ya barua pepe ambayo ulitumia kusajili programu yako na ikiwa na Mada ya: “ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT. Ni lazima utume barua pepe yako ndani ya siku 30 baada ya kukubaliana na Sheria hizi, kando na hivyo utalazimika kutumia mchakato wa usuluhishaji ili kusuluhisha Migogoro kulingana na masharti ya Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji. Ukijiondoa kwenye Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji, sisi pia haitafungwa na Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji.
15.4 Mabadiliko kwenye Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji.
Tutakupa ilani ya siku 30 ya mabadiliko yoyote kwenye sehemu ya Sheria hizi iliyo na kichwa “
Usuluhishaji Migogoro, Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji na Uondoaji Kesi ya Kundi”
kwa kukupatia ilani, na mabadiliko hayo yataanza kutumika siku 30 baada ya kupokea ilani kutoka kwetu. Mabadiliko kwenye sehemu ya
Usuluhishaji Migogoro, Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji na Uondoaji Kesi ya Kundi
yatatumika tu kwa Migogoro inayoibuka baada ya siku ya 30. Ikiwa mahakama au msuluhishaji ataamua kwamba mabadiliko kwenye sehemu hii hayawezi kutekelezwa au si halali, basi mabadiliko hayo yataondolewa kwenye Sheria hizi nayo mahakama au msuluhishaji atatumia masharti ya toleo la kwanza la Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji yaliyoanza kutumika baada ya kuanza kutumia Huduma. Unaweza kutumia haki yako ya kujiondoa kwenye masharti mapya ya Makubaliano ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji kwa kufuta utaratibu uliobainishwa katika sehemu iliyo hapa juu kwa kichwa “Haki ya Kujiondoa ya Siku 30.”
Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji yataendelea kutumika hata Sheria hizi zikisitishwa, na wewe kuacha kutumia Huduma.
Bila kujali chochote kilicho katika Makubaliano haya ya Mchakato wa Usuluhishaji, mhusika yeyote anaweza kuanzisha kesi ya kumwondolea wajibu ili kusitisha matumizi bila idhini au matumizi mabaya ya Huduma, au ukiukaji wa haki za mali bunifu (kwa mfano, alama za kibiashara, siri za kibiashara,
hakimiliki, au haki za hataza) bila kwanza kuhusisha mchakato wa usuluhishaji au mchakato usio rasmi wa kusuluhisha migogoro ulioelezewa hapa juu.
16. Misimamo Jumla
16.1 Hakuna Kuondoa Haki; Ubaya; Kutoweza Kupewa Jukumu
. Sisi kushindwa kutekeleza kipengele si kuondoa haki yetu ya kufanya hivyo baadaye. Ikiwa kipengele fulani kitapatikana kuwa hakiwezi kutekelezeka, vipengele vinavyosalia vya Sheria hizi vitasalia kutumika kikamilifu na kipengele kinachoweza kutekelezeka kitachukua nafasi hiyo ili kuonyesha jitihada zetu kadri iwezekanavyo, kwa kiwango kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika. Hauwezi kupeana haki zako zozote chini ya Sheria hizi, na jaribio lolote la kufanya hivyo litakuwa bure. Tunaweza kupeana haki zake kwa mshirika wake yeyote au kampuni yoyote yake tanzu, au kwa mrithi yeyote kwa ajili ya shughuli yoyote inayohusiana na Huduma.
16.2 Makubaliano Kamili
. Makubaliano haya yanajumuisha makubaliano yote na kamili baina yako nasi kuhusiana na Huduma na yana nguvu kuliko maelewano, makubaliano, uwakilisho, na hakikisho zote za hapo awali, kwa maandishi na matamshi, kuhusiana na Huduma. Vichwa vya sehemu mbalimbali katika Sheria hizi ni vya kurahisisha mambo tu na havitatawala maana au ufafanuzi wa kipengele chochote.
16.3 Kudumu.
Vipengele vyote vya Sheria hizi kuhusiana na uahirishaji au usitishaji, madeni kwa TFH, matumizi jumla ya Huduma, Migogoro na TFH, na pia vipengele ambavyo vinazidi wakati wa usitishaji wa Sheria hizi, vitadumu hata baada ya usitishaji wa Sheria hizi.
16.4 Uhusiano wa Wahusika.
Hakuna kitu chochote katika Sheria hizi kitachukuliwa au kinakusudiwa kuchukuliwa, wala kitakachokufanya na TFH kuchukuliwa kuwa wabia, wanabiashara wenza, au vinginevyo kama washirika wa pamoja katika faida, na wewe wala TFH hamtachukuliwa kuwa ajenti wa yule mwingine. Hii inajumuisha kwamba hakuna kitu chochote katika Sheria hizi kinaweka au kinakusudiwa kuweka uhusiano wowote wa ajira baina yako na TFH.
16.5 Hakuna Majukumu ya Ushauri wa Kitaalamu au Kifedha.
Maudhui yote yanayotolewa nasi ni ya malengo ya kimaelezo pekee na hayapaswi kuchukuliwa kama ushauri wa kitaalamu. Haupaswi kuchukua, au kutochukua, hatua yoyote kwa sababu ya maelezo yaliyo katika Sheria hizi. Kabla ya kufanya maamuzi yoyote ya kifedha, kisheria, au mengine yanayohusiana na Huduma au Sarafu zozote za Kidijitali, unapaswa kutafuta ushauri huru wa kitaalamu kutoka kwa mtu ambaye ana leseni na amehitimu katika nyanja ambayo ushauri huo unafaa. Sheria hizi hazikusudiwi, na hatengenezi wala kutuwekea majukumu yoyote ya kifedha. Kwa kiwango kamili kinachoruhusiwa na Sheria, unakiri na kukubali kwamba hatuna majukumu au dhima za kifedha kwako au kwa mhusika mwingine yeyote, na kwamba kwa kiwango ambazo majukumu au dhima hizo huenda zikakuwepo kisheria, majukumu au dhima hizo zimekanushwa, kuondolewa, na kutupiliwa mbali jinsi isiyoweza kubatilishika. Aidha unakubali kwamba wajibu na majukumu pekee ambayo tuko nayo kwako ni yale ambayo yamebainishwa moja kwa moja katika Sheria hizi.
16.6 Mabadiliko kwenye Udhibiti.
Endapo tutanunuliwa au kuungana na shirika lingine, au vinginevyo kupeana majukumu mengine kwa shirika husika au linalorithi au shirika lingine ambalo tutaona ni kwa maslahi bora ya Watumiaji, basi tunahifadhi haki, katika tukio lolote kati ya matukio haya, ya kuhamisha au kupatiana Data ambazo tumekusanya kutoka kwako kama sehemu ya muungano huo, kunukuliwa huko, uuzaji huo, au badiliko nyingine kwenye udhibiti, kulingana na sheria husika.
16.7 Mambo Yasiyotarajiwa na Yasiyoweza Kudhibitiwa.
Hatutawajibikia kuchelewa, utendakazi duni, au huduma kudakizwa ambao moja kwa moja au vinginevyo kunapelekea mabadiliko makubwa sokoni katika thamani ya Sarafu za Kidijitali, tendo lolote la Mungu, matendo ya mamlaka za kijamii au kijeshi, matendo ya magaidi, usumbufu wa umma, vita, mgomo, dharura ya afya, mgogoro wa leba, moto, mawasiliano ya simu au huduma za Intaneti na huduma za mtandao kudakizwa, vifaa au programu kutofanya kazi, au jambo au hali yoyote ambayo haiwezi kudhibitiwa (kila moja, “Tukio la Mambo Yasiyotarajiwa na Yasiyoweza Kudhibitiwa”). Utokeaji wa Tukio la Mambo Yasiyotarajiwa na Yasiyoweza Kudhibitiwa hautaathiri uhalali na uwezo wa kutekelezeka wa kipengele chochote kilichosalia cha Sheria hizi.
16.8 Maduka ya Programu.
Mahali ambapo unapakua Programu zetu kutoka kwa duka lolote la programu au jukwaa la usambazaji kando na Apple App Store, ikijumuisha Google Play Store ("Jukwaa la Usambazaji") unakubali kwamba:
Sheria hizi ni kati yako nasi, na sio na mtoa huduma ya Jukwaa la Usambazaji (“Mmiliki Duka”); matumizi yako ya Programu ni lazima yaambatane na Sheria za Huduma za wakati huo za Jukwaa la Usambazaji la Mmiliki Duka; Mmiliki Duka ni mtoaji tu wa huduma ya wa Jukwaa la Usambazaji ambako ulipakua Programu;
Ni sisi pekee, na si Mmiliki Duka, tunawajibikia Programu;
Mmmiliki Duka hana jukumu wala dhima kwako kuhusiana na Programu au Sheria hizi; na
unatambua na kukubali kwamba Mmiliki Duka ni mnufaika mwingine wa Sheria inavyohusiana na Programu.
16.9 Apple App Store
. Sehemu hii inatumika ambapo Programu zimepakuliwa kutoka kwenye Apple App Store. Unatambua na kukubali kwamba Sheria ni kati yako na sisi, si Apple, Inc. ("Apple") na kwamba Apple haina wajibu wowote kuhusiana na Programu au maudhui yaliyo ndani yake. Matumizi yako ya Programu ni lazima yaambatane na Sheria za Huduma za App Store.
Unatambua kwamba Apple haina jukumu lolote lile la kutoa huduma zozote za udumishaji na usaidizi kuhusiana na Programu. Endapo kuna wakati wowote ambapo Programu inakosa kuambatana na waranti zozote husika, unaweza kuarifu Apple, na (inapofaa) Apple itakurejeshea fedha ulizotumia kununua Programu; kwa kiwango cha juu zaidi kinachoruhusiwa na sheria husika, Apple haitakuwa na jukumu lingine lolote la waranti kuhusiana na Programu, na madai, hasara, dhima, uharibifu, gharama zingine zozote zinazohusiswa na ukosefu wowote wa kukosa kuambatana na waranti yoyote zitatawaliwa na Sheria hii na sheria yoyote husika kwetu kama mtoaji Programu.
Unatambua kwamba Apple haina wajibu wa kushughulikia madai yoyote yako au mhusika yeyote mwingine kuhusiana na Programu au umiliki wako na/au matumizi yako ya Programu, ikijumuisha, lakini sio tu: (i) madai ya shima ya bidhaa; (ii) dai lolote kwamba Programu zinakosa kuambatana na hitaji lolote husika la kisheria au kikanuni; na (iii) madai yanayoibuka chini ya ulinzi wa mtumiaji au sheria sawa; na madai yote kama hayo yanatawaliwa tu na Sheria hizi na sheria yoyote husika kwetu kama mtoaji Programu.
Unatambua kwamba, endapo kutakuwa na dai lolote la mhusika mwingine kwamba Programu au umiliki au matumizi yako ya Programu yanakiuka haki za mali bunifu za mhusika huyo mwingine, ni TFH, si Apple, itawajibika kuhakikisha uchunguzi, ulinzi, fidia na utekelezaji wa dai lolote kama hilo la ukiukaji haki za mali bunifu kwa kiwango kinachohitajika na Sheria.
Unawakilisha na kutoa hakikisho kwamba (i) haupo katika nchi ambayo ipo chini ya marufuku ya Serikali ya Marekani, au ambayo imetajwa na Serikali ya Marekani kuwa nchi "inayosaidia ugaidi"; na (ii) haujaorodheshwa kwenye orodha yoyote ya Serikali ya Marekani ya watu waliopigwa marufuku au wanaozuiliwa.
Wewe na TFH mnatambua na kukubali kwamba Apple, na kampuni tanzu za Apple, ni wanufaika wengine wa Sheria za Huduma kuhusiana na leseni yako ya Programu, na kwamba, baada ya wewe kukubali sheria na masharti ya Sheria za Huduma, Apple itakuwa na haki (na inaonekana kuwa imekubali kuwa ina haki) ya kutekeleza Sheria za Huduma kama inavyohusiana na leseni yako ya Programu dhidi yako kama mnufaika mwingine hapa.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
ข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขการใช้งาน
Tools For Humanity
ยินดีต้อนรับสู่
World App
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ระหว่างท่านกับ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
ซึ่งเป็นบริษัทจัดตั้งในรัฐเดลาแวร์ (“
TFH”
หรือ “เรา”) จะมีผลบังคับกับการใช้งานและการเข้าถึงเว็บไซต์และ             แอปพลิเคชันของเรา รวมถึง
World App
และ
Operator App (
เรียกรวมกันว่า “แอป”) ตลอดจนฟังก์ชันการทำงาน เนื้อหา และบริการทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวข้องซึ่งเราจัดหาให้แก่ท่าน (เรียกรวมกันว่า “บริการ” หรือ “บริการของเรา”) ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับ
World Network (“World Network”)
และระบบนิเวศที่เกี่ยวข้อง
โปรดอ่านข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้อย่างละเอียดก่อนใช้หรือเข้าถึงบริการ โดยการเข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการใด ๆ ที่เราจัดหาให้ และโดยการให้ความยินยอมอย่างชัดแจ้งตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ ท่านตกลงอย่างชัดแจ้งที่จะผูกพันตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และตามนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของเราซึ่งรวมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ โปรดความเข้าใจเนื้อหาส่วนต่อไปนี้ของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ซึ่งมีความสำคัญเป็นพิเศษ
ท่านตกลงที่จะระงับข้อพิพาทใด ๆ ระหว่างท่านกับ
TFH
ผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่มีผลผูกพันแทนการฟ้องร้องในศาล หากท่านอาศัยอยู่ในเกาหลีใต้ ท่านสามารถเลือกที่จะระงับข้อพิพาทในศาลท้องถิ่นที่มีอำนาจแทนได้ โปรดดูรายละเอียดในข้อ
15
ด้านล่าง
โดยส่วนใหญ่แล้ว ผลิตภัณฑ์คริปโทรวมถึงโทเคนดิจิทัลจะไม่ได้อยู่ภายใต้การกำกับดูแลและอาจมีความเสี่ยงสูง ในกรณีที่เกิดการสูญเสียจากธุรกรรมดังกล่าว อาจไม่มีวิธีการเยียวยาที่กำหนดไว้ตามกฎหมาย
ไม่มีส่วนใดของบริการที่ถือว่าเป็นการเสนอขายหรือการชักชวนให้เสนอซื้อหลักทรัพย์หรือโทเคนดิจิทัล บริการจะไม่ถือเป็นคำแนะนำในการลงทุน การถือครอง ซื้อ หรือขายโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ (ตามคำจำกัดความในข้อ
2.1
ด้านล่างนี้) อาจเป็นสิ่งที่ห้ามดำเนินการในพื้นที่ที่ท่านอาศัยอยู่ และท่านมีหน้าที่ในการปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด โปรดพิจารณาว่าการซื้อ ขาย ใช้ หรือถือครองโทเคนดิจิทัลเหมาะสมกับท่านหรือไม่ โดยพิจารณาถึงสถานการณ์ทางการเงินของท่านและความเข้าใจของท่านเกี่ยวกับโทเคนดิจิทัล มูลค่าของโทเคนดิจิทัลอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงอย่างรวดเร็วและอาจสูญเสียมูลค่าทั้งหมด    ก็ได้
นอกจากนี้ โทเคน
Worldcoin (“WLD”)
ไม่ได้มีเจตนาให้ใช้งาน ซื้อ หรือเข้าถึงโดยบุคคลในสหรัฐอเมริกา รวมถึงพลเมืองสหรัฐอเมริกา ผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ หรือบุคคลที่อยู่ในสหรัฐอเมริกา หรือบริษัทที่จัดตั้ง ตั้งอยู่ หรือมีที่มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในสหรัฐอเมริกา หรือมีตัวแทนจดทะเบียนในสหรัฐอเมริกา เราไม่เปิดให้บุคคลในสหรัฐอเมริกาใช้งาน ซื้อ หรือเข้าถึง
WLD
นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ขาย โอน หรือทำให้บุคคลในสหรัฐอเมริกาสามารถใช้งาน
WLD
ได้ ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมเกี่ยวกับความเสี่ยงที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
WLD
ได้ที่นี่
1. ขอบเขตของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
1.1 ความเป็นส่วนตัวและข้อมูลของท่าน
เมื่อเข้าถึงแอป ท่านอาจมอบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลบางประเภทแก่เรา เช่น ชื่อหรือหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่าน หากท่านมอบข้อมูลเพื่อแสดง
proof of personhood
และเพื่อใช้สิทธิรับโทเคน
WLD
จากนั้นท่านอาจต้องมอบข้อมูลประเภทพิเศษคือข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่มีความอ่อนไหว เช่น ข้อมูลไบโอเมตริกซ์ นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของเราอธิบายถึงข้อมูลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมจากท่านและวิธีที่เราใช้ข้อมูลนั้น โปรดอย่าใช้บริการหากท่านไม่ต้องการให้เราเก็บรวบรวมหรือใช้ข้อมูลของท่านในลักษณะที่ระบุในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัว
1.2 สิทธิในการใช้บริการ
หน้าเว็บที่แสดงรายละเอียดบริการของเราอาจเข้าถึงได้ทั่วโลก แต่ไม่ได้หมายความว่าบริการทั้งหมดหรือฟีเจอร์ของบริการทั้งหมดจะถูกกฎหมายหรือพร้อมให้บริการในประเทศของท่าน ท่านต้องไม่ใช้
VPN
หรือเครื่องมือที่คล้ายกันเพื่อหลบเลี่ยงข้อจำกัดใด ๆ ท่านมีหน้าที่รับผิดชอบในการดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าท่านสามารถใช้บริการของเราได้โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในพื้นที่ที่ท่านใช้บริการ บริการของเราอาจไม่พร้อมให้บริการในทุกภาษา เพื่อใช้บริการของเรา ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด ท่านต้องไม่ใช้บริการของเราเพื่อดำเนินการ ส่งเสริม หรือช่วยเหลือผู้อื่นในการดำเนินกิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมายหรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายใด ๆ
นอกจากนี้ ท่านต้องมีคุณสมบัติครบตามเกณฑ์ทั้งหมดดังต่อไปนี้
มีอายุ
20
ปีขึ้นไป และ
ไม่ได้
อยู่ใน อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมของ เป็นพลเมืองของ หรือเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในพื้นที่ต่อไปนี้: ซีเรีย ภูมิภาคไครเมีย โดเนตสก์ ลูฮันสก์ เคอร์ซอน และซาโปริซเซียของยูเครน รัสเซีย เกาหลีเหนือ อิหร่าน คิวบา หรือประเทศหรือภูมิภาคอื่นใดที่สหรัฐอเมริกา สหภาพยุโรป หรือประเทศหรือเขตแดนอื่นใดได้จำกัดการเข้าถึงบริการ และ
ท่านไม่ได้เป็น “บุคคลต้องห้ามไม่ให้ดำเนินธุรกรรมทางธุรกิจด้วย (
Specially Designated National: SDN
)” ตามที่ประกาศโดยสำนักงานควบคุมทรัพย์สินต่างประเทศของกระทรวงการคลังสหรัฐอเมริกา (“
OFAC”)
หรือมีรายชื่ออยู่ในบัญชีบุคคลที่อยู่ภายใต้มาตรการลงโทษของประเทศ อื่นใด และชื่อของท่านไม่ได้อยู่ในรายชื่อบุคคลที่ถูกปฏิเสธไม่ให้ได้รับสิทธิพิเศษด้านการส่งออก (
Denied Person List
) ของกระทรวงพาณิชย์สหรัฐอเมริกา หรือรายชื่อบุคคลที่ถูกห้ามของประเทศอื่นใด
หากท่านมีคุณสมบัติไม่ครบถ้วนตามข้อกำหนดดังกล่าว ท่านจะไม่ได้รับอนุญาตให้เข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการ และเราอาจจำกัดความสามารถของท่านในการเข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการ
นอกจากนี้ หากท่านจดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีที่ตั้งอยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในประเทศดังกล่าว ท่านจะไม่ได้รับอนุญาตให้เข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งอยู่ภายในขอบเขตความหมายที่กำหนดในข้อ
2.5
หรือแอปพลิเคชันแบบกระจายศูนย์ (
decentralized application
) ซึ่งอยู่ภายในขอบเขตความหมายที่กำหนดในข้อ
2.8
ฟีเจอร์ดังกล่าวไม่สามารถใช้ได้สำหรับท่าน
1.3 ความพร้อมใช้งาน
หน้าเว็บที่แสดงรายละเอียดบริการของเราอาจเข้าถึงได้ทั่วโลก แต่ไม่ได้หมายความว่าบริการทั้งหมดหรือฟีเจอร์ของบริการทั้งหมดจะถูกกฎหมายหรือพร้อมให้บริการในประเทศของท่าน การเข้าถึงบริการบางอย่าง (หรือฟีเจอร์ของบริการบางอย่าง) ในบางประเทศอาจถูกปิดกั้นโดยเราหรือรัฐบาล ท่านต้องไม่ใช้
VPN
หรือเครื่องมือที่คล้ายกันเพื่อหลบเลี่ยงข้อจำกัดใด ๆ การเข้าถึงแอปและฟีเจอร์บางอย่างภายในแอปอาจไม่สามารถใช้ได้หรือถูกจำกัด ขึ้นอยู่กับตำแหน่งที่ตั้งของท่าน
ท่านมีหน้าที่ในการดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าท่านสามารถใช้บริการของเราได้โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในพื้นที่ที่ท่านใช้บริการ
บริการของเราอาจไม่พร้อมให้บริการในทุกภาษา
1.4 การปรับปรุงข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
เราอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นครั้งคราว ในกรณีดังกล่าว เราจะเผยแพร่ข้อกำหนดฉบับปรับปรุงผ่านทางบริการ และหากกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนด เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบก่อนทำการเปลี่ยนแปลงใด ๆ หากการเปลี่ยนแปลงดังกล่าวเป็นการเปลี่ยนแปลงในส่วนที่เป็นสาระสำคัญหรือทำให้ท่านเสียประโยชน์ เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้าเพิ่มเติมหากกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนด ท่านเข้าใจและตกลงว่า การที่ท่านยังคงใช้บริการต่อไปหลังจากที่เราเปลี่ยนแปลงข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้โดยไม่ได้คัดค้านการเปลี่ยนแปลงนั้นอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงจะถือเป็นการที่ท่านยอมรับข้อกำหนดฉบับแก้ไขนั้น ท่านสามารถหยุดใช้บริการได้ทุกเมื่อหากท่านไม่ยอมรับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ เนื่องจากบริการมีการเปลี่ยนแปลงตลอดเวลา เราอาจใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือหยุดการให้บริการทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนได้ทุกเมื่อโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบล่วงหน้าเท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต
1.5 ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม
อาจมีการบังคับใช้ข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขเพิ่มเติมกับแอปพลิเคชัน เนื้อหา ฟีเจอร์ หรือส่วนต่าง ๆ ของบริการที่เฉพาะเจาะจง และข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขเพิ่มเติมทั้งหมดที่เราแจ้งให้ท่านทราบจะถือเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
2. บริการ
2.1 วอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
World App
มาพร้อมกับวอลเล็ตแบบไม่ได้ผูกกับผู้ให้บริการรายใดรายหนึ่ง (
unhosted
) และผู้ใช้เป็นผู้เก็บรักษากุญแจส่วนตัวหรือ
private key
ด้วยตนเอง (
non-custodial
) ซึ่งใช้สำหรับการถือครองคริปโทเคอร์เรนซี สกุลเงินดิจิทัล หรือโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับ (รวมถึง
WLD
โดยเรียกรวมกันว่า “โทเคนดิจิทัล”) ท่านเป็นผู้ควบคุมโทเคนดิจิทัลที่อยู่ในวอลเล็ตของท่านเอง ใน
World App
กุญแจส่วนตัว (ซึ่งเป็นรหัสผ่านในการเข้าถึงโทเคนดิจิทัล) จะถูกเก็บไว้บนอุปกรณ์ของท่านโดยตรง ท่านสามารถถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านได้ทุกเมื่อโดยการส่งไปยังที่อยู่บล็อกเชนอื่น โดยจะขึ้นอยู่กับการเข้าถึงอินเทอร์เน็ตและความแออัดบนบล็อกเชน ในเวลาที่ท่านถือโทเคนดิจิทัลอยู่ในวอลเล็ตของท่าน เราจะไม่มีสิทธิควบคุมวอลเล็ต โทเคนดิจิทัล หรือกุญแจส่วนตัวของท่านแต่อย่างใด ผู้ใช้ต้องรับผิดชอบต่อความเสี่ยงจากการสูญเสียกุญแจส่วนตัวของตน และ
TFH
หรือ
World App
จะไม่สามารถกู้คืนกุญแจเหล่านั้นได้
เนื่องจาก
World App
เป็นวอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
ท่านจะได้รับที่อยู่วอลเล็ตซึ่งระบุว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านถูกเก็บไว้ที่ใดบนบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้อง เราจะไม่สามารถเข้าถึงโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านได้
2.2 โทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับ
World App
รองรับโทเคน
ERC-20
บางประเภท เราอาจเพิ่มโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับเพิ่มเติมในอนาคต ท่านสามารถดูโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับได้ใน
World App
โปรดตรวจสอบโทเคนและเครือข่ายที่รองรับใน
World App
ให้แน่ใจก่อนที่จะฝากหรือถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน เราจะไม่สามารถกู้คืนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านได้หากท่านส่งโทเคนที่ระบบไม่รองรับหรือส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลไปยังที่อยู่วอลเล็ตที่ไม่ถูกต้อง
ท่านเข้าใจว่าการส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ระบบไม่รองรับไปยังที่อยู่วอลเล็ต
World App
อาจหมายความว่าท่านจะสูญเสียการเข้าถึงโทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านั้นทั้งหมด เราไม่มีวิธีการกู้คืนโทเคนดิจิทัลด้วย โปรดตรวจสอบให้มั่นใจว่าท่านส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ถูกต้องไปยังที่อยู่วอลเล็ตที่ถูกต้องไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตาม ทั้งนี้ ท่านอาจทดสอบการทำธุรกรรมได้โดยใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลจำนวนเล็กน้อย
2.3 ข้อเสนอและการเข้าถึง
เมื่อท่านดำเนินการเกี่ยวกับโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน เช่น การส่งไปยังที่อยู่            วอลเล็ตอื่นหรือการเชื่อมต่อกับแอปพลิเคชันแบบ
distributed application
โดยใช้บริการ ท่านต้องอนุมัติหรือ “ลงนาม” เพื่อให้ดำเนินการดังกล่าวผ่านทางอุปกรณ์ที่ท่านระบุในระหว่างกระบวนการเริ่มต้นใช้งาน แอปจะอ้างอิงการอนุมัติจากอุปกรณ์ดังกล่าวเท่านั้นในการเริ่มต้นการดำเนินการกับบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้อง ท่านเข้าใจว่าท่านจะติดต่อกับบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้องโดยตรงเมื่อท่านดำเนินการดังกล่าว และท่านเข้าใจว่าเราไม่มีหน้าที่รับผิดชอบในการส่งคำสั่งในนามของท่าน
2.4 ข้อมูลจากบุคคลภายนอก
ในการใช้บริการ ท่านอาจเข้าถึงข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน เช่น มูลค่าตลาดปัจจุบัน แต่ก็ไม่ได้จำกัดเพียงข้อมูลนี้ การนำเสนอข้อมูลดังกล่าวไม่ได้แสดงถึงความเกี่ยวข้องหรือการรับรองบุคคลภายนอกนั้น แม้ว่าในการให้บริการฟังก์ชันบางประการในบริการจำเป็นต้องใช้ผลิตภัณฑ์ของบุคคลภายนอกนั้นก็ตาม เนื้อหาของบริการและผลิตภัณฑ์ของบุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าวตามที่แสดงให้เห็นผ่านทางบริการจะอ้างอิงตามข้อมูลที่เปิดเผยต่อสาธารณะหรือที่บุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าวมอบให้กับเรา ดังนั้น เราจึงไม่รับรองหรือรับประกันความถูกต้องของข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการหรือผลิตภัณฑ์ของบุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าว
2.5 บริการของบุคคลภายนอก
ผู้ใช้ที่จดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีที่ตั้งอยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในประเทศดังกล่าว จะไม่สามารถใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอกเพื่อขายหรือแลกเปลี่ยนโทเคนดิจิทัลของตนตามข้อนี้
ในกรณีที่มีให้บริการ บริการอาจแสดงลิงก์ที่นำไปยังผู้ประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกเพื่อทำธุรกรรม เช่น การซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลด้วยเงินสด การขายโทเคนดิจิทัล การแลกเปลี่ยนโทเคนดิจิทัล และฟังก์ชันอื่น ๆ ที่อาจมีให้บริการในอนาคต ท่านสามารถดูบริการของบุคคลภายนอกที่พร้อมให้บริการได้ใน
World App
เมื่อท่านทำธุรกรรมดังกล่าว ท่านจะทำธุรกรรมกับบุคคลภายนอกนั้น ไม่ใช่กับเรา ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามคำแนะนำที่เกี่ยวข้องและยอมรับข้อกำหนดในการให้บริการของผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกนั้น เราจะไม่ควบคุมหรือส่งเงินหรือโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตามในขณะที่ให้บริการของเราหรือเมื่อท่านเข้าถึงบริการของบุคคลภายนอก
2.6 ธุรกรรม
Peer-to-Peer
บริการมาพร้อมกับแพลตฟอร์มการสื่อสารที่ท่านสามารถใช้เพื่อส่ง มีคำขอ รับ และเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับจากวอลเล็ตบล็อกเชนอื่น ๆ ไม่ว่าจะควบคุมโดยท่านหรือบุคคลภายนอก การโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับระหว่างวอลเล็ตบล็อกเชนของท่าน รวมทั้งการโอนไปยังบุคคลภายนอกและการโอนจากบุคคลภายนอก จะถือเป็นการโอน ฝ่ายที่เริ่มต้นการโอนต้องรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการทำธุรกรรมอย่างถูกต้อง ซึ่งอาจรวมถึงการชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่ายหรือค่าธรรมเนียมผู้ตรวจสอบธุรกรรม (
miner’s fee)
ที่เพียงพอเพื่อให้ธุรกรรมสำเร็จ การชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่ายไม่ครบถ้วนอาจทำให้การโอนอยู่ในสถานะรอดำเนินการและอาจส่งผลให้เกิดความล่าช้าหรือการสูญเสียที่เกิดจากข้อผิดพลาดในการเริ่มต้นธุรกรรม เราไม่มีหน้าที่ในการให้ความช่วยเหลือในการแก้ไขธุรกรรมดังกล่าว เมื่อท่านส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ จากวอลเล็ตของท่านไปยังวอลเล็ตบล็อกเชนอีกวอลเล็ตหนึ่ง การโอนดังกล่าวจะเป็นการดำเนินการบนบล็อกเชนโดยท่านเอง ซึ่งไม่อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมของเรา ท่านควรตรวจสอบความถูกต้องของข้อมูลธุรกรรมทั้งหมดก่อนที่จะส่งข้อมูล เราจะไม่รับผิดหรือรับผิดชอบในกรณีที่ท่านป้อนที่อยู่ปลายทางบล็อกเชนที่ไม่ถูกต้อง การโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจะไม่สามารถย้อนกลับได้เมื่อถูกส่งไปยังเครือข่ายบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้องแล้ว แม้ว่าธุรกรรมจะอยู่ในสถานะรอดำเนินการและแสดงสถานะดังกล่าวในระหว่างที่ธุรกรรมกำลังประมวลผลโดยผู้ดำเนินการเครือข่ายก็ตาม เราไม่ได้เป็นผู้ควบคุมเครือข่ายและไม่สามารถรับประกันได้ว่าการโอนจะได้รับการยืนยันจากเครือข่าย
2.7 Vault
2.7.1 ข้อมูลทั่วไป
World App
มาพร้อมกับอินเทอร์เฟสสำหรับผู้ใช้ซึ่งเชื่อมต่อกับ “ห้องนิรภัย” แบบกระจายศูนย์สำหรับจัดเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน (“
vault
”) การที่ท่านใช้
vault
ถือเป็นการรับทราบและยอมรับข้อกำหนดที่ใช้บังคับกับ
vault
รวมถึงข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมใด ๆ ที่กำหนดโดยบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งเป็นผู้พัฒนาหรือให้บริการฟีเจอร์ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับหรือมีขึ้นจากการใช้
vault
ของท่าน
vault
รองรับเฉพาะโทเคนดิจิทัลบางประเภทเท่านั้น โทเคนดิจิทัลดังกล่าวไม่ถือเป็นโทเคนที่อ้างอิงมูลค่าของสินทรัพย์อื่น (
asset referenced token)
หรือโทเคนที่มีคุณสมบัติเป็นเงินอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ (
e-money token)
ตามข้อกำหนดของ
Regulation
(
EU) 2023/1114
ของรัฐสภายุโรปและสภาแห่งสหภาพยุโรป ฉบับลงวันที่
31
พฤษภาคม 2566 ว่าด้วยตลาดสินทรัพย์คริปโท โทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับจะแสดงใน
World App
เมื่อท่านเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่าน โทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับโดย
vault
อาจเปลี่ยนแปลงได้เป็นครั้งคราว และจะไม่มีการรับประกันว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลที่รองรับจะยังคงสามารถใช้ได้ใน
vault
vault
ให้บริการร่วมกับ
smart contract
ของบุคคลภายนอก บุคคลหรือหน่วยงานอื่นใดนอกจากท่านจะไม่สามารถโต้ตอบกับ
vault
ของท่านหรือโทเคนดิจิทัลภายใน
vault
ของท่านได้ ทั้ง
TFH
และบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ จะไม่มีกุญแจสำหรับการจัดการดูแลระบบ (
administrative key)
หรือสิทธิในการเข้าถึง (ไม่ว่าในลักษณะที่เป็นสิทธิพิเศษหรือโดยประการอื่น) สำหรับเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่านหรือ
smart contract
ที่เกี่ยวข้อง การฝากหรือถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ จาก
vault
สำหรับบัญชีของท่านสามารถเกิดขึ้นได้ต่อเมื่อธุรกรรมนั้นลงนามด้วยกุญแจส่วนตัวที่เกี่ยวข้องของท่านตามที่อธิบายไว้ในข้อ
2.1
ของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ นั่นหมายความว่าหากท่านเสียสิทธิในการเข้าถึงหรือการควบคุมกุญแจส่วนตัวของท่าน ท่านจะไม่สามารถทำการฝากหรือถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจาก
vault
ได้ และบุคคลอื่นจะไม่สามารถให้ความช่วยเหลือท่านหรือดำเนินการดังกล่าวในนามของท่านได้ ดังนั้น การใช้
vault
จึงไม่ได้เป็นและไม่สามารถให้บริการดูแลทรัพย์ การรับฝากทรัพย์ หรือการโอน โดย
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ สำหรับโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ท่านอาจจัดเก็บไว้โดยใช้
vault
ในบัญชีของท่าน
smart contract
ที่ควบคุมฟังก์ชัน
vault
ซึ่งใช้ในการจัดเก็บโทเคน
WLD
สามารถดูได้โดยใช้บล็อกเชนที่นี่ เพื่อความชัดเจน การใช้ฟังก์ชัน
vault
ดังกล่าวและฟังก์ชันอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องจะอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของข้อกำหนดว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธการรับประกันที่ระบุในข้อ
12
ของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
2.7.2 ฟังก์ชัน
vault
ในปัจจุบัน
vault
มีฟีเจอร์ดังต่อไปนี้ ซึ่ง
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกอาจทำการเปลี่ยนแปลง ยกเลิก หรือเพิ่มได้ในอนาคต: การล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลไว้เป็นระยะเวลาที่กำหนด (
Locking)
ผลตอบแทน (
Yield
) การถอนและระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม
(Withdraw and Security Period)
การโอน
grant
ที่ได้รับไปยัง
vault
โดยตรง (
Grants to Vault
)
2.7.3 การล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลไว้เป็นระยะเวลาที่กำหนด (
Locking)
โดยการใช้
vault
ท่านตกลงที่จะล็อก     โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านไว้เป็นระยะเวลาที่กำหนด เมื่อท่านล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลโดยใช้
vault
โทเคนดิจิทัลจะถูกโอนจากวอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
ของท่านไปยัง
smart contract
แบบกระจายศูนย์ เมื่อโอนแล้ว โทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านี้จะถูก “ล็อก” ไว้ใน
vault
เป็นระยะเวลาหนึ่ง ซึ่งรวมถึงระยะเวลาที่โทเคนดิจิทัลดังกล่าวยังคงฝากอยู่ใน
vault
และระยะเวลาที่กำหนดล่วงหน้าที่เรียกว่า “ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม” หรือ
security period
ซึ่งอธิบายรายละเอียดเพิ่มเติมไว้ด้านล่างนี้ ในระหว่างที่โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านถูกล็อก ท่านจะไม่สามารถเข้าถึง โอน หรือทำธุรกรรมอื่นใดโดยใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านั้นได้ จนกว่าท่านจะขอถอนและรอให้ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมที่เกี่ยวข้องสิ้นสุดลง บุคคลใด ๆ ก็ตาม รวมถึง
TFH
หรือผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก จะไม่สามารถปลดล็อก ดูแล
(custody)
ควบคุม ถอน หรือโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ถูกล็อกของท่านได้ การจัดเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านใน
vault
และการยินยอมให้โทเคนเหล่านั้นอยู่ภายใต้ข้อจำกัดเกี่ยวกับการล็อกและการถอนจะไม่ถือเป็นการขาย การให้กู้ หรือการโอนสิทธิ กรรมสิทธิ์ หรือประโยชน์ใด ๆ ในโทเคนดิจิทัลให้กับ
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกอื่นใด
การล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านใน
vault
จะไม่เป็นการรับประกันว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านจะได้รับการจัดเก็บไว้อย่างปลอดภัยหรืออยู่ภายใต้การดูแล โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านจะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การคุ้มครองการประกันการฝาก
(deposit insurance)
หรือการคุ้มครองที่คล้ายกันใด ๆ และมูลค่าและ/หรือการใช้ประโยชน์ของโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ที่ท่านได้ล็อกไว้อาจเพิ่มขึ้นหรือลดลงได้ตลอดระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม นั่นหมายความว่ามูลค่าหรือการใช้ประโยชน์ของโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ที่ท่านล็อกไว้ใน
vault
ของท่านอาจลดลงหรือกลายเป็นศูนย์ในระหว่างระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าการถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ในบัญชีของท่านหลังจากระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมที่ใช้บังคับอาจทำให้ท่านได้รับคืนโทเคนดิจิทัลที่มีมูลค่าต่ำกว่าเดิมหรือไม่มีมูลค่าเลยเมื่อเทียบกับเวลาที่ท่านทำการล็อกโทเคนเหล่านั้นไว้ใน
vault
ของท่าน และ
TFH
หรือบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ จะไม่รับความเสี่ยงหรือความรับผิดชอบใด ๆ ต่อการลดลงของมูลค่าที่อาจเกิดขึ้น
2.7.4 ผลตอบแทน
ท่านอาจมีสิทธิได้รับสิ่งที่เรียกว่า “ผลตอบแทน” จากโทเคนดิจิทัลบางประเภทใน
vault
ของท่าน ผลตอบแทนนี้ซึ่งอาจอยู่ในรูปแบบของโทเคนดิจิทัลเพิ่มเติมนั้น ซึ่งมอบให้โดยบุคคลภายนอกผ่านการดำเนินการของ
smart contract
อีกชุดหนึ่งที่ท่านสามารถเข้าถึงได้โดยใช้อินเทอร์เฟสที่จัดหาให้ใน
World App
ทั้ง
TFH
และบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ จะไม่ใช้ ควบคุม รับเครดิตใด ๆ หรือจำหน่ายจ่ายโอนโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านโดยประการอื่น ดังนั้น ผลตอบแทนจึงไม่ใช่ดอกเบี้ยที่ผูกกับหรือเกิดขึ้นจากการดำเนินการอื่นใดนอกเหนือไปจากการล็อกโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านตามข้อกำหนดและข้อกำหนดเฉพาะที่กำหนด ผลตอบแทนใด ๆ ที่ท่านอาจได้รับจะมอบให้ท่านในรูปแบบของ
grant
ซึ่งมอบให้โดยบุคคลภายนอก โดยขึ้นอยู่กับการตัดสินใจของท่านในการจัดเก็บโทเคนดิจิทัลโดยใช้
vault
ข้อกำหนดเฉพาะที่จะเป็นตัวกำหนดการสร้างผลตอบแทน รวมถึงจำนวนผลตอบแทนที่จะเกิดขึ้นหรือระยะเวลาที่อาจมีผลตอบแทนเกิดขึ้น อาจเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือยกเลิกได้ทุกเมื่อ โดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
อาจมีการจำกัดจำนวนผลตอบแทนสูงสุดที่ท่านสามารถได้รับ รายละเอียดเหล่านี้จะแสดงควบคู่กับข้อมูล
vault
ของท่านและผ่านทางข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมใด ๆ ที่บุคคลภายนอก (ซึ่งเรียกว่า “ผู้ให้บริการ” ใน
World App)
ซึ่งเป็นผู้ให้ผลตอบแทนกำหนด ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมดังกล่าวจะรวมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ด้วย
TFH
ไม่ได้เป็นผู้จัดหาหรือผู้ให้บริการเกี่ยวกับผลตอบแทน
ผลตอบแทนใด ๆ ที่มีขึ้นจะถูกมอบให้แก่ท่านเมื่อการถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลซึ่งสร้างผลตอบแทนนั้นออกจาก
vault
ดำเนินการจนเสร็จสิ้น ซึ่งจะเกิดขึ้นหลังจากที่ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมที่ใช้บังคับสิ้นสุดลงเท่านั้น การถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจะเป็นเงื่อนไขสุดท้ายในการมอบ
grant
ที่เป็นผลตอบแทนใด ๆ นั่นหมายความว่าท่านไม่มีสิทธิในผลตอบแทนใด ๆ ที่มีขึ้นหรือที่จะมีขึ้นเว้นแต่และจนกว่าผลตอบแทนที่ได้รับจะถูกโอนเข้าไปยังวอลเล็ตแบบ
non-custodial
ของท่าน นอกจากนี้ นั่นยังหมายความว่า หากท่านเสียสิทธิในการเข้าถึงหรือการควบคุมกุญแจส่วนตัวของท่าน ท่านจะไม่สามารถทำการถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ที่จะทำให้ท่านมีสิทธิได้รับผลตอบแทน
2.7.5 การถอนและระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม (
Withdraw and Security Period)
ท่านสามารถขอถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจาก
vault
ของท่านได้ทุกเมื่อ โทเคนดิจิทัลที่ท่านขอถอนจาก
vault
จะถูกส่งคืนให้ท่านหลังจากระยะเวลาที่กำหนดล่วงหน้าที่เรียกว่า “ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรม” สิ้นสุดลง  ทุกครั้งที่ท่านขอถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจาก
vault
ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมช่วงใหม่จะเริ่มต้นและเริ่มนับถอยหลังจนกว่าโทเคนดิจิทัลเหล่านั้นจะถูกส่งคืนให้ท่าน ในช่วงเวลานี้ โทเคนดิจิทัลที่ท่านเลือกที่จะถอนจะยังคงถูกล็อกอยู่ และท่านยังสามารถยกเลิกการถอนได้ เมื่อระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมสิ้นสุดลง การถอนโทเคนดิจิทัลจะเสร็จสมบูรณ์ และโทเคนดิจิทัลพร้อมกับผลตอบแทนที่อาจมีขึ้นจะถูกส่งไปยังวอลเล็ตของท่าน ระยะเวลาหน่วงสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมจะระบุอยู่ใน
World App
เมื่อท่านเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่าน
2.7.6 การโอน
grant
ที่ได้รับไปยัง
vault
โดยตรง (
Grants to Vault)
เมื่อเลือกฟีเจอร์นี้ ท่านจะสามารถส่ง
WLD Grant
ไปยัง
vault
ในบัญชีของท่านได้โดยตรง แทนที่จะส่งไปยังวอลเล็ตของท่าน ท่านสามารถเปลี่ยนการตั้งค่านี้ได้ตลอดเวลา
2.7.7 TFH
และ
vault
ท่านสามารถเข้าถึงฟีเจอร์นี้ได้ผ่านทาง
World App
อย่างไรก็ตาม
TFH
ทำได้เพียงอ่านและแสดงข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องต่อท่านเท่านั้น
TFH
ไม่สามารถโอน ถอน หรือฝากโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ของท่าน และจะไม่มีสิทธิเข้าถึง
vault
ของท่าน
2.7.8 แอปพลิเคชันแบบกระจายศูนย์
ส่วนนี้จะไม่ใช้บังคับกับผู้ใช้ที่จดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีที่ตั้งอยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในประเทศดังกล่าว
ในกรณีที่มีความพร้อมในการให้บริการ
เราอาจมีฟังก์ชันที่อนุญาตให้ท่านเชื่อมต่อวอลเล็ตของท่านกับ แอปพลิเคชันแบบกระจายศูนย์ ท่านมีหน้าที่แต่เพียงผู้เดียวในดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าแอปพลิเคชันของบุคคลภายนอกเหล่านี้มีความมั่นคงปลอดภัย เราไม่มีอำนาจควบคุมแอปพลิเคชันของบุคคลภายนอก และไม่สามารถให้การสนับสนุนสำหรับปัญหาใด ๆ ที่ท่านอาจพบเมื่อเชื่อมต่อกับแอปพลิเคชันของบุคคลภายนอก
2.9 การสนับสนุนผู้ใช้
เราให้การสนับสนุนเพื่อช่วยเหลือผู้ใช้เกี่ยวกับฟีเจอร์และฟังก์ชันบางอย่างที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ หากต้องการติดต่อเรา เลือก “การสนับสนุน” จากเมนูในแอปหรือส่งอีเมลผ่านทาง
support@toolsforhumanity.com
2.10 อินเทอร์เฟส
World ID
World Foundation
(ไม่ใช่
TFH
) เป็นผู้ดูแลโปรโตคอล
World ID
และควบคุมการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
Orb
เพื่อยืนยัน
World ID
เราอาจเปิดให้ท่านใช้งาน
World ID
(ในลักษณะที่เป็นอินเทอร์เฟส) ผ่านทางบริการ โปรโตคอล
World ID
ช่วยให้ท่านพิสูจน์ว่าท่านเป็นมนุษย์จริงและมีเอกลักษณ์เฉพาะตัว
(real and unique human being)
และในขณะเดียวกันก็คุ้มครองความเป็นส่วนตัวของท่านด้วย
2.11 โปรแกรมเชิญชวน
ในกรณีที่มีความพร้อมในการให้บริการ เราอาจเปิดให้ท่านใช้งานฟีเจอร์
'
เชิญชวน
'
เมื่อใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวน ท่านจะสามารถเชิญชวนเพื่อนและครอบครัวให้ดาวน์โหลด
World App
และทำการยืนยันตัวตนเพื่อขอรับ
World ID
ได้ หากท่านใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวน ท่านตกลงยอมรับข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขดังต่อไปนี้
ค่าตอบแทนสำหรับการเข้าร่วมโปรแกรมเชิญชวนจะมอบให้โดย
World Assets Limited
โดย
World Assets Limited
อาจใช้ดุลยพินิจของตนแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการเสนอค่าตอบแทนให้ท่านสำหรับการเชิญชวนผู้ใช้ที่ยืนยันตัวตนเพื่อขอรับ
World ID
สำเร็จ เพื่อรับค่าตอบแทน ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามเงื่อนไขบางประการ ซึ่งจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบใน
World App
ทั้งนี้ จะมีการกำหนดจำนวนผู้ใช้สูงสุดที่ท่านสามารถแนะนำให้ใช้
World App
ได้ โดยจำนวนที่กำหนดดังกล่าวจะแสดงใน
World App
ท่านไม่จำเป็นต้องซื้อสินค้าหรือบริการใด ๆ เพื่อเข้าร่วมโปรแกรมเชิญชวน ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนมีไว้สำหรับการใช้งานส่วนบุคคลที่ไม่ใช่เชิงพาณิชย์เท่านั้น ท่านต้องใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนโดยสุจริตเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ที่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายเท่านั้น ท่านต้องไม่ (ก
)
ใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนหรือบริการในลักษณะที่เป็นการหลอกลวง ฉ้อโกง หรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
(
ข
)
ทำสิ่งใด ๆ ที่ทำให้แบรนด์ ค่าความนิยม หรือชื่อเสียงของเราได้รับความเสียหาย
(
ค
)
ส่งโฆษณาหรือสื่อส่งเสริมการขายโดยไม่ได้รับการร้องขอหรือโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
(
ง
)
กล่าวอ้างข้อมูลที่เป็นเท็จหรือทำให้เข้าใจผิด
(
จ
)
จ่ายเงินซื้อพื้นที่โฆษณาบนโปรแกรมค้นหาข้อมูล ใช้สื่อที่เสียค่าใช้จ่าย หรือดำเนินกิจกรรมที่คล้ายกันเพื่อชักชวนผู้ใช้ผ่านฟีเจอร์เชิญชวน และ (ฉ
)
ใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนเพื่อพยายามขอข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลจากผู้ใช้อื่น
ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนไม่สามารถใช้ได้ในทุกประเทศหรือพื้นที่ และไม่ได้เปิดให้ใช้สำหรับผู้ใช้ทุกคน โปรแกรมเชิญชวนจะไม่เปิดให้ใช้ในประเทศใด ๆ ที่ฟีเจอร์นี้หรือส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งของฟีเจอร์นี้อาจละเมิด (หรือทำให้เราละเมิด) ข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายใด ๆ ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ใช้ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนหากฟีเจอร์เชิญไม่เป็นไปตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับในประเทศของท่าน
ฟีเจอร์เชิญชวนจะเปิดให้ใช้งานโดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียว เราอาจเปลี่ยนแปลง แก้ไข ระงับ และยกเลิกฟีเจอร์นี้ได้ทุกเมื่อ
World Assets Limited
อาจปฏิเสธที่จะเสนอค่าตอบแทนให้ท่านสำหรับการเชิญชวนผู้ใช้ให้ยืนยันตัวตนเพื่อรับ
World ID
หาก
World Assets Limited
พิจารณาโดยใช้ดุลยพินิจของตนแต่เพียงผู้เดียวแล้วเห็นว่าท่านได้ละเมิดข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
2.12 WLD Grant
และ
WLD Reservation
หนึ่งในบริการของบุคคลภายนอกคือการขอใช้สิทธิรับโทเคน
WLD
เป็นจำนวนเล็กน้อยในช่วงเวลาแตกต่างกัน (“
WLD Grant”) WLD Grant
จัดหาให้โดย
World Assets Limited
ซึ่งเป็นบริษัทในเครือของ
Worldcoin Foundation
จำนวนที่แน่นอน ช่วงเวลาที่กำหนด และเวลาในการมอบ
WLD Grant
จะแสดงอยู่ใน
World App
แต่จะกำหนดโดย
World Assets Limited
แต่เพียงผู้เดียวเท่านั้น โดยสอดคล้องตามที่ระบุในข้อกำหนดเวอร์ชันก่อนหน้านี้
WLD Reservation
ที่มีอยู่ในเวลาก่อนหน้าจะไม่เป็นการรับประกันว่าท่านจะได้รับ
WLD Grant
ทั้งนี้ จำนวนที่แน่นอน ช่วงเวลาที่กำหนด และเวลาในการจองสิทธิเพื่อรับ
WLD
จะระบุใน
World App
แต่จะกำหนดโดย
World Assets Limited
แต่เพียงผู้เดียวเท่านั้น
WLD Reservation
อาจหมดอายุโดยมีหรือไม่มีการแจ้งล่วงหน้าใน
World App
ก็ได้ ไม่ว่าท่านจะได้รับ
WLD Reservation
หรือ
WLD Grant
ที่เกี่ยวข้องแล้วหรือไม่ก็ตาม
WLD Grant
และ
WLD Reservation
สามารถเพิกถอนได้ โดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของ
World Assets Limited
แต่เพียงผู้เดียว
2.13 Operator App
สำหรับ
Orb Operator
และพันธมิตรอื่น ๆ เรามี
Operator App
ที่ช่วยให้ท่านติดตามตรวจสอบกิจกรรมและสถิติที่เกี่ยวข้องกับท่านและธุรกิจของท่านในฐานะ
Orb Operator
นอกจากนี้ เรายังอาจมีฟีเจอร์บางอย่างที่ช่วยให้ท่านดำเนินธุรกิจในฐานะ
Orb Operator
2.14 Miniapps
“
Miniapps”
เป็นฟีเจอร์ของ
World App
ที่อนุญาตให้ท่านเข้าถึงแพลตฟอร์มซึ่งรวมแอปพลิเคชันขนาดเล็กที่สามารถเข้าถึงได้ภายใน
World App
เรามีสิทธิใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการกำหนดว่าจะแสดง
Miniapps
ภายใน
World App
อย่างไร ท่านต้องมีที่อยู่วอลเล็ต
World App
เพื่อเข้าถึง
Miniapps
ท่านรับทราบว่าในการแสดง
Miniapps TFH
จะให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มเทคโนโลยีที่เชื่อมต่อระหว่างผู้ใช้เท่านั้น ไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตาม
TFH
จะไม่ส่ง เก็บ ครอบครอง ดูแล หรือมีส่วนร่วมโดยประการอื่นกับ           สกุลเงินแบบดั้งเดิมหรือสกุลเงินดิจิทัลใด ๆ
TFH
จะไม่ทำธุรกรรม กระทำการในฐานะที่เป็นผู้ประมวลผลการชำระเงิน หรือมีส่วนร่วมในการประมวลผลธุรกรรมใด ๆ
TFH
ไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในธุรกรรม และ ไม่มีความรับผิดใด ๆ เกี่ยวกับธุรกรรมเหล่านี้
TFH
ไม่สามารถให้การสนับสนุนสำหรับปัญหาในการทำธุรกรรมได้
2.14.1 ธุรกรรมและการชำระเงินที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
Miniapps
Miniapps
จะแสดงอยู่ใน
World App
และอาจเสนอสินค้าหรือบริการที่ผู้ใช้
World App
สามารถซื้อได้โดยใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลในวอลเล็ต
World App
ของตน ธุรกรรมดังกล่าวจะเป็นธุรกรรมระหว่างท่านกับ
miniapp
นั้น และ
TFH
ไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในธุรกรรมดังกล่าว
ในการทำธุรกรรมดังกล่าว ท่านรับทราบว่าวอลเล็ต
World App
เป็นบริการในลักษณะที่ไม่ใช่การดูแลทรัพย์
(non-custodial) TFH
ไม่ได้จัดเก็บหรือดูแลโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่านและไม่ได้ทำธุรกรรม ส่ง ถือครอง หรือมีส่วนร่วมโดยประการอื่นในการทำธุรกรรมใด ๆ โทเคนดิจิทัลจะถูกจัดเก็บและส่งบนเครือข่ายบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้องเสมอ จะไม่มีการรับประกันว่าธุรกรรมจะดำเนินการอย่างถูกต้อง
TFH
เพียงเชื่อมต่อท่านกับบุคคลภายนอกในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
เท่านั้น และไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในธุรกรรมใด ๆ
TFH
ไม่มีบทบาทในการประมวลผลการชำระเงินและกำกับดูแลค่าธรรมเนียมการคืนเงินหรือค่าธรรมเนียมการยกเลิก
เมื่อท่านตัดสินใจที่จะทำธุรกรรม ท่านต้องส่งจำนวนและประเภทของโทเคนดิจิทัลที่ตกลงกันไว้
TFH
จะไม่ประมวลผลโทเคนดิจิทัลหรือสกุลเงินแบบดั้งเดิมของผู้ใช้ และไม่ได้ทำการโอนใด ๆ ในนามของผู้ใช้
TFH
จะไม่ดำเนินการ จัดการ ดูแล ตรวจสอบ หรือให้การรับประกันเกี่ยวกับธุรกรรมใด ๆ ในกรณีที่ธุรกรรมถูกส่งไปแต่ไม่ได้รับ ถูกตีกลับ ประมวลผลไม่ถูกต้อง หรือพบข้อผิดพลาดใด ๆ โดยประการอื่น ท่านและผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกต้องดำเนินการร่วมกันเพื่อแก้ไขปัญหานั้น ข้อพิพาท สิทธิเรียกร้อง การสูญเสีย ความเข้าใจผิด ข้อผิดพลาดทางเทคนิค หรือปัญหาใด ๆ (ทั้งที่เกิดขึ้นโดยบังเอิญและโดยเจตนา) ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการชำระเงินหรือธุรกรรมต้องได้รับการจัดการโดยตรงระหว่างท่านกับผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
TFH
จะไม่รับผิดชอบใด ๆ และจะไม่เป็นคู่กรณีในข้อพิพาทหรือการหารือเกี่ยวกับการชำระเงินใด ๆ และไม่รับผิดต่อการสูญเสียหรือค่าเสียหายที่อาจมีขึ้นแก่ฝ่ายที่เกี่ยวข้อง
ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการยอมรับความเสี่ยงของความผันผวนของราคาที่เกี่ยวข้องกับมูลค่าโทเคนดิจิทัล และท่านเข้าใจว่าภายในเวลาที่ท่านทำธุรกรรมเสร็จสิ้น มูลค่าโทเคนดิจิทัลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับธุรกรรมนั้นอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงไปอย่างมาก
2.14.2 บุคคลภายนอก
ผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการที่แสดงใน
miniapp
ใด ๆ นำเสนอและจัดการโดยบุคคลภายนอก โดยการใช้แพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่า
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นข้อกำหนดระหว่างท่านกับเรา ไม่ใช่กับ
miniapp
ใด ๆ โดยเฉพาะ
ท่านกำลังเข้าถึงแอปที่พัฒนาและ/หรือจัดหาให้โดยแอปของบุคคลภายนอก โดยบุคคลดังกล่าวต้องรับผิดชอบต่อ
miniapp
แต่เพียงผู้เดียว
TFH
เพียงให้สิทธิในการเข้าถึงผู้ให้บริการด้านการชำระเงินของบุคคลภายนอกผ่านวอลเล็ต
World App
เท่านั้น และไม่ได้ประมวลผลการชำระเงินหรือถือเงินไว้ด้วยตนเอง
miniapps
อาจมีข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมซึ่งเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการของตน ซึ่งท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามหากท่านยอมรับบริการของบุคคลดังกล่าว และ
ท่านรับทราบเต็มที่และยอมรับความเสี่ยงทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวข้องกับธุรกรรมอย่างชัดแจ้ง และตกลงว่าเราจะไม่ต้องรับผิดต่อความเสี่ยงหรือผลกระทบที่ไม่พึงประสงค์ใด ๆ จากธุรกรรมดังกล่าว
นักพัฒนา
miniapp
แต่ละรายที่แสดงอยู่ในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
ต้องรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวต่อเนื้อหา ผลิตภัณฑ์ สินค้า หรือบริการที่เสนอให้ท่านโดยตรงผ่านทาง
miniapp
ที่เกี่ยวข้อง หากท่านมีข้อสงสัยหรือข้อพิพาทใด ๆ กรุณาติดต่อกับนักพัฒนาดังกล่าวโดยตรง
ผู้ใช้ยอมรับความเสี่ยงทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการทำธุรกรรม รวมถึงความเสี่ยงที่จะไม่ได้รับผลตอบแทนจากการซื้อหรือขายสินทรัพย์ ในกรณีที่มีปัญหาเกี่ยวกับธุรกรรมใด ๆ
TFH
จะไม่สามารถช่วยแก้ไขปัญหาได้ และจะไม่รับผิดต่อปัญหาที่เกิดจากธุรกรรมใด ๆ
2.14.3 ค่าธรรมเนียม
TFH
เราอาจคิดค่าธรรมเนียมสำหรับการใช้แพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
เมื่อท่านทำธุรกรรมกับนักพัฒนา จำนวนค่าธรรมเนียมนี้จะแสดงให้ท่านเห็นภายในแพลตฟอร์ม ค่าธรรมเนียมดังกล่าวจะแสดงและเป็นปัจจุบันตามที่แสดงใน
Miniapps
และอาจมีการปรับปรุงและเปลี่ยนแปลงเป็นครั้งคราว
2.14.4 ภาษี
ท่านมีความรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการพิจารณาว่าภาษีจะมีผลบังคับกับธุรกรรมที่ดำเนินการผ่าน
Miniapps
หรือธุรกรรมใด ๆ ที่ท่านดำเนินการใน
Miniapps
หรือไม่และในขอบเขตใดบ้าง รวมทั้งมีหน้าที่ในการหัก จัดเก็บ รายงาน และส่งภาษีเป็นจำนวนที่ถูกต้องไปยังหน่วยงานภาษีที่เหมาะสม
2.14.5 ไม่มีการตรวจสอบทั่วไป
TFH
ไม่มีหน้าที่ในการตรวจสอบทั่วไปเกี่ยวกับข้อมูลที่สร้างโดยผู้ใช้ และไม่มีหน้าที่แสวงหาข้อเท็จจริงหรือสถานการณ์ที่บ่งชี้ถึงกิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมายใด ๆ ภายในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
อย่างไรก็ตาม หากเราทราบไม่ว่าจะด้วยวิธีใดก็ตามว่ามีการเสนอผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมายผ่านทาง
Miniapps
ให้กับผู้ใช้ที่อยู่ในสหภาพยุโรป เราจะแจ้งให้ผู้ใช้ที่ซื้อผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมายผ่าน
Miniapps
ทราบ
2.14.6 สิ่งที่ห้ามกระทำ
ผู้ใช้บริการ
Miniapps
ตกลงว่าจะไม่โพสต์หรือเผยแพร่เนื้อหาใด ๆ ที่ละเมิดกฎหมายหรือสิทธิของบุคคลภายนอก รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา สิทธิในความเป็นส่วนตัว หรือสิทธิในการนำภาพลักษณ์ของบุคคลไปใช้ในทางพาณิชย์
นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ดำเนินการใด ๆ ซึ่ง
ผิดกฎหมาย เป็นการฉ้อโกง หรือเป็นอันตราย
รบกวนหรือขัดขวางการทำงานของ
Miniapps
ละเมิดข้อกำหนดใด ๆ ที่ระบุในแนวทางการใช้งานแอปของเรา และ
เกี่ยวข้องกับเนื้อหาที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตตามแนวทางการใช้งานแอป
2.14.7 การแจ้งเตือนเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมาย
World App
มีกลไกที่เข้าถึงได้ง่ายและใช้งานง่ายสำหรับผู้ใช้ในการแจ้งเตือนเราเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายในแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
เราจะดำเนินการตรวจสอบรายงานดังกล่าวอย่างรวดเร็ว
2.14.8
การลบเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมาย
หากเราพิจารณาแล้วเห็นว่า
miniapp
ใดมีเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายหรือเสนอผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมาย
miniapp
นั้นจะถูกลบออกจากแพลตฟอร์ม
Miniapps
ทั้งนี้
TFH
จะจัดทำคำชี้แจงเหตุผลโดยย่อที่ชัดเจนและเฉพาะเจาะจงเพื่อแจ้งให้ผู้โพสต์เนื้อหาหรือบริการที่ผิดกฎหมายทราบ
การบังคับใช้ข้อจำกัดใด ๆ โดย
World App
ต่อผู้ใช้จะดำเนินการอย่างรอบคอบ เป็นกลาง และได้สัดส่วน
ผู้ใช้ที่เชื่อว่าเนื้อหาของตนถูกลบหรือการเข้าถึงเนื้อหาถูกปิดกั้นโดยไม่เป็นธรรมสามารถติดต่อเราได้ที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
เพื่ออุทธรณ์การตัดสินใจนั้น เรามีระบบสำหรับยื่นข้อร้องเรียนทางอิเล็กทรอนิกส์โดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่าย ซึ่งช่วยให้ผู้ใช้สามารถคัดค้านการตัดสินใจของเราเกี่ยวกับการลบเนื้อหา การระงับการให้บริการ การยกเลิกบัญชี หรือการจำกัดการสร้างรายได้เนื่องจากเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายหรือการละเมิดข้อกำหนดที่มีการกล่าวอ้าง
2.14.9 การกลั่นกรองเนื้อหา
TFH
สงวนสิทธิในการระงับการให้บริการแก่ผู้ใช้ที่แสดงเนื้อหาที่ผิดกฎหมายอย่างชัดเจนบ่อยครั้งเป็นระยะเวลาตามสมควรหลังจากที่ได้ออกคำเตือนล่วงหน้าแล้วหากกฎหมายกำหนด นอกจากนี้
TFH
อาจระงับการประมวลผลการแจ้งเตือนและการร้องเรียนจากผู้ใช้ที่มีข้อกล่าวอ้างที่ไม่มีมูลความจริงบ่อยครั้งไว้เป็นการชั่วคราว
2.15 ชื่อผู้ใช้
ชื่อผู้ใช้
World App
ของท่านไม่จำเป็นต้องเป็นชื่อจริงของท่าน ในการเลือกชื่อผู้ใช้ ท่านมีหน้าที่ต้องปฏิบัติตามนโยบายเกี่ยวกับชื่อผู้ใช้ฉบับปรับปรุงล่าสุด
3. การซื้อ ค่าธรรมเนียม และภาษี
3.1 ค่าธรรมเนียมการทำธุรกรรม
โดยการใช้บริการ ท่านตกลงว่าจะชำระค่าธรรมเนียมที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด รวมถึงค่าธรรมเนียมการทำธุรกรรมสำหรับการแลกเปลี่ยนและการทำธุรกรรมเกี่ยวกับโทเคนดิจิทัล เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบถึงค่าธรรมเนียมที่ใช้บังคับก่อนที่ท่านจะทำธุรกรรม หากท่านใช้บริการชำระเงินของบุคคลภายนอก ค่าธรรมเนียมธนาคาร ค่าธรรมเนียมบัตรเครดิต และค่าธรรมเนียมบัตรเดบิตที่เรียกเก็บสำหรับการซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ อาจถูกหักออกจากจำนวนเงินที่ชำระสำหรับการซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน นอกจากนี้ ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบในการชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเพิ่มเติมใด ๆ ที่เรียกเก็บโดยผู้ให้บริการทางการเงินของท่าน
3.2 ค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่าย
การโต้ตอบกับบล็อกเชนมีค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่าย ค่าธรรมเนียมเครือข่ายจะถูกเรียกเก็บโดยและชำระให้กับเครือข่ายบล็อกเชน (ไม่ใช่เรา) สำหรับการอำนวยความสะดวกในการโต้ตอบ    ใด ๆ ในบางกรณีท่านอาจมีสิทธิทำธุรกรรมโดยไม่ต้องเสียค่าธรรมเนียมการทำธุรกรรม (
gas-free transaction)
เป็นจำนวนครั้งที่กำหนดภายในระยะเวลาที่กำหนดซึ่งขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจอันเป็นที่สุดของ
TFH
ธุรกรรมดังกล่าวอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของมูลค่าการทำธุรกรรมขั้นต่ำซึ่ง
TFH
อาจปรับเปลี่ยนได้ในภายหลัง
3.3 ภาษี
ท่านมีความรับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการพิจารณาว่าภาษีจะมีผลบังคับกับธุรกรรมที่ดำเนินการผ่านบริการหรือไม่และในขอบเขตใดบ้าง รวมทั้งมีหน้าที่ในการหัก จัดเก็บ รายงาน และส่งภาษีเป็นจำนวนที่ถูกต้องไปยังหน่วยงานภาษีที่เหมาะสม
3.4 การเปลี่ยนแปลง
ค่าธรรมเนียมทั้งหมดจะแสดงและเป็นปัจจุบันตามที่แสดงในบริการ และอาจมีการปรับปรุงและเปลี่ยนแปลงเป็นครั้งคราว
4. ปัจจัยเสี่ยง
4.1 ไม่ใช่เงินตราที่ใช้ชำระหนี้ได้ตามกฎหมาย
โทเคนดิจิทัลไม่ใช่เงินตราที่ใช้ชำระหนี้ได้ตามกฎหมาย ไม่ได้รับการรับรองจากรัฐบาล และบัญชีโทเคนดิจิทัลและยอดคงเหลือในบริการไม่อยู่ภายใต้การคุ้มครองของ
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
,
Securities Investor Protection Corporation
หรือการคุ้มครองที่คล้ายกันในประเทศอื่น ๆ เราไม่ใช่ธนาคารและไม่ให้บริการดูแลทรัพย์สิน (
fiduciary service
)  ธุรกรรมที่ดำเนินการผ่าน
World App
ส่วนใหญ่ไม่อยู่ภายใต้การกำกับดูแลในหลายประเทศ เราไม่รับประกันการทำงานของบล็อกเชนที่เรารับรอง ซึ่งอาจนำไปสู่ความล่าช้า การขัดกันแห่งผลประโยชน์ หรือการตัดสินใจเกี่ยวกับการดำเนินงานโดยบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งทำให้เจ้าของโทเคนดิจิทัลบางรายเสียประโยชน์ หรือทำให้ท่านไม่สามารถทำธุรกรรมผ่านทางบริการได้จนเสร็จสมบูรณ์ รายละเอียดธุรกรรมที่ท่านส่งผ่านบริการอาจไม่สมบูรณ์ หรืออาจเกิดความล่าช้าอย่างมีนัยสำคัญบนบล็อกเชนที่เกี่ยวข้อง และเราจะไม่รับผิดชอบสำหรับธุรกรรมที่ไม่ได้รับการยืนยันหรือไม่สามารถประมวลผลได้ตามที่คาดหวัง จะไม่มีการรับประกันหรือการรับรองว่าการโอนที่ดำเนินการผ่านบริการจะส่งผลให้เป็นการโอนกรรมสิทธิ์หรือสิทธิในโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ได้สำเร็จ นอกจากนี้ อาจมีความเสี่ยงเฉพาะที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการใช้โทเคนดิจิทัลบางประเภท เช่น โทเคน
WLD
ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมเกี่ยวกับความเสี่ยงเฉพาะที่เกี่ยวข้องกับโทเคน
WLD
ได้ที่นี่
4.2 เทคโนโลยีใหม่
บริการของเราเป็นเทคโนโลยีใหม่ แม้ว่าซอฟต์แวร์นี้จะได้รับการทดสอบอย่างครอบคลุมแล้ว แต่ซอฟต์แวร์ที่ใช้สำหรับบริการยังค่อนข้างใหม่และอาจมีข้อบกพร่องหรือช่องโหว่ด้านความปลอดภัย นอกจากนี้ ซอฟต์แวร์ยังอยู่ระหว่างการพัฒนาและอาจมีการเปลี่ยนแปลงอย่างมากเมื่อเวลาผ่านไป ซึ่งอาจไม่ตรงกับความคาดหวังของผู้ใช้
4.3 ความเสี่ยงด้านความปลอดภัยของข้อมูล
โทเคนดิจิทัลและการใช้บริการอาจถูกยึดหรือโจรกรรมได้ แฮกเกอร์หรือกลุ่มหรือองค์กรผู้ไม่หวังดีอื่น ๆ อาจพยายามแทรกแซงบริการในหลายวิธี รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงการโจมตีด้วยมัลแวร์ การโจมตีโดยปฏิเสธการให้บริการ (
denial of service attack)
การโจมตีต่อระบบฉันทามติ (
consensus-based attack)
การโจมตีแบบ
Sybil
การโจมตีแบบ
smurfing
และการโจมตีแบบ
spoofing
นอกจากนี้ เนื่องจากเครือข่ายบล็อกเชนที่เรารับรอง เช่น โปรโตคอล
Ethereum
ทำงานโดยอิงตามซอฟต์แวร์โอเพ่นซอร์ส ซอฟต์แวร์ที่เป็นพื้นฐานของบริการอาจมีข้อบกพร่องหรือจุดอ่อนที่ตั้งใจหรือไม่ตั้งใจ ซึ่งอาจส่งผลกระทบต่อบริการในทางลบ หรือทำให้ผู้ใช้สูญเสียโทเคนดิจิทัลหรือสูญเสียความสามารถในการเข้าถึงหรือควบคุมวอลเล็ตของตนผ่านบริการ ในกรณีที่เกิดข้อบกพร่องหรือจุดอ่อนของซอฟต์แวร์ดังกล่าว เราอาจไม่มีวิธีการแก้ไขข้อบกพร่องหรือจุดอ่อนของซอฟต์แวร์นั้น และเราจะไม่รับประกันว่าผู้ใช้จะได้รับทางเยียวยา การคืนเงิน หรือการชดเชยใด ๆ
4.4 ความถูกต้อง
แม้ว่าเราตั้งใจที่จะมอบข้อมูลที่ถูกต้องและเป็นปัจจุบัน แต่ข้อมูลที่มอบให้ผ่านบริการ (รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงเนื้อหา) อาจไม่ถูกต้อง ครบถ้วน หรือเป็นปัจจุบันเสมอไป และอาจมีความไม่ถูกต้องทางเทคนิคหรือข้อผิดพลาดในการพิมพ์ ในความพยายามที่จะมอบข้อมูลที่ครบถ้วนและถูกต้องที่สุดเท่าที่จะเป็นไปได้ เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต ข้อมูลอาจมีการเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือปรับปรุงเป็นครั้งคราวโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบ รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับนโยบาย ผลิตภัณฑ์ และบริการของเรา ดังนั้น ท่านควรตรวจสอบข้อมูลทั้งหมดก่อนที่จะอ้างอิงข้อมูลนั้น และการตัดสินใจทั้งหมดที่อิงตามข้อมูลที่มอบให้ผ่านบริการจะถือเป็นความรับผิดชอบของท่านแต่เพียงผู้เดียว และเราจะไม่มีความรับผิดต่อการตัดสินใจดังกล่าว
4.5 ความพร้อมใช้งาน
แม้ว่าเราพยายามที่จะให้บริการที่ยอดเยี่ยมแก่ท่าน เราไม่รับประกันว่าบริการจะพร้อมใช้งานเสมอโดยไม่หยุดชะงัก บริการอาจไม่สามารถใช้งานได้ชั่วคราวเป็นครั้งคราวเพื่อทำการบำรุงรักษาหรือด้วยเหตุผลอื่น ๆ เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อข้อผิดพลาด การละเว้น การหยุดชะงัก การลบ ข้อบกพร่อง ความล่าช้าในการดำเนินการหรือการส่ง การขัดข้องของสายการสื่อสาร การโจรกรรมหรือการทำลาย หรือการเข้าถึงโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต หรือการเปลี่ยนแปลงการสื่อสารของผู้ใช้ เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อปัญหาหรือความผิดพลาดทางเทคนิคใด ๆ ของเครือข่ายหรือสายโทรศัพท์ ระบบออนไลน์ของคอมพิวเตอร์ เซิร์ฟเวอร์หรือผู้ให้บริการ อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์ ซอฟต์แวร์ ความล้มเหลวของอีเมลหรือโปรแกรมต่าง ๆ ซึ่งเกิดขึ้นจากปัญหาทางเทคนิคหรือความแออัดของการจราจรบนอินเทอร์เน็ตหรือในบริการ หรือสิ่งต่าง ๆ ข้างต้นรวมกัน รวมถึงการบาดเจ็บหรือความเสียหายต่อผู้ใช้หรือคอมพิวเตอร์ของบุคคลอื่นใดซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับหรือเกิดจากการมีส่วนร่วมกับหรือการดาวน์โหลดข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อการสูญเสียหรือความเสียหาย ค่าเสียหายทางการเงินหรือการสูญเสียผลกำไร การสูญเสียธุรกิจ หรือการบาดเจ็บส่วนบุคคลหรือการเสียชีวิตใด ๆ ซึ่งเกิดจากการที่บุคคลใดใช้บริการ เนื้อหาใด ๆ ที่โพสต์บนหรือผ่านทางบริการหรือส่งไปยังผู้ใช้ หรือการโต้ตอบใด ๆ ระหว่างผู้ใช้บริการ ไม่ว่าจะผ่านช่องทางออนไลน์หรือออฟไลน์ก็ตาม
4.6 กระบวนการแยกตัว หรือ
Fork
ซอฟต์แวร์ที่ใช้สร้าง
WLD
เป็นซอฟต์แวร์โอเพ่นซอร์สซึ่งเปิดให้บุคคลทั่วไปทำสำเนาและนำไปใช้ได้โดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่าย ซึ่งหมายความว่าทุกคนสามารถสร้าง
WLD
ฉบับดัดแปลงได้ โดยกระบวนการดังกล่าวจะเรียกว่า “กระบวนการ
fork
” ในกรณีที่เกิดกระบวนการ
fork
หรือการหยุดชะงักของเครือข่ายโทเคนดิจิทัลอื่น ๆ เราอาจไม่สามารถให้การสนับสนุนกิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับกระบวนการ
fork
ได้ ธุรกรรมอาจไม่เสร็จสมบูรณ์ เสร็จสมบูรณ์บางส่วน เสร็จสมบูรณ์อย่างไม่ถูกต้อง หรือล่าช้าอย่างมากเมื่อเกิดกระบวนการ
fork
เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อการสูญเสียใด ๆ ที่มีขึ้นแก่ท่าน ซึ่งเกิดขึ้นจากกระบวนการ
fork
หรือการหยุดชะงักของเครือข่ายอื่น ๆ ไม่ว่าทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วน
4.7 บริการของบุคคลภายนอก
ในกรณีที่ทำได้ (ดูข้อ
5)
เราอาศัยผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกในการให้บริการฟีเจอร์และฟังก์ชันบางส่วนภายในแอป เช่น ความสามารถในการซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลด้วยสกุลเงินแบบดั้งเดิม หรือความสามารถในการแลกเปลี่ยนสินทรัพย์ดิจิทัลหนึ่งเป็นอีกสินทรัพย์หนึ่ง เราไม่ได้เป็น              ผู้ให้บริการดังกล่าวและไม่ได้เป็นคู่สัญญาในการทำธุรกรรมดังกล่าว ท่านต้องพึ่งพาผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกในการใช้บริการนั้น และท่านต้องมีบัญชีกับผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกและยอมรับข้อกำหนดของบุคคลภายนอกนั้น เราไม่สามารถช่วยเหลือท่านได้หากท่านพบปัญหาในการใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอก และเราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อธุรกรรมใด ๆ ที่ท่านดำเนินการโดยใช้ผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
5. ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา
5.1 การเป็นเจ้าของ
ซอฟต์แวร์ แอปพลิเคชัน บริการ เนื้อหา เครื่องหมาย (ตามคำจำกัดความด้านล่างนี้) และการออกแบบของเรา และการเลือก และการจัดเรียงเนื้อหาในบริการ (“ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา”) ได้รับการคุ้มครองโดยลิขสิทธิ์ เครื่องหมายการค้า สิทธิบัตร และสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาอื่น ๆ และกฎหมายของสหรัฐอเมริกาและประเทศอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้อง ท่านตกลงว่าจะปฏิบัติตามสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาและกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด รวมถึงประกาศหรือข้อจำกัดเกี่ยวกับเครื่องหมายการค้าหรือลิขสิทธิ์ที่แสดงอยู่ในข้อตกลงหรือบริการ ท่านต้องไม่ลบประกาศเกี่ยวกับลิขสิทธิ์ เครื่องหมายการค้า หรือสิทธิความเป็นเจ้าของ ใด ๆ ที่แสดงอยู่ในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา
5.2 เครื่องหมายการค้า
ชื่อ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
โลโก้
World App
และโลโก้และสโลแกนที่เกี่ยวข้องทั้งหมดเป็นเครื่องหมายการค้าหรือเครื่องหมายบริการของ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
หรือผู้อนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิของ
Tools for Humanity Corporation
(“เครื่องหมาย”) ท่านต้องไม่คัดลอก เลียนแบบ หรือใช้เครื่องหมายทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรจากเรา เครื่องหมายการค้า ชื่อ หรือโลโก้อื่น ๆ ทั้งหมดที่กล่าวถึงในบริการเป็นทรัพย์สินของเจ้าของสิทธิที่เกี่ยวข้อง และท่านต้องไม่คัดลอก เลียนแบบ หรือใช้สิ่งเหล่านั้นทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรจากเจ้าของเครื่องหมายการค้าที่เกี่ยวข้อง การแสดงเครื่องหมายของบุคคลอื่นในบริการจะไม่ถือเป็นการอนุมัติ การรับรอง หรือการแนะนำโดยเราแต่อย่างใด
6. การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิและข้อจำกัด
6.1 การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิ
โดยมีเงื่อนไขว่าท่านมีสิทธิใช้บริการและท่านปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ เราอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิอันจำกัดในการเข้าถึงและใช้บริการ
6.2 ข้อจำกัดของการอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิ
ท่านต้องไม่นำเนื้อหาไปเผยแพร่ซ้ำผ่านทางเว็บไซต์ใด ๆ บนอินเทอร์เน็ต อินทราเน็ต หรือเอ็กซ์ทราเน็ต หรือนำข้อมูลไปรวมในฐานข้อมูลหรือการรวบรวมข้อมูลอื่น ๆ และต้องไม่นำเนื้อหาไปใช้ในลักษณะอื่นใดที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตโดยเด็ดขาด ท่านต้องไม่ใช้บริการในลักษณะอื่นใดนอกเหนือจากที่ได้รับอนุญาตอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้โดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรล่วงหน้าจากเราโดยเด็ดขาด และการดำเนินการดังกล่าวจะทำให้การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธินี้สิ้นสุดลง การใช้บริการในลักษณะที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตดังกล่าวอาจเป็นการละเมิดกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงกฎหมายลิขสิทธิ์และเครื่องหมายการค้า และข้อบังคับและกฎหมายว่าด้วยการสื่อสารที่ใช้บังคับ เว้นแต่เมื่อระบุไว้อย่างชัดเจนในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ ไม่มีส่วนใดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่สามารถตีความได้ว่าเป็นการอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา ไม่ว่าจะตามหลักกฎหมายปิดปาก หรือโดยปริยาย หรือโดยประการอื่น เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราสามารถเพิกถอนการอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธินี้ได้ตลอดเวลาโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบล่วงหน้า ไม่ว่าจะโดยมีเหตุหรือไม่มีเหตุก็ตาม
6.3 รัฐบาล
หากท่านเป็นผู้ใช้ปลายทางซึ่งเป็นรัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกา เราอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิในการใช้บริการในลักษณะที่เป็น “สินค้าพาณิชย์ (
Commercial Item)
” ตามคำจำกัดความในประมวลข้อบังคับของรัฐบาลกลางสหรัฐอเมริกา (
S. Code of Federal Regulations)
(ดู
48 C.F.R. § 2.101)
และสิทธิที่เรามอบให้ท่านในการใช้บริการเป็นสิทธิเดียวกันกับที่เรามอบให้กับผู้ใช้รายอื่นตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
7. การใช้งานที่อนุญาต
7.1 ท่านต้องใช้บริการเพื่อการใช้งานส่วนบุคคลของท่านเองเท่านั้น เราสงวนสิทธิไม่ว่าในเวลาใดก็ตามโดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการตรวจสอบ ยกเลิก หรือระงับสิทธิของท่านในการเข้าถึงหรือใช้บริการตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ รายการการใช้งานที่ไม่อนุญาตเป็นเพียงตัวอย่างเท่านั้น และไม่ใช่รายการที่ครบถ้วนสมบูรณ์ เราอาจใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการเพิ่มหรือลบการใช้งานที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
7.2 การใช้งานที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาตรวมถึง
กิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมาย
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่ละเมิดหรืออำนวยความสะดวกในการละเมิดมาตรการลงโทษซึ่งบังคับใช้โดย
OFAC
ละเมิดหรืออำนวยความสะดวกในการละเมิดกฎหมายใด ๆ ในประเทศที่เราดำเนินธุรกิจ มีความเกี่ยวข้องกับรายได้จากกิจกรรมที่ผิดกฎหมายใด ๆ หรือเป็นการตีพิมพ์หรือเผยแพร่วัสดุหรือข้อมูลที่ผิดกฎหมายใด ๆ
การใช้งานที่มากเกินไปหรือการแฮ็ก
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่ก่อให้เกิดภาระที่ไม่สมเหตุสมผลหรือมากเกินไปต่อโครงสร้างพื้นฐานของเรา แทรกแซงในทางที่ก่อให้เกิดความเสียหาย ขัดขวางการทำงาน หรือเข้ายึดระบบ ข้อมูล หรือสารสนเทศใด ๆ ส่งหรืออัปโหลดเนื้อหาใด ๆ ไปยังบริการที่มีไวรัส โทรจัน เวิร์ม หรือโปรแกรมที่เป็นภัยหรือเป็นอันตรายอื่น ๆ หรือพยายามเข้าถึงระบบคอมพิวเตอร์หรือเครือข่ายที่เชื่อมต่อกับบริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
การละเมิดผู้อื่น
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่แทรกแซงการเข้าถึงหรือการใช้บริการของบุคคลอื่น หมิ่นประมาท ละเมิด  ขู่กรรโชก คุกคาม สะกดรอย ข่มขู่ หรือฝ่าฝืนความเป็นส่วนตัว ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา หรือสิทธิตามกฎหมาย
อื่น ๆ ของบุคคลอื่น ยุยง ข่มขู่ กระตุ้น ส่งเสริม หรือสนับสนุนความเกลียดชัง การแบ่งแยกเชื้อชาติ หรือการกระทำที่รุนแรงต่อผู้อื่น หรือเก็บเกี่ยว สกัด หรือเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลของผู้ใช้อื่นจากบริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
การฉ้อโกงและการปฏิบัติทางการค้าที่ไม่เป็นธรรมอื่น ๆ
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่ดำเนินการเพื่อฉ้อโกงเรา ผู้ใช้ของเรา หรือบุคคลอื่นใด มอบข้อมูลที่เป็นเท็จ ไม่ถูกต้อง หรือทำให้เข้าใจผิดแก่เรา สัญญาผลตอบแทนที่สูงเกินไปหรือขายบริการที่ไม่มีประโยชน์ที่แท้จริงแก่ผู้ซื้อ หรือส่งเสริมการปฏิบัติที่เป็นการเอารัดเอาเปรียบและหลอกลวงอื่น ๆ รวมถึงสลากกินแบ่ง การจับฉลาก การประมูลแบบมีค่าธรรมเนียมการเสนอราคา (
bidding fee auction)
การแข่งขัน การชิงโชค การพนัน หรือเกมเสี่ยงโชคอื่น ๆ ที่ผิดกฎหมาย
การละเมิดทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา
: กิจกรรมใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการขาย การเผยแพร่ หรือการอนุญาตให้เข้าถึงเพลง ภาพยนตร์ หรือซอฟต์แวร์ปลอมแปลง หรือเนื้อหาที่มีลิขสิทธิ์อื่น ๆ โดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตอย่างถูกต้องจากผู้ถือสิทธิ ใช้ทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา (รวมถึงเครื่องหมาย) โดยไม่ได้รับความยินยอมอย่างชัดแจ้งหรือในลักษณะที่ทำให้เราหรือแบรนด์ของเราเสียหาย แสดงโดยนัยถึงการรับรองหรือความสัมพันธ์กับเราโดยไม่เป็นความจริง หรือละเมิดลิขสิทธิ์ เครื่องหมายการค้า สิทธิในการนำภาพลักษณ์ของบุคคลไปใช้ในทางพาณิชย์หรือความเป็นส่วนตัว หรือสิทธิความเป็นเจ้าของอื่นใดตามกฎหมาย
8. Orb Operator
เราเป็นพันธมิตรกับผู้รับจ้างอิสระในประเทศที่เรียกว่า “
Orb Operator”
ซึ่งอำนวยความสะดวกในการลงทะเบียนผู้ใช้และช่วยตอบคำถามที่ท่านอาจมีเกี่ยวกับเรา
Orb Operator
เหล่านี้ได้รับการฝึกอบรมและมีความรู้เกี่ยวกับ
World Network
เป็นอย่างดี อย่างไรก็ตาม เราไม่มีอำนาจควบคุม
Orb Operator
และปฏิเสธความรับผิดทั้งหมดสำหรับสิ่งที่
Orb Operator
กล่าวและความประพฤติของ
Orb Operator
Orb Operator
ไม่ใช่ตัวแทนหรือพนักงานของเราไม่ว่าในทางใดก็ตาม การดำเนินการ ฟีเจอร์ กระบวนการ นโยบาย มาตรฐาน หรือความพยายามอื่น ๆ ที่ดำเนินการโดย
TFH
เพื่อประโยชน์ของผู้ใช้ไม่ได้บ่งบอกถึงความสัมพันธ์ในลักษณะของการจ้างงานหรือตัวการ/ตัวแทนกับ
Orb Operator
แต่อย่างใด
9. การระงับ
เราอาจระงับและจำกัดสิทธิของท่านในการเข้าถึงบริการ (
i)
หากเราจำเป็นต้องดำเนินการดังกล่าวตามหมายเรียก คำสั่งศาล หรือคำสั่งที่มีผลผูกพันของหน่วยงานของรัฐ ซึ่งมีผลบังคับตามที่ปรากฏในเอกสาร
(ii)
หากเรามีเหตุให้สงสัยได้ว่าท่านใช้บริการในลักษณะที่เป็นการใช้งานที่ไม่ได้รับอนุญาต
(iii)
หากการใช้บริการของท่านอยู่ภายใต้การดำเนินคดี การสอบสวน หรือการดำเนินการโดยหน่วยงานรัฐซึ่งอยู่ระหว่างการดำเนินการ และ/หรือเราเห็นว่ามีความเสี่ยงสูงที่จะเกิดการไม่ปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายหรือข้อบังคับซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับการดำเนินการของท่าน
(iv)
หากพันธมิตรทางธุรกิจซึ่งให้การสนับสนุนบริการของเราไม่สามารถสนับสนุนการใช้งานของท่านได้
(v)
หากท่านดำเนินการใด ๆ ที่เราเห็นว่าเป็นการหลบเลี่ยงการควบคุมของเรา (รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงการพยายามสร้างบัญชีหลายบัญชี)
10. ไม่ใช่การเสนอขายหลักทรัพย์หรือประโยชน์ที่อ้างอิงกับสินค้าโภคภัณฑ์
เนื้อหาของบริการไม่ถือเป็นการเสนอซื้อหรือเสนอขาย หรือการชักชวนให้ซื้อหรือขายการลงทุน หลักทรัพย์ ผลประโยชน์ในการเป็นหุ้นส่วน สินค้าโภคภัณฑ์ หรือเครื่องมือทางการเงินอื่น ๆ นอกจากนี้ เนื้อหาหรือบริการจะไม่ถือเป็นและต้องไม่ถูกใช้เพื่อหรือในลักษณะที่เป็นการเสนอหรือการชักชวนโดยบุคคลใดก็ตามในรัฐหรือประเทศใด ๆ ที่การเสนอหรือการชักชวนดังกล่าวไม่ได้รับอนุญาตหรือไม่สามารถทำได้ หรือการเสนอหรือการชักชวนต่อบุคคลใด ซึ่งการเสนอหรือการชักชวนต่อบุคคลนั้นไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
11. เนื้อหา
11.1 การอ้างอิงเนื้อหา การเปลี่ยนแปลงบริการ
ข้อมูลและเนื้อหาที่เรามอบให้ท่านผ่านบริการ (“เนื้อหา”) มีวัตถุประสงค์เพื่อเป็นข้อมูลทั่วไปเท่านั้น และเท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราไม่รับประกันความถูกต้อง ประโยชน์ หรือความครบถ้วนของเนื้อหานั้น ท่านต้องรับความเสี่ยงจากการอ้างอิงเนื้อหาของเราด้วยตัวท่านเอง เราจะไม่รับผิดหรือรับผิดชอบต่อการกระทำใด ๆ ที่ท่านได้ดำเนินการไปหรือไม่ได้ดำเนินการเนื่องจากเนื้อหานั้น หรือต่อบุคคลที่ได้รับการแบ่งปันเนื้อหาจากท่าน คำแถลงของผู้ใช้รายอื่นที่อธิบายถึงการใช้บริการของเราซึ่งแสดงอยู่ในบริการหรือที่อื่น ๆ จะไม่ถือเป็นการที่เรารับรองคำแถลงของบุคคลดังกล่าวหาก
คำแถลงนั้นไม่สอดคล้องกับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้หรือเนื้อหาของเรา เราอาจปรับปรุงเนื้อหาเป็นครั้งคราว
แต่เนื้อหาดังกล่าวอาจไม่ครบถ้วนหรือเป็นปัจจุบัน และเราไม่มีหน้าที่ต่อท่านในการปรับปรุงเนื้อหาหรือส่วนอื่น ๆ ของบริการ เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงหรือยุติการจัดหาเนื้อหาหรือบริการส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งหรือทั้งหมดไม่ว่าชั่วคราวหรือถาวรโดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้า เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราจะไม่รับผิดต่อการเปลี่ยนแปลง การระงับ หรือการยุติการจัดหาเนื้อหาหรือบริการส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งหรือทั้งหมด
11.2 บริการและเนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอก
เราอาจแสดงลิงก์ที่นำไปยังสื่อการเรียนรู้ การสัมมนาผ่านเว็บ การพบปะ และการประชาสัมพันธ์บนแพลตฟอร์มสื่อสังคมออนไลน์ (“บริการของบุคคลภายนอก”) ซึ่งช่วยให้เกิดการแบ่งปันและการทำงานร่วมกันระหว่างผู้ใช้กับบุคคลภายนอก หากท่านแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล รูปภาพ ความคิดเห็น เนื้อหา หรือข้อมูลอื่น ๆ บนบริการของบุคคลภายนอก ท่านต้องรับความเสี่ยงจากการดำเนินการดังกล่าวด้วยตัวเอง และการใช้บริการดังกล่าวจะอยู่ภายใต้ข้อกำหนดการใช้งานและนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของบริการของบุคคลภายนอก ไม่ใช่ของเรา ท่านควรตรวจสอบข้อกำหนดการให้บริการที่ใช้บังคับกับบริการของบุคคลภายนอกแต่ละรายเพื่อทำความเข้าใจสิทธิของท่านและวิธีที่แพลตฟอร์มเหล่านั้นใช้ข้อมูลของท่าน เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อการสูญเสีย การโจรกรรม การละเมิด หรือการใช้ข้อมูลของท่านในทางที่ผิดใด ๆ ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับบริการของบุคคลภายนอก (รวมถึงความประมาทเลินเล่อ)
เว้นแต่ในกรณีที่เราไม่สามารถจำกัดความรับผิดได้ตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ ท่านต้องใช้ข้อมูลใด ๆ ที่จัดหาให้โดยบริการของบุคคลภายนอก (“เนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอก”) โดยรับความเสี่ยงด้วยตัวท่านเอง และเราไม่ให้คำมั่นใด ๆ กับท่านว่าเนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอกจะถูกต้อง ครบถ้วน เป็นความจริง หรือเหมาะสมกับสถานการณ์ส่วนบุคคลของท่าน เนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอกรวมถึงข้อมูลที่จัดหาให้โดยผู้ใช้รายอื่นที่ไม่ได้รับการรับรองจากเราโดยเฉพาะ
11.3 เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้
ในฐานะที่เป็นส่วนหนึ่งของชุมชน
Worldcoin
ท่านอาจโพสต์ข้อความ ข้อมูล ซอฟต์แวร์ รูปภาพ วิดีโอ หรือเนื้อหาอื่น ๆ (“เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้”) บนกระดานสนทนา บล็อก บัญชีสื่อสังคมออนไลน์ที่เราเป็นเจ้าของ รวมถึงพื้นที่สาธารณะอื่น ๆ ที่อยู่ในบริการ พื้นที่เหล่านี้อาจจัดให้โดยเราหรือ
ผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกในนามของเรา ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ทั้งหมดที่ท่านส่ง อัปโหลด โพสต์ หรือจัดเก็บผ่านทางบริการ ท่านต้องแสดงคำเตือน ข้อมูล และการเปิดเผยข้อมูลที่จำเป็นและเหมาะสมทั้งหมดเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ของท่าน เราจะไม่รับผิดชอบต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ใด ๆ ที่ท่านส่งผ่านทางบริการ
11.4 การอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิในเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้
โดยการส่งเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ให้กับเรา ท่านรับรองว่าท่านมีสิทธิที่จำเป็นทั้งหมดในเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ และท่านอนุญาตให้เรามีสิทธิตลอดไป ในทั่วโลก โดยไม่จำกัดแต่เพียง
ผู้เดียว ไม่มีค่าสิทธิ สามารถอนุญาตให้ใช้สิทธิช่วงได้ และสามารถโอนได้ในการใช้ ทำซ้ำ เผยแพร่ จัดทำงานสร้างสรรค์ต่อเนื่อง แก้ไข แสดง และดำเนินการต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนในลักษณะที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการทำการตลาดและการส่งเสริมการขายของเรา และเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ทางธุรกิจที่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายอื่นใดที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ เราอาจนำงานสร้างสรรค์ต่อเนื่องทั้งหมดหรือบางส่วนซึ่งจัดทำขึ้นจากเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ของท่านไปเผยแพร่ซ้ำในรูปแบบสื่อและผ่านช่องทางใดก็ตามที่เราเลือก นอกจากนี้ โดยข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขฉบับนี้ ท่านยังอนุญาตให้เราและผู้ใช้รายอื่นมีสิทธิที่ไม่จำกัดเพียงผู้เดียวในการใช้ เข้าถึง ทำซ้ำ เผยแพร่ แก้ไข แสดง และดำเนินการต่อเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ของท่านผ่านทางบริการ ข้อ
4
นี้จะมีผลบังคับใช้เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด
11.5 ข้อจำกัดเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้
ท่านตกลงว่าจะไม่ใช้หรืออนุญาตให้บุคคลภายนอกใช้บริการในการโพสต์หรือส่งเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ใด ๆ ซึ่ง (ก
)
เป็นการหมิ่นประมาทหรือใส่ร้าย หรือเปิดเผยเรื่องส่วนตัวหรือข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเกี่ยวกับบุคคลใด ๆ
(
ข
)
มีลักษณะลามก อนาจาร คุกคาม ข่มขู่ ดูถูก เกลียดชัง หรือเป็นการเหยียดเชื้อชาติหรือชาติพันธุ์ ส่งเสริมการกระทำที่ถือเป็นความผิดทางอาญา ก่อให้เกิดความรับผิดทางแพ่ง หรือละเมิดกฎหมายใด ๆ หรือไม่เหมาะสมในทางอื่นใด
(
ค
)
จะละเมิดสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาของผู้อื่น รวมถึงการใช้ข้อความ รูปภาพ หรือโปรแกรมที่มีลิขสิทธิ์โดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต ความลับทางการค้าหรือข้อมูลที่มีกรรมสิทธิ์ที่เป็นความลับอื่น ๆ หรือเครื่องหมายการค้าหรือเครื่องหมายบริการที่ใช้ในลักษณะที่เป็นการละเมิด หรือ (ง
)
แทรกแซงการใช้บริการของผู้ใช้อื่นอย่างไม่สมเหตุสมผล ท่านรับรองต่อเราว่าท่านโพสต์เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ไปยังบริการโดยสมัครใจ ดังนั้น การโพสต์เนื้อหาของผู้ใช้จะไม่ก่อให้เกิดความสัมพันธ์ในลักษณะนายจ้างกับลูกจ้างระหว่างท่านกับเรา ท่านต้องไม่คัดลอกหรือใช้ที่อยู่อีเมล หมายเลขโทรศัพท์มือถือ ยอดคงเหลือ ชื่อผู้ใช้ หรือข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลอื่น ๆ เกี่ยวกับผู้ใช้รายอื่นโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต การส่งอีเมล จดหมาย การโทรศัพท์ หรือการสื่อสารอื่น ๆ ไปยังผู้ใช้รายอื่นผ่านทางบริการหรือในช่องทางอื่นใดโดยไม่ได้รับการร้องขอเป็นสิ่งที่ห้ามกระทำ
11.6 ข้อร้องเรียนและการลบเนื้อหาตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมาย
DMCA
หากท่านเชื่อว่าเครื่องหมายการค้าหรืองานอันมีลิขสิทธิ์ของท่านถูกละเมิดโดยเนื้อหาของเราหรือเนื้อหาของผู้ใช้ที่แสดงอยู่ในบริการ หรือถูกเผยแพร่ในลักษณะที่แสดงเป็นนัยถึงการรับรองหรือความสัมพันธ์กับเรา โปรดส่งอีเมลถึงเราที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
โดยระบุหัวข้อดังนี้ “[
Trademark/Copyright] Complaint”
(แล้วแต่กรณี) เพื่อให้ข้อร้องเรียนของท่านมีผลบังคับและเพื่อให้เราสามารถดำเนินการตามกฎหมาย
Digital Millennium Copyright Act
(“กฎหมาย
DMCA”)
ท่านต้องปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมดโดยแสดงข้อมูลต่อไปนี้ในอีเมลของท่าน
ระบุงานอันมีลิขสิทธิ์หรือเครื่องหมายที่กล่าวอ้างว่าถูกละเมิดให้ชัดเจน รวมถึงหมายเลขการจดทะเบียนลิขสิทธิ์หากงานนั้นได้รับการจดทะเบียน
ระบุงานหรือเครื่องหมายที่กล่าวอ้างว่าละเมิดซึ่งท่านต้องการให้ลบออก รวมทั้ง
URL
หรือข้อมูลที่ชัดเจนอื่น ๆ ซึ่งช่วยให้เราสามารถค้นหาเนื้อหาที่กล่าวอ้างว่าละเมิดได้
ที่อยู่อีเมล ที่อยู่ไปรษณีย์ และหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่าน และ
คำแถลงฉบับลงลายมือชื่อซึ่งระบุว่าท่านเชื่อโดยสุจริตว่าเนื้อหานั้นละเมิดสิทธิอื่น ข้อมูลที่ท่านให้เป็นข้อมูลที่ถูกต้อง และท่านเป็นเจ้าของหรือได้รับอนุญาตให้เป็นตัวแทนของเจ้าของเนื้อหานั้น
ท่านควรทราบด้วยว่าตามกฎหมายแพ่งและอาญาที่เกี่ยวข้อง บุคคลใดที่ร้องเรียนเรื่องการละเมิดที่ไม่มีมูลความจริงโดยตั้งใจอาจต้องมีความรับผิดในการชดใช้ค่าเสียหาย ดังนั้นโปรดอย่าส่งข้อเรียกร้องที่เป็นเท็จ เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลหรือการติดต่อใด ๆ ที่ท่านส่งถึงเราให้กับบุคคลภายนอก รวมถึงบุคคลที่อัปโหลดเนื้อหาที่กล่าวอ้างว่าละเมิดไปยังบริการ
เมื่อได้รับการแจ้งเตือนเรื่องการละเมิดโดยสุจริต เราจะดำเนินการตามนโยบายโดย (ก
)
ลบหรือปิดการเข้าถึงเนื้อหาที่ละเมิดทันที
(
ข
)
แจ้งบุคคลที่อัปโหลดเนื้อหาที่เป็นการละเมิดว่าเราได้ลบหรือปิดการเข้าถึงเนื้อหานั้นแล้ว และ (ค
)
ในกรณีของผู้กระทำผิดซ้ำ เราจะยกเลิกสิทธิในการเข้าถึงบริการของบุคคลนั้น หากเราได้รับหนังสือโต้แย้งข้อกล่าวอ้างเรื่องการละเมิดจากบุคคลดังกล่าว เราอาจส่งสำเนาหนังสือโต้แย้งนั้นให้แก่ท่านเพื่อชี้แจงว่าเราอาจนำเนื้อหาที่ถูกลบกลับมาเผยแพร่ดังเดิมหรือยกเลิกการปิดการเข้าถึงเนื้อหานั้นใน
10
วันทำการ เว้นแต่ท่านจะยื่นฟ้องเพื่อขอให้ศาลมีคำสั่งต่อเราหรือบุคคลที่อัปโหลดเนื้อหา เราจะเปิดให้สามารถเข้าถึงเนื้อหาที่ถูกลบใหม่ใน
10
ถึง
14
วันทำการหรือนานกว่านั้นหลังจากได้รับหนังสือโต้แย้งข้อกล่าวอ้างเรื่องการละเมิด โดยขึ้นอยู่กับดุลยพินิจของเรา
12. การปฏิเสธการรับประกัน
12.1 ท่านต้องใช้บริการด้วยความเสี่ยงของตนเอง บริการ
WLD
เนื้อหา และทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาอื่น ๆ ทั้งหมดจัดหาให้ “ตามสภาพ” และ “ตามที่มี” โดยไม่มีการรับรองหรือการรับประกันใด ๆ ไม่ว่าจะโดยชัดแจ้ง โดยปริยาย หรือตามกฎหมาย เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด เราขอปฏิเสธการรับประกันโดยปริยายอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงเกี่ยวกับกรรมสิทธิ์ การใช้สอยสินค้าสมประโยชน์ตามวิสัยของการใช้ทั่วไป
(merchantability)
การใช้สอยสินค้าสมประโยชน์หรือความมุ่งหมายโดยเฉพาะ
(fitness for a particular purpose)
หรือการไม่ละเมิดสำหรับฟีเจอร์ เนื้อหา หรือทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาอื่น ๆ ที่มีอยู่ในบริการ บางประเทศไม่อนุญาตให้มีข้อยกเว้นว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธการรับประกันโดยปริยาย ดังนั้นข้อยกเว้นว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธการรับประกันข้างต้นอาจไม่ใช้บังคับกับท่าน เราไม่รับรอง รับประกัน หรือรับผิดชอบต่อโฆษณา ข้อเสนอ หรือคำแถลงใด ๆ ที่จัดทำโดยบุคคลภายนอก รวมถึงผู้ใช้รายอื่น ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ
12.2 เราไม่รับรองหรือรับประกันว่า (ก
)
ท่านจะสามารถเข้าถึงบริการส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งหรือทั้งหมดได้อย่างต่อเนื่อง โดยไม่หยุดชะงัก ภายในเวลาที่กำหนด อย่างปลอดภัย หรือโดยปราศจากข้อผิดพลาด
(
ข
)
บริการหรือเนื้อหาจะถูกต้อง ครบถ้วน เชื่อถือได้ หรือเป็นปัจจุบัน
(
ค
)
บริการจะไม่มีไวรัสหรือส่วนประกอบที่เป็นอันตรายอื่น ๆ หรือ (ง
)
บริการหรือเนื้อหาจะตรงตามความต้องการ ความจำเป็น หรือความคาดหวังของท่าน
12.3 นอกจากนี้ เราไม่ให้การรับรองหรือการรับประกันใด ๆ เกี่ยวกับความถูกต้องตามกฎหมายของบริการหรือ
WLD
สำหรับการใช้งานในกรณีใด ๆ และไม่รับรองหรือรับประกันว่าบริการหรือ
WLD
จะเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดด้านการปฏิบัติตามกฎระเบียบหรือการปฏิบัติตามกฎหมาย ท่านต้องรับผิดชอบในการพิจารณาและปฏิบัติตามข้อจำกัดและข้อกำหนดด้านกฎหมายและกฎระเบียบทั้งหมดที่อาจใช้บังคับกับการใช้บริการหรือ
WLD
ยกเว้นคำแถลงที่ระบุไว้อย่างชัดแจ้งในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าท่านไม่ได้อ้างอิงคำแถลงหรือความเข้าใจอื่นใด ไม่ว่าจะทำไว้เป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรหรือให้ไว้ด้วยวาจา ในการเข้าถึงและใช้บริการหรือ
WLD
12.4 เราไม่ได้กระทำการและไม่สามารถกระทำการในฐานะที่ปรึกษาของท่านเกี่ยวกับเรื่องการเงิน กฎหมาย การลงทุน หรือภาษี เนื้อหาใด ๆ มีผลเฉพาะในวันที่ระบุเท่านั้น การคาดการณ์ การประมาณการ การพยากรณ์ เป้าหมาย และ/หรือความคิดเห็นใด ๆ ที่แสดงในที่นี้อยู่ภายใต้ความเสี่ยง ความไม่แน่นอน และสมมติฐาน และอาจไม่ถูกต้องและอาจเปลี่ยนแปลงได้โดยไม่ต้องแจ้งให้ทราบ ท่านไม่ควรอ้างอิงเนื้อหาในการตัดสินใจใด ๆ
ข้อมูลบางส่วนในที่นี้อาจได้รับมาจากแหล่งข้อมูลของบุคคลภายนอก แม้ว่าเราจะเชื่อว่าแหล่งข้อมูลดังกล่าวสามารถเชื่อถือได้ แต่เราไม่ได้ตรวจสอบข้อมูลทั้งหมดด้วยตนเองและจะไม่รับรองความถูกต้องของข้อมูลนั้น เราไม่ได้เป็นนายหน้าผู้ค้า หรือที่ปรึกษาทางการเงินที่ที่ได้ขึ้นทะเบียน เราไม่ให้การรับรองใด ๆ และขอปฏิเสธการรับประกันทั้งหมดอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจง ไม่ว่าจะเป็นการรับประกันโดยชัดแจ้ง โดยปริยาย หรือตามกฎหมาย เกี่ยวกับความถูกต้อง ความเป็นปัจจุบัน หรือความครบถ้วนของเนื้อหาใด ๆ ที่มีอยู่ในบริการ เนื้อหาของเรามีไว้เพื่อเป็นข้อมูลทั่วไปเท่านั้น และท่านมีหน้าที่แต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการตัดสินใจว่าจะใช้บริการหรือไม่ ท่านรับทราบว่าการซื้อขาย การใช้ และการถือครองโทเคนดิจิทัลมีความเสี่ยงโดยลักษณะของธุรกรรมดังกล่าวอยู่แล้ว ท่านอาจสูญเสียเงินทั้งหมดในวอลเล็ตของท่าน ท่านรับทราบว่าบริการอาจอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของข้อจำกัดด้านการส่งออกและมาตรการลงโทษทางเศรษฐกิจที่กำหนดโดยกฎหมายของสหรัฐอเมริกา
12.5 เราจะไม่รับผิดต่อท่านหรือบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ สำหรับการแก้ไขหรือการยกเลิกบริการ หรือการระงับหรือการยกเลิกสิทธิในการเข้าถึงบริการของท่าน
13. การจำกัดความรับผิด
13.1 เราจะไม่มีข้อยกเว้นความรับผิดหรือจำกัดความรับผิดที่เรามีต่อท่านในกรณีที่การดำเนินการดังกล่าวอาจไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย ในประเทศที่ไม่อนุญาตให้มีข้อยกเว้นว่าด้วยการปฏิเสธความรับผิดในลักษณะต่อไปนี้ เราจะรับผิดชอบในการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายแก่ท่านสำหรับการสูญเสียและความเสียหายซึ่งเป็นผลที่คาดการณ์ได้ตามสมควรจากการที่เราไม่ใช้ความระมัดระวังและทักษะความสามารถตามสมควรหรือจากการที่เราละเมิดสัญญาที่เข้าทำกับท่านเท่านั้น ข้อกำหนดนี้จะไม่กระทบต่อสิทธิของผู้บริโภคที่ไม่สามารถสละสิทธิหรือจำกัดความรับผิดได้โดยสัญญาหรือข้อตกลงใด ๆ
13.2 เท่าที่กฎหมายอนุญาต ท่านตกลงว่าไม่ว่าในกรณีใดก็ตาม เราหรือเจ้าหน้าที่ กรรมการ พนักงาน ผู้รับจ้าง ตัวแทน บริษัทในเครือ หรือบริษัทสาขาใด ๆ ของเรา (“คู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH”)
จะไม่มีความรับผิดในการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายแก่ท่านสำหรับค่าเสียหายทางอ้อม ค่าเสียหายเชิงลงโทษ ค่าเสียหายอันเนื่องมาจากการผิดสัญญา (
incidental damages
) ค่าเสียหายจำเพาะ
(special damages)
ค่าเสียหายที่เป็นผลสืบเนื่อง
(consequential damages)
หรือค่าเสียหายเพื่อเป็นเยี่ยงอย่าง
(exemplary damages)
รวมถึงความเสียหายจากการสูญเสียผลกำไร ค่าความนิยม การใช้ประโยชน์ ข้อมูล หรือทรัพย์สินที่ไม่มีตัวตนอื่น ๆ ไม่ว่าการเรียกร้องให้รับผิดดังกล่าวจะตั้งอยู่บนพื้นฐานของการละเมิดหรือโดยประการอื่น และไม่ว่าคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
จะได้รับแจ้งถึงความเป็นไปได้ที่ความเสียหายจะเกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับสิ่งต่อไปนี้หรือไม่ก็ตามเกี่ยวกับ (ก
)
การที่ท่านใช้หรือไม่สามารถใช้บริการ โทเคนดิจิทัลของท่าน หรือ
World Network (
ข
)
การไม่สามารถเข้าถึงหรือการยกเลิกบริการ
(
ค
)
การแฮ็ก การแทรกแซง การเข้าถึงโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต หรือการเปลี่ยนแปลงธุรกรรมหรือข้อมูลของท่าน
(
ง
)
ธุรกรรมหรือข้อตกลงใด ๆ ที่ท่านทำกับบุคคลภายนอกผ่านบริการ
(
จ
)
กิจกรรมหรือการสื่อสารใด ๆ ของบุคคลภายนอก
(
ฉ
)
การกระทำของ
Orb Operator (
ช
)
การสูญเสียมูลค่าของโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ
(
ซ
)
เนื้อหาของบุคคลภายนอกที่เข้าถึงได้บนบริการหรือผ่านทางบริการ
(
ฌ
)
ข้อผิดพลาด ความผิดพลาด หรือความไม่ถูกต้องในเนื้อหาของเรา
(
ญ
)
การบาดเจ็บส่วนบุคคลหรือความเสียหายต่อทรัพย์สินไม่ว่าในลักษณะใด ๆ ซึ่งเกิดจากการเข้าถึงหรือการใช้บริการ
(
ฎ
)
ไวรัส โทรจัน หรือสิ่งอื่นในทำนองเดียวกันที่อาจถูกส่งไปยังหรือผ่านทางบริการ หรือ (ฏ
)
การกระทำของบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ ที่เป็นการหมิ่นประมาท สร้างความไม่พอใจ หรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด การจำกัดความรับผิดนี้จะมีผลบังคับ ไม่ว่าความเสียหายจะเกิดจากการใช้บริการ การใช้บริการในทางที่ผิด หรือการอ้างอิง
TFH
หรือบริการ แม้ว่าทางเยียวยาอันจำกัดที่มอบให้จะไม่สามารถบรรลุวัตถุประสงค์ที่ถือเป็นสาระสำคัญของทางเยียวยานั้นก็ตาม
13.3 ไม่ว่าในกรณีใดก็ตาม คู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
จะไม่ต้องรับผิดต่อท่านสำหรับการเรียกร้อง การดำเนินการ ความรับผิด หน้าที่ ค่าเสียหาย การสูญเสีย หรือค่าใช้จ่ายโดยตรงใด ๆ ที่มีจำนวนเกินกว่า
00
ดอลลาร์สหรัฐ หากท่านไม่พอใจกับบริการ ท่านตกลงว่าทางเยียวยาเพียงสิ่งเดียวที่เฉพาะเจาะจงที่ท่านมีคือการหยุดใช้บริการ การจำกัดความรับผิดนี้จะมีผลบังคับใช้เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด
13.4 การปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดและการชดใช้ค่าเสียหาย
ท่านตกลงว่าจะปกป้อง ชดใช้ค่าเสียหาย และคุ้มครองคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
ไม่ให้ได้รับความเสียหายจากการเรียกร้อง ค่าเสียหาย ต้นทุน ความรับผิด ค่าทนายความตามสมควร และค่าใช้จ่ายใด ๆ ที่บุคคลภายนอกมีข้อเรียกร้องต่อคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
ซึ่งเกิดจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับ (ก
)
การที่ท่านใช้บริการ
(
ข
)
การที่ท่านละเมิดข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
(
ค
)
การที่ท่านละเมิดสิทธิของบุคคลอื่น
(
ง
)
การกระทำของท่านที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ หรือ (จ
)
การที่ท่านใช้
WLD
โทเคนดิจิทัล หรือเครือข่าย
Worldcoin
ในบางประเทศมีการจำกัดขอบเขตของข้อกำหนดว่าด้วยการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายของผู้บริโภค ดังนั้นข้อกำหนดว่าด้วยการชดใช้ค่าเสียหายในข้อนี้อาจไม่มีผลบังคับกับท่านไม่ว่าทั้งหมดหรือเป็นบางส่วน หากท่านมีหน้าที่ชดใช้ค่าเสียหายให้กับคู่สัญญาฝ่าย
TFH
เราขอสงวนสิทธิในการใช้ดุลยพินิจของเราแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการควบคุมการดำเนินคดีหรือการดำเนินการใด ๆ และในการตัดสินใจว่าจะระงับข้อพิพาทหรือไม่และตามเงื่อนไขใด
หากท่านเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนีย ท่านสละสิทธิในการได้รับประโยชน์และการคุ้มครองจากข้อกำหนดของ
California Civil Code § 1542
ซึ่งระบุว่า “[ก
]
การปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดทั่วไปจะไม่ครอบคลุมถึงสิทธิเรียกร้องที่เจ้าหนี้หรือฝ่ายที่ปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดไม่ทราบว่ามีหรือไม่สงสัยว่ามีอยู่ในทางที่เป็นประโยชน์แก่ตนในเวลาที่ตกลงปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดนั้น ซึ่งหากเจ้าหนี้หรือฝ่ายที่ปลดเปลื้องความรับผิดทราบว่ามี จะมีผลกระทบอย่างมีนัยสำคัญต่อการทำข้อตกลงกับลูกหนี้หรือฝ่ายที่ได้รับการปลดเปลื้องความรับผิด”
14. กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
กฎหมายของรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียจะใช้บังคับกับข้อตกลงนี้และข้อพิพาทใด ๆ ที่เกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับข้อตกลงนี้ กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับที่ระบุในส่วนนี้จะมีผลบังคับโดยไม่คำนึงถึงหลักการขัดกันแห่งกฎหมาย นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงว่าบริการจะอยู่ภายใต้บังคับแห่งกฎหมายของรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียเท่านั้น และตกลงว่าแม้ว่าอาจมีการจัดหาบริการให้ในประเทศเขตแดนอื่น ๆ การจัดหาบริการดังกล่าวจะไม่ทำให้ศาลใด ๆ ซึ่งอยู่นอกรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียเป็นศาลที่มีเขตอำนาจทั่วไปหรือเขตอำนาจเฉพาะเจาะจงเหนือตัวบุคคลแต่อย่างใด
15. การระงับข้อพิพาท การอนุญาโตตุลาการ และการสละสิทธิในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม
15.1 โปรดอ่านเนื้อหาส่วนนี้อย่างละเอียด เนื้อหาส่วนนี้กำหนดให้ท่านระงับข้อพิพาทกับเราผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการเป็นรายบุคคลต่อหน้าอนุญาโตตุลาการเพียงคนเดียว และไม่ใช่ในฐานะสมาชิกกลุ่มในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม การอนุญาโตตุลาการป้องกันไม่ให้ท่านฟ้องร้องดำเนินคดีต่อเราในศาลหรือผ่านการพิจารณาคดีโดยคณะลูกขุน แม้ว่าท่านอาจนำข้อพิพาทไปฟ้องร้องดำเนินคดีต่อศาลที่มีเขตอำนาจพิจารณาคดีมโนสาเร่ได้หากท่านมีคุณสมบัติตามข้อกำหนด
15.2 เราจะใช้ความพยายามอย่างดีที่สุดในการระงับข้อพิพาทใด ๆ ที่อาจมีผ่านการเจรจาอย่างไม่เป็นทางการโดยสุจริต หากเกิดข้อพิพาทขึ้น ท่านต้องติดต่อเราโดยส่งอีเมลไปที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
เพื่อที่เราจะสามารถพยายามระงับข้อพิพาทนั้นได้โดยไม่ต้องเข้าสู่กระบวนการระงับข้อพิพาทอย่างเป็นทางการ หากเราไม่สามารถระงับข้อพิพาทอย่างไม่เป็นทางการได้ภายใน
60
วันนับจากวันที่ท่านส่งอีเมล และท่านเลือกที่จะใช้สิทธิเรียกร้องตามกฎหมายของรัฐบาลกลางหรือรัฐ เรียกร้องตามกฎหมายคอมมอนลอว์ เรียกร้องตามสัญญา เรียกร้องตามฐานการละเมิด การฉ้อโกง การแถลงข้อความอันเป็นเท็จ หรือทฤษฎีทางกฎหมายอื่น ๆ หรือดำเนินกระบวนการทางกฎหมายอย่างเป็นทางการในลักษณะอื่น ซึ่งเกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ เนื้อหา หรือบริการ (แต่ละข้อจะเรียกว่า “ข้อพิพาท”) ท่านตกลงว่าจะระงับข้อพิพาทผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการเป็นรายบุคคลที่มีผลผูกพันตามข้อกำหนดต่อไปนี้ (เรียกรวมกันว่า “สัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ”):
กระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการจะดำเนินการในลักษณะที่เป็นความลับโดยอนุญาโตตุลาการเพียงคนเดียวโดยใช้ภาษาอังกฤษ อนุญาโตตุลาการจะใช้อายุความตามที่กฎหมายกำหนดและใช้กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับทั้งหมด และจะเคารพเอกสิทธิ์ที่ได้รับการยอมรับตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
ข้อพิพาทจะถูกระงับจนถึงที่สุดผ่านกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่ดำเนินการโดย
JAMS
ตามข้อบังคับการอนุญาโตตุลาการแบบเร่งรัดของ
JAMS
(
JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules
) เท่านั้น เว้นแต่เมื่อจำนวนทุนทรัพย์ที่พิพาทมีจำนวนรวมกัน
250
,
000
ดอลลาร์สหรัฐขึ้นไป ซึ่งในกรณีดังกล่าวจะดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการตามข้อบังคับการอนุญาโตตุลาการแบบครอบคลุมของ
JAMS
(
JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules
) การอนุญาโตตุลาการจะดำเนินการที่ซานฟรานซิสโก รัฐแคลิฟอร์เนีย เว้นแต่เมื่อเราตกลงกันให้ดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่อื่น ท่านตกลงว่าศาลรัฐบาลกลางและศาลมลรัฐในซานฟรานซิสโก รัฐแคลิฟอร์เนียเป็นศาลที่เหมาะสมสำหรับการอุทธรณ์คำชี้ขาดของอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือการดำเนินกระบวนการทางศาลในกรณีที่ข้อตกลงว่าด้วยการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่มีผลผูกพันตามสัญญานี้ถูกตัดสินว่าไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้
ในการดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการไม่ว่าในสถานที่ใดก็ตาม คู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่ายต้องไม่ร้องขอให้มีการแสวงหาพยานหลักฐานที่จะนำมาใช้ในการพิจารณาคดีจากอีกฝ่าย และอนุญาโตตุลาการจะไม่อนุญาตให้คู่พิพาทร้องขอให้มีการแสวงหาพยานหลักฐานที่จะนำมาใช้ในการพิจารณาคดีจากอีกฝ่าย แต่แทนที่จะดำเนินการดังกล่าว ให้คู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่ายจะเปิดเผยพยานหลักฐานที่สนับสนุนข้อกล่าวอ้างของตนในวันและเวลาที่ตกลงร่วมกันก่อนการสืบพยานของอนุญาโตตุลาการในนัดสุดท้าย
สัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้มีผลบังคับครอบคลุมถึงความสามารถในการบังคับใช้ การเพิกถอน ขอบเขต และการมีผลบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือส่วนใดส่วนหนึ่งของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ รวมทั้งข้อพิพาทอื่น ๆ ทั้งหมดที่เกิดขึ้นจากหรือโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับการตีความหรือการใช้บังคับสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ และประเด็นทั้งหมดดังกล่าวจะตัดสินชี้ขาดโดยอนุญาโตตุลาการ ไม่ใช่โดยศาลหรือผู้พิพากษา
หากอนุญาโตตุลาการกำหนดให้ท่านชำระค่าธรรมเนียมเริ่มต้นหรือค่าใช้จ่ายในการบริหารคดีอื่น ๆ เมื่อท่านร้องขอ เราจะคืนเงินส่วนต่างให้ท่านในกรณีที่ค่าธรรมเนียมหรือค่าใช้จ่ายดังกล่าวอาจมีจำนวนเกินกว่าที่ท่านอาจต้องจ่ายหากโดยประการอื่นท่านนำข้อพิพาทไปดำเนินคดีในศาล นอกจากนี้ เราจะจ่ายค่าธรรมเนียมหรือค่าใช้จ่ายเพิ่มเติมหากข้อบังคับของสถาบันอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนดให้ทำเช่นนั้น
เมื่อคู่พิพาทฝ่ายใดฝ่ายหนึ่งมีคำขอ การดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการทั้งหมดจะเป็นไปอย่างลับสุดยอด และในกรณีดังกล่าวอนุญาโตตุลาการจะรับ พิจารณา และเก็บรักษาเอกสาร คำให้การ และบันทึกทั้งหมดในลักษณะที่เป็นความลับโดยอยู่ภายใต้ข้อตกลงว่าจะไม่นำข้อมูลดังกล่าวไปเปิดเผย โดยเอกสาร คำให้การ และบันทึกดังกล่าวจะเปิดให้ตรวจสอบได้โดยคู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่าย ทนายความ ผู้เชี่ยวชาญ ที่ปรึกษา หรือพยานของคู่พิพาทแต่ละฝ่ายซึ่งได้ตกลงล่วงหน้าเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรว่าจะรับข้อมูลดังกล่าวทั้งหมดในลักษณะที่เป็นความลับเพื่อใช้สำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ในการอนุญาโตตุลาการเท่านั้น
นอกเหนือจากการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่มและทางเยียวยาที่กล่าวถึงในสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ อนุญาโตตุลาการยังมีอำนาจในการมีคำชี้ขาดเกี่ยวกับทางเยียวยาใด ๆ ที่ศาลอาจมีคำสั่งได้โดยประการอื่น
คู่พิพาทอาจขอให้ศาลใด ๆ ที่มีเขตอำนาจมีคำพิพากษาตามคำชี้ขาดของอนุญาโตตุลาการได้
หากข้อกำหนดให้ระงับข้อพิพาทโดยการดำเนินกระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการ หรือข้อกำหนดห้ามไม่ให้ดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม รวมทั้งข้อกำหนดเกี่ยวกับข้อพิพาทอื่น ๆ ที่มีขึ้นในนามของบุคคลภายนอกที่ระบุในสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ ถูกตัดสินว่าไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ ให้ถือว่าเฉพาะข้อกำหนดที่ไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ดังกล่าวถูกลบออกจากข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และหน้าที่ส่วนอื่นทั้งหมดที่เหลืออยู่ในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้จะยังคงมีผลบังคับใช้อย่างเต็มที่ต่อไป
15.3 สิทธิในการเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการภายใน
30
วัน (
Opt Out
)
ท่านมีสิทธิเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับและผลผูกพันของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้โดยส่งอีเมลจากที่อยู่อีเมลที่ท่านใช้ในการลงทะเบียนเพื่อใช้แอปพลิเคชันไปที่
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
โดยระบุหัวเรื่องว่า: “
ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT”
ท่านต้องส่งอีเมลดังกล่าวภายใน
30
วันนับจากวันที่ท่านตกลงยอมรับข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ มิฉะนั้นท่านจะอยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของข้อกำหนดในการระงับข้อพิพาทโดยการอนุญาโตตุลาการตามข้อกำหนดของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ หากท่านเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการ เราจะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการเช่นกัน
15.4 การเปลี่ยนแปลงสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้
เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้า
30
วันเกี่ยวกับการเปลี่ยนแปลงใด ๆ ในส่วนของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่มีหัวข้อว่า “
การระงับข้อพิพาท การอนุญาโตตุลาการ และการสละสิทธิในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม
” โดยส่งคำบอกกล่าวถึงท่าน และการเปลี่ยนแปลงนั้นจะมีผลบังคับใช้
30
วันหลังจากที่ท่านได้รับคำบอกกล่าวจากเรา ข้อกำหนดที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงในหัวข้อ
การระงับข้อพิพาท การอนุญาโตตุลาการ และการสละสิทธิในการดำเนินคดีแบบกลุ่ม
จะมีผลบังคับกับข้อพิพาทที่เกิดขึ้นหลังจากวันที่
30
เท่านั้น หากศาลหรืออนุญาโตตุลาการตัดสินว่าข้อกำหนดที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงในหัวข้อนี้ไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้หรือไม่มีผลบังคับ ให้ข้อกำหนดที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงถูกแยกออกจากข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และศาลหรืออนุญาโตตุลาการจะบังคับใช้ข้อกำหนดของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการฉบับแรกที่มีผลบังคับใช้หลังจากที่ท่านเริ่มใช้บริการ ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิในการเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการฉบับใหม่ได้ โดยปฏิบัติตามขั้นตอนที่ระบุไว้ในข้อด้านบนที่มีหัวข้อว่า “สิทธิในการเลือกที่จะไม่อยู่ภายใต้การบังคับของสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการภายใน 30 วัน”
สัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้จะยังคงมีผลบังคับใช้ต่อไปหลังจากที่ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และการใช้บริการของท่านสิ้นสุดลง
โดยไม่คำนึงถึงข้อกำหนดใด ๆ ในสัญญาอนุญาโตตุลาการนี้ที่กำหนดเป็นอย่างอื่น คู่สัญญาแต่ละฝ่ายสามารถฟ้องร้องดำเนินคดีเพื่อขอให้ศาลมีคำสั่งคุ้มครองชั่วคราวให้หยุดการใช้บริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตหรือการใช้บริการในทางที่ผิด หรือการละเมิดสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา (เช่น เครื่องหมายการค้า ความลับทางการค้า ลิขสิทธิ์ สิทธิบัตร หรือสิทธิอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญา) โดยไม่ต้องเข้าสู่กระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการหรือกระบวนการระงับข้อพิพาทอย่างไม่เป็นทางการที่อธิบายไว้ข้างต้นก่อน
16. ข้อกำหนดทั่วไป
16.1 ไม่ถือเป็นการสละสิทธิ การแยกจากกันได้ของสัญญา การห้ามโอนสิทธิ
การที่เราไม่บังคับตามข้อกำหนดข้อใดข้อหนึ่งจะไม่ถือเป็นการสละสิทธิในการบังคับตามข้อกำหนดนั้นในภายหลัง หากข้อกำหนดข้อใดข้อหนึ่งถูกตัดสินว่าไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ ข้อกำหนดส่วนที่เหลือของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้จะยังคงมีผลบังคับใช้อย่างเต็มที่ต่อไป และข้อกำหนดที่ไม่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้นั้นจะถูกแทนที่ด้วยข้อกำหนดที่สามารถบังคับใช้ได้ ซึ่งแสดงถึงเจตนาของเราได้ใกล้เคียงที่สุดเท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต ท่านต้องไม่โอนสิทธิใด ๆ ของท่านตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และความพยายามในการโอนสิทธิดังกล่าวจะตกเป็นโมฆะ เราอาจโอนสิทธิของเราให้กับบริษัทในเครือหรือบริษัทสาขาใด ๆ ของเรา หรือผู้สืบสิทธิใด ๆ ที่ได้รับโอนธุรกิจที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการ
16.2 ข้อตกลงทั้งหมด
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นคำแถลงที่ครบถ้วนสมบูรณ์เพียงฉบับเดียวเกี่ยวกับข้อตกลงระหว่างท่านกับเราในเรื่องของบริการ และมีผลบังคับแทนที่ความเข้าใจ ข้อตกลง คำรับรอง และคำรับประกันทั้งหมดเกี่ยวกับบริการที่มีอยู่ก่อนหน้านี้และในเวลาเดียวกัน ทั้งที่เป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรและให้ไว้ด้วยวาจา หัวข้อในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้มีไว้เพื่อความสะดวกในการอ้างอิงเท่านั้น และจะไม่มีผลบังคับต่อความหมายหรือการตีความของข้อกำหนดใด ๆ
16.3 การมีผลบังคับต่อไป
ข้อกำหนดทั้งหมดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการระงับหรือการยกเลิก หนี้ที่ค้างชำระต่อ
TFH
การใช้บริการทั่วไป ข้อพิพาทกับ
TFH
รวมถึงข้อกำหนดที่โดยลักษณะแล้วจะมีผลบังคับต่อไปหลังจากการสิ้นสุดระยะเวลาหรือการบอกเลิกข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ จะยังคงมีผลบังคับต่อไปแม้ว่าข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้จะสิ้นผลบังคับแล้วก็ตาม
16.4 ความสัมพันธ์ระหว่างคู่สัญญาทั้งสองฝ่าย
ไม่มีส่วนใดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่ถือได้ว่าเป็นการก่อให้เกิดหรือมีเจตนาให้ถือได้ว่าเป็นการก่อให้เกิด และจะไม่มีการก่อให้เกิดความสัมพันธ์ระหว่างท่านกับ
TFH
ในลักษณะของหุ้นส่วน ผู้ร่วมทุน หรือผู้ร่วมงานเพื่อผลกำไร และท่านและ
TFH
จะไม่ถือเป็นตัวแทนของอีกฝ่าย นอกจากนี้ ไม่มีส่วนใดของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ที่ก่อให้เกิดหรือมีเจตนาที่จะก่อให้เกิดความสัมพันธ์ในการจ้างงานระหว่างท่านกับ
TFH
16.5 ไม่ถือเป็นคำแนะนำของผู้ประกอบวิชาชีพหรือหน้าที่ในการดูแลผลประโยชน์
(fiduciary duty)
เนื้อหาทั้งหมดที่เราจัดหาให้มีไว้เพื่อเป็นข้อมูลเท่านั้นและไม่ควรตีความว่าเป็นคำแนะนำของผู้ประกอบวิชาชีพ ท่านไม่ควรดำเนินการหรือละเว้นการดำเนินการใด ๆ โดยอ้างอิงจากข้อมูลใด ๆ ที่มีอยู่ในบริการ ก่อนที่ท่านจะตัดสินใจในเรื่องการเงิน กฎหมาย หรือเรื่องอื่น ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับบริการหรือโทเคนดิจิทัลใด ๆ ท่านควรขอคำแนะนำของผู้ประกอบวิชาชีพอิสระจากบุคคลที่มีใบอนุญาตและมีคุณสมบัติในการให้คำแนะนำในสาขาที่เกี่ยวข้อง ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ไม่ได้มีเจตนาและจะไม่ก่อให้เกิดหรือกำหนดหน้าที่ในการดูแลผลประโยชน์ใด ๆ ต่อเรา เท่าที่กฎหมายอนุญาตสูงสุด ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าเราไม่มีหน้าที่ในการดูแลผลประโยชน์หรือความรับผิดใด ๆ ต่อท่านหรือบุคคลอื่นใด และในกรณีที่หน้าที่หรือความรับผิดดังกล่าวอาจมีอยู่ตามกฎหมายหรือตามหลักยุติธรรม เราขอปฏิเสธ สละสิทธิ และยกเลิกหน้าที่และความรับผิดชอบดังกล่าวอย่างไม่สามารถเพิกถอนได้ นอกจากนี้ ท่านตกลงอีกด้วยว่าหน้าที่และความรับผิดชอบเดียวที่เรามีต่อท่านคือหน้าที่และความรับผิดชอบที่ระบุไว้อย่างชัดแจ้งในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
16.6 การเปลี่ยนแปลงการควบคุม
ในกรณีที่เราถูกเข้าซื้อกิจการโดยหรือควบรวมกิจการกับนิติบุคคลอื่นที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก หรือมอบหมายหน้าที่บางอย่างให้กับบริษัทในเครือ หรือผู้สืบสิทธิ หรือนิติบุคคลอื่นที่เราเห็นว่าจะเกิดประโยชน์ต่อผู้ใช้สูงสุด เราสงวนสิทธิในกรณีใด ๆ ดังกล่าวในการโอนหรือโอนสิทธิในข้อมูลที่เราได้เก็บรวบรวมจากท่านเพื่อเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของการควบรวมกิจการ การเข้าซื้อกิจการ การขาย หรือการเปลี่ยนแปลงการควบคุมอื่น ๆ ตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ
16.7 เหตุสุดวิสัย
เราจะไม่มีความรับผิดสำหรับความล่าช้า การไม่สามารถปฏิบัติหน้าที่ หรือการหยุดชะงักของบริการที่เกิดขึ้นโดยตรงหรือโดยอ้อมจากความผันผวนที่มีนัยสำคัญของตลาดโทเคนดิจิทัล เหตุสุดวิสัยทางธรรมชาติ
(act of God)
การกระทำของหน่วยงานพลเรือนหรือทหาร การกระทำของผู้ก่อการร้าย การก่อความไม่สงบ สงคราม การนัดหยุดงาน ภาวะฉุกเฉินด้านสุขภาพ ข้อพิพาทด้านแรงงาน ไฟไหม้ การหยุดชะงักในการสื่อสารโทรคมนาคม หรือบริการอินเทอร์เน็ต หรือบริการของผู้ให้บริการเครือข่าย ความล้มเหลวของอุปกรณ์หรือซอฟต์แวร์ หรือสาเหตุหรือเงื่อนไขใด ๆ ที่อยู่นอกเหนือการควบคุมตามสมควรของเรา (แต่ละข้อเรียกว่า “เหตุสุดวิสัย”) การเกิดขึ้นของเหตุสุดวิสัยจะไม่ส่งผลกระทบต่อความสมบูรณ์และการบังคับใช้ข้อกำหนดส่วนที่เหลือของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
16.8 App Store
เมื่อท่านดาวน์โหลดแอปของเราจาก
app store
หรือแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันอื่น ๆ นอกเหนือจาก
Apple App Store
รวมถึง
Google Play Store (“
แพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน”) ท่านตกลงว่า
ข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นข้อตกลงระหว่างท่านกับเรา ไม่ใช่กับผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน (“ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน”) การใช้แอปของท่านต้องเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันของผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันซึ่งมีผลบังคับในเวลาดังกล่าว ทั้งนี้ ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันเป็นเพียงผู้จัดหาแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันที่ท่านใช้ในการดาวน์โหลดแอปเท่านั้น
เรา (ไม่ใช่ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชัน) มีความรับผิดชอบต่อแอปแต่เพียงผู้เดียว
ผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันไม่มีหน้าที่หรือความรับผิดต่อท่านเกี่ยวกับแอปหรือข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ และ
ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าผู้ให้บริการแพลตฟอร์มจำหน่ายแอปพลิเคชันเป็นผู้ได้รับผลประโยชน์ที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกตามข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้ในส่วนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับแอป
16.9 Apple App Store
ข้อกำหนดส่วนนี้จะมีผลบังคับในกรณีที่ท่านดาวน์โหลดแอปจาก
Apple App Store
ท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่าข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้เป็นข้อตกลงระหว่างท่านกับเราเท่านั้น ไม่ใช่กับ
Apple Inc. (“Apple”)
และท่านรับทราบและตกลงว่า
Apple
ไม่มีความรับผิดชอบต่อแอปหรือเนื้อหาของแอป การใช้แอปของท่านต้องเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการของ
App Store
ท่านรับทราบว่า
Apple
ไม่มีหน้าที่ในการให้บริการบำรุงรักษาและการสนับสนุนใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวกับแอป ในกรณีที่แอปไม่เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการรับประกันใด ๆ ท่านสามารถแจ้งให้
Apple
ทราบได้ และ
Apple
จะคืนเงินค่าซื้อแอปให้ท่าน (ถ้ามี) เท่าที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาตสูงสุด
Apple
จะไม่มีหน้าที่ในการรับประกันอื่นใดที่เกี่ยวกับแอปอีก และการใช้สิทธิเรียกร้อง การสูญเสีย ความรับผิด ค่าเสียหาย ต้นทุน หรือค่าใช้จ่ายอื่นใดที่เกิดจากการที่แอปไม่เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดการรับประกันใด ๆ จะอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกับเราในฐานะผู้ให้บริการแอปเท่านั้น
ท่านรับทราบว่า
Apple
ไม่มีความรับผิดชอบในการดำเนินการเกี่ยวกับการใช้สิทธิเรียกร้องใด ๆ ของท่านหรือบุคคลภายนอกที่เกี่ยวข้องกับแอปหรือการที่ท่านครอบครองและ/หรือใช้แอป รวมถึงแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียง (
i)
การใช้สิทธิเรียกร้องเกี่ยวกับความรับผิดที่เกิดจากผลิตภัณฑ์
(ii)
ข้อเรียกร้องใด ๆ ว่าแอปไม่เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายหรือข้อบังคับที่ใช้บังคับ และ (
iii)
สิทธิเรียกร้องที่เกิดขึ้นตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองผู้บริโภคหรือกฎหมายอื่นที่คล้ายกัน และสิทธิเรียกร้องทั้งหมดดังกล่าวจะอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้และกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกับเราในฐานะผู้ให้บริการซอฟต์แวร์เท่านั้น
ท่านรับทราบว่า ในกรณีที่บุคคลภายนอกกล่าวอ้างว่าแอปหรือการครอบครองและการใช้แอปของท่านละเมิดสิทธิในทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาของบุคคลภายนอกดังกล่าว
TFH
(ไม่ใช่
Apple
) จะเป็นผู้รับผิดชอบแต่เพียงผู้เดียวในการตรวจสอบ การต่อสู้คดี การระงับข้อพิพาท และการปลดเปลื้องสิทธิเรียกร้องเกี่ยวกับการละเมิดทรัพย์สินทางปัญญาดังกล่าวเท่าที่กำหนดไว้ในข้อกำหนดฉบับนี้
ท่านรับรองและรับประกันว่า (
i)
ท่านไม่ได้อยู่ในประเทศที่อยู่ภายใต้มาตรการลงโทษเกี่ยวกับการห้ามส่งสินค้าของรัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกา หรือประเทศที่รัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกากำหนดว่าเป็นประเทศที่สนับสนุนการก่อการร้าย และ (
ii)
ท่านไม่มีรายชื่อในบัญชีบุคคลที่ถูกห้ามหรือจำกัดของรัฐบาลสหรัฐอเมริกา
ท่านและ
TFH
รับทราบและตกลงว่า
Apple
และบริษัทในเครือของ
Apple
เป็นผู้รับผลประโยชน์ที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการในส่วนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิในการใช้แอป และเมื่อท่านยอมรับข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขของข้อกำหนดการให้บริการ
Apple
จะมีสิทธิ (และจะถือว่าได้ยอมรับสิทธิ) ในการบังคับตามข้อกำหนดการให้บริการในส่วนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการอนุญาตให้ท่านมีสิทธิในการใช้แอปต่อท่านในฐานะผู้รับผลประโยชน์บุคคลภายนอก
TFHUSERTOS20241112
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Điều khoản và Điều kiện Người dùng của Tools For Humanity
Chào mừng quý vị đến với Ứng dụng World! Các Điều khoản này giữa quý vị và Tools for Humanity Corporation, một công ty của Delaware (gọi là “TFH” hoặc “chúng tôi”) điều chỉnh việc quý vị sử dụng và truy cập vào các trang web và ứng dụng của chúng tôi, bao gồm Ứng dụng World và Ứng dụng Operator (gọi chung là “Ứng dụng”) và tất cả các chức năng, nội dung và dịch vụ liên quan mà chúng tôi cung cấp cho quý vị (gọi chung là “Dịch vụ” hoặc “Dịch vụ của chúng tôi”) liên quan đến Mạng World (“Mạng World”) và hệ sinh thái.
Vui lòng đọc kỹ các Điều khoản này trước khi sử dụng hoặc truy cập Dịch vụ. Bằng việc truy cập hoặc sử dụng bất kỳ Dịch vụ nào do chúng tôi cung cấp, cùng với sự chấp thuận rõ ràng của quý vị với các Điều khoản này, quý vị đồng ý ràng buộc bởi các Điều khoản này và Thông báo Quyền riêng tư của chúng tôi, được đưa vào như một phần của các Điều khoản này.  Xin lưu ý những phần đặc biệt quan trọng sau đây của các Điều khoản này:
Quý vị đồng ý giải quyết mọi tranh chấp giữa quý vị và TFH thông qua phân xử trọng tài mang tính ràng buộc thay vì ra tòa án. Nếu quý vị cư trú tại Hàn Quốc, quý vị có thể chọn giải quyết tranh chấp tại tòa án địa phương có thẩm quyền. Vui lòng xem lại Mục 15 dưới đây để biết chi tiết.
Các sản phẩm tiền điện tử, bao gồm cả Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số, phần lớn không được quản lý và có thể có rủi ro cao. Có thể không có biện pháp khắc phục theo quy định đối với bất kỳ tổn thất nào từ các giao dịch như vậy.
Không có nội dung nào trong Dịch vụ cấu thành lời đề nghị bán hoặc chào mời mua bất kỳ chứng khoán hoặc Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào. Các Dịch vụ không cấu thành tư vấn đầu tư. Việc nắm giữ, mua hoặc bán bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào (như được định nghĩa trong Mục 2.1 dưới đây) có thể không được phép tại nơi quý vị cư trú và quý vị có trách nhiệm tuân thủ mọi luật hiện hành. Vui lòng cân nhắc xem việc mua, bán, sử dụng hoặc nắm giữ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số có phù hợp với quý vị hay không dựa trên tình hình tài chính và hiểu biết của quý vị về Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số. Giá trị của Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số có thể thay đổi nhanh chóng và có thể mất toàn bộ giá trị.
Ngoài ra, mã thông báo Worldcoin (“WLD”) không nhằm mục đích cho phép người cư trú ở Hoa Kỳ, bao gồm công dân, thường trú nhân Hoa Kỳ hoặc những người ở Hoa Kỳ, hoặc các công ty được thành lập, đặt trụ sở hoặc thường trú tại Hoa Kỳ, hoặc có đại lý đã đăng ký tại Hoa Kỳ, sử dụng, mua hoặc truy cập. Chúng tôi không cung cấp WLD cho những người cư trú ở Hoa Kỳ này. Hơn nữa, quý vị đồng ý rằng quý vị sẽ không bán, chuyển nhượng hoặc cung cấp WLD cho người cư trú ở Hoa Kỳ. Quý vị có thể tìm thêm thông tin về các rủi ro liên quan đến WLD tại đây.
1. Phạm vi của các Điều khoản
1.1 Quyền riêng tư và Dữ liệu của Quý vị
. Khi truy cập Ứng dụng, quý vị có thể cung cấp cho chúng tôi các loại thông tin cá nhân, chẳng hạn như tên hoặc số điện thoại của quý vị. Nếu quý vị cung cấp thông tin để chứng minh nhân thân và yêu cầu mã thông báo WLD, thì quý vị có thể cung cấp các loại dữ liệu cá nhân nhạy cảm đặc biệt, chẳng hạn như thông tin sinh trắc học của quý vị. Thông báo Quyền riêng tư của chúng tôi mô tả dữ liệu chúng tôi thu thập từ quý vị và cách chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu đó. Vui lòng không sử dụng Dịch vụ nếu quý vị không muốn chúng tôi thu thập hoặc sử dụng dữ liệu của quý vị theo cách được mô tả trong Thông báo Quyền riêng tư.
1.2 Tính đủ điều kiện.
Các trang web mô tả dịch vụ của chúng tôi có thể truy cập được trên toàn thế giới, nhưng điều này không có nghĩa là tất cả các Dịch vụ hoặc tính năng dịch vụ đều hợp pháp hoặc khả dụng ở quốc gia của quý vị. Quý vị không được sử dụng VPN hoặc các công cụ tương tự nhằm mục đích lách bất kỳ hạn chế nào. Quý vị có trách nhiệm đảm bảo rằng việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi hợp pháp tại nơi quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ. Dịch vụ của chúng tôi không khả dụng bằng tất cả các ngôn ngữ. Dịch vụ của chúng tôi hợp pháp tại nơi quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ. Dịch vụ của chúng tôi không khả dụng bằng tất cả các ngôn ngữ. Để sử dụng Dịch vụ, quý vị phải tuân thủ các Điều khoản này và luật pháp hiện hành. Quý vị không được sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi để thực hiện, quảng bá hoặc trợ giúp người khác thực hiện bất kỳ hoạt động bất hợp pháp hoặc trái pháp luật nào.
Ngoài ra, quý vị phải đáp ứng tất cả các tiêu chí sau:
Quý vị đã đủ 18 tuổi trở lên; và
Quý vị
không
cư trú tại, thuộc sự kiểm soát của, là công dân hoặc thường trú nhân của: Syria, Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Các vùng Kherson và Zaporizhzhia của Ukraine, Nga, Bắc Triều Tiên, Iran, Cuba hoặc bất kỳ quốc gia hoặc khu vực nào khác mà Hoa Kỳ, Liên minh Châu Âu hoặc bất kỳ quốc gia hoặc khu vực pháp lý nào khác đã hạn chế quyền truy cập vào Dịch vụ;
Quý vị không phải là “Công dân Được chỉ định Đặc biệt” theo tuyên bố của Văn phòng Kiểm soát Tài sản nước ngoài (Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control, “OFAC”) thuộc Bộ Tài chính Hoa Kỳ hoặc danh sách trừng phạt của bất kỳ quốc gia nào khác, và tên của quý vị không có trong Danh sách những Người bị Từ chối Nhập cảnh của Bộ Thương mại Hoa Kỳ hoặc danh sách những người bị cấm của bất kỳ quốc gia nào khác.
Nếu quý vị không đáp ứng tất cả các yêu cầu này, quý vị sẽ không được phép truy cập hoặc sử dụng Dịch vụ, và do đó, chúng tôi có thể hạn chế khả năng truy cập hoặc sử dụng Dịch vụ của quý vị.
Ngoài ra, nếu quý vị thành lập hoặc cư trú tại Đức hoặc có nơi cư trú thông thường hoặc văn phòng đã đăng ký tại đó, quý vị không được phép truy cập hoặc sử dụng các dịch vụ của bên thứ ba theo nghĩa của Mục 2.5 hoặc các ứng dụng phi tập trung theo nghĩa của Mục 2.8. Những tính năng này không khả dụng với quý vị.
1.3 Tính khả dụng
. Các trang web mô tả Dịch vụ có thể truy cập được trên toàn thế giới, nhưng điều này không có nghĩa là tất cả các Dịch vụ hoặc tính năng dịch vụ đều hợp pháp hoặc khả dụng ở quốc gia của quý vị. Chúng tôi hoặc các chính phủ có thể chặn quyền truy cập vào một số Dịch vụ nhất định (hoặc một số tính năng nhất định của Dịch vụ) ở một số quốc gia nhất định. Quý vị không được sử dụng VPN hoặc các công cụ tương tự nhằm mục đích lách bất kỳ hạn chế nào. Quyền truy cập vào Ứng dụng và một số tính năng trong Ứng dụng có thể không khả dụng hoặc bị hạn chế, tùy thuộc vào vị trí của quý vị.
Quý vị có trách nhiệm đảm bảo rằng việc sử dụng Dịch vụ của quý vị là hợp pháp tại nơi quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ
. Dịch vụ không khả dụng bằng tất cả các ngôn ngữ.
1.4 Cập nhật
. Chúng tôi có thể thay đổi các Điều khoản này theo từng thời điểm. Nếu chúng tôi làm như vậy, chúng tôi sẽ cung cấp các điều khoản cập nhật trên Dịch vụ và khi luật hiện hành yêu cầu, chúng tôi sẽ thông báo cho quý vị trước khi thực hiện bất kỳ thay đổi nào và khi những thay đổi đó có thể đặc biệt quan trọng hoặc bất lợi cho quý vị, chúng tôi sẽ cung cấp thêm thông báo trước nếu luật hiện hành yêu cầu. Quý vị hiểu và đồng ý rằng việc quý vị tiếp tục sử dụng Dịch vụ sau khi chúng tôi đã thực hiện bất kỳ thay đổi nào và quý vị không phản đối cụ thể những thay đổi đó sẽ cấu thành sự chấp nhận của quý vị đối với các Điều khoản đã cập nhật. Quý vị có thể ngừng sử dụng Dịch vụ bất kỳ lúc nào nếu quý vị không đồng ý với các Điều khoản này. Vì Dịch vụ liên tục phát triển theo thời gian nên chúng tôi có thể thay đổi hoặc ngừng toàn bộ hoặc một phần Dịch vụ bất kỳ lúc nào mà không cần thông báo, theo quyết định riêng của chúng tôi, trong phạm vi luật pháp hiện hành cho phép.
1.5 Điều khoản Bổ sung.
Các điều khoản và điều kiện bổ sung có thể áp dụng cho các ứng dụng, nội dung, tính năng hoặc cấu phần cụ thể của Dịch vụ và tất cả các điều khoản và điều kiện bổ sung mà chúng tôi cung cấp cho quý vị sẽ là một phần của các Điều khoản này.
2. Dịch vụ
2.1 Ví Không Lưu ký.
Ứng dụng World bao gồm ví không lưu trữ và không lưu ký để lưu giữ các loại tiền điện tử, tiền kỹ thuật số hoặc Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ (bao gồm WLD và gọi chung là “Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số”). Quý vị kiểm soát các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được lưu giữ trong ví của mình. Với Ứng dụng World, khóa riêng (là mật khẩu để truy cập Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số) được lưu giữ trực tiếp trên thiết bị của quý vị. Bất kỳ lúc nào, tùy thuộc vào kết nối internet và tình trạng tắc nghẽn trên blockchain, quý vị có thể rút Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của mình bằng cách gửi chúng đến một địa chỉ blockchain khác. Khi quý vị lưu giữ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số trong ví của mình, chúng tôi không kiểm soát ví, Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số hoặc khóa riêng của quý vị. Người dùng phải chịu trách nhiệm về rủi ro mất khóa riêng của mình, cả TFH và Ứng dụng World đều không thể khôi phục những khóa đó.
Vì Ứng dụng World là ví không lưu ký nên quý vị sẽ được cung cấp một địa chỉ ví chỉ rõ nơi lưu giữ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị trên blockchain tương ứng. Chúng tôi không có khả năng truy cập vào Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị.
2.2 Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ.
Ứng dụng World hỗ trợ một số mã thông báo ERC-20 nhất định. Trong tương lai, chúng tôi có thể bổ sung hỗ trợ cho nhiều loại Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số khác. Ứng dụng World hiển thị các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ.
Hãy chắc chắn kiểm tra mã thông báo và mạng nào được hỗ trợ trong Ứng dụng World trước khi quý vị gửi hoặc rút Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của mình. Chúng tôi không thể khôi phục Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị nếu quý vị gửi mã thông báo không được hỗ trợ hoặc gửi Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đến địa chỉ ví không chính xác.
Quý vị hiểu rằng việc gửi Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số không được hỗ trợ đến một địa chỉ ví Ứng dụng World có thể khiến quý vị mất hoàn toàn quyền truy cập vào các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đó. Chúng tôi không có cách nào để khôi phục các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số. Hãy đảm bảo rằng quý vị luôn gửi đúng Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đến đúng địa chỉ ví. Quý vị nên thử thực hiện một giao dịch với một lượng nhỏ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số.
2.3 Cung cấp và Tiếp cận.
Khi quý vị tương tác với Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của mình - chẳng hạn như gửi chúng đến một địa chỉ ví khác hoặc kết nối với một ứng dụng phân tán - khi sử dụng Dịch vụ, quý vị sẽ được yêu cầu chấp thuận hoặc “ký” tương tác thông qua các thiết bị mà quý vị đã xác định trong quá trình gia nhập. Các ứng dụng hoàn toàn phụ thuộc vào sự chấp thuận của quý vị từ các thiết bị này để bắt đầu tương tác với blockchain có liên quan. Quý vị hiểu rằng quý vị đang tương tác trực tiếp với blockchain có liên quan khi thực hiện những tương tác này và chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm truyền lệnh thay mặt quý vị.
2.4 Thông tin từ Bên thứ ba.
Bằng việc sử dụng Dịch vụ, quý vị có thể truy cập thông tin liên quan đến Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của mình, chẳng hạn như nhưng không giới hạn ở giá trị thị trường hiện tại của chúng. Việc trình bày thông tin này không ngụ ý bất kỳ sự liên kết hoặc xác nhận nào với bên thứ ba, ngay cả khi một số chức năng được cung cấp liên quan đến Dịch vụ đòi hỏi phải sử dụng các sản phẩm của bên thứ ba đó. Nội dung của các dịch vụ và sản phẩm của bên thứ ba như được nêu trong Dịch vụ đều dựa trên thông tin công khai hoặc do bên thứ ba đó cung cấp cho chúng tôi và do đó chúng tôi không đưa ra bất kỳ tuyên bố hoặc bảo đảm nào về tính chính xác của thông tin liên quan đến dịch vụ hoặc sản phẩm của bên thứ ba đó.
2.5 Dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba
Người dùng được thành lập hoặc cư trú tại Đức hoặc có nơi ở thường xuyên hoặc trụ sở đăng ký tại đó không thể sử dụng Dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba để bán hoặc trao đổi Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của họ theo Mục này.
Khi khả dụng, Dịch vụ có thể cung cấp cho quý vị các liên kết đến bên xử lý thứ ba để xử lý các giao dịch như mua Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số bằng tiền pháp định, bán Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số, trao đổi Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số và các chức năng khác có thể có trong tương lai. Quý vị có thể xem những dịch vụ của bên thứ ba nào khả dụng trong Ứng dụng World. Khi quý vị thực hiện các giao dịch này, quý vị đang thực hiện giao dịch với bên thứ ba chứ không phải với chúng tôi. Quý vị phải tuân theo các hướng dẫn có liên quan do nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba cung cấp và chấp nhận các điều khoản dịch vụ của họ. Chúng tôi không kiểm soát hoặc chuyển tiền hoặc Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị bất kỳ lúc nào trong khi cung cấp Dịch vụ hoặc khi quý vị truy cập các dịch vụ của bên thứ ba.
2.6 Giao dịch Ngang hàng.
Dịch vụ cung cấp một nền tảng truyền thông mà qua đó quý vị có thể gửi đến hoặc yêu cầu, nhận và lưu trữ các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ từ các ví blockchain khác, cho dù do quý vị hay bên thứ ba kiểm soát. Việc quý vị chuyển Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ giữa các ví blockchain khác của quý vị và từ bên thứ ba cũng được coi là giao dịch chuyển. Bên khởi tạo giao dịch chuyển sẽ chịu toàn bộ trách nhiệm thực hiện giao dịch đúng cách, bao gồm việc thanh toán đủ phí mạng hoặc phí khai thác để giao dịch thành công. Phí mạng không đủ có thể khiến giao dịch chuyển vẫn ở trạng thái chờ xử lý và có thể dẫn đến sự chậm trễ hoặc tổn thất do lỗi khi khởi tạo giao dịch. Chúng tôi không có nghĩa vụ hỗ trợ khắc phục những giao dịch như vậy. Khi quý vị gửi bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào từ ví của mình đến một ví blockchain khác, các giao dịch chuyển đó sẽ được quý vị thực hiện trên chuỗi chứ không thuộc kiểm soát của chúng tôi. Quý vị nên xác minh tất cả thông tin giao dịch trước khi gửi chúng. Chúng tôi không chịu bất kỳ trách nhiệm nào trong trường hợp quý vị nhập địa chỉ đích blockchain không chính xác. Việc chuyển Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số không thể được đảo ngược sau khi đã được phát đến mạng blockchain có liên quan, mặc dù giao dịch có thể ở trạng thái chờ xử lý và được chỉ định phù hợp trong khi được xử lý bởi nhà điều hành mạng. Chúng tôi không kiểm soát mạng và không đảm bảo rằng giao dịch chuyển sẽ được mạng xác nhận.
2.7 Kho lưu trữ
2.7.1 Thông tin chung
. Ứng dụng World cung cấp giao diện người dùng đến “kho lưu trữ” phi tập trung dành cho Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số (“Kho lưu trữ”) của quý vị. Việc quý vị sử dụng Kho lưu trữ đồng nghĩa với việc quý vị thừa nhận và chấp thuận các điều khoản quản lý Kho lưu trữ, cũng như bất kỳ điều khoản bổ sung nào đưa ra bởi bên thứ ba đã phát triển hoặc cung cấp các tính năng liên quan đến hoặc phát sinh từ việc quý vị sử dụng Kho lưu trữ.
Kho lưu trữ chỉ hỗ trợ một số loại Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nhất định. Các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số này không đủ điều kiện là Mã thông báo Tham chiếu Tài sản hoặc Mã thông báo Tiền điện tử theo các điều khoản tại Quy định (EU) 2023/1114 của Nghị viện Châu Âu và Hội đồng ngày 31 tháng 5 năm 2023 về thị trường tài sản tiền điện tử. Các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ sẽ được hiển thị trong Ứng dụng World khi quý vị truy cập vào Kho lưu trữ. Các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được Kho lưu trữ hỗ trợ có thể thay đổi theo từng thời điểm và không có gì đảm bảo rằng các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số được hỗ trợ sẽ vẫn khả dụng để sử dụng trong Kho lưu trữ.
Kho lưu trữ được cung cấp liên quan đến hợp đồng thông minh của bên thứ ba. Không có cá nhân hoặc thực thể nào khác, ngoài quý vị, có khả năng tương tác với Kho lưu trữ hoặc Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số bên trong Kho lưu trữ của quý vị. TFH hoặc bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào đều không có khóa quản trị hoặc quyền truy cập (theo đặc quyền hoặc không) vào Kho lưu trữ của quý vị hoặc các hợp đồng thông minh liên quan. Việc gửi vào hoặc rút ra bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào từ tài khoản của quý vị chỉ có thể diễn ra nếu giao dịch đó được ký bằng khóa riêng tương ứng của quý vị như được mô tả trong Mục 2.1 của các Điều khoản này. Điều này có nghĩa là nếu quý vị mất quyền truy cập hoặc quyền kiểm soát khóa riêng của mình, quý vị sẽ không thể gửi hoặc rút bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào từ Kho lưu trữ và không bên nào khác có thể hỗ trợ quý vị hoặc thực hiện việc đó thay mặt quý vị. Theo đó, việc sử dụng Kho lưu trữ không và không thể cung cấp cho quý vị bất kỳ dịch vụ lưu ký, bảo quản hoặc chuyển nào của TFH hoặc bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào khác liên quan đến bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào mà quý vị có thể khóa bằng cách sử dụng Kho lưu trữ trên tài khoản của mình.
Hợp đồng thông minh quản lý chức năng Kho lưu trữ cho các mã thông báo WLD có thể được xem bằng blockchain  tại đây. Để rõ ràng, việc sử dụng các chức năng này và bất kỳ chức năng Kho lưu trữ liên quan nào khác đều phải tuân theo Tuyên bố Miễn trừ Trách nhiệm Bảo hành nêu tại Mục 12 của các Điều khoản này.
2.7.2 Các chức năng của Kho lưu trữ
. Kho lưu trữ hiện cung cấp các tính năng sau, có thể được TFH hoặc bên thứ ba thay đổi, xóa hoặc thêm vào:  Khóa, Lợi nhuận, Rút ra và Thời hạn Bảo mật, Gửi Phần thưởng vào Kho lưu trữ.
2.7.3 Khóa
. Khi sử dụng Kho lưu trữ, quý vị đồng ý khóa Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của mình trong một khoảng thời gian nhất định. Việc khóa Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số bằng Kho lưu trữ sẽ chuyển các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đó từ ví không lưu ký của quý vị sang hợp đồng thông minh phi tập trung. Khi chuyển, các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số này sẽ được “khóa” trong kho, bao gồm cả thời gian chúng được ký gửi trong kho cũng như khoảng thời gian được xác định trước gọi là “Thời hạn Bảo mật”, được mô tả chi tiết dưới đây. Trong khi Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị được khóa, quý vị sẽ không thể truy cập, chuyển hoặc thực hiện bất kỳ giao dịch nào khác với những Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số này cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu rút các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số này và đã hết Thời hạn Bảo mật áp dụng. Không ai, kể cả TFH hoặc Nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba, có khả năng mở khóa, lưu ký, kiểm soát, rút ra hoặc chuyển Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đã khóa của quý vị. Việc đặt Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị vào Kho lưu trữ và áp dụng các hạn chế về khóa và rút ra không cấu thành hành vi bán, cho vay hoặc chuyển nhượng bất kỳ quyền, quyền sở hữu hoặc lợi ích nào đối với Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số cho TFH hoặc bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào khác.
Việc khóa Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị trong Kho lưu trữ không đảm bảo rằng Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị được bảo quản hoặc giữ an toàn. Không có chương trình bảo hiểm tài sản gửi hoặc bất kỳ biện pháp bảo vệ tương tự nào áp dụng cho Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị và giá trị và/hoặc hiệu dụng của bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào quý vị đã khóa có thể tăng hoặc giảm trong suốt Thời hạn Bảo mật. Điều này có nghĩa là giá trị hoặc hiệu dụng của bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào quý vị khóa trong Kho lưu trữ của mình có thể giảm hoặc bằng 0 trong Thời hạn Bảo mật. Quý vị thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng bất kỳ việc rút Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào ra khỏi tài khoản của quý vị sau Thời hạn bảo mật áp dụng có thể dẫn đến việc trả về Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số có giá trị thấp hơn hoặc không có giá trị nào so với thời điểm quý vị khóa chúng trong Kho lưu trữ của mình và TFH cũng như bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào không chịu rủi ro hoặc trách nhiệm về bất kỳ sự giảm giá trị nào có thể xảy ra.
2.7.4 Lợi nhuận.
Quý vị cũng có thể đủ điều kiện để tạo ra thứ mà theo mục đích của sản phẩm này được gọi là "lợi nhuận" trên một số Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nhất định trong Kho lưu trữ của quý vị. Lợi nhuận này, có thể ở dạng Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số bổ sung, được cung cấp bởi bên thứ ba thông qua một loạt hoạt động hợp đồng thông minh riêng biệt mà quý vị có thể truy cập bằng giao diện được cung cấp trong Ứng dụng World. TFH hoặc bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào đều không sử dụng, kiểm soát, nhận bất kỳ tín dụng nào hoặc xử lý Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị theo bất kỳ cách nào khác. Do đó, lợi nhuận không phải là khoản lãi được gắn với hoặc tạo ra bởi bất kỳ điều gì khác ngoài việc khóa Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị theo các điều khoản và thông số kỹ thuật được cung cấp. Bất kỳ lợi nhuận nào quý vị nhận được đều do bên thứ ba cung cấp cho quý vị dưới dạng thưởng dựa trên quyết định lưu trữ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị bằng Kho lưu trữ. Các thông số kỹ thuật xác định việc tạo ra lợi nhuận, bao gồm số lượng tạo ra hoặc thời gian mà lợi nhuận có thể tích lũy, có thể được thay đổi hoặc hủy bỏ bất kỳ lúc nào, tùy theo quyết định của Nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba.
Có thể có mức lợi nhuận tối đa mà quý vị kiếm được. Các chi tiết này sẽ được trình bày cùng với Kho lưu trữ của quý vị và thông qua bất kỳ điều khoản bổ sung nào do bên thứ ba (được xác định là “Nhà cung cấp” trong Ứng dụng World) cung cấp lợi nhuận. Những điều khoản bổ sung này cũng được đưa vào các Điều khoản này. TFH không cung cấp hoặc mang lại lợi nhuận.
Bất kỳ lợi nhuận nào tích lũy sẽ chỉ được phân phối cho quý vị sau khi hoàn tất việc rút bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số tạo ra lợi nhuận nào từ Kho lưu trữ, điều này chỉ xảy ra sau khi mọi Thời hạn Bảo mật áp dụng đã hết hạn. Việc rút ra này là điều kiện cuối cùng của bất kỳ khoản cấp lợi nhuận nào, nghĩa là quý vị không có quyền, quyền sở hữu hoặc quyền lợi đối với bất kỳ lợi nhuận nào đã hoặc sẽ được tạo ra cho đến khi lợi nhuận đã được nhận trong ví không lưu ký của quý vị. Điều này cũng có nghĩa là nếu quý vị mất quyền truy cập hoặc quyền kiểm soát khóa riêng của mình, quý vị sẽ không thể thực hiện bất kỳ giao dịch rút ra nào để nhận được lợi nhuận.
2.7.5 Rút ra và Thời hạn Bảo mật
. Quý vị có thể bắt đầu rút Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của mình ra khỏi Kho lưu trữ bất kỳ lúc nào. Các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số mà quý vị yêu cầu rút ra khỏi Kho lưu trữ sẽ được trả về cho quý vị sau khi đã hết khoảng thời gian được thiết lập trước gọi là “Thời hạn Bảo mật”. Mỗi lần quý vị bắt đầu rút Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số ra khỏi Kho lưu trữ, một Thời hạn Bảo mật mới sẽ bắt đầu và đếm ngược thời gian cho đến khi các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đó được trả về cho quý vị. Trong thời gian này, các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số mà quý vị đã chọn để rút ra sẽ vẫn bị khóa và quý vị cũng có thể hủy lệnh rút. Sau khi đã hết Thời hạn Bảo mật, việc rút của quý vị sẽ hoàn tất và Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số cùng với bất kỳ lợi nhuận nào có thể tích lũy được sẽ được gửi vào ví của quý vị. Thời hạn Bảo mật kéo dài bao lâu sẽ được nêu trong Ứng dụng World khi quý vị truy cập vào Kho lưu trữ của mình.
2.7.6 Gửi Phần thưởng vào Kho lưu trữ
. Tính năng này, khi được chọn, cho phép quý vị tự động gửi Phần thưởng WLD trực tiếp vào Kho lưu trữ trên tài khoản của quý vị thay vì gửi vào ví. Quý vị có thể thay đổi cài đặt này bất kỳ lúc nào.
2.7.7 TFH và Kho lưu trữ
. Quý vị có thể truy cập tính năng này thông qua Ứng dụng World. Tuy nhiên, TFH chỉ có thể đọc dữ liệu liên quan và hiển thị dữ liệu đó cho quý vị. TFH không thể chuyển, rút ra hoặc gửi bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào của quý vị và không có quyền truy cập vào Kho lưu trữ của quý vị.
2.8 Ứng dụng Phi tập trung
Mục này không áp dụng cho người dùng được thành lập hoặc định cư tại Đức hoặc có nơi cư trú thông thường hoặc văn phòng đã đăng ký tại đó:
Khi khả dụng,
chúng tôi có thể cung cấp chức năng cho phép quý vị kết nối ví của mình với nhiều ứng dụng phi tập trung khác nhau. Quý vị hoàn toàn chịu trách nhiệm đảm bảo tính an toàn và bảo mật của các ứng dụng bên thứ ba này. Chúng tôi không kiểm soát các ứng dụng của bên thứ ba và không thể hỗ trợ bất kỳ sự cố nào quý vị có thể gặp phải khi kết nối với các ứng dụng của bên thứ ba.
2.9 Hỗ trợ Người dùng
. Chúng tôi cung cấp dịch vụ hỗ trợ người dùng đối với một số tính năng và chức năng nhất định liên quan đến Dịch vụ. Để liên hệ, hãy chọn “Hỗ trợ” từ menu trong ứng dụng hoặc thông qua địa chỉ support@toolsforhumanity.com.
2.10 Giao diện World ID
. Quỹ Worldcoin, chứ không phải TFH, quản lý Giao thức World ID và kiểm soát việc xử lý dữ liệu liên quan đến Orb để xác minh World ID. Chúng tôi có thể cung cấp World ID của quý vị (dưới dạng giao diện) cho quý vị thông qua Dịch vụ. Giao thức World ID cho phép quý vị chứng minh quý vị là một người thật và duy nhất, đồng thời bảo vệ quyền riêng tư của quý vị.
2.11 Chương trình Mời
. Khi khả dụng, chúng tôi có thể cung cấp tính năng "Mời" cho quý vị. Khi sử dụng tính năng Mời, quý vị có thể mời bạn bè và gia đình tải xuống Ứng dụng World và xác minh World ID. Nếu đang sử dụng tính năng Mời, quý vị đồng ý với các điều khoản và điều kiện sau:
Phần thưởng khi tham gia chương trình Mời được cung cấp bởi World Assets Limited. World Assets Limited có thể tùy ý trao cho quý vị phần thưởng khi quý vị mời người dùng xác minh thành công World ID của họ. Để nhận được phần thưởng, quý vị phải đáp ứng một số điều kiện nhất định sẽ được giải thích trong Ứng dụng World. Quý vị có giới hạn tối đa về số lượng người dùng mà quý vị có thể giới thiệu đến Ứng dụng World. Giới hạn này được hiển thị trong Ứng dụng World.
Không cần phải mua hàng để tham gia tính năng Mời. Tính năng Mời chỉ dành cho mục đích sử dụng cá nhân, phi thương mại. Quý vị chỉ có thể sử dụng tính năng Mời một cách thiện chí cho các mục đích hợp pháp. Quý vị không được: (a) sử dụng tính năng Mời hoặc Dịch vụ theo cách lừa đảo, gian lận hoặc bất hợp pháp; (b) làm bất kỳ điều gì gây tổn hại đến thương hiệu, lợi thế thương mại hoặc danh tiếng của chúng tôi; (c) truyền tải quảng cáo hoặc tài liệu khuyến mại không được yêu cầu hoặc trái phép; (d) đưa ra khiếu nại sai sự thật hoặc gây hiểu lầm; (e) sử dụng tìm kiếm trả phí, phương tiện truyền thông trả phí hoặc hoạt động tương tự khác để thu hút người dùng thông qua tính năng Mời; và (f) sử dụng tính năng Mời để tìm cách lấy thông tin cá nhân từ những người dùng khác.
Tính năng Mời không khả dụng ở tất cả các quốc gia hoặc địa điểm và không khả dụng với tất cả người dùng. Tính năng Mời không khả dụng ở bất kỳ khu vực pháp lý nào mà toàn bộ hoặc một phần của tính năng này có thể vi phạm (hoặc khiến chúng tôi vi phạm) bất kỳ yêu cầu pháp lý nào. Quý vị đồng ý không sử dụng tính năng Mời nếu tính năng Mời không phù hợp với luật hiện hành tại địa điểm của quý vị.
Tính năng Mời được cung cấp theo quyết định riêng của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi có thể thay đổi, sửa đổi, tạm dừng và hủy bỏ tính năng này bất kỳ lúc nào. World Assets Limited có thể từ chối trao phần thưởng cho quý vị vì đã mời người dùng xác minh World ID của họ nếu World Assets Limited xác định, theo quyết định riêng của mình, rằng quý vị đã vi phạm các Điều khoản này.
2.12 Phần thưởng WLD và Đặt trước
. Một trong các dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba là yêu cầu một số lượng nhỏ WLD theo các khoảng thời gian khác nhau (“Phần thưởng WLD”). Phần thưởng WLD được cung cấp bởi World Assets Limited, một công ty con của Worldcoin Foundation. Số lượng, khoảng thời gian và thời điểm chính xác của cả Phần thưởng WLD sẽ được nêu rõ trong Ứng dụng World, nhưng chỉ do World Assets Limited quyết định. Phù hợp với các phiên bản trước của các điều khoản này, Đặt trước WLD có sẵn trước đây không đảm bảo rằng quý vị sẽ nhận được bất kỳ khoản Phần thưởng WLD nào. Số lượng, khoảng thời gian và thời điểm chính xác của Phần thưởng WLD sẽ được nêu rõ trong Ứng dụng World, nhưng chỉ do World Assets Limited quyết định. Đặt trước WLD có thể hết hạn, có hoặc không có thông báo trước trên Ứng dụng World, bất kể quý vị đã thực hiện Đặt trước WLD hay đã nhận được Phần thưởng WLD liên quan hay chưa. Chúng có thể được thu hồi theo quyết định riêng của World Assets Limited.
2.13 Ứng dụng Operator
. Đối với Bên vận hành Orb và các đối tác khác, chúng tôi cung cấp Ứng dụng Operator cho phép quý vị theo dõi một số hoạt động và số liệu thống kê có liên quan đến quý vị và doanh nghiệp của quý vị với tư cách là Bên vận hành Orb. Chúng tôi cũng có thể cung cấp một số tính năng nhất định để giúp quý vị tiến hành hoạt động kinh doanh với tư cách là Bên vận hành Orb.
2.14. Miniapps
. “Miniapps” là một tính năng của Ứng dụng World cho phép quý vị truy cập vào một nền tảng gồm các ứng dụng nhỏ có thể được truy cập trong Ứng dụng World. Chúng tôi có toàn quyền quyết định cách hiển thị Miniapps trong Ứng dụng World. Quý vị phải có địa chỉ ví Ứng dụng World để truy cập Miniapps.
Quý vị thừa nhận rằng khi hiển thị Miniapps, TFH đang cung cấp một nền tảng công nghệ chỉ nhằm kết nối người dùng. TFH không bao giờ truyền, lưu trữ, sở hữu, nắm giữ hoặc dính líu đến bất kỳ loại tiền truyền thống hoặc kỹ thuật số nào. TFH không xử lý các giao dịch, đóng vai trò là bên xử lý thanh toán hoặc tham gia xử lý các giao dịch. TFH không phải là một bên tham gia vào các giao dịch và không chịu trách nhiệm pháp lý liên quan đến các giao dịch này. TFH không thể cung cấp hỗ trợ liên quan đến các vấn đề về giao dịch.
2.14.1 Giao dịch và Thanh toán liên quan đến Miniapps.
Các ứng dụng nhỏ được hiển thị trong Ứng dụng World và có thể cung cấp hàng hóa hoặc dịch vụ mà người dùng Ứng dụng World có thể mua bằng Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số trong ví Ứng dụng World của họ. Các giao dịch này diễn ra giữa quý vị và ứng dụng nhỏ đó.  TFH không phải là một bên tham gia vào bất kỳ giao dịch nào như vậy.
Đối với bất kỳ giao dịch nào như vậy, quý vị thừa nhận rằng ví Ứng dụng World là một dịch vụ không lưu ký, TFH không lưu trữ hoặc nắm giữ các Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị và không giao dịch, truyền, sở hữu hoặc tham gia thực hiện bất kỳ giao dịch nào. Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số luôn được lưu trữ và truyền trên các mạng blockchain tương ứng của chúng. Không có gì đảm bảo rằng các giao dịch sẽ được xử lý chính xác.
TFH chỉ kết nối quý vị với một bên thứ ba trong nền tảng Miniapps và không tham gia bất kỳ giao dịch nào. TFH không có vai trò trong việc xử lý thanh toán và quản lý các khoản phí hoàn tiền hoặc hủy bỏ.
Khi quý vị quyết định tham gia vào một giao dịch, quý vị phải gửi số tiền và loại Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số đã thỏa thuận. TFH không xử lý Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số hoặc tiền tệ truyền thống của người dùng cũng như không thực hiện bất kỳ giao dịch chuyển nào thay mặt cho người dùng. TFH không xử lý, quản lý, giám sát, xác minh hoặc cung cấp bất kỳ loại bảo đảm nào đối với bất kỳ giao dịch nào.  Trong trường hợp giao dịch không được nhận, đảo ngược, xử lý không đúng cách hoặc gặp lỗi, quý vị và nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba phải phối hợp cùng nhau để giải quyết bất kỳ vấn đề nào phát sinh. Mọi tranh chấp, khiếu nại, tổn thất, hiểu lầm, lỗi kỹ thuật hoặc vấn đề dưới bất kỳ hình thức nào (cả vô tình và bị cáo buộc là cố ý) liên quan đến các thanh toán hoặc giao dịch phải được xử lý trực tiếp giữa quý vị và nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba.  TFH hoàn toàn không chịu trách nhiệm và sẽ không tham gia bất kỳ tranh chấp hoặc thảo luận nào liên quan đến thanh toán, đồng thời cũng không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ tổn thất hoặc thiệt hại nào có thể phát sinh cho các bên liên quan.
Quý vị hoàn toàn chịu trách nhiệm chấp nhận rủi ro của bất kỳ biến động giá nào liên quan đến giá trị của Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số và hiểu rằng khi quý vị hoàn thành giao dịch, giá trị Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số liên quan đến giao dịch có thể đã thay đổi đáng kể.
2.14.2 Bên thứ ba
. Các sản phẩm và dịch vụ được hiển thị trong bất kỳ ứng dụng nhỏ nào đều do bên thứ ba cung cấp và quản lý. Bằng việc sử dụng Miniapps, quý vị thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng:
Các Điều khoản này là giữa quý vị và chúng tôi, chứ không phải với bất kỳ ứng dụng nhỏ cụ thể nào;
Quý vị đang truy cập một ứng dụng được phát triển và/hoặc cung cấp bởi một ứng dụng của bên thứ ba, bên thứ ba đó chịu trách nhiệm hoàn toàn về ứng dụng nhỏ đó;
TFH chỉ cung cấp quyền truy cập vào các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ thanh toán bên thứ ba thông qua ví Ứng dụng World chứ không tự mình xử lý các khoản thanh toán hoặc giữ tiền;
Các ứng dụng nhỏ có thể có các điều khoản bổ sung thuộc phạm vi sản phẩm hoặc dịch vụ và quý vị phải tuân thủ các điều khoản này nếu chấp nhận dịch vụ của họ; và
Quý vị hoàn toàn xác nhận và chấp nhận một cách rõ ràng bất kỳ và tất cả các rủi ro liên quan đến các giao dịch và đồng ý rằng chúng tôi sẽ không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ rủi ro hoặc hệ quả bất lợi nào phát sinh từ các giao dịch đó.
Các Nhà phát triển riêng lẻ của các ứng dụng nhỏ được cung cấp tại Miniapps chịu trách nhiệm hoàn toàn về nội dung, sản phẩm, hàng hóa hoặc dịch vụ được cung cấp trực tiếp cho quý vị thông qua các ứng dụng nhỏ tương ứng của họ. Nếu có bất kỳ thắc mắc hoặc tranh chấp nào, quý vị phải liên hệ trực tiếp với Nhà phát triển tương ứng.
Người dùng chấp nhận tất cả rủi ro liên quan đến việc thực hiện giao dịch, bao gồm cả rủi ro rằng họ sẽ không nhận được số tiền thu được từ giao dịch mua hoặc bán. Trong trường hợp có vấn đề phát sinh liên quan đến bất kỳ giao dịch nào, TFH không thể hỗ trợ giải quyết, cũng như không chịu bất kỳ trách nhiệm pháp lý nào đối với các vấn đề phát sinh từ bất kỳ giao dịch nào.
2.14.3 Phí TFH
. Chúng tôi có thể thu phí sử dụng Miniapps khi quý vị thực hiện giao dịch với Nhà phát triển. Số tiền phí này sẽ được hiển thị cho quý vị trong nền tảng. Mọi khoản phí như vậy đều sẽ được hiển thị và cập nhật như được thể hiện trong Miniapps và có thể được cập nhật và thay đổi tùy từng thời điểm.
2.14.4 Thuế
. Quý vị là người duy nhất chịu trách nhiệm về việc xác định xem có bất kỳ loại thuế nào áp dụng cho bất kỳ giao dịch nào thông qua Miniapps hoặc các giao dịch quý vị thực hiện trong đó hay không và áp dụng ở mức độ nào, cũng như khấu trừ, thu, báo cáo và chuyển số tiền thuế chính xác cho cơ quan thuế có thẩm quyền.
2.14.5 Không thực hiện giám sát chung.
TFH sẽ không có nghĩa vụ giám sát thông tin do người dùng tạo, cũng như không chủ động tìm kiếm dữ kiện hoặc tình huống cho thấy bất kỳ hoạt động bất hợp pháp nào trong Miniapps.
Tuy nhiên, nếu chúng tôi biết rằng một sản phẩm hoặc dịch vụ bất hợp pháp đã được cung cấp qua Miniapps cho người dùng ở Liên minh Châu Âu bất kể sử dụng biện pháp nào, chúng tôi sẽ thông báo cho người dùng đã mua sản phẩm hoặc dịch vụ bất hợp pháp đó thông qua Miniapps
.
2.14.6 Các hoạt động bị cấm
. Người dùng Dịch vụ Miniapps đồng ý không đăng hoặc phân phối bất kỳ nội dung nào vi phạm bất kỳ luật nào hoặc vi phạm bất kỳ quyền của bên thứ ba, bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở bất kỳ quyền sở hữu trí tuệ, quyền riêng tư hoặc quyền công khai.
Ngoài ra, quý vị đồng ý không tham gia bất kỳ hoạt động nào:
Bất hợp pháp, gian lận hoặc gây hại;
Cản trở hoặc làm gián đoạn hoạt động của Miniapps;
Vi phạm bất kỳ điều khoản được nêu trong Hướng dẫn Ứng dụng của chúng tôi; và
Đưa vào nội dung không được cho phép theo Hướng dẫn Ứng dụng.
2.14.7 Gắn cờ nội dung bất hợp pháp
. Ứng dụng World có các cơ chế dễ truy cập và thân thiện với người dùng để qua đó người dùng thông báo cho chúng tôi về nội dung bất hợp pháp trong nền tảng Miniapps. Chúng tôi sẽ nhanh chóng xem xét các báo cáo đó.
2.14.8 Xóa nội dung bất hợp pháp
. Nếu chúng tôi xác định bất kỳ ứng dụng nhỏ nào chứa nội dung bất hợp pháp hoặc cung cấp sản phẩm hoặc dịch vụ bất hợp pháp, ứng dụng nhỏ đó sẽ bị xóa khỏi Miniapps. TFH sẽ cung cấp một tuyên bố ngắn gọn, rõ ràng và cụ thể về lý do cho bất kỳ ai đăng tải nội dung hoặc dịch vụ bất hợp pháp.
Bất kỳ hạn chế nào do Ứng dụng World thực thi đối với người dùng sẽ được thực hiện một cách cẩn thận, khách quan và tương xứng.
Nếu tin rằng nội dung của mình đã bị xóa hoặc quyền truy cập vào nội dung đó đã bị vô hiệu hóa một cách không chính đáng, người dùng có thể liên hệ với chúng tôi qua địa chỉ
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
để kháng nghị quyết định. Chúng tôi cung cấp hệ thống khiếu nại điện tử miễn phí, cho phép người dùng phản đối các quyết định của chúng tôi liên quan đến việc xóa nội dung, tạm dừng dịch vụ, chấm dứt tài khoản hoặc hạn chế kiếm tiền do cáo buộc nội dung bất hợp pháp hoặc vi phạm điều khoản.
2.14.9 Kiểm duyệt nội dung
. TFH có quyền tạm ngừng cung cấp dịch vụ của chúng tôi trong một khoảng thời gian hợp lý cho người dùng thường xuyên cung cấp nội dung rõ ràng là bất hợp pháp, sau khi đã đưa ra cảnh báo trước nếu pháp luật yêu cầu. TFH cũng có thể tạm ngừng xử lý các thông báo và khiếu nại từ người dùng thường xuyên gửi khiếu nại vô căn cứ.
2.15. Tên người dùng
. Tên người dùng Ứng dụng World của quý vị không nhất thiết phải là tên thật của quý vị. Khi chọn tên người dùng, quý vị có nghĩa vụ tuân thủ
Chính sách Tên người dùng
, phiên bản mới nhất.
3. Mua hàng, Phí và Thuế
3.1 Phí Giao dịch
. Bằng việc sử dụng Dịch vụ, quý vị đồng ý thanh toán mọi khoản phí áp dụng, bao gồm phí giao dịch cho các giao dịch và hoán đổi Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số. Chúng tôi sẽ thông báo cho quý vị về bất kỳ khoản phí nào được áp dụng trước khi quý vị thực hiện giao dịch. Nếu quý vị sử dụng dịch vụ thanh toán của bên thứ ba, thì phí ngân hàng, phí thẻ tín dụng và thẻ ghi nợ được tính cho bất kỳ giao dịch mua Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào có thể được khấu trừ khỏi số tiền đã thanh toán cho các giao dịch mua Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị. Quý vị cũng có trách nhiệm thanh toán mọi khoản phí bổ sung do nhà cung cấp dịch vụ tài chính thu.
3.2 Phí mạng
. Các tương tác với blockchain cũng phải chịu phí mạng. Phí mạng được tính và trả cho mạng blockchain, không phải cho chúng tôi, để tạo thuận lợi cho bất kỳ tương tác nào. Trong một số trường hợp, quý vị có thể đủ điều kiện nhận một số lượng giới hạn giao dịch miễn phí phí gas trong một khoảng thời gian nhất định do TFH toàn quyền quyết định. Các giao dịch đó phải tuân theo yêu cầu về giá trị giao dịch tối thiểu và TFH có thể điều chỉnh giá trị này.
3.3 Thuế
. Quý vị là người duy nhất chịu trách nhiệm về việc xác định xem có áp dụng bất kỳ loại thuế nào cho bất kỳ giao dịch nào thông qua Dịch vụ hay không và áp dụng ở mức độ nào, cũng như khấu trừ, thu, báo cáo và chuyển số tiền thuế chính xác cho cơ quan thuế có thẩm quyền.
3.4 Cập nhật
. Mọi khoản phí đều được trình bày và cập nhật như phản ánh trong Dịch vụ và có thể được cập nhật và thay đổi tùy từng thời điểm.
4. Các yếu tố Rủi ro
4.1 Không phải là Tiền tệ Hợp pháp.
Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số không phải là tiền tệ hợp pháp, không được bất kỳ chính phủ nào bảo lãnh và các tài khoản Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số cũng như số dư giá trị trên Dịch vụ không được bảo vệ bởi Công ty Bảo hiểm Ký thác Liên bang, Công ty Bảo vệ Nhà đầu tư Chứng khoán hoặc các biện pháp bảo vệ tương tự ở các quốc gia khác. Chúng tôi không phải là ngân hàng và không cung cấp dịch vụ tín thác. Các giao dịch được thực hiện thông qua Ứng dụng World phần lớn không được quản lý ở nhiều quốc gia. Chúng tôi không đưa ra bất kỳ đảm bảo nào về chức năng của các blockchain mà chúng tôi hỗ trợ, mà điều này, ngoài những hậu quả khác, có thể dẫn đến sự chậm trễ, xung đột lợi ích hoặc quyết định hoạt động của bên thứ ba bất lợi cho một số chủ sở hữu Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số hoặc dẫn đến việc quý vị không thể hoàn tất giao dịch bằng Dịch vụ. Chi tiết giao dịch quý vị gửi qua Dịch vụ có thể không hoàn tất hoặc có thể bị chậm trễ đáng kể trên blockchain hiện hành và chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về việc giao dịch không được xác nhận hoặc không được xử lý như mong đợi. Không có bất kỳ bảo đảm hay cam kết nào rằng việc chuyển được khởi tạo thông qua Dịch vụ sẽ chuyển thành công quyền sở hữu hoặc quyền đối với bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào. Ngoài ra, có thể có những rủi ro cụ thể khi sử dụng một số Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nhất định, chẳng hạn như WLD. Có thể xem thêm thông tin về các rủi ro cụ thể của WLD tại đây.
4.2 Kỹ thuật Mới.
Dịch vụ này còn mới mẻ. Mặc dù phần mềm này đã được thử nghiệm rộng rãi, nhưng phần mềm được sử dụng cho Dịch vụ vẫn còn tương đối mới mẻ và có thể có lỗi hoặc lỗ hổng bảo mật. Hơn nữa, phần mềm vẫn đang trong quá trình phát triển và có thể có những thay đổi đáng kể theo thời gian mà không đáp ứng được mong đợi của người dùng.
4.3 Rủi ro Bảo mật Thông tin.
Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số và việc sử dụng Dịch vụ có thể bị tước đoạt hoặc đánh cắp. Tin tặc hoặc các nhóm hoặc tổ chức độc hại khác có thể tìm cách can thiệp vào Dịch vụ theo nhiều cách khác nhau, bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở các cuộc tấn công phần mềm độc hại, tấn công từ chối dịch vụ, tấn công dựa trên sự đồng thuận, tấn công Sybil, smurfing và giả mạo. Hơn nữa, do các mạng blockchain mà chúng tôi hỗ trợ, chẳng hạn như giao thức Ethereum, dựa trên phần mềm nguồn mở nên phần mềm cơ sở của Dịch vụ có thể có các lỗi hoặc điểm yếu cố ý hoặc vô ý mà có thể ảnh hưởng bất lợi đến Dịch vụ hoặc dẫn đến việc người dùng mất Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số hoặc mất khả năng truy cập hoặc kiểm soát ví của mình thông qua Dịch vụ. Trong trường hợp phần mềm có lỗi hoặc điểm yếu như vậy, có thể không có cách khắc phục nào và người dùng không được đảm bảo bất kỳ biện pháp khắc phục, hoàn lại tiền hoặc bồi thường nào.
4.4 Tính chính xác.
Mặc dù mục tiêu của chúng tôi là cung cấp thông tin chính xác và kịp thời thông qua Dịch vụ (bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở nội dung) nhưng thông tin đó có thể không phải lúc nào cũng hoàn toàn chính xác, đầy đủ hoặc cập nhật và cũng có thể bao gồm các lỗi kỹ thuật hoặc lỗi đánh máy. Để tiếp tục cung cấp cho quý vị thông tin đầy đủ và chính xác nhất có thể, thông tin có thể được thay đổi hoặc cập nhật theo thời gian mà không cần thông báo trước, bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở thông tin liên quan đến chính sách, sản phẩm và dịch vụ của chúng tôi trong phạm vi pháp luật hiện hành cho phép. Do vậy, quý vị nên xác minh mọi thông tin trước khi dựa vào thông tin đó và mọi quyết định dựa trên thông tin được cung cấp thông qua Dịch vụ đều là trách nhiệm của riêng quý vị và chúng tôi sẽ không chịu trách nhiệm đối với những quyết định đó.
4.5 Tính khả dụng
. Mặc dù chúng tôi nỗ lực cung cấp cho quý vị dịch vụ xuất sắc, nhưng chúng tôi không đảm bảo rằng Dịch vụ sẽ luôn khả dụng mà không bị gián đoạn. Dịch vụ có thể tạm thời không khả dụng do bảo trì hoặc lý do khác. Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ lỗi, thiếu sót, gián đoạn, xóa, khiếm khuyết, chậm trễ trong hoạt động hoặc truyền tải, lỗi đường truyền thông tin, trộm cắp hoặc phá hủy hoặc truy cập trái phép hoặc thay đổi thông tin liên lạc của người dùng. Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ sự cố hoặc trục trặc kỹ thuật nào của bất kỳ mạng hoặc đường dây, hệ thống máy tính trực tuyến, máy chủ hoặc nhà cung cấp, thiết bị máy tính, phần mềm, lỗi email hoặc trình phát do sự cố kỹ thuật hoặc tắc nghẽn lưu lượng trên Internet hoặc trên Dịch vụ hoặc kết hợp cả hai, bao gồm thương tích hoặc thiệt hại cho người dùng hoặc máy tính của bất kỳ người nào khác liên quan đến hoặc phát sinh từ việc tham gia hoặc tải xuống tài liệu liên quan đến Dịch vụ. Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ mất mát hoặc thiệt hại, tổn thất tài chính hoặc lợi nhuận bị mất, tổn thất kinh doanh, thương tích cá nhân hoặc tử vong, phát sinh từ việc bất kỳ ai sử dụng Dịch vụ, bất kỳ Nội dung nào được đăng trên hoặc thông qua Dịch vụ hoặc được truyền tới người dùng, hoặc bất kỳ tương tác nào giữa những người dùng Dịch vụ, dù trực tuyến hay ngoại tuyến.
4.6 Forks
. Phần mềm dùng để tạo WLD là phần mềm mã nguồn mở và miễn phí cho bất kỳ ai sao chép và sử dụng. Điều này có nghĩa là bất kỳ ai cũng có thể tạo ra phiên bản sửa đổi của WLD, hay còn gọi là “Fork”. Trong trường hợp xảy ra Fork hoặc bất kỳ sự gián đoạn nào khác đối với mạng Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số, chúng tôi không thể hỗ trợ bất kỳ hoạt động nào liên quan đến Fork. Giao dịch có thể không được hoàn tất, hoàn tất một phần, hoàn tất không chính xác hoặc bị chậm trễ đáng kể khi xảy ra Fork. Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ tổn thất nào quý vị phải gánh chịu do sự cố Fork hoặc gián đoạn mạng khác gây ra, toàn bộ hoặc một phần.
4.7 Dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba.
Khi khả dụng (xem cụ thể tại Mục 2.5), chúng tôi dựa vào các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ bên thứ ba để cung cấp một số tính năng và chức năng trong Ứng dụng, ví dụ như khả năng mua Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số bằng tiền pháp định hoặc khả năng hoán đổi một Tài sản Kỹ thuật số này lấy một Tài sản Kỹ thuật số khác. Chúng tôi không cung cấp những dịch vụ này và không tham gia vào bất kỳ giao dịch nào như vậy. Quý vị chỉ dựa vào các nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba đối với các dịch vụ này và quý vị phải có tài khoản với các nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba và đồng ý với các điều khoản của họ. Chúng tôi
không thể hỗ trợ quý vị nếu quý vị gặp sự cố khi sử dụng dịch vụ của họ và chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ giao dịch nào quý vị thực hiện khi sử dụng nhà cung cấp bên thứ ba.
5. Sở hữu Trí tuệ.
5.1 Quyền sở hữu
. Phần mềm, ứng dụng, Dịch vụ, Nội dung, Nhãn hiệu (như được định nghĩa dưới đây) và thiết kế, lựa chọn và sắp xếp Nội dung trong Dịch vụ (gọi tắt là “IP”) của chúng tôi được bảo vệ bởi bản quyền, nhãn hiệu, bằng sáng chế và các quyền sở hữu trí tuệ khác cũng như luật pháp của Hoa Kỳ và các quốc gia áp dụng khác. Quý vị đồng ý tuân thủ mọi quyền sở hữu trí tuệ và luật hiện hành, cũng như mọi thông báo hoặc hạn chế về thương hiệu hoặc bản quyền có trong Thỏa thuận hoặc Dịch vụ. Quý vị không được xóa bất kỳ thông báo bản quyền, nhãn hiệu hoặc quyền sở hữu nào có trong IP.
5.2 Thương hiệu.
Tên gọi Tools for Humanity Corporation, logo Ứng dụng World và tất cả các logo và tiêu ngữ liên quan đều là thương hiệu hoặc nhãn hiệu dịch vụ của Tools for Humanity Corporation hoặc bên cấp phép của Tools for Humanity Corporation (“Nhãn hiệu”). Quý vị không được sao chép, bắt chước hoặc sử dụng Nhãn hiệu, toàn bộ hoặc một phần, nếu không có sự cho phép bằng văn bản của chúng tôi. Mọi thương hiệu, tên hoặc logo khác được đề cập liên quan đến Dịch vụ đều là tài sản của chủ sở hữu tương ứng và quý vị không được sao chép, bắt chước hoặc sử dụng chúng, toàn bộ hoặc một phần, nếu không có sự cho phép bằng văn bản của chủ sở hữu nhãn hiệu có liên quan. Việc đưa bất kỳ nhãn hiệu nào của người khác vào Dịch vụ không cấu thành sự chấp thuận, xác nhận hoặc khuyến nghị của chúng tôi.
6. Giấy phép và Hạn chế
6.1 Giấy phép
. Với điều kiện là quý vị đủ điều kiện sử dụng Dịch vụ và tuân thủ các Điều khoản này, chúng tôi sẽ cấp cho quý vị giấy phép có giới hạn để truy cập và sử dụng Dịch vụ.
6.2 Hạn chế của Giấy phép
. Quý vị không được phép tái bản Nội dung trên bất kỳ trang web Internet, Intranet hoặc Extranet nào hoặc đưa thông tin vào bất kỳ cơ sở dữ liệu hoặc tài liệu biên soạn nào khác và bất kỳ việc sử dụng Nội dung nào khác đều bị nghiêm cấm. Bất kỳ việc sử dụng Dịch vụ nào khác ngoài những mục đích được cho phép cụ thể tại đây, nếu không có sự cho phép trước bằng văn bản của chúng tôi, đều bị nghiêm cấm và sẽ chấm dứt giấy phép được cấp tại đây. Việc sử dụng trái phép như vậy cũng có thể vi phạm luật hiện hành bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở luật bản quyền và luật thương hiệu cũng như các quy định và điều lệ truyền thông hiện hành. Trừ khi được nêu rõ ràng tại đây, không có nội dung nào trong các Điều khoản này được hiểu là cấp bất kỳ giấy phép nào đối với quyền sở hữu trí tuệ, dù là thông qua chế định ngăn không cho phủ nhận, ngụ ý hay cách khác. Chúng tôi có thể thu hồi giấy phép này bất kỳ lúc nào mà không cần thông báo và có hoặc không có lý do, trong phạm vi luật pháp hiện hành cho phép.
6.3 Chính phủ
. Nếu quý vị là người dùng cuối của Chính phủ Hoa Kỳ, chúng tôi sẽ cấp phép Dịch vụ cho quý vị dưới dạng "Mặt hàng Thương mại" theo định nghĩa của thuật ngữ này trong Bộ luật Liên bang Hoa Kỳ (xem 48 C.F.R. § 2.101) và các quyền chúng tôi cấp cho quý vị đối với Dịch vụ giống như các quyền chúng tôi cấp cho tất cả những người khác theo các Điều khoản này.
7. Sử dụng Được chấp nhận
7.1
Quý vị chỉ được sử dụng Dịch vụ cho mục đích cá nhân của mình. Chúng tôi có toàn quyền xem xét, hủy bỏ hoặc tạm dừng quyền truy cập hoặc sử dụng Dịch vụ của quý vị bất kỳ lúc nào và theo quyết định riêng của mình theo luật hiện hành. Các mục trong danh sách Mục đích Sử dụng Bị cấm chỉ là ví dụ và danh sách này không đầy đủ; chúng tôi có thể thêm hoặc xóa các mục đích sử dụng bị cấm theo quyết định riêng của mình phù hợp với luật hiện hành.
7.2 Các Mục đích Sử dụng Bị cấm bao gồm:
Hoạt động Bất hợp pháp:
Bất kỳ hoạt động nào vi phạm hoặc hỗ trợ vi phạm bất kỳ chương trình trừng phạt nào do OFAC quản lý; vi phạm hoặc hỗ trợ vi phạm bất kỳ luật nào tại các quốc gia nơi chúng tôi kinh doanh; liên quan đến thu nhập từ bất kỳ hoạt động bất hợp pháp nào; hoặc công bố, phân phối hoặc phổ biến bất kỳ tài liệu hoặc thông tin bất hợp pháp nào.
Sử dụng Quá mức hoặc Hacking:
Bất kỳ hoạt động nào gây ra tải trọng bất hợp lý hoặc quá lớn cho cơ sở hạ tầng của chúng tôi; can thiệp có hại, chặn hoặc chiếm đoạt bất kỳ hệ thống, dữ liệu hoặc thông tin nào; truyền hoặc tải lên Dịch vụ bất kỳ tài liệu nào có chứa vi-rút, trojan horse, sâu hoặc bất kỳ chương trình gây hại hoặc phá hoại nào khác; hoặc tìm cách truy cập trái phép vào hệ thống máy tính hoặc mạng được kết nối với Dịch vụ.
Lạm dụng Người khác:
Bất kỳ hoạt động nào cản trở người khác truy cập hoặc sử dụng Dịch vụ; phỉ báng, lạm dụng, tống tiền, quấy rối, theo dõi, đe dọa hoặc vi phạm hoặc xâm phạm quyền riêng tư, quyền sở hữu trí tuệ hoặc bất kỳ quyền hợp pháp nào khác của người khác; kích động, đe dọa, tạo điều kiện, thúc đẩy hoặc khuyến khích lòng thù hận, bài xích chủng tộc hoặc hành vi bạo lực chống lại người khác; hoặc
thu gom, xóa hoặc thu thập dữ liệu của người dùng khác từ Dịch vụ mà không được phép.
Gian lận và những Hành vi Kinh doanh Không công bằng khác:
Bất kỳ hoạt động nào nhằm lừa gạt chúng tôi, người dùng của chúng tôi hoặc bất kỳ người nào khác; cung cấp cho chúng tôi bất kỳ thông tin sai lệch, không chính xác hoặc gây hiểu lầm; hứa hẹn phần thưởng cao một cách vô lý hoặc bán dịch vụ mà không mang lại lợi ích gia tăng cho người mua; hoặc thúc đẩy các hoạt động lừa đảo và săn mồi khác bao gồm xổ số bất hợp pháp, xổ số hiện vật, đấu giá phí đấu thầu, cuộc thi, rút thăm trúng thưởng, cờ bạc hoặc bất kỳ trò chơi may rủi nào khác.
Vi phạm Quyền sở hữu Trí tuệ:
Bất kỳ hoạt động nào liên quan đến việc bán, phân phối hoặc cung cấp quyền truy cập vào nhạc, phim, phần mềm hoặc các tài liệu được cấp phép giả mạo mà không có sự cho phép thích hợp từ chủ sở hữu; sử dụng IP (bao gồm cả Nhãn hiệu) mà không có sự chấp thuận rõ ràng hoặc theo cách gây hại cho chúng tôi hoặc thương hiệu của chúng tôi; ngụ ý sự xác nhận hoặc liên kết không đúng sự thật với chúng tôi; hoặc xâm phạm hoặc vi phạm bất kỳ bản quyền, nhãn hiệu, quyền công khai hoặc quyền riêng tư hoặc bất kỳ quyền sở hữu nào khác theo luật.
8. Bên vận hành Orb
Chúng tôi hợp tác với các nhà thầu độc lập tại địa phương có tên là “Bên vận hành Orb”, họ hỗ trợ đăng ký người dùng và giải đáp những thắc mắc quý vị có thể có về chúng tôi. Các bên vận hành Orb này đã được đào tạo và có hiểu biết về Mạng World. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi không kiểm soát và từ chối mọi trách nhiệm đối với những gì họ nói hoặc cách họ cư xử.
Bên vận hành Orb không phải là đại lý hoặc nhân viên của chúng tôi theo bất kỳ cách nào. Bất kỳ hoạt động, tính năng, quy trình, chính sách, tiêu chuẩn hoặc các hoạt động khác do TFH thực hiện vì lợi ích của người dùng đều không cho thấy mối quan hệ tuyển dụng hoặc đại lý với Bên vện hành Orb
.
9. Tạm dừng
Chúng tôi có thể tạm dừng và hạn chế quyền truy cập của quý vị vào Dịch vụ: (i) Chúng tôi được yêu cầu như vậy theo lệnh triệu tập, lệnh của tòa án hoặc lệnh mang tính ràng buộc của cơ quan chính phủ có hiệu lực rõ ràng; (ii) Chúng tôi có lý do để nghi ngờ quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ liên quan đến Mục đích Sử dụng Bị cấm; (iii) Việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ dính líu đến bất kỳ vụ kiện tụng, điều tra hoặc thủ tục tố tụng nào của chính phủ đang chờ xử lý và/hoặc chúng tôi nhận thấy rủi ro cao hơn về việc không tuân thủ pháp luật hoặc quy định liên quan đến hoạt động của quý vị; (iv) Đối tác dịch vụ của chúng tôi không thể hỗ trợ việc quý vị sử dụng; (v) Quý vị thực hiện bất kỳ hành động nào mà chúng tôi coi là lách các quy định kiểm soát của chúng tôi (chẳng hạn như nhưng không giới hạn ở việc tìm cách tạo nhiều tài khoản).
10. Không phải là Chào bán Chứng khoán hoặc Lợi tức Hàng hóa
Nội dung của Dịch vụ không cấu thành lời đề nghị mua hoặc bán hoặc chào mời mua hoặc bán các khoản đầu tư, chứng khoán, quyền lợi hợp tác, hàng hóa hoặc bất kỳ công cụ tài chính nào khác; nội dung hoặc Dịch vụ cũng không cấu thành và không được sử dụng cho hoặc liên quan đến lời đền nghị hoặc chào mời của bất kỳ ai ở bất kỳ tiểu bang hoặc khu vực pháp lý nào mà lời đề nghị hoặc chào mời đó không được ủy quyền hoặc cho phép, hoặc đối với bất kỳ người nào mà việc đưa ra lời đề nghị hoặc chào mời đó là bất hợp pháp.
11. Nội dung
11.1 Sự tin cậy vào Nội dung; Các thay đổi đối với Dịch vụ.
Thông tin và tài liệu chúng tôi cung cấp cho quý vị thông qua Dịch vụ (“Nội dung”) chỉ nhằm mục đích cung cấp thông tin chung và chúng tôi không đảm bảo tính chính xác, hữu ích hoặc đầy đủ của thông tin đó trong phạm vi luật pháp hiện hành cho phép. Quý vị tự chịu rủi ro hoàn toàn trong việc quý vị tin cậy vào Nội dung của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi không chịu bất kỳ trách nhiệm pháp lý nào đối với bất kỳ hành động nào quý vị thực hiện hoặc không thực hiện do Nội dung hoặc đối với bất kỳ ai mà quý vị chia sẻ Nội dung. Tuyên bố của những người dùng khác mô tả việc họ sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi trên Dịch vụ hoặc bất kỳ nơi nào khác không được coi là chúng tôi xác nhận tuyên bố của họ nếu những tuyên bố đó không nhất quán với các Điều khoản này hoặc Nội dung của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi có thể cập nhật Nội dung theo từng thời điểm, nhưng Nội dung đó có thể không đầy đủ hoặc cập nhật, và chúng tôi không có nghĩa vụ phải cập nhật cho quý vị Nội dung hoặc bất kỳ phần nào khác của Dịch vụ. Chúng tôi có thể sửa đổi hoặc ngừng cung cấp, tạm thời hoặc vĩnh viễn, bất kỳ phần nào hoặc toàn bộ Nội dung hoặc Dịch vụ mà không cần thông báo trước cho quý vị, trong phạm vi luật pháp hiện hành cho phép. Chúng tôi sẽ không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ sửa đổi, tạm dừng hoặc ngừng cung cấp một phần hoặc toàn bộ Nội dung hoặc Dịch vụ nào, trong phạm vi luật pháp hiện hành cho phép.
11.2 Dịch vụ và Nội dung của Bên thứ ba
. Chúng tôi có thể cung cấp liên kết đến tài liệu giáo dục, hội thảo trên web, buổi gặp mặt và chương trình khuyến mãi trên các nền tảng mạng xã hội (“Dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba”) cho phép người dùng và các bên thứ ba khác chia sẻ và cộng tác. Nếu quý vị chia sẻ bất kỳ thông tin cá nhân, hình ảnh, ý kiến, nội dung hoặc bất kỳ dữ liệu nào khác trên các dịch vụ đó, quý vị phải tự chịu rủi ro và việc quý vị sử dụng các dịch vụ đó phải tuân theo các điều khoản sử dụng và chính sách bảo mật của các dịch vụ đó, chứ không phải của chúng tôi. Quý vị nên xem xét các điều khoản dịch vụ đối với từng Dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba để hiểu rõ hơn về quyền của mình và cách thức các nền tảng đó sử dụng dữ liệu của quý vị. Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ mất mát, trộm cắp, xâm phạm hoặc sử dụng sai dữ liệu của quý vị liên quan đến bất kỳ Dịch vụ của Bên thứ ba nào (bao gồm cả
sơ suất), ngoại trừ trường hợp trách nhiệm đó không thể bị giới hạn theo luật hiện hành. Việc quý vị sử dụng bất kỳ thông tin nào do Dịch vụ Bên thứ ba cung cấp ("Nội dung của Bên thứ ba") đều do quý vị tự chịu rủi ro và chúng tôi không cam kết rằng bất kỳ Nội dung của Bên thứ ba nào là chính xác, đầy đủ, xác thực hoặc phù hợp với hoàn cảnh cá nhân của quý vị. Nội dung của Bên thứ ba bao gồm thông tin do người dùng khác cung cấp mà không được chúng tôi xác nhận cụ thể.
11.3 Nội dung Người dùng
. Với tư cách là thành viên của cộng đồng Worldcoin, quý vị có thể đăng thông điệp, dữ liệu, phần mềm, hình ảnh, video hoặc nội dung khác (“Nội dung Người dùng”) trên các bảng tin, blog, tài khoản mạng xã hội do chúng tôi sở hữu cũng như nhiều nơi công khai khác trên Dịch vụ. Các diễn đàn này có thể được chúng tôi hoặc Nhà cung cấp Dịch vụ Bên thứ ba thay mặt chúng tôi lưu trữ. Quý vị chịu trách nhiệm về mọi Nội dung Người dùng do quý vị gửi, tải lên, đăng hoặc lưu trữ thông qua Dịch vụ. Quý vị phải cung cấp mọi cảnh báo, thông tin và tiết lộ cần thiết và phù hợp liên quan đến Nội dung Người dùng của quý vị. Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ Nội dung Người dùng nào quý vị gửi thông qua Dịch vụ.
11.4 Giấy phép Nội dung Người dùng
. Bằng việc gửi Nội dung Người dùng cho chúng tôi, quý vị tuyên bố rằng quý vị có mọi quyền cần thiết đối với Nội dung Người dùng và do đó, quý vị cấp cho chúng tôi giấy phép vĩnh viễn, trên toàn thế giới, không độc quyền, miễn phí bản quyền, có thể cấp phép phụ và có thể chuyển nhượng để sử dụng, sao chép, phân phối, chuẩn bị các tác phẩm phái sinh từ, sửa đổi, hiển thị và thực hiện toàn bộ hoặc bất kỳ phần nào của Nội dung Người dùng liên quan đến hoạt động tiếp thị và quảng cáo của chúng tôi và cho bất kỳ mục đích kinh doanh hợp pháp nào khác liên quan đến Dịch vụ. Chúng tôi có thể phân phối lại một phần hoặc toàn bộ và các tác phẩm phái sinh từ Nội dung người dùng của quý vị ở bất kỳ định dạng truyền thông nào và thông qua bất kỳ kênh truyền thông nào chúng tôi chọn. Quý vị cũng cấp cho chúng tôi và những người dùng khác giấy phép không độc quyền để sử dụng, truy cập, sao chép, phân phối, sửa đổi, hiển thị và thực hiện Nội dung Người dùng của quý vị thông qua Dịch vụ. Mục 11.4 sẽ được áp dụng ở mức độ tối đa được pháp luật hiện hành cho phép.
11.5 Giới hạn Nội dung Người dùng
. Quý vị đồng ý không sử dụng hoặc cho phép bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào sử dụng Dịch vụ để đăng hoặc truyền bất kỳ Nội dung Người dùng nào: (a) mang tính phỉ báng hoặc bôi nhọ, hoặc tiết lộ các vấn đề riêng tư hoặc cá nhân liên quan đến bất kỳ người nào; (b) khiếm nhã, tục tĩu, khiêu dâm, quấy rối, đe dọa, lạm dụng, thù hận, xúc phạm chủng tộc hoặc sắc tộc; khuyến khích hành vi bị coi là tội hình sự, gây ra trách nhiệm dân sự hoặc vi phạm bất kỳ luật nào hoặc không phù hợp; (c) vi phạm quyền sở hữu trí tuệ của người khác, bao gồm văn bản, hình ảnh hoặc chương trình có bản quyền nhưng chưa được cho phép, bí mật thương mại hoặc thông tin độc quyền bí mật khác hoặc thương hiệu hoặc nhãn hiệu dịch vụ được sử dụng theo cách vi phạm; hoặc (d) can thiệp bất hợp lý vào việc người dùng khác sử dụng Dịch vụ. Quý vị cam kết với chúng tôi rằng quý vị đăng Nội dung Người dùng lên Dịch vụ một cách tự nguyện; do đó, việc đăng Nội dung Người dùng không tạo ra mối quan hệ chủ lao động - nhân viên giữa quý vị và chúng tôi. Quý vị không được sao chép hoặc sử dụng địa chỉ email, số điện thoại di động, số dư, tên người dùng hoặc bất kỳ thông tin cá nhân nào khác của người dùng khác mà không có sự cho phép của họ. Các email, thư từ, cuộc gọi điện thoại hoặc các hình thức liên lạc không mong muốn khác gửi tới người dùng khác thông qua Dịch vụ hoặc bất kỳ kênh nào khác đều bị nghiêm cấm.
11.6 Khiếu nại và Gỡ bỏ DMCA.
Nếu quý vị tin rằng thương hiệu hoặc tác phẩm có bản quyền của quý vị đang bị Nội dung của chúng tôi hoặc Nội dung Người dùng trên Dịch vụ vi phạm hoặc đang được phát hành theo cách ám chỉ sự xác nhận hoặc liên kết với chúng tôi, vui lòng gửi email cho chúng tôi theo địa chỉ legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com với dòng tiêu đề “Khiếu nại [Thương hiệu/Bản quyền]”, tùy trường hợp. Để khiếu nại của quý vị có hiệu lực và để chúng tôi có thể thực hiện hành động theo Đạo luật Bản quyền Thiên niên kỷ Kỹ thuật số (“DMCA”), quý vị phải tuân thủ mọi yêu cầu của DMCA bằng cách bao gồm thông tin sau trong email của quý vị:
Xác định rõ ràng tác phẩm có bản quyền hoặc nhãn hiệu bị cho là bị vi phạm, bao gồm số Đăng ký Bản quyền nếu tác phẩm đã được đăng ký;
Xác định tác phẩm hoặc nhãn hiệu bị cho là gây vi phạm và xác định rằng quý vị muốn xóa bỏ;
URL hoặc hướng dẫn rõ ràng khác cho phép chúng tôi xác định được nội dung bị cáo buộc vi phạm;
Địa chỉ email, địa chỉ gửi thư và số điện thoại của quý vị; và
Một tuyên bố có chữ ký xác nhận rằng quý vị tin tưởng một cách thiện chí rằng nội dung đó đang vi phạm, rằng thông tin quý vị cung cấp là chính xác và rằng quý vị là chủ sở hữu hoặc được ủy quyền đại diện cho chủ sở hữu nội dung đó.
Quý vị cũng nên biết rằng theo Mục 512(f) của DMCA, bất kỳ người nào cố ý gửi thông báo vi phạm không có căn cứ đều có thể phải chịu trách nhiệm bồi thường thiệt hại, vì vậy vui lòng không đưa ra bất kỳ khiếu nại sai sự thật nào. Chúng tôi có thể chia sẻ bất kỳ thông tin hoặc thư từ nào quý vị cung cấp cho chúng tôi với bên thứ ba, bao gồm cả người đã tải tài liệu bị cáo buộc vi phạm lên Dịch vụ.
Khi chúng tôi nhận được thông báo vi phạm ngay tình, chính sách của chúng tôi là: (a) ngay lập tức xóa hoặc vô hiệu hóa quyền truy cập vào nội dung vi phạm; (b) thông báo cho người đã tải lên tài liệu vi phạm rằng chúng tôi đã xóa hoặc vô hiệu hóa quyền truy cập vào tài liệu; và (c) đối với
những người vi phạm nhiều lần, chấm dứt quyền truy cập của người đó vào Dịch vụ. Nếu chúng tôi nhận được thông báo phản đối từ người đó, chúng tôi có thể gửi cho quý vị một bản sao thông báo phản đối giải thích rằng chúng tôi có thể khôi phục tài liệu đã xóa hoặc ngừng vô hiệu hóa tài liệu đó trong vòng 10 ngày làm việc. Trừ khi quý vị nộp đơn kiện yêu cầu tòa án ra phán quyết chống lại chúng tôi hoặc người đã tải nội dung lên, chúng tôi sẽ khôi phục quyền truy cập vào tài liệu đã xóa trong vòng 10 đến 14 ngày làm việc hoặc lâu hơn sau khi nhận được thông báo phản đối, tùy theo quyết định của chúng tôi.
12. TUYÊN BỐ MIỄN TRỪ TRÁCH NHIỆM BẢO HÀNH
12.1 Quý vị tự chịu rủi ro trong việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ. Dịch vụ, WLD, nội dung và tất cả IP khác được cung cấp trên cơ sở “NGUYÊN TRẠNG” và “THEO TÌNH TRẠNG SẴN CÓ” mà không có bất kỳ tuyên bố hoặc bảo hành nào, dù là rõ ràng, ngụ ý hay theo luật định. Trong phạm vi tối đa được luật pháp hiện hành cho phép, chúng tôi đặc biệt từ chối mọi bảo đảm ngụ ý về quyền sở hữu, khả năng bán được, tính phù hợp cho một mục đích cụ thể hoặc việc không vi phạm đối với các tính năng, nội dung hoặc IP khác có trong Dịch vụ. Một số khu vực pháp lý không cho phép loại trừ các bảo đảm ngụ ý, do đó các loại trừ trên đây có thể không áp dụng cho quý vị. Chúng tôi không xác nhận, đảm bảo hoặc chịu trách nhiệm về bất kỳ quảng cáo, ưu đãi hoặc tuyên bố nào do bên thứ ba đưa ra, bao gồm cả những người dùng khác liên quan đến Dịch vụ.
12.2 Chúng tôi không đưa ra bất kỳ tuyên bố hoặc bảo đảm nào rằng (a) việc truy cập vào toàn bộ hoặc một phần Dịch vụ sẽ liên tục, không bị gián đoạn, kịp thời, an toàn hoặc không có sai sót; (b) rằng Dịch vụ hoặc nội dung là chính xác, đầy đủ, đáng tin cậy hoặc cập nhật; (c) rằng Dịch vụ không có vi-rút hoặc các thành phần có hại khác; hoặc (d) rằng Dịch vụ hoặc nội dung sẽ đáp ứng các yêu cầu, nhu cầu hoặc kỳ vọng của quý vị.
12.3 Ngoài ra, chúng tôi không đưa ra bất kỳ tuyên bố hoặc bảo đảm nào liên quan đến tính hợp pháp của Dịch vụ hoặc WLD cho bất kỳ trường hợp sử dụng nào, hoặc rằng Dịch vụ hoặc WLD sẽ đáp ứng bất kỳ nhu cầu tuân thủ hoặc quy định nào. Quý vị cũng có trách nhiệm xác định và tuân thủ mọi hạn chế và yêu cầu pháp lý và quy định có thể chi phối việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ hoặc WLD. Ngoại trừ các tuyên bố rõ ràng được nêu trong các Điều khoản này, quý vị thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng quý vị không trông cậy vào bất kỳ tuyên bố hoặc thỏa thuận nào khác, dù bằng văn bản hay bằng miệng, liên quan đến việc quý vị truy cập và sử dụng Dịch vụ hoặc WLD.
12.4 Chúng tôi không hành động và không thể hành động với vai trò cố vấn của quý vị về bất kỳ vấn đề tài chính, pháp lý, đầu tư hoặc thuế nào. Mọi nội dung chỉ có giá trị tính đến ngày được chỉ định. Bất kỳ dự báo, ước tính, dự đoán, mục tiêu và/hoặc ý kiến nào được nêu ở đây đều có rủi ro, sự không chắc chắn và giả định, do đó có thể không chính xác và có thể thay đổi mà không cần thông báo trước. Không nên trông cậy vào bất kỳ nội dung nào.
Một số thông tin ở đây có thể được lấy từ nguồn của bên thứ ba. Mặc dù những nguồn như vậy được cho là đáng tin cậy, nhưng chúng tôi chưa xác minh độc lập tất cả thông tin đó và không đưa ra tuyên bố nào về tính chính xác của chúng. Chúng tôi không phải là nhà môi giới chứng khoán hoặc cố vấn đầu tư đã đăng ký. Chúng tôi không đưa ra bất kỳ tuyên bố nào và từ chối mọi bảo đảm, dù là rõ ràng, ngụ ý hay theo luật định, liên quan đến tính chính xác, tính kịp thời hoặc tính đầy đủ của bất kỳ tài liệu nào có trong Dịch vụ. Nội dung của chúng tôi chỉ mang tính chất thông tin chung và quý vị là người duy nhất chịu trách nhiệm quyết định có sử dụng Dịch vụ hay không. Quý vị thừa nhận rằng việc giao dịch, sử dụng và nắm giữ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số có rủi ro cố hữu. Quý vị có thể mất toàn bộ tiền trong ví của mình. Quý vị thừa nhận rằng Dịch vụ có thể phải tuân theo các hạn chế xuất khẩu và lệnh trừng phạt kinh tế theo luật pháp Hoa Kỳ.
12.5 Chúng tôi không chịu trách nhiệm với quý vị hoặc bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào về bất kỳ sửa đổi hoặc chấm dứt nào đối với Dịch vụ, hoặc việc tạm dừng hoặc chấm dứt quyền truy cập của quý vị vào Dịch vụ.
13. GIỚI HẠN TRÁCH NHIỆM
13.1 Chúng tôi không loại trừ hoặc hạn chế trách nhiệm của chúng tôi đối với quý vị khi điều đó là bất hợp pháp. Tại các quốc gia không cho phép các hình thức loại trừ dưới đây, chúng tôi chỉ chịu trách nhiệm với quý vị về những tổn thất và thiệt hại là kết quả có thể lường trước một cách hợp lý do chúng tôi không vận dụng sự cẩn trọng và kỹ năng thích hợp hoặc do chúng tôi vi phạm hợp đồng với quý vị. Đoạn này không ảnh hưởng đến các quyền của người tiêu dùng vốn không thể bị từ bỏ hoặc hạn chế bởi bất kỳ hợp đồng hoặc thỏa thuận nào.
13.2 Trong phạm vi pháp luật cho phép, quý vị đồng ý rằng trong mọi trường hợp, chúng tôi hoặc bất kỳ quản lý, giám đốc, nhân viên, nhà thầu, đại lý, chi nhánh hoặc công ty con nào của chúng tôi (các “Bên TFH”) sẽ không chịu trách nhiệm với quý vị về bất kỳ thiệt hại gián tiếp, mang tính trừng phạt, ngẫu nhiên, đặc biệt, hậu quả hoặc thiệt hại mang tính răn đe nào, bao gồm thiệt hại do mất lợi nhuận, lợi thế thương mại, việc sử dụng, dữ liệu hoặc tài sản vô hình khác, cho dù trách nhiệm đó được khẳng định trên cơ sở hành vi vi phạm pháp luật hay cách khác, và cho dù các Bên TFH đã được thông báo hay chưa được thông báo về khả năng xảy ra những thiệt hại đó phát sinh từ hoặc liên quan đến: (a) việc quý vị sử dụng hoặc không sử dụng Dịch vụ, Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số của quý vị hoặc Mạng World; (b) việc không thể truy cập hoặc chấm dứt Dịch vụ; (c) bất kỳ hành vi hacking, giả mạo, truy cập trái phép hoặc thay đổi bất kỳ giao dịch nào hoặc Dữ liệu của quý vị; (d) bất kỳ giao dịch hoặc thỏa thuận nào mà quý vị đã ký kết với bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào thông qua Dịch vụ; (e) bất kỳ hoạt động hoặc thông tin liên lạc nào của các bên thứ ba; (f) các hành động của Bên vận hành Orb, (g) bất kỳ tổn thất giá trị nào của bất kỳ Mã thông báo
Kỹ thuật số nào; (h) bất kỳ Nội dung của Bên thứ ba nào được truy cập trên hoặc thông qua Dịch vụ; (i) các lỗi, sai sót hoặc không sự chính xác trong Nội dung của chúng tôi; (j) thương tích cá nhân hoặc thiệt hại tài sản dưới bất kỳ hình thức nào phát sinh từ bất kỳ việc truy cập hoặc sử dụng Dịch vụ nào; (k) vi-rút, trojan horse hoặc các phần mềm độc hại tương tự có thể được truyền đến hoặc thông qua Dịch vụ; hoặc (l) hành vi phỉ báng, xúc phạm hoặc bất hợp pháp của bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào. Giới hạn trách nhiệm này sẽ được áp dụng cho dù thiệt hại phát sinh từ việc sử dụng, sử dụng sai mục đích hoặc dựa vào TFH hoặc Dịch vụ, cho dù không đạt được mục đích thiết yếu của bất kỳ biện pháp khắc phục hạn chế nào và ở mức độ tối đa được luật pháp hiện hành cho phép.
13.3 Trong mọi trường hợp, các Bên TFH sẽ không chịu trách nhiệm với quý vị về bất kỳ khiếu nại trực tiếp, thủ tục tố tụng, trách nhiệm pháp lý, nghĩa vụ, thiệt hại, tổn thất hoặc chi phí nào vượt quá số tiền 100,00 đô la. Nếu quý vị không hài lòng với Dịch vụ, quý vị đồng ý rằng biện pháp khắc phục duy nhất và độc quyền của quý vị là ngừng sử dụng Dịch vụ. Giới hạn trách nhiệm này sẽ được áp dụng ở mức tối đa được pháp luật hiện hành cho phép.
13.4 Miễn trừ và Bồi thường.
Quý vị đồng ý bảo vệ, bồi thường và giữ cho các Bên TFH không bị tổn hại khỏi và chống lại mọi khiếu nại, thiệt hại, chi phí, nghĩa vụ, phí luật sư hợp lý và chi phí do bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào đưa ra chống lại một Bên TFH phát sinh từ hoặc liên quan đến: (a) việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ; (b) việc quý vị vi phạm các Điều khoản này; (c) việc quý vị vi phạm bất kỳ quyền nào của người khác; (d) hành vi của quý vị liên quan đến Dịch vụ; hoặc (e) việc quý vị sử dụng WLD, bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào hoặc mạng Worldcoin. Một số khu vực pháp lý hạn chế quyền bồi thường của người tiêu dùng, do đó một số hoặc toàn bộ các điều khoản bồi thường trong đoạn này có thể không áp dụng cho quý vị. Nếu quý vị có nghĩa vụ bồi thường cho bất kỳ Bên TFH nào, chúng tôi có toàn quyền quyết định kiểm soát mọi hành động hoặc thủ tục và xác định xem có nên giải quyết hay không và giải quyết theo các điều khoản nào.
NẾU QUÝ VỊ LÀ CƯ DÂN CALIFORNIA, quý vị sẽ từ bỏ các quyền lợi và sự bảo vệ của Bộ luật Dân sự California § 1542, trong đó có quy định: “[sự] miễn trừ chung không áp dụng cho các khiếu nại mà chủ nợ hoặc bên miễn trừ không biết hoặc nghi ngờ là có lợi cho mình tại thời điểm thực hiện miễn trừ, và rằng nếu được người đó biết, sẽ ảnh hưởng đáng kể đến việc điêu của người đó với bên nợ hoặc bên được miễn trừ.”
14. Luật Điều chỉnh
Luật pháp của Tiểu bang California sẽ được áp dụng cho Thỏa thuận này và bất kỳ tranh chấp nào phát sinh từ hoặc liên quan đến Thỏa thuận này. Luật điều chỉnh nêu trong mục này sẽ được áp dụng mà không cần thực hiện các nguyên tắc xung đột luật. Quý vị cũng đồng ý rằng Dịch vụ sẽ được coi là chỉ đặt trụ sở tại Tiểu bang California, và rằng mặc dù Dịch vụ có thể khả dụng tại các khu vực pháp lý khác, nhưng tính khả dụng của Dịch vụ không tạo ra quyền tài phán cá nhân chung hoặc cụ thể tại bất kỳ tòa án nào bên ngoài Tiểu bang California.
15. GIẢI QUYẾT TRANH CHẤP, PHÂN XỬ TRỌNG TÀI VÀ TỪ BỎ KIỆN TẬP THỂ
15.1 VUI LÒNG ĐỌC KỸ CÁC ĐOẠN SAU ĐÂY. NHỮNG QUY ĐỊNH NÀY YÊU CẦU QUÝ VỊ PHẢI GIẢI QUYẾT TRANH CHẤP VỚI CHÚNG TÔI THÔNG QUA PHÂN XỬ TRỌNG TÀI CÁ NHÂN TRƯỚC MỘT TRỌNG TÀI DUY NHẤT, VÀ KHÔNG PHẢI LÀ THÀNH VIÊN CỦA VỤ KIỆN TẬP THỂ. VIỆC PHÂN XỬ TRỌNG TÀI NGĂN CẢN QUÝ VỊ KHỞI KIỆN CHÚNG TÔI TẠI TÒA ÁN HOẶC XÉT XỬ BẰNG BỒI THẨM ĐOÀN, MẶC DÙ QUÝ VỊ CÓ THỂ KHỞI KIỆN TRANH CHẤP CHỐNG LẠI CHÚNG TÔI TẠI TÒA ÁN XÉT XỬ CÁC VỤ KIỆN NHỎ NẾU QUÝ VỊ ĐÁP ỨNG ĐIỀU KIỆN.
15.2 Chúng tôi sẽ nỗ lực hết sức để giải quyết mọi tranh chấp có thể có thông qua đàm phán thiện chí, không chính thức. Nếu có tranh chấp phát sinh, quý vị phải liên hệ với chúng tôi bằng cách gửi email đến legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com để chúng tôi có thể cố gắng giải quyết mà không cần dùng đến biện pháp giải quyết tranh chấp chính thức. Nếu chúng tôi không thể đạt được giải pháp không chính thức trong vòng 60 ngày kể từ ngày email của quý vị và quý vị chọn đưa ra khiếu nại theo luật định của liên bang hoặc tiểu bang, khiếu nại theo luật chung, khiếu nại dựa trên hợp đồng, hành vi vi phạm pháp luật, gian lận, trình bày sai sự thật hoặc bất kỳ lý thuyết pháp lý nào khác hoặc bất kỳ thủ tục tố tụng chính thức nào khác phát sinh từ hoặc liên quan đến các Điều khoản này, Nội dung hoặc Dịch vụ (mỗi vụ việc được gọi là một "Tranh chấp"), thì quý vị đồng ý giải quyết Tranh chấp thông qua phân xử trọng tài mang tính ràng buộc, trên cơ sở cá nhân theo các điều khoản sau (gọi chung là "Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài"):
Việc phân xử trọng tài sẽ được tiến hành một cách bảo mật bởi một trọng tài viên duy nhất. Trọng tài viên sẽ áp dụng các điều luật về thời hiệu và mọi luật hiện hành và sẽ tôn trọng các yêu cầu về đặc quyền được luật hiện hành công nhận.
Tranh chấp sẽ được giải quyết duy nhất và cuối cùng thông qua trọng tài do JAMS quản lý theo Quy tắc Trọng tài Rút gọn của JAMS, trừ khi tổng số tiền Tranh chấp là 250.000 đô la trở lên, trong trường hợp đó, Quy tắc Trọng tài Đầy đủ của JAMS sẽ được áp dụng. Việc phân xử trọng tài sẽ diễn ra tại San Francisco, California, trừ khi quý vị và chúng tôi đều đồng ý tiến hành ở nơi khác. Quý vị đồng ý rằng tòa án liên bang và tiểu bang tại San Francisco, California là diễn đàn thích hợp cho bất kỳ kháng cáo nào về phán quyết trọng tài hoặc cho các thủ tục tố tụng tại tòa án trong trường hợp điều khoản phân xử trọng tài mang tính ràng buộc của Thỏa thuận này được xác định là không thể thi hành.
Trong bất kỳ vụ phân xử trọng tài nào, bất kể địa điểm, các bên sẽ không tìm cách thăm dò lẫn nhau và trọng tài viên sẽ không cho phép các bên tham gia vào quá trình thăm dò; thay vào đó, mỗi bên sẽ cung cấp bằng chứng để bảo vệ quan điểm của mình tại thời điểm và ngày mà cả hai bên đều đồng ý trước phiên điều trần trọng tài cuối cùng.
Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này đề cập đến khả năng thực thi, khả năng hủy bỏ, phạm vi và hiệu lực của Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài hoặc bất kỳ phần nào của Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài, và tất cả các Tranh chấp khác phát sinh từ hoặc liên quan đến việc diễn giải hoặc khả năng áp dụng của Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài; và tất cả các vấn đề như vậy sẽ được trọng tài viên quyết định chứ không phải tòa án hoặc thẩm phán.
Nếu trọng tài viên hoặc người quản lý trọng tài áp dụng lệ phí nộp đơn hoặc các chi phí hành chính khác cho quý vị, chúng tôi sẽ bồi hoàn cho quý vị, theo yêu cầu, trong phạm vi các khoản phí hoặc chi phí đó vượt quá số tiền mà quý vị phải trả nếu quý vị tiến hành tố tụng tại tòa án. Chúng tôi cũng sẽ trả chi phí hoặc phí bổ sung theo yêu cầu của người quản lý trọng tài hoặc luật pháp hiện hành.
Theo yêu cầu của bất kỳ bên nào, mọi thủ tục phân xử trọng tài sẽ được tiến hành trong sự bảo mật tối đa và trong trường hợp đó, mọi tài liệu, lời khai và hồ sơ sẽ được trọng tài viên tiếp nhận, lắng nghe và lưu giữ trong sự bảo mật dưới dạng niêm phong, chỉ các bên, luật sư tương ứng của họ, các chuyên gia, cố vấn hoặc nhân chứng tương ứng của họ, những người đã đồng ý trước bằng văn bản rằng sẽ tiếp nhận mọi thông tin như vậy dưới dạng bảo mật để chỉ sử dụng cho mục đích phân xử trọng tài, mới được phép xem.
Ngoài các biện pháp khắc phục và thủ tục tố tụng tập thể được thảo luận trong Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này, trọng tài viên có thẩm quyền phán quyết bất kỳ biện pháp khắc phục nào có thể áp dụng tại tòa án.
Bất kỳ phán quyết nào do trọng tài viên đưa ra đều có thể được đưa vào bất kỳ tòa án có thẩm quyền nào.
Nếu yêu cầu về phân xử trọng tài hoặc việc cấm khởi kiện tập thể và các Tranh chấp khác được đưa ra thay mặt cho bên thứ ba có trong Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này được xác định là không thể thi hành, thì chỉ những điều khoản không thể thi hành sẽ được coi là đã bị xóa khỏi các Điều khoản này và mọi nghĩa vụ còn lại trong các Điều khoản này sẽ tiếp tục có hiệu lực đầy đủ.
15.3 Quyền Từ chối trong vòng 30 ngày
. Quý vị có quyền từ chối và không bị ràng buộc bởi Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này bằng cách gửi email từ địa chỉ quý vị đã sử dụng để thiết lập đơn đăng ký của mình tới legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com với Dòng chủ đề: “TỪ CHỐI PHÂN XỬ TRỌNG TÀI VÀ KHỞI KIỆN TẬP THỂ. Quý vị phải gửi email trong vòng 30 ngày kể từ ngày đồng ý với các Điều khoản này, nếu không, quý vị sẽ phải giải quyết Tranh chấp theo các điều khoản của Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này. Nếu quý vị chọn không tham gia Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này, chúng tôi cũng sẽ không bị ràng buộc bởi Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài.
15.4 Thay đổi đối với Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này.
Chúng tôi sẽ thông báo cho quý vị trước 30 ngày về bất kỳ thay đổi nào đối với mục có tiêu đề “
Giải quyết tranh chấp, Phân xử trọng tài và Từ bỏ Kiện Tập thể”
trong các Điều khoản này bằng cách thông báo cho quý vị, và những thay đổi đó sẽ có hiệu lực sau 30 ngày kể từ khi quý vị nhận được thông báo từ chúng tôi. Những thay đổi đối với mục
Giải quyết tranh chấp, Phân xử trọng tài và Từ bỏ Kiện Tập thể
sẽ chỉ áp dụng cho các Tranh chấp phát sinh sau ngày thứ 30. Nếu tòa án hoặc trọng tài viên quyết định rằng những thay đổi đối với mục này không thể thực thi hoặc không hợp lệ, thì những thay đổi đó sẽ được tách khỏi các Điều khoản này và tòa án hoặc trọng tài viên sẽ áp dụng các điều khoản của Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài đầu tiên có hiệu lực sau khi quý vị bắt đầu sử dụng Dịch vụ. Quý vị có thể thực hiện quyền không tham gia các điều khoản Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài mới bằng cách làm theo các quy trình được nêu trong mục có tiêu đề “Quyền Từ chối Tham gia trong vòng 30 ngày” trên đây.
Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này sẽ vẫn có hiệu lực sau khi các Điều khoản này chấm dứt và quý vị vẫn tiếp tục sử dụng Dịch vụ.
Cho dù bất kỳ điều khoản nào trái ngược với Thỏa thuận Phân xử Trọng tài này, bất kỳ bên nào cũng có thể khởi kiện chỉ để yêu cầu biện pháp khẩn cấp tạm thời nhằm ngăn chặn việc sử dụng hoặc lạm dụng trái phép Dịch vụ hoặc vi phạm quyền sở hữu trí tuệ (ví dụ như thương hiệu, bí mật thương mại,
bản quyền hoặc bằng sáng chế) mà không cần tiến hành phân xử trọng tài hoặc quá trình giải quyết tranh chấp không chính thức được mô tả trên đây.
16. Quy định Chung
16.1 Không từ bỏ; Có thể tách rời; Không thể chuyển nhượng.
Việc chúng tôi không thực thi một điều khoản nào đó không có nghĩa là chúng tôi từ bỏ quyền thực thi điều khoản đó sau này. Nếu một điều khoản nào đó được xác định là không thể thực thi, thì các điều khoản còn lại của các Điều khoản này vẫn có hiệu lực đầy đủ, và một điều khoản có thể thực thi sẽ được thay thế để phản ánh ý định của chúng tôi một cách chặt chẽ nhất có thể, trong phạm vi luật pháp hiện hành cho phép. Quý vị không được chuyển nhượng bất kỳ quyền nào của mình theo các Điều khoản này và mọi nỗ lực chuyển nhượng đó sẽ đều vô hiệu. Chúng tôi có thể chuyển nhượng quyền của mình cho bất kỳ chi nhánh hoặc công ty con nào hoặc cho bất kỳ bên kế nhiệm nào vì quyền lợi của bất kỳ doanh nghiệp nào có liên quan đến Dịch vụ.
16.2 Toàn bộ Thỏa thuận
. Các Điều khoản này cấu thành tuyên bố đầy đủ và độc quyền về thỏa thuận giữa quý vị và chúng tôi liên quan đến Dịch vụ và thay thế tất cả các thỏa thuận, cam kết, bảo đảm trước đó và đồng thời, cả bằng văn bản và bằng miệng, liên quan đến Dịch vụ. Tiêu đề mục trong các Điều khoản này chỉ nhằm mục đích thuận tiện và sẽ không chi phối ý nghĩa hoặc cách diễn giải của bất kỳ điều khoản nào.
16.3 Duy trì hiệu lực.
Tất cả các điều của Điều khoản này liên quan đến việc tạm dừng hoặc chấm dứt, các khoản nợ đối với TFH, việc sử dụng chung các Dịch vụ, Tranh chấp với TFH, cũng như các điều mà theo bản chất của chúng sẽ kéo dài sau khi hết hạn hoặc chấm dứt các Điều khoản này, sẽ vẫn có hiệu lực sau khi hết hạn hoặc chấm dứt các Điều khoản này.
16.4 Mối quan hệ của các Bên.
Không có điều nào trong các Điều khoản này được coi là hoặc có ý định được coi là, cũng như không khiến cho quý vị và TFH được coi là đối tác, liên doanh hoặc là các bên liên kết vì lợi nhuận, và quý vị cũng như TFH sẽ không được coi là đại lý của bên kia. Việc này bao gồm thực tế là không có điều nào trong các Điều khoản này thiết lập hoặc có ý định thiết lập bất kỳ mối quan hệ tuyển dụng nào giữa quý vị và TFH.
16.5 Không Tư vấn Chuyên môn hoặc Nghĩa vụ Ủy thác.
Mọi nội dung chúng tôi cung cấp chỉ nhằm mục đích cung cấp thông tin và không được hiểu là tư vấn chuyên môn. Quý vị không nên thực hiện hoặc không thực hiện bất kỳ hành động nào dựa trên bất kỳ thông tin nào có trong Dịch vụ. Trước khi đưa ra bất kỳ quyết định tài chính, pháp lý hoặc quyết định khác liên quan đến Dịch vụ hoặc bất kỳ Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số nào, quý vị nên tìm kiếm tư vấn chuyên môn độc lập từ một cá nhân được cấp phép và có trình độ trong lĩnh vực phù hợp cho hoạt động tư vấn đó. Các Điều khoản này không nhằm mục đích và không tạo ra hoặc áp đặt bất kỳ nghĩa vụ ủy thác nào cho chúng tôi. Trong phạm vi tối đa được Luật pháp cho phép, quý vị thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng chúng tôi không có nghĩa vụ hoặc trách nhiệm pháp lý nào đối với quý vị hoặc bất kỳ bên nào khác, và trong phạm vi bất kỳ nghĩa vụ hoặc trách nhiệm pháp lý nào như vậy có thể tồn tại theo luật pháp hoặc luật công bình, thì các nghĩa vụ và trách nhiệm pháp lý đó sẽ bị từ chối, miễn trừ và xóa bỏ không thể hủy ngang. Quý vị cũng đồng ý rằng bổn phận và nghĩa vụ duy nhất của chúng tôi đối với quý vị là những bổn phận và nghĩa vụ được nêu rõ trong các Điều khoản này.
16.6 Thay đổi Quyền kiểm soát.
Trong trường hợp chúng tôi được một bên thứ ba mua lại hoặc sáp nhập, hoặc chuyển giao một số chức năng nhất định cho một bên liên kết, bên kế nhiệm hoặc bên khác mà chúng tôi xác định là vì lợi ích tốt nhất của Người dùng, thì chúng tôi có quyền, trong bất kỳ trường hợp nào trong số những trường hợp này, chuyển giao hoặc chuyển nhượng Dữ liệu mà chúng tôi đã thu thập từ quý vị như một phần của việc sáp nhập, mua lại, bán hoặc thay đổi quyền kiểm soát khác, theo luật hiện hành.
16.7 Trường hợp Bất khả kháng.
Chúng tôi sẽ không chịu trách nhiệm về sự chậm trễ, không thực hiện hoặc gián đoạn dịch vụ phát sinh trực tiếp hoặc gián tiếp từ sự biến động đáng kể của thị trường Mã thông báo Kỹ thuật số, bất kỳ thiên tai, hành động của chính quyền dân sự hoặc quân sự, hành động khủng bố, bất ổn dân sự, chiến tranh, đình công, tình trạng khẩn cấp về y tế, tranh chấp lao động, hỏa hoạn, gián đoạn dịch vụ viễn thông hoặc Internet hoặc dịch vụ của nhà cung cấp mạng, lỗi thiết bị hoặc phần mềm hoặc bất kỳ nguyên nhân hoặc tình trạng nào nằm ngoài tầm kiểm soát hợp lý của chúng tôi (mỗi trường hợp được gọi là một "Sự kiện Bất khả kháng"). Việc xảy ra Sự kiện Bất khả kháng sẽ không ảnh hưởng đến tính hợp lệ và khả năng thực thi của bất kỳ điều khoản còn lại nào trong các Điều khoản này.
16.8 App Stores.
Khi quý vị tải xuống Ứng dụng của chúng tôi từ bất kỳ cửa hàng ứng dụng hoặc nền tảng phân phối nào khác ngoài Apple App Store, bao gồm cả Google Play Store ("Nền tảng Phân phối"), quý vị đồng ý rằng:
các Điều khoản này là giữa quý vị và chúng tôi, không phải với nhà cung cấp Nền tảng Phân phối ("Nhà cung cấp Cửa hàng"); việc quý vị sử dụng Ứng dụng phải tuân thủ Điều khoản Dịch vụ Nền tảng Phân phối hiện hành của Nhà cung cấp Cửa hàng; Nhà cung cấp Cửa hàng chỉ là nhà cung cấp Nền tảng Phân phối nơi quý vị đã lấy Ứng dụng;
Chúng tôi, không phải Nhà cung cấp Cửa hàng, chịu trách nhiệm hoàn toàn về các Ứng dụng;
Nhà cung cấp Cửa hàng không có nghĩa vụ hoặc trách nhiệm pháp lý nào đối với quý vị liên quan đến Ứng dụng hoặc các Điều khoản; và
quý vị thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng Nhà cung cấp Cửa hàng là bên thứ ba được hưởng lợi từ các Điều khoản liên quan đến Ứng dụng.
16.9 Apple App Store
. Mục này áp dụng khi Ứng dụng được tải từ Apple App Store. Quý vị thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng các Điều khoản là chỉ giữa quý vị với chúng tôi, không phải với Apple, Inc. ("Apple") và Apple không chịu trách nhiệm về Ứng dụng hoặc nội dung của Ứng dụng. Việc quý vị sử dụng Ứng dụng phải tuân thủ Điều khoản Dịch vụ của App Store.
Quý vị thừa nhận rằng Apple không có bất kỳ nghĩa vụ nào trong việc cung cấp bất kỳ dịch vụ bảo trì và hỗ trợ nào liên quan đến Ứng dụng. Trong trường hợp Ứng dụng không tuân thủ bất kỳ bảo hành nào được áp dụng, quý vị có thể thông báo cho Apple và (nếu áp dụng) Apple sẽ hoàn lại giá mua Ứng dụng cho quý vị; trong phạm vi tối đa được luật hiện hành cho phép, Apple sẽ không có bất kỳ nghĩa vụ bảo hành nào khác đối với Ứng dụng và bất kỳ khiếu nại, tổn thất, trách nhiệm pháp lý, thiệt hại, chi phí hoặc phí tổn nào khác do không tuân thủ bất kỳ bảo hành nào sẽ chỉ được điều chỉnh bởi các Điều khoản và bất kỳ luật nào được áp dụng cho chúng tôi với tư cách là nhà cung cấp Ứng dụng.
Quý vị thừa nhận rằng Apple không chịu trách nhiệm giải quyết bất kỳ khiếu nại nào của quý vị hoặc bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào liên quan đến Ứng dụng hoặc quyền sở hữu và/hoặc việc quý vị sử dụng Ứng dụng, bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở: (i) khiếu nại về trách nhiệm sản phẩm; (ii) bất kỳ khiếu nại nào cho rằng Ứng dụng không tuân thủ bất kỳ yêu cầu pháp lý hoặc quy định hiện hành nào; và (iii) khiếu nại phát sinh theo luật bảo vệ người tiêu dùng hoặc luật tương tự; và tất cả các khiếu nại đó chỉ được điều chỉnh bởi các Điều khoản và bất kỳ luật nào áp dụng cho chúng tôi với tư cách là nhà cung cấp phần mềm.
Quý vị thừa nhận rằng, trong trường hợp có bất kỳ khiếu nại nào của bên thứ ba cho rằng Ứng dụng hoặc việc quý vị sở hữu và sử dụng Ứng dụng đó vi phạm quyền sở hữu trí tuệ của bên thứ ba, thì TFH, chứ không phải Apple, sẽ chịu toàn bộ trách nhiệm về việc điều tra, bảo vệ, giải quyết và thực thi bất kỳ khiếu nại vi phạm quyền sở hữu trí tuệ nào như vậy trong phạm vi yêu cầu của các Điều khoản.
Quý vị tuyên bố và bảo đảm rằng (i) quý vị không cư trú tại quốc gia chịu lệnh cấm vận của Chính phủ Hoa Kỳ hoặc bị Chính phủ Hoa Kỳ chỉ định là quốc gia "hỗ trợ khủng bố"; và (ii) quý vị không có tên trong bất kỳ danh sách các bên bị cấm hoặc hạn chế nào của Chính phủ Hoa Kỳ.
Quý vị và TFH thừa nhận và đồng ý rằng Apple và các công ty con của Apple là bên thứ ba được hưởng lợi từ Điều khoản Dịch vụ liên quan đến giấy phép Ứng dụng của quý vị, và rằng khi quý vị chấp nhận các điều khoản và điều kiện của Điều khoản Dịch vụ, Apple sẽ có quyền (và sẽ được coi là đã chấp nhận quyền) thực thi Điều khoản Dịch vụ liên quan đến giấy phép Ứng dụng của quý vị đối với quý vị với tư cách là bên thứ ba được hưởng lợi.
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective February 14th 2025
Download
Tools For Humanity
用戶條款和條件
歡迎使用 World App！您與德拉瓦州公司 Tools for Humanity Corporation（「TFH」、「我們」或「我方」）之間的這些條款規範您對我們網站和應用程式的使用和存取，包括 World App 和營運方應用程式（統稱為「應用程式」），以及我們向您所提供與 World Network（「World Network」）和生態系統相關的所有相關功能、內容和服務（統稱為「服務」或「我們的服務」）。
使用或存取服務前，請仔細閱讀這些條款。一經存取或使用我們提供的任何服務，並明確同意這些條款，即代表您明示同意受這些條款和我們的私隱聲明所約束，該聲明納入成為這些條款的一部分。請注意這些條款中特別重要的部分：
您同意透過具約束力的仲裁而非法庭解決您與
TFH
之間的任何爭議。如果您住在南韓，您可以選擇在具司法管轄權的當地法庭解決爭議。請查看以下第
15
節，以了解詳情。
加密產品（包括數碼代幣）在很大程度上不受管制，風險可能很高。此類交易的任何損失可能沒有監管追索權。
服務中的任何內容均不構成任何證券或數碼代幣的出售要約或購買要約的招攬。服務不構成投資建議。您居住的地方可能不允許持有、購買或出售任何數碼代幣（定義見下文第
2.1
節），您有責任遵守所有適用法律。請因應您的財務狀況以及您對數碼代幣的理解，考慮購買、出售、使用或持有數碼代幣是否適合您。數碼代幣的價值可能會快速變更，並可能失去所有價值。
此外，
Worldcoin
代幣（「
WLD
」）不可供美國人士使用、購買或存取，包括美國公民、美國居民或在美國的人士，或在美國註冊、設立或居住的公司，或在美國擁有註冊代理的公司。我們不向此類美國人士提供
WLD
。此外，您同意不會向美國人士出售、轉移或提供
WLD
。有關
WLD
相關風險的更多資訊，請參閱此處
1. 條款範圍
1.1
私隱和您的資料
。存取應用程式時，您可能向我們提供各類個人資訊，例如您的姓名或電話號碼。如果您提供資訊以確立 Proof of Personhood（人格證明）並索取您的 WLD 代幣，則您可以提供特殊類別的敏感個人資料，例如您的生物識別資訊。我們的私隱聲明說明我們向您收集的資料以及有關使用方式。如果您不希望我們以私隱聲明中所述的方式收集或使用您的資料，則請勿使用服務。
1.2
資格。
描述我們的服務的網頁可能可在全球範圍內存取，但這並不表示所有服務或服務功能均在您的國家／地區合法或可用。您不得使用 VPN 或類似工具來規避任何限制。您有責任確保在您使用我們的服務的地方合法使用這些服務。我們的服務並非以所有語言提供。我們的服務在您使用的地方是合法的。我們的服務並非以所有語言提供。為了使用服務，您必須遵守這些條款和所有適用法律。您不得使用我們的服務以進行、推廣或協助他人進行任何非法或違法活動。
此外，您必須符合下列所有條件：
您年滿 18 歲；且
您
並非
身處下列國家或地區、受其管轄或屬其國民或居民：敘利亞、烏克蘭的克里米亞、頓涅茨克、盧甘斯克、赫爾松和札波羅熱區、俄羅斯、北韓、伊朗、古巴，或美國、歐盟或任何其他國家或司法管轄區限制存取服務的任何其他國家或地區；
您不是美國財政部外國資產控制辦公室（「OFAC」）或任何其他國家／地區的制裁名單所宣佈的「特別指定國民」，以及您的姓名不在美國商務部的被拒人士名單或任何其他國家／地區的禁止人士名單中。
如果您不符合所有這些要求，您將無法存取或使用服務，因此，我們可能會限制您存取或使用服務的能力。
此外，若您在德國設立、位於德國，或在德國擁有通常住所或註冊辦事處，則不得存取或使用第 2.5 節所指的第三方服務或第 2.8 節所指的分散式應用程式。這些功能不適用於您。
1.3
可用性
。描述服務的網頁可在全球範圍內存取，但這並不表示所有服務或服務功能均在您的國家／地區合法或可用。我們或各政府可能會封鎖在某些國家／地區使用某些服務（或某些服務功能）。您不得使用 VPN 或類似工具來規避任何限制。應用程式之存取及應用程式中某些功能可能無法使用或受到限制，視您所在地區而定。
您有責任確保在您使用服務的地方使用這些服務屬
合法。服務並非以所有語言提供。
1.4
更新
。我們可能會不時變更這些條款。如有變更，我們將在服務上提供更新條款，並在適用法律要求的情況下，在作出任何變更前通知您；如果此類變更可能對您特別重要或不利，我們將在適用法律要求的情況下提供額外事先通知。您理解並同意，在我們進行任何此類變更後，如果您未明確反對，則繼續使用服務即代表您接受更新後的條款。如果您不同意這些條款，您可以隨時停止使用服務。服務會隨時間而演變，因此我們可能會在適用法律允許的範圍內全權酌情決定隨時變更或中止全部或部分服務，恕不另行通知。
1.5
附加條款。
附加條款和條件可能適用於特定應用程式、內容、功能或服務的某些部分，且我們向您提供的所有此類附加條款和條件將構成本條款的一部分。
2. 服務
2.1
非託管錢包。
World App 包括一個非寄存和非託管錢包，用於持有支援的加密貨幣、數碼貨幣或數碼代幣（包括 WLD，統稱為「數碼代幣」）。您控制您錢包中持有的數碼代幣。透過 World App，私密金鑰（代表存取數碼代幣的密碼）會直接儲存在您的裝置中。您可隨時透過將數碼代幣傳送到不同的區塊鏈位址以提取數碼代幣，具體視互聯網存取和區塊鏈上擠塞程度而定。您將數碼代幣保存在您的錢包內時，我們無法控制您的錢包、數碼代幣或私密金鑰。用戶須對其私密金鑰遺失的風險負責，TFH 和 World App 均無法復原此類金鑰。
由於 World App 是非託管錢包，您將獲得一個錢包地址，該地址指定您的數碼代幣在相應區塊鏈上的保存位置。我們無法存取您的數碼代幣。
2.2
支援的數碼代幣。
World App 支援某些 ERC-20 代幣。我們未來可能會新增對其他數碼代幣的支援。World App 會顯示支援的數碼代幣。
在您存入或提取您的數碼代幣之前，請務必檢查
World App
支援哪些代幣和網絡。如果您傳送不支援的代幣或將數碼代幣發送至錯誤的錢包地址，我們無法復原您的數碼代幣。
您明白，傳送不支援的數碼代幣至 World App 錢包地址，可能表示您將完全失去這些數碼代幣的存取權。我們無法復原數碼代幣。請確保您始終將正確的數碼代幣發送到正確的錢包地址。您可以使用少量的數碼代幣來測試交易。
2.3
提供和存取。
當您使用服務與數碼代幣互動時，例如將其傳送到另一個錢包位址或連接到分散式應用程式時，您將需要透過在入門過程中識別的裝置來核准或「簽核」互動。應用程式完全依賴您從這些裝置取得的核准，以啟動與相關區塊鏈的互動。您明白，當您進行這些互動時，您直接與相關區塊鏈互動，而且我們不負責代表您傳輸命令。
2.4
關於第三方的資訊。
一經使用服務，您可以存取與您的數碼代幣相關的資訊，例如但不限於其目前的市值。即使與服務相關的某些功能要求使用第三方產品，展示此資訊並不代表與該等第三方有任何關聯或對之有所認可。此類第三方服務和產品的內容，如透過服務所述，以公開提供的資訊或由此類第三方提供給我們的資訊為基礎，因此我們並不聲明或保證此類第三方服務或產品相關資訊準確無誤。
2.5
第三方服務
在德國設立、位於德國，或在德國有通常住所或註冊辦事處的用戶，無法根據本節使用第三方服務出售或交換其數碼代幣。
在可用的情況下，服務可能向您提供第三方處理者的連結，以處理交易，例如法定購買數碼代幣、銷售數碼代幣、交換數碼代幣，以及未來可能提供的其他功能。您可以在 World App 中查看可用的第三方服務。當您執行這些交易時，您與第三方而非我們進行交易。您必須遵循第三方供應商提供的相關指示，並接受其服務條款。在提供服務期間，或您存取第三方服務時，我們並未隨時控制或傳輸您的資金或數碼代幣。
2.6
點對點交易。
服務提供一個通訊平台，透過此平台，您可以向其他區塊鏈錢包發送，或向其他區塊鏈錢包請求、接收和儲存支援的數碼代幣，不論這些錢包是由您或第三方控制。您在其他區塊鏈錢包之間以及與第三方之間轉移受支援的數碼代幣屬於轉移。交易發起者全權負責正確執行交易，其中包括支付足夠的網絡費用或礦工費用，以使交易成功。若然網絡費用不足，可能導致轉帳處於擱置狀態，亦可能因交易啟動過程中的錯誤而導致延遲或損失。我們沒有義務協助補救此類交易。當您將任何數碼代幣從錢包發送到另一個區塊鏈錢包時，該等傳輸將由您在區塊鏈上執行，而非由我們控制。提交交易資訊之前，您應確認全都準確無誤。如果您輸入不正確的區塊鏈目的地地址，我們不承擔任何責任或義務。數碼代幣轉移一旦被廣播到相關區塊鏈網絡後即無法撤銷，儘管在網絡營運商處理交易時其可能處於擱置狀態，並被相應指定。我們不控制網絡，也不保證網絡將確認轉移。
2.7
保險庫
2.7.1
一般資訊
。 World App 為您提供讓數碼代幣存取分散式「保險庫」（「保險庫」）的用戶介面。您使用保險庫即表示您確認並接受適用於保險庫的條款，以及由開發或提供與您使用保險庫相關或由此產生的功能的第三方所訂立的任何附加條款。
保險庫僅支援某些數碼代幣。根據歐洲議會和理事會於 2023 年 5 月 31 日有關加密資產市場的《2023/1114 號歐盟法規》所訂明的條款，該等數碼代幣並不符合當中資產參考代幣或電子貨幣代幣的標準。在存取您的保險庫時，World App 將會顯示支援的數碼代幣。保險庫支援的數碼代幣可能會不時變更，並且無法保證支援的數碼代幣會保持可供保險庫使用的狀態。
保險庫乃透過第三方智能合約提供。除了您本人之外，任何其他個人或實體都無法與您的保險庫或保險庫內的數碼代幣進行互動。TFH 或任何第三方均沒有管理金鑰，亦沒有您的保險庫或相關智能合約的存取權（不論是特權或其他存取權）。只有在使用本條款第 2.1 節所述的您的相應私密金鑰簽署交易後，才能對保險庫存入或從中提取任何數碼代幣。這意味著，如果您失去對自己的私密金鑰的存取或控制權，您將無法對保險庫存入或從中提取數碼代幣，並且任何人士均無法協助您或代表您進行有關操作。因此，就您可能透過自身帳戶的保險庫鎖定的任何數碼代幣而言，使用保險庫並不會且無法為您提供 TFH 或任何其他第三方的託管、寄存或轉移服務。
適用於 WLD 代幣保險庫功能的智能合約，可使用區塊鏈在此處檢視。特此清晰訂明，使用該等功能和任何其他相關的保險庫功能，均受本條款第 12 節所載的同一免責聲明約束。
2.7.2
保險庫功能。
保險庫目前提供以下功能，而 TFH 或第三方可能會更改、移除或新增有關功能：鎖定、收益、提款與安全期，以及撥款至保險庫。
2.7.3
鎖定
。使用保險庫即表示您同意將您的數碼代幣鎖定一段特定時間。使用您的保險庫鎖定數碼代幣，會將此等數碼代幣從您的非託管錢包轉移至分散式智能合約。轉移後，此等數碼代幣將被「鎖定」在保險庫內，其中包括有關代幣保存在保險庫內的期間，以及稱為「安全期」的預定期間，詳情載於下文。當您的數碼代幣被鎖定時，在您要求提取有關代幣並等待適用的安全期到期之前，您將無法存取或轉移有關代幣，或使用有關代幣執行任何其他交易。包括 TFH 或第三方供應商在內的任何人都無法解鎖、託管、控制、提取或轉移您已鎖定的數碼代幣。將您的數碼代幣放進保險庫內並使其受到鎖定和提取限制，並不表示將數碼代幣的任何權利、所有權或權益出售、借出或轉讓給 TFH 或任何其他第三方。
將您的數碼代幣鎖定在保險庫內，並不保證您的數碼代幣會獲安全保管或託管。任何存款保險計劃或任何類似的保障措施均不適用於您的數碼代幣，且您鎖定的任何數碼代幣的價值和／或效用，在安全期內可能會有所增加或減少。這表示您鎖定在保險庫內的任何數碼代幣的價值或效用，在安全期內可能會減少或歸零。您確認並同意，在適用的安全期之後，任何提取您帳戶的數碼代幣的行為，均可能導致退回數碼代幣的價值低於將其鎖定於保險庫時的價值，甚至沒有價值，且 TFH 或任何第三方概不就任何可能出現的貶值承擔任何風險或責任。
2.7.4
收益
。就本產品而言，您亦可能合資格就您保險庫中的數碼代幣產生若干「收益」。此收益可能以額外數碼代幣的形式，由第三方透過另一系列的智能合約操作提供，您可以使用 World App 提供的介面存取。TFH 或任何第三方均不會使用您的數碼代幣、取得其控制權、就其收取任何賬款或以其他方式處置有關代幣。因此，除了根據訂明的條款和標準鎖定數碼代幣外，收益並非與任何其他事宜聯繫或產生的利益。您可能獲得的任何收益，均由第三方基於您使用保險庫儲存數碼代幣的決定而以補助金的形式向您提供。第三方供應商可隨時酌情更改或取消釐定產生收益的標準，包括所產生的金額或其可累計的時間。
您可賺取的收益金額可能設有上限。這些詳細資料將顯示在您的保險庫旁邊，並載於提供收益的第三方（在 World App 中稱為「供應商」）訂立的任何附加條款。該等附加條款亦會納入本條款當中。收益並非由 TFH 提供或維護。
在完成從保險庫提取產生收益的數碼代幣後，您才會獲發任何累計收益，而此事只會於任何適用的安全期到期後才會發生。此提款行為是獲取任何收益補助金的最終條件，意即除非您已在非託管錢包收取收益，否則對於已產生或將會產生的任何收益，您概無任何權利、所有權或權益。這也意味著，如果您失去對自己的私密金鑰的存取或控制權，您將無法進行任何提款，以使您有權收取收益。
2.7.5
提款和安全期
。您可以隨時提出從您的保險庫提取數碼代幣。您要求從保險庫提取的數碼代幣，將在預定的「安全期」結束後退還給您。您每次提出從保險庫中提取數碼代幣時，新的安全期將會開始和倒數，直至該等數碼代幣退還給您為止。在此期間，您選擇提取的數碼代幣將保持鎖定狀態，而您亦可以取消提款。安全期結束後，您的提款即告完成，數碼代幣以及任何可能已累計的收益將傳送至您的錢包。當您存取保險庫時， World App 將會標明安全期的持續時間。
2.7.6
撥款至金庫
。選用此功能後，即可自動將 WLD 撥款直接傳送到您帳戶的保險庫，而非您的錢包。您可以隨時變更此項設定。
2.7.7 TFH
和保險庫。
此功能可透過 World App 使用。然而，TFH 只能讀取並向您顯示相關資料。TFH 無法轉移、提取或存入您的任何數碼代幣，亦無法存取您的保險庫
2.8
分散式應用程式
本節不適用於在德國設立或位於德國的用戶，或在德國擁有通常住所或註冊辦事處的用戶：
在可用的情況下，
我們可能會提供功能，使您能夠將您的錢包連接到各種分散式應用程式。您全權負責確保這些第三方應用程式的安全性。我們無法控制第三方應用程式，也無法為您與第三方應用程式連接時可能遇到的任何問題提供支援。
2.9
用戶支援
。我們就與服務相關的部分特點及功能，為用戶提供支援協助。若要與我們聯絡，請從應用程式內功能表選擇「支援」，或透過 support@toolsforhumanity.com。
2.10 World ID
介面
。Worldcoin Foundation（而非 TFH）管理 World ID 協定，並控制 Orb 相關的資料處理，以驗證 World ID。我們可能會透過服務向您提供您的 World ID（作為介面）。World ID 協定允許您證明自己是真實且唯一的人，同時保護您的私隱。
2.11
邀請計劃
。在可行的情況下，我們可能會向您提供「邀請」功能。透過邀請，您可以邀請親友下載 World App，並獲得 World ID 驗證。如果您使用邀請，即表示您同意以下條款和條件：
參與邀請的獎勵由 World Assets Limited 提供。World Assets Limited 可全權酌情決定是否針對邀請用戶成功驗證其 World ID 提供獎勵。為獲得獎勵，您必須符合特定條件，其在 World App 中有所說明。有關您可擁有的用戶人數上限，請查看 World App。此限制會顯示在 World App 中。
無需購買即可參加邀請功能。邀請僅適用於非商業的個人用途。您僅可出於合法目的善意使用邀請功能。您不得：(a) 以欺騙、欺詐或非法的方式使用邀請或服務；(b) 採取任何行動損害我們的品牌、商譽或聲譽；(c) 傳輸未經請求或未經授權的廣告或宣傳材料；(d) 作出虛假或誤導性的聲明；(e) 透過邀請使用付費搜尋、付費媒體或其他類似活動來招攬用戶；以及 (f) 使用邀請來嘗試從其他用戶獲取個人資訊。
邀請並非在所有國家／地區或地點都可用，也並非對所有用戶都可用。參與邀請不適用於此功能可能違反（或導致我們違反）任何法律要求的任何司法管轄區。您同意，如果邀請功能不符合您所在地點的適用法律，則不使用邀請功能。
我們可全權酌情決定是否提供邀請。我們可隨時變更、修改、暫停和取消功能。如果 World Assets Limited 全權酌情判定您違反這些條款，可拒絕就您邀請用戶驗證其 World ID 而向您給予獎勵。
2.12 WLD
撥款和預訂。
其中一項第三方服務是在不同時間間隔申請少量的 WLD（「WLD 撥款」）。WLD 撥款由 Worldcoin Foundation 的附屬公司 World Assets Limited 提供。WLD 撥款的確切金額、間隔和時間將在 World App 中指定，但完全由 World Assets Limited 決定。與這些條款的先前版本一致，先前可用的 WLD 保留不保證您將獲得任何金額的 WLD 撥款。WLD 預訂的確切金額、間隔和時間將在 World App 中指定，但完全由 World Assets Limited 決定。WLD 預訂可能會過期，無論在 World App 中已否事先通知，亦不論您是否已進行 WLD 預訂或收到相關的 WLD 撥款。World Assets Limited 可全權酌情決定予以撤銷。
2.13
營運方應用程式
。對於 Orb 營運方和其他合作夥伴，我們提供營運方應用程式，讓您監控與您和您身為 Orb 營運方的業務相關的特定活動和統計資料。我們也可能提供某些功能，協助您以 Orb 營運方的身分開展業務。
2.14. Miniapps
。「Miniapps」是 World App 的一項功能，讓您可以在 World App 內存取迷你應用程式 (mini applications) 平台。我們全權酌情決定 Miniapps 在 World App 中的顯示方式。 您必須擁有 World App 錢包地址才能存取 Miniapps。
您確認在顯示
Miniapps
時，
TFH
僅作為一項技術平台，提供用戶連接服務。
TFH
在任何時候均不會傳輸、儲存、持有、保管或以其他方式處理任何傳統或數碼貨幣。
TFH
不會處理交易、不充當支付處理商，也不會以任何方式參與交易處理。
TFH
並非交易的一方，對於這些交易不承擔任何責任。
TFH
無法提供有關交易問題的支援。
2.14.1
與
Miniapps
相關的交易和付款
。Miniapps 顯示於 World App 中，並可能提供 World App 用戶可使用其 World App 錢包中的數碼代幣購買的商品或服務。這些交易僅發生於您與 Miniapps 之間。TFH 並非任何此類交易的一方。
關於任何此類交易，您確認 World App 錢包為非保管服務，TFH 不會儲存或保管您的數碼代幣，且不進行、傳輸、管有或以其他方式參與任何交易。數碼代幣始終儲存在各自的區塊鏈網絡中並通過其傳輸。不保證交易能正確處理。
TFH 只負責將您連接至 Miniapps 平台上的第三方，並非任何交易的參與方。TFH 不參與支付處理或管理任何退款或取消費用。
一旦您決定進行交易，您須發送約定的數碼代幣金額及類型。TFH 不處理使用者的數碼代幣或傳統貨幣，亦不代替用戶執行任何轉帳。TFH 不會處理、管理、監管、驗證任何交易，亦不對任何交易提供保證。若交易未被接收、被逆轉、處理不當，或遇到其他錯誤，您需與第三方供應商協商並共同解決問題。任何與付款或交易相關的爭議、索賠、損失、誤解、技術錯誤或任何類型的問題（無論是意外發生或涉嫌故意）均須由您與第三方供應商直接處理。TFH 不承擔任何責任，亦不會參與任何與付款相關的爭議或討論，並且不對相關各方可能遭受的任何損失或損害負責。
您需自行承擔數碼代幣價格波動的風險，並理解當您完成交易時，交易中涉及的數碼代幣價值可能已大幅波動。
2.14.2
第三方。
任何 Miniapps 中顯示的產品和服務均由第三方提供和管理。使用 Miniapps 即表示您確認並同意：
本條款是您與我們之間的協議，而非與任何特定 Miniapps 之間的協議；
您正在存取由第三方開發和／或提供的應用程式，該方對 Miniapps 負全部責任；
TFH 僅透過 World App 錢包提供對第三方支付提供者的存取，而不直接處理支付或持有資金；
Miniapps 可能會有額外的條款作為其產品或服務的一部分，如果您接受其服務，必須遵守這些條款；及
您完全確認並明確承擔與交易相關的任何及所有風險，並同意我們對此類交易產生的任何風險或不利後果概不負責。
Miniapps 上的個別開發者對直接通過其各自的迷你應用程式向您提供的內容、產品、貨物或服務負全責。如有任何疑問或爭議，您應直接聯絡該開發者。
用戶接受與進行交易相關的所有風險，包括無法收到其購買或銷售所得款項的風險。如果交易出現問題，TFH 無法協助解決，也不對交易產生的問題承擔任何責任。
2.14.3 TFH
費用
。當您與開發者進行交易時，我們可能會為使用 Miniapps 增加費用。該費用的金額將在平台上顯示。任何此類費用均如 Miniapps 中所反映顯示且為最新費用，並可能隨時更新和變更。
2.14.4
稅金
。您全權負責確定透過 Miniapps 進行的任何交易或您在 Miniapps 中進行的交易是否需要繳納稅款，以及在多大程度上需要繳納，以及預扣、收取、報告及向適當的稅務機關繳納正確的稅款金額。
2.14.5
無一般監控。
TFH 並無一般義務監控用戶產生的資訊，也不會主動尋找顯示 Miniapps 內任何非法活動的事實或情況。
然而，如果我們發現（無論使用何種方式）有非法產品或服務通過 Miniapps 提供給歐盟地區的用戶，我們將通知透過 Miniapps 購買該非法產品或服務的用戶
。
2.14.6
禁止的活動
。Miniapps 服務的用戶同意不發佈或散佈任何違反法律或侵犯第三方權利的內容，包括但不限於知識產權、私隱權或宣傳權。
此外，您同意不從事以下活動：
違法、欺詐或有害的行為；
干擾或破壞 Miniapps 的運作；
違反我們應用程式指南中的任何條款；及
包含應用程式指引不允許的內容。
2.14.7
標示非法內容
。World App 設有便於存取且易用的機制，讓用戶能向我們舉報 Miniapps 平台上的非法內容。我們將迅速採取行動審查此類報告。
2.14.8
移除非法內容
。如果我們確定任何 Miniapps 含有非法內容或提供非法產品或服務，該 Miniapps 將從平台中移除。TFH 將向任何發布非法內容或服務的用戶提供簡短、清晰且具體的原因說明。
World App 對其用戶所執行的任何限制措施，將秉持謹慎、客觀且適度的原則。
用戶若認為自己的內容被無故移除或存取權限被無理禁用，可透過
legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
聯絡我們，對該決定提出上訴。我們提供免費的電子申訴系統，讓用戶可以針對因涉嫌非法內容或違反條款而導致的內容移除、服務暫停、帳戶終止或貨幣化限制等決定提出異議。
2.14.9
內容審查
。對於經常提供明顯非法內容的用戶，TFH 有權在合理期限內暫停提供服務，並在法律要求的情況下發出事先警告。TFH 也可能暫時停止處理經常提交無根據申訴的用戶的通知和投訴。
2.15.
用戶名稱
。您的 World App 用戶名稱不必為您的真實姓名。選擇用戶名稱時，您有義務遵守最新版本的
用戶名稱
政策。
3. 購買、費用和稅項
3.1
交易費用
。一經使用服務，即代表您同意支付所有適用費用，包括數碼代幣互換和交易的交易費用。在您進行交易前，我們會告知您任何適用的費用。如果您使用第三方付款服務，針對任何數碼代幣購買所收取的銀行手續費、信用卡和扣帳卡手續費，可能會從數碼代幣購買的結算金額中扣除。您亦須負責支付您的金融服務供應商收取的任何額外費用。
3.2
網絡費用
。與區塊鏈的互動也會產生網絡費用。網絡費用由區塊鏈網絡收取並向其而非我們支付，以促進任何互動。在某些情況下，您可能有資格在由 TFH 全權決定的特定時期內進行有限次數的免手續費交易。此類交易須符合 TFH 可隨時調整的最低交易金額。
3.3
稅項
。您全權負責確定透過服務進行任何交易是否要付及在多大程度上要付稅款，以及預扣、收取、報告並繳納正確的稅款金額向適當的稅務機關。
3.4
更新
。所有費用均如服務中所反映顯示且為最新費用，並可能隨時更新和變更。
4. 風險因素
4.1
非法定投標。
數碼代幣並非法定投標，不受任何政府支持，服務上的數碼代幣帳戶及價值餘額亦不具備聯邦存款保險公司或證券投資者保護公司的保護或其他國家／地區的類似保護。我們並非銀行，亦不提供信託服務。在許多國家／地區，透過 World App 進行的交易大多不受管制。我們對我方支援的區塊鏈功能不作任何保證，當中可能導致延遲、利益衝突或對某些數碼代幣擁有者不利的第三方營運決策，或導致您無法透過服務完成交易。您透過服務提交的交易詳情可能無法完成，或可能在適用的區塊鏈上發生重大延遲，並且我們對無法如預期確認或處理交易概不負責。概不保證或擔保透過服務發起的轉讓，將成功轉讓任何數碼代幣的所有權或權利。此外，使用某些數碼代幣（例如 WLD）可能會有特定的風險。有關 WLD 特定風險的詳細資訊，請參閱此處 。
4.2
新技術。
本服務為新技術。雖然本軟件已經過廣泛測試，但用於服務的軟件仍相對較新，可能有錯誤或安全性弱點。此外，軟件仍在開發中，並可能隨著時間發生無法滿足用戶期望的重大變更。
4.3
資訊安全風險。
數碼代幣和服務使用可能受到侵佔或盜竊。駭客或其他惡意團體或組織可能會試圖以各種方式干擾服務，包括但不限於惡意軟件攻擊、拒絕服務攻擊、基於共識的攻擊、女巫攻擊、Smurf 攻擊和欺騙攻擊。此外，由於我們支援的區塊鏈網絡（例如 (Ethereum) 以太坊協定）依賴開源軟件，因此服務基礎的軟件可能蘊含有意或無意的錯誤或弱點，這些錯誤或弱點可能對服務造成負面影響，或導致用戶損失數碼代幣或失去透過服務存取或控制其錢包的能力。如果出現此類軟件錯誤或弱點，可能無法補救，且無法保證用戶可獲得任何補救、退款或補償。
4.4
準確性。
儘管我們致力提供準確及時的資訊（包括但不限於內容），但無法保證為完全準確、完整或最新的資訊，當中也可能包括技術偏差或印刷錯誤。為了盡可能持續向您提供完整且準確的資訊，在適用法律允許的範圍內，資訊可能會不時變更或更新，恕不另行通知，包括但不限於有關我們政策、產品和服務的資訊。因此，在依賴任何資訊前，您應作出驗證；所有基於服務所提供資訊作出的決定均由您全權負責，我們對該等決定不承擔任何責任。
4.5
可用性
。我們努力為您提供卓越的服務，但不保證能夠無間斷地提供服務。服務可能因為維護或其他原因而隨時暫時無法使用。對於用戶通訊的任何錯誤、遺漏、中斷、刪除、缺陷、操作或傳輸延遲、通訊線路故障、盜竊或破壞、未經授權存取或更改，我們概不負責。對於任何電話網絡或線路、電腦網上系統、伺服器或供應商、電腦設備、軟件、電郵或播放器因技術問題或互聯網或服務上的流量擠塞而造成的任何問題或技術故障，包括用戶或任何其他人的電腦因參與或下載與服務相關的材料而受到傷害或損害，我們概不負責。對於任何人使用服務、在服務上發佈或透過服務傳輸的任何內容或向用戶傳輸的任何互動導致的任何損失或損害、財務損失或利潤損失、業務損失或人身傷亡，無論是線上還是離線，我們概不負責。
4.6
分叉
。用於建立 WLD 的軟件為開放原始碼，可供任何人複製和使用。換言之，任何人都可以建立修改過的 WLD 版本，也稱為「分叉」。如果發生分叉或數碼代幣網絡出現任何其他中斷，我們可能無法支援與分叉相關的任何活動。發生分叉時，交易可能無法完成、部分完成、不正確完成或大幅延遲。對於全部或部分因分叉或其他網絡中斷而導致的任何損失，我們概不負責。
4.7
第三方服務。
在適用情況下（具體見第 2.5 節），我們依賴第三方服務供應商在應用程式內提供某些特性和功能，例如購買具法定貨幣的數碼代幣的功能，或將一項數碼資產換成另一項的功能。我們不提供這些服務，也不是任何此類交易的當事方。您僅依賴第三方供應商提供這些服務，且您必須擁有第三方供應商的帳戶並同意其條款。如果
您在使用其服務時遇到問題，我們無法為您提供協助；對於您使用第三方供應商進行的任何交易，我們概不負責。
5. 知識產權。
5.1
擁有權
。我們的軟件、應用程式、服務、內容、標誌（定義見下文）以及服務中內容的設計、選擇和安排（「IP」）受美國和其他適用國家／地區的版權、商標、專利和其他知識產權和法律保護。您同意遵守所有適用的知識產權和法律，以及本協議或服務中載有的任何商標或版權聲明或限制。您不得移除 IP 中載有的任何版權、商標或專有聲明。
5.2
商標。
Tools for Humanity 公司名稱、World App 標誌所有相關標誌以及標語是 Tools for Humanity Corporation 或其授權者的商標或服務標誌（「標誌」）。未經我們書面許可，您不得全部或部分複製、模仿或使用標誌。服務中提及的所有其他商標、名稱或標誌均為其各自擁有者的財產，未經適用商標擁有者的書面許可，您不得全部或部分複製、模仿或使用。服務中包括他人的任何標誌並不構成我們的批准、認可或推薦。
6. 授權和限制
6.1
授權
。倘若您有資格使用服務，並在遵守這些條款的前提下，我們特此授予您存取和使用服務的有限授權。
6.2
授權限制
。您不得在任何互聯網、內聯網或外聯網網站上重新發佈內容，或將資訊納入任何其他資料庫或編譯中，並且嚴格禁止對內容的任何其他使用。未經我們事先書面許可，嚴禁以本文明確授權範圍以外方式使用服務，如有違反則將終止本文授予的許可。此類未經授權的使用也可能違反適用法律，包括但不限於版權法和商標法，以及適用的通訊規例和法規。除非本文明確規定，否則這些條款中的任何內容均不應被詮釋為授予任何知識產權，無論是透過不容反悔、暗示或其他方式。在適用法律允許的範圍內，我們可隨時撤銷此授權，恕不另行通知，無論是否有理由。
6.3
政府
。如果您是美國政府最終用戶，我們將把服務授權給您作為「商業項目」，該術語定義於美國聯邦法規中（見 48 C.F.R. § 2.101），我們授予您服務的權利與我們根據這些條款授予的所有其他權利相同。
7. 可接受的用途
7.1
您只可將服務用於個人用途。我們保留權利，隨時根據適用法律全權酌情決定審查、取消或暫停您對服務的存取或使用。禁止用途清單上的項目僅為範例，清單並非詳盡無遺；我們可能會根據適用法律全權酌情決定新增或移除禁止用途。
7.2
禁止用途包括：
非法活動：
違反或協助違反 OFAC 所管理任何制裁計劃；違反或協助違反我們開展業務所在國家／地區的任何法律；涉及任何非法活動的收益；或發佈、散佈或傳播任何非法材料或資訊。
過度使用或駭入：
對我們的基礎設施施加不合理或不成比例的大量負載；破壞性干擾、攔截或侵佔任何系統、資料或資訊；向服務傳輸或上載任何含有病毒、木馬病毒、蠕蟲或任何其他有害或不利程式的材料；或試圖未經授權存取連接到服務的電腦系統或網絡。
損害他人利益：
干擾他人存取或使用服務；誹謗、濫用、勒索、騷擾、跟蹤、威脅或以其他方式違反或侵犯他人的私隱、知識產權或任何其他法律權利；煽動、威脅、促進、推動或鼓勵對他人的仇恨、種族排斥或暴力行為；或
在未經許可的情況下從服務中獲取、提取或收集其他用戶的資料。
欺詐和其他不公平的商業慣例：
旨在欺詐我們、我方用戶或任何其他人的任何活動；向我們提供任何虛假、不準確或誤導性資訊；承諾不合理地給予高額回報或銷售服務而不為買方帶來額外好處；或進一步實施其他掠奪性和欺騙性慣例，包括非法彩券、抽獎、競投費拍賣、競賽、抽獎、賭博或任何其他靠運氣取勝的遊戲。
知識產權侵犯：
涉及銷售、分佈或提供盜版音樂、電影、軟件、或其他未經權利持有人適當授權的許可材料；未經明確同意或以其他危害我們或我方品牌的方式使用 IP（包括標誌）；暗示我們或與我方關聯的失實認可；或侵犯或違反任何版權、商標、公開權或私隱權或法律規定的任何其他專有權利。
8. Orb
營運方
我們與稱為「Orb 營運方」的本地獨立承辦人員合作，其協助用戶註冊並回答您對我們可能抱有的問題。這些 Orb 營運方已經接受過培訓，並且了解 World Network。然而，我們無法控制營運方的言行，對其概不負責。
Orb
營運方在任何方面都不是我們的代理人或員工。
TFH
為用戶權益作出的任何努力、功能、程序、政策、標準或其他工作，並不表示與
Orb
營運方具有僱傭或代理關係。
9. 暫停
我們在下列情況下可能要暫停及限制您對服務的存取：(i) 表面有效傳票、法院命令或具約束力的政府機關命令；(ii) 我們合理懷疑您將服務用於禁止用途；(iii) 您使用服務受限於任何未決訴訟、調查或政府訴訟的約束，和／或我們察覺您的活動有較高的法律或監管違合風險；(iv) 我們的服務合作夥伴無法支援您使用服務；(v) 您採取我們認為規避管控的任何行動（例如但不限於嘗試建立多個帳戶）。
10. 並非證券或商品利益要約
服務內容並不構成買賣要約，或買賣投資、證券、合夥利益、商品或任何其他金融工具的要約招攬；若然要約或招攬未獲授權或允許，內容或服務亦不構成且不得用於或涉及任何州份或司法管轄區內任何人士的要約或招攬，或提供給作出該要約或招攬即屬違法的人士。
11. 內容
11.1
依賴內容；服務變更。
我們透過服務向您提供的資訊和材料（「內容」）僅用於一般資訊參考；在適用法律允許的範圍內，我們不保證其準確、實用或完整。您對我們內容的任何依賴均由您自行承擔風險。對於您因內容而採取或不採取的任何行動，或獲您分享內容的任何人，我們概不負上責任或法律責任。若然其他用戶在服務或任何其他地方描述其使用服務的聲明與這些條款或我們的內容不一致，不應被視為我們認可其聲明。我們可能會不時更新內容，但其可能不是完整或最新的內容，而我們對您沒有義務更新內容或服務的任何其他部分。在適用法律允許的範圍內，我們可能在未事先通知您的情況下，暫時或永久修改或中止任何部分或所有內容或服務。在適用法律允許的範圍內，我們不對部分或全部內容或服務的任何修改、暫停或中止負責。
11.2
第三方服務和內容
。我們可能會在社交媒體平台（「第三方服務」）上提供教育材料、網絡研討會、會議和推廣活動的連結，以便用戶和其他第三方之間分享和合作。如果您分享任何個人資訊、照片、意見、內容或有關這些服務的任何其他資料，您須自行承擔風險，而您使用這些服務時，須遵守這些服務而非我們的使用條款和私隱政策。您應檢閱各第三方服務的服務條款，以更加了解您的權利，以及這些平台使用您資料的方式。對於與任何第三方服務相關而導致您的資料遺失、遭竊、毀損或誤用（包括
疏忽）的情況，我們概不負責，但相關法律無法限制該等責任者則不在此限。您使用第三方服務（「第三方內容」）提供的任何資訊的風險由您自行承擔，我們不保證任何第三方內容準確、完整、真實或適合您的個人情況。第三方內容包括由我們未明確認可而由其他用戶提供的資訊。
11.3
用戶內容
。身為 Worldcoin 社群的成員，您可於我們擁有的留言板、網誌、社交媒體帳戶，以及服務上各種其他公開位置，發佈訊息、資料、軟件、圖片、影片或其他內容（「用戶內容」）。這些論壇可能由我們或第三方服務供應商代表我們主辦。您對透過服務提交、上載、發佈或儲存的所有用戶內容負責。您必須提供有關您用戶內容的所有必要且適當的警告、資訊和披露。對於您透過服務提交的任何用戶內容，我們概不負責。
11.4
用戶內容授權
。一經向我們提交用戶內容，即代表您對用戶內容擁有所有必要的權利，且您藉此向我們授予永久、全球、非獨家、免版稅、可再授權且可轉讓的授權，以使用、複製、散佈、衍生製作、修改、展示和執行與我們營銷和推廣相關的全部或部分用戶內容，以及用於與服務相關的任何其他合法商業目的。我們可能會透過我們選擇的任何媒體渠道以任何媒體格式重新散佈您部分或全部的用戶內容及衍生作品。您亦特此向我們及其他用戶授予非獨家授權，以透過服務使用、存取、複製、散佈、修改、顯示和執行您的用戶內容。第 11.4 節將在適用法律允許的最大範圍內適用。
11.5
用戶內容限制
。您同意不使用也不允許任何第三方使用服務來發佈或傳輸任何屬於下列性質的用戶內容：(a) 中傷或誹謗，或披露有關任何人的私人或個人事務；(b) 不雅、淫穢、色情、騷擾、威脅、辱罵、憎恨、種族或民族冒犯；鼓勵將被視為刑事罪行的行為，導致民事責任或違反任何法律或以其他方式有所不當；(c) 侵犯他人的知識產權，包括未經授權的版權文字、圖片或程式、商業秘密或其他機密專有資訊，或以侵權方式使用的商標或服務標誌；或 (d) 不合理地干擾其他用戶使用服務。您向我們聲明，您自願向服務發佈用戶內容；因此，發佈用戶內容不會在您與我們之間建立僱主與僱員的關係。未經其他用戶許可，您不得複製或使用其電郵地址、手機號碼、餘額、用戶名稱或任何其他個人資訊。禁止透過服務或任何其他渠道主動向其他用戶發送電郵、郵件、電話或其他通訊。
11.6
投訴和
DMCA
下架。
如果您認為您的商標或版權作品受到我們的內容或我方服務上的用戶內容所侵犯，或以其他方式暗示我們認可或隸屬我們的方式發佈，請發送電郵至 legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com，主旨行使用「[商標／版權]投訴」（視情況而定）。為使您的投訴有效，並使我們根據數碼千禧年版權法案 (Digital Millennium Copyright Act)（「DMCA」）採取行動，您必須按照所有 DMCA 要求，在電郵中列載以下資訊：
清楚識別聲稱被侵權的版權保護作品或標誌，包括註冊作品時的版權註冊編號；
識別聲稱侵權且您想移除的作品或標誌；
網址或其他明確的指示，使我們能夠找到涉嫌侵權的內容；
您的電郵地址、郵寄地址和電話號碼；及
一份經簽署的聲明，表明您真誠地相信該內容侵權，您提供的資訊正確無誤，且您是該內容的擁有者或獲授權代表該內容的擁有者。
您亦應了解，根據 DMCA 第 512(f) 節，任何故意發送無理侵權通知的人士均可能須對損害承擔責任，因此請勿作出任何虛假聲稱。我們可能會與第三方分享您向我們提供的任何資訊或通訊，包括將涉嫌侵權資料上載至服務的人士。
當我們收到善意的侵權通知時，我們的政策是：(a) 立即移除或停用侵權內容的存取權；(b) 通知上載侵權資料的人，我們已移除或停用該資料的存取權；以及 (c) 對於重複
違規者，終止該名人士對服務的存取權。如果我們收到該名人士的異議通知，我們可能會向您寄送異議通知副本，說明我們可能會在 10 個工作日內還原移除的資料或停止停用該資料。除非您向我們或上載內容的人士提交尋求法院命令的訴訟，否則我們將在收到異議通知後 10 至 14 個工作日或更長的時間內，酌情決定恢復對移除材料的存取權。
12. 免責聲明
12.1
您使用服務的風險由您自行承擔。服務、
WLD
、內容和所有其他知識產權均按現況和可用基礎提供，不作任何明示、暗示或法定的聲明或保證。在適用法律允許的最大範圍內，我們明確拒絕就服務中的功能、內容或其他知識產權，對所有權、適銷性、特定用途適用性或不侵權作出任何暗示保證。某些司法管轄區不允許排除暗示保證，因此上述排除可能不適用於您。我們不認可、保證或承擔第三方所作任何廣告、要約或聲明的責任，包括與服務相關的其他用戶。
12.2
我們並不聲明或保證
(a)
全部或部分服務的存取將持續、無間斷、及時、安全或正確無誤；
(b)
服務或內容準確、完整、可靠或緊貼當下；
(c)
服務不含病毒或其他有害成分；或
(d)
服務或內容將滿足您的要求、需求或期望。
12.3
此外，對於任何使用案例，我們並不聲明或保證服務或
WLD
合法，或服務或
WLD
將滿足任何監管或合規需求。您亦有責任判斷及遵守可能規範您對服務或
WLD
之使用的所有法律及規例限制及要求。除這些條款列載的明示聲明外，您特此確認並同意，您並未就存取或使用服務或
WLD
依賴任何其他書面或口頭聲明或諒解。
12.4
就任何財務、法律、投資或稅務事宜而言，我們並非亦無法擔任您的顧問。任何內容僅代表標示日期起的情況。此處表達的任何預估、估計、預測、目標和／或意見均受到風險、不確定性和假設的影響，因此不一定正確，且可能在不另行通知的情況下變更。您不應依賴任何內容。
此處的某些資訊可能從第三方來源取得。雖然這些被視為可靠的資訊來源，但我們尚未獨立驗證所有該等資訊，也不對其準確性作出任何聲明。我們不是註冊經紀交易商或投資顧問。對於服務中所載任何材料的準確性、及時性或完整性，我們不作任何聲明，並明確否認任何明示、暗示或法定的保證。我們的內容僅供一般資訊參考，且您全權負責確定是否使用服務。您確認交易、使用和持有數碼代幣本身具有風險。您可能會損失錢包中的所有資金。您確認，服務可能受到美國法律的出口限制和經濟制裁。
12.5
有關服務的任何修改或終止，或您對服務的存取暫停或終止，我們不對您或任何第三方負責。
13. 責任限制
13.1
如排除或限制我們對您的責任屬違法，則我們不會這樣做。
在不允許以下各類排除內容的國家／地區，我們僅對因我們未能使用合理的謹慎和技能或違反我們與您的合約而導致的合理可預見的損失和損害負責。本段不影響任何合約或協議無法豁免或限制的消費者權利。
13.2
在法律允許的範圍內，您同意我們或我們的任何高級人員、董事、員工、承辦方、代理、聯屬公司、或附屬公司（「
TFH
當事方」）於任何情況下均無須就任何間接、處罰性、附帶、特殊、相應或懲罰性損害對您負責，包括利潤損失、商譽、使用、資料或其他無形財產的損害，無論有關責任是基於侵權法或其他法律主張，以及
TFH
當事方是否已獲知可能出現以下原因導致或與之相關的損害：
(a)
您使用或無法使用服務、您的數碼代幣或
World Network
；
(b)
無法存取或終止服務；
(c)
任何駭客攻擊、竄改、未經授權存取或修改任何交易或您的資料；
(d)
您透過服務與任何第三方訂立的任何交易或協議；
(e)
第三方的任何活動或通訊；
(f) Orb
營運方的行動；
(g)
任何數碼代幣價值的任何損失；
(h)
在該等服務上或透過該等服務存取的任何第三方內容；
(i)
我方內容中的錯誤、誤差或不準確之處；
(j)
因存取或使用該等服務所導致任何性質的人身傷害或財產損失；
(k)
病毒、木馬病毒或可能傳輸至該等服務或透過服務傳輸的類似病毒；或
(l)
任何第三方的誹謗、冒犯性或非法行為。無論損害因使用或誤用，或因依賴
TFH
或服務所引起，本責任限制仍在適用法律允許的最大範圍內有效，即使任何有限補救未能達到基本目的。
13.3
在任何情況下，
TFH
當事方均不對金額超過
100.00
美元的直接索償、訴訟、責任、義務、損害、損失或成本負責。若您對服務不滿，您同意我們提供的唯一補救方式將是讓您停用服務。本責任限制將在適用法律允許的最大範圍內適用。
13.4
豁免和彌償。
您同意就任何第三方向 TFH 當事方所提以下各項導致或相關的任何索償、損害賠償、成本、負債、合理律師費及開支，為 TFH 當事方辯護、作出彌償和使其免受傷害：(a) 您對服務的使用；(b) 您對這些條款的違反；(c) 您對他人任何權利的侵犯；(d) 您與服務相關的行為；或 (e) 您對 WLD、任何數碼代幣或 Worldcoin 網絡的使用。部分司法管轄區限制消費者彌償，因此本段中的部分或全部彌償條款可能不適用於您。若您有義務賠償任何 TFH 當事方，則我們保留權利全權酌情決定控制任何訴訟或法律程序，並判斷是否要和解和決定和解條款。
如果您是加州居民，您放棄加州民法 § 1542 的福利和保障，該法規定：「[a] 一般豁免不適用於債權人或豁免方在執行豁免時不知道或懷疑存在其利益的主張，並且如其知道，將嚴重影響其與債務人或豁免方的和解。」
14. 管限法律
加州法律適用於本協議以及由本協議引起或與本協議相關的任何爭議。無論法律衝突原則為何，本節所述的管限法律均適用。您進一步同意，服務將被視為僅基於加州，且雖然服務可能在其他司法管轄區提供，但其可用性不會導致在加州以外任何訴訟地產生一般或特定個人管轄權。
15. 爭議解決、仲裁和集體訴訟放棄
15.1 請細閱以下段落。當中要求您在仲裁員面前透過個人仲裁而非以集體訴訟成員身分解決爭議。仲裁會阻止您在法院起訴我們或進行陪審團審判，不過如果您符合資格，可以在小額索償法院向我們提出爭議。
15.2 我們將盡最大努力，透過非正式的善意協商解決任何潛在的爭議。若發生潛在爭議，您必須發送電郵至 legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com 以聯絡我們，讓我們能在不採取正式爭議解決方案的情況下嘗試解決爭議。如果我們無法您發出電郵起計 60 天內達成非正式的解決方案，而且您選擇提出聯邦或州份法定索償、普通法索償、合約法、侵權法、欺詐法、虛假陳述法或任何其他法律理論的索償，或因這些條款、內容或服務導致或與之相關的任何其他正式訴訟（各自稱為「爭議」），則您同意透過具約束力的仲裁根據以下條款以個人為基礎解決爭議（統稱為「仲裁協議」）：
仲裁將由單一仲裁員保密進行。仲裁員將適用限制法規及所有適用法律，並履行適用法律認可的特權索償。
爭議將完全由 JAMS 根據 JAMS 簡化仲裁規則 (Streamlined Arbitration Rules) 進行仲裁和最終解決，除非爭議的總金額達到 250,000 美元或以上，則將適用 JAMS 綜合仲裁規則 (Comprehensive Arbitration Rules)。仲裁將在加州三藩市進行，除非您和我們雙方都同意在其他地方進行仲裁則作別論。您同意，加州三藩市的聯邦和州份法院是仲裁裁決的任何上訴或（若本協議具約束力的仲裁條款被裁定為無法執行）法院訴訟的適當訴訟地。
在任何仲裁中，無論地點為何，各方均不會向對方尋求文件透露，仲裁員亦不會允許雙方作出透露；相反，各方將在最終仲裁聽證會之前，於各方同意的時間及日期披露支持其立場的證據。
此仲裁協議涵蓋仲裁協議或仲裁協議任何部分的可執行性、可撤銷性、範圍和有效性，以及所有其他因仲裁協議的詮釋或適用性引起或與其相關的爭議；所有此類事宜將由仲裁員而非法院或法官決定。
如果仲裁員或仲裁管理員對您徵收提交費或其他行政費用，我們將在您提出請求時向您付還超過您在法院提訴時應付費用的該等費用或成本。如果仲裁管理員的規則或適用法律要求，我們也將支付額外費用或成本。
應任何一方要求進行的所有仲裁程序均將以最高保密性進行，並且在這種情況下所有文件、證詞及記錄將由仲裁員保密接收、聽取和備存，僅供當事方以及其各別專家、顧問或證人查看，以上人士須事先書面同意保密接收所有該等資訊，只將資訊用於仲裁目的。
除此仲裁協議中討論的集體程序和補救措施外，仲裁員有權授予法院另行提供的任何補救措施。
仲裁員所作裁決的任何判決均可在任何具司法管轄權的法院作出。
如果仲裁要求或禁止此仲裁協議中代表第三方提起的集體訴訟和其他爭議被裁定為無法執行，則僅無法執行的條文將被視為已從這些條款中移除，且這些條款中的所有剩餘義務將繼續具有十足效力及作用。
15.3 30
天內的退出權
。若要選擇退出且不受本仲裁協議約束，您有權從您用於設定申請的地址向 egalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com 發送電郵，主旨行使用：「仲裁和集體訴訟放棄的退出」。您必須在同意這些條款後 30 天內傳送電郵，否則您將有義務根據此仲裁協議的條款進行爭議仲裁。如果您選擇退出此仲裁協議，我們也不會受仲裁協議約束。
15.4
本仲裁協議之變更。
若本條款中標題為「
爭議解決、仲裁和集體訴訟放棄」
的章節有任何變更，我們將於 30 天內通知您，且該等變更將於您收到我方通知後 30 天起生效。對
爭議解決、仲裁和集體訴訟放棄
章節的變更，在其他情況下將僅適用於第 30 天後發生的爭議。若法院或仲裁員判定本節變更無法執行或無效，則該等變更將自這些條款分割，且法院或仲裁員將應用您開始使用服務後生效的第一份仲裁協議之條款。您可以按照上述標題「30 天內的退出權」一節中規定的程序，行使您選擇退出新仲裁協議條款的權利。
此仲裁協議於這些條款以及您對服務的使用終止後仍繼續有效。
儘管此仲裁協議有任何相反規定，任何一方均可提起訴訟，其僅用於禁制令救濟，以阻止未經授權使用或濫用服務，或侵犯知識產權（例如商標、商業秘密、
版權或專利權），而無須首先參與上述仲裁或非正式爭議解決程序。
16. 一般條文
16.1
無棄權；可分割性；不可轉讓性
。我們未能執行條文並不代表我們放棄之後執行該條文的權利。如果某項條文被裁定為無法執行，則這些條款的其餘條文將保持完全效力，並在適用法律允許的範圍內以可執行條款，從而盡可能反映我們的意圖。您不得轉讓您在這些條款下的任何權利，任何此類企圖均屬無效。我們可能會將我方權利轉讓給其任何聯屬公司或附屬公司，或與服務相關任何業務權益的任何繼承者。
16.2
完整協議
。這些條款構成您與我們之間關於服務的完整和排他性協議聲明，並取代所有先前和同期關於服務的書面和口頭諒解、協議、聲明和保證。這些條款中的章節標題僅為方便起見，並不管限任何條文的涵義或詮釋。
16.3
存續。
這些條款中與暫停或終止、欠付 TFH 的債務、服務的一般使用、與 TFH 的爭議有關的所有條文，以及其性質延伸至這些條款屆滿或終止後的條文，於這些條款終止或屆滿後仍繼續有效。
16.4
雙方的關係。
這些條款中的任何內容均不被視為或企圖被視為，亦不得使您和 TFH 被視為合作夥伴、聯營者或透過其他方式以共同合夥人身分獲利，且您或 TFH 均不會被視為另一方的代理。當中包括這些條款中沒有任何內容在您與 TFH 之間建立或企圖建立任何僱傭關係的事實。
16.5
無專業建議或受託人責任。
我們提供的所有內容僅供參考，不應被詮釋為專業建議。您不應根據服務中載有的任何資訊採取或避免採取任何行動。在您作出涉及服務或任何數碼代幣的任何財務、法律或其他決策前，您應向持牌和合資格在該領域提供意見的個人尋求獨立的專業建議。這些條款並非旨在且不對我們建立或施加任何受託責任。在法律允許的最大範圍內，您確認並同意我們對您或任何其他方不負任何信託義務或責任，且在普通法或衡平法中可能存在任何此類義務或責任的範圍內，特此不可撤銷地否認、放棄和免除這些義務和責任。您進一步同意，我們對您所負的唯一責任和義務已在這些條款明確列出。
16.6
控制權的變更。
倘若我們被第三方實體收購或與之合併，或以其他方式將特定功能轉讓給關係企業或繼承實體，或我們判斷為用戶帶來最大利益的其他實體，則我們保留權利，在以上任何情況下根據適用法律轉移或轉讓向您收集的資料，作為該等合併、收購、出售或其他控制權變更的一部分。
16.7
不可抗力。
對於直接或間接因數碼代幣的重大市場波動、任何天災、民事或軍事當局的行為、恐怖份子行為、內亂、戰爭、罷工、衛生緊急情況、勞資糾紛、火災、電訊或互聯網服務或網絡供應商服務中斷、設備或軟件故障或超出我們合理控制範圍的任何原因或條件，導致的延遲、效能故障或服務中斷（「不可抗力事件」），我們概不負責。即使發生不可抗力事件，也不會影響這些條款中其餘任何條文的有效性和可執行性。
16.8
應用程式商店。
如果您從任何 Apple App Store 以外的應用程式商店或分銷平台下載我們的應用程式，包括 Google Play Store（「分銷平台」），您同意：
本條款為您我們之間的協議，並非與發佈平台供應商（以下稱「商店供應商」）之間的協議；您使用應用程式必須遵守商店供應商當時的發佈平台服務條款；商店供應商僅為您取得應用程式的發佈平台供應商；
我們而非商店供應商對應用程式全權負責；
商店供應商對您並無應用程式或條款方面的相關義務或責任；及
您確認並同意，在應用程式方面，商店供應商是本條款的第三方受益人。
16.9 Apple App Store
。本節適用於從 Apple App Store 取得的應用程式。您確認並同意本條款僅由您與我們而非 Apple, Inc.（「Apple」）之間訂立，並且 Apple 對應用程式或其內容不負任何責任。您使用應用程式時，必須遵守應用程式商店的服務條款。
您確認 Apple 沒有任何義務提供與應用程式相關的任何維護和支援服務。若應用程式未能符合任何適用保證，您可以通知 Apple，（在適用情況下）Apple 將退還應用程式購買費用給您；在適用法律允許的最大範圍內，Apple 對應用程式不負其他保證義務，而因未能遵守任何保證而產生的任何其他索償、損失、負債、損壞、成本或費用將僅受條款和作為應用程式供應商適用於我們的任何法律所約束。
您確認 Apple 不負責處理您或任何第三方就應用程式或您擁有和／或使用應用程式而提出的任何索償，包括但不限於：(i) 產品責任索償；(ii) 應用程式未能符合任何適用法律或規例要求的任何主張；及 (iii) 因消費者保護或類似法律而產生的索償；且所有此等索償僅受本條款及適用於作為軟件供應商的我們的任何法律管轄。
您確認，倘若任何第三方聲稱應用程式或您擁有和使用該等應用程式侵犯該第三方的知識產權，則 TFH 而非 Apple 將全權負責調查、辯護、和解和履行本條款所要求的任何此類知識產權侵犯索償。
您聲明並保證 (i) 您並非位於美國政府禁運的國家／地區，或美國政府指定為「支持恐怖主義支持」的國家／地區；以及 (ii) 您並無列入任何美國政府禁止方或限制方名單。
您和 TFH 確認並同意，Apple 和 Apple 的附屬公司是與您應用程式授權相關服務條款的第三方受益人，並且在您接受服務條款的條款和條件後，Apple 將有權（並將被視為已接受該權利）以第三方受益人的身分對您執行與您應用程式授權相關的服務條款。
TFHUSERTOS20241017 - AT
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Tools for Humanity Privacy Notice
Thank you for choosing to be part of the Worldcoin Community! Worldcoin is an open-source protocol, supported by a global community of developers, individuals, and other contributors.
This Privacy Notice covers the data you provide to us through your use of our websites, applications (“App”), and other services linked to this Privacy Notice (collectively, the “Services”). This Privacy Notice is incorporated into and governed by the
User Terms and Conditions
(“User Terms”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), along with its German subsidiary Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; together, “
TFH
” or “
we
,” “
us
”), is contributing to the development and growth of the Worldcoin protocol (“Worldcoin”) but is different from the Worldcoin Foundation that controls the Orb related data processing.
1. Controller
We are the data controller of all “World App Data”, “Credential Verification Data” and other “Business Data”: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH is established in the European Union (“
EU
”) through Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“World App Data” means all personal data collected and processed through your use of the World App, as defined further in Section 5 below, except any personal data related to your use of the Worldcoin protocol or the Worldcoin tokens (such as your wallet address and the transactional data, which we do not control).
Credential Verification Data refers to the data processed when verifying a credential to add it to your self-custodial World ID. This means e.g. reading the NFC chip of your passport to securely store your passport’s information on your device. This data is under your control and after verifying the validity of your credential, TFH stores an anonymized fragment of a hash value of a unique cryptographic signature of your credential (e.g. passport) to ensure that each credential can only be added to a World ID once.
“Business data” means all personal data collected and processed through other means by our company when communicating or any other way working or interacting with us via email, video conferencing or our websites. For data processing in the context of the Orb App please refer to the Orb App Privacy Notice linked in the Orb App. For data processing in the context of dedicated data collection and testing  please refer to the respective Collection and Testing Privacy Notice linked in your test app. For processing in the context of our website please refer to our Cookie Policy linked on our website.
2. Updates to this Privacy Notice
We update this Privacy Notice sometimes. If we make major changes, such as how we use your personal information, then we'll let you know via an email or a message in your App.
3. What is in this Privacy Notice?
Our commitment to protecting your privacy and data
Information we collect and why
How we use the data we collect
Where we process your data
When we share your data
How your data is recorded on public blockchain
How we use cookies
How long we keep your data
How this Privacy Notice differs for children and teens
The statutory rights you have
How to contact us about this Privacy Notice
4. Our Commitment to Protecting your Privacy and Data
We are deeply committed to protecting your privacy and securing your data. We recognize that we can only fulfill our mission of distributing our digital tokens fairly to as many people as possible if people trust us, and privacy and data security are central to earning your trust.
Privacy
We have designed our products and services with your privacy in mind. We collect data to improve our product and services. We will always tell you, here in this Privacy Notice or in data consent forms for specific products or services, what data we are collecting, why we are collecting that data, and what we do with it.
Data Security
We have a dedicated team to look after your data and have implemented physical and electronic safeguards that protect your data both in transit and at rest. At the same time, no service can be completely secure. If you have any concerns about your account or your data, please contact us through our
Request Portal
or write to us at Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA.
5. Information We Collect and Why
5.1 Data You Provide To Us
As a user, you are not required to provide any data to access the App. However, you may need to provide us with certain data in order to use a feature within the Services. The legal grounds for processing in the cases below are the user’s consent and the performance of a contract (our commitment to provide the Services). Below is a list of data that you may provide and what we may use the data for:
In the Context of World App:
Phone number.
You may choose to enter your phone number to associate it with your account. With your permission, other users may be able to find your account through your phone number. We may require a phone number when you submit a data subject request. The legal basis for processing this data is performance of the Service under the User Terms.
Username.
You may link a username to your wallet address and change the username at any time.
Date of Birth.
You may disclose your date of birth to ensure compliance with age restriction requirements. We will never store your data of birth but only a checksum of that data and whether you are over 18 years of age or not.
Feedback and correspondence from you.
These include any emails, chat messages, or other communications that you send us via email or third-party social media websites. This may include processing email addresses or social media profile names if you seek to communicate with us through such means. We may use a third-party service provider to facilitate surveys about your use of our Services. The legal basis for processing this data is performance of the Service under the User Terms.
Address book contacts.
You may provide the App with access to your address book to enable the feature that makes it easy for you to find and interact with other users who may be in your address book. The legal basis for processing this data is the legitimate interest of the subject to be found within the App and the interest of the sharing user to find her contacts in the App.
Please note:
You are responsible for ensuring that sharing your contacts’ information complies with applicable laws. This may require that you obtain your contacts’ permission and you shall not share with TFH any contact details from other people without their explicit consent. You can change your mind and turn off our access to your contacts at any time in your device settings. If you elect to import your device’s address book contacts to the App to find out which of your contacts uses our Services or invite them to join you in using our Services, we will periodically sync your contacts’ phone numbers to those numbers and corresponding wallet addresses provided by other users on our servers.
Location information
. You may decide to enable a location-based service (such as a feature allowing you to find an Orb Operator near you). Only with your specific consent, we may then collect information about your location through GPS to enable the location based service to show you an Orb near you. You can change your permissions any time in your device's settings. If you are not based in South Korea we may also store your approximate location disassociated from your World App account. We use this data to improve our services particularly but not limited to the selection of Orb locations.
P2P Marketplace
. If you use the P2P Marketplace Services (where available) that allow you to purchase digital tokens from other users, then we may collect additional information such as your wallet address, your contact information (i.e. your phone number), and your account number associated with the transaction (such as your M-PESA number). We log the transaction data as part of providing the P2P Marketplace Services. We may also collect additional information to comply with applicable KYC requirements.
Device metadata.
If you are using the App we are collecting metadata from your device to ensure that the App is functioning properly and that you are not infringing our Terms and Conditions. This includes collecting device identifiers and IP addresses.
Device World ID data.
We also process your device metadata to calculate a unique device fingerprint. The hash of this fingerprint serves as the signal that proves the uniqueness for your with a device World ID.
In the context of Business Data processing:
First and last name.
We may process your first and last name to pursue the legitimate interest of maintaining and administering a business relationship with you.
Email address.
You may also provide your email to subscribe to our mailing list to stay up-to-date with the Worldcoin project. We may require your email when you submit a data subject request. We may process your email address to pursue the legitimate interest of maintaining and administering a business relationship with you.
Phone number.
We may process your phone number to pursue the legitimate interest of maintaining and administering a business relationship with you.
Enterprise Data
. If you have a business relationship with us (such as if you are an Orb Operator or a supplier), then we may require information such as names, mailing address, email, phone number, wallet address, and other documentation (such as your government ID) as part of furthering that business relationship and to satisfy our know-your-customers obligations. We may use third-party services, such as Onfido, to help us collect and review the information and documentation above to satisfy the know-your-customers obligations.
Application data
. If you want to work for us you have to send us your application that includes your cover letter and CV as well as the personal information you wish to disclose.
You can find the legal base for processing for each of the data processing activities above detailed in
ANNEX I – Legal grounds for Tools for Humanity data processing activities
at the end of this privacy notice.
5.2 Data We Collect From Third-Party Sources
From time to time, we may obtain information about you from the following third-party sources:
Blockchain Data
. We may analyze public blockchain data to ensure parties utilizing our Services are not engaged in illegal or prohibited activity under the User Terms, and to analyze transaction trends for research and development purposes.
Identity Verification Services
. We may obtain information from third-party services using your data to verify your identity if required by law (such as applicable know-your-customer requirements). To clarify, we do
not
use your biometric data when we verify your identity as required by law.
Talent data bases
. We may collect data from various sources to make job offers to talented individuals.
5.3 Data We Collect Automatically
If permitted under applicable law, we may collect certain types of data automatically when you interact with our Services. This information helps us address customer support issues, improve the performance of the Services, provide you with a streamlined and personalized experience, and secure your Account credentials. Information collected automatically includes:
Online Identifiers:
Geo-location and tracking details (see above), computer or mobile phone operating system, web browser name and version, and IP addresses. In very limited cases these data are also fed into our fraud and illicit financial flow detection. They also serve to provide a stable and fraud-free experience of our software.
Usage Data:
Authentication data, security questions, and other data collected via cookies and similar technologies.
Cookies
: small data files stored on your hard drive or in-device memory that help us improve our Services and your experience, see which areas and features of our Services are popular, and count visits. For the legal basis processing those data please refer to our
Cookie Policy
where we explain the different kinds of cookies we are using.
Similarly, the App gathers information for troubleshooting and improvement. We use third-party services, such as Segment.io or PostHog, to view aggregated information about end user usage and interactions. Where possible, we take steps to minimize or mask the information sent to third parties (such as encoding the data).
5.4 Anonymized and Aggregated Data
Anonymization is a data processing technique that disqualifies data from being personal data since once anonymized the data can no longer be associated with a specific individual. Examples of anonymized data include:
Transaction data
Click-stream data
Performance metrics
Fraud indicators (although personal data is used for this purpose, too)
We also aggregate data, combining large amounts of information together so that it no longer identifies or references an individual. We use anonymized or aggregate data for our business purposes, such as understanding user needs and behaviors, improving our Services, conducting business intelligence and marketing, detecting security threats, and training our algorithms.
The legal basis for processing the above mentioned data is the legitimate interest of a functioning app or website, business insights and fraud prevention.
6. How We Use the Data We Collect
6.1 General description
We must have a valid reason (or “lawful basis for processing”) to use your personal information. In some cases, the use of your personal information does not require your prior consent. We use your data for the following purposes:
To provide and maintain our products and services under the User Terms. These services include:
The App where users can manage their World ID and digital tokens as well as learn about cryptocurrency in general and the Worldcoin project in specific;
The Operator App where Orb Operators can manage and oversee their Orbs under management and their statistics;
The P2P Marketplace where we connect users with agents (does not apply to users who are established or resident in Germany or have their habitual residence or registered office in Germany);
To improve and develop our products and services, including to debug and repair errors in our Services.
To conduct data science research.
To analyze your use of our Services to provide better support.
To enable you to publish information on a blockchain to prove your uniqueness.
To use your wallet address to send you digital tokens we support.
To comply with applicable law such as anti-money-laundering law and sanctions. This entails:
Using your IP address to block individuals whose country does not allow them to access the Services;
To answer data subject requests under the applicable data protection laws like requests for access or deletion;
Monitor potentially illicit financial flows e.g. from blacklisted wallets; and
To comply with applicable law such as regulations against illegal content.
To handle your customer service requests, complaints and inquiries.
To resolve disputes, troubleshooting issues, and enforcing our agreements with you, including this Privacy Notice and the User Terms.
To contact you regarding updates to the Services.
6.2 Credentials
TFH allows you to store certain credentials locally on your device to share them in the zero knowledge infrastructure of the World ID protocol (“Credentials”). In the context of Credentials we process this data in the following ways:
We check the validity of your credential (in the case of passports this works through your country's root certificate).
We authenticate you as the rightful holder of the credential (for passports this works locally on your device though a photo of your face (selfie) that is never stored).
We encrypt, sign and store your credential’s data in a secure environment on your device.
We never have access to the personal information contained on your credential.
You can then later selectively share this information with relying parties through the protections of the World ID protocol (e.g. you can prove that you are at least 18 years old without revealing your exact age or who you are).
For passports, TFH only maintains an anonymized shard of a hash value of a unique cryptographic signature of your passport to ensure that each passport can only be verified once.
This processing is based on your consent and we never get access to your personal data from your passport which is stored on your device. You can delete this data from your phone by deleting the World App.
6.3 World ID Data
Your World ID (i.e. the secret number required to use it) is stored on your device only (in case you have a backup there exists an encrypted copy in your backup). Neither TFH nor anyone else have access to your World ID. You can use your World ID anonymously. Each time you use World ID with a new application, the application only receives a disposable number (“Nullifier”) that does not reveal your World ID. This is enabled through Zero Knowledge Proofs (you only prove that you have a verified World ID but not which one) and ensures that your World ID cannot be used to trace you across applications. This means that World ID is not a general user ID for the internet.
World ID proofs function through an open protocol accessing a public Merkle Tree of the hashes of verified World IDs. World ID is not a centralized service but a protocol anyone can access. We offer APIs to facilitate access to the Merkle Tree and World ID Proofs but never receive any personal data in this context.
It is important to note that we also do not process any data related to your World ID that would allow us to identify you. All personal data processed in the context of World App particularly your wallet address and transaction data is deliberately designed to be delinked from World ID data.
7. Where We Process Your Data
7.1 Data Transfer.
When you provide us with your data, it may be transferred, stored, or processed in a location outside of where your data was originally collected. The country in which your data is transferred, stored, or processed may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the data.
We make the best efforts to adhere to the principles stated in each jurisdiction regarding privacy laws. We only share data with data processors outside of your jurisdiction if such a transfer is lawful and if we are confident that the data processor will protect your data as required under applicable laws and, further, in accordance with our standards.
7.2 Risks of Transfer
Below is a list of possible risks that may arise if we transfer your data to the United States, the European Union, or another country. Below we also summarize how we mitigate the respective risks.
While we do what we can to ensure that our subcontractors are contractually obligated to adequately protect your data, these subcontractors may not be subject to the data privacy law of your country. If the subcontractors were to illegally process your data without authorization, then it may be difficult to assert your privacy rights against that subcontractor. We mitigate this risk as we close strict data processing agreements with our subcontractors that oblige them to protect the data at a GDPR level and fulfill subjects’ requests.
It’s possible that the data privacy law in your country is inconsistent with the data privacy laws in the U.S. or in the E.U. We always try to adhere to the highest standard of data protection we are subject to.
It may be possible that your data will be subject to governmental access of officials and authorities. In those cases we have committed ourselves to challenge any invalid, overbroad, or unlawful governmental request to access in court. We further use advanced encryption to hinder unauthorized access.
Please note that this list contains examples, but may not include all possible risks to you.
7.3 Data Privacy Framework for US data transfers
TFH complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. TFH has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. TFH has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this Data Privacy Framework Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH is responsible for the processing of personal data it receives under the DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. TFH complies with the DPF Principles for all onward transfers of personal data from the EU, UK, and Switzerland, including the onward transfer liability provisions.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over TFH’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  In certain situations, TFH may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, TFH commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information.  EU and UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact TFH at dpo@worldcoin.org
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, TFH commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs)} and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC)} with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
For complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website.
8. When We Share Your Data
We will never sell your data
.
When we share your data outside of our organization, we will always:
Share it in a reasonably secure way;
Take steps to ensure that it is handled in a manner that is consistent with our commitment to your privacy; and
Prohibit other companies from using it for their own purposes.
We do share your data in these limited ways:
With Worldcoin Foundation:
we may act as Worldcoin Foundation processors for collecting personal data on behalf of Worldcoin (please check Worldcoin’s privacy notice for further information).
Within our organization:
We only disclose data to our team members who require access in order to perform their tasks and duties. We only disclose as much data as is needed to perform specific tasks and duties and have a system of strict access control.
With vendors and service providers outside of our organization:
We only disclose data to service providers whose services we rely on in order to process the data and provide our Services to you. We only disclose data with identity verification vendors if required by Law (i.e., know-your-customer requirements).
The categories of such service providers are:
Cloud service providers (all data types)
SaaS providers; we use SaaS products in the following categories:
Database and infrastructure management
Data security
Recruiting
Communication
Surveys
KYC/KYB i.e. checking official documents
Data subject request management
Technical support
User support
External experts
Specialist software developers
Legal specialists
Tax advisors
Banks
Labeling service providers (only under special safeguards)
Background check services for applicants and Orb Operators
With law enforcement, officials, or other third parties:
We may disclose your data in order to comply with applicable laws and respond to mandatory legal demands. We will carefully consider each request to determine whether the request complies with the law and, where appropriate, we may challenge invalid, overbroad, or unlawful requests. We may share personal data with police and other government authorities where we reasonably believe it to be necessary to comply with law, regulation or other legal process or obligation.
We may share your personal information if we believe that your actions are inconsistent with our User Terms, if we believe that you have violated the law, or if we believe it is necessary to protect our rights, property, and safety, our users, the public, or others.
We may share your personal information with our lawyers and other professional advisors where necessary to obtain advice or otherwise protect and manage our business interests.
We may share your personal information in connection with, or during negotiations concerning, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business by another company.
Data, including your personal information, may be shared between and among our current and future parents, affiliates, and subsidiaries and other companies under common control and ownership.
We may share your personal information with your consent or at your direction.
9. How Your Data is Recorded on Public Blockchain
Transaction information related to your use of our Services may be recorded on a public blockchain.
Please note:
Blockchains are public ledgers of transactions that are maintained on decentralized networks operated by third parties that are not controlled or operated by Worldcoin. Due to the public and immutable nature of blockchain ledgers, we cannot guarantee the ability to amend, erase, or control the disclosure of data that is uploaded and stored on a blockchain
10. How We Use Cookies
We use cookies to help our Services work better. In addition to cookies, we may use other similar technologies, like web beacons, to track users of our Services. Web beacons (also known as "clear gifs") are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies. Our
Cookie Policy
, incorporated herein by reference.
We also use Google Analytics. More information on how Google uses your data when you use its partners’ websites and applications:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. By using the Services, you consent to us storing and accessing cookies and other data on your computer or mobile device and the use of Google Analytics in connection with such activities. Please read the information at the link provided so you understand what you are consenting to.
11. How Long Do We Keep Your Data?
Unless applicable law stipulates otherwise, we retain your data for as long as is reasonably necessary to provide our Services to you, serve our legitimate business purposes, and comply with our legal and regulatory obligations. If you close your account with us, we will delete your account data within one month; otherwise we will delete your account data after 2 years of inactivity. If required by law, we will continue to retain your personal data as necessary to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations, including fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention, as well as tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations.
Please note:
Blockchains are decentralized third-party networks that we do not control or operate. Due to the public and immutable nature of blockchain technology, we cannot amend, erase, or control the disclosure of data that is stored on blockchains.
12. How this Privacy Notice Differs for Children and Teens
Individuals under the age of 18 are not allowed to use the Services, and we do not knowingly collect data from individuals under the age of 18. If you believe that your child under the age of 18 has gained access to the Services without your permission, please request the deletion of their data by contacting us through our
Request Portal
.
If we learn that we have collected data about a child under age 18, we will delete such data as quickly as possible. We have taken steps like implementing an automated age detection AI-model, instructions to operators and self-confirmations to restrict use of the Services to those who are at least 18 years old. We do not market products or services to children.
13. How to Contact us About this Privacy Notice
You may choose to delete your data from within the App under the Settings menu. If you have questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Notice, wish to exercise your rights, or to contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO), please submit your request through our
Request Portal
or write to us at Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA or
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. You can also delete your data from within the World App.
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not satisfactorily addressed, please contact the data protection regulator in your jurisdiction. If you reside in the EU, then you can find your data protection regulator
here
.
If you reside in Thailand, you may contact our local representative in Thailand, Tilleke & Gibbins Digital Solutions Co., Ltd., at No. 1011 Supalai Grand Tower, 20th-26th Floors, Rama 3 Road, Chongnonsi, Yannawa, Bangkok, 10120 Thailand or email at
digital@tilleke.com
.
14. Your Rights
These rights apply insofar as we can identify the requestor in our database and insofar as we do not violate other data subject's rights by exercising the requestor’s rights:
You have the right to obtain from us at any time upon request information about the personal data we process concerning you. You have the right to receive from us the personal data concerning you.
You have the right to demand that we immediately correct the personal data concerning you if it is incorrect.
You have the right to demand that we delete the personal data concerning you. These prerequisites provide in particular for a right to erasure if the personal data are no longer necessary for the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed, provided the requirements for deletion under the applicable laws are given (e.g. several jurisdiction’s laws oblige us to retain transaction information for a certain time period)
You have the right to freely withdraw your consent to any data processing based on consent or to object to the data processing if it is not based on consent.
15. ADDENDA
In the following, several addenda provide legally required information for the respective markets we operate in. This information forms part of the consent depending on the region the data subject resides in. This information might differ from your location’s information because we block certain services in certain jurisdictions. In case of any inconsistency with the above the more special statement about the particular jurisdiction prevails:
Addendum A: European Economic Area (“EEA”) and the United Kingdom (“UK”)
If you are in the EEA or the UK the following applies to you: You have at least the following rights You may have additional rights under General Data Protection Regulation, EU Regulation 2016/679 of 27.04.2016 (“GDPR”) as listed below. To exercise your rights available under GDPR, please contact us at our
Request Portal
. Apart from exceptional cases, we will resolve your request within the statutory deadline of one month. The use of the word GDPR in the following section also entails the UK-GDPR transposed into UK national law as the UK Data Protection Act of 2018 and retained as part of the law of England and Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland by virtue of
section 3
of the European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 and as amended by
Schedule
1
to the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 The statutory rights under GDPR
This section applies if the processing of your data falls under the GDPR’s scope of application (
e.g.
, if you are a resident of the EEA  or in the UK). You may have additional rights under GDPR as listed below. To exercise your rights available under GDPR, please contact us at our
Request Portal
.
You have the right to obtain from us at any time upon request information about the personal data we process concerning you within the scope of Art. 15 GDPR.
You have the right to demand that we immediately correct the personal data concerning you if it is incorrect.
You have the right, under the conditions described in Art. 17 GDPR, to demand that we delete the personal data concerning you. These prerequisites provide in particular for a right to erasure if the personal data are no longer necessary for the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed, as well as in cases of unlawful processing, the existence of an objection or the existence of an obligation to erase under Union law or the law of the Member State to which we are subject.
You have the right to demand that we restrict processing in accordance with Art. 18 GDPR.
You have the right to receive from us the personal data concerning you that you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format in accordance with Art. 20 GDPR.
You have the right to object at any time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of personal data concerning you which is carried out, inter alia, on the basis of Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, in accordance with Article 21 GDPR.
You have the right to contact the competent supervisory authority in the event of complaints about the data processing carried out by the controller. The responsible supervisory authority is: the Bavarian State Office for Data Protection Supervision (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
If the processing of personal data is based on your consent, you are entitled under Art. 7 GDPR to revoke your consent to the use of your personal data at any time with effect for the future, whereby the revocation is just as easy to declare as the consent itself. Please note that the revocation only takes effect for the future. Processing that took place before the revocation is not affected.
A.2 Data transfers
When transferring data to a country that does not have an adequacy decision, we utilize the EU Standard Contractual Clauses. We are currently only transferring personal data to the USA.
If the processing of personal data is based on your consent, you are entitled under Art. 7 GDPR to revoke your consent to the use of your personal data at any time with effect for the future, whereby the revocation is just as easy to declare as the consent itself. Please note that the revocation only takes effect for the future. Processing that took place before the revocation is not affected. Please also note that processing that is not based on consent is not affected by withdrawing the consent.
ADDENDUM B: JAPAN
If you reside in Japan, additionally, the following applies to you.
B1. Information Regarding the Japanese Regulations
We comply with Japanese laws and regulations, including the Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan (“APPI”).  This section applies to our handling of “personal information” as defined in the APPI in precedence to the other portions of this Biometric Data Consent Form
We comply with Japanese laws and regulations, including the Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan (“APPI”). This section applies to our handling of “personal information” as defined in the APPI in precedence to the other portions of this Privacy Notice.
B2. Data Sharing
Unless otherwise permitted by applicable laws, we do not disclose, sell, provide, share, or transfer your personal information to any third party.
B3. Security Control Measures
We take necessary and appropriate measures to prevent any leakage or loss of, or damage to, your personal information being handled, and to otherwise maintain the security of personal information, such as by establishing rules for the handling of personal information, regular monitoring of the handling of personal information, regular training of employees in the handling of personal information, prevention of theft or loss of equipment used to handle personal information, and implementation of access controls. We also appropriately supervise our contractors and employees who handle personal information. You can obtain further details about the security control measures in place in relation to the handling of your personal information by contacting us at our
Request Portal
.
B4. Reference Information on Processing Personal Data in Foreign Countries
Your personal data is processed in the EU and USA.
B5. The Statutory Rights under APPI
To exercise your rights provided under the APPI please contact us at our
Request Portal
.
ADDENDUM C: ARGENTINA
If you are domiciled in the Argentine Republic, we inform you that the AGENCY OF ACCESS TO PUBLIC INFORMATION, in its capacity as Control Agency of Law No. 25,326, has the power to hear complaints and claims filed by those whose rights are affected by non-compliance with the rules in force regarding personal data protection.
The Agency can be contacted as follows:
Address: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
Postal Code: C1067ABP
Phone number: (54-11) 3988-3968
E-mail: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADDENDUM D: SINGAPORE
If you are a resident of Singapore the following applies to you:
D1. Collection, use and disclosure of your personal data
If you are a resident of Singapore and with your consent, we will collect, use or otherwise disclose your personal data for each of the purposes as set out in our privacy notice. You may exercise your right to withdraw your consent at any time, but please note that we may not be able to continue providing our services to you depending on the nature and scope of your request. Please also note that withdrawing consent does not affect our right to continue to collect, use and disclose personal data where such collection, use and disclose without consent is permitted or required under applicable laws.[1]
D2. Exercise of your data subject rights
You may control the personal data that we have collected and exercise any of the rights by contacting us at our
Request Portal
. We aim to respond to your request as soon as we can, typically within 30 days. We will inform you in advance if we are not able to respond to your request within 30 days, or if we are not able to fulfill your request and the reasons.[2]
Where permitted by law, we may charge you an administrative fee to fulfill your request.
D3. Transfer of your personal data to other countries
If you are a resident of Singapore and we have collected your data, we may also transfer your data outside of Singapore from time to time. However, we will always ensure your personal data continues to receive a standard of protection that is at least comparable to that provided under the Singapore Personal Data Protection Act 2012, such as through the use of ASEAN Model Contractual Clauses.
ADDENDUM E – SOUTH KOREA
This Addendum for Korean Data Subjects explains our practices with respect to personal information we process in connection with your relationship with us where you are a Korean data subject.
E.1 –  Transfer of Personal Information
We provide personal information to or outsource the processing thereof to third parties as specified below:
- Provision of Personal Information to Third Parties
Name of Recipient
Purposes of use by recipient
Items of personal information provided to the recipient
Periods of retention by the recipient
Tools for Humanity GmbH
The purposes described in this notice in section 6 above.
The items described in this notice in section 5 above
The storage periods defined in this notice in section 11 above.
- Outsourcing of the Processing of Personal Information to Third Parties:
Please find a list of all outsourced data processing and the respective companies under this link:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
We may outsource the processing of your personal information and/or transfer your personal information for storing purposes to third parties located outside of Korea:
If you do not want to transfer your personal information overseas, you can refuse by not agreeing to the transfer of personal information, or by requesting us to stop the cross-border transfer, but if you refuse, you may not be able to use our services. The legal basis for the cross-border transfer of personal information above is the fact that it constitutes “outsourced processing or storage of personal information that is necessary for the conclusion and fulfillment of a contract with the data subject” and statutorily-prescribed matters have been disclosed in the privacy policy (Article 28-8(1)(iii) of the Personal Information Protection Act).
E.2 – Destruction of Personal Information
When personal information becomes unnecessary due to the expiration of the retention period or the achievement of the purpose of processing, etc., the personal information shall be destroyed without delay. The process and method for destruction are set forth below:
1) Destruction Process: We select certain items of personal information to be destroyed, and destroys them with the approval of the DPO.
2) Destruction Method: We destroy personal information recorded and stored in the form of electronic files by using a technical method (e.g., low level format) to ensure that the records may not be reproduced, while personal information recorded and stored in the form of paper documents would be shredded or incinerated.
E.3 – Storage of Personal Information
If we are required to retain your personal information in accordance with applicable laws, we will do so for the following purposes and periods as required by applicable laws.
E.4 – Your Rights
You may exercise your rights related to personal information against us, including a request for access to, modification or deletion of, or suspension of processing of, your personal information as provided by applicable law including the Personal Information Protection Act. You may also exercise your right of withdrawal of consent to collection/use/provision of personal information, right to portability, and rights relating to automated decision-making. Such rights may also be exercised through your legal representatives or other duly authorized persons.
You may exercise any applicable rights described above by contacting us at worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Security Measures
We will implement technical, organizational, and physical security measures prescribed by applicable Korean laws in order to protect personal information, such as those listed below:
1) Managerial measures: Designation of a Data Protection Officer, establishment and implementation of an internal management plan, regular training of employees on data protection, etc.;
2) Technical measures: Management of access authority to the personal information processing system, installation of an access control system, installation of security programs, etc.; and
3) Physical measures: Restriction of access to personal information storage facilities and equipment such as computer rooms and data storage rooms, etc.
E.6 – Contact Us
For questions or inquiries related to privacy and data protection, please contact our Data Protection Team  at
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ADDENDUM F – USA
The California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act, does not presently apply to us.
ADDENDUM G - BRAZIL
G.1 Applicable legislation, Controller and Operator
If you reside in Brazil, if your personal data was collected in Brazil, or if you use our Services in Brazil, the applicable legislation is the Law No. 13,709/2018 (General Data Protection Law, or “LGPD”).
G.2 Right to object
You have the right to object to the use of your personal data for purposes that do not depend on consent if the purpose is inconsistent with the LGPD. If your objection is upheld, we will no longer use your personal information to develop and improve the features and experiences of our Services.
Note that if you do not provide or do not allow the collection or processing of certain personal data, it may affect the quality of your experience, we may not be able to fulfill the objectives of our Services, or we may not be able to provide certain Services to you.
In some cases, your data is anonymized, meaning it no longer identifies you. You cannot object to the use of anonymized data because it does not allow for your identification, as provided for in the LGPD. We use this anonymized data to improve our products and services.
G.3 The statutory rights under LGPD
According to the LGPD, you have the right to confirm the existence of processing, access, rectification, or request the portability of data processed. Moreover, you can request information of public and private entities with which we jointly use your personal data. You can also request information regarding the possibility of not giving consent and the negative consequences, and request the deletion of data processed with consent. You can choose the deletion of your information in the World App in the Settings menu.
Under certain circumstances, you have the right to object to or restrict how we process your personal data, or to withdraw your consent, which we rely on to process the information you provide.
You can exercise your rights under the LGPD by submitting a request to our DPO using the contact details in section H.4 below or through our online request portal. If you feel that your rights have not been adequately addressed, you can file a complaint with the Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) by completing the form available at this link:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 International Transfer of Your Personal Data
If the LGPD applies to you, and we have collected your personal data, we may also transfer it outside of the country. However, we will always ensure that your personal data is only transferred to foreign countries or international organizations that provide a level of protection adequate to that provided for in the LGPD, as recognized in adequacy decisions issued by the ANPD. In the absence of an adequacy decision, we will continue to follow a standard of protection that is at least equivalent to that provided for in the LGPD using Standard Contractual Clauses established in the ANPD's regulations or when we obtain your specific and highlighted consent for the international transfer.
ANNEX I – Legal grounds/purposes for Tools for Humanity data processing activities
Users
Why we Process the Data
What Personal Data is Processed
Legal Ground for the Processing
Retention Period
To create your account in World App
Wallet address, metadata, username
Performance of contract
Duration of the use of the services or until you request the deletion of the data.
To ensure you are of eligible age
Date of birth
Legal obligation
Your exact date of birth is never stored. We only store whether you are 18. We store this information for the duration of the use of the services or until you request the deletion of the data.
To optionally allow your contacts to easily communicate and transact with you
Phone number
Consent
Duration of the use of the services or until you request the deletion of the data.
To enable you to easily communicate and transact with your contacts
Address book contacts
Consent
Duration of the use of the services or until you request the deletion of the data.
To optionally show you Orbs near you
Location information
Consent
Up to 24 months.
To prevent fraud in the context of account prevention
Metadata, IP address, Device ID
Legitimate interest, namely the interest to prevent certain types of fraud (LIST OF TYPES)
Up to 24 months.
To ensure the service is permitted in your country
IP address, location information
Legal obligation
Up to 24 months.
To display your self-custodial wallet and provide an interface for wallet transactions
Wallet address, transaction data
Performance of contract
No personal data is stored in this context.
To display your self-custodial World ID and provide an interface for verifications
World ID information
Performance of contract
No personal data is stored in this context.
To display your self-custodial  Credentials and provide an interface for sharing the Credentials
Credential information, credential validity information
Performance of contract
No personal data is stored in this context.
To analyze and improve our services and to conduct data science research
Usage data and metadata, public transaction data
Consent
Up to 24 months.
To comply with applicable laws such as anti-money laundering law, and sanctions
Transaction data, wallet address
Legal obligation
Duration of the use of the services.
To comply with applicable laws such as content regulations
Miniapp Content
Legal obligation
Duration of the use of the services.
To enable communication and marketing
Email address, push notifications
Legitimate interest
Up to 24 months.
Correspondence from you
Legitimate interest
Up to 24 months.
Feedback from you
Legitimate interest
Up to 24 months.
To handle your customer service requests, complaints and inquiries.
Communication information and email or social media profile name  if you seek to communicate with us through such means
Performance of contract
To make sure the app is running smoothly for you
Metadata
Performance of contract
Up to 24 months.
To verify your device
Device World ID data (device fingerprint)
Performance of contract
Duration of the use of the services.
To resolve disputes, troubleshooting issues, and enforcing our agreements with you, including this Privacy Notice and the User Terms.
Duration of the use of the services.
Business partners
Why we Process the Data
What Personal Data is Processed
Legal Ground for the Processing
Retention Period
Communication
Phone number, email address, Name
Legitimate interests, i.e. the interest to communicate with business partners.
Duration of the business relationship or until you request the deletion of the data.
Maintaining and administering a business relationship
Phone number, email address, Name, enterprise data
Legitimate interests i.e. the interest to maintaining and administering a business relationship with business partners.
Duration of the business relationship or until you request the deletion of the data.
Fulfill KYC obligations
Passport data, Enterprise data
Legal obligation
Duration of the business relationship and up to 3 years after termination.
To process your application
Application data
Consent and steps at the request of the data subject prior to entering into a contract.
Up to 3 months by default or longer if you agree to be part of a talent pool.
TFHPS20241017a
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Datenschutzerklärung von Tools for Humanity
Vielen Dank, dass Sie sich entschieden haben, Teil der Worldcoin-Community zu sein! Worldcoin ist ein Open-Source-Protokoll, das von einer globalen Gemeinschaft von Entwicklern, Einzelpersonen und anderen Mitwirkenden unterstützt wird.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung bezieht sich auf die Daten, die Sie uns durch die Nutzung unserer Websites, Anwendungen („App“) und anderer mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung verknüpfter Dienste (zusammen die „Dienste“) zur Verfügung stellen. Diese Datenschutzerklärung wird in die
Nutzungsbedingungen
(“Nutzungsbedingungen”) einbezogen und unterliegt diesen. Die Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”) trägt zusammen mit ihrer deutschen Tochtergesellschaft Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; zusammen “
TFH
” oder “
wir
”, “
uns
”) zur Entwicklung und zum Wachstum des Worldcoin-Protokolls (“Worldcoin”) bei, unterscheidet sich jedoch von der Worldcoin Foundation, die die Datenverarbeitung im Zusammenhang mit Orb kontrolliert.
1. Verantwortlicher
Wir sind der Datenverantwortliche für alle “World-App-Daten”, “Daten zur Ausweisüberprüfung” und andere “Geschäftsdaten”: Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH ist über die Tools for Humanity GmbH in der Europäischen Union (“
EU
”) niedergelassen.
“World App-Daten” bezeichnet alle personenbezogenen Daten, die durch Ihre Nutzung der World App erfasst und verarbeitet werden, wie in Abschnitt 5 weiter unten definiert, mit Ausnahme von personenbezogenen Daten im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Nutzung des Worldcoin-Protokolls oder der Worldcoin-Token (wie Ihre Wallet-Adresse und die Transaktionsdaten, die nicht unter unserer Kontrolle stehen).
Daten zur Ausweisüberprüfung beziehen sich auf die Daten, die bei der Überprüfung eines Ausweisdokuments verarbeitet werden, um sie Ihrer World ID zur Selbstverwahrung hinzuzufügen. Dies bedeutet z. B. das Auslesen des NFC-Chips in Ihrem Reisepass, um Ihre Passdaten sicher auf Ihrem Gerät zu speichern. Diese Daten unterliegen Ihrer Kontrolle und nach der Überprüfung der Gültigkeit Ihrer Ausweisdaten speichert TFH ein anonymisiertes Fragment eines Hash-Werts einer eindeutigen kryptographischen Signatur Ihrer Ausweisdaten (z. B. Reisepass), um sicherzustellen, dass jedes Ausweisdokument nur einmal zu einer World ID hinzugefügt werden kann.
“Geschäftsdaten” sind alle personenbezogenen Daten, die von unserem Unternehmen bei der Kommunikation oder sonstigen Zusammenarbeit oder Interaktion mit uns per E-Mail, Videokonferenz oder über unsere Websites erfasst und auf andere Weise verarbeitet werden. Informationen zur Datenverarbeitung im Zusammenhang mit der Orb App finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung der Orb App, die in der Orb App verlinkt ist. Informationen zur Datenverarbeitung im Zusammenhang mit der dedizierten Datenerhebung und -prüfung finden Sie in der jeweiligen Datenschutzerklärung für die Erhebung und Prüfung, die in Ihrer Test-App verlinkt ist. Für die Verarbeitung im Zusammenhang mit unserer Website lesen Sie bitte unsere Cookie-Richtlinie, die auf unserer Website verlinkt ist.
2. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir aktualisieren diese Datenschutzerklärung bisweilen. Wenn wir größere Änderungen vornehmen, wie z. B. dahingehend, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, werden wir Sie per E-Mail oder mittels einer Nachricht in Ihrer App darüber informieren.
3. Was ist in dieser Datenschutzerklärung enthalten?
Unser Engagement für den Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre und Daten
Welche Informationen wir erheben und weshalb wir diese erheben
Wie wir die erhobenen Daten verwenden
Wo wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten
Wann wir Ihre Daten weitergeben
Wie Ihre Daten in der öffentlichen Blockchain aufgezeichnet werden
Wie wir Cookies verwenden
Wie lange wir Ihre Daten aufbewahren
Wie sich diese Datenschutzerklärung für Kinder und Jugendliche unterscheidet
Ihre gesetzlichen Rechte
Wie Sie uns bezüglich dieser Datenschutzerklärung kontaktieren können
4. Unser Engagement für den Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre und Daten
Wir engagieren uns intensiv für den Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer Daten. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass wir unsere Mission, unsere digitalen Tokens gerecht an so viele Menschen wie möglich zu verteilen, nur erfüllen können, wenn man uns vertraut, und Datenschutz und Datensicherheit sind für Ihr Vertrauen von zentraler Bedeutung.
Datenschutz
Wir haben unsere Produkte und Dienste unter Berücksichtigung Ihrer Privatsphäre entwickelt. Wir erheben Daten, um unsere Produkte und Dienste zu verbessern. Wir werden Ihnen hier in dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder in Dateneinwilligungserklärungen für bestimmte Produkte oder Dienste immer mitteilen, welche Daten wir erheben, warum wir diese Daten erheben und was wir mit diesen tun.
Datensicherheit
Wir haben ein engagiertes Team, das sich um Ihre Daten kümmert, und wir verfügen über physische und elektronische Garantien, um Ihre Daten sowohl während der Übertragung als auch im Ruhezustand zu schützen. Gleichzeitig kann kein Dienst vollkommen sicher sein. Wenn Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihres Kontos oder Ihrer Daten haben, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte über unser
Anfrageportal
oder schreiben Sie uns an Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA.
5. Welche Informationen wir erheben und weshalb wir diese erheben
5.1 Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen
Als Benutzer müssen Sie keine Daten angeben, um auf die App zuzugreifen. Sie müssen uns jedoch möglicherweise bestimmte Daten zur Verfügung stellen, um eine Funktion innerhalb der Dienste nutzen zu können. Die Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung in den nachfolgenden Fällen sind die Einwilligung des Benutzers und die Erfüllung eines Vertrags (unsere Verpflichtung zur Bereitstellung der Dienste). Unten finden Sie eine Liste der Daten, die Sie uns möglicherweise zur Verfügung stellen, und wofür wir diese Daten verwenden können:
Im Zusammenhang mit der World App:
Telefonnummer.
Sie können Ihre Telefonnummer eingeben, um sie mit Ihrem Konto zu verknüpfen. Mit Ihrer Erlaubnis können andere Benutzer Ihr Konto über Ihre Telefonnummer finden. Wir können Ihre Telefonnummer verlangen, wenn Sie eine Anfrage als betroffene Person stellen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist die Bereitstellung des Dienstes gemäß den Nutzungsbedingungen.
Benutzername.
Sie können einen Benutzernamen mit Ihrer Wallet-Adresse verknüpfen und den Benutzernamen jederzeit ändern.
Geburtsdatum.
Sie können Ihr Geburtsdatum angeben, sodass die Einhaltung der Altersbeschränkungen sichergestellt ist. Wir speichern niemals Ihr Geburtsdatum, sondern nur eine Prüfsumme dieser Daten und ob Sie über 18 Jahre alt sind oder nicht.
Feedback und Korrespondenz von Ihnen.
Dazu gehören alle E-Mails, Chat-Nachrichten oder andere Mitteilungen, die Sie uns per E-Mail oder über Social-Media-Websites von Drittanbietern senden. Dies kann die Verarbeitung von E-Mail-Adressen oder Profilnamen der sozialen Medien umfassen, wenn Sie versuchen, mit uns auf diese Weise zu kommunizieren. Wir können einen Drittanbieter einsetzen, um Umfragen über die Nutzung unserer Dienste durchzuführen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist die Bereitstellung des Dienstes gemäß den Nutzungsbedingungen.
Adressbuch-Kontakte.
Sie können der App Zugriff auf Ihr Adressbuch gewähren, um die Funktion zu aktivieren, die es Ihnen erleichtert, andere Benutzer, die sich möglicherweise in Ihrem Adressbuch befinden, zu finden und mit ihnen zu interagieren. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist das berechtigte Interesse der betroffenen Person, in der App gefunden zu werden, und das Interesse des teilenden Benutzers, seine Kontakte in der App zu finden.
Bitte beachten Sie Folgendes:
Sie sind dafür verantwortlich, dass die Weitergabe Ihrer Kontaktdaten den geltenden Gesetzen entspricht. Dies kann erfordern, dass Sie die Erlaubnis Ihrer Kontaktpersonen einholen, und Sie dürfen keine Kontaktdaten von anderen Personen ohne deren ausdrückliche Einwilligung an TFH weitergeben. Sie können jederzeit Ihre Meinung ändern und unseren Zugriff auf Ihre Kontakte in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts deaktivieren. Wenn Sie die Adressbuchkontakte Ihres Geräts in die App importieren möchten, um herauszufinden, welche Ihrer Kontakte unsere Dienste nutzen, oder sie einladen möchten, sich Ihnen bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste anzuschließen, synchronisieren wir regelmäßig die Telefonnummern Ihrer Kontakte mit diesen Nummern und entsprechenden Wallet-Adressen, die von anderen Benutzern auf unseren Servern bereitgestellt werden.
Standortinformationen
. Sie können sich entscheiden, einen standortbasierten Dienst zu aktivieren (z. B. eine Funktion, mit der Sie einen Orb Operator in Ihrer Nähe finden können). Nur mit Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung können wir dann über GPS Informationen über Ihren Standort sammeln, damit der standortbezogene Dienst Ihnen einen Orb in Ihrer Nähe anzeigen kann. Sie können Ihre Berechtigungen jederzeit in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts ändern. Wenn Sie nicht in Südkorea ansässig sind, können wir Ihren ungefähren Standort auch getrennt von Ihrem World App-Konto speichern. Wir verwenden diese Daten, um unsere Dienstleistungen zu verbessern, insbesondere, aber nicht beschränkt auf die Auswahl von Orb-Standorten.
P2P Marketplace
. Wenn Sie die P2P Marketplace Services (sofern verfügbar) nutzen, die es Ihnen ermöglichen, digitale Tokens von anderen Benutzern zu kaufen, können wir zusätzliche Informationen wie Ihre Wallet-Adresse, Ihre Kontaktinformationen (d. h. Ihre Telefonnummer) und Ihre mit der Transaktion verbundene Kontonummer (wie Ihre M-PESA-Nummer) erheben. Wir protokollieren die Transaktionsdaten im Rahmen der Bereitstellung der P2P Marketplace Services. Wir können auch zusätzliche Informationen erheben, um die geltenden KYC-Anforderungen zu erfüllen.
Gerätemetadaten.
Wenn Sie die App nutzen, erfassen wir Metadaten von Ihrem Gerät, um sicherzustellen, dass die App ordnungsgemäß funktioniert und dass Sie nicht gegen unsere Geschäftsbedingungen verstoßen. Dazu gehört das Erfassen von Gerätekennungen und IP-Adressen.
World-ID-Daten des Geräts.
Wir verarbeiten außerdem Ihre Geräte-Metadaten, um einen eindeutigen Geräte-Fingerabdruck zu berechnen. Der Hash dieses Fingerabdrucks dient als Nachweis für die Einzigartigkeit Ihres Geräts mit einer World ID.
Im Rahmen der Geschäftsdatenverarbeitung:
Vor- und Nachname.
Wir können Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen verarbeiten, um das berechtigte Interesse an der Pflege und Verwaltung einer Geschäftsbeziehung mit Ihnen zu verfolgen.
E-Mail-Adresse.
Sie können Ihre E-Mail-Adresse auch angeben, um unsere Mailingliste zu abonnieren und über das Worldcoin-Projekt auf dem Laufenden zu bleiben. Wir können Ihre E-Mail verlangen, wenn Sie eine Anfrage als betroffene Person stellen. Wir können Ihre E-Mail-Adresse verarbeiten, um das berechtigte Interesse an der Pflege und Verwaltung einer Geschäftsbeziehung mit Ihnen zu verfolgen.
Telefonnummer.
Wir können Ihre Telefonnummer verarbeiten, um das berechtigte Interesse an der Pflege und Verwaltung einer Geschäftsbeziehung mit Ihnen zu verfolgen.
Unternehmensdaten
. Wenn Sie eine Geschäftsbeziehung mit uns haben (z. B. wenn Sie ein Orb Operator oder Lieferant sind), benötigen wir möglicherweise Informationen wie Namen, Postanschrift, E-Mail-Adresse, Telefonnummer, Wallet-Adresse und andere Dokumente (z. B. Ihre behördliche Identifikationsnummer), um diese Geschäftsbeziehung zu fördern und unsere Verpflichtungen aufgrund von Kundenidentitätsanforderungen (Know Your Customer) zu erfüllen. Wir können Drittanbieterdienste wie Onfido nutzen, um die oben genannten Informationen und Dokumente zu erheben und zu überprüfen, damit wir die Kundenidentitätsanforderungen erfüllen.
Bewerbungsdaten
. Wenn Sie für uns arbeiten möchten, müssen Sie uns Ihre Bewerbung mit Ihrem Anschreiben und Lebenslauf sowie die personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie offenlegen möchten, zusenden.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung der oben genannten Datenverarbeitungsaktivitäten finden Sie in
ANHANG I – Rechtliche Gründe für die Datenverarbeitungsaktivitäten von Tools for Humanity
am Ende dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
5.2 Daten, die wir aus Drittquellen erheben
Von Zeit zu Zeit können wir Informationen über Sie von den folgenden Drittquellen erhalten:
Blockchain-Daten
. Wir können öffentliche Blockchain-Daten analysieren, um sicherzustellen, dass Parteien, die unsere Dienste nutzen, keine illegalen oder verbotenen Handlungen im Sinne der Nutzungsbedingungen ausführen, und um Transaktionstrends für Forschungs- und Entwicklungszwecke zu analysieren.
Identitätsüberprüfungsdienste
. Wir können Informationen von Drittanbietern einholen, die Ihre Daten zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität verwenden, sofern dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist (wie im Fall von einschlägigen Kundenidentitätsanforderungen). Zur Klarstellung: Wir verwenden Ihre biometrischen Daten
nicht
, wenn wir wie gesetzlich vorgeschrieben Ihre Identität verifizieren.
Talent-Datenbanken
. Wir können Daten aus verschiedenen Quellen erheben, um talentierten Personen Stellenangebote zu unterbreiten.
5.3 Daten, die wir automatisch erheben
Soweit dies nach geltendem Recht zulässig ist, können wir bestimmte Arten von Daten automatisch erheben, wenn Sie mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Informationen helfen uns, Probleme beim Kundensupport zu lösen, die Leistung der Dienste zu verbessern, Ihnen ein optimiertes und personalisiertes Erlebnis zu bieten und Ihre Kontozugangsdaten zu sichern. Zu den automatisch erfassten Informationen gehören:
Online-Kennungen:
Geostandort- und Tracking-Daten (siehe oben), Betriebssystem des Computers oder Mobiltelefons, Name und Version des Webbrowsers sowie IP-Adressen. In sehr begrenzten Fällen fließen diese Daten auch in unsere Funktion zur Erkennung von Betrug und illegalen Finanzströmen ein. Sie dienen auch dazu, eine stabile und betrugsfreie Nutzung unserer Software zu gewährleisten.
Nutzungsdaten:
Authentifizierungsdaten, Sicherheitsfragen und andere Daten, die über Cookies und ähnliche Technologien erhoben werden.
Cookies
: kleine Datendateien, die auf Ihrer Festplatte oder in Ihrem geräteinternen Speicher gespeichert sind und uns helfen, unsere Dienste und Ihre Erfahrung zu verbessern, zu sehen, welche Bereiche und Funktionen unserer Dienste beliebt sind, und Besuche zu zählen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung dieser Daten entnehmen Sie bitte unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie,
in der wir die verschiedenen Arten von Cookies erklären, die wir verwenden.
Ebenso erfasst die App Informationen zur Fehlerbehebung und Verbesserung. Wir nutzen Drittanbieterdienste wie Segment.io oder PostHog, um aggregierte Informationen über die Nutzung und Interaktionen von Endbenutzern anzuzeigen. Wenn möglich, ergreifen wir Maßnahmen, um die an Dritte gesendeten Informationen zu minimieren oder zu verbergen (wie z. B. durch Verschlüsselung der Daten).
5.4 Anonymisierte und aggregierte Daten
Bei der Anonymisierung handelt es sich um eine Datenverarbeitungstechnik, bei der Daten nicht mehr als personenbezogene Daten gelten, da die Daten nach der Anonymisierung nicht mehr mit einer bestimmten Person in Verbindung gebracht werden können. Beispiele für anonymisierte Daten sind:
Transaktionsdaten
Click-Stream-Daten
Leistungskennzahlen
Betrugsindikatoren (obwohl personenbezogene Daten auch zu diesem Zweck verwendet werden)
Wir fassen außerdem Daten zusammen, d. h. wir kombinieren große Mengen an Informationen, so dass sie keine Einzelperson mehr identifizieren oder referenzieren können. Wir verwenden anonymisierte oder zusammengefasste Daten für unsere Geschäftszwecke, z. B. um die Bedürfnisse und das Verhalten der Benutzer zu verstehen, unsere Dienste zu verbessern, Geschäftsanalysen und Marketing durchzuführen, Sicherheitsbedrohungen zu erkennen und unsere Algorithmen zu trainieren.
Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung der oben genannten Daten ist das berechtigte Interesse an einer funktionierenden App oder Website, Geschäftserkenntnisse und Betrugsprävention.
6. Wie wir die erhobenen Daten verwenden
6.1 Allgemeine Beschreibung
Wir müssen einen triftigen Grund (oder eine „rechtliche Grundlage für die Verarbeitung“) haben, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu verwenden. In einigen Fällen ist für die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten Ihre vorherige Einwilligung nicht erforderlich. Wir verwenden Ihre Daten für die folgenden Zwecke:
zur Bereitstellung und Wartung unserer Produkte und Dienste gemäß den Nutzungsbedingungen. Zu diesen Diensten gehören:
die App, in der Benutzer ihre World ID und digitale Token verwalten und mehr über Kryptowährung im Allgemeinen und das Worldcoin-Projekt im Besonderen erfahren können;
die Operator App, in der Orb Operators ihre verwalteten Orbs und ihre Statistiken verwalten und beobachten können;
der P2P-Marktplatz, auf dem wir Nutzer mit Vermittlern zusammenbringen (gilt nicht für Nutzer, die in Deutschland niedergelassen oder wohnhaft sind oder ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt oder Geschäftssitz in Deutschland haben);
zur Verbesserung und Entwicklung unserer Produkte und Dienste, einschließlich der Fehlerbehebung und Reparatur von Fehlern in unseren Diensten;
zur Durchführung von datenwissenschaftlichen Forschungen;
um zu analysieren, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, damit wir einen besseren Support bieten können;
damit Sie Informationen in einer Blockchain veröffentlichen können, um Ihre Einzigartigkeit zu beweisen;
um Ihre Wallet-Adresse zu verwenden, um Ihnen digitale Token zu senden;
zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, wie z. B. Gesetze zur Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und zugehörigen Sanktionen. Dies beinhaltet:
die Verwendung Ihrer IP-Adresse, um Personen zu sperren, deren Land ihnen den Zugriff auf die Dienste nicht gestattet;
die Beantwortung von Anfragen betroffener Personen nach den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen, wie z. B. Anfragen wegen Auskunft oder Löschung;
die Überwachung potenziell illegaler Finanzströme, z. B. aus Wallets aus der schwarzen Liste; und
zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, wie z. B. Vorschriften gegen illegale Inhalte.
zur Bearbeitung Ihrer Kundendienstanfragen, Beschwerden und Anfragen.
zur Beilegung von Streitigkeiten, Behebung von Problemen und Durchsetzung unserer Vereinbarungen mit Ihnen, einschließlich dieser Datenschutzerklärung und der Nutzungsbedingungen.
Um Sie über Aktualisierungen der Dienste zu informieren.
6.2 Ausweisdokumente
TFH ermöglicht es Ihnen, bestimmte Ausweisdokumente lokal auf Ihrem Gerät zu speichern, um sie in der Zero-Knowledge-Infrastructure des World ID-Protokolls (“Ausweisdokumente”) zu teilen. Im Zusammenhang mit Ausweisdokumenten verarbeiten wir diese Daten auf folgende Weise:
Wir überprüfen die Gültigkeit Ihres Ausweisdokuments (im Falle von Reisepässen funktioniert dies über das Stammzertifikat Ihres Landes).
Wir authentifizieren Sie als rechtmäßigen Inhaber der Ausweisdokuments (für Reisepässe funktioniert dies lokal auf Ihrem Gerät durch ein Foto Ihres Gesichts (Selfie), das niemals gespeichert wird).
Wir verschlüsseln, signieren und speichern die Daten Ihres Ausweisdokuments in einer sicheren Umgebung auf Ihrem Gerät.
Wir haben keinen Zugang zu den personenbezogenen Daten auf Ihrem Ausweis.
Später können Sie diese Informationen durch den Schutz des World ID-Protokolls selektiv an vertrauenswürdige Parteien weitergeben (z. B. können Sie nachweisen, dass Sie mindestens 18 Jahre alt sind, ohne Ihr genaues Alter oder Ihre Identität preiszugeben).
Für Reisepässe speichert die TFH nur einen anonymisierten Shard eines Hash-Wertes einer eindeutigen kryptografischen Signatur Ihres Reisepasses, um sicherzustellen, dass jeder Reisepass nur einmal verifiziert werden kann.
Diese Verarbeitung basiert auf Ihrer Einwilligung und wir erhalten niemals Zugriff auf die personenbezogenen Daten aus Ihrem Reisepass, die auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind. Sie können diese Daten von Ihrem Telefon löschen, indem Sie die World App löschen.
6.3 World ID-Daten
Ihre World ID (d. h. die geheime Nummer, die für die Verwendung erforderlich ist) wird nur auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert (falls Sie ein Backup haben, gibt es eine verschlüsselte Kopie in Ihrem Backup). Weder TFH noch andere Personen haben Zugriff auf Ihre World ID. Sie können Ihre World ID anonym verwenden. Jedes Mal, wenn Sie World ID mit einer neuen Anwendung verwenden, erhält die Anwendung nur eine Einwegnummer (“Nullifizierer”), die Ihre World ID nicht offenlegt. Dies wird durch Zero-Knowledge-Proofs ermöglicht (Sie beweisen nur, dass Sie eine verifizierte World ID haben, aber nicht welche) und stellt sicher, dass Ihre World ID nicht verwendet werden kann, um Sie über Anwendungen hinweg zu verfolgen. Das bedeutet, dass die World ID keine allgemeine Benutzerkennung für das Internet ist.
World ID-Proofs funktionieren über ein offenes Protokoll, das auf einen öffentlichen Merkle-Baum der Hashes verifizierter World IDs zugreift. World ID ist kein zentralisierter Dienst, sondern ein Protokoll, auf das jeder zugreifen kann. Wir bieten APIs an, um den Zugriff auf den Merkle-Baum und World ID-Proofs zu ermöglichen, erhalten jedoch in diesem Zusammenhang niemals personenbezogene Daten.
Es ist wichtig zu beachten, dass wir auch keine Daten im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer World ID verarbeiten, die es uns ermöglichen würden, Sie zu identifizieren. Alle personenbezogenen Daten, die im Zusammenhang mit der World App verarbeitet werden, insbesondere Ihre Wallet-Adresse und Transaktionsdaten, sind bewusst von den World ID-Daten abgekoppelt.
7. Wo wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten
7.1 Datenübermittlung.
Wenn Sie uns Ihre Daten zur Verfügung stellen, können diese an einen anderen Ort als demjenigen, an dem Ihre Daten ursprünglich erhoben wurden, übermittelt werden oder dort gespeichert oder verarbeitet werden. In dem Land, in das Ihre Daten übermittelt werden oder in dem diese gespeichert oder verarbeitet werden, gibt es möglicherweise nicht die gleichen Datenschutzgesetze wie in dem Land, in dem Sie die Daten ursprünglich bereitgestellt haben.
Wir bemühen uns nach besten Kräften, die in den einzelnen Ländern geltenden Grundsätze zum Datenschutz einzuhalten. Wir geben Daten nur dann an Datenverarbeiter außerhalb Ihrer Gerichtsbarkeit weiter, wenn eine solche Übertragung rechtmäßig ist und wir sicher sind, dass der Datenverarbeiter Ihre Daten gemäß den geltenden Gesetzen und darüber hinaus in Übereinstimmung mit unseren Standards schützt.
7.2 Übermittlungsrisiken
Nachstehend finden Sie eine Liste möglicher Risiken, die entstehen können, wenn wir Ihre Daten in die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika, die Europäische Union oder ein anderes Land übermitteln. Im Folgenden fassen wir auch zusammen, wie wir die jeweiligen Risiken abmildern.
Obwohl wir alles in unserer Macht Stehende tun, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Unterauftragnehmer vertraglich verpflichtet sind, Ihre Daten angemessen zu schützen, unterliegen diese Unterauftragnehmer möglicherweise nicht dem datenschutzrechtlichen Niveau Ihres Landes. Wenn die Unterauftragnehmer Ihre Daten unrechtmäßig und ohne Genehmigung verarbeiten, kann es schwierig sein, Ihre Datenschutzrechte gegenüber diesem Unterauftragnehmer geltend zu machen. Wir verringern dieses Risiko, indem wir strenge Datenverarbeitungsverträge mit unseren Unterauftragnehmern abschließen, die sie dazu verpflichten, die Daten auf DSGVO-Niveau zu schützen und Anfragen betroffener Personen zu beantworten.
Es ist möglich, dass die Datenschutzgesetze in Ihrem Land nicht mit den Datenschutzgesetzen in den USA oder in der EU im Einklang stehen. Wir sind stets bemüht, den höchsten Datenschutzstandard einzuhalten, dem wir unterliegen.
Es ist möglich, dass Ihre Daten dem staatlichen Zugriff von Beamten und Behörden unterliegen. In diesen Fällen haben wir uns verpflichtet, jede ungültige, übermäßig ausgedehnte oder rechtswidrige behördliche Aufforderung zum Datenzugriff vor Gericht anzufechten. Außerdem verwenden wir eine fortschrittliche Verschlüsselung, um einen unbefugten Zugriff zu verhindern.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Liste zwar Beispiele enthält, aber nicht alle möglichen Risiken für Sie umfasst.
7.3 Datenschutzrahmen für Datenübermittlungen in die USA
TFH befolgt den EU-US-Datenschutzrahmen (EU-US DPF), die britische Erweiterung des EU-US DPF und den Schweizer-US-Datenschutzrahmen (Schweizer-US DPF) in der vom US-Handelsministerium festgelegten Version. TFH hat gegenüber dem US-Handelsministerium zertifiziert, dass das Unternehmen die Grundsätze des EU-US-Datenschutzrahmens (EU-US DPF-Grundsätze) in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten einhält, die es aus der Europäischen Union im Verlass auf den EU-US DPF und aus dem Vereinigten Königreich im Verlass auf die britische Erweiterung des EU-US DPF erhalten hat. TFH hat gegenüber dem US-Handelsministerium zertifiziert, dass das Unternehmen die Grundsätze des Schweizer-US-Datenschutzrahmens (Schweizer-US DPF-Grundsätze) in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten einhält, die es aus der Schweiz im Verlass auf den Schweizer-US DPF erhalten hat. Sollte ein Konflikt zwischen den Bestimmungen in dieser Datenschutzrahmen-Erklärung und den EU-US DPF-Grundsätzen und/oder den Schweizer-US DPF-Grundsätzen existieren, haben die Grundsätze Vorrang. Wenn Sie mehr über das Programm zum Datenschutzrahmen (Data Privacy Framework, DPF) und unsere Zertifizierung erfahren möchten, besuchen Sie bitte
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov
.
TFH ist für die Verarbeitung von Daten verantwortlich, die das Unternehmen im Rahmen des DPF erhält, und leitet sie im Anschluss an einen Drittanbieter weiter, der als Vertreter in seinem Auftrag fungiert. TFH befolgt die DPF-Grundsätze bei allen Weiterleitungen von personenbezogenen Daten aus der EU, dem Vereinigten Königreich und der Schweiz, einschließlich der Haftungsbestimmungen für Datenweiterleitungen.
Die Bundeshandelskommission (Federal Trade Commission) führt die Aufsicht über TFHs Befolgung des EU-US DPF, der britischen Erweiterung des EU-US DPF und des Schweizer-US DPF. In bestimmten Situationen kann TFH verpflichtet sein, personenbezogene Daten in Reaktion auf rechtmäßige Anordnungen staatlicher Stellen offenzulegen, wie etwa um Anforderungen aus dem Bereich der nationalen Sicherheit oder der Strafverfolgung nachzukommen.
TFH verpflichtet sich in Befolgung des EU-US DPF und der britischen Erweiterung des EU-US DPF sowie des Schweizer-US DPF, Beschwerden im Zusammenhang mit DPF-Grundsätzen über unsere Erhebung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu klären. In der EU, im Vereinigten Königreich und in der Schweiz ansässige Personen mit Fragen oder Beschwerden bezüglich unseres Umgangs mit personenbezogenen Daten, die im Verlass auf den EU-US DPF, die britische Erweiterung des EU-US DPF und den Schweizer-US DPF erhalten wurden, sollten sich zunächst an TFH per E-Mail an dpo@worldcoin.org wenden.
TFH verpflichtet sich in Befolgung des EU-US DPF und der britischen Erweiterung des EU-US DPF sowie des Schweizer-US DPF, mit dem Gremium zu kooperieren und seine jeweiligen Ratschläge zu befolgen, das von den EU-Datenschutzbehörden (Data Protection Authorities, DPAs), dem britischen Information`s Office (ICO), der Aufsichtsbehörde in Gibraltar (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) und dem Eidgenössischen Datenschutz- und Öffentlichkeitsbeauftragten (Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, FDPIC) im Hinblick auf ungeklärte Beschwerden eingerichtet worden ist, die unseren Umgang mit im Verlass auf den EU-US DPF, die britische Erweiterung des EU-US DPF und den Schweizer-US DPF erhaltenen personenbezogenen Daten betreffen.
Im Fall von Beschwerden in Bezug auf die Einhaltung des DPF, die durch keinen der anderen DPF-Mechanismen geklärt werden konnten, haben Sie unter bestimmten Umständen die Möglichkeit, ein verbindliches Schiedsverfahren einzuleiten. Weitere Informationen finden Sie auf der offiziellen DPF-Website.
8. Wann wir Ihre Daten weitergeben
Wir werden Ihre Daten niemals verkaufen
.
Wenn wir Ihre Daten außerhalb unserer Organisation weitergeben, werden wir stets Folgendes berücksichtigen:
Die Weitergabe erfolgt auf sichere Art und Weise;
Ergreifen von Maßnahmen, um sicherzustellen, dass die Daten in einer Weise behandelt werden, die mit unserer Verpflichtung zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre vereinbar ist; und
Anderen Unternehmen die Verwendung für ihre eigenen Zwecke untersagen.
Wir geben Ihre Daten nur wie folgt weiter:
An die Worldcoin Foundation:
Wir handeln möglicherweise als Auftragsverarbeiter der Worldcoin Foundation, um personenbezogene Daten im Namen von Worldcoin zu erfassen (weitere Informationen finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung von Worldcoin).
Innerhalb unserer Organisation:
Wir legen Daten nur unseren Teammitgliedern offen, die Zugang benötigen, um ihre Aufgaben und Pflichten zu erfüllen. Wir geben nur so viele Daten weiter, wie zur Erfüllung bestimmter Aufgaben und Pflichten erforderlich sind, und verfügen über ein System der strengen Zugangskontrolle.
An Anbieter und Dienstleister außerhalb unserer Organisation:
Wir geben Daten nur an Dienstleister weiter, auf deren Dienste wir angewiesen sind, um die Daten zu verarbeiten und Ihnen unsere Dienste anzubieten. Wir geben Daten nur an Identitätsverifizierungsanbieter weiter, wenn dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist (d. h. Kundenidentitätsanforderungen (KYC)).
Die Kategorien solcher Dienstleister sind:
Anbieter von Cloud-Diensten (alle Datentypen)
SaaS-Anbieter; wir verwenden SaaS-Produkte in den folgenden Kategorien:
Verwaltung von Datenbanken und Infrastrukturen
Datensicherheit
Personalbeschaffung
Kommunikation
Umfragen
KYC/KYB, d. h. Überprüfung offizieller Dokumente
Verwaltung von Anfragen betroffener Personen
Technischer Support
Benutzer-Support
Externe Experten
Spezialisierte Softwareentwickler
Juristen
Steuerberater
Banken
Kennzeichnungsanbieter (nur mit besonderen Garantien)
Hintergrundüberprüfungsdienste für Bewerber und Orb Operators
An Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Behörden oder andere Dritte:‭
Wir können Ihre Daten offenlegen, um geltende Gesetze einzuhalten und auf zwingende gesetzliche Anforderungen zu reagieren. Wir werden jede Anfrage sorgfältig prüfen, um festzustellen, ob die Anfrage dem Gesetz entspricht, und wir können gegebenenfalls ungültige, zu weit gefasste oder unrechtmäßige Anfragen infrage stellen. Wir können personenbezogene Daten an die Polizei und andere Behörden weitergeben, wenn wir vernünftigerweise der Ansicht sind, dass dies notwendig ist, um Gesetze, Vorschriften oder andere rechtliche Verfahren oder Verpflichtungen zu befolgen.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergeben, wenn wir der Ansicht sind, dass Ihre Handlungen nicht mit unseren Nutzungsbedingungen übereinstimmen, wenn wir der Ansicht sind, dass Sie gegen das Gesetz verstoßen haben, oder wenn wir der Ansicht sind, dass es notwendig ist, um unsere Rechte, unser Eigentum und unsere Sicherheit, unsere Benutzer, die Öffentlichkeit oder andere zu schützen.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an unsere Anwälte und andere Fachberater weitergeben, wenn dies erforderlich ist, um Rat einzuholen oder unsere Geschäftsinteressen anderweitig zu schützen und zu verwalten.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in Verbindung mit oder während Verhandlungen über Fusionen, Verkäufe von Unternehmensvermögen, Finanzierungen oder Übernahmen unseres gesamten oder eines Teils unseres Unternehmens durch ein anderes Unternehmen weitergeben.
Daten, einschließlich Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, können zwischen und unter unseren derzeitigen und zukünftigen Muttergesellschaften, verbundenen Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften sowie anderen Unternehmen, die sich unter gemeinsamer Kontrolle und in gemeinsamem Eigentum befinden, weitergegeben werden.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Einwilligung oder auf Ihre Anweisung hin weitergeben.
9. Wie Ihre Daten in der öffentlichen Blockchain aufgezeichnet werden
Transaktionsinformationen im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung unserer Dienste können in einer öffentlichen Blockchain aufgezeichnet werden.
Bitte beachten Sie Folgendes:
Blockchains sind öffentliche Bücher über Transaktionen, die in dezentralisierten Netzwerken geführt werden, die von Dritten betrieben werden, die von Worldcoin nicht kontrolliert oder betrieben werden. Aufgrund der öffentlichen und unveränderlichen Natur von Blockchain-Büchern können wir nicht garantieren, dass die Daten, die auf eine Blockchain hochgeladen und dort gespeichert werden, geändert, gelöscht oder kontrolliert werden können.
10. Wie wir Cookies verwenden
Wir verwenden Cookies, damit unsere Dienste besser funktionieren. Neben Cookies können wir auch andere ähnliche Technologien wie Web-Beacons verwenden, um die Benutzer unserer Dienste zu verfolgen. Web-Beacons (auch „Clear Gifs“ genannt) sind winzige Grafiken mit einer eindeutigen Kennung, die in ihrer Funktion Cookies ähneln. Unsere
Cookie-Richtlinie
, die durch Bezugnahme hierin aufgenommen wird.
Wir verwenden auch Google Analytics. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie Google Ihre Daten verwendet, wenn Sie die Websites und Anwendungen von Google-Partnern nutzen:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Mit der Nutzung der Dienste erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass wir Cookies und andere Daten auf Ihrem Computer oder Mobilgerät speichern und darauf zugreifen, und wir in Zusammenhang mit diesen Tätigkeiten Google Analytics nutzen. Bitte lesen Sie die Informationen unter dem angegebenen Link, damit Sie verstehen, womit Sie sich einverstanden erklären.
11. Wie lange wir Ihre Daten aufbewahren
Sofern das geltende Recht nichts anderes vorschreibt, bewahren wir Ihre Daten so lange auf, wie es vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um Ihnen unsere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen, unsere legitimen Geschäftszwecke zu erfüllen und unseren rechtlichen und regulatorischen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto bei uns schließen, löschen wir Ihre Kontodaten innerhalb eines Monats; andernfalls löschen wir Ihre Kontodaten nach 2 Jahren Inaktivität. Falls gesetzlich vorgeschrieben, werden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterhin aufbewahren, soweit dies zur Erfüllung unserer rechtlichen und regulatorischen Verpflichtungen erforderlich ist, einschließlich zur Betrugsüberwachung, -erkennung und -prävention sowie für Steuer-, Buchhaltungs- und Finanzberichterstattungspflichten.
Bitte beachten Sie Folgendes:
Blockchains sind dezentralisierte Netzwerke Dritter, die wir nicht kontrollieren oder betreiben. Aufgrund der öffentlichen und unveränderlichen Natur der Blockchain-Technologie können wir Daten, die in Blockchains gespeichert sind, nicht ändern oder löschen oder ihre Offenlegung kontrollieren.
12. Wie sich diese Datenschutzerklärung für Kinder und Jugendliche unterscheidet
Personen unter 18 Jahren dürfen die Dienste nicht nutzen, und wir erheben wissentlich keine Daten von Personen unter 18 Jahren. Wenn Sie glauben, dass Ihr Kind, das unter 18 Jahr alt ist, ohne Ihre Erlaubnis Zugang zu den Diensten erhalten hat, fordern Sie bitte die Löschung seiner Daten an, indem Sie uns über unser
Anfrageportal
kontaktieren.
Wenn wir erfahren, dass wir Daten über ein Kind unter 18 Jahren erhoben haben, werden wir diese Daten so schnell wie möglich löschen. Wir haben Maßnahmen ergriffen, wie die Implementierung eines KI-Modells zur automatisierten Alterserkennung, Anweisungen für Betreiber und Selbstbestätigungen, um die Nutzung der Dienste auf Personen zu beschränken, die mindestens 18 Jahre alt sind. Wir vermarkten keine Produkte oder Dienste für Kinder.
13. Wie Sie uns bezüglich dieser Datenschutzerklärung kontaktieren können
Sie können Ihre Daten auch innerhalb der App unter dem Menüpunkt „Einstellungen“ (Settings) löschen. Wenn Sie Fragen oder Bedenken bezüglich dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, Ihre Rechte ausüben oder unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten (DSB) kontaktieren möchten, stellen Sie Ihre Anfrage bitte über unser
Anfrageportal
oder schreiben Sie uns an Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA oder
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Wir reagieren auf alle Anfragen, die wir von Personen erhalten, die ihre Datenschutzrechte in Übereinstimmung mit den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen ausüben möchten. Sie können Ihre Daten auch innerhalb der World App löschen.
Wenn Sie ein ungelöstes Problem mit dem Datenschutz oder der Datennutzung haben, das wir nicht zufriedenstellend gelöst haben, wenden Sie sich bitte an die Datenschutzbehörde in Ihrem Land. Wenn Sie in der EU wohnen, finden Sie Ihre Datenschutzbehörde
hier
.
14. Ihre Rechte
Diese Rechte gelten, soweit wir den Anfragenden in unserer Datenbank identifizieren können und soweit wir durch die Ausübung der Rechte des Anfragenden nicht andere Rechte betroffener Personen verletzen:
Sie haben das Recht, von uns jederzeit auf Anfrage Auskunft über die personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten, die wir über Sie verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, von uns die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns die unverzügliche Berichtigung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen, wenn diese unrichtig sind.
Sie haben das Recht zu verlangen, dass wir die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten löschen. Diese Voraussetzungen sehen insbesondere ein Recht auf Löschung vor, wenn die personenbezogenen Daten für die Zwecke, für die sie erfasst oder anderweitig verarbeitet wurden, nicht mehr erforderlich sind, sofern die Voraussetzungen für eine Löschung nach den geltenden Gesetzen gegeben sind (z. B. verpflichten uns verschiedene Rechtsordnungen, Transaktionsdaten für einen bestimmten Zeitraum aufzubewahren).
Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung zu einer Datenverarbeitung, die auf einer Einwilligung beruht, frei zu widerrufen oder der Datenverarbeitung zu widersprechen, wenn diese nicht auf einer Einwilligung beruht.
15. ANHÄNGE
Im Folgenden finden Sie mehrere Anhänge mit gesetzlich vorgeschriebenen Informationen für die jeweiligen Märkte, in denen wir tätig sind. Diese Informationen sind Teil der Einwilligung, je nachdem, in welcher Region die betroffene Person wohnt. Diese Informationen können von den Informationen über Ihren Standort abweichen, da wir bestimmte Dienste in bestimmten Ländern blockieren. Im Falle von Widersprüchen zum Vorstehenden ist die speziellere Aussage über die jeweilige Gerichtsbarkeit maßgebend:
Anhang A: Europäischer Wirtschaftsraum („EWR“) und das Vereinigte Königreich („UK“)
Wenn Sie sich im EWR oder im Vereinigten Königreich befinden, gilt das Folgende für Sie: Sie haben mindestens die folgenden Rechte – Sie haben möglicherweise zusätzliche Rechte gemäß der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung, EU-Verordnung 2016/679 vom 27.04.2016 („DSGVO“), wie unten aufgeführt. Um Ihre Rechte gemäß der DSGVO auszuüben, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte über das
Anfrageportal
. Abgesehen von Ausnahmefällen werden wir Ihre Anfrage innerhalb der gesetzlichen Frist von einem Monat bearbeiten. Die Verwendung des Wortes DSGVO im folgenden Abschnitt bezieht sich auch auf die DSGVO des Vereinigten Königreichs, die als UK Data Protection Act (britisches Datenschutzgesetz) von 2018 in das nationale Recht des Vereinigten Königreichs umgesetzt und als Teil des Rechts von England und Wales, Schottland und Nordirland gemäß
Abschnitt 3
des European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 und in der Fassung von
Anhang
1
der Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc.) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019 (SI 2019/419), beibehalten wurde.
A.1 Die gesetzlichen Rechte gemäß der DSGVO
Dieser Abschnitt gilt, wenn die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten unter den Anwendungsbereich der DSGVO fällt (
z. B.
, wenn Sie im EWR oder im Vereinigten Königreich ansässig sind). Gemäß der DSGVO haben Sie unter Umständen zusätzliche Rechte, die im Folgenden aufgeführt sind. Um Ihre Rechte gemäß der DSGVO auszuüben, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte über das
Anfrageportal
.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns jederzeit auf Anfrage Auskunft über die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten, die wir im Rahmen von Art. 15 der DSGVO verarbeiten.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns die unverzügliche Berichtigung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen, wenn diese unrichtig sind.
Sie haben das Recht, unter den in Art. 17 der DSGVO beschriebenen Bedingungen zu verlangen, dass wir die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten löschen. Diese Voraussetzungen sehen insbesondere ein Recht auf Löschung vor, wenn die personenbezogenen Daten für die Zwecke, für die sie erfasst oder anderweitig verarbeitet wurden, nicht mehr erforderlich sind, sowie im Falle einer unrechtmäßigen Verarbeitung, des Vorliegens eines Widerspruchs oder des Bestehens einer Löschungspflicht nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht des Mitgliedstaats, dem wir unterliegen.
Sie haben das Recht zu verlangen, dass wir die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 18 der DSGVO einschränken.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt haben, in einem strukturierten, gängigen und maschinenlesbaren Format gemäß Art. 20 der DSGVO zu erhalten.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus Ihrer besonderen Situation ergeben, jederzeit gegen die Verarbeitung Sie betreffender personenbezogener Daten, die unter anderem auf der Grundlage von Art. 6 Abs. 1 Satz 1 Buchstabe f der DSGVO erfolgt, gemäß Art. 21 der DSGVO Widerspruch einzulegen.
Sie haben das Recht, sich im Falle von Beschwerden über die Datenverarbeitung durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen an die zuständige Datenschutzbehörde zu wenden. Die zuständige Datenschutzbehörde ist: das Bayerische Landesamt für Datenschutz.
Beruht die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf Ihrer Einwilligung, haben Sie nach Art. 7 der DSGVO das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung in die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft zu widerrufen, wobei der Widerruf ebenso einfach zu erklären ist wie die Einwilligung selbst. Bitte beachten Sie, dass der Widerruf nur für die Zukunft wirksam ist. Die Verarbeitung, die vor dem Widerruf stattgefunden hat, ist davon nicht betroffen.
A.2 Datenübermittlung
Bei der Übermittlung von Daten in ein Land, für das es keinen Angemessenheitsbeschluss gibt, verwenden wir die EU-Standardvertragsklauseln. Wir übertragen personenbezogene Daten derzeit nur in die USA.
Beruht die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf Ihrer Einwilligung, haben Sie nach Art. 7 der DSGVO das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung in die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft zu widerrufen, wobei der Widerruf ebenso einfach zu erklären ist wie die Einwilligung selbst. Bitte beachten Sie, dass der Widerruf nur für die Zukunft wirksam ist. Die Verarbeitung, die vor dem Widerruf stattgefunden hat, ist davon nicht betroffen. Bitte beachten Sie auch, dass die Verarbeitung, die nicht auf einer Einwilligung beruht, durch den Widerruf der Einwilligung nicht beeinträchtigt wird.
ANHANG B: JAPAN
Wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Japan haben, gilt zusätzlich Folgendes für Sie:
B1. Informationen zu den japanischen Vorschriften
Wir halten uns an die japanischen Gesetze und Vorschriften, einschließlich des Gesetzes über den Schutz personenbezogener Daten in Japan (Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan, „APPI“). Dieser Abschnitt bezieht sich auf unseren Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten gemäß der Definition im APPI und hat Vorrang vor den anderen Teilen dieses Formulars zur Einwilligung in die Nutzung biometrischer Daten.
Wir halten uns an die japanischen Gesetze und Vorschriften, einschließlich des Gesetzes über den Schutz personenbezogener Daten in Japan (Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan, „APPI“). Dieser Abschnitt bezieht sich auf unseren Umgang mit “personenbezogenen Daten” gemäß der Definition im APPI und hat Vorrang vor den anderen Teilen dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
B2. Austausch von Daten
Sofern nicht anderweitig durch geltende Gesetze gestattet, legen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht offen, verkaufen sie nicht, stellen sie nicht zur Verfügung und übertragen sie nicht an Dritte.
B3. Sicherheitskontrollmaßnahmen
Wir ergreifen die notwendigen und angemessenen Maßnahmen, um den Verlust oder die Beeinträchtigung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu verhindern und die Sicherheit personenbezogener Daten aufrechtzuerhalten, z. B. durch die Festlegung von Regeln für den Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten, die regelmäßige Überwachung des Umgangs mit personenbezogenen Daten, die regelmäßige Schulung von Mitarbeitern im Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten, die Verhinderung von Diebstahl oder Verlust von Geräten, die für den Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, und die Implementierung von Zugangskontrollen. Wir beaufsichtigen auch unsere Auftragnehmer und Mitarbeiter, die mit personenbezogenen Daten umgehen, in angemessener Weise. Weitere Einzelheiten zu den Sicherheitskontrollmaßnahmen in Bezug auf den Umgang mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten erhalten Sie, wenn Sie sich über unser
Anfrageportal
an uns wenden.
B4. Referenzinformationen zur Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten im Ausland
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden in der EU und den USA verarbeitet.
B5. Die gesetzlichen Rechte gemäß APPI
Um Ihre Rechte im Rahmen des APPI auszuüben, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte über unser
Anfrageportal
.
ANHANG C: ARGENTINIEN
Wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Argentinien haben, informieren wir Sie darüber, dass die BEHÖRDE FÜR DEN ZUGANG ZU ÖFFENTLICHEN INFORMATIONEN in ihrer Eigenschaft als Kontrollbehörde für das Gesetz Nr. 25.326 befugt ist, Beschwerden und Klagen von Personen entgegenzunehmen, deren Rechte durch die Nichteinhaltung der geltenden Vorschriften zum Schutz personenbezogener Daten beeinträchtigt werden.
Die Behörde kann wie folgt kontaktiert werden:
Adresse: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor – Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
Postleitzahl: C1067ABP
Telefonnummer: (54-11) 3988-3968
E-Mail: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ANHANG D: SINGAPUR
Wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Singapur haben, gilt für Sie Folgendes:
D1. Erfassung, Nutzung und Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Singapur haben, werden wir mit Ihrer Einwilligung Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für jeden der in unserer Datenschutzerklärung genannten Zwecke erfassen, verwenden oder anderweitig offenlegen. Sie können Ihr Recht auf Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung jederzeit ausüben. Bitte beachten Sie jedoch, dass wir je nach Art und Umfang Ihrer Anfrage möglicherweise nicht in der Lage sind, weiterhin unsere Dienstleistungen für Sie zu erbringen. Bitte beachten Sie auch, dass der Widerruf der Einwilligung nicht unser Recht berührt, personenbezogene Daten weiterhin zu erfassen, zu nutzen und offenzulegen, wenn eine solche Erfassung, Nutzung und Offenlegung ohne Einwilligung nach geltendem Recht zulässig oder erforderlich ist.[1]
D2. Ausübung Ihrer Rechte als betroffene Person
Sie können die von uns erfassten personenbezogenen Daten überprüfen und alle Rechte ausüben, indem Sie sich über unser
Anfrageportal
an uns wenden. Wir bemühen uns, Ihre Anfrage so schnell wie möglich zu beantworten, in der Regel innerhalb von 30 Tagen. Wir werden Sie im Voraus informieren, wenn wir nicht in der Lage sind, Ihre Anfrage innerhalb von 30 Tagen zu beantworten, oder wenn wir nicht in der Lage sind, Ihre Anfrage zu erfüllen und die Gründe dafür nennen.[2]
Soweit gesetzlich zulässig, können wir Ihnen eine Verwaltungsgebühr für die Bearbeitung Ihrer Anfrage in Rechnung stellen.
D3. Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in andere Länder
Wenn Sie in Singapur ansässig sind und wir Ihre Daten erfasst haben, können wir Ihre Daten gegebenenfalls auch außerhalb von Singapur übertragen. Wir werden jedoch stets sicherstellen, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterhin einen Schutzstandard erhalten, der zumindest mit dem des Singapore Personal Data Protection Act 2012 vergleichbar ist, z. B. durch die Verwendung von Standardvertragsklauseln (ASEAN Model Contractual Clauses).
ANHANG E – SÜDKOREA
Dieser ANHANG für koreanische betroffene Personen erläutert unsere Praktiken in Bezug auf personenbezogene Daten, die wir im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Beziehung zu uns verarbeiten, wenn Sie eine betroffene Person aus Korea sind.
E.1 – Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Dritte weiter oder lagern die Verarbeitung dieser Daten an Dritte aus, wie unten angegeben:
- Weitergabe von personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte
Name des Empfängers
Verwendungszwecke des Empfängers
An den Empfänger übermittelte personenbezogene Daten
Aufbewahrungsfristen auf Seiten des Empfängers
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Die in dieser Mitteilung in Abschnitt 6 oben beschriebenen Zwecke.
Die in dieser Bekanntmachung in Abschnitt 5 beschriebenen Punkte
Die in dieser Mitteilung in Abschnitt 11 definierten Aufbewahrungsfristen.
- Outsourcing der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten an Dritte:
Eine Liste aller ausgelagerten Datenverarbeitungsprozesse und der entsprechenden Unternehmen finden Sie unter diesem Link:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Wir können die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auslagern und/oder Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zum Zwecke der Speicherung an Dritte außerhalb von Korea übertragen:
Wenn Sie nicht möchten, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten ins Ausland übertragen werden, können Sie dies ablehnen, indem Sie der Übertragung personenbezogener Daten nicht zustimmen oder uns auffordern, die grenzüberschreitende Übertragung zu stoppen, aber wenn Sie dies ablehnen, können Sie unsere Dienste möglicherweise nicht nutzen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die oben genannte grenzüberschreitende Übertragung personenbezogener Daten ist die Tatsache, dass es sich um eine “ausgelagerte Verarbeitung oder Speicherung personenbezogener Daten handelt, die für den Abschluss und die Erfüllung eines Vertrags mit der betroffenen Person erforderlich ist” und gesetzlich vorgeschriebene Sachverhalte in der Datenschutzerklärung offengelegt wurden (Artikel 28-8(1)(iii) des Gesetzes zum Schutz personenbezogener Daten).
E.2 – Vernichtung personenbezogener Daten
Wenn personenbezogene Daten aufgrund des Ablaufs der Aufbewahrungsfrist oder der Erreichung des Zwecks der Verarbeitung usw. nicht mehr benötigt werden, sind die personenbezogenen Daten unverzüglich zu vernichten. Das Verfahren und die Methode zur Vernichtung werden im Folgenden beschrieben:
1) Vernichtungsprozess: Wir entscheiden, ob bestimmte personenbezogene Daten vernichtet werden sollen, und vernichten sie mit Zustimmung des DSB.
2) Vernichtungsmethode: Wir vernichten personenbezogene Daten, die in Form von elektronischen Dateien aufgezeichnet und gespeichert wurden, mit Hilfe einer technischen Methode (z. B. Low-Level-Format), um sicherzustellen, dass die Aufzeichnungen nicht reproduziert werden können, während personenbezogene Daten, die in Form von Papierdokumenten erfasst und aufbewahrt wurden, geschreddert oder verbrannt werden würden.
E.3 – Speicherung von personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn wir verpflichtet sind, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in Übereinstimmung mit den geltenden Gesetzen aufzubewahren, werden wir dies für die folgenden Zwecke und Zeiträume tun, wie es die geltenden Gesetze vorschreiben.
E.4 – Ihre Rechte
Sie können Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf personenbezogene Daten gegenüber uns geltend machen, einschließlich eines Antrags auf Zugang zu Ihren personenbezogenen Daten, auf deren Änderung oder Löschung oder auf die Aussetzung der Verarbeitung dieser Daten, wie es das geltende Recht einschließlich des Gesetzes zum Schutz personenbezogener Daten vorsieht. Sie können außerdem Ihr Recht auf Widerruf der Einwilligung zur Erfassung/Verwendung/Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten, Ihr Recht auf Übertragbarkeit sowie Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf die automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung ausüben. Diese Rechte können auch durch Ihre gesetzlichen Vertreter oder andere ordnungsgemäß bevollmächtigte Personen ausgeübt werden.
Sie können alle oben beschriebenen Rechte ausüben, indem Sie uns unter worldcoin.org/requestportal kontaktieren.
E.5 – Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Wir setzen technische, organisatorische und physische Sicherheitsmaßnahmen ein, die von den geltenden koreanischen Gesetzen vorgeschrieben sind, um personenbezogene Daten zu schützen, wie z. B. die unten aufgeführten:
1) Managementmaßnahmen: Ernennung eines Datenschutzbeauftragten, Erstellung und Umsetzung eines internen Managementplans, regelmäßige Schulungen der Mitarbeiter zum Thema Datenschutz usw.;
2) Technische Maßnahmen: Verwaltung der Zugriffsrechte auf das personenbezogene Datenverarbeitungssystem, Installation eines Zugangskontrollsystems, Installation von Sicherheitsprogrammen usw.; und
3) Physische Maßnahmen: Beschränkung des Zugangs zu Einrichtungen und Geräten zur Speicherung personenbezogener Daten, wie z. B. Computerräume und Datenspeicherräume usw.
E.6 – Kontakt
Bei Fragen oder Anfragen in Bezug auf den Datenschutz wenden Sie sich bitte an unser Datenschutzteam unter
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ANHANG F – USA
Der California Consumer Privacy Act (Datenschutzgesetz für Verbraucher des US-Bundesstaats Kalifornien) in der durch den California Privacy Rights Act (Gesetz des US-Bundesstaats Kalifornien zu Datenschutzrechten) geänderten Fassung ist derzeit nicht auf uns anwendbar.
ANHANG G – BRASILIEN
G.1 Anwendbare Gesetze, Verantwortlicher und Betreiber
Wenn Sie in Brasilien wohnen, wenn Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in Brasilien erfasst wurden oder wenn Sie unsere Dienste in Brasilien nutzen, ist die geltende Gesetzgebung das Gesetz Nr. 13.709/2018 (Datenschutz-Grundverordnung oder “LGPD”).
G.2 Widerspruchsrecht
Sie haben das Recht, der Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu Zwecken zu widersprechen, die nicht von einer Einwilligung abhängen, wenn der Zweck mit der LGPD unvereinbar ist. Wenn Ihr Widerspruch aufrechterhalten wird, werden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr verwenden, um die Funktionen und Erfahrungen unserer Dienste zu entwickeln und zu verbessern.
Beachten Sie, dass, wenn Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten nicht zur Verfügung stellen oder deren Erfassung oder Verarbeitung nicht zulassen, dies die Qualität Ihrer Erfahrung beeinträchtigen kann, wir möglicherweise nicht in der Lage sind, die Ziele unserer Dienste zu erfüllen oder Ihnen bestimmte Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen.
In einigen Fällen werden Ihre Daten anonymisiert, so dass Sie nicht mehr identifiziert werden können. Sie können der Verwendung anonymisierter Daten nicht widersprechen, da diese keine Identifizierung Ihrer Person zulassen, wie dies in der LGPD vorgesehen ist. Wir verwenden diese anonymisierten Daten, um unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu verbessern.
G.3 Die gesetzlichen Rechte gemäß LGPD
Nach der LGPD haben Sie das Recht, die Existenz der Verarbeitung zu bestätigen, sowie auf Zugang, Berichtigung oder Übertragbarkeit der verarbeiteten Daten. Darüber hinaus können Sie Informationen über öffentliche und private Stellen anfordern, mit denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gemeinsam nutzen. Sie können auch Informationen über die Möglichkeit der Verweigerung der Zustimmung und die negativen Folgen anfordern und die Löschung der mit Zustimmung verarbeiteten Daten verlangen. Sie können die Löschung Ihrer Daten in der World App im Menü Einstellungen auswählen.
Unter bestimmten Umständen haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu widersprechen, diese einzuschränken oder Ihre Einwilligung zu widerrufen, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung der von Ihnen bereitgestellten Informationen stützen.
Sie können Ihre Rechte im Rahmen des LGPD ausüben, indem Sie eine Anfrage an unseren DSB unter Verwendung der Kontaktdaten im folgenden Abschnitt H.4 oder über unser Online-Anfrageportal senden. Wenn Sie der Meinung sind, dass Ihre Rechte nicht angemessen berücksichtigt wurden, können Sie eine Beschwerde bei der Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) einreichen, indem Sie das unter diesem Link verfügbare Formular ausfüllen:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Internationale Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn die LGPD für Sie gilt und wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfasst haben, können wir diese auch ins Ausland übermitteln. Wir werden jedoch stets sicherstellen, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nur an Länder oder internationale Organisationen übermittelt werden, die ein Schutzniveau bieten, das dem der LGPD entspricht, wie es in Angemessenheitsbeschlüssen der ANPD festgelegt ist. In Ermangelung einer Angemessenheitsentscheidung halten wir uns weiterhin an einen Schutzstandard, der dem in der LGPD vorgesehenen mindestens gleichwertig ist, indem wir Standardvertragsklauseln verwenden, die in den Vorschriften der ANPD festgelegt sind, oder wenn wir Ihre ausdrückliche und hervorgehobene Zustimmung für die internationale Übermittlung erhalten.
ANHANG I – Rechtliche Gründe/Zwecke für die Datenverarbeitung von Tools for Humanity
Nutzer
Warum wir die Daten verarbeiten
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung
Aufbewahrungsfrist
Erstellung Ihres Kontos in der World App
Wallet-Adresse, Metadaten, Benutzername
Erfüllung des Vertrags
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste oder bis Sie die Löschung der Daten verlangen.
Um sicherzustellen, dass Sie volljährig sind
Geburtsdatum
Gesetzliche Verpflichtung
Ihr genaues Geburtsdatum wird niemals gespeichert. Wir speichern nur, ob Sie 18 Jahre alt sind. Wir speichern diese Informationen für die Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste oder bis Sie die Löschung der Daten verlangen.
Um Ihren Kontakten die Möglichkeit zu geben, einfach mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren und Geschäfte zu tätigen
Telefonnummer
Einwilligung
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste oder bis Sie die Löschung der Daten verlangen.
Damit Sie problemlos mit Ihren Kontakten kommunizieren und Transaktionen durchführen können
Adressbuch-Kontakte
Einwilligung
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste oder bis Sie die Löschung der Daten verlangen.
Um Ihnen optional Orbs in Ihrer Nähe anzuzeigen
Standortinformationen
Einwilligung
Bis zu 24 Monate.
Betrugsprävention im Rahmen der Kontoprävention
Metadaten, IP-Adresse, Geräte-ID
Berechtigtes Interesse, nämlich das Interesse, bestimmte Arten von Betrug zu verhindern (LISTE DER ARTEN)
Bis zu 24 Monate.
Um sicherzustellen, dass der Dienst in Ihrem Land zugelassen ist
IP-Adresse, Standortinformationen
Gesetzliche Verpflichtung
Bis zu 24 Monate.
Zur Anzeige Ihres selbstverwahrten Wallets und zur Bereitstellung einer Schnittstelle für Wallet-Transaktionen
Wallet-Adresse, Transaktionsdaten
Erfüllung des Vertrags
In diesem Zusammenhang werden keine personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert.
Zur Anzeige Ihrer World ID für Selbstverwahrer und zur Bereitstellung einer Schnittstelle für Überprüfungen
Informationen zur World ID
Erfüllung des Vertrags
In diesem Zusammenhang werden keine personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert.
Zur Anzeige Ihrer Ausweisdaten für die Selbstverwahrung und zur Bereitstellung einer Schnittstelle für die Freigabe der Ausweisdaten
Informationen zum Ausweisdokument und zur Gültigkeit des Ausweisdokuments
Erfüllung des Vertrags
In diesem Zusammenhang werden keine personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert.
Zur Analyse und Verbesserung unserer Dienstleistungen und zur Durchführung datenwissenschaftlicher Forschung
Nutzungsdaten und Metadaten, öffentliche Transaktionsdaten
Einwilligung
Bis zu 24 Monate.
zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, wie z. B. Gesetze zur Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Sanktionen.
Transaktionsdaten, Wallet-Adresse
Gesetzliche Verpflichtung
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, wie z. B. Inhaltsvorschriften
Miniapp-Inhalt
Gesetzliche Verpflichtung
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste.
Um Kommunikation und Marketing zu ermöglichen
E-Mail-Adresse, Push-Benachrichtigungen
Berechtigtes Interesse
Bis zu 24 Monate.
Korrespondenz von Ihnen
Berechtigtes Interesse
Bis zu 24 Monate.
Feedback von Ihnen
Berechtigtes Interesse
Bis zu 24 Monate.
zur Bearbeitung Ihrer Kundendienstanfragen, Beschwerden und Anfragen.
Kommunikationsinformationen und E-Mail-Adresse oder Profilname in sozialen Medien, wenn Sie auf diese Weise mit uns kommunizieren möchten
Erfüllung des Vertrags
Um sicherzustellen, dass die App für Sie reibungslos läuft
Metadaten
Erfüllung des Vertrags
Bis zu 24 Monate.
Zur Überprüfung Ihres Geräts
Geräte-World ID (Gerätefingerabdruck)
Erfüllung des Vertrags
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste.
zur Beilegung von Streitigkeiten, Behebung von Problemen und Durchsetzung unserer Vereinbarungen mit Ihnen, einschließlich dieser Datenschutzerklärung und der Nutzungsbedingungen.
Dauer der Nutzung der Dienste.
Geschäftspartner
Warum wir die Daten verarbeiten
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung
Aufbewahrungsfrist
Kommunikation
Telefonnummer, E-Mail-Adresse, Name
Berechtigte Interessen, d. h. das Interesse an der Kommunikation mit Geschäftspartnern.
Dauer der Geschäftsbeziehung oder bis Sie die Löschung der Daten verlangen.
Pflege und Verwaltung einer Geschäftsbeziehung
Telefonnummer, E-Mail-Adresse, Name, Unternehmensdaten
Berechtigte Interessen, d. h. das Interesse an der Aufrechterhaltung und Verwaltung einer Geschäftsbeziehung mit Geschäftspartnern.
Dauer der Geschäftsbeziehung oder bis Sie die Löschung der Daten verlangen.
Erfüllung der KYC-Verpflichtungen
Reisepassdaten, Unternehmensdaten
Gesetzliche Verpflichtung
Dauer der Geschäftsbeziehung und bis zu 3 Jahre nach Beendigung.
Um Ihre Bewerbung zu bearbeiten
Bewerbungsdaten
Einwilligung und Maßnahmen auf Verlangen der betroffenen Person vor Vertragsabschluss.
Bis zu 3 Monate standardmäßig oder länger, wenn Sie zustimmen, Teil eines Talentpools zu sein.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Declaración de privacidad de Tools for Humanity
¡Gracias por elegir formar parte de la Comunidad Worldcoin! Worldcoin es un protocolo de código abierto, respaldado por una comunidad global de desarrolladores, individuos y otros colaboradores.
Esta Declaración de privacidad incluye los datos que usted nos proporciona al usar los sitios web, aplicaciones (“Aplicación”) y otros servicios vinculados a esta Declaración de privacidad (conjuntamente, los “Servicios”). Esta Declaración de privacidad se incorpora a y rige los
Términos y condiciones del usuario
(“Condiciones del usuario”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH EE. UU.”), junto con su filial alemana Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Alemania”; conjuntamente, “
TFH
” o “
nosotros
,” “
nos
”), contribuye al desarrollo inicial y crecimiento del protocolo de Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”), pero es distinta de la Worldcoin Foundation que es el responsable del tratamiento de datos relacionados con el Orb.
1. Responsable del tratamiento
Somos el responsable del tratamiento de todos los “Datos de World App”, los “Datos de verificación de credenciales” y otros “Datos empresariales”: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EE. UU. TFH está establecida en la Unión Europea (“
UE
”) a través de Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Datos de World App” se refiere a todos los datos personales recopilados y tratados a través del uso que usted hace de la World App, según se define con más detalle en el apartado 5 a continuación, excepto cualquier dato personal relacionado con el uso que usted hace del protocolo Worldcoin o de los tokens de Worldcoin (como su dirección de billetera y los datos transaccionales, que no controlamos).
Los Datos de verificación de credenciales se refieren a los datos tratados al verificar una credencial para agregarla a su World ID de autocustodia. Esto significa, por ejemplo, leer el chip NFC de su pasaporte para almacenar de forma segura la información de su pasaporte en su dispositivo. Estos datos están bajo su control y, después de verificar la validez de su credencial, TFH almacena un fragmento anonimizado de un valor hash de una firma criptográfica única de su credencial (p. ej., pasaporte) para garantizar que cada credencial solo se pueda añadir a un World ID una vez.
“Datos comerciales” se refiere a todos los datos personales recopilados y tratados por otros medios por nuestra empresa cuando se comunica, o trabaja o interactúa de cualquier otra manera con nosotros por correo electrónico, videoconferencia o nuestros sitios web. Para el tratamiento de datos en el contexto de la Aplicación Orb, consulte la Declaración de privacidad de la Aplicación Orb cuyo enlace figure en la Aplicación Orb. Para el tratamiento de datos en el contexto de la recopilación y las pruebas de datos específicas, consulte la correspondiente Declaración de privacidad de recopilación y pruebas cuyo enlace figura en su aplicación de prueba. Para el tratamiento en el contexto de nuestro sitio web, consulte nuestra Política de cookies cuyo enlace figura en nuestro sitio web.
2. Actualizaciones a esta Declaración de privacidad
A veces actualizamos esta Declaración de privacidad. Si realizamos cambios sustanciales, como por ejemplo el uso de su información personal, se lo haremos saber a través de un correo electrónico o un mensaje en su Aplicación.
3. ¿Qué contiene esta Declaración de privacidad?
Nuestro compromiso de proteger su privacidad y sus datos
Información que recopilamos y porqué
Cómo utilizamos los datos personales que recopilamos
Dónde tratamos sus datos
Cuándo compartimos sus datos
Cómo se registran sus datos en la cadena de bloques pública
Cómo utilizamos las cookies
Cuánto tiempo conservamos sus datos
En qué se diferencia esta Declaración de privacidad para niños y adolescentes
Los derechos legales que usted tiene
Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros en relación con esta Declaración de privacidad
4. Nuestro compromiso de proteger su privacidad y sus datos
Estamos profundamente comprometidos con la protección de su privacidad y la seguridad de sus datos. Reconocemos que solo podemos cumplir nuestra misión de distribuir nuestros tokens digitales de forma justa al mayor número de personas posible si la gente confía en nosotros, y la privacidad y la seguridad de los datos son fundamentales para ganarnos su confianza.
Privacidad
Hemos diseñado nuestros productos y servicios teniendo en cuenta su privacidad. Recopilamos datos para mejorar nuestros productos y servicios. Siempre le diremos, aquí en esta Declaración de Privacidad o en los formularios de consentimiento de datos para productos o servicios específicos, qué datos estamos recogiendo, por qué los recogemos y qué hacemos con ellos.
Seguridad de los datos
Contamos con un equipo dedicado a cuidar sus datos y hemos implementado garantías físicas y electrónicas que protegen sus datos tanto en tránsito como en reposo. Al mismo tiempo, ningún servicio puede ser completamente seguro. Si tiene alguna duda sobre su cuenta o sus datos, póngase en contacto con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
o escríbanos a Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EE. UU.
5. Información que recopilamos y porqué
5.1 Datos que usted nos facilita
Como usuario, no tiene la obligación de facilitar ningún dato para acceder a la Aplicación. Sin embargo, es posible que tenga que facilitarnos ciertos datos para poder utilizar una función dentro de los Servicios. Las bases jurídicas para el tratamiento en los casos que se indican a continuación son el consentimiento de los usuarios y la ejecución de un contrato (nuestro compromiso a prestar los Servicios). A continuación encontrará una lista de los datos que puede facilitar y para qué podemos utilizarlos:
En el contexto de World App:
Número de teléfono
Puede decidir introducir su número de teléfono para asociarlo con su cuenta. Con su permiso, otros usuarios pueden encontrar su cuenta a través de su número de teléfono. Es posible que necesitemos un número de teléfono cuando envíe una solicitud de interesado. La base jurídica para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de las Condiciones del usuario.
Nombre de usuario.
Puede vincular un nombre de usuario a la dirección de su billetera y cambiar el nombre de usuario en cualquier momento.
Fecha de nacimiento.
Puede revelar su fecha de nacimiento para garantizar el cumplimiento de los requisitos de restricción de edad. Nunca almacenaremos sus datos de nacimiento, sino solo una suma de comprobación de esos datos y si tiene más de 18 años de edad o no.
Comentarios y correspondencia de usted.
Estos incluyen cualquier correo electrónico, mensajes de chat u otras comunicaciones que nos envíe por correo electrónico o sitios web de redes sociales de terceros. Esto puede incluir el tratamiento de direcciones de correo electrónico o nombres de perfiles de redes sociales si desea comunicarse con nosotros a través de dichos medios. Podemos utilizar un proveedor de servicios externo para facilitar encuestas sobre su uso de nuestros Servicios. La base jurídica para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de las Condiciones del usuario.
Contactos de la libreta de direcciones.
Puede otorgar acceso a la Aplicación a su libreta de direcciones para habilitar la función que facilita la búsqueda e interacción con otros usuarios que puedan estar en su libreta de direcciones. La base jurídica para el tratamiento de estos datos es el interés legítimo del sujeto que se encuentra en la Aplicación y el interés del usuario que comparte por encontrar a sus contactos en la Aplicación.
Tenga en cuenta:
usted es responsable de asegurarse de compartir la información de sus contactos de forma que cumpla con la legislación aplicable. Esto puede requerir que obtenga el permiso de sus contactos y abstenerse de compartir con TFH ningún dato de contacto de otras personas sin el consentimiento explícito de estas. Puede cambiar de opinión y desactivar nuestro acceso a sus contactos en cualquier momento desde la configuración de su dispositivo. Si decide importar los contactos de la libreta de direcciones de su dispositivo a la Aplicación para averiguar cuáles de sus contactos utilizan nuestros Servicios o invitarlos a unirse a usted en el uso de nuestros Servicios, sincronizaremos periódicamente los números de teléfono de sus contactos con esos números y direcciones de billetera correspondientes proporcionados por otros usuarios en nuestros servidores.
Información de ubicación
. Puede decidir activar un servicio basado en la ubicación (como una función que le permita encontrar un operador de Orb cerca de usted). Solo con su consentimiento específico, podemos recopilar información sobre su ubicación a través de GPS para permitir que el servicio por ubicación le muestre un Orb cerca de usted. Puede cambiar sus permisos en cualquier momento en la configuración de su dispositivo. Si no se encuentra en Corea del Sur, también podemos almacenar su ubicación aproximada disociada de su cuenta de World App. Utilizamos estos datos para mejorar nuestros servicios, especialmente, entre otros, la selección de ubicaciones de Orb.
Mercado P2P
. Si utiliza los Servicios de Marketplace P2P (cuando estén disponibles) que le permiten comprar tokens digitales de otros usuarios, podemos recopilar información adicional como su dirección de billetera, su información de contacto (es decir, su número de teléfono) y su número de cuenta asociado con la transacción (como su número M-PESA). Registramos los datos de la transacción como parte de la prestación de los Servicios de Mercado P2P. También podemos recopilar información adicional para cumplir con los requisitos de KYC aplicables.
Metadatos del dispositivo.
Si está utilizando la Aplicación, recopilamos metadatos de su dispositivo para garantizar que la Aplicación funcione correctamente y que usted no está infringiendo nuestros Términos y condiciones. Esto incluye la recopilación de identificadores de dispositivo y direcciones IP.
Datos de la World ID del dispositivo.
También tratamos los metadatos de su dispositivo para calcular una huella digital única del dispositivo. El hash de esta huella dactilar sirve como la señal que demuestra la singularidad de su [sic.] con una World ID del dispositivo.
En el contexto del tratamiento de Datos comerciales:
Nombre y apellidos.
Podemos tratar su nombre y apellidos para perseguir el interés legítimo de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con usted.
Dirección de correo electrónico.
También puede facilitar su correo electrónico para suscribirse a nuestra lista de correo para mantenerse al día con el proyecto Worldcoin. Es posible que necesitemos su dirección de correo electrónico cuando envíe una solicitud de interesado. Podemos tratar su dirección de correo electrónico para perseguir el interés legítimo de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con usted.
Número de teléfono.
Podemos tratar su número de teléfono para perseguir el interés legítimo de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con usted.
Datos corporativos
. Si tiene una relación comercial con nosotros (como si es un Operador de Orb o un proveedor), podemos requerir información como nombres, dirección postal, correo electrónico, número de teléfono, dirección de billetera y otra documentación (como su identificación gubernamental) como parte de la promoción de esa relación comercial y para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones de conocer a nuestros clientes. Podemos utilizar servicios de terceros, como Onfido, para que nos ayuden a recopilar y revisar la información y la documentación anterior para cumplir con la obligación de conocer a nuestros clientes.
Datos de la aplicación
. Si desea trabajar para nosotros, debe enviarnos su solicitud que incluya su carta de presentación y su CV, así como la información personal que desea divulgar.
Puede encontrar la base jurídica para el tratamiento de cada una de las actividades de tratamiento de datos anteriores detalladas en
ANEXO I – Bases jurídicas para las actividades de tratamiento de datos de Tools for Humanity
al final de esta Declaración de privacidad.
5.2 Datos que recopilamos de fuentes de terceros
De vez en cuando, podemos obtener información sobre usted de las siguientes fuentes de terceros:
Datos de la cadena de bloques
. Podemos analizar los datos públicos de la cadena de bloques para garantizar que las partes que utilizan nuestros Servicios no participan en actividades ilegales o prohibidas en virtud de las Condiciones del usuario, y para analizar las tendencias de las transacciones con fines de investigación y desarrollo.
Servicios de verificación de identidad
. Podemos obtener información de servicios de terceros utilizando sus datos para verificar su identidad si así lo exige la ley (como los requisitos de conocer a tu cliente). Para aclarar,
no
utilizamos sus datos biométricos cuando verificamos su identidad tal como exige la ley.
Bases de datos de talentos
. Podemos recopilar datos de diversas fuentes para hacer ofertas de trabajo a personas con talento.
5.3 Datos que recopilamos de forma automática
Si lo permite la legislación aplicable, podemos recopilar ciertos tipos de datos automáticamente cuando usted interactúa con nuestros Servicios. Esta información nos ayuda a resolver los problemas de atención al cliente, a mejorar el rendimiento de los Servicios, a ofrecerle una experiencia ágil y personalizada y a asegurar las credenciales de su Cuenta. La información recopilada de forma automática incluye:
Identificadores en línea:
Datos de geolocalización y de seguimiento (véase más arriba), sistema operativo del ordenador o del teléfono móvil, nombre y versión del navegador web y direcciones IP. En casos muy limitados, estos datos también se introducen en nuestra detección de fraude y flujo financiero ilícito. También sirven para proporcionar una experiencia estable y sin fraudes de nuestro software.
Datos de uso:
Datos de autenticación, preguntas de seguridad y otros datos recopilados a través de cookies y tecnologías similares.
Cookies
: pequeños archivos de datos almacenados en su disco duro o en la memoria de su dispositivo que nos ayudan a mejorar nuestros Servicios y su experiencia, ver qué áreas y características de nuestros Servicios son populares y contar las visitas. Para conocer la base jurídica del tratamiento de esos datos, consulte nuestra
Política de cookies
, donde explicamos los diferentes tipos de cookies que utilizamos.
Del mismo modo, la Aplicación recopila información para solucionar y mejorar los problemas. Utilizamos servicios de terceros, como Segment.io o PostHog, para visualizar información agregada sobre el uso y las interacciones de los usuarios finales. Cuando es posible, tomamos medidas para minimizar o enmascarar la información enviada a terceros (como la codificación de los datos).
5.4 Datos anonimizados y agregados
La anonimización es una técnica de tratamiento de datos que impide que datos sean clasificados como datos personales, ya que una vez anonimizados, los datos ya no pueden asociarse con una persona específica. Algunos ejemplos de datos anonimizados son:
Datos de transacción
Datos de secuencia de clics
Métricas de rendimiento
Indicadores de fraude (aunque, para este fin, también se utilizan datos personales)
También agregamos datos, combinando grandes cantidades de información de modo que deja de identificar o hacer referencia a una persona física. Utilizamos datos anonimizados o agregados para nuestros fines comerciales, como comprender las necesidades y comportamientos de los usuarios, mejorar nuestros Servicios, llevar a cabo inteligencia comercial y marketing, detectar amenazas de seguridad y entrenar a nuestros algoritmos.
La base jurídica para el tratamiento de los datos mencionados es el interés legítimo en que la aplicación o el sitio web funcionen, perspectivas de negocios y la prevención del fraude.
6. Cómo utilizamos los datos que recopilamos
6.1 Descripción general
Debemos tener una razón válida (o “base legítima para el tratamiento”) para utilizar su información personal. En algunos casos, el uso de su información personal no requiere su consentimiento previo. Utilizamos sus datos para los siguientes fines:
Ofrecer y mantener nuestros productos y servicios en virtud de las Condiciones del usuario. Estos servicios incluyen:
la Aplicación en la que los usuarios pueden gestionar su World ID y sus Tokens digitales, así como aprender sobre criptomonedas en general y el proyecto Worldcoin específicamente;
la Aplicación del operador donde los Operadores de Orb pueden gestionar y supervisar los Orbs que gestionan y sus estadísticas;
El Mercado P2P en el que conectamos a los usuarios con agentes (no se aplica a usuarios establecidos o residentes en Alemania o que tienen su residencia habitual o domicilio social en Alemania);
Para mejorar y desarrollar nuestros productos y servicios, incluso para depurar y reparar errores en nuestros Servicios.
Para llevar a cabo investigaciones científicas de datos.
Analizar el uso que usted hace de nuestros Servicios para prestarle una mejor asistencia.
Para permitirle publicar información en una cadena de bloques para demostrar su singularidad.
Para usar la dirección de su billetera para enviarle tokens digitales que admitimos.
Para cumplir con la legislación aplicable, como la legislación contra el blanqueo de capitales y las sanciones. Esto implica:
Utilizar su dirección IP para bloquear a las personas cuyo país no les permita acceder a los Servicios;
Responder a las solicitudes de los interesados en virtud de las leyes de protección de datos aplicables, como las solicitudes de acceso o supresión;
Supervisar los flujos financieros potencialmente ilícitos, p. ej., de billeteras incluidas en la lista negra; y
Cumplir con la legislación aplicable, como las normativas contra el contenido ilegal.
Gestionar sus solicitudes de servicio al cliente, quejas y consultas.
Resolver controversias, solucionar problemas y hacer cumplir nuestros acuerdos con usted, incluidos esta Declaración de privacidad y las Condiciones del usuario.
Ponernos en contacto con usted en relación con actualizaciones de los Servicios.
6.2 Credenciales
TFH le permite almacenar localmente ciertas credenciales en su dispositivo para compartirlas en la infraestructura de conocimiento cero del protocolo de World ID (“Credenciales”). En el contexto de las Credenciales, tratamos estos datos de las siguientes maneras:
Comprobamos la validez de su credencial (en el caso de pasaportes, esto funciona a través del certificado raíz de su país).
Lo autenticamos a usted como titular legítimo de la credencial (para pasaportes, esto funciona localmente en su dispositivo a través de una foto de su rostro (selfie) que nunca se almacena).
Ciframos, firmamos y almacenamos los datos de su credencial en un entorno seguro en su dispositivo.
Nunca tenemos acceso a la información personal contenida en su credencial.
Posteriormente, podrá usted compartir esta información de forma selectiva con terceros de confianza a través de las protecciones del protocolo World ID (p. ej., puede demostrar que tiene al menos 18 años sin revelar su edad exacta o quién es).
Para los pasaportes, TFH solo mantiene un fragmento anonimizado de un valor hash de una firma criptográfica única de su pasaporte para garantizar que cada pasaporte solo se pueda verificar una vez.
Este tratamiento se basa en su consentimiento y nunca obtenemos acceso a los datos personales de su pasaporte, que se almacenan en su dispositivo. Puede suprimir estos datos de su teléfono eliminando la World App.
6.3 Datos de World ID
Su World ID (es decir, el número secreto necesario para usarlo) se almacena solo en su dispositivo (en caso de que tenga una copia de seguridad, existe una copia cifrada en su copia de seguridad). Ni TFH ni nadie más tiene acceso a su World ID. Puede utilizar su World ID de forma anónima. Cada vez que utiliza World ID con una nueva aplicación, la aplicación solo recibe un número desechable (“Anulador”) que no revela su World ID. Esto se habilita a través de Pruebas de conocimiento cero (solo demuestra que tiene un World ID verificado, pero no cuál) y garantiza que su World ID no se pueda utilizar para rastrearle a través de las aplicaciones. Esto significa que World ID no es un ID de usuario general para Internet.
Las pruebas de World ID funcionan a través de un protocolo abierto que accede a un árbol de Merkle público de los hashes de World ID verificados. World ID no es un servicio centralizado, sino un protocolo al que cualquiera puede acceder. Ofrecemos diversas API para facilitar el acceso al árbol de Merkle y las Pruebas de World ID, pero nunca recibimos ningún dato personal en este contexto.
Es importante tener en cuenta que tampoco tratamos ningún dato relacionado con su World ID que nos permita identificarle. Todos los datos personales tratados en el contexto de World App, especialmente la dirección de su billetera y los datos de transacciones, están deliberadamente diseñados para desvincularse de los datos de World ID.
7. Dónde tratamos sus datos
7.1 Transferencia de datos.
Cuando usted nos facilita sus datos, estos pueden ser transferidos, almacenados o tratados en un lugar fuera de donde sus datos fueron recopilados originalmente. El país al que se transfieren, almacenan o tratan sus datos puede no tener las mismas leyes de protección de datos que el país en el que usted facilitó inicialmente los datos.
Hacemos todo lo posible por cumplir los principios establecidos en cada jurisdicción en relación con las leyes de privacidad. Solo compartimos datos con encargados del tratamiento fuera de su jurisdicción si dicha transferencia es lícita y si confiamos en que el encargado del tratamiento de datos protegerá sus datos tal y como exigen las leyes aplicables y, además, de acuerdo con nuestras normas.
7.2 Riesgos de la transferencia
A continuación se enumeran los posibles riesgos que pueden surgir si transferimos sus datos a los Estados Unidos, la Unión Europea u otro país. A continuación también resumimos cómo mitigamos los riesgos respectivos.
Aunque hacemos lo posible para garantizar que nuestros subcontratistas estén obligados por contrato a proteger adecuadamente sus datos, es posible que estos subcontratistas no estén sujetos a la ley de privacidad de datos de su país. Si los subcontratistas trataran ilícitamente sus datos sin autorización, podría ser difícil hacer valer sus derechos de privacidad contra ese subcontratista. Mitigamos este riesgo al cerrar acuerdos estrictos de tratamiento de datos con nuestros subcontratistas que les obligan a proteger los datos al nivel del RGPD y cumplir con las solicitudes de los interesados.
Es posible que la ley de privacidad de datos de su país no sea coherente con las leyes de privacidad de datos de los EE. UU. o de la UE. Siempre intentamos cumplir con el más alto estándar de protección de datos al que estamos sujetos.
Es posible que sus datos estén sujetos a acceso gubernamental por parte de funcionarios y autoridades. En esos casos, nos hemos comprometido a impugnar cualquier solicitud gubernamental inválida, excesiva o ilegal de acceso ante un tribunal. Además, utilizamos cifrado avanzado para impedir el acceso no autorizado.
Tenga en cuenta que esta lista contiene ejemplos, pero puede no incluir todos los posibles riesgos para usted.
7.3 Marco de privacidad de datos para transferencias de datos a EE. UU.
TFH cumple con el Marco de privacidad de datos UE-EE. UU. (MPD UE-EE. UU.), la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. y el Marco de privacidad de datos Suiza-EE. UU. (MPD Suiza-EE. UU.) conforme a lo establecido por el Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. TFH ha certificado al Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. que cumple con la Principios del Marco de privacidad de datos UE-EE. UU. (Principios del MPD UE-EE. UU.) con respecto al tratamiento de datos personales recibidos de la Unión Europea con base en el MPD UE-EE. UU. y del Reino Unido (y Gibraltar) con base en la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. TFH ha certificado al Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. que cumple con el Principios del Marco de privacidad de datos Suiza-EE. UU. (Principios del MPD Suiza-EE. UU.) con respecto al tratamiento de datos personales recibidos de Suiza con base en el MPD Suiza-EE.UU. Si existiera algún conflicto entre los términos de este Aviso de marco de privacidad de datos y los Principios del MPD UE-EE. UU. y/o los Principios del MPD Suiza-EE. UU., regirán los Principios. Para obtener más información sobre el programa del Marco de privacidad de datos (MPD) y ver nuestra certificación, visite
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH es responsable del tratamiento de los datos personales que recibe con arreglo al MPD y posteriormente los transfiere a un tercero que actúa como agente en su nombre. TFH cumple con los Principios del MPD para todas las transferencias ulteriores de datos personales desde la UE, el Reino Unido y Suiza, incluidas las disposiciones de responsabilidad por transferencia ulterior.
La Comisión Federal de Comercio tiene jurisdicción sobre el cumplimiento de TFH con el MPD UE-EE. UU., la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. y el MPD Suiza-EE. UU. En determinadas situaciones, TFH puede estar obligada a divulgar datos personales en respuesta a solicitudes legales de las autoridades públicas, incluido para cumplir con los requisitos de seguridad nacional o de aplicación de la ley.
De conformidad con el MPD UE-EE. UU. y la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. y el MPD Suiza-EE. UU., TFH se compromete a resolver las quejas relacionadas con los Principios del MPD sobre nuestra recopilación y uso de su información personal. Las personas de la UE, del Reino Unido y de Suiza con consultas o quejas sobre nuestro tratamiento de datos personales recibidos con base en el MPD UE-EE. UU. y la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. y el MPD Suiza-EE. UU. deben ponerse en contacto primero con TFH en dpo@worldcoin.org
De conformidad con el MPD UE-EE. UU. y la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. y el MPD Suiza-EE. UU., TFH se compromete a cooperar y cumplir respectivamente con el asesoramiento del panel establecido por las autoridades de protección de datos de la UE (APD)} y la Oficina del Comisionado de Información del Reino Unido (Information Commissioner Office, ICO), la Autoridad Reguladora de Gibraltar (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) y el Comisionado Federal de Protección e Información de Datos de Suiza (FDPIC)} con respecto a las quejas no resueltas relativas a nuestro tratamiento de los datos personales recibidos con base en el MPD UE-EE. UU. y la extensión del Reino Unido al MPD UE-EE. UU. y el MPD Suiza-EE. UU.
En el caso de reclamaciones relativas al cumplimiento del MPD no resueltas por ninguno de los otros mecanismos del MPD, usted tiene la posibilidad, en determinadas condiciones, de invocar un arbitraje vinculante. Puede encontrar más información en el sitio web oficial del MPD.
8. Cuándo compartimos sus datos
No venderemos sus datos nunca
.
Cuando compartamos sus datos fuera de nuestra organización, siempre:
los compartiremos de forma razonablemente segura;
tomaremos medidas para garantizar que se gestionan de forma coherente con nuestro compromiso con su privacidad; y
prohibiremos que otras empresas los utilicen para sus propios fines.
Compartimos sus datos de estas maneras limitadas:
Con Worldcoin Foundation:
podemos actuar como encargados del tratamiento de Worldcoin Foundation para recopilar datos personales en nombre de Worldcoin (consulte la declaración de privacidad de Worldcoin para obtener más información).
Dentro de nuestra organización:
solo divulgamos datos a los miembros de nuestro equipo que requieren acceso para desempeñar sus tareas y funciones. Solo divulgamos los datos necesarios para realizar tareas y funciones específicas y tenemos un sistema de control de acceso estricto.
Con vendedores y proveedores de servicios ajenos a nuestra organización:
solo divulgamos datos a los proveedores de servicios en cuyos servicios confiamos para el tratamiento de los datos y para prestarle nuestros Servicios. Solo divulgamos los datos con proveedores de verificación de identidad si lo exige la ley (es decir, los requisitos de conocer a tu cliente).
Las categorías de dichos proveedores de servicios son:
Proveedores de servicios en la nube (todos los tipos de datos)
Proveedores de SaaS; utilizamos productos SaaS en las siguientes categorías:
Gestión de bases de datos e infraestructuras
Seguridad de los datos
Contratación
Comunicación
Encuestas
KYC/KYB, es decir, comprobación de documentos oficiales
Gestión de solicitudes de interesados
Asistencia técnica
Asistencia al usuario
Expertos externos
Desarrolladores de software especializados
Especialistas jurídicos
Asesores fiscales
Bancos
Proveedores de servicios de etiquetado (solo bajo medidas de seguridad especiales)
Servicios de verificación de antecedentes para solicitantes y Operadores de Orb
Con las fuerzas del orden, funcionarios o terceros:
podemos divulgar sus datos para cumplir con las leyes aplicables y responder a peticiones legales obligatorias. Estudiaremos detenidamente cada solicitud para determinar si se ajusta a la ley y, en su caso, podremos impugnar las solicitudes inválidas, excesivamente amplias o ilegales. Podemos compartir datos personales con la policía y otras autoridades gubernamentales cuando creamos razonablemente que es necesario para cumplir con la ley, los reglamentos u otros procesos u obligaciones legales.
Podemos compartir su información personal si creemos que sus acciones son incompatibles con nuestras Condiciones del usuario, si creemos que ha violado la ley o si creemos que es necesario para proteger nuestros derechos, nuestra propiedad y seguridad, además de nuestros usuarios, el público u otros.
Podemos compartir su información personal con nuestros abogados y otros asesores profesionales cuando sea necesario para obtener asesoramiento o para proteger y gestionar nuestros intereses comerciales.
Podemos compartir su información personal en relación con cualquier fusión, venta de activos corporativos, financiación o adquisición de todo o parte de nuestro negocio por parte de otra empresa o durante las negociaciones relativas a estos asuntos.
Los datos, incluida su información personal, pueden ser compartidos entre nuestras empresas matrices, filiales y subsidiarias actuales y futuras y otras empresas bajo control y propiedad común.
Podemos compartir su información personal con su consentimiento o siguiendo sus instrucciones.
9. Cómo se registran sus datos en la cadena de bloques pública
La información de las transacciones relacionadas con su uso de los servicios puede quedar registrada en una cadena de bloques pública.
Tenga en cuenta:
las cadenas de bloques son libros públicos de registro de transacciones que se mantienen en redes descentralizadas operadas por terceros que no son controladas ni gestionadas por Worldcoin. Debido a la naturaleza pública e inmutable de los libros de contabilidad de la cadena de bloques, no podemos garantizar la capacidad de modificar, borrar o controlar la comunicación de los datos que se cargan y almacenan en una cadena de bloques.
10. Cómo utilizamos las cookies
Utilizamos cookies para ayudar a nuestros Servicios a funcionar mejor. Además de las cookies, podemos utilizar otras tecnologías similares, como las balizas web, para hacer un seguimiento de los usuarios de nuestros Servicios. Las balizas web (también conocidas como “clear gifs”) son gráficos diminutos con un identificador único, cuya función es similar a la de las cookies. Nuestra
Política de cookies
, incorporada en el presente documento mediante referencia.
También utilizamos Google Analytics. Más información sobre el uso que hace Google de sus datos cuando usted utiliza sus sitios web y aplicaciones asociadas:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Al usar los Servicios otorga su consentimiento para que almacenemos y accedamos a las cookies y otros datos en su ordenador o dispositivo móvil y para que utilice Google Analytics en relación con dichas actividades. Lea la información en el enlace proporcionado para que entienda a lo que está consintiendo.
11. ¿Cuánto tiempo conservamos sus datos?
A menos que la ley aplicable disponga lo contrario, conservamos sus datos durante el tiempo que sea razonablemente necesario para prestarle nuestros Servicios, servir a nuestros legítimos fines comerciales y cumplir con nuestras obligaciones legales y reglamentarias. Si cierra su cuenta con nosotros, eliminaremos los datos de su cuenta en un plazo de un mes; de lo contrario, eliminaremos los datos de su cuenta después de 2 años de inactividad. Si lo exige la ley, seguiremos conservando sus datos personales según sea necesario para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones legales y reglamentarias, incluyendo la supervisión, detección y prevención del fraude, así como las obligaciones fiscales, contables y de información financiera.
Tenga en cuenta:
las cadenas de bloques son redes descentralizadas de terceros que no controlamos ni gestionamos. Debido a la naturaleza pública e inmutable de la tecnología de cadena de bloques, no podemos modificar, borrar o controlar la comunicación de los datos que se almacenan en cadenas de bloques.
12. En qué se diferencia esta Declaración de privacidad para niños y adolescentes
Las personas menores de 18 años no están autorizadas a utilizar los Servicios, y no recopilamos conscientemente datos de personas menores de 18 años. Si cree que su hijo menor de 18 años ha accedido a los Servicios sin su permiso, puede solicitar la eliminación de sus datos poniéndose en contacto con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
Si nos enteramos de que hemos recopilado datos de un menor de 18 años, eliminaremos dichos datos lo antes posible. Hemos tomado medidas como la implementación de un modelo automatizado de IA de detección de edad, instrucciones para los operadores y autoconfirmaciones para limitar el uso de los Servicios a quien tenga al menos 18 años de edad. No comercializamos productos o servicios a menores.
13. Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros en relación con esta Declaración de privacidad
También puede eliminar sus datos desde la Aplicación en el menú de Configuración. Si tiene preguntas o dudas sobre esta Declaración de privacidad, desea ejercer sus derechos o ponerse en contacto con nuestro delegado de protección de datos (DPD), envíe su solicitud a través de nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
o escríbanos a Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 Estados Unidos o a
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Respondemos a todas las solicitudes que recibimos de personas que desean ejercer sus derechos de protección de datos de acuerdo con las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. También puede eliminar sus datos desde la World App.
Si tiene una duda no resuelta sobre la privacidad o el uso de los datos que no hayamos resuelto satisfactoriamente, póngase en contacto con el regulador de la protección de datos de su jurisdicción. Si reside en la UE, puede encontrar su regulador de protección de datos
aquí
.
14. Sus derechos
Estos derechos se aplican en la medida en que podamos identificar al solicitante en nuestra base de datos y en la medida en que no violemos los derechos de otros interesados al ejercer los derechos del solicitante:
Tiene derecho a obtener de nosotros en cualquier momento, previa solicitud, información sobre los datos personales que tratamos sobre usted. Tiene derecho a recibir de nosotros los datos personales que le conciernen.
Tiene derecho a exigir que corrijamos de inmediato los datos personales que le conciernen si son incorrectos.
Tiene derecho a exigir que eliminemos los datos personales que le conciernen. Estos requisitos previos establecen en particular el derecho de supresión si los datos personales ya no son necesarios para los fines para los que se recopilaron o trataron, siempre que se den los requisitos de supresión en virtud de las leyes aplicables (p. ej., las leyes de varias jurisdicciones nos obligan a conservar la información de transacciones durante un determinado periodo de tiempo)
Tiene derecho a retirar libremente su consentimiento para cualquier tratamiento de datos basado en el consentimiento o a oponerse al tratamiento de datos si no está basado en el consentimiento.
15. ADENDAS
A continuación, varias adendas disponen información jurídicamente requerida para los mercados respectivos en los que desarrollamos nuestra actividad. Esta información forma parte del consentimiento dependiendo de la región en la que resida el interesado. Esta información puede diferir de la información de su ubicación porque en determinadas jurisdicciones bloqueamos determinados servicios. En caso de cualquier incoherencia con lo anterior, prevalecerá la declaración más especial sobre la jurisdicción en particular:
Adenda A: Espacio Económico Europeo (“EEE”) y Reino Unido (“RU”)
Si se encuentra en el EEE o el Reino Unido, se le aplica lo siguiente: Usted tiene al menos los siguientes derechos Puede tener derechos adicionales en virtud del Reglamento General de Protección de Datos, Reglamento de la UE 2016/679 de 27.04.2016 (“RGPD”) como se indica a continuación. Para ejercer sus derechos disponibles en virtud del RGPD, póngase en contacto con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
. Aparte de los casos excepcionales, resolveremos su solicitud dentro del plazo legal de un mes. El uso de la palabra RGPD en el siguiente apartado también se refiere al RGPD del Reino Unido traspuesto a la legislación nacional del Reino Unido mediante la Ley de Protección de Datos del Reino Unido de 2018 y conservado como parte de la legislación de Inglaterra y Gales, Escocia e Irlanda del Norte en virtud del
artículo 3
de la Ley de (Retirada de) la Unión Europea de 2018 y según lo modificado por el
Anexo
1
del Reglamento de Protección de Datos, Privacidad y Comunicaciones Electrónicas (Enmiendas, etc.) (Salida de la UE) de 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Los derechos legales en virtud del RGPD
Este apartado se aplica si el tratamiento de sus datos entra dentro del ámbito de aplicación del RGPD (p. ej., si usted es residente en el Espacio Económico Europeo o en el Reino Unido). Es posible que tenga derechos adicionales en virtud del RGPD como se indica a continuación. Para ejercer sus derechos disponibles en virtud del RGPD, póngase en contacto con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
Tiene derecho a obtener de nosotros en cualquier momento, previa solicitud, información sobre los datos personales que tratamos sobre usted en el ámbito del artículo 15 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a exigir que corrijamos de inmediato los datos personales que le conciernen si son incorrectos.
Tiene derecho, en virtud de las condiciones descritas en el artículo 17 del RGPD, a exigir que eliminemos los datos personales que le conciernen. Estos requisitos prevén, en particular, un derecho de supresión si los datos personales ya no son necesarios para los fines para los que fueron recogidos o tratados de otro modo, así como en los casos de tratamiento ilícito, la existencia de una oposición o la existencia de una obligación de supresión en virtud de la legislación de la Unión o del Estado miembro a la que estemos sujetos.
Tiene derecho a exigir que limitemos el tratamiento de acuerdo con el artículo 18 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a recibir de nosotros los datos personales que le conciernen y que nos ha facilitado en un formato estructurado, de uso común y legible por máquina, de acuerdo con el artículo 20 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a oponerse en cualquier momento, por motivos relacionados con su situación particular, al tratamiento de los datos personales que le conciernen y que se lleva a cabo, entre otras cosas, sobre la base del artículo 6, apartado 1, frase 1, letra f), del RGPD, de conformidad con el artículo 21 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a ponerse en contacto con la autoridad de control competente en caso de que tenga quejas sobre el tratamiento de datos realizado por el responsable del tratamiento. La autoridad de control responsable es: la Oficina estatal de supervisión de la protección de datos de Baviera (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Si el tratamiento de los datos personales se basa en su consentimiento, usted tiene derecho, en virtud del artículo 7 del RGPD a revocar su consentimiento para el uso de sus datos personales en cualquier momento con efecto para el futuro, por lo que la revocación es tan fácil de declarar como el propio consentimiento. Tenga en cuenta que la revocación solo tendrá efecto para el futuro. El tratamiento que tuvo lugar antes de la revocación no se ve afectado.
A.2 Transferencias de datos
Cuando transferimos datos a un país que no tiene una decisión de adecuación, utilizamos las cláusulas contractuales tipo de la UE. Actualmente solo transferimos datos personales a los EE. UU.
Si el tratamiento de los datos personales se basa en su consentimiento, usted tiene derecho, en virtud del artículo 7 del RGPD a revocar su consentimiento para el uso de sus datos personales en cualquier momento con efecto para el futuro, por lo que la revocación es tan fácil de declarar como el propio consentimiento. Tenga en cuenta que la revocación solo tendrá efecto para el futuro. El tratamiento que tuvo lugar antes de la revocación no se ve afectado. Tenga en cuenta también que el tratamiento que no se basa en el consentimiento no se ve afectado por la retirada del consentimiento.
ADENDA B: JAPÓN
Si usted reside en Japón, se le aplica lo siguiente.
B1. Información sobre la normativa japonesa
Cumplimos con las leyes y normativas japonesas, incluida la Ley de Protección de Información Personal de Japón (“LPIP”). Este apartado se aplica al tratamiento que hacemos de la “información personal” según se define en la LPIP con prioridad a las otras partes de este Formulario de consentimiento de datos biométricos
Cumplimos con las leyes y normativas japonesas, incluida la Ley de Protección de Información Personal de Japón (“LPIP”). Este apartado se aplica al tratamiento que hacemos de la “información personal” según se define en la LPIP con prioridad a las otras partes de esta Declaración de privacidad.
B2. Intercambio de datos
A menos que las leyes aplicables permitan lo contrario, no divulgamos, vendemos, proporcionamos, compartimos, ni transferimos su información personal a ningún tercero.
B3. Medidas de control de seguridad
Tomamos las medidas necesarias y apropiadas para evitar cualquier fuga, pérdida o daños de su información personal que se esté tratando, y para mantener de otro modo la seguridad de la información personal; por ejemplo, mediante el establecimiento de normas para el tratamiento de la información personal, la supervisión periódica del tratamiento de la información personal, la formación periódica de los empleados en el manejo de la información personal, la prevención del robo o pérdida de equipos utilizados para manejar información personal y la aplicación de controles de acceso. También supervisamos adecuadamente a nuestros contratistas y empleados que manejan información personal. Puede obtener más detalles sobre las medidas de control de seguridad en vigor en relación con el tratamiento de su información personal poniéndose en contacto con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
B4. Información de referencia sobre el Tratamiento de datos personales en países extranjeros
Sus datos personales se tratan en la UE y los EE. UU.
B5. Los derechos legales en virtud de la LPIP
Para ejercer sus derechos disponibles en virtud de la LPIP, póngase en contacto con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
ADENDA C: ARGENTINA
Si usted tiene su domicilio en la República Argentina, le informamos de que la AGENCIA DE ACCESO A LA INFORMACIÓN PÚBLICA, en su calidad de Agencia de Control de la Ley N.º 25.326, tiene la facultad de atender quejas y reclamaciones presentadas por aquellos cuyos derechos se vean afectados por el incumplimiento de las normas vigentes en materia de protección de datos personales.
Puede ponerse en contacto con la Agencia de la siguiente manera:
Dirección: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5.ª planta - Ciudad Autónoma de Buenos Aires
Código postal: C1067ABP
Número de teléfono: (54-11) 3988-3968
Correo electrónico: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADENDA D: SINGAPUR
Si usted es residente en Singapur, se le aplica lo siguiente:
D1. Recopilación, uso y divulgación de sus datos personales
Si usted es residente en Singapur, recopilaremos, utilizaremos o divulgaremos de otro modo sus datos personales, con su consentimiento, para cada uno de los fines establecidos en nuestra declaración de privacidad. Puede ejercer su derecho a retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento, pero tenga en cuenta que es posible que no podamos seguir prestándole nuestros servicios dependiendo de la naturaleza y el alcance de su solicitud. Tenga en cuenta también que la retirada del consentimiento no afecta a nuestro derecho a seguir recopilando, utilizando y divulgando datos personales cuando dicha recopilación, uso y divulgación sin consentimiento estén permitidos o sean requeridos por la legislación aplicable.[1]
D2. Ejercicio de sus derechos como interesado
Puede controlar los datos personales que hemos recopilado y ejercer cualquiera de los derechos poniéndose en contacto con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
. Nuestro objetivo es responder a su solicitud lo antes posible, normalmente en un plazo de 30 días. Le informaremos con antelación si no podemos responder a su solicitud en un plazo de 30 días, o si no podemos satisfacer su solicitud y los motivos de ello.[2]
Cuando lo permita la ley, podremos cobrarle una tarifa administrativa para satisfacer su solicitud.
D3. Transferencia de sus datos personales a otros países
Si reside en Singapur y hemos recopilado sus datos, también podremos transferir sus datos fuera de Singapur de forma oportuna. Sin embargo, siempre nos aseguraremos de que sus datos personales sigan recibiendo un estándar de protección que sea al menos comparable al proporcionado en virtud de la Ley de Protección de Datos Personales de Singapur de 2012, por ejemplo, mediante el uso de Cláusulas contractuales tipo de la ASEAN.
ADENDA E – COREA DEL SUR
Esta Adenda para interesados coreanos expone nuestras prácticas con respecto a la información personal que tratamos con respecto a la relación que tiene con nosotros cuando usted es un interesado coreano.
E.1 – Transferencia de información personal
Proporcionamos información personal o subcontratamos el tratamiento de la misma a terceros según se especifica a continuación:
- Entrega de información personal a terceros
Nombre del destinatario
Fines de uso por parte del destinatario
Elementos de información personal proporcionados al destinatario
Periodos de conservación por parte del destinatario
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Los fines descritos en esta declaración en el apartado 6 anterior.
Los elementos descritos en esta declaración en el apartado 5 anterior.
Los periodos de conservación definidos en esta declaración en el apartado 11 anterior.
- Subcontratación del tratamiento de información personal a terceros:
Encontrará una lista de todo el tratamiento de datos subcontratado y las respectivas empresas en este enlace:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Podemos subcontratar el tratamiento de su información personal y/o transferir su información personal con fines de almacenamiento a terceros que estén situados fuera de Corea:
Si no desea transferir su información personal al extranjero, puede negarse a ello no aceptando la transferencia de información personal o solicitándonos que detengamos la transferencia transfronteriza, pero si se niega, es posible que no pueda utilizar nuestros servicios. La base jurídica para la transferencia transfronteriza de información personal anterior es el hecho de que constituye un “tratamiento o almacenamiento subcontratado de información personal que es necesario para la celebración y el cumplimiento de un contrato con el interesado” y los asuntos prescritos por ley se han divulgado en la política de privacidad (artículo 28-8(1)(iii) de la Ley de Protección de Información Personal).
E.2 – Destrucción de la información personal
Cuando la información personal se vuelva innecesaria debido a la expiración del periodo de conservación o una vez se satisfaga la finalidad del tratamiento, etc., la información personal deberá destruirse sin demora. El proceso y el método de destrucción se establecen a continuación:
1) Proceso de destrucción: Seleccionamos ciertos elementos de información personal para destruirlos y los destruimos con la aprobación del DPD.
2) Método de destrucción: Destruimos la información personal registrada y almacenada en forma de archivos electrónicos utilizando un método técnico (p. ej., formateo a bajo nivel) para garantizar que los registros no puedan reproducirse, mientras que la información personal registrada y almacenada en forma de documentos en papel se triturará o incinerará.
E.3 – Almacenamiento de información personal
Si estamos obligados a conservar su información personal de acuerdo con las leyes aplicables, lo haremos para los siguientes fines y períodos según lo exija la legislación aplicable.
E.4 – Sus derechos
Puede ejercer sus derechos relacionados con la información personal frente a nosotros, incluida la solicitud de acceso, modificación, supresión o suspensión del tratamiento de su información personal según lo dispuesto por la legislación aplicable, incluida la Ley de Protección de Información Personal. Asimismo puede ejercer el derecho de retirada del consentimiento para la recopilación/uso/provisión de información personal, el derecho a la portabilidad y los derechos relacionados con la toma de decisiones automatizada. Dichos derechos también pueden ejercerse a través de sus representantes legales u otras personas debidamente autorizadas.
Puede ejercer cualquier derecho aplicable descrito anteriormente poniéndose en contacto con nosotros en worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Medidas de seguridad
Implementaremos medidas de seguridad técnicas, organizativas y físicas según prescribe la legislación coreana aplicable con el objeto de proteger la información personal, como las que se enumeran a continuación:
1) Medidas de gestión: Designación de un delegado de protección de datos, establecimiento e implementación de un plan de gestión interno, formación periódica de los empleados sobre protección de datos, etc.;
2) Medidas técnicas: Gestión de la autoridad de acceso al sistema de tratamiento de información personal, instalación de un sistema de control de acceso, instalación de programas de seguridad, etc.; y
3) Medidas físicas: Restricción del acceso a instalaciones y equipos de almacenamiento de información personal, como salas de ordenadores y salas de almacenamiento de datos, etc.
E.6 – Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros
Si tiene preguntas o consultas relacionadas con la privacidad y la protección de datos, póngase en contacto con nuestro Equipo de Protección de Datos en
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ADENDA F – EE. UU.
La Ley de Privacidad del Consumidor de California, modificada por la Ley de Derechos de Privacidad de California, actualmente no es aplicable.
ADENDA G - BRASIL
G.1 Legislación aplicable, Responsable del tratamiento y Operador
Si reside en Brasil, si sus datos personales se recopilaron en Brasil o si utiliza nuestros Servicios en Brasil, la legislación aplicable es la Ley n.º 13.709/2018 (Ley General de Protección de Datos, o “LGPD”).
G.2 Derecho de oposición
Usted tiene derecho a oponerse al uso de sus datos personales para fines que no dependan del consentimiento si el fin no es coherente con la LGPD. Si se confirma su objeción, dejaremos de utilizar su información personal para desarrollar y mejorar las características y experiencias de nuestros Servicios.
Tenga en cuenta que si no proporciona o no permite la recopilación o el tratamiento de ciertos datos personales, ello podría afectar a la calidad de su experiencia, quizá no podamos cumplir con los objetivos de nuestros Servicios o no podamos proporcionarle ciertos Servicios.
En algunos casos, sus datos se anonimizan, lo que significa que ya no le identifican. No puede oponerse al uso de datos anonimizados porque no permiten su identificación, según lo dispuesto en la LGPD. Utilizamos estos datos anonimizados para mejorar nuestros productos y servicios.
G.3 Los derechos legales en virtud de la LGPD
De acuerdo con la LGPD, usted tiene derecho de confirmación de existencia del tratamiento, de acceso, de rectificación o de solicitud de la portabilidad de los datos tratados. Además, puede solicitar información de entidades públicas y privadas con las que utilizamos conjuntamente sus datos personales. También puede solicitar información sobre la posibilidad de no dar su consentimiento y las consecuencias negativas, y solicitar la supresión de los datos tratados con su consentimiento. Puede optar por la supresión de su información en la World App en el menú Ajustes.
En determinadas circunstancias, tiene derecho a oponerse o limitar la forma en que tratamos sus datos personales, o a retirar su consentimiento, en el que nos basamos para tratar la información que proporciona.
Puede ejercer sus derechos en virtud de la LGPD enviando una solicitud a nuestro DPD mediante los datos de contacto del apartado H.4 a continuación, o a través de nuestro portal de solicitudes en línea. Si cree que sus derechos no se han abordado adecuadamente, puede presentar una reclamación ante la Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) cumplimentando el formulario disponible en este enlace:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Transferencia internacional de sus datos personales
Si le resulta de aplicación la LGPD y hemos recopilado sus datos personales, también podremos transferirlos fuera del país. Sin embargo, siempre nos aseguraremos de que sus datos personales solo se transfieran a países extranjeros u organizaciones internacionales que ofrezcan un nivel de protección adecuado al previsto en la LGPD, según lo reconocido en las decisiones de adecuación emitidas por la ANPD. En ausencia de una decisión de adecuación, seguiremos observando una exigencia en materia de protección que sea al menos equivalente a lo previsto en la LGPD, mediante las Cláusulas contractuales tipo establecidas en las normativas de la ANPD, o cuando obtengamos su consentimiento específico y destacado para la transferencia internacional.
ANEXO I – Bases jurídicas/finalidades para las actividades de tratamiento de datos de Tools for Humanity
Usuarios
Por qué tratamos los datos
Qué datos personales se tratan
Base jurídica para el tratamiento
Periodo de conservación
Para crear su cuenta en World App
Dirección de billetera, metadatos, nombre de usuario
Ejecución del contrato
Duración del uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la supresión de los datos.
Para asegurarse de que tiene la edad adecuada
Fecha de nacimiento
Obligación legal
Su fecha de nacimiento exacta nunca se almacena. Solo almacenamos el hecho de tener o no 18 años. Almacenamos esta información durante el uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la supresión de los datos.
Permitir opcionalmente que sus contactos se comuniquen y realicen transacciones fácilmente con usted
Número de teléfono
Consentimiento
Duración del uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la supresión de los datos.
Permitirle que se comuniquen y realice transacciones fácilmente con sus contactos
Contactos de la libreta de direcciones
Consentimiento
Duración del uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la supresión de los datos.
Para mostrarle opcionalmente Orbs cerca de usted
Información de ubicación.
Consentimiento
Hasta 24 meses.
Para impedir el fraude en el contexto de la prevención de cuentas
Metadatos, dirección IP, ID de dispositivo
Interés legítimo, es decir, el interés por impedir ciertos tipos de fraude (LISTA DE TIPOS)
Hasta 24 meses.
Para garantizar que el servicio está permitido en su país
Dirección IP, información de ubicación
Obligación legal
Hasta 24 meses.
Mostrar su billetera de autocustodia y proporcionar una interfaz para las transacciones de la billetera
Dirección de la billetera, datos de la transacción
Ejecución del contrato
No se almacenan datos personales en este contexto.
Mostrar su World ID de autocustodia y proporcionar una interfaz para las verificaciones
Información de World ID
Ejecución del contrato
No se almacenan datos personales en este contexto.
Mostrar sus Credenciales de autocustodia y proporcionar una interfaz para compartir las Credenciales
Información de Credenciales, información de validez de credenciales
Ejecución del contrato
No se almacenan datos personales en este contexto.
Analizar y mejorar nuestros servicios y llevar a cabo investigaciones científicas de datos
Datos de uso y metadatos, datos de transacciones públicas
Consentimiento
Hasta 24 meses.
Para cumplir con las leyes aplicables, como la legislación contra el blanqueo de capitales y las sanciones.
Datos de la transacción, dirección de la billetera
Obligación legal
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Para cumplir con las leyes aplicables, como las normativas de contenido
Contenido de la miniaplicación
Obligación legal
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Para permitir la comunicación y el marketing
Dirección de correo electrónico, notificaciones push
Interés legítimo
Hasta 24 meses.
Correspondencia suya
Interés legítimo
Hasta 24 meses.
Comentarios suyos
Interés legítimo
Hasta 24 meses.
Gestionar sus solicitudes de servicio al cliente, quejas y consultas.
Información de comunicación y correo electrónico o nombre de perfil de redes sociales si desea comunicarse con nosotros a través de dichos medios
Ejecución del contrato
Para asegurarse de que la aplicación funciona sin problemas
Metadatos
Ejecución del contrato
Hasta 24 meses.
Para verificar su dispositivo
Datos de World ID del dispositivo (huella dactilar del dispositivo)
Ejecución del contrato
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Resolver controversias, solucionar problemas y hacer cumplir nuestros acuerdos con usted, incluidos esta Declaración de privacidad y las Condiciones del usuario.
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Socios comerciales
Por qué tratamos los datos
Qué datos personales se tratan
Base jurídica para el tratamiento
Periodo de conservación
Comunicación
Número de teléfono, dirección de correo electrónico, nombre
Intereses legítimos, es decir, el interés de comunicarse con socios comerciales.
Duración de la relación comercial o hasta que solicite la supresión de los datos.
Mantener y administrar una relación comercial
Número de teléfono, dirección de correo electrónico, nombre, datos empresariales
Intereses legítimos, es decir, el interés en mantener y administrar una relación comercial con socios comerciales.
Duración de la relación comercial o hasta que solicite la supresión de los datos.
Cumplir con las obligaciones de conocimiento del cliente
Datos de pasaporte, datos empresariales
Obligación legal
Duración de la relación comercial y hasta 3 años después de la finalización.
Para procesar su solicitud
Datos de la aplicación.
Consentimiento y pasos a petición del interesado antes de celebrar un contrato.
Hasta 3 meses por defecto o más si acepta usted formar parte de un grupo de talentos.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Aviso de Privacidad de Tools for Humanity
Gracias por elegir ser parte de la Comunidad Worldcoin. Worldcoin es un protocolo de código abierto, respaldado por una comunidad global de desarrolladores, individuos y otros colaboradores.
Este Aviso de Privacidad contempla los datos que usted nos proporciona a través del uso que hace de nuestros sitios web, aplicaciones (la “Aplicación”) y demás servicios que incluyan un enlace a este Aviso de Privacidad (en su conjunto, los “Servicios”). Este Aviso de Privacidad se incorpora y se rige por los
Términos y Condiciones de Usuario
(los “(Términos de Usuario”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), junto con su subsidiaria alemana Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; en su conjunto, “
TFH
”, “
nosotros
” o “
nos
”) contribuye al desarrollo inicial del protocolo de Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”), pero es diferente de The Worldcoin Foundation, la cual controla el tratamiento de datos relativos a Orb.
1. Responsable del tratamiento
Somos los responsables del tratamiento de datos de todos los “Datos de la Aplicación World App”, los “Datos de Verificación de Credenciales” y otros “Datos Comerciales”: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104, EE. UU. TFH está establecida en la Unión Europea (la “
UE
”) a través de Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Datos de la Aplicación World App” se refiere a todos los datos personales recopilados y tratados a través de su uso de World App, conforme se define en más detalle en la Sección 5 a continuación, excepto cualquier dato personal relacionado con el uso que usted haga del protocolo de Worldcoin o los tokens de Worldcoin (como la dirección de su billetera y los datos sobre transacciones, que nosotros no recopilamos).
Datos de Verificación de Credenciales se refiere a los datos tratados al verificar una credencial para agregarla a su World ID de conservación propia. Esto significa, por ejemplo, leer el chip NFC de su pasaporte para almacenar de forma segura la información de su pasaporte en su dispositivo. Estos datos están bajo su control y, después de verificar la validez de su credencial, TFH almacena un fragmento anonimizado de un valor hash de una firma criptográfica única de su credencial (p. ej., pasaporte) para garantizar que cada credencial solo se pueda agregar a un World ID una vez.
“Datos Comerciales” se refiere a todos los datos personales que nuestra compañía recopila y trata por otros medios cuando se comunican o de cualquier otra manera cuando trabajan o interactúan con nosotros a través de correo electrónico, videoconferencias o en nuestros sitios web. Para el tratamiento de datos en el contexto de la aplicación Orb, consulte el Aviso de Privacidad de la aplicación Orb vinculado en la aplicación Orb. Para el tratamiento de datos en el contexto de la recopilación y las pruebas de datos dedicadas, consulte el respectivo Aviso de Privacidad para Recopilación y Pruebas vinculado en su aplicación de prueba. Para el tratamiento en el contexto de nuestro sitio web, consulte nuestra Política de Cookies vinculada en nuestro sitio web.
2. Actualizaciones de este Aviso de Privacidad
De forma periódica, actualizaremos este Aviso de Privacidad. Si realizamos cambios importantes, como la forma en la que usamos su información personal, se lo informaremos por correo electrónico o mensaje en su Aplicación.
3. ¿Qué contiene este Aviso de Privacidad?
Nuestro compromiso con la protección de su privacidad y sus datos
Información que recopilamos y motivo de la recopilación
Cómo utilizamos los datos que recopilamos
Dónde llevamos a cabo el tratamiento de sus datos
Cuándo compartimos sus datos
Cómo se registran sus datos en la blockchain pública
Cómo usamos las cookies
Cuánto tiempo conservamos sus datos
Cómo difiere este Aviso de Privacidad en el caso de niños y adolescentes
Los derechos legales con los que cuenta
Cómo comunicarse con nosotros en relación con este Aviso de Privacidad
4. Nuestro compromiso con la protección de su privacidad y sus datos
Estamos profundamente comprometidos con la protección de su privacidad y la seguridad de sus datos. Reconocemos que solo podemos cumplir con nuestra misión de distribuir nuestros tokens digitales de manera justa a la mayor cantidad posible de personas si las personas confían en nosotros, y la privacidad y la seguridad de los datos son fundamentales para ganarnos su confianza.
Privacidad
Hemos diseñado nuestros productos y servicios teniendo en cuenta su privacidad. Recopilamos datos para mejorar nuestros productos y servicios. Siempre le informaremos, aquí en este Aviso de Privacidad o en formularios de consentimiento para tratamiento de datos de los productos o servicios específicos, qué datos estamos recopilando, por qué estamos recopilando esos datos y qué hacemos con ellos.
Seguridad de los datos
Contamos con un equipo dedicado a cuidar sus datos y hemos implementado medidas de seguridad físicas y electrónicas que protegen sus datos tanto en tránsito como en reposo. Al mismo tiempo, ningún servicio puede ser completamente seguro. Si tiene alguna inquietud sobre su cuenta o sus datos, comuníquese con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de solicitudes
o escríbanos a Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EE. UU.
5. Información que recopilamos y motivo de la recopilación
5.1 Datos que usted nos proporciona
Como usuario, no está obligado a proporcionar ningún dato para acceder a la Aplicación. Sin embargo, es posible que deba proporcionarnos determinados datos para poder utilizar alguna característica dentro de los Servicios. Los fundamentos legales para el tratamiento en los casos que se indican a continuación son el consentimiento del usuario y el cumplimiento de un contrato (nuestro compromiso de prestar los Servicios). A continuación, encontrará una lista de los datos que puede proporcionar y para qué podemos utilizarlos:
En el contexto de la World App:
Número de teléfono.
Usted podrá elegir ingresar su número de teléfono para asociarlo a su cuenta. Con su permiso, otros usuarios podrán encontrar su cuenta a través de su número de teléfono. Podremos solicitarle su número de teléfono cuando envíe una solicitud en calidad de interesado. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Nombre de usuario.
Podrá vincular un nombre de usuario a la dirección de su billetera y cambiar el nombre de usuario en cualquier momento.
Fecha de nacimiento.
Podrá informar su fecha de nacimiento para garantizar el cumplimiento de los requisitos de restricción de edad. Nunca almacenaremos sus datos de nacimiento, sino solo un valor de verificación de esos datos y si tiene o no más de 18 años de edad.
Comentarios y correspondencia de parte suya.
Esto incluye correos electrónicos, mensajes de chat u otras comunicaciones que nos envíe por correo electrónico o sitios web de redes sociales de terceros. Esto puede incluir el procesamiento de direcciones de correo electrónico o nombres de perfiles de redes sociales si busca comunicarse con nosotros a través de dichos medios. Podemos utilizar un proveedor de servicios externo para facilitar encuestas sobre su uso de nuestros Servicios. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Contactos de la agenda.
Usted podrá proporcionar a la Aplicación acceso a su agenda para habilitar la característica que le permita encontrar e interactuar con otros usuarios que estén en su agenda. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el interés legítimo del interesado que se encuentra dentro de la Aplicación y el interés del usuario que comparte de encontrar sus contactos en la Aplicación.
Tenga en cuenta:
usted será responsable de asegurarse de que compartir la información de sus contactos cumpla con las leyes aplicables. Esto puede requerir que obtenga el permiso de sus contactos y no debe compartir con TFH ningún detalle de contacto de otras personas sin su consentimiento explícito. Puede cambiar de opinión y desactivar nuestro acceso a sus contactos en cualquier momento desde la configuración de su dispositivo. Si decide importar los contactos de la agenda de su dispositivo a la Aplicación para saber cuáles de sus contactos utilizan nuestros Servicios o para invitarlos a acompañarlo en el uso de nuestros Servicios, sincronizaremos periódicamente los números de teléfono de sus contactos con los números y las direcciones de billetera correspondientes que hayan proporcionado otros usuarios en nuestros servidores.
Información sobre ubicación
. Usted puede decidir habilitar un servicio basado en la ubicación (como la característica que le permite encontrar un operador de Orb cerca de donde usted se encuentra). Solo con su consentimiento específico, podemos recopilar información sobre su ubicación a través de GPS para permitir que el servicio basado en la ubicación le muestre un Orb cerca de donde usted se encuentra. Usted podrá cambiar sus permisos en cualquier momento desde la configuración del dispositivo. Si no se encuentra en Corea del Sur, también podremos almacenar su ubicación aproximada desasociada de su cuenta de World App. Utilizamos estos datos para mejorar nuestros servicios, en particular, por ejemplo, la selección de ubicaciones de Orb.
Mercado P2P
. Si utiliza los Servicios del Mercado P2P (cuando estén disponibles) que le permiten comprar tokens digitales de otros usuarios, entonces podemos recopilar información adicional como la dirección de su billetera, su información de contacto (p. ej., su número de teléfono) y su número de cuenta asociado a la transacción (como su número M-PESA). Registramos los datos de la transacción como parte de la prestación de los Servicios del Mercado P2P. También podemos recopilar información adicional para cumplir con los requisitos de KYC aplicables.
Metadatos del dispositivo.
Si está utilizando la Aplicación, nosotros estamos recopilando metadatos de su dispositivo para garantizar que la Aplicación funcione correctamente y que no esté infringiendo nuestros Términos y Condiciones. Esto incluye la recopilación de identificadores de dispositivos y direcciones IP.
Datos de World ID del dispositivo.
También procesamos los metadatos de su dispositivo para calcular una huella digital única del dispositivo. El hash de esta huella dactilar sirve como la señal que demuestra su singularidad con un World ID de dispositivo.
En el contexto del tratamiento de Datos Comerciales:
Nombre y apellido.
Podemos procesar su nombre y apellido para perseguir el interés legítimo de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con usted.
Dirección de correo electrónico.
También puede proporcionar su correo electrónico para suscribirse a nuestra lista de correo para mantenerse actualizado con el proyecto Worldcoin. Es posible que le solicitemos su correo electrónico cuando envíe una solicitud en calidad de interesado. Podemos procesar su dirección de correo electrónico para perseguir el interés legítimo de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con usted.
Número de teléfono.
Podemos procesar su dirección de correo electrónico para perseguir el interés legítimo de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con usted.
Datos empresariales
. Si tiene una relación comercial con nosotros (por ejemplo, si usted es un operador de Orb o un proveedor), es posible que necesitemos información como nombres, dirección postal, correo electrónico, número de teléfono, dirección de billetera y otra documentación (como un documento de identificación emitido por el gobierno) como parte de la promoción de esa relación comercial y para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones de conocer a los clientes. Podremos utilizar servicios de terceros, como Onfido, para que nos ayuden a recopilar y revisar la información y documentación mencionadas anteriormente con el fin de satisfacer las obligaciones de conocer a los clientes.
Datos de la Aplicación
. Si desea trabajar para nosotros, debe enviarnos su solicitud en la que se incluirá su carta de presentación y CV, así como la información personal que desee divulgar.
Puede encontrar el fundamento legal para el procesamiento de cada una de las actividades de tratamiento de datos detalladas antes en el
ANEXO I: Fundamentos legales para las actividades de tratamiento de datos de Tools for Humanity
al final de este aviso de privacidad.
5.2 Datos que recopilamos de fuentes externas
Ocasionalmente, podemos obtener información sobre usted de las siguientes fuentes externas:
Datos de la blockchain
. Podremos analizar los datos de la blockchain pública para garantizar que las partes que utilizan nuestros Servicios no estén involucradas en actividades ilegales o prohibidas según los Términos de Usuario, y para analizar las tendencias en transacciones con fines de investigación y desarrollo.
Servicios de verificación de identidad
. Podremos obtener información de servicios de terceros utilizando los datos de usted para verificar su identidad si lo exige la ley (como los requisitos de conocer al cliente aplicables). Cabe aclarar que
no
utilizaremos sus datos biométricos al verificar su identidad, conforme lo exige la ley.
Bases de datos de talentos
. Podemos recopilar datos de diversas fuentes para hacer ofertas de trabajo a personas talentosas.
5.3 Datos que recopilamos automáticamente
Si lo permite la ley aplicable, podremos recopilar determinados tipos de datos automáticamente cuando usted interactúe con nuestros Servicios. Esta información nos ayuda a abordar problemas de asistencia al cliente, mejorar el rendimiento de los Servicios, proporcionarle una experiencia optimizada y personalizada, y a proteger las credenciales de su Cuenta. La información recopilada automáticamente incluye:
Identificadores en línea:
datos de geolocalización y seguimiento (ver más arriba), sistema operativo de la computadora o el teléfono celular, nombre y versión del navegador web y direcciones IP. En casos muy limitados, estos datos también se incluyen en nuestra detección de fraude y flujo financiero ilícito. También sirven para ofrecer una experiencia estable y libre de fraude de nuestro software.
Datos de uso:
datos de autenticación, preguntas de seguridad y otros datos recopilados a través de cookies y tecnologías similares.
Cookies
: pequeños archivos de datos almacenados en su disco duro o en la memoria del dispositivo que nos ayudan a mejorar nuestros Servicios y su experiencia, ver qué áreas y características de nuestros Servicios son populares y contar las visitas. Para conocer los fundamentos legales del tratamiento de dichos datos, consulte nuestra
Política de Cookies,
donde explicamos los diferentes tipos de cookies que utilizamos.
De manera similar, la Aplicación recopila información para solucionar problemas y mejorar. Utilizamos servicios de terceros, como Segment.io o PostHog, para ver información fusionada sobre el uso y las interacciones del usuario final. De ser posible, adoptamos medidas para minimizar u ocultar la información que se envía a terceros (como la codificación de los datos).
5.4 Datos anonimizados y fusionados
La anonimización es una técnica de tratamiento de datos que descalifica los datos para que no sean datos personales, ya que una vez anonimizados, los datos ya no pueden ser asociados con una persona específica. Algunos ejemplos de datos anonimizados incluyen lo siguiente:
Datos de transacciones
datos de secuencia de clics;
métricas de rendimiento;
indicadores de fraude (aunque los datos personales también se utilizan para este propósito)
También fusionamos datos, combinando grandes cantidades de información para que ya no se pueda identificar o se haga referencia a una persona. Utilizaremos datos anonimizados o fusionados para nuestros fines comerciales, como entender mejor las necesidades y los comportamientos del usuario, mejorar nuestros Servicios, realizar inteligencia comercial y mercadotecnia, detectar amenazas de seguridad y entrenar nuestros algoritmos.
El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de los datos mencionados antes es el interés legítimo de una aplicación o sitio web en funcionamiento, comprender el negocio y prevenir el fraude.
6. Cómo utilizamos los datos que recopilamos
6.1 Descripción general
Debemos tener un motivo válido (o un “fundamento legal para el tratamiento”) para usar su información personal. En algunos casos, el uso de su información personal no requiere su consentimiento previo. Utilizaremos sus datos para los fines que se indican a continuación:
proporcionar y mantener nuestros productos y servicios en virtud de los Términos de Usuario. Estos servicios incluyen:
La Aplicación, donde los usuarios pueden administrar su World ID y tokens digitales, así como aprender sobre criptomonedas en general y el proyecto Worldcoin en particular.
La Aplicación Operador donde los operadores de Orb pueden gestionar y supervisar sus Orb bajo gestión y sus estadísticas.
El Mercado P2P donde conectamos a los usuarios con agentes (no se aplica a los usuarios que están establecidos o residen en Alemania o tienen su residencia habitual o sede social allí).
Mejorar y desarrollar nuestros productos y servicios, incluso depurar y reparar errores en nuestros Servicios.
Llevar a cabo investigaciones científicas de datos.
Analizar el uso que usted hace de nuestros Servicios para brindar un mejor soporte.
Permitirle publicar información en una blockchain para demostrar su unicidad.
Usar la dirección de su billetera para enviarle tokens digitales que soportamos.
Cumplir con la ley aplicable, como la ley contra el lavado de dinero y las sanciones. Esto implica:
Usar su dirección IP para bloquear a las personas cuyo país no les permite acceder a los Servicios.
Responder a las solicitudes de los interesados en virtud de las leyes de protección de datos aplicables, como las solicitudes de acceso o eliminación.
Monitorear los flujos financieros potencialmente ilícitos, p. ej., de billeteras incluidas en la lista negra.
Cumplir con la ley aplicable, como las reglamentaciones contra el contenido ilegal.
Gestionar sus solicitudes, quejas y consultas de servicio al cliente.
Resolver disputas, resolver problemas y hacer cumplir nuestros acuerdos con usted, incluido este Aviso de Privacidad y los Términos de Usuario.
Comunicarnos con usted en relación con las actualizaciones de los Servicios.
6.2 Credenciales
TFH le permite almacenar ciertas credenciales localmente en su dispositivo para compartirlas en la infraestructura de conocimiento cero del protocolo World ID (“Credenciales”). En el contexto de Credenciales, tratamos estos datos de la siguiente manera:
Verificamos la validez de su credencial (en el caso de pasaportes, esto funciona a través del certificado raíz de su país).
Lo autenticamos a usted como el titular legítimo de la credencial (en el caso de pasaportes, esto funciona localmente en su dispositivo a través de una foto de su rostro (selfie) que nunca se almacena).
Ciframos, firmamos y almacenamos los datos de su credencial en un entorno seguro en su dispositivo.
Nunca tenemos acceso a la información personal que su credencial contiene.
Posteriormente usted podrá compartir esta información de manera selectiva con las partes confiables a través de las protecciones del protocolo World ID (p. ej., puede probar que tiene al menos 18 años de edad sin revelar su edad exacta o quién es).
En el caso de pasaportes, TFH solo mantiene un fragmento anonimizado de un valor hash de una firma criptográfica única de su pasaporte para garantizar que cada pasaporte solo se pueda verificar una vez.
Este tratamiento se basa en su consentimiento y nunca obtenemos acceso a sus datos personales a partir de su pasaporte que se almacena en su dispositivo. Puede eliminar estos datos de su teléfono eliminando la World App.
6.3 Datos del World ID
Su World ID (es decir, el número secreto requerido para usarlo) se almacena solamente en su dispositivo (en caso de que tenga una copia de seguridad, existe una copia cifrada en su copia de seguridad). Ni TFH ni nadie más tienen acceso a su World ID. Puede usar su World ID de forma anónima. Cada vez que utiliza el World ID con una nueva aplicación, la aplicación solo recibe un número desechable (un “Nullifier”) que no revela su World ID. Esto se habilita a través de pruebas de conocimiento cero (Zero Knowledge Proofs) (usted solamente demuestra que tiene un World ID verificado, pero no cuál) y garantiza que su World ID no pueda utilizarse para rastrearlo en distintas aplicaciones. Esto significa que World ID no es una identificación general de usuario para Internet.
Las pruebas de World ID funcionan a través de un protocolo abierto que accede a un árbol de Merkle público de los hashes de World ID verificados. World ID no es un servicio centralizado, sino un protocolo al que cualquier persona puede acceder. Ofrecemos API para facilitar el acceso a las pruebas de World ID y árbol de Merkle, pero nunca recibimos ningún dato personal en este contexto.
Es importante tener en cuenta que tampoco tratamos ningún dato relacionado con su World ID que nos permita identificarlo. Todos los datos personales tratados en el contexto de la World App, en particular la dirección de su billetera y los datos de transacciones, están diseñados deliberadamente para desvincularse de los datos de la World ID.
7. Dónde llevamos a cabo el tratamiento de sus datos
7.1 Transferencia de datos.
Cuando nos proporciona sus datos, estos podrán transferirse, almacenarse o tratarse en un lugar distinto del lugar donde se recopilaron originalmente. Es posible que el país al que se transfieren, o en el que se almacenan o tratan sus datos no tenga las mismas leyes de protección de datos que el país en el que inicialmente proporcionó la información.
Hacemos todo lo posible para cumplir con los principios establecidos en cada jurisdicción en lo que respecta a las leyes de privacidad. Solo compartimos datos con encargados del tratamiento de datos fuera de su jurisdicción si dicha transferencia es legítima y si confiamos en que el encargado del tratamiento de datos protegerá los datos, conforme lo exigen las leyes aplicables y, además, de acuerdo con nuestros estándares.
7.2 Riesgos de la transferencia
A continuación, se presenta una lista de posibles riesgos que pueden surgir si transferimos sus datos a los Estados Unidos, la Unión Europea u otro país. A continuación, también resumimos cómo mitigamos los riesgos respectivos.
Si bien hacemos todo lo posible para garantizar que nuestros subcontratistas estén obligados contractualmente a proteger adecuadamente sus datos, es posible que estos subcontratistas no estén sujetos a la ley de privacidad de los datos de su país. Si los subcontratistas procesaran ilegalmente sus datos sin autorización, tal vez sea difícil hacer valer sus derechos de privacidad contra ese subcontratista. Mitigamos este riesgo a medida que cerramos acuerdos estrictos de tratamiento de datos con nuestros subcontratistas que los obligan a proteger los datos a nivel del RGPD y a cumplir con las solicitudes de los interesados.
Es posible que la ley de privacidad de los datos de su país sea incompatible con las leyes de privacidad de datos de los EE. UU. o la UE. Siempre intentamos cumplir con el más alto estándar de protección de datos al que estamos sujetos.
Es posible que sus datos estén sujetos al acceso gubernamental de funcionarios y autoridades. En esos casos, nos hemos comprometido a impugnar cualquier solicitud de acceso gubernamental inválida, excesiva o ilegal ante un tribunal. Además, utilizamos el cifrado avanzado para impedir el acceso no autorizado.
Tenga en cuenta que esta lista contiene ejemplos, pero es posible que no incluya todos los posibles riesgos para usted.
7.3 Marco de privacidad de datos para transferencias de datos en EE. UU.
TFH cumple con el Marco de Privacidad de Datos (Data Privacy Framework, DPF) entre la UE y EE. UU. (DPF UE-EE. UU.), la Ampliación del Reino Unido del DPF UE-EE. UU. y el Marco de Privacidad de Datos entre Suiza y EE. UU. (DPF Suiza-EE. UU.) según lo establecido por el Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. TFH ha certificado ante el Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. que cumple con los principios del Marco de Privacidad de Datos entre la UE y EE. UU. (Principios del DPF UE-EE. UU.) con respecto al tratamiento de datos personales recibidos de la Unión Europea sobre la base del DPF UE-EE. UU. y recibidos del Reino Unido (y Gibraltar) sobre la base de la Ampliación del Reino Unido del DPF UE-EE. UU. TFH ha certificado ante el Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. que cumple con los principios del Marco de Privacidad de Datos entre Suiza y EE. UU. (Principios del DPF Suiza-EE. UU.) con respecto al tratamiento de datos personales recibidos de Suiza sobre la base del DPF Suiza-EE. UU. Si existiera algún conflicto entre los términos de este Aviso del Marco de Privacidad de Datos y los Principios del DPF UE-EE. UU. o los Principios del DPF Suiza-EE UU., regirán los Principios. Para obtener más información sobre el programa del Marco de Privacidad de Datos (DPF) y ver nuestra certificación, visite
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH es responsable del tratamiento de los datos personales que recibe en virtud del DPF y posteriormente transfiere a un tercero que actúa como agente en su nombre. TFH cumple con los Principios del DPF respecto de todas las transferencias posteriores de datos personales desde la UE, el Reino Unido y Suiza, incluidas las disposiciones sobre responsabilidad por transferencias posteriores.
La Comisión Federal de Comercio tiene jurisdicción sobre el cumplimiento, por parte de TFH, del DPF UE-EE. UU., la Ampliación del Reino Unido del DPF UE-EE. UU y el DPF Suiza-EE. UU. En ciertas situaciones, es posible que TFH deba divulgar datos personales en respuesta a solicitudes legales de autoridades públicas, incluso para cumplir con requisitos de seguridad nacional o de aplicación de la ley.
De acuerdo con el DPF UE-E. UU. y la Ampliación del Reino Unido al DPF UE-EE. UU. y el DPF Suiza-EE.UU., TFH se compromete a resolver las denuncias relativas al DPF sobre nuestra recopilación y uso de su información personal. Los individuos de la UE, del Reino Unido y de Suiza que tengan alguna consulta o denuncia sobre nuestro manejo de los datos personales recibidos sobre la base del DPF UE-EE. UU. DPF y la Ampliación del Reino Unido del DPF UE-EE. UU. y el DPF Suiza-EE. UU., primero deben comunicarse con TFH escribiendo a dpo@worldcoin.org
De acuerdo con el DPF UE-EE. UU. y la Ampliación del Reino Unido del DPF UE-EE. UU. DPF y el DPF Suiza-EE.UU., TFH se compromete a cooperar y cumplir respectivamente con el asesoramiento del panel establecido por las autoridades de protección de datos (Data Protection Authorities, DPA) de la UE y la Oficina del Comisionado de Información (Information Commissioner’s Office, ICO) del Reino Unido y la Autoridad Reguladora de Gibraltar (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) y el Comisionado Federal de Protección e Información de Datos (Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, FDPIC) de Suiza con respecto a las denuncias no resueltas relativas a nuestro manejo de los datos personales recibidos sobre la base del DPF UE-EE. UU. y la Ampliación del Reino Unido del DPF UE-EE. UU. DPF y el DPF Suiza-EE. UU.
En el caso de denuncias relativas al cumplimiento del DPF no resueltas por ninguno de los otros mecanismos del DPF, usted tendrá la posibilidad, bajo ciertas condiciones, de invocar un arbitraje vinculante. Puede encontrar más información en el sitio web oficial del DPF.
8. Cuándo compartiremos sus datos
Nunca venderemos sus datos
.
Cuando compartamos sus datos fuera de nuestra organización, siempre haremos lo siguiente:
los compartiremos de una manera razonablemente segura;
tomaremos medidas para asegurarnos de que se gestionen de un modo compatible con nuestro compromiso con su privacidad; y
prohibiremos que otras empresas los usen para sus propios fines.
Compartimos sus datos de estas maneras limitadas:
Con Worldcoin Foundation:
podemos actuar como encargados del tratamiento de Worldcoin Foundation para recopilar datos personales en nombre de Worldcoin (consulte el aviso de privacidad de Worldcoin para obtener más información).
Dentro de nuestra organización:
solo divulgaremos datos a los miembros de nuestro equipo que necesiten acceso para realizar sus tareas y funciones. Solo divulgaremos los datos necesarios para realizar tareas y funciones específicas, y disponemos de un sistema de estricto control de acceso.
Con los proveedores y prestadores de servicios de nuestra organización:
solo divulgaremos datos a prestadores de servicios a los que recurrimos para que procesen los datos y le presten nuestros Servicios. Solo divulgaremos datos a proveedores de verificación de identidad si lo exige la ley (es decir, requisitos de conocer al cliente).
Las categorías de dichos proveedores de servicios son:
Proveedores de servicios en la nube (todos los tipos de datos)
Proveedores de SaaS: utilizamos productos SaaS en las siguientes categorías:
Gestión de bases de datos e infraestructura
Seguridad de los datos
Reclutamiento
Comunicación
Encuestas
KYC/KYB, es decir, verificación de documentos oficiales
Gestión de solicitudes del interesado
Asistencia técnica
Asistencia al usuario
Expertos externos
Desarrolladores de software especializados
Especialistas legales
Asesores fiscales
Bancos
Proveedores de servicios de etiquetado (solo bajo salvaguardas especiales)
Servicios de verificación de antecedentes para solicitantes y operadores de Orb
Con la fuerza y oficiales de aplicación de la ley u otros terceros:
podremos divulgar sus datos para cumplir con las leyes aplicables y responder a demandas legales obligatorias. Consideraremos detenidamente cada solicitud para determinar si cumple con la ley y, si corresponde, podremos impugnar las solicitudes inválidas, excesivamente amplias o ilegales. Podemos compartir datos personales con la policía y otras autoridades gubernamentales cuando creamos razonablemente que es necesario para cumplir con las leyes, reglamentaciones u otros procesos u obligaciones legales.
Podemos compartir su información personal si creemos que sus acciones son incompatibles con nuestros Términos de Usuario, si creemos que ha violado la ley o si creemos que es necesario para proteger nuestros derechos, propiedad y seguridad, a nuestros usuarios, al público u otras partes.
Podemos compartir su información personal con nuestros abogados y otros asesores profesionales cuando sea necesario para obtener asesoramiento o, de otro modo, proteger y gestionar nuestros intereses comerciales.
Podemos compartir su información personal en relación con negociaciones relacionadas con una fusión, la venta de activos de la compañía, el financiamiento o la adquisición de la totalidad o una parte de nuestro negocio por parte de otra compañía, o en el transcurso de dichas negociaciones.
Los datos, incluida su información personal, pueden compartirse entre nuestras compañías matrices, filiales y subsidiarias actuales y futuras, y con otras compañías que están bajo el control y la propiedad común.
Podemos compartir su información personal con su consentimiento o siguiendo sus instrucciones.
9. Cómo se registrarán sus datos en la blockchain pública
La información de las transacciones relacionadas con el uso de nuestros Servicios puede quedar registrada en una blockchain pública.
Tenga en cuenta:
las blockchains son libros públicos de transacciones que se mantienen en redes descentralizadas operadas por terceros que no están bajo el control ni son operadas por Worldcoin. Debido a la naturaleza pública e inmutable de los libros de blockchain, no podemos garantizar la capacidad para modificar, borrar o controlar la divulgación de los datos que se cargan y almacenan en una blockchain.
10. Cómo usamos las cookies
Utilizaremos cookies para ayudar a que nuestros Servicios funcionen mejor. Además de las cookies, podremos utilizar otras tecnologías similares, como las balizas web, para rastrear a los usuarios de nuestros Servicios. Las balizas web (también denominadas “imágenes gif transparentes”), son gráficos diminutos con un identificador único, cuya función es similar a la de las cookies. Se incorpora al presente nuestra
Política de Cookies
por su referencia.
También utilizamos Google Analytics. Podrá encontrar más información sobre cómo Google utiliza sus datos cuando usted utiliza los sitios web y las aplicaciones de sus socios en
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Al utilizar los Servicios, usted acepta que acepta que almacenemos y accedamos a cookies y otros datos de su computadora o dispositivo móvil, y que se utilice Google Analytics en relación con dichas actividades. Lea la información en el enlace proporcionado para entender lo que está aceptando.
11. Cuánto tiempo conservaremos sus datos
A menos que la ley aplicable estipule lo contrario, conservaremos sus datos durante el tiempo que sea razonablemente necesario para prestarle nuestros Servicios, cumplir con nuestros fines comerciales legítimos y con nuestras obligaciones legales y reglamentarias. Si cierra su cuenta con nosotros, eliminaremos los datos de su cuenta en el plazo de un mes; de lo contrario, eliminaremos los datos de su cuenta después de 2 años de inactividad. Si la ley lo exige, seguiremos conservando sus datos según sea necesario para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones legales y reglamentarias, lo que incluye el monitoreo, la detección y la prevención de fraudes, y las obligaciones fiscales, contables y de presentación de informes financieros.
Tenga en cuenta:
las blockchains son redes descentralizadas de terceros que nosotros no controlamos ni operamos. Debido a la naturaleza pública e inmutable de la tecnología de blockchain, no podremos modificar, borrar ni controlar la divulgación de los datos que se almacenan en las blockchains.
12. Cómo difiere este Aviso de Privacidad en el caso de niños y adolescentes
Las personas menores de 18 años no están autorizadas a utilizar los Servicios, y no recopilamos deliberadamente datos de personas menores de 18 años. Si cree que su hijo menor de 18 años ha tenido acceso a los Servicios sin su permiso, podrá solicitar la eliminación de sus datos comunicándose con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de solicitudes
.
Si tomamos conocimiento de que hemos recopilado datos sobre un niño menor de 18 años, los eliminaremos lo antes posible. Hemos tomado medidas, como la implementación de un modelo de inteligencia artificial (IA) de detección automática de la edad, instrucciones a los operadores y autoconfirmaciones para restringir el uso de los Servicios para los mayores de 18 años. No comercializamos productos ni servicios a menores de edad.
13. Cómo comunicarse con nosotros en relación con este Aviso de Privacidad
Usted puede optar por eliminar sus datos de la Aplicación desde el menú de Configuración. Si tiene alguna pregunta o inquietud con respecto a este Aviso de Privacidad, desea ejercer sus derechos o comunicarse con nuestro oficial responsable de protección de los datos (Data Protection Officer, DPO), envíe su solicitud a través de nuestro
Portal de solicitudes
o escríbanos a Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104, EE. UU. o a
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Responderemos a todas las solicitudes que recibimos de personas que desean ejercer sus derechos de protección de datos de acuerdo con la legislación de protección de datos aplicable. También podrá eliminar sus datos dentro de la World App.
Si tiene alguna inquietud con respecto a la privacidad o el uso de datos que no hayamos resuelto de forma satisfactoria, comuníquese con el organismo regulador de protección de datos de su jurisdicción. Si reside en la UE, puede encontrar su organismo regulador de protección de datos
aquí
.
14. Sus derechos
Estos derechos se aplican en la medida en que podamos identificar al solicitante en nuestra base de datos y en tanto no violemos los derechos de otros interesados al ejercer los derechos del solicitante:
Tiene derecho a obtener de nosotros, en cualquier momento y por pedido, información sobre los datos personales que tratamos en relación con usted. Tiene derecho a recibir de nosotros los datos personales relacionados con usted.
Tiene derecho a exigir que corrijamos de inmediato los datos personales sobre usted si son incorrectos.
Tiene derecho a exigir que eliminemos los datos personales sobre usted. Estos requisitos previos establecen, en particular, un derecho a la eliminación si los datos personales ya no son necesarios para los fines para los cuales fueron recopilados o, de otro modo, tratados, siempre que se cumplan los requisitos para la eliminación en virtud de las leyes aplicables (p. ej., las leyes de varias jurisdicciones nos obligan a conservar la información de la transacción durante un determinado período).
Tiene derecho a retirar libremente su consentimiento para cualquier tratamiento de datos basado en el consentimiento o a objetar el tratamiento de los datos si no se basa en el consentimiento.
15. APÉNDICES
Los diversos apéndices que siguen ofrecen la información legalmente exigida para los respectivos mercados en los que operamos. Esta información forma parte del consentimiento según la región en la que reside el interesado. Esta información puede diferir de la información de su ubicación porque bloqueamos ciertos servicios en ciertas jurisdicciones. En caso de cualquier incompatibilidad con lo anterior, prevalecerá la declaración más especial sobre la jurisdicción en particular:
Apéndice A: Espacio Económico Europeo (“EEE”), Suiza y el Reino Unido (“R. U.”)
Si se encuentra en el EEE o en el Reino Unido, lo siguiente se aplica a su caso: Usted goza, al menos, de los siguientes derechos. Puede tener derechos adicionales en virtud del Reglamento General de Protección de Datos, el Reglamento de la UE 2016/679 del 27.04.2016 (el “RGPD”) tal como se indica a continuación. Para ejercer los derechos que tiene a su disposición en virtud del RGPD, comuníquese con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
. Salvo en casos excepcionales, resolveremos su solicitud en el plazo legal de un mes. El uso del término RGPD en la sección que sigue también implica el RGPD del Reino Unido incorporado a la legislación nacional del Reino Unido como la Ley de Protección de Datos del Reino Unido de 2018 y retenida como parte de la ley de Inglaterra y Gales, Escocia e Irlanda del Norte en virtud de la
sección 3
de la Ley de la Unión Europea (Retiro) de 2018, según lo enmienda del
Anexo
1
de las Regulaciones de Protección de Datos, Privacidad y Comunicaciones Electrónicas (Enmiendas, etc.) (Salida de la UE) de 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Los derechos legales en virtud del RGPD.
Esta sección se aplica si el tratamiento de sus datos se encuentra dentro del alcance de aplicación del RGPD (
p. ej.
, si usted es residente del EEE o del Reino Unido). Es posible que tenga derechos adicionales en virtud del RGPD, según se indica a continuación. Para ejercer los derechos que tiene a su disposición en virtud del RGPD, comuníquese con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
Tiene derecho a obtener de nosotros, en cualquier momento y por pedido, información sobre los datos personales que tratamos en relación con usted dentro del alcance del Art. 15 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a exigir que corrijamos de inmediato los datos personales sobre usted si son incorrectos.
Tiene derecho, de acuerdo con las condiciones descritas en el Art. 17 del RGPD, a exigir que eliminemos los datos personales sobre usted. Estos prerrequisitos establecen, en particular, un derecho de eliminación si los datos personales ya no son necesarios para los fines para los que fueron recopilados o tratados de otro modo, así como en los casos de tratamiento ilegal, la existencia de una objeción o la existencia de una obligación de eliminación en virtud del Derecho de la Unión o la ley del Estado miembro al que estamos sujetos.
Tiene derecho a exigir que restrinjamos el tratamiento de acuerdo con el Art. 18 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a recibir de nosotros los datos personales sobre usted que nos haya proporcionado en un formato estructurado, de uso común y legible en máquina, de acuerdo con el Art. 20 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a objetar en cualquier momento, por motivos relacionados con su situación particular, el tratamiento de los datos personales sobre usted que se lleve a cabo, entre otros, sobre la base del Artículo 6 (1), oración 1 lit. f del RGPD, de acuerdo con el Artículo 21 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a comunicarse con la autoridad supervisora competente en caso de quejas sobre el tratamiento de datos que realiza el responsable del tratamiento. La autoridad de supervisión responsable es la Oficina Estatal Bávara para la Supervisión de la Protección de Datos (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Si el tratamiento de datos personales se basa en su consentimiento, de acuerdo con el Art. 7 del RGPD, usted tiene derecho a revocar su consentimiento para el uso de sus datos personales en cualquier momento con efecto a futuro, por lo que la revocación es tan fácil de declarar como el consentimiento propiamente dicho. Tenga en cuenta que la revocación solo entra en vigencia para el futuro. El tratamiento que tuvo lugar antes de la revocación no se ve afectado.
A.2 Transferencia de datos
Al transferir datos a un país que no tiene una decisión de adecuación, utilizamos las Cláusulas contractuales estándares de la UE. En la actualidad solo estamos transfiriendo datos personales a los EE. UU.
Si el tratamiento de datos personales se basa en su consentimiento, de acuerdo con el Art. 7 del RGPD, usted tiene derecho a revocar su consentimiento para el uso de sus datos personales en cualquier momento con efecto a futuro, por lo que la revocación es tan fácil de declarar como el consentimiento propiamente dicho. Tenga en cuenta que la revocación solo entra en vigencia para el futuro. El tratamiento que tuvo lugar antes de la revocación no se ve afectado. Tenga en cuenta también que el tratamiento que no se basa en el consentimiento no se ve afectado por el retiro del consentimiento.
APÉNDICE B: JAPÓN
Si reside en Japón, además, lo siguiente se aplica a su persona.
B1. Información sobre las reglamentaciones japonesas
Cumplimos con las leyes y reglamentaciones japonesas, incluida la Ley de Protección de la Información Personal de Japón (“APPI”). Esta sección se aplica a nuestro manejo de la “información personal”, según se define en la APPI, en precedencia de las otras partes de este Formulario de Consentimiento para Datos Biométricos.
Cumplimos con las leyes y reglamentaciones japonesas, incluida la Ley de Protección de la Información Personal de Japón (“APPI”). Esta sección se aplica a nuestro manejo de la “información personal”, según se define en la APPI, en precedencia de las otras partes de este Aviso de Privacidad.
B2. Intercambio de datos.
A menos que las leyes aplicables permitan lo contrario, no divulgamos, vendemos, proporcionamos, compartimos o transferimos su información personal a ningún tercero.
B3. Medidas de control de seguridad
Tomamos las medidas necesarias y apropiadas para evitar cualquier filtración, pérdida o daño en su información personal que se esté manejando y, de otro modo, para mantener la seguridad de la información personal, lo que incluye establecer reglas para el manejo de información personal, el monitoreo regular del manejo de la información personal, la capacitación regular de los empleados en el manejo de la información personal, la prevención del robo o la pérdida de los equipos utilizados para manejar la información personal y la implementación de controles de acceso. También supervisamos adecuadamente a nuestros contratistas y empleados que manejan información personal. Puede obtener más detalles sobre las medidas de control de seguridad implementadas en relación con el manejo de su información personal comunicándose con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de solicitudes
.
B4. Información de referencia sobre el tratamiento de datos personales en otros países
Sus datos personales se procesan en la UE y los EE. UU.
B5. Los derechos legales en virtud de APPI
Para ejercer los derechos que le otorga APPI, comuníquese con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de solicitudes
.
APÉNDICE C: ARGENTINA
Si tiene domicilio en la República Argentina, le informamos que la AGENCIA DE ACCESO A LA INFORMACIÓN PÚBLICA, en su calidad de Agencia de Control de la Ley N.º 25.326, tiene facultad para escuchar las quejas y los reclamos que presenten aquellos que consideren que sus derechos se ven afectados por el incumplimiento de las normas vigentes con respecto a la protección de los datos personales.
Se puede comunicar con la Agencia de la siguiente manera:
Dirección: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5º Piso - Ciudad Autónoma de Buenos Aires
Código postal: C1067ABP
Número de teléfono: (54-11) 3988-3968
Correo electrónico: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
APÉNDICE D: SINGAPUR
Si usted es residente de Singapur, lo siguiente se aplica a su persona:
D1. Recopilación, uso y divulgación de sus datos personales
Si usted es residente de Singapur y con su consentimiento, recopilaremos, usaremos o, de otro modo, divulgaremos sus datos personales para cada uno de los fines establecidos en nuestro aviso de privacidad. Puede ejercer su derecho a retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento, pero tenga en cuenta que es posible que no podamos continuar prestándole nuestros servicios en función de la naturaleza y el alcance de su solicitud. Tenga en cuenta también que retirar el consentimiento no afecta nuestro derecho de continuar recopilando, usando y divulgando datos personales cuando dicha recopilación, uso y divulgación sin consentimiento estén permitidos o sean exigidos por las leyes aplicables.[1]
D2. Ejercicio de sus derechos como interesado
Puede controlar los datos personales que hemos recopilado y ejercer cualquiera de los derechos comunicándose con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de solicitudes
. Nuestro objetivo es responder a su solicitud lo antes posible, generalmente dentro de los 30 días. Le informaremos con anticipación si no podemos responder a su solicitud dentro de los 30 días, o si no podemos cumplir con su solicitud y los motivos.[2]
En los casos en los que la ley lo permita, podemos cobrarle un cargo administrativo para cumplir con su solicitud.
D3. Transferencia de sus datos personales a otros países
Si usted es residente de Singapur y nosotros hemos recopilado sus datos, también podemos transferir sus datos fuera de Singapur ocasionalmente. Sin embargo, siempre nos aseguraremos de que sus datos personales continúen recibiendo un estándar de protección que sea al menos comparable con el ofrecido en virtud de la Ley de Protección de Datos Personales de Singapur de 2012, por ejemplo, mediante el uso de Cláusulas Contractuales Modelo de la ASEAN.
APÉNDICE E: COREA DEL SUR
Este Apéndice para Titulares de Datos de Corea explica nuestras prácticas con respecto a la información personal que tratamos en lo concerniente a su relación con nosotros cuando usted es un interesado coreano.
E.1 – Transferencia de la información personal
Proporcionamos información personal o tercerizamos su tratamiento a terceros de acuerdo con lo que se especifica a continuación:
- Entrega de información personal a terceros
Nombre del destinatario
Propósitos de uso por parte del destinatario
Elementos de información personal que se proporcionan al destinatario
Periodos de conservación por parte del destinatario
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Los fines descritos en este aviso en la sección 6 anterior.
Los elementos descritos en este aviso en la sección 5 anterior.
Los periodos de almacenamiento definidos en este aviso en la sección 11 anterior.
- Subcontratación del tratamiento de la información personal a terceros
Busque una lista de todos los tratamientos de datos subcontratados y las respectivas compañías en este enlace:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Nosotros podemos subcontratar el tratamiento de su información personal o transferir su información personal para fines de almacenamiento a terceros ubicados fuera de Corea:
Si no desea transferir su información personal al extranjero, puede negarse al no aceptar la transferencia de información personal o al solicitarnos que detengamos la transferencia transnacional, pero si se niega, es posible que no pueda usar nuestros servicios. El fundamento legal para la transferencia transnacional de información personal antes mencionada es el hecho de que constituye un “tratamiento o almacenamiento subcontratado de información personal que es necesario para la celebración y el cumplimiento de un contrato con el interesado” y los asuntos prescritos por ley han sido divulgados en la política de privacidad (Artículo 28-8(1)(iii) de la Ley de Protección de la Información Personal).
E.2 – Destrucción de la información personal
La información personal se destruirá sin demora cuando la información personal se vuelva innecesaria debido al vencimiento del periodo de conservación o el logro del propósito del tratamiento, etc. El proceso y el método de destrucción se establecen a continuación:
1) Proceso de destrucción: Seleccionamos ciertos elementos de información personal que se destruirán y los destruimos con la aprobación del DPO.
2) Método de destrucción: Destruimos la información personal registrada y almacenada en forma de archivos electrónicos utilizando un método técnico (p. ej., formato de bajo nivel) para garantizar que los registros no puedan ser reproducidos, mientras que la información personal registrada y almacenada en forma de documentos impresos sería triturada o incinerada.
E.3 – Almacenamiento de la información personal
Si se nos exige conservar su información personal de acuerdo con las leyes aplicables, lo haremos para los siguientes fines y por los siguientes periodos, según lo exijan las leyes aplicables.
E.4 – Sus derechos
Puede ejercer sus derechos relacionados con la información personal en nuestra contra, incluida una solicitud de acceso, modificación, eliminación o suspensión del tratamiento de su información personal, según lo dispuesto por la ley aplicable, incluida la Ley de Protección de la Información Personal. También puede ejercer su derecho de retirar el consentimiento para la recopilación/el uso/la entrega de información personal, el derecho a la portabilidad y los derechos relacionados con la toma de decisiones automatizada. También podrá ejercer dichos derechos a través de sus representantes legales u otras personas debidamente autorizadas.
Puede ejercer cualquier derecho pertinente descrito anteriormente comunicándose con nosotros en worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Medidas de seguridad
Implementaremos las medidas de seguridad técnicas, organizativas y físicas que estipulen las leyes coreanas correspondientes para proteger la información personal, como las que se enumeran a continuación:
1) Medidas gerenciales: Designación de un Funcionario de protección de datos, establecimiento e implementación de un plan de gestión interna, capacitación regular de empleados sobre protección de datos, etc.
2) Medidas técnicas: Gestión de la autoridad de acceso al sistema de tratamiento de información personal, instalación de un sistema de control de acceso, instalación de programas de seguridad, etc.; y
3) Medidas físicas: Restricción de acceso a instalaciones y equipos de almacenamiento de información personal, como salas de computadoras y salas de almacenamiento de datos, etc.
E.6 – Comuníquese con nosotros
Si tiene preguntas o consultas en relación con la privacidad y la protección de datos, comuníquese con nuestro Equipo de protección de datos a
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
APÉNDICE F: EE. UU.
La Ley de Privacidad del Consumidor de California (California Consumer Privacy Act), según pueda ser enmendada por la Ley de Derechos de Privacidad de California (California Privacy Rights Act), no se aplica actualmente a nosotros.
APÉNDICE G: BRASIL
G.1 Legislación aplicable, responsable del tratamiento y operador
Si reside en Brasil y sus datos personales se recopilaron en Brasil o si utiliza nuestros Servicios en Brasil, la legislación aplicable es la Ley N.°13.709/2018 (Ley General de Protección de Datos, o “LGPD”).
G.2 Derecho a objetar
Tiene derecho a oponerse al uso de sus datos personales para fines que no dependan del consentimiento si el propósito no se ajusta a la LGPD. Si se confirma su objeción, ya no utilizaremos su información personal para desarrollar y mejorar las características y experiencias de nuestros Servicios.
Tenga en cuenta que, si no proporciona o no permite la recopilación o el tratamiento de ciertos datos personales, esto puede afectar la calidad de su experiencia o puede que no podamos cumplir con los objetivos de nuestros Servicios o que no podamos proveerle ciertos Servicios.
En algunos casos, sus datos se anonimizan, lo que significa que ya no lo identifican. No puede oponerse al uso de datos anonimizados porque ello no permite su identificación, según lo dispuesto en la LGPD. Utilizamos estos datos anonimizados para mejorar nuestros productos y servicios.
G.3 Los derechos legales en virtud de la LGPD
De acuerdo con la LGPD, usted tiene derecho a confirmar la existencia del tratamiento, el acceso, la rectificación o la solicitud de portabilidad de los datos tratados. Además, puede solicitar información sobre las entidades públicas y privadas junto con las cuales usamos sus datos personales. También puede solicitar información sobre la posibilidad de no dar su consentimiento y las consecuencias negativas, y solicitar la eliminación de los datos tratados con su consentimiento. Puede optar por la eliminación de su información en la World App en el menú Configuración.
En determinadas circunstancias, usted tiene derecho a objetar o restringir la forma en que tratamos sus datos personales, o a retirar su consentimiento, en el que nos basamos para realizar el tratamiento de la información que usted proporciona.
Puede ejercer sus derechos en virtud de la LGPD enviando una solicitud a nuestro DPO utilizando los detalles de contacto que se indican en la sección H.4 a continuación o a través de nuestro portal de solicitudes en línea. Si considera que sus derechos no se han abordado adecuadamente, puede presentar una denuncia ante la Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) completando el formulario disponible en este enlace:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Transferencia internacional de sus datos personales
Si la LGPD se aplica a usted y hemos recopilado sus datos personales, también podemos transferirlos fuera del país. Sin embargo, siempre nos aseguraremos de que sus datos personales solo se transfieran a países extranjeros u organizaciones internacionales que proporcionen un nivel de protección acorde al establecido en la LGPD, según lo reconocido en las decisiones de adecuación emitidas por la ANPD. En ausencia de una decisión de adecuación, continuaremos siguiendo un estándar de protección que sea al menos equivalente al establecido en la LGPD, utilizando las cláusulas contractuales modelo establecidas en las regulaciones de la ANPD o cuando obtengamos su consentimiento específico y destacado para la transferencia internacional.
ANEXO I: Fundamentos/propósitos legales para las actividades de tratamiento de datos de Tools for Humanity por jurisdicción
Usuarios
Por qué tratamos los datos
Qué datos personales se tratan
Fundamento legal para el tratamiento
Período de retención
Para crear su cuenta en World App
Dirección de la billetera, metadatos, nombre de usuario
Cumplimiento de contrato
Duración del uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la eliminación de los datos.
Para asegurarse de que tiene la edad elegible
Fecha de nacimiento
Obligación legal
Nunca se guarda su fecha exacta de nacimiento. Solo guardamos si tiene 18 años. Guardamos esta información por el tiempo que use los servicios o hasta que solicite la eliminación de los datos.
Para permitir opcionalmente que sus contactos se comuniquen y realicen transacciones fácilmente con usted
Número de teléfono
Consentimiento
Duración del uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la eliminación de los datos.
Para permitirle comunicarse y realizar transacciones fácilmente con sus contactos
Contactos de la agenda
Consentimiento
Duración del uso de los servicios o hasta que solicite la eliminación de los datos.
Para mostrarle opcionalmente Orbs cercanos a usted
Información sobre ubicación
Consentimiento
Hasta 24 meses.
Para prevenir el fraude en el contexto de la prevención de cuentas
Metadatos, dirección IP, ID del dispositivo
Interés legítimo, es decir, el interés para prevenir ciertos tipos de fraude (LISTA DE TIPOS)
Hasta 24 meses
Para garantizar que el servicio esté permitido en su país
Dirección IP, información de ubicación
Obligación legal
Hasta 24 meses
Para mostrar su billetera de conservación propia y proporcionar una interfaz para transacciones de billetera
Dirección de la billetera, datos de la transacción
Cumplimiento de contrato
No se almacenan datos personales en este contexto.
Para mostrar su World ID de conservación propia y proporcionar una interfaz para verificaciones
Información del World ID
Cumplimiento de contrato
No se almacenan datos personales en este contexto.
Para mostrar sus credenciales de conservación propia y proporcionar una interfaz para compartir las credenciales
Información de credenciales, información de validez de credenciales
Cumplimiento de contrato
No se almacenan datos personales en este contexto.
Analizar y mejorar nuestros servicios y llevar a cabo investigaciones científicas de datos
Datos y metadatos de uso, datos de transacciones públicas
Consentimiento
Hasta 24 meses.
Cumplir con la ley aplicable, como la ley contra el lavado de dinero, y las sanciones.
Datos de la transacción, dirección de la billetera
Obligación legal
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Para cumplir con las leyes aplicables, como las reglamentaciones de contenido
Contenido de la miniaplicación
Obligación legal
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Para permitir la comunicación y el marketing
Dirección de correo electrónico, notificaciones push
Interés legítimo
Hasta 24 meses.
Correspondencia recibida de usted
Interés legítimo
Hasta 24 meses.
Comentarios realizados por usted
Interés legítimo
Hasta 24 meses.
Para gestionar sus solicitudes, quejas y consultas de servicio al cliente
Información de comunicación y correo electrónico o nombre del perfil en redes sociales si busca comunicarse con nosotros a través de dichos medios
Cumplimiento de contrato
Para asegurarse de que la aplicación le funcione sin problemas
Metadatos
Cumplimiento de contrato
Hasta 24 meses.
Para verificar su dispositivo
Datos del World ID del dispositivo (huella dactilar del dispositivo)
Cumplimiento de contrato
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Resolver disputas, resolver problemas y hacer cumplir nuestros acuerdos con usted, incluido este Aviso de Privacidad y los Términos de Usuario.
Duración del uso de los servicios.
Socios comerciales
Por qué tratamos los datos
Qué datos personales se tratan
Fundamento legal para el tratamiento
Período de retención
Comunicación
Número de teléfono, dirección de correo electrónico, nombre
Intereses legítimos, es decir, el interés de comunicarse con socios comerciales.
Duración de la relación comercial o hasta que solicite la eliminación de los datos.
Para mantener y administrar una relación comercial
Número de teléfono, dirección de correo electrónico, nombre, datos empresariales
Intereses legítimos, es decir, el interés de mantener y administrar una relación comercial con socios comerciales.
Duración de la relación comercial o hasta que solicite la eliminación de los datos.
Para cumplir con las obligaciones de KYC
Datos de pasaporte, datos empresariales
Obligación legal
Duración de la relación comercial y hasta 3 años después de la finalización.
Para procesar su solicitud
Datos de la Aplicación
Consentimiento y pasos a solicitud del interesado antes de celebrar un contrato.
Hasta 3 meses de forma predeterminada o más si acepta formar parte de un grupo de talentos.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Déclaration de confidentialité de Tools for Humanity
Merci d’avoir choisi de faire partie de la communauté Worldcoin ! Worldcoin est un protocole open source, soutenu par une communauté mondiale de développeurs, d’individus et d’autres contributeurs.
La présente Déclaration de confidentialité couvre les données que vous nous fournissez par le biais de votre utilisation des sites Web, applications et protocoles (« Application ») et autres services liés à la présente Déclaration de confidentialité (collectivement, les « Services »). La présente Déclaration de confidentialité est incorporée et régie par les
Conditions générales de l’utilisateur
(« Conditions d’utilisation »). Tools for Humanity Corporation (« TFH US »), conjointement à sa filiale allemande Tools for Humanity GmbH (« TFH Germany » ; collectivement «
TFH
», «
nous
» ou «
notre/nos
»), dirige le développement initial et la croissance du protocole Worldcoin, (« Worldcoin »), mais est différent de la Worldcoin Foundation qui contrôle le traitement des données liées à l’Orb.
1. Responsable du traitement
Nous sommes le responsable du traitement de toutes les « Données World App », des « Données de vérification des identifiants » et d’autres « Données commerciales » : Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 États-Unis. TFH est établie dans l’Union européenne («
UE
») par le biais de Tools for Humanity GmbH.
« Données World App » désigne toutes les données à caractère personnel collectées et traitées par le biais de votre utilisation de l’application World App telles que définies plus en détail dans la Section 5 ci-dessous, à l’exception de toutes les données à caractère personnel liées à votre utilisation du protocole Worldcoin ou des jetons Worldcoin (comme votre adresse de portefeuille et les données relatives aux transactions que nous ne contrôlons pas).
Les Données de vérification des identifiants font référence aux données traitées lors de la vérification d’une information d’identification pour l’ajouter à votre World ID auto-conservé. Cela signifie, par exemple, lire la puce NFC de votre passeport pour stocker en toute sécurité les données de votre passeport sur votre appareil. Ces données sont sous votre contrôle et, après avoir vérifié la validité de vos informations d’identification, TFH stocke un fragment anonymisé d’une valeur de hachage d’une signature cryptographique unique de vos informations d’identification (p. ex., passeport) pour s’assurer que chaque information d’identification ne peut être ajoutée qu’une seule fois à un World ID.
« Données commerciales » désigne toutes les données à caractère personnel collectées et traitées par d’autres moyens par notre société lors de la communication ou de toute autre manière en travaillant ou en interagissant avec nous par e-mail, visioconférence ou via nos sites Web. Pour le traitement des données dans le contexte de l’application Orb, veuillez consulter la Déclaration de confidentialité de l’application Orb dont le lien est accessible dans l’application Orb. Pour le traitement des données dans le cadre de la collecte de données dédiées et de tests, veuillez vous reporter à la Déclaration de confidentialité relative à la collecte et la Déclaration de confidentialité relative aux tests, respectivement, dont le lien est accessible dans votre application de test. Pour le traitement dans le contexte de notre site Web, veuillez consulter notre Politique en matière de cookies dont le lien est sur notre site Web.
2. Mises à jour de la présente Déclaration de confidentialité
Nous mettons parfois à jour la présente Déclaration de confidentialité. Si nous apportons des modifications majeures, par exemple à la manière dont nous utilisons vos données à caractère personnel, nous vous en informerons par e-mail ou par message dans votre Application.
3. Que contient la présente Déclaration de confidentialité ?
Notre engagement à protéger votre vie privée et vos données
Les informations que nous collectons et pourquoi nous les collectons
Comment nous utilisons les données que nous collectons
Où nous traitons vos données
Quand nous partageons vos données
Comment vos données sont enregistrées sur la blockchain publique
Comment nous utilisons les cookies
Combien de temps nous conservons vos données
Dans quelle mesure la présente Déclaration de confidentialité diffère pour les enfants et les adolescents
Droits légaux dont vous disposez
Comment nous contacter au sujet de la présente Déclaration de confidentialité
4. Notre engagement à protéger votre vie privée et vos données
Nous sommes profondément engagés à protéger votre vie privée et à sécuriser vos données. Nous reconnaissons que nous pouvons remplir notre mission de distribution équitable de jetons numériques vis-à-vis d’autant de personnes que possible seulement si les gens nous font confiance et que la confidentialité et la sécurité des données sont essentielles pour gagner votre confiance.
Confidentialité
Nous avons conçu nos produits et services en gardant votre vie privée à l’esprit. Nous collectons des données pour améliorer nos produits et services. Nous vous dirons toujours, dans la présente Déclaration de confidentialité ou dans les formulaires de consentement au traitement de vos données pour des produits ou services spécifiques, quelles données nous collectons, pourquoi nous collectons ces données et ce que nous en faisons.
Sécurité des données
Nous disposons d’une équipe dédiée qui prend soin de vos données et avons mis en place des mesures de protection physiques et électroniques qui protègent vos données en transit et au repos. Dans le même temps, aucun service ne peut être entièrement sécurisé. Si vous avez des préoccupations concernant votre compte ou vos données, veuillez nous contacter via notre
Portail de demande
ou nous écrire à l’adresse Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 États-Unis.
5. Les informations que nous collectons et pourquoi nous les collectons
5.1 Données que vous nous fournissez
En tant qu’utilisateur, vous n’êtes pas tenu de fournir des données pour accéder à l’application. Toutefois, vous devrez peut-être nous fournir certaines données afin d’utiliser une fonctionnalité des Services. Les bases juridiques du traitement dans les cas ci-dessous reposent sur le consentement de l’utilisateur et l’exécution d’un contrat (notre engagement à la prestation des Services). Vous trouverez ci-dessous une liste de données que vous pouvez fournir et pour quelles raisons nous pouvons utiliser les données :
Dans le contexte de World App :
Numéro de téléphone.
Vous pouvez choisir de saisir votre numéro de téléphone pour l’associer à votre compte. Avec votre autorisation, d’autres utilisateurs peuvent trouver votre compte via votre numéro de téléphone. Nous pouvons vous demander votre numéro de téléphone lorsque vous soumettez une demande de personne concernée. La base juridique du traitement de ces données est l’exécution du Service en vertu des Conditions d’utilisation.
Nom d’utilisateur.
Vous pouvez lier un nom d’utilisateur à l’adresse de votre portefeuille et modifier ce nom d’utilisateur à tout moment.
Date de naissance.
Vous pouvez divulguer votre date de naissance afin de vous conformer aux exigences de restriction d’âge. Nous ne conserverons jamais les données de votre date de naissance, mais seulement un calcul de ces données et le fait que vous ayez ou non plus de 18 ans.
Commentaires et correspondance de votre part.
Cela comprend les e-mails, messages de discussion instantanée ou autres communications que vous nous envoyez par e-mail ou sites Web de réseaux sociaux tiers. Le traitement peut concerner les adresses e-mail ou les noms de profil de réseaux sociaux si vous cherchez à communiquer avec nous par ces moyens. Nous pouvons faire appel à un prestataire de services tiers pour faciliter les enquêtes sur votre utilisation de nos Services. La base juridique du traitement de ces données est l’exécution du Service en vertu des Conditions d’utilisation.
Contacts du carnet d’adresses.
Vous pouvez fournir à l’application l’accès à votre carnet d’adresses pour activer la fonctionnalité qui vous permet de trouver et d’interagir facilement avec d’autres utilisateurs qui peuvent être dans votre carnet d’adresses. La base juridique du traitement de ces données est l’intérêt légitime du sujet à se trouver dans l’application et l’intérêt de l’utilisateur partageant de trouver ses contacts dans ladite application.
Veuillez noter :
vous êtes tenu de vous assurer que le partage des informations de vos contacts est conforme aux lois en vigueur. Cela peut impliquer que vous obteniez l’autorisation de vos contacts et que vous ne communiquiez pas à TFH les coordonnées d’autres personnes sans leur consentement explicite. Vous pouvez changer d’avis et désactiver notre accès à vos contacts à tout moment dans les paramètres de votre appareil. Si vous choisissez d’importer les contacts du carnet d’adresses de votre appareil vers l’application pour savoir lequel de vos contacts utilise nos Services ou de les inviter à vous rejoindre pour utiliser nos Services, nous synchroniserons périodiquement les numéros de téléphone de vos contacts avec ces numéros et les adresses de portefeuille correspondantes fournies par d’autres utilisateurs sur nos serveurs.
Informations de localisation
. Vous pouvez décider d’activer un service basé sur la localisation (comme une fonctionnalité vous permettant de trouver un Opérateur Orb près de chez vous). Ce n’est qu’avec votre consentement spécifique que nous pourrons alors collecter des informations sur votre géolocalisation par GPS pour permettre au service basé sur la géolocalisation de vous indiquer une Orb près de chez vous. Vous pouvez modifier vos autorisations à tout moment dans les paramètres de votre appareil. Si vous n’êtes pas situé en Corée du Sud, nous pouvons également stocker votre emplacement approximatif dissocié de votre compte World App. Nous utilisons ces données pour améliorer nos services, en particulier, mais sans s’y limiter, la sélection des sites Orb.
P2P Marketplace
. Si vous utilisez les Services P2P Marketplace (le cas échéant) qui vous permettent d’acheter des jetons numériques auprès d’autres utilisateurs, nous pouvons collecter des informations supplémentaires telles que votre adresse de portefeuille, vos coordonnées (c’est-à-dire votre numéro de téléphone) et votre numéro de compte associé à la transaction (comme votre numéro M-PESA). Nous enregistrons les données de transaction dans le cadre de la fourniture des Services P2P Marketplace. Nous pouvons également recueillir des informations supplémentaires pour nous conformer aux exigences KYC applicables.
Métadonnées de l’appareil.
Si vous utilisez l’application, nous collectons les métadonnées de votre appareil pour nous assurer que l’application fonctionne correctement et que vous n’enfreignez pas nos Conditions générales. Cela inclut la collecte des identifiants d’appareil et des adresses IP.
Données d’identification World ID de l’appareil.
Nous traitons également les métadonnées de votre appareil pour calculer une empreinte digitale unique. Le hachage de cette empreinte digitale sert de signal qui prouve l'unicité de votre appareil World ID.
Dans le cadre du traitement des Données commerciales :
Prénom et nom.
Nous pouvons traiter votre prénom et votre nom pour poursuivre l’intérêt légitime de maintenir et d’administrer une relation commerciale avec vous.
Adresse e-mail.
Vous pouvez également fournir votre e-mail pour vous abonner à notre liste de diffusion afin de rester informé du projet Worldcoin. Nous pouvons vous demander votre adresse e-mail lorsque vous soumettez une demande de personne concernée. Nous pouvons traiter votre adresse e-mail pour poursuivre l’intérêt légitime de maintenir et d’administrer une relation commerciale avec vous.
Numéro de téléphone.
Nous pouvons traiter votre numéro de téléphone pour poursuivre l’intérêt légitime de maintenir et d’administrer une relation commerciale avec vous.
Données d’entreprise
. Si vous entretenez une relation commerciale avec nous (par exemple, si vous êtes un Opérateur Orb ou un fournisseur), nous pouvons exiger des informations telles que les noms, l’adresse postale, l’adresse électronique, le numéro de téléphone, l’adresse du portefeuille et d’autres documents (tels que votre identifiant gouvernemental) dans le cadre de cette relation commerciale et pour satisfaire à nos obligations de connaissance des clients. Nous pouvons utiliser des services tiers, comme Onfido, pour nous aider à collecter et examiner les informations et la documentation ci-dessus afin de satisfaire aux obligations de connaissance des clients.
Données d’application
. Si vous souhaitez travailler pour nous, vous devez nous envoyer votre candidature avec votre lettre de motivation et votre CV ainsi que les données à caractère personnel que vous souhaitez divulguer.
Vous trouverez la base juridique pour le traitement de chacune des activités de traitement de données ci-dessus détaillée en
ANNEXE I – Fondements juridiques des activités de traitement de données de Tools for Humanity
à la fin de la présente déclaration de confidentialité.
5.2 Données que nous collectons auprès de sources tierces
Nous pouvons occasionnellement obtenir des informations vous concernant auprès des sources tierces suivantes :
Données de chaîne de blocs (Blockchain)
. Nous pouvons analyser les données de la blockchain publique pour nous assurer que les parties utilisant nos Services ne mènent pas d’activités illégales ou interdites en vertu des Conditions d’utilisation, et pour analyser les tendances des transactions à des fins de recherche et de développement.
Services de vérification d’identité
. Nous pouvons obtenir des informations auprès de services tiers en utilisant vos données pour vérifier votre identité si la loi l’exige (comme les exigences de connaissance des clients). À titre de clarification, nous n’utilisons
pas
vos données biométriques lorsque nous vérifions votre identité comme la loi l’exige.
Bases de données des talents
. Nous pouvons collecter des données provenant de diverses sources pour proposer des offres d’emploi à des personnes talentueuses.
5.3 Données que nous collectons automatiquement
Si cela est autorisé par la loi applicable, nous pouvons collecter certains types de données automatiquement lorsque vous interagissez avec nos Services. Ces informations nous aident à résoudre les problèmes rapportés à l’assistance client, à améliorer les performances des Services, à vous proposer une expérience rationalisée et personnalisée et à sécuriser vos identifiants de compte. Les informations collectées automatiquement comprennent :
Identifiants en ligne.
Informations de géolocalisation et de suivi (voir ci-dessus), système d’exploitation de l’ordinateur ou du téléphone portable, nom et version du navigateur Web et adresses IP. Dans des cas très limités, ces données sont également intégrées à notre détection de la fraude et des flux financiers illicites. Elles servent également à fournir à notre logiciel une expérience stable et sans fraude.
Données d’utilisation.
Données d’authentification, questions de sécurité et autres données collectées par l’intermédiaire de cookies et de technologies similaires.
Cookies.
Petits fichiers de données stockés sur votre disque dur ou dans la mémoire de votre appareil et nous aidant à améliorer nos Services et votre expérience, à voir quelles zones et fonctionnalités de nos Services sont populaires, et à compter le nombre de visites. Pour la base juridique du traitement de ces données, veuillez consulter notre
Politique relative aux cookies
où nous expliquons les différents types de cookies que nous utilisons.
De même, l’application rassemble des informations pour le dépannage et l’amélioration. Nous utilisons des services tiers, tels que Segment.io ou PostHog, pour afficher des informations agrégées sur l’utilisation et les interactions de l’utilisateur final. Lorsque cela est possible, nous prenons des mesures pour minimiser ou masquer les informations envoyées à des tiers (comme l’encodage des données).
5.4 Données anonymisées et agrégées
L’anonymisation est une technique de traitement des données qui rejette les données à caractère personnel : une fois anonymisées, les données ne peuvent plus être associées à une personne en particulier. Parmi les données anonymisées, on peut citer ce qui suit :
Données de transaction
Données de flux de clics
Indicateurs de performance
Indicateurs de fraude (bien que des données à caractère personnel soient également utilisées à cette fin)
Nous agrégeons également les données en combinant de grandes quantités d’informations afin qu’elles n’identifient plus ou ne fassent plus référence à une personne. Nous utilisons des données anonymisées ou agrégées pour servir nos objectifs commerciaux, par exemple pour comprendre les besoins et comportements des utilisateurs, améliorer nos Services, mener des activités de veille économique et de marketing, détecter les menaces de sécurité et entraîner nos algorithmes.
La base juridique du traitement des données susmentionnées repose sur l’intérêt légitime d’une application ou d’un site Web fonctionnel, les informations commerciales et la prévention de la fraude.
6. Comment nous utilisons les données que nous collectons
6.1 Description générale
Nous devons avoir une raison valable (ou une « base juridique pour le traitement ») d’utiliser vos données à caractère personnel. Dans certains cas, l’utilisation de vos données à caractère personnel ne nécessite pas votre consentement préalable. Nous utilisons vos données aux fins suivantes :
pour fournir et maintenir nos produits et services en vertu des Conditions d’utilisation. Ces services comprennent :
l’application dans laquelle les utilisateurs peuvent gérer leur World ID et leurs jetons numériques, ainsi qu’en savoir plus sur la cryptomonnaie en général et le projet Worldcoin en particulier ;
l’application opérateur dans laquelle les Opérateurs Orb peuvent gérer et superviser leurs Orbs sous gestion et leurs statistiques ;
la place de marché P2P où nous connectons les utilisateurs avec des agents (ne s’applique pas aux utilisateurs qui sont établis ou résident en Allemagne ou qui ont leur résidence habituelle ou leur siège social en Allemagne) ;
pour fournir, maintenir, améliorer et développer nos produits et services, y compris pour déboguer et réparer les erreurs dans nos Services ;
pour mener des recherches en science des données ;
pour analyser votre utilisation de nos Services afin de fournir une meilleure assistance ;
pour vous permettre de publier des informations sur une blockchain afin de prouver votre caractère unique ;
pour utiliser votre adresse de portefeuille afin de vous envoyer des jetons numériques que nous prenons en charge ;
pour se conformer à la loi applicable, telle que la loi anti-blanchiment et les sanctions. Cela implique :
l’utilisation de votre adresse IP pour bloquer des personnes dont le pays ne leur permet pas d’accéder aux Services ;
répondre aux demandes des personnes concernées en vertu des lois applicables en matière de protection des données, telles que les demandes d’accès ou de suppression ;
surveiller les flux financiers potentiellement illicites, par ex. provenant de portefeuilles sur liste noire ; et
pour se conformer aux lois applicables, comme les réglementations contre le contenu illégal.
pour gérer vos demandes, réclamations et demandes de service client ;
pour résoudre les litiges et les problèmes et pour faire appliquer nos accords avec vous, y compris la présente Déclaration de confidentialité et les Conditions d’utilisation ;
pour vous contacter concernant les mises à jour des Services.
6.2 Identifiants
TFH vous permet de stocker certains Identifiants localement sur votre appareil pour les partager dans l’infrastructure de preuve à divulgation nulle de connaissance du protocole World ID (« Identifiants »). Dans le contexte des Identifiants, nous traitons ces données comme suit :
Nous vérifions la validité de vos Identifiants (dans le cas des passeports, cela fonctionne avec le certificat racine de votre pays).
Nous vous authentifions en tant que titulaire légitime des identifiants (pour les passeports, cela fonctionne localement sur votre appareil avec une photo de votre visage (selfie) qui n’est jamais stockée).
Nous chiffrons, signons et stockons les données de vos identifiants dans un environnement sécurisé sur votre appareil.
Nous n’avons jamais accès aux données à caractère personnel contenues dans vos identifiants.
Vous pourrez ensuite partager ces informations de manière sélective avec les parties dépendantes par le biais des protections du protocole World ID (p. ex., vous pouvez prouver que vous avez au moins 18 ans sans révéler votre âge exact ou qui vous êtes).
Pour les passeports, TFH ne conserve qu’une partition anonymisée d’une valeur de hachage d’une signature cryptographique unique de votre passeport pour s’assurer que chaque passeport ne peut être vérifié qu’une seule fois.
Ce traitement est basé sur votre consentement et nous n’avons jamais accès à vos données personnelles de votre passeport qui est stocké sur votre appareil. Vous pouvez supprimer ces données de votre téléphone en supprimant World App.
6.3 Données World ID
Votre World ID (c.-à-d. le numéro secret requis pour l’utiliser) est stocké sur votre appareil uniquement (si vous avez une sauvegarde, il existe une copie chiffrée dans votre sauvegarde). Ni TFH ni personne d’autre n’a accès à votre World ID. Vous pouvez utiliser votre World ID de manière anonyme. Chaque fois que vous utilisez World ID avec une nouvelle application, l’application ne reçoit qu’un numéro jetable (« Annulateur ») qui ne révèle pas votre World ID. Cette fonction est activée via la Preuve à Divulgation Nulle de Connaissance (vous devez seulement prouver que vous disposez d’un World ID vérifié, mais pas le divulguer) et garantit que votre World ID ne peut pas être utilisé pour vous suivre d’une application à l’autre. Cela signifie que World ID n’est pas un identifiant utilisateur général pour Internet.
Les preuves World ID fonctionnent grâce à un protocole ouvert accédant à un arbre de Merkle public des hachages des World ID vérifiés. World ID n’est pas un service centralisé, mais un protocole auquel tout le monde peut accéder. Nous proposons des API pour faciliter l’accès à l’arbre de Merkle et aux preuves World ID, mais nous ne recevons jamais de données à caractère personnel dans ce contexte.
Il est important de noter que nous ne traitons pas non plus de données liées à votre World ID qui nous permettraient de vous identifier. Toutes les données à caractère personnel traitées dans le cadre de World App, en particulier l’adresse de votre portefeuille et les données de transaction, sont délibérément conçues pour être dissociées des données de World ID.
7. Où nous traitons vos données
7.1 Transfert de données.
Lorsque vous nous fournissez vos données, celles-ci peuvent être transférées, conservées ou traitées dans un lieu autre que celui où vos données ont été collectées à l’origine. Le pays dans lequel vos données sont transférées, conservées ou traitées peut ne pas avoir les mêmes lois en matière de protection des données que le pays dans lequel vous avez initialement fourni les données.
Nous faisons de notre mieux pour respecter les principes énoncés dans chaque juridiction concernant les lois sur la protection de la vie privée. Nous partageons les données avec des sous-traitants en dehors de votre juridiction uniquement si un tel transfert est légal et si nous sommes convaincus que le sous-traitant protégera vos données conformément aux lois applicables et, en outre, conformément à nos normes.
7.2 Risques de transfert
Vous trouverez ci-dessous une liste des risques possibles qui peuvent survenir si nous transférons vos données aux États-Unis, dans l’Union européenne ou dans un autre pays. Nous résumons également ci-dessous la manière dont nous atténuons les risques respectifs.
Bien que nous fassions tout notre possible pour nous assurer que nos sous-traitants sont contractuellement tenus de protéger vos données de manière adéquate, ces sous-traitants peuvent ne pas être soumis à la législation en matière de protection des données de votre pays. Si les sous-traitants devaient traiter illégalement vos données sans autorisation, il pourrait être difficile de faire valoir vos droits à la vie privée contre ce sous-traitant. Nous atténuons ce risque lorsque nous concluons des accords stricts de traitement des données avec nos sous-traitants qui les obligent à protéger les données au niveau du RGPD et à répondre aux demandes des personnes.
Il est possible que la loi sur la protection des données de votre pays soit incompatible avec les lois sur la confidentialité des données aux États-Unis ou dans l’UE. Nous essayons toujours de respecter le plus haut niveau de protection des données auquel nous sommes soumis.
Il est possible que vos données soient soumises à l’accès gouvernemental des fonctionnaires et des autorités. Dans ces cas-là, nous nous sommes engagés à contester toute demande d’accès au tribunal invalide, excessive ou illégale du gouvernement. Nous utilisons en outre un chiffrement avancé pour empêcher tout accès non autorisé.
Veuillez noter que cette liste contient des exemples, mais peut ne pas inclure tous les risques possibles pour vous.
7.3 Cadre de protection des données pour les transferts de données aux États-Unis
TFH respecte le Cadre de protection des données UE–États-Unis (CPD UE–États-Unis), l’extension britannique du Cadre de protection des données UE–États-Unis et le cadre de protection des données Suisse–États-Unis (CPD Suisse–États-Unis), tels que définis par le Département américain du commerce. TFH a certifié au Département américain du commerce qu’il adhère aux principes du Cadre de protection des données UE–États-Unis (principes du CPD UE–États-Unis) en ce qui concerne le traitement des données à caractère personnel reçues de l’Union européenne en vertu du CPD UE–États-Unis et du Royaume-Uni (et de Gibraltar) en vertu de l’extension britannique du CPD UE–États-Unis. TFH a certifié au Département américain du commerce qu’il adhère aux principes du Cadre de protection des données Suisse–États-Unis (principes du CPD Suisse–États-Unis) en ce qui concerne le traitement des données à caractère personnel reçues de la Suisse en vertu du CPD Suisse–États-Unis. En cas de conflit entre les conditions du présent avis relatif au Cadre de protection des données et les principes du CPD UE–États-Unis et/ou les principes du CPD Suisse–États-Unis, ce sont les Principes qui prévalent. Pour en savoir plus sur le programme du cadre de protection des données (CPD) et pour consulter notre certification, veuillez vous rendre à l’adresse suivante
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH est responsable du traitement des données à caractère personnel qu’il reçoit dans le cadre du CPD et qu’il transfère ensuite à un tiers qui intervient en tant que mandataire en son nom. TFH se conforme aux principes du CPD pour tous les transferts ultérieurs de données à caractère personnel en provenance de l’UE, du Royaume-Uni et de la Suisse, y compris les dispositions relatives à la responsabilité en cas de transfert ultérieur.
La Federal Trade Commission (Commission fédérale du commerce) est compétente en ce qui concerne le respect par TFH du CPD UE–États-Unis, de l’extension britannique du CPD UE–États-Unis et du CPD Suisse–États-Unis. Dans certaines situations, TFH peut être tenu de divulguer des données à caractère personnel en réponse à des demandes légales émanant d’autorités publiques, notamment pour répondre à des exigences de sécurité nationale ou d’application de la loi.
Conformément au CPD UE–États-Unis et à l’extension britannique du CPD UE–États-Unis et du CPD Suisse–États-Unis, TFH s’engage à résoudre les plaintes liées aux principes du CPD concernant la collecte et l’utilisation de vos données à caractère personnel. Les personnes de l’UE, du Royaume-Uni et de la Suisse ayant des questions ou des réclamations concernant notre traitement des données à caractère personnel reçues en vertu du RGPD UE–États-Unis et de l’extension britannique du RGPD UE–États-Unis et du RGPD Suisse–États-Unis doivent d’abord contacter TFH à l’adresse suivante : dpo@worldcoin.org
Conformément au CPD UE–États-Unis et à l’extension britannique du CPD UE–États-Unis et du CPD Suisse–États-Unis, TFH s’engage à coopérer et à se conformer respectivement à l’avis du panel établi par les autorités de protection des données (APD) de l’UE} et l’Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) du Royaume-Uni, ainsi que l’Autorité de régulation de Gibraltar (GRA) et le Préposé fédéral suisse à la protection des données et à l’information (PFPDT)} en ce qui concerne les plaintes non résolues relatives à notre traitement des données à caractère personnel reçues en vertu du CPD UE–États-Unis et de l’extension britannique du CPD UE–États-Unis et du CPD Suisse–États-Unis.
Pour les plaintes concernant le respect du CPD qui ne sont pas résolues par l’un des autres mécanismes du CPD, vous avez la possibilité, sous certaines conditions, de recourir à un arbitrage contraignant. De plus amples informations sont disponibles sur le site officiel du CPD.
8. Quand nous partageons vos données
Nous ne vendrons jamais vos données
.
Lorsque nous partageons vos données en dehors de notre organisation, nous nous assurerons toujours de prendre les mesures suivantes :
les partager de manière raisonnablement sécurisée ;
effectuer les démarches nécessaires pour faire en sorte qu’elles soient traitées conformément à notre engagement de respect de votre vie privée ; et
interdire à d’autres sociétés de les utiliser à leurs propres fins.
Nous partageons vos données de ces manières limitées :
avec la Worldcoin Foundation :
nous pouvons agir au nom de Worldcoin, en tant que sous-traitants de la Worldcoin Foundation, pour la collecte de données à caractère personnel (veuillez consulter l’avis de confidentialité de Worldcoin pour plus d’informations).
au sein de notre entreprise :
nous ne divulguons les données qu’aux membres de l’équipe qui ont besoin d’y accéder pour accomplir leurs tâches et leurs obligations. Nous ne divulguons que les données nécessaires pour effectuer des tâches et des fonctions spécifiques et disposons d’un système de contrôle strict de l’accès.
avec les fournisseurs et prestataires de services hors de notre entreprise :
nous ne divulguons les données qu’aux prestataires de services sur lesquels nous nous appuyons pour traiter les données et vous fournir nos Services. Nous ne divulguons les données avec les prestataires de services de vérification d’identité que si la Loi l’exige (c.-à-d., les exigences de connaissance des clients).
les catégories de ces prestataires de services sont :
les fournisseurs de services cloud (tous types de données) ;
les fournisseurs SaaS ; nous utilisons des produits SaaS dans les catégories suivantes :
la gestion des bases de données et des infrastructures ;
la sécurité des données ;
le recrutement ;
Communication
les enquêtes
les contrôles KYC/KYB, c.-à-d. la vérification des documents officiels ;
la gestion des demandes des personnes concernées ;
l’assistance technique ;
l’assistance utilisateur ;
les experts externes :
les développeurs logiciels spécialisés ;
les spécialistes juridiques ;
les conseillers fiscaux ;
les banques ;
les prestataires de services d’étiquetage (uniquement sous protections spéciales) ;
les services de vérification des antécédents pour les candidats et les Opérateurs Orb ;
avec les forces de l'ordre, des fonctionnaires ou d'autres tiers :
nous pouvons divulguer vos données afin de nous conformer aux lois applicables et de répondre aux exigences légales obligatoires ; Nous examinerons attentivement chaque demande pour déterminer si la demande est conforme à la loi et, le cas échéant, nous pourrons contester les demandes invalides, abusives ou illégales. nous pouvons partager des données à caractère personnel avec la police et d’autres autorités gouvernementales lorsque nous estimons raisonnablement qu’elles sont nécessaires pour nous conformer à la loi, à la réglementation ou à toute autre procédure ou obligation légale ;
nous pouvons partager vos données à caractère personnel si nous pensons que vos actions sont incompatibles avec nos Conditions d’utilisation, vous avez enfreint la loi, ou qu’il est nécessaire de protéger nos droits, notre propriété et notre sécurité, nos utilisateurs, le public ou d’autres personnes ;
nous pouvons partager vos données à caractère personnel avec nos avocats et autres conseillers professionnels lorsque cela est nécessaire pour obtenir des conseils ou protéger et gérer nos intérêts commerciaux ;
nous pouvons partager vos données à caractère personnel dans le cadre de, ou pendant les négociations concernant toute fusion, vente d’actifs de la société, financement ou acquisition de tout ou partie de notre activité par une autre société ;
les données, y compris vos données à caractère personnel, peuvent être partagées entre nos sociétés mères, affiliés et filiales actuelles et futures, ainsi qu’avec d’autres sociétés sous contrôle et propriété communs ;
nous pouvons partager vos données à caractère personnel avec votre consentement ou selon vos instructions.
9. Comment vos données sont enregistrées sur la blockchain publique
Les informations de transaction relatives à votre utilisation de nos Services peuvent être enregistrées sur une blockchain publique.
Veuillez noter :
les blockchains sont des registres publics de transactions qui sont conservés sur des réseaux décentralisés exploités par des tiers qui ne sont pas contrôlés ou exploités par Worldcoin. En raison de la nature publique et immuable des registres de blockchain, nous ne pouvons pas garantir la possibilité de modifier, d’effacer ou de contrôler la divulgation des données qui sont téléchargées et stockées sur une blockchain.
10. Comment nous utilisons les cookies
Nous utilisons des cookies pour permettre à nos Services de mieux fonctionner. Outre les cookies, nous pouvons utiliser d’autres technologies similaires, comme les balises Web, pour suivre les utilisateurs de nos Services. Les balises Web (également dénommés « pixels invisibles ») sont de minuscules graphiques avec un identifiant unique, dont la fonction est similaire à celle des cookies. Notre
Politique relative aux cookies
est intégrée aux présentes par renvoi.
Nous utilisons également Google Analytics. Pour en savoir plus sur la manière dont Google utilise vos données lorsque vous utilisez les sites Web et applications de ses partenaires :
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. En utilisant les Services, vous consentez à ce que nous stockions des cookies et autres données sur votre ordinateur ou appareil mobile et y accédions, et à l’utilisation de Google Analytics dans le cadre de ces activités. Veuillez lire les informations contenues sur la page accessible via le lien fourni afin de comprendre ce à quoi vous consentez.
11. Combien de temps conservons-nous vos données ?
Sauf stipulation contraire des lois en vigueur, nous conservons vos données aussi longtemps que raisonnablement nécessaire pour vous fournir nos Services, servir nos objectifs commerciaux légitimes et nous conformer à nos obligations légales et réglementaires. Si vous fermez votre compte chez nous, nous supprimerons les données du compte dans un délai d’un mois. Sinon, nous les supprimerons après 2 ans d’inactivité. Si nous y sommes tenus par la loi, nous continuerons à conserver vos données à caractère personnel si nécessaire pour nous conformer à nos obligations légales et réglementaires, y compris la surveillance, la détection et la prévention des fraudes, ainsi qu’aux obligations fiscales, comptables et financières.
Veuillez noter :
les blockchains sont des réseaux décentralisés tiers que nous ne contrôlons et n’exploitons pas. En raison de la nature publique et immuable de la technologie blockchain, nous ne pouvons pas modifier, effacer ou contrôler la divulgation des données qui sont conservées sur des blockchains.
12. Dans quelle mesure la présente Déclaration de confidentialité diffère pour les enfants et les adolescents
Les personnes âgées de moins de 18 ans ne sont pas autorisées à utiliser les Services, et nous ne collectons pas sciemment de données auprès de personnes âgées de moins de 18 ans. Si vous pensez que votre enfant de moins de 18 ans a eu accès aux Services sans votre autorisation, vous pouvez demander la suppression de ses données en nous contactant par l’intermédiaire du
Portail de demande
.
Si nous apprenons que nous avons collecté des données concernant un enfant de moins de 18 ans, nous supprimerons ces données aussi rapidement que possible. Nous avons pris des mesures telles que la mise en œuvre d’un modèle d’IA automatisé de détection de l’âge, des instructions aux opérateurs et des auto-confirmations pour limiter l’utilisation des Services aux personnes âgées d’au moins 18 ans. Nous ne commercialisons pas de produits ou de services pour les enfants.
13. Comment nous contacter à propos de la présente Déclaration de confidentialité
Vous pouvez choisir de supprimer vos données depuis l’application, dans le menu Paramètres. Si vous avez des questions ou des préoccupations concernant la présente Déclaration de confidentialité et que vous souhaitez exercer vos droits ou contacter notre Délégué à la protection des données (DPD), veuillez soumettre votre demande via notre
Portail de demande
ou nous écrire à : Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104, États-Unis ou sur
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Nous répondons à toutes les demandes que nous recevons de personnes souhaitant exercer leurs droits en matière de protection des données conformément aux lois applicables en matière de protection des données. Vous pouvez également supprimer vos données depuis World App.
Si l’une de vos préoccupations concernant la protection ou l’utilisation des données n’a pas été traitée de manière satisfaisante, veuillez contacter l’organisme de réglementation de la protection des données de votre pays. Si vous résidez dans l’UE, vous pouvez trouver votre organisme de régulation et de protection des données
ici
.
14. Vos droits
Les droits suivants sont applicables dans la mesure où nous pouvons identifier le demandeur dans notre base de données et où nous ne violons pas les droits d’autres personnes concernées en exerçant les droits du demandeur :
vous avez le droit d’obtenir de nous, à tout moment et sur demande, des informations sur les données à caractère personnel que nous traitons vous concernant ; vous avez le droit de recevoir de notre part les données personnelles vous concernant ;
Vous avez le droit de nous demander de corriger immédiatement les données à caractère personnel vous concernant si elles sont incorrectes.
vous avez le droit de nous demander de supprimer les données à caractère personnel vous concernant. Ces prérequis prévoient notamment un droit à l’effacement si les données à caractère personnel ne sont plus nécessaires aux fins pour lesquelles elles ont été collectées ou autrement traitées, à condition que les exigences de suppression en vertu des lois en vigueur soient données (par ex., les lois de plusieurs juridictions nous obligent à conserver les informations de transaction pendant une certaine période) ;
vous avez le droit de retirer librement votre consentement à tout traitement de données basé sur le consentement ou de vous opposer au traitement de données si celui-ci n’est pas basé sur le consentement.
15. ADDENDA
Dans les paragraphes suivants, plusieurs addenda fournissent les informations prévues par la loi pour les marchés où nous menons nos activités. Ces informations font partie du consentement en fonction de la région dans laquelle réside la personne concernée. Ces informations peuvent être différentes de celles prévues dans le lieu où vous vous trouvez, car nous bloquons certains services dans certaines juridictions. En cas d’écart avec ce qui précède, la déclaration la plus spécifique concernant la juridiction particulière prévaut :
Addendum A : Espace économique européen (“EEE”) et Royaume-Uni (“RU”)
Si vous êtes situé dans l’EEE ou au Royaume-Uni, les conditions suivantes vous sont applicables : vous disposez au moins des droits suivants. Vous pourriez avoir d’autres droits en vertu du Règlement général sur la protection des données, du Règlement UE 2016/679 du 27/04/2016 (« RGPD” ») comme indiqué ci-dessous. Pour exercer vos droits en vertu du RGPD, veuillez nous contacter sur notre
Portail de demande
. Hormis les cas exceptionnels, nous répondrons à votre demande dans le délai légal d’un mois. L’utilisation du mot RGPD dans la section suivante implique également le RGPD du Royaume-Uni transposé dans le droit national britannique dans la loi britannique relative à la protection des données (UK Data Protection Act) de 2018 et maintenue dans le droit en vigueur en Angleterre et au Pays de Galles, en Écosse et en Irlande du Nord conformément à la
section 3
de la loi de l’Union européenne (Retrait) de 2018 et tel que modifié par
l’Annexe
1
des Réglementations de 2019 (Sortie de l’UE) relatives à la protection des données, à la confidentialité et aux communications électroniques (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Droits légaux garantis par le RGPD
Cette section s’applique si le traitement de vos données relève du champ d’application du RGPD (
par ex.
, si vous résidez dans l’EEE ou au Royaume-Uni). Vous pouvez avoir des droits supplémentaires en vertu du RGPD comme indiqué ci-dessous. Pour exercer vos droits en vertu du RGPD, veuillez nous contacter sur notre
Portail de demande
.
Vous avez le droit d’obtenir de nous à tout moment, sur demande, des informations sur les données à caractère personnel que nous traitons vous concernant dans le cadre de l’art. 15 du RGPD.
Vous avez le droit de nous demander de corriger immédiatement les données à caractère personnel vous concernant si elles sont incorrectes.
Vous avez le droit, dans les conditions décrites à l’article 17 du RGPD, de nous demander de supprimer les données à caractère personnel vous concernant. Ces prérequis prévoient notamment un droit à l’effacement si les données à caractère personnel ne sont plus nécessaires aux fins pour lesquelles elles ont été collectées ou autrement traitées, ainsi qu’en cas de traitement illégal, d’existence d’une objection ou d’une obligation d’effacement en vertu du droit de l’Union ou du droit de l’État membre auquel nous sommes soumis.
Vous avez le droit d’exiger que nous limitions le traitement conformément à l’art. 18 du RGPD.
Vous avez le droit de recevoir de notre part les données à caractère personnel vous concernant que vous nous avez fournies dans un format structuré, couramment utilisé et lisible par machine conformément à l’art. 20 du RGPD.
Vous avez le droit de vous opposer à tout moment, pour des motifs liés à votre situation particulière, au traitement des données à caractère personnel vous concernant qui est effectué, entre autres, sur la base de l’article 6 (1) paragraphe 1, alinéa f, du RGPD, conformément à l’article 21 du RGPD.
Vous avez le droit de contacter l’autorité de contrôle compétente en cas de réclamations concernant le traitement des données effectué par le responsable du traitement. L’autorité de contrôle responsable est : le Bureau bavarois pour le contrôle de la protection des données (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Si le traitement des données à caractère personnel est basé sur votre consentement, vous avez le droit, en vertu de l’art. 7 du RGPD, de révoquer votre consentement à l’utilisation de vos données à caractère personnel à tout moment avec effet à l’avenir, moyennant quoi la révocation est tout aussi facile à déclarer que le consentement lui-même. Veuillez noter que la révocation ne prend effet que pour l’avenir. Le traitement qui a eu lieu avant la révocation n’est pas affecté.
A.2 Transfert de données
Lorsque nous transférons des données vers un pays qui n’a pas de décision d’adéquation, nous utilisons les Clauses contractuelles types de l’UE. Nous ne transférons actuellement des données à caractère personnel qu’aux États-Unis.
Si le traitement des données à caractère personnel est basé sur votre consentement, vous avez le droit, en vertu de l’art. 7 du RGPD, de révoquer votre consentement à l’utilisation de vos données à caractère personnel à tout moment avec effet à l’avenir, moyennant quoi la révocation est tout aussi facile à déclarer que le consentement lui-même. Veuillez noter que la révocation ne prend effet que pour l’avenir. Le traitement qui a eu lieu avant la révocation n’est pas affecté. Veuillez également noter que le retrait du consentement n’affecte pas le traitement qui n’est pas basé sur le consentement.
ADDENDUM B : JAPON
Si vous résidez au Japon, les conditions suivantes vous sont également applicables :
B1. Informations concernant les réglementations japonaises
Nous nous conformons aux lois et réglementations japonaises, y compris la Loi sur la protection des données à caractère personnel du Japon (« APPI »). Cette section s’applique à notre traitement des « informations à caractère personnel » telles que définies dans l’APPI, avec préséance sur les autres parties du présent Formulaire de consentement relatif aux données biométriques.
Nous nous conformons aux lois et réglementations japonaises, y compris la Loi sur la protection des données à caractère personnel du Japon (« APPI »). Cette section s’applique à notre traitement des « informations à caractère personnel » telles que définies dans l’APPI, avec préséance sur les autres parties de la présente Déclaration de confidentialité.
B2. Partage de données
Sauf autorisation contraire des lois en vigueur, nous ne divulguons, ne vendons, ne fournissons, ne partageons ni ne transférons vos données à caractère personnel à aucun tiers.
B3. Mesures de contrôle de sécurité
Nous prenons les mesures nécessaires et appropriées pour empêcher toute fuite, perte ou altération de vos données à caractère personnel traitées et pour assurer la sécurité des données à caractère personnel, notamment en [établissant des règles pour le traitement des données à caractère personnel, en le contrôlant régulièrement, en formant régulièrement les employés au traitement des données à caractère personnel, en prévenant le vol ou la perte de l'équipement utilisé pour traiter les données à caractère personnel, et en mettant en place des contrôles d'accès. Nous supervisons également de manière appropriée nos sous-traitants et employés qui traitent des données à caractère personnel. Vous pouvez obtenir plus de détails sur les mesures de contrôle de sécurité qui sont en place en ce qui concerne le traitement de vos données à caractère personnel en nous contactant sur notre
Portail de demande
.
B4. Informations de référence sur le traitement de données à caractère personnel dans des pays étrangers
Vos données à caractère personnel sont traitées dans l’UE et aux États-Unis.
B5. Les droits légaux en vertu de l’APPI
Pour exercer vos droits en vertu de l’APPI, veuillez nous contacter sur notre
Portail de demande
.
ADDENDUM C : ARGENTINE
Si vous résidez en République d’Argentine, nous vous informons que l’AGENCE D’ACCÈS AUX INFORMATIONS PUBLIQUES, en sa qualité d’Agence de contrôle de la loi n° 25,326, a le pouvoir de recevoir les plaintes et réclamations déposées par les personnes dont les droits sont affectés par le non-respect des règles en vigueur en matière de protection des données à caractère personnel.
L’Agence peut être contactée comme suit :
Adresse : Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5e étage - Commune autonome de Buenos Aires
Code postal : C1067ABP
Numéro de téléphone : (54-11) 3988-3968
E-mail : datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADDENDUM D : SINGAPOUR
Si vous résidez à Singapour, les conditions suivantes vous sont applicables :
D1. Collecte, utilisation et divulgation de vos données à caractère personnel
Si vous résidez à Singapour et avec votre consentement, nous collecterons, utiliserons ou divulguerons autrement vos données à caractère personnel pour chacune des finalités énoncées dans notre avis de confidentialité. Vous pouvez exercer votre droit de retirer votre consentement à tout moment, mais veuillez noter que nous pourrions ne pas être en mesure de continuer à vous fournir nos services selon la nature et la portée de votre demande. Veuillez également noter que le retrait du consentement n’affecte pas notre droit de continuer à collecter, utiliser et divulguer des données à caractère personnel lorsque cette collecte, utilisation et divulgation sans consentement est autorisée ou requise en vertu des lois en vigueur.[1]
D2. Exercice de vos droits en tant que personne concernée
Vous pouvez contrôler les données à caractère personnel que nous avons collectées et exercer l’un quelconque de vos droits en nous contactant sur notre
Portail de demande.
Nous nous efforçons de répondre à votre demande dès que possible, généralement dans les 30 jours. Nous vous informerons à l’avance si nous ne sommes pas en mesure de répondre à votre demande dans les 30 jours, ou si nous ne sommes pas en mesure de répondre à votre demande, ainsi que les raisons de cette incapacité.[2]
Lorsque la loi l’autorise, nous pouvons vous facturer des frais administratifs pour répondre à votre demande.
D3. Transfert de vos données à caractère personnel vers d’autres pays
Si vous résidez à Singapour et que nous avons recueilli vos données, nous pouvons également transférer occasionnellement vos données en dehors de Singapour. Cependant, nous veillerons toujours à ce que vos données à caractère personnel restent couvertes par une protection au moins comparable à celle assurée en vertu de la loi de 2012 relative à la protection des données personnelles en vigueur à Singapour[, par exemple en appliquant les Clauses contractuelles types de l’ASEAN.
ADDENDUM E – CORÉE DU SUD
Le présent Addendum pour les Personnes concernées de nationalité coréenne explique nos pratiques relativement aux données à caractère personnel que nous traitons dans le cadre de votre relation avec nous lorsque vous êtes une Personne concernée de nationalité coréenne.
E.1 – Transfert de données à caractère personnel
Nous fournissons des données à caractère personnel à des tiers ou externalisons leur traitement à des tiers comme indiqué ci-dessous :
- Fourniture de données à caractère personnel à des tiers
Nom du destinataire
Finalités d’utilisation par le destinataire
Éléments de données à caractère personnel fournis au destinataire
Périodes de conservation par le destinataire
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Les finalités décrites dans la présente déclaration à la section 6 ci-dessus.
Les finalités décrites dans la présente déclaration à la section 5 ci-dessus.
Les périodes de stockage définies dans la présente déclaration à la section 11 ci-dessus.
- Sous-traitance du traitement des données à caractère personnel à des tiers :
Veuillez trouver une liste de tous les traitements de données externalisés et des sociétés en question en suivant ce lien :
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Nous pouvons externaliser le traitement de vos données à caractère personnel et/ou transférer celles-ci à des fins de stockage à des tiers situés hors de Corée :
Si vous ne souhaitez pas transférer vos données à caractère personnel à l’étranger, vous pouvez refuser en refusant leur transfert ou en nous demandant d’arrêter le transfert transfrontalier, mais dans ce cas, vous ne pourrez peut-être pas utiliser nos services. Le transfert transfrontalier de données à caractère personnel ci-dessus est juridiquement basé le fait qu’il constitue un « traitement ou un stockage externalisé des données à caractère personnel nécessaires à la conclusion et à l’exécution d’un contrat avec la personne concernée » et que des éléments prescrits en vertu des règlements ont été divulgués dans la politique de confidentialité (Article 28-8(1)(iii) du Personal Information Protection Act).
E.2 – Destruction des données à caractère personnel
Lorsque des données à caractère personnel deviennent inutiles en raison de l’expiration de la période de conservation ou de la réalisation de la finalité du traitement, etc., elles sont détruites sans délai. Le processus et la méthode de destruction sont indiqués ci-dessous :
1) Processus de destruction : Nous sélectionnons certains éléments de données à caractère personnel à détruire et les détruisons avec l’approbation du DPD.
2) Méthode de destruction : Nous détruisons les données à caractère personnel enregistrées et stockées sous forme de fichiers électroniques en utilisant une méthode technique (par ex., format de bas niveau) pour nous assurer que les dossiers ne peuvent pas être reproduits, tandis que les données à caractère personnel enregistrées et stockées sous forme de documents papier sont déchiquetées ou incinérées.
E.3 – Stockage des données à caractère personnel
Si nous sommes tenus de conserver vos données à caractère personnel conformément aux lois en vigueur, nous le ferons conformément aux finalités et périodes de conservation suivantes, comme l’exigent les lois en vigueur.
E.4 – Vos droits
Vous pouvez exercer vos droits liés aux données à caractère personnel à notre encontre, y compris une demande d’accès, de modification, de suppression ou de suspension du traitement de vos données à caractère personnel, tel que prévu par la loi applicable, y compris la Loi sur la protection des données à caractère personnel. Vous pouvez également exercer votre droit de retrait de votre consentement à la collecte/utilisation/fourniture de vos données à caractère personnel, votre droit à la portabilité et vos droits relatifs à la prise de décision automatisée. Ces droits peuvent également être exercés par l’intermédiaire de vos représentants légaux ou d’autres personnes dûment autorisées.
Vous pouvez exercer tous les droits applicables décrits ci-dessus en nous contactant à l’adresse worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Mesures de sécurité
Nous mettrons en œuvre les mesures de sécurité techniques, organisationnelles et physiques prévues par les lois coréennes applicables afin de protéger les données à caractère personnel, telles que celles énumérées ci-dessous :
1) Mesures organisationnelles : désignation d’un délégué à la protection des données, établissement et mise en œuvre d’un plan de gestion interne, formation régulière des employés à la protection des données, etc. ;
2) Mesures techniques : gestion des autorisations d’accès au système de traitement des données à caractère personnel, installation d’un système de contrôle d’accès, installation de programmes de sécurité, etc. ; et
3) Mesures physiques : restriction de l’accès aux installations et équipements de stockage de données à caractère personnel tels que les salles informatiques et les salles de stockage de données, etc.
E.6 – Nous contacter
Pour toute question ou demande relative à la confidentialité et à la protection des données, veuillez contacter notre équipe de protection des données à l’adresse
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ADDENDUM F – ÉTATS-UNIS
La Loi californienne sur la protection de la vie privée des consommateurs (California Consumer Privacy Act), telle que modifiée par la Loi californienne sur les droits à la vie privée (California Privacy Rights Act), ne s’applique pas actuellement à nous.
ADDENDUM G - BRÉSIL
G.1 Législation applicable, Responsable du traitement et Opérateur
Si vous résidez au Brésil, si vos données à caractère personnel ont été collectées au Brésil ou si vous utilisez nos Services au Brésil, la législation applicable est la Loi n° 13,709/2018 (Loi générale sur la protection des données, « LGPD »).
G.2 Droit de s’opposer au traitement des données
Vous avez le droit de vous opposer à l’utilisation de vos données à caractère personnel à des fins qui ne dépendent pas du consentement si la finalité est incompatible avec la LGPD. Si votre demande d’opposition au traitement est respectée, nous n’utiliserons plus vos données à caractère personnel pour développer et améliorer les fonctionnalités et les expériences de nos Services.
Veuillez noter que si vous ne confiez pas certaines données ou que vous n’autorisez pas la collecte ou le traitement de certaines données à caractère personnel, cela peut affecter la qualité de votre expérience, il se peut que nous ne soyons pas en mesure d’atteindre les objectifs de nos Services ou que nous ne soyons pas en mesure de vous fournir certains Services.
Dans certains cas, vos données sont anonymisées, ce qui signifie qu’elles ne permettent plus de vous identifier. Vous ne pouvez pas vous opposer à l’utilisation de données anonymisées, car elles ne permettent pas de vous identifier, comme prévu dans la LGPD. Nous utilisons ces données anonymisées pour améliorer nos produits et nos services.
G.3 Les droits légaux en vertu de la LGPD
En vertu de la LGPD, vous avez le droit de confirmer l’existence du traitement, de l’accès, de la rectification ou de demander la portabilité des données traitées. De plus, vous pouvez demander des informations sur les entités publiques et privées avec lesquelles nous utilisons conjointement vos données à caractère personnel. Vous pouvez également demander des informations concernant la possibilité de ne pas donner votre consentement et les répercussions de ce refus, et demander la suppression des données traitées avec votre consentement. Vous pouvez choisir de supprimer vos informations dans l’application World App dans le menu Paramètres.
Dans certaines circonstances, vous avez le droit de vous opposer au traitement ou de limiter notre traitement de vos données à caractère personnel, ou de retirer votre consentement sur lequel nous nous appuyons pour traiter les informations que vous fournissez.
Vous pouvez exercer vos droits en vertu de la LGPD en soumettant une demande à notre DPD en utilisant les coordonnées de la section H.4 ci-dessous ou via notre portail de demande en ligne. Si vous estimez que vos droits n’ont pas été correctement traités, vous pouvez introduire une réclamation auprès de l’Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) en remplissant le formulaire disponible à ce lien :
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Transfert international de vos données personnelles
Si la LGPD s’applique à vous et que nous avons recueilli vos données à caractère personnel, nous pouvons également les transférer en dehors du pays. Cependant, nous veillerons toujours à ce que vos données à caractère personnel soient transférées uniquement vers des pays étrangers ou des organisations internationales qui offrent un niveau de protection équivalent à celui prévu dans la LGPD, tel que reconnu dans les décisions d’adéquation émises par l’ANPD. En l’absence de décision d’adéquation, nous continuerons à suivre une norme de protection au moins équivalente à celle prévue dans la LGPD en utilisant les Clauses contractuelles types établies dans la réglementation de l’ANPD ou lorsque nous obtiendrons votre consentement spécifique et explicite pour le transfert international.
ANNEXE I – Fondements juridiques/finalités pour les activités de traitement des données Tools for Humanity
Utilisateurs
Pourquoi nous traitons les données
Quelles données à caractère personnel sont traitées
Fondement juridique du traitement
Période de conservation
Pour créer votre compte dans World App
Adresse, métadonnées, nom d’utilisateur du portefeuille
Exécution du contrat
Durée d’utilisation des services ou jusqu’à ce que vous demandiez la suppression des données.
Pour vérifier que vous avez l’âge minimum requis
Date de naissance
Obligation légale
Votre date de naissance exacte n’est jamais conservée. Nous ne stockons que le fait que vous avez bien 18 ans. Nous conservons ces informations pendant la durée d’utilisation des services ou jusqu’à ce que vous demandiez la suppression des données.
Pour permettre à vos contacts de communiquer facilement et de faire affaire avec vous
Numéro de téléphone
Consentement
Durée d’utilisation des services ou jusqu’à ce que vous demandiez la suppression des données.
Pour vous permettre de communiquer facilement et de faire affaire avec vos contacts
Contacts du carnet d’adresses
Consentement
Durée d’utilisation des services ou jusqu’à ce que vous demandiez la suppression des données.
Pour vous indiquer les Orbs près de vous
Informations de localisation
Consentement
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Pour prévenir la fraude dans le cadre de la protection des comptes
Métadonnées, adresse IP, ID de l’appareil
Intérêt légitime, à savoir l’intérêt de prévenir certains types de fraude (LISTE DES TYPES)
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Pour s’assurer que le service est autorisé dans votre pays
Adresse IP, informations de localisation
Obligation légale
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Pour afficher votre portefeuille auto-géré et fournir une interface pour les transactions de portefeuille
Adresse du portefeuille, données de transaction
Exécution du contrat
Aucune donnée à caractère personnel n’est stockée dans ce contexte.
Pour afficher votre World ID auto-conservé et fournir une interface pour les vérifications
Informations World ID
Exécution du contrat
Aucune donnée à caractère personnel n’est stockée dans ce contexte.
Pour afficher vos Identifiants auto-conservés et fournir une interface pour partager les Identifiants
Informations d’identifiant, informations de validité des informations d’identification
Exécution du contrat
Aucune donnée à caractère personnel n’est stockée dans ce contexte.
Analyser et améliorer nos services et mener des recherches en science des données
Données et métadonnées d’utilisation, données de transactions publiques
Consentement
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Pour se conformer aux lois applicables, telles que les lois de lutte contre le blanchiment de capitaux et les sanctions
Données de transactions, adresse du portefeuille
Obligation légale
Durée d’utilisation des services.
Pour se conformer aux lois applicables, comme les réglementations sur le contenu
Contenu de la mini-application
Obligation légale
Durée d’utilisation des services.
Pour permettre la communication et le marketing
Adresse e-mail, notifications push
Intérêt légitime
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Correspondance de votre part
Intérêt légitime
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Commentaires de votre part
Intérêt légitime
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
pour gérer vos demandes, réclamations et demandes de service client ;
Informations de communication et e-mail ou nom de profil sur les réseaux sociaux si vous cherchez à communiquer avec nous par ces moyens
Exécution du contrat
Pour s’assurer que l’application fonctionne correctement
Métadonnées
Exécution du contrat
Jusqu’à 24 mois.
Pour vérifier votre appareil
Données World ID de l’appareil (empreinte digitale de l’appareil)
Exécution du contrat
Durée d’utilisation des services.
pour résoudre les litiges et les problèmes et pour faire appliquer nos accords avec vous, y compris la présente Déclaration de confidentialité et les Conditions d’utilisation ;
Durée d’utilisation des services.
Partenaires commerciaux
Pourquoi nous traitons les données
Quelles données à caractère personnel sont traitées
Fondement juridique du traitement
Période de conservation
Communication
Numéro de téléphone, adresse e-mail, nom
Intérêts légitimes, c’est-à-dire l’intérêt de communiquer avec les partenaires commerciaux.
Durée de la relation commerciale ou jusqu’à ce que vous demandiez la suppression des données.
Maintenir et administrer une relation commerciale
Numéro de téléphone, adresse e-mail, nom, données d’entreprise
Intérêts légitimes, c’est-à-dire l’intérêt de maintenir et d’administrer une relation commerciale avec des partenaires commerciaux.
Durée de la relation commerciale ou jusqu’à ce que vous demandiez la suppression des données.
Respecter les obligations KYC
Données de passeport, données d’entreprise
Obligation légale
Durée de la relation commerciale et jusqu’à 3 ans après la résiliation.
Pour traiter votre candidature
Données d’application
Consentement et étapes à la demande de la personne concernée avant de conclure un contrat.
Jusqu’à 3 mois par défaut ou plus si vous acceptez de faire partie d’un vivier de talents.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity निजता सूचना
Worldcoin समुदाय का भाग बनने का विकल्प चुनने के लिए आपका धन्यवाद! Worldcoin एक ओपन-सोर्स प्रोटोकॉल है, जिसे डेवलपर्स, लोगों, और अन्य योगदानकर्ताओं के एक वैश्विक समुदाय का समर्थन प्राप्त है।
यह निजता सूचना हमारी वेबसाइट्स, ऐप्लिकेशंस (“ऐप”), और इस निजता सूचना से जुड़ी अन्य सेवाओं (सामूहिक रूप से, “सेवाएँ”) के आपके द्वारा उपयोग के ज़रिए आपके द्वारा हमें दिए गए डेटा पर लागू होती है। यह निजता सूचना
उपयोगकर्ता नियमों और शर्तों
(“उपयोगकर्ता शर्तें”) में शामिल है और उन्हीं के द्वारा नियंत्रित होती है। Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), अपनी जर्मन सहायक कंपनी Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; एक साथ, “
TFH
” या “
हम
,” “
हमारा/हमारी/हमारे/हमसे
”) के साथ मिलकर, Worldcoin प्रोटोकॉल (“Worldcoin”) के विकास और वृद्धि में योगदान दे रही है, लेकिन Worldcoin Foundation से अलग है, जो Orb संबंधित डेटा प्रसंस्करण को नियंंत्रित करता है।
1. नियंत्रक
हम समस्त “World ऐप डेटा”, “क्रेडेंशियल सत्यापन डेटा” और अन्य “व्यवसाय डेटा” के डेटा नियंत्रक हैं: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH को यूरोपीय संघ (“
EU
”) में Tools for Humanity GmbH के माध्यम से स्थापित किया गया है।
“World ऐप डेटा” का अर्थ World ऐप के आपके द्वारा उपयोग, जैसा नीचे सेक्शन 5 में और विस्तार से वर्णित है, के ज़रिए एकत्र व प्रोसेस किए गए सारे व्यक्तिगत डेटा से है, पर इसमें ऐसा कोई भी व्यक्तिगत डेटा शामिल नहीं है जो Worldcoin प्रोटोकॉल या Worldcoin टोकन के आपके द्वारा उपयोग से संबंधित है (जैसे आपका वॉलेट पता और लेनदेन से संबंधित डेटा, जिसे हम नियंत्रित नहीं करते हैं)।
क्रेडेंशियल वेरिफिकेशन डेटा आपके सेल्फ-कस्टोडियल World ID में जोड़ने के लिए क्रेडेंशियल को सत्यापित करते समय संसाधित डेटा को संदर्भित करता है। इसका मतलब है कि अपने डिवाइस पर अपने पासपोर्ट की जानकारी को सुरक्षित रूप से संग्रहित करने के लिए अपने पासपोर्ट के NFC चिप को पढ़ना। यह डेटा आपके नियंत्रण में है और आपके क्रेडेंशियल की वैधता की पुष्टि करने के बाद, TFH आपके क्रेडेंशियल (जैसे पासपोर्ट) के एक अद्वितीय क्रिप्टोग्राफिक हस्ताक्षर के हैश मूल्य का एक अज्ञात अंश संग्रहित करता है ताकि यह सुनिश्चित किया जा सके कि प्रत्येक क्रेडेंशियल को केवल एक बार World ID में जोड़ा जा सकता है।
“व्यवसाय डेटा” का अर्थ ईमेल, वीडियो कॉन्फ़रेंसिंग या हमारी वेबसाइट्स के ज़रिए हमसे संचार करते समय या हमारे साथ किसी अन्य प्रकार से कार्य या व्यवहार करते समय हमारी कंपनी द्वारा अन्य साधनों के ज़रिए एकत्र व प्रोसेस किए गए सारे व्यक्तिगत डेटा से है। Orb ऐप के संदर्भ में डेटा प्रोसेसिंग के लिए कृपया Orb ऐप में लिंक की गई Orb ऐप गोपनीयता सूचना देखें। समर्पित डेटा संग्रह और परीक्षण के संदर्भ में डेटा प्रोसेसिंग के लिए कृपया अपने परीक्षण ऐप में लिंक किए गए संबंधित संग्रह और परीक्षण गोपनीयता सूचना देखें। हमारी वेबसाइट के संदर्भ में प्रसंस्करण के लिए कृपया हमारी वेबसाइट पर लिंक की गई हमारी कुकी नीति देखें।
2. इस निजता सूचना में अपडेट
हम कभी-कभी इस निजता सूचना को अपडेट करते हैं। अगर हम बड़े बदलाव करते हैं, जैसे हमारे द्वारा आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के उपयोग के तरीके में बदलाव, तो हम ईमेल के ज़रिए या आपके ऐप में संदेश के ज़रिए आपको सूचित करेंगे।
3. इस निजता सूचना में क्या है?
आपकी निजता और डेटा का संरक्षण करने की हमारी वचनबद्धता
हम क्या-क्या जानकारी एकत्र करते हैं और क्यों
हमारे द्वारा एकत्र डेटा का उपयोग हम कैसे करते हैं
हम आपके डेटा को कहां प्रोसेस करते हैं
हम आपका डेटा कब साझा करते हैं
सार्वजनिक ब्लॉकचेन पर आपका डेटा कैसे रिकॉर्ड होता है
हम कुकीज़ का उपयोग कैसे करते हैं
हम आपका डेटा कब तक रखते हैं
यह निजता सूचना बच्चों और किशोरों के लिए किस प्रकार अलग है
आपके सांविधिक अधिकार
इस निजता सूचना के बारे में हमसे कैसे संपर्क करें
4. आपकी निजता और डेटा का संरक्षण करने की हमारी वचनबद्धता
हम आपकी निजता का संरक्षण करने और आपके डेटा को सुरक्षित करने के लिए गहराई से वचनबद्ध हैं। हम मानते हैं कि हम हमारे डिजिटल टोकन अधिकतम संभव लोगों में निष्पक्षता से वितरित करने का हमारा मिशन केवल तब पूरा कर सकते हैं जब लोग हम पर भरोसा करते हों, और निजता व डेटा की सुरक्षा आपका भरोसा जीतने के लिए सबसे महत्वपूर्ण है।
निजता
हमने आपकी निजता को ध्यान में रखते हुए हमारे उत्पादों और सेवाओं को डिज़ाइन किया है। हम हमारे उत्पादों और सेवाओं को बेहतर बनाने के लिए डेटा एकत्र करते हैं। हम यहां इस निजता सूचना में या उत्पाद अथवा सेवा विशेष के डेटा सहमति फ़ॉर्म्स में हमेशा आपको बताएंगे कि हम क्या-क्या डेटा एकत्र कर रहे हैं, हम वह डेटा क्यों एकत्र कर रहे हैं, और हम उसका क्या करते हैं।
डेटा सुरक्षा
हमारे पास आपके डेटा की देखभाल के लिए एक अलग टीम है और हमने ऐसे भौतिक और इलेक्ट्रॉनिक सुरक्षा-उपाय लागू किए हैं जो पारगमन और स्थिर अवस्था, दोनों के दौरान आपके डेटा की सुरक्षा करते हैं। साथ-ही-साथ, हम यह भी कहेंगे कि कोई भी सेवा पूरी तरह सुरक्षित नहीं हो सकती है। यदि आपको आपके खाते या आपके डेटा के बारे में कोई चिंता हो, तो कृपया हमसे हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
के ज़रिए संपर्क करें या हमें Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA पर लिखें।
5. हम क्या-क्या जानकारी एकत्र करते हैं और क्यों
5.1 वह डेटा जो आप हमें देते हैं
एक उपयोगकर्ता के रूप में आपके लिए यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि आप ऐप के उपयोग के लिए कोई डेटा दें। हालाँकि, सेवाओं के भीतर किसी सुविधा विशेष के उपयोग के लिए आपको हमें कुछ डेटा देने की ज़रूरत पड़ सकती है। उपयोगकर्ता की सहमति और अनुबंध (सेवाएं प्रदान करने की हमारी वचनबद्धता) का निष्पादन नीचे लिखे मामलों में प्रोसेसिंग के कानूनी आधार हैं। नीचे दी गई सूची में बताया गया है कि आप हमें कौन-कौन सा डेटा दे सकते हैं और हम उस डेटा का उपयोग किसलिए करते हैं:
World App के संदर्भ में:
फोन नंबर।
आप अपने खाते से जोड़ने के लिए अपना फोन नंबर दर्ज करने का विकल्प चुन सकते हैं। अगर आप अनुमति देते हैं तो, अन्य उपयोगकर्ता आपके फोन नंबर के ज़रिए आपका खाता ढूंढ पाएंगे। जब आप कोई डेटा आयत्त अनुरोध भेजते हैं तब हम एक फोन नंबर मांग सकते हैं। उपयोगकर्ता शर्तों के तहत सेवा का निष्पादन इस डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग का कानूनी आधार है।
उपयोगकर्ता नाम।
आप किसी उपयोगकर्ता नाम को अपने वॉलेट पते से लिंक कर सकते हैं और किसी भी समय उपयोगकर्ता नाम बदल सकते हैं।
जन्म तिथि।
आयु प्रतिबंध आवश्यकताओं का अनुपालन सुनिश्चित करने के लिए आप अपनी जन्म तिथि का खुलासा कर सकते हैं। हम आपके जन्म के डेटा को कभी भी संग्रहित नहीं करेंगे, लेकिन केवल उस कुछ डेटा की जांच करेंगे चाहे आप 18 वर्ष से अधिक उम्र के हों या नहीं।
आपकी ओर से फ़ीडबैक और पत्र-व्यवहार।
इनमें वे कोई भी ईमेल, चैट संदेश, या अन्य संदेश शामिल हैं जो आप हमें ईमेल या तृतीय-पक्ष सोशल मीडिया वेबसाइट्स के ज़रिए भेजते हैं। इसमें ईमेल पते या सोशल मीडिया प्रोफाइल नाम की प्रोसेसिंग करना शामिल हो सकता है, यदि आप ऐसे साधनों के माध्यम से हमारे साथ संवाद करना चाहते हैं। हम हमारी सेवाओं के आपके द्वारा उपयोग के बारे में सर्वेक्षणों के संचालन के लिए किसी तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा प्रदाता का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। उपयोगकर्ता शर्तों के तहत सेवा का निष्पादन इस डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग का कानूनी आधार है।
अड्रेस बुक संपर्क।
आप आपकी अड्रेस बुक में हो सकने वाले अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं को ढूँढना और उनसे व्यवहार करना आपके लिए आसान बना सकने वाली सुविधा को सक्षम करने हेतु अपनी अड्रेस बुक की पहुँच ऐप को प्रदान कर सकते हैं। आयत्त का ‘ऐप के भीतर ढूंढे जा सकने का’ वैध हित और साझाकर्ता उपयोक्ता का ऐप में अपने संपर्कों को ढूंढने का हित इस डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग के कानूनी आधार हैं।
कृपया ध्यान दें:
अपने संपर्कों की जानकारी का साझाकरण लागू कानूनों का अनुपालन करता हो यह सुनिश्चित करने की ज़िम्मेदारी आपकी है।’ इसके लिए यह आवश्यक हो सकता है कि आप अपने संपर्कों से अनुमति लें और आप अन्य लोगों से प्राप्त किसी भी संपर्क विवरण को उनकी स्पष्ट सहमति के बिना TFH से साझा नहीं करेंगे।’ आप जब चाहें तब अपना विचार बदल सकते हैं और अपनी डिवाइस सेटिंग्स में जाकर आपके संपर्कों तक हमारी पहुँच को बंद कर सकते हैं। अगर आप, आपके कौन-कौन से संपर्क हमारी सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हैं यह देखने के लिए या हमारी सेवाओं के आपके द्वारा उपयोग में उन्हें साथ जोड़ने के लिए अपने डिवाइस की अड्रेस बुक ऐप में लाने का विकल्प चुनते हैं तो हम समय-समय पर आपके संपर्कों के फोन नंबर, उन नंबरों के साथ और हमारे सर्वर्स पर अन्य उपयोक्ताओं द्वारा दिए गए संबंधित वॉलेट पतों के साथ सिंक करेंगे।
स्थान जानकारी
। आप कोई स्थान-आधारित सेवा (जैसे आपको अपने आस-पास कोई Orb ऑपरेटर ढूंढने में सक्षम बनाने वाली सुविधा) चालू करने का विकल्प चुन सकते हैं। केवल आपकी विशिष्ट सहमति से, हम तब GPS के माध्यम से आपके स्थान के बारे में जानकारी एकत्र कर सकते हैं ताकि आपको आपके नजदीक एक Orb दिखाने के लिए स्थान आधारित सेवा को सक्षम कर सकें। आप जब चाहें तब अपने डिवाइस की सेटिंग्स में जाकर अपनी अनुमतियां बदल सकते हैं। यदि आप दक्षिण कोरिया में स्थित नहीं हैं, तो हम आपके World App खाते से अलग किए गए आपके अनुमानित स्थान को भी स्टोर कर सकते हैं। हम इस डेटा का उपयोग विशेष रूप से हमारी सेवाओं को बेहतर बनाने के लिए करते हैं, लेकिन यह Orb स्थानों के चयन तक सीमित नहीं हैं।
P2P मार्केटप्लेस
। अगर आप (जहां उपलब्ध हैं वहां) ऐसी P2P मार्केटप्लेस सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हैं जो आपको अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं से डिजिटल टोकन खरीदने की सुविधा देती हैं, तो हम कुछ अतिरिक्त जानकारी एकत्र कर सकते हैं, जैसे आपका वॉलेट पता, आपकी संपर्क जानकारी (यानी आपका फोन नंबर), और लेनदेन से जुड़ी आपकी खाता संख्या (जैसे, आपकी M-PESA संख्या)। हम P2P मार्केटप्लेस सेवाएं देने के भाग के रूप में लेनदेन डेटा को रिकॉर्ड करते हैं। हम लागू KYC आवश्यकताओं के अनुपालन के लिए भी अतिरिक्त जानकारी एकत्र कर सकते हैं।
डिवाइस मेटाडेटा।
यदि आप ऐप का उपयोग कर रहे हैं तो हम यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए आपके डिवाइस से मेटाडेटा एकत्र कर रहे हैं कि ऐप ठीक से काम कर रही हो और यह कि आप हमारे नियमों और शर्तों का उल्लंघन न कर रहे हों। इसमें डिवाइस आइडेंटिफ़ायर और IP पते एकत्र करना शामिल है।
डिवाइस World ID डेटा।
हम एक अद्वितीय डिवाइस फ़िंगरप्रिंट की गणना करने के लिए भी आपके डिवाइस मेटाडेटा को प्रोसेस करते हैं। इस फ़िंगरप्रिंट का हैश एक संकेत का काम करता है जो डिवाइस World ID के साथ आपकी अद्वितीयता सिद्ध करता है।
व्यावसायिक डेटा प्रोसेसिंग के संदर्भ में:
पहला और अंतिम नाम।
हम आपके साथ व्यावसायिक संबंध बनाए रखने और प्रशासित करने के वैध हित को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए आपके पहले और अंतिम नाम की प्रोसेसिंग कर सकते हैं।
ईमेल पता।
आप Worldcoin परियोजना के नवीनतम समाचार पाने हेतु हमारी मेलिंग सूची को सब्सक्राइब करने के लिए भी अपना ईमेल दे सकते हैं। जब आप कोई डेटा आयत्त अनुरोध भेजते हैं तब हम आपका ईमेल मांग सकते हैं। हम आपके साथ व्यावसायिक संबंध बनाए रखने और प्रशासित करने के वैध हित को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए आपके ईमेल पते की प्रोसेसिंग कर सकते हैं।
फोन नंबर।
हम आपके साथ व्यावसायिक संबंध बनाए रखने और उसे प्रशासित करने के वैध हित को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए आपके फोन नंबर की प्रोसेसिंग कर सकते हैं।
एंटरप्राइज़ डेटा
। अगर आपका हमसे कोई व्यापारिक संबंध है (जैसे अगर आप Orb ऑपरेटर हैं या सप्लायर हैं), तो हम उस व्यापारिक संबंध को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए और हमारे अपने-ग्राहक-को-जानें दायित्व पूरे करने के लिए आपसे नाम, डाक पते, ईमेल, फोन नंबर, वॉलेट पता, और अन्य दस्तावेज़ (जैसे आपकी सरकारी ID) आदि जानकारी मांग सकते हैं। हम अपने-ग्राहक-को-जानें दायित्व पूरे करने हेतु ऊपर लिखी जानकारी और दस्तावेज़ प्राप्त करने में मदद के लिए तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं, जैसे Onfido, का उपयोग कर सकते हैं।
आवेदन डेटा
। अगर आप हमारे लिए काम करना चाहते हैं तो आपको हमें अपना आवेदन भेजना होगा जिसमें आपका कवर लेटर और CV होते हैं और साथ ही वह व्यक्तिगत जानकारी होती है जिसे आप प्रकट करना चाहते हैं।
ऊपर विस्तार से वर्णित प्रत्येक डेटा प्रोसेसिंग गतिविधि के लिए प्रोसेसिंग के कानूनी आधार की जानकारी इस निजता सूचना के अंत में दिए गए
संलग्नक I – Tools for Humanity की डेटा प्रोसेसिंग गतिविधियों के कानूनी उद्देश्य
में दी गई है।
5.2 वह डेटा जो हम तृतीय-पक्ष स्रोतों से एकत्र करते हैं
समय-समय पर हम आपके बारे में निम्नलिखित तृतीय-पक्ष स्रोतों से जानकारी प्राप्त कर सकते हैं:
ब्लॉकचेन डेटा
। हमारी सेवाओं को उपयो ग में लाने वाले पक्ष हमारे उपयोगकर्ता शर्तों के अंतर्गत गैरकानूनी या निषिद्ध गतिविधियों में संलिप्त न हों यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए, और शोध एवं विकास के प्रयोजनों से लेनदेन के रुझानों (ट्रांज़ेक्शन ट्रेंड्स) का विश्लेषण करने के लिए हम सार्वजनिक ब्लॉकचेन डेटा का विश्लेषण कर सकते हैं।
पहचान सत्यापन सेवाएं
। अगर कानून द्वारा आवश्यक किया जाए (जैसे लागू अपने-ग्राहक-को-जानें आवश्यकताएं) तो हम आपकी पहचान के सत्यापन के लिए आपके डेटा का उपयोग करते हुए तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं से जानकारी प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। स्पष्टीकरण के लिए बता दें कि हम कानून द्वारा आवश्यक किए गए अनुसार आपकी पहचान का सत्यापन करते समय आपके बायोमेट्रिक डेटा का उपयोग
नहीं
करते हैं।
प्रतिभा डेटाबेस
। हम प्रतिभावान व्यक्तियों को जॉब ऑफ़र देने के लिए विभिन्न स्रोतों से डेटा एकत्र कर सकते हैं।
5.3 वह डेटा जो हम स्वचालित ढंग से एकत्र करते हैं
लागू कानून के अंतर्गत अनुमन्य होने पर, जब आप हमारी सेवाओं से व्यवहार करते हैं तब हम कुछ प्रकार के डेटा स्वचालित ढंग से एकत्र कर सकते हैं। इस जानकारी से हमें ग्राहक सहयोग समस्याएं हल करने, सेवाओं का प्रदर्शन बेहतर करने, आपको एक सुवीही और वैयक्तिकृत अनुभव प्रदान करने, और आपके खाता क्रेडेन्शियल्स (पहचान जानकारी) को सुरक्षित करने में मदद मिलती है। स्वचालित रूप से एकत्र जानकारी
ऑनलाइन आइडेंटिफ़ायर:
जिओ-लोकेशन (भौगोलिक स्थान) और ट्रैकिंग के विवरण (ऊपर देखें), कंप्यूटर या मोबाइल फोन का ऑपरेटिंग सिस्टम, वेब ब्राउज़र का नाम और संस्करण, और IP पते। बहुत सीमित मामलों में इन डेटा को हमारे धोखाधड़ी और अवैध वित्तीय प्रवाह संसूचन में भी डाला जाता है। इनसे हमारे सॉफ़्टवेयर का एक स्थिर और धोखाधड़ी-मुक्त अनुभव भी मिलता है।
उपयोग डेटा:
प्रमाणन डेटा, सुरक्षा प्रश्न, और कुकीज़ व इसी प्रकार की अन्य टेक्नॉलजी के ज़रिए एकत्र अन्य डेटा।
कुकीज़
: आपके हार्ड ड्राइव या इन-डिवाइस मेमोरी में स्टोर की जाने वाली छोटी-छोटी डेटा फ़ाइल्स जो हमें हमारी सेवाओं और आपके अनुभव को बेहतर बनाने में, हमारी सेवाओं के कौनसे क्षेत्र और सुविधाएँ लोकप्रिय हैं यह देखने में, और आगमनों की गिनती करने में मदद देती हैं। उन डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग के कानूनी आधार के लिए हमारी
कुकी नीति
देखें जिसमें हमने हमारे द्वारा प्रयोग की जा रहीं विभिन्न प्रकार की कुकीज़ के बारे में समझाया है।
इसी प्रकार, समस्या-समाधान और सुधार के लिए भी ऐप जानकारी एकत्र करती है। हम अंत उपयोगकर्ता के उपयोग और व्यवहारों के बारे में पुंजित जानकारी देखने के लिए तृतीय-पक्ष सेवाओं, जैसे Segment.io या PostHog, का उपयोग करते हैं। जहां संभव हो वहां, हम तृतीय पक्षों को भेजी जाने वाली जानकारी न्यूनतम करने या उसे ढकने (जैसे डेटा को एनकोड करने) के कदम उठाते हैं।
5.4 बेनामीकृत और पुंजित डेटा
बेनामीकरण एक डेटा प्रोसेसिंग तकनीक है जो व्यक्तिगत डेटा को इस तरह बेनामी बना देती है कि उसे किसी व्यक्ति विशेष से जोड़ा नहीं जा सकता है और इसलिए उसे फिर व्यक्तिगत डेटा नहीं माना जाता है। बेनामीकृत डेटा के उदाहरणों में शामिल हैं:
लेनदेन का डेटा
क्लिक-स्ट्रीम डेटा
प्रदर्शन की मापें
धोखाधड़ी संकेतक (हालाँकि इस उद्देश्य के लिए व्यक्तिगत डेटा का भी उपयोग होता है)
हम डेटा को पुंजित भी करते हैं, यानी जानकारी की विशाल मात्रा को इस प्रकार संयुक्त कर देते हैं कि वह किसी व्यक्ति विशेष की पहचान या उसे संदर्भित न कर पाए। हम हमारे व्यावसायिक उद्देश्यों, जैसे उपयोगकर्ता की आवश्यकताओं और व्यवहारों को बेहतर ढंग से समझना, हमारी सेवाओं को और बेहतर बनाना, व्यावसायिक खुफिया सूचनाएँ पाना और मार्केटिंग करना, सुरक्षा खतरों का पता लगाना और हमारे एल्गोरिद्म्स को प्रशिक्षित करना, के लिए बेनामीकृत या पुंजित डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं।
कार्यशील ऐप या वेबसाइट, व्यापारिक अंतर्दृष्टियां और धोखाधड़ी की रोकथाम का वैध हित, ऊपर लिखे डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग का कानूनी आधार है।
6. हमारे द्वारा एकत्र डेटा का उपयोग हम कैसे करते हैं
6.1 सामान्य विवरण
आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के उपयोग के लिए हमारे पास कोई वैध कारण (या “प्रोसेसिंग का कानूनी आधार”) होना ज़रूरी है। कुछ मामलों में, आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के उपयोग के लिए आपकी अग्रिम सहमति आवश्यक नहीं होती है। हम आपके डेटा का उपयोग निम्नलिखित प्रयोजनों से करते हैं:
उपयोगकर्ता शर्तों के तहत हमारे उत्पाद और सेवाएं प्रदान करना और उन्हें कायम रखना। इन सेवाओं में शामिल हैं:
ऐप, जिसमें उपयोगकर्ता अपनी World ID का और डिजिटल टोकन का प्रबंधन कर सकते हैं और सामान्यतः क्रिप्टोकरेंसी के बारे में तथा विशिष्टतः Worldcoin परियोजना के बारे में जानकारी पा सकते हैं;
ऑपरेटर ऐप, जिसमें ओर्ब ऑपरेटर्स अपने प्रबंधनाधीन ओर्ब्स का और उनके आंकड़ों का प्रबंधन व पर्यवेक्षण कर सकते हैं;
P2P मार्केटप्लेस जहां हम उपयोगकर्ताओं को एजेंटों से जोड़ते हैं (उन उपयोगकर्ताओं पर लागू नहीं होता है जो जर्मनी में स्थापित या निवासी हैं या जर्मनी में उनका आदतन निवास या पंजीकृत कार्यालय है);
हमारे उत्पादों और सेवाओं को बेहतर बनाने तथा विकसित करने के लिए, जिसमें हमारी सेवाओं में मौजूद त्रुटियों को डीबग करके ठीक करना शामिल है।
डेटा विज्ञान शोध संचालित करने के लिए
बेहतर सहयोग प्रदान हेतु हमारी सेवाओं के आपके द्वारा उपयोग का विश्लेषण करने के लिए।
आपकी अद्वितीयता सिद्ध करने हेतु आपको ब्लॉकचेन पर जानकारी प्रकाशित करने में सक्षम बनाने के लिए।
आपको हमारे द्वारा समर्थित डिजिटल टोकन भेजने हेतु आपके वॉलेट पते का उपयोग करने के लिए।
लागू कानूनों, जैसे धनशोधन-रोधी कानून, और प्रतिबंधों का अनुपालन करने के लिए। इसके लिए यह आवश्यक है:
आपके IP पते का उपयोग करके उन व्यक्तियों को अवरुद्ध करना जिनका देश उन्हें सेवाओं तक पहुँचने की अनुमति नहीं देता है;
लागू डेटा संरक्षण कानूनों के तहत डेटा आयत्त अनुरोधों, जैसे पहुँच या मिटाव के अनुरोधों, का उत्तर देने के लिए;
संभावित रूप से गैरकानूनी वित्तीय प्रवाहों, जैसे काली सूची में पड़े वॉलेट्स से आने वाला प्रवाह, पर नज़र रखने के लिए; और
लागू कानून का पालन करना जैसे कि अवैध सामग्री के खिलाफ नियम।
आपके ग्राहक सेवा अनुरोधों, शिकायतों, और प्रश्नों को संभालने के लिए।
विवाद हल करने के लिए, समस्याओं का निवारण करने के लिए, और आपके साथ हमारे करारों, जिसमें यह निजता सूचना और उपयोगकर्ता शर्तें शामिल हैं, को लागू करने के लिए।
सेवाओं के अपडेट्स के संबंध में आपसे संपर्क करने के लिए।
6.2 क्रेडेंशियल्स
TFH आपको अपने डिवाइस पर स्थानीय रूप से कुछ क्रेडेंशियल्स स्टोर करने की अनुमति देता है ताकि उन्हें World ID प्रोटोकॉल (“क्रेडेंशियल्स”) के शून्य ज्ञान बुनियादी ढांचे में साझा किया जा सके। क्रेडेंशियल्स के संदर्भ में हम इस डेटा को निम्नलिखित तरीकों से प्रोसेसिंग करते हैं:
हम आपके क्रेडेंशियल की वैधता की जांच करते हैं (पासपोर्ट के मामले में यह आपके देश के रूट सर्टिफिकेट के माध्यम से काम करता है)।
हम आपको क्रेडेंशियल के सही धारक के रूप में प्रमाणित करते हैं (पासपोर्ट के लिए यह आपके डिवाइस पर स्थानीय रूप से आपके चेहरे (सेल्फी) की तस्वीर के माध्यम से काम करता है, जो कभी संग्रहित नहीं होती है)।
हम आपके डिवाइस पर एक सुरक्षित परिवेश में आपके क्रेडेंशियल के डेटा को एन्क्रिप्ट, साइन और स्टोर करते हैं।
हमारे पास आपके क्रेडेंशियल पर निहित व्यक्तिगत जानकारी तक कभी भी पहुंच नहीं होती है।
फिर आप बाद में World ID प्रोटोकॉल की सुरक्षा के माध्यम से भरोसा करने वाले पक्षों के साथ इस जानकारी को चुनिंदा रूप से साझा कर सकते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए आप साबित कर सकते हैं कि आप अपनी सटीक उम्र का खुलासा किए बिना कम से कम 18 वर्ष के हैं या आप कौन हैं)।
पासपोर्ट के लिए, TFH केवल आपके पासपोर्ट के एक अद्वितीय क्रिप्टोग्राफिक हस्ताक्षर के हैश मूल्य के एक अनाम टुकड़े को बनाए रखता है, ताकि यह सुनिश्चित किया जा सके कि प्रत्येक पासपोर्ट को केवल एक बार सत्यापित किया जा सके।
यह प्रोसेसिंग आपकी सहमति पर आधारित है और हमें आपके पासपोर्ट से आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा तक कभी भी पहुंच नहीं मिलती है, जो आपके डिवाइस पर संग्रहित है। आप World App को हटाकर इस डेटा को अपने फोन से हटा सकते हैं।
6.3 World ID डेटा
आपकी World ID (यानी इसका उपयोग करने के लिए आवश्यक गुप्त संख्या) केवल आपके डिवाइस पर संग्रहित है, (यदि आपके पास बैकअप है तो आपके बैकअप में एन्क्रिप्टेड कॉपी मौजूद है)। न तो TFH और न ही किसी और के पास आपकी World ID तक पहुंच है। आप गुमनाम रूप से अपनी World ID का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। हर बार जब आप किसी नए एप्लिकेशन के साथ World ID का उपयोग करते हैं, तो एप्लिकेशन को केवल एक डिस्पोजेबल नंबर (“नलिफायर”) प्राप्त होता है जो आपकी World ID को प्रकट नहीं करता है। यह शून्य ज्ञान प्रमाण के माध्यम से सक्षम है (आप केवल यह साबित करते हैं कि आपके पास एक सत्यापित World ID है, लेकिन कौन सा है, यह नहीं) और यह सुनिश्चित करता है कि आपकी World ID का उपयोग आपको एप्लिकेशनों में ट्रेस करने के लिए नहीं किया जा सकता है। इसका मतलब है कि World ID इंटरनेट के लिए सामान्य उपयोगकर्ता आईडी नहीं है।
World ID प्रमाण एक खुले प्रोटोकॉल के माध्यम से कार्य करते हैं, जो सत्यापित World ID के हैश के सार्वजनिक मर्केल ट्री तक पहुंचता है। World ID एक केंद्रीकृत सेवा नहीं है, लेकिन एक प्रोटोकॉल है जिसे कोई भी एक्सेस कर सकता है। हम मर्केल ट्री और World ID प्रूफ तक पहुंच की सुविधा के लिए एपीआई प्रदान करते हैं लेकिन इस संदर्भ में कभी भी कोई व्यक्तिगत डेटा प्राप्त नहीं करते हैं।
यह ध्यान रखना महत्वपूर्ण है कि हम आपकी World ID से संबंधित किसी भी डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग नहीं करते हैं जो हमें आपकी पहचान करने की अनुमति देगा। World App के संदर्भ में संसाधित सभी व्यक्तिगत डेटा विशेष रूप से आपके वॉलेट पते और लेनदेन डेटा को जानबूझकर World ID डेटा से डीलिंक करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है।
7. हम आपके डेटा को कहां प्रोसेस करते हैं
7.1 डेटा अंतरण।
जब आप हमें अपना डेटा देते हैं, तो वह आपके डेटा के मूल एकत्रण वाले स्थान से बाहर के किसी स्थान को अंतरित, में भंडारित, या में प्रोसेस किया जा सकता है। आपका डेटा जिस देश को अंतरित, में भंडारित, या में प्रोसेस किया जाता है, हो सकता है कि वहां उस देश जैसे डेटा संरक्षण कानून न हों जहां आपने आरंभ में डेटा दिया था।
हम निजता कानूनों के संबंध में प्रत्येक क्षेत्राधिकार में कथित सिद्धांतों के पालन का हर संभव प्रयास करते हैं। हम आपके क्षेत्राधिकार से बाहर के डेटा प्रोसेसर्स के साथ डेटा केवल तब साझा करते हैं यदि उक्त अंतरण कानून-सम्मत हो और यदि हमें पूरा विश्वास हो कि डेटा प्रोसेसर लागू कानूनों के तहत आवश्यक किए गए के अनुसार, और हमारे मानकों के अनुसार भी, आपके डेटा की सुरक्षा करेगा।
7.2 अंतरण के जोखिम
यदि हम आपका डेटा संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, यूरोपीय संघ, या किसी अन्य देश को स्थानांतरित करते हैं तो जो जोखिम पैदा हो सकते हैं उनकी सूची नीचे दी गई है। नीचे हमने सारांश में यह भी बताया है कि हम उन जोखिमों की गंभीरता कैसे घटाते हैं।
हालांकि, हमारे सबकॉन्ट्रेक्टर आपके डेटा के पर्याप्त संरक्षण के लिए अनुबंध द्वारा बाध्य हों यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए हम हर संभव प्रयास करते हैं, पर हो सकता है कि ये सबकॉन्ट्रेक्टर आपके देश के डेटा निजता कानून के अधीन न हों। यदि सबकॉन्ट्रेक्टर प्राधिकार के बिना आपके डेटा को गैर-कानूनी ढंग से प्रोसेस करते हैं, तो उस सबकॉन्ट्रेक्टर के विरुद्ध आपके डेटा निजता अधिकारों का दावा किया जाना कठिन हो सकता है। हम हमारे सबकॉन्ट्रेक्टर से GDPR के स्तर पर डेटा का संरक्षण करने और आयत्तों के अनुरोधों की पूर्ति करने के लिए उन्हें बाध्य करने वाले कठोर डेटा प्रोसेसिंग करार करके इस जोखिम की गंभीरता घटाते हैं।
यह संभव है कि आपके देश का डेटा निजता कानून, US या EU के डेटा निजता कानूनों से मेल न खाते हों। हम जिन-जिन डेटा संरक्षण मानकों के अधीन हैं उनमें से हम हमेशा सबसे ऊँचे मानक का पालन करने की कोशिश करते हैं।
यह संभव है कि आपका डेटा अधिकारियों और प्राधिकरणों की सरकारी पहुँच के अधीन होगा। ऐसे मामलों में हमने स्वयं को पहुँच के किसी भी अमान्य, अधि-व्यापक, या गैर-कानूनी सरकारी अनुरोध को न्यायालय में चुनौती देने के लिए प्रतिबद्ध किया है। हम अनधिकृत पहुँच को रोकने के लिए उन्नत एन्क्रिप्शन का उपयोग भी करते हैं।
कृपया ध्यान दें कि इस सूची में आपके लिए मौजूद सभी संभव जोखिम नहीं बल्कि उनके कुछ उदाहरण मात्र ही हैं।
7.3 अमेरिकी डेटा हस्तांतरण के लिए डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा
TFH यूरोपीय संघ-अमेरिका डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा (EU-U.S. DPF), EU-U.S. DPF के लिए ब्रिटिश विस्तार और स्विस-अमेरिका डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा (स्विस-U.S. DPF) का अनुपालन करता है, जैसा कि अमेरिकी वाणिज्य विभाग द्वारा निर्धारित किया गया है। TFH ने अमेरिकी वाणिज्य विभाग को प्रमाणित किया है कि वह EU-U.S. DPF पर निर्भरता के संबंध में यूरोपीय संघ से प्राप्त व्यक्तिगत डेटा और EU-U.S. DPF के लिए ब्रिटेन विस्तार पर निर्भरता के संबंध में यूनाइटेड किंगडम (और जिब्राल्टर) से प्राप्त व्यक्तिगत डेटा के प्रोसेसिंग के संबंध में यूरोपीय संघ-अमेरिका डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा सिद्धांत (EU-U.S. DPF सिद्धांत) का पालन करता है। TFH ने अमेरिकी वाणिज्य विभाग को प्रमाणित किया है कि वह स्विस-U.S. DPF पर निर्भरता के संबंध में स्विट्जरलैंड से प्राप्त व्यक्तिगत डेटा के प्रोसेसिंग के संबंध में स्विस-यू.एस. डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा सिद्धांत (स्विस-यू.एस. DPF सिद्धांत) का पालन करता है। यदि इस डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा नोटिस और EU-यू.एस. DPF सिद्धांतों और/या स्विस-यू.एस. DPF सिद्धांतों की शर्तों के बीच कोई टकराव है, तो सिद्धांत नियंत्रण करेंगे। डेटा गोपनीयता ढांचा (DPF) कार्यक्रम के बारे में अधिक जानने के लिए, और हमारे प्रमाणन को देखने के लिए, कृपया
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
पर जाएं।
TFH DPF के तहत प्राप्त व्यक्तिगत डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग के लिए जिम्मेदार है और बाद में इसकी ओर से एजेंट के रूप में कार्य करने वाले तीसरे पक्ष को स्थानांतरित करता है। TFH यूरोपीय संघ, यूके और स्विट्जरलैंड से व्यक्तिगत डेटा के सभी आगे के स्थानांतरण के लिए DPF सिद्धांतों का अनुपालन करता है, जिसमें आगे के स्थानांतरण देयता प्रावधान शामिल हैं।
संघीय व्यापार आयोग के पास EU-U.S. DPF, UK एक्सटेंशन टू ईयू-यू.एस. DPF के लिए ब्रिटिश विस्तार और स्विस-यू.एस. DPF, TFH के अनुपालन पर अधिकार क्षेत्र है। कुछ स्थितियों में, TFH को राष्ट्रीय सुरक्षा या कानून प्रवर्तन आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने सहित सार्वजनिक अधिकारियों द्वारा वैध अनुरोधों के जवाब में व्यक्तिगत डेटा का खुलासा करने की आवश्यकता हो सकती है।
EU-U.S. DPF, EU-U.S. DPF के लिए ब्रिटिश विस्तार और स्विस-U.S. DPF के अनुपालन में, TFH आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के संग्रह और उपयोग के बारे में DPF सिद्धांतों से संबंधित शिकायतों को हल करने के लिए प्रतिबद्ध है। EU-U.S. DPF, EU-U.S. DPF के लिए ब्रिटिश विस्तार और स्विस-U.S. DPF पर निर्भरता में प्राप्त व्यक्तिगत डेटा के हमारे संचालन के बारे में पूछताछ या शिकायतों के बारे में यूरोपीय संघ और यूके और स्विस व्यक्तियों को पहले पर TFH से dpo@worldcoin.org पर संपर्क चाहिए
EU-U.S. DPF, EU-U.S. DPF के लिए ब्रिटिश विस्तार और स्विस-U.S. DPF के अनुपालन में, TFH EU-U.S. DPF, EU-U.S. DPF के लिए ब्रिटिश विस्तार और स्विस-U.S. DPF पर निर्भरता में प्राप्त व्यक्तिगत डेटा के हमारे संचालन के बारे में अनसुलझी शिकायतों के संबंध में यूरोपीय संघ के डेटा संरक्षण प्राधिकरणों (DPAs)} और यूके सूचना आयुक्त कार्यालय (ICO) और जिब्राल्टर नियामक प्राधिकरण (GRA) और स्विस संघीय डेटा संरक्षण और सूचना आयुक्त (FDPIC)} द्वारा स्थापित पैनल की सलाह के साथ क्रमशः सहयोग और अनुपालन करने के लिए प्रतिबद्ध है।
किसी भी अन्य DPF तंत्र द्वारा DPF अनुपालन के बारे में शिकायतों को हल नहीं करने के लिए, आपके पास कुछ शर्तों के तहत बाध्यकारी मध्यस्थता का आह्वान करने की संभावना है। अधिक जानकारी DPF की आधिकारिक वेबसाइट पर देखी जा सकती है।
8. हम आपका डेटा कब साझा करते हैं
हम आपका डेटा कभी नहीं बेचेंगे
।
जब हम आपका डेटा हमारे संगठन से बाहर साझा करते हैं तो हम हमेशा:
उसे समुचित रूप से सुरक्षित ढंग से साझा करेंगे;
यह सुनिश्चित करने के उपाय करेंगे कि उसे आपकी निजता के प्रति हमारी प्रतिबद्धता के अनुरूप ढंग से हैंडल किया जाए; और
अन्य कंपनियों द्वारा उनके स्वयं के प्रयोजनों से उसके उपयोग पर रोक लगाएँगे।
हम इन सीमित तरीकों से आपका डेटा अवश्य साझा करते हैं:
Worldcoin Foundation से:
हम Worldcoin की ओर से व्यक्तिगत डेटा के एकत्रण के लिए Worldcoin Foundation के प्रोसेसर्स के रूप में कार्य कर सकते हैं (और जानकारी के लिए कृपया Worldcoin की निजता सूचना देखें)।’
हमारे संगठन के भीतर:
हम डेटा का प्रकटन हमारे केवल उन टीम सदस्यों के समक्ष करते हैं जिन्हें अपने कार्यों और दायित्वों के निर्वहन के लिए उस तक पहुँचने की आवश्यकता होती है। हम केवल उतने डेटा का प्रकटन करते हैं जितना कार्यों और दायित्वों विशेष के निर्वहन के लिए आवश्यक होता है और हम एक कठोर पहुँच नियंत्रण सिस्टम लागू रखते हैं।
हमारे संगठन से बाहर के वेंडर्स और सेवा प्रदाताओं से:
हम केवल उन सेवा प्रदाताओं के समक्ष डेटा का प्रकटन करते हैं जिनकी सेवाओं पर हम डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग के लिए और आपको हमारी सेवाएँ प्रदान करने के लिए निर्भर करते हैं। हम पहचान सत्यापन वेंडर्स के समक्ष डेटा केवल तब प्रकट करते हैं जब कानून (यानी, अपने-ग्राहक-को-जानें आवश्यकताओं) द्वारा आवश्यक किया जाए।
ऐसे सेवा प्रदाताओं की श्रेणियाँ इस प्रकार हैं:
क्लाउड सेवा प्रदाता (सभी डेटा प्रकार)
SaaS प्रदाता; हम निम्नलिखित श्रेणियों में SaaS उत्पादों का उपयोग करते हैं:
डेटाबेस और मूलभूत ढाँचा प्रबंधन
डेटा सुरक्षा
भर्ती
संचार
सर्वेक्षण
KYC/KYB यानी आधिकारिक दस्तावेज़ों की जांच
डेटा आयत्त अनुरोध प्रबंधन
तकनीकी सहायता
उपयोगकर्ता सहायता
बाहरी विशेषज्ञ
विशेषज्ञ सॉफ़्टवेयर डेवलपर
कानूनी विशेषज्ञ
कर सलाहकार
बैंक
लेबलिंग सेवा प्रदाता (केवल विशेष सुरक्षा-उपायों के तहत)
आवेदकों और ओर्ब ऑपरेटर्स के लिए पृष्ठभूमि जांच सेवाएं
विधि प्रवर्तन, अधिकारियों या अन्य तृतीय पक्षों से:
हम लागू कानूनों के अनुपालन के लिए और अनिवार्य कानूनी माँगें पूरी करने के लिए आपके डेटा का प्रकटन कर सकते हैं। हम प्रत्येक अनुरोध पर सावधानीपूर्वक विचार करके यह निर्धारित करेंगे कि अनुरोध कानून का अनुपालन करता है या नहीं, और जहां उपयुक्त हो वहां, हम अमान्य, अतिशय, या गैरकानूनी अनुरोधों को चुनौती देंगे। जहां हमें यह उचित विश्वास हो कि कानून, विनियम, या अन्य कानूनी प्रक्रिया अथवा दायित्व के अनुपालन के लिए पुलिस या अन्य सरकारी प्राधिकारियों से डेटा साझा करना आवश्यक है वहां हम ऐसा कर सकते हैं।
अगर हमारा यह विश्वास हो कि आपके कृत्य हमारे उपयोगकर्ता शर्तों से असंगत हैं, अगर हमारा यह विश्वास हो कि आपने कानून का उल्लंघन किया है, या अगर हमारा यह विश्वास हो कि हमारे अधिकारों, संपत्ति, और सुरक्षा, हमारे उपयोगकर्ताओं, जनता, या अन्य की सुरक्षा के लिए आवश्यक है तो हम आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी साझा कर सकते हैं।
हम, सलाह प्राप्त करने या अन्यथा हमारे व्यापारिक हितों की सुरक्षा और प्रबंधन के लिए, जहां आवश्यक हो वहां हमारे वकीलों और अन्य पेशेवर सलाहकारों से आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी साझा कर सकते हैं।
हम, किसी विलय, कंपनी आस्तियों की बिक्री, वित्तीयन, या किसी अन्य कंपनी द्वारा हमारे संपूर्ण व्यापार या उसके किसी अंश के अधिग्रहण के संबंध में या उससे संबंधित मोलभाव के दौरान आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी साझा कर सकते हैं।
डेटा, जिसमें आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी शामिल है, को हमारी वर्तमान और भावी जनक कंपनियों, सहबद्ध कंपनियों और अनुषंगी कंपनियों तथा साझा नियंत्रण व स्वामित्व वाली अन्य कंपनियों में से दो या दो से अधिक कंपनियों के बीच साझा किया जा सकता है।
हम आपकी सहमति से या आपके निर्देश पर आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी साझा कर सकते हैं।
9. सार्वजनिक ब्लॉकचेन पर आपका डेटा कैसे रिकॉर्ड होता है
सेवाओं के आपके द्वारा उपयोग से संबंधित लेनदेन जानकारी किसी सार्वजनिक ब्लॉकचेन पर रिकॉर्ड की जा सकती है।
कृपया ध्यान दें:
ब्लॉकचेन लेनदेन की सार्वजनिक बहियाँ होती हैं जिन्हें ऐसे तृतीय-पक्षों जो Worldcoin द्वारा नियंत्रित या संचालित नहीं हैं, के द्वारा संचालित विकेंद्रीकृत नेटवर्क्स पर बनाकर रखा जाता है। ब्लॉकचेन बहियों की सार्वजनिक और अपरिवर्तनीय प्रकृति के कारण, हम किसी ब्लॉकचेन पर अपलोड व भंडारित किए गए डेटा में संशोधन, के मिटाव या के प्रकटन के नियंत्रण की योग्यता की गारंटी नहीं दे सकते हैं।
10. हम कुकीज़ का उपयोग कैसे करते हैं
हम हमारी सेवाओं को बेहतर कार्य करने में मदद देने के लिए कुकीज़ का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी सेवाओं के उपयोगकर्ताओं को ट्रैक करने के लिए हम कुकीज़ के साथ-साथ, उसके जैसी अन्य टेक्नॉलजी, जैसे वेब बीकन्स, का उपयोग भी कर सकते हैं। वेब बीकन्स (जिन्हें “पारदर्शी gifs” भी कहते हैं), अद्वितीय आइडेंटिफ़ायर वाले नन्हे ग्राफिक्स होते हैं जिनका कार्य कुकीज़ जैसा ही होता है। हमारी
कुकी नीति
, यहाँ इसमें संदर्भ द्वारा सम्मिलित।
हम Google Analytics का भी उपयोग करते हैं। जब आप Google की साझेदार वेबसाइट्स और ऐप्लिकेशंस का उपयोग करते हैं तब Google आपके डेटा का उपयोग कैसे करता है इस बारे में अधिक जानकारी यहाँ है:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
.’ सेवाओं का उपयोग करने के द्वारा, आप हमारे द्वारा आपके कंप्यूटर या मोबाइल डिवाइस पर कुकीज़ व अन्य डेटा भंडारित किए जाने व उस तक पहुँचे जाने और उक्त गतिविधियों के सिलसिले में Google Analytics का उपयोग किए जाने पर सहमति देते हैं। कृपया प्रदत्त लिंक पर मौजूद जानकारी पढ़ें ताकि आप समझ सकें कि आप किस पर सहमति दे रहे हैं।
11. हम आपका डेटा कब तक रखते हैं?
तब के सिवाय जब लागू कानून अन्यथा आवश्यक करता हो, आपको हमारी सेवाएँ प्रदान करने के लिए, हमारे वैध व्यावसायिक उद्देश्य पूरे करने के लिए, और हमारे कानूनी व नियामक दायित्वों का अनुपालन करने के लिए जब तक आवश्यक हो तब तक हम आपका डेटा हमारे पास रखते हैं। अगर आप हमारे यहां आपका जो खाता है उसे बंद करते हैं, तो हम एक माह के भीतर आपका खाता डेटा मिटा देंगे; अन्यथा हम 2 वर्ष की निष्क्रियता के बाद आपका खाता डेटा मिटा देंगे। अगर कानून आवश्यक करे तो, हम हमारे कानूनी और नियामक दायित्वों, जिनमें धोखाधड़ी की निगरानी, उसका पता लगाना और उसकी रोकथाम करना, और कर (टैक्स), लेखांकन (अकाउंटिंग), और वित्तीय रिपोर्टिंग के दायित्व शामिल हैं, के अनुपालन के लिए जब तक आवश्यक हो तब तक आपका व्यक्तिगत डेटा हमारे पास बनाए रखेंगे।
कृपया ध्यान दें:
ब्लॉकचेन विकेंद्रीकृत तृतीय-पक्ष नेटवर्क होती हैं जिन्हें हम नियंत्रित या संचालित नहीं करते हैं। ब्लॉकचेन टेक्नॉलजी की सार्वजनिक और अपरिवर्तनीय प्रकृति के कारण, हम ब्लॉकचेन पर स्टोर किए गए डेटा को संशोधित नहीं कर सकते, मिटा नहीं सकते और उसका प्रकटन नियंत्रित नहीं कर सकते हैं।
12. यह निजता सूचना बच्चों और किशोरों के लिए किस प्रकार अलग है
18 वर्ष से कम आयु के व्यक्तियों को इन सेवाओं के उपयोग की अनुमति नहीं है, और हम 18 वर्ष से कम आयु के व्यक्तियों से जानते-बूझते हुए डेटा एकत्र नहीं करते हैं। यदि आपका विश्वास है कि 18 वर्ष से कम आयु के आपके बच्चे को आपकी अनुमति के बिना सेवाओं की पहुँच मिल गई है, तो कृपया हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
के ज़रिए हमसे संपर्क करके उसके डेटा को मिटाने का अनुरोध करें।
अगर हमें यह पता चलता है कि हमने 18 वर्ष से कम आयु वाले किसी बच्चे से डेटा एकत्र किए हैं, तो हम उस डेटा को अधिकतम संभव शीघ्रता से मिटा देंगे। हमने सेवाओं के उपयोग को कम-से-कम 18 वर्ष की आयु वालों तक सीमित रखने के उपाय किए हैं, जैसे आयु का पता लगाने वाला एक स्वचालित AI-मॉडल, ऑपरेटर्स को दिए गए निर्देश, और स्व-प्रमाणन। हम बच्चों में उत्पादों या सेवाओं की मार्केटिंग नहीं करते हैं।
13. इस निजता सूचना के बारे में हमसे कैसे संपर्क करें
आप ऐप के भीतर सेटिंग मेन्यू में जाकर अपना डेटा मिटा सकते हैं। यदि आपके पास इस निजता सूचना के बारे में प्रश्न या चिंताएँ हों, आप अपने अधिकारों का उपयोग करना चाहते हों, या हमारे डेटा संरक्षण अधिकारी (डेटा प्रोटेक्शन ऑफ़िसर, DPO) से संपर्क करने के लिए, कृपया हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
के ज़रिए अपना अनुरोध भेजें या हमें Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA या r
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
पर लिखें। हम, अपने डेटा संरक्षण अधिकारों का उपयोग करने की इच्छा रखने वाले व्यक्तियों से प्राप्त सभी अनुरोधों का उत्तर लागू डेटा संरक्षण कानूनों के अनुसरण में देते हैं। आप World App के भीतर से भी अपना डेटा मिटा सकते हैं।
अगर आपके पास निजता या डेटा उपयोग से जुड़ी ऐसी कोई अनसुलझी चिंता हो जिसे हमने संतोषजनक ढंग से हल न किया हो, तो कृपया अपने क्षेत्राधिकार के डेटा संरक्षण नियामक से संपर्क करें। यदि आप EU में रहते हैं तो आपको अपना डेटा संरक्षण नियामक
यहाँ
मिल जाएगा।
14. आपके अधिकार
ये अधिकार तब तक लागू होते हैं जब तक हम अनुरोधकर्ता को हमारे डेटाबेस में पहचान सकते हों और जब तक हम अनुरोधकर्ता’ के अधिकारों के उपयोग से किसी अन्य डेटा आयत्त के अधिकारों का उल्लंघन न कर रहे हों:
आपके पास हमारे द्वारा प्रोसेस किए जाने वाले आपसे संबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा के बारे में किसी भी समय हमसे अनुरोध करके हमसे जानकारी पाने का अधिकार है। आपके पास आपसे संबंधित डेटा हमसे पाने का अधिकार है।
आपके पास यह माँग करने का अधिकार है कि यदि आपसे संबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा में अशुद्धियाँ हैं तो हम तुरंत उन्हें ठीक करें।
आपके पास यह माँग करने का अधिकार है कि हम आपसे संबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा मिटा दें। ये पूर्वापेक्षाएँ विशेष रूप से तब व्यक्तिगत डेटा को मिटवाने का अधिकार प्रदान करती हैं जब वह उसके एकत्रण के या अन्यथा प्रोसेसिंग के उद्देश्यों से आवश्यक न रह जाए, बशर्ते कि लागू कानूनों के तहत मिटाव की आवश्यकताएँ प्रदान की जाएँ (जैसे, कई क्षेत्राधिकारों के कानून हमें एक तय समयावधि तक लेनदेन की जानकारी बनाए रखने को बाध्य करते हैं)।’
आपके पास सहमति पर आधारित किसी भी डेटा प्रोसेसिंग पर अपनी सहमति स्वतंत्र रूप से वापस लेने या यदि डेटा प्रोसेसिंग सहमति पर आधारित नहीं है तो उस पर आपत्ति करने का अधिकार है।
15. अनुशेष
निम्नलिखित में, कई अनुशेष हमारे संचालन वाले संबंधित बाज़ारों के लिए कानूनन आवश्यक जानकारी प्रदान करते हैं। डेटा आयत्त के निवास क्षेत्र पर निर्भर करते हुए, यह जानकारी सहमति का भाग है। यह जानकारी आपके स्थान की जानकारी से अलग हो सकती है क्योंकि हम कुछ क्षेत्राधिकारों में कुछ सेवाएँ अवरुद्ध रखते हैं।’ उपर्युक्त के साथ किसी भी विसंगति की स्थिति में, क्षेत्राधिकार विशेष के बारे में अधिक विशेष कथन अभिभावी होता है:
अनुशेष A: यूरोपीय आर्थिक क्षेत्र (यूरोपियन इकॉनमिक एरिया, “EEA”) और यूनाइटेड किंगडम (“UK”)
यदि आप EEA या UK में हैं तो आप पर निम्नलिखित लागू होगा: आपके पास कम-से-कम निम्नलिखित अधिकार हैं: आपके पास सामान्य डेटा संरक्षण विनियम (जनरल डेटा प्रोटेक्शन रेगुलेशन), EU विनियम 2016/679 दिनांक 27.04.2016 (“GDPR”) के तहत नीचे यथा वर्णित अतिरिक्त अधिकार हो सकते हैं। GDPR के तहत उपलब्ध अपने अधिकारों का उपयोग करने के लिए, कृपया हमसे हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
पर संपर्क करें। अपवादस्वरूप मामलों को छोड़कर, हम आपका अनुरोध एक माह की सांविधिक समय-सीमा के भीतर हल कर देंगे। निम्नलिखित सेक्शन में GDPR शब्द के उपयोग में UK-GDPR भी शामिल है जिसे UK डेटा संरक्षण अधिनियम (डेटा प्रोटेक्शन एक्ट), 2018 के रूप में UK के राष्ट्रीय कानून में शामिल किया गया है और यूरोपीय संघ (आहरण) अधिनियम (यूरोपियन यूनियन (विथड्रॉअल) एक्ट), 2018 की
धारा 3
के आधार पर तथा डेटा संरक्षण, निजता एवं इलेक्ट्रॉनिक संचार (संशोधन इत्यादि) (EU निकास) विनियम 2019 (SI 2019/419) की
अनुसूची
1
द्वारा संशोधित के अनुसार इंग्लैंड और वेल्स, स्कॉटलैंड तथा उत्तरी आयरलैंड के कानूनों के भाग के रूप में बनाए रखा गया है।
A.1 GDPR के तहत सांविधिक अधिकार
यदि आपके डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग GDPR के लागू होने के दायरे के भीतर आती है (
जैसे
, यदि आप EEA के निवासी हैं या UK में हैं) तो यह सेक्शन लागू होता है।’ GDPR के तहत आपके पास अतिरिक्त अधिकार हो सकते हैं, जैसे नीचे वर्णित हैं। GDPR के तहत उपलब्ध अपने अधिकारों का उपयोग करने के लिए, कृपया हमसे हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
पर संपर्क करें।
आपके पास GDPR के अनु. 15 के दायरे के भीतर हमारे द्वारा प्रोसेस किए जाने वाले आपसे संंबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा के बारे में किसी भी समय हमसे अनुरोध करके हमसे जानकारी पाने का अधिकार है।
आपके पास यह माँग करने का अधिकार है कि यदि आपसे संबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा में अशुद्धियाँ हैं तो हम तुरंत उन्हें ठीक करें।
आपके पास GDPR के अनु. 17 में वर्णित शर्तों के अधीन यह माँग करने का अधिकार है कि हम आपसे संबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा मिटा दें। ये पूर्वावश्यक शर्तें विशेष रूप से एक मिटाने का अधिकार प्रदान करती हैं बशर्ते व्यक्तिगत डेटा अब उन प्रयोजनों के लिए आवश्यक न हो जिनके लिए वह एकत्र किया गया या अन्यथा प्रोसेस किया गया था, साथ ही, गैर-कानूनी प्रोसेसिंग के मामलों में, और संघीय कानून के तहत या हम जिस सदस्य राज्य के कानून के अधीन हैं उस कानून के तहत आपत्ति की मौजूदगी या मिटाने की बाध्यता की मौजूदगी के मामलों में भी उक्त अधिकार उपलब्ध है।
आपके पास GDPR के अनु. 18 के अनुसार यह माँग करने का अधिकार है कि हम प्रोसेसिंग प्रतिबंधित कर दें।
आपके पास GDPR के अनु. 20 के अनुसरण में, आपके द्वारा हमें दिए गए आपसे संबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा को हमसे, एक निश्चित संरचना वाले, आम तौर पर प्रयोग होने वाले और मशीन द्वारा पढ़े जा सकने वाले प्रारूप में प्राप्त करने का अधिकार है।
आपके पास GDPR के अनुच्छेद 21 के अनुसरण में, आपसे संंबंधित व्यक्तिगत डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग, जो अन्य के साथ-साथ, GDPR के अनुच्छेद 6 (1) वाक्य 1 बिंदु f के आधार पर की जाती है, पर किसी भी समय और आपकी परिस्थिति विशेष से संबंधित आधारों पर, आपत्ति करने का अधिकार है।
आपके पास नियंत्रक द्वारा संचालित डेटा प्रोसेसिंग के संबंध में शिकायतें होने की स्थिति में सक्षम पर्यवेक्षी प्राधिकरण से संपर्क करने का अधिकार है। ज़िम्मेदार पर्यवेक्षी प्राधिकरण है: बवेरियाई राज्य डेटा संरक्षण पर्यवेक्षण कार्यालय/द बवेरियन स्टेट ऑफ़िस फ़ॉर द डेटा प्रोटेक्शन सुपरविज़न (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz)।
यदि व्यक्तिगत डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग आपकी सहमति पर आधारित है, तो आप GDPR के अनु. 7 के तहत भविष्यव्यापी प्रभाव से किसी भी समय अपने व्यक्तिगत डेटा के उपयोग की अपनी सहमति वापस लेने के अधिकारी हैं, जिसमें सहमति वापसी की घोषणा करना उतना ही आसान है जितना सहमति की घोषणा करना। कृपया ध्यान दें कि सहमति की वापसी केवल भविष्य के लिए प्रभावी होती है। सहमति वापसी से पहले हो चुकी प्रोसेसिंग प्रभावित नहीं होती है।
A.2 डेटा अंतरण
पर्याप्तता निर्णय विहीन किसी देश को डेटा अंतरित करते समय, हम EU के मानक अनुबंधीय खंडों (स्टेंडर्ड कॉन्ट्रेक्चुअल क्लॉज़ेज़) का उपयोग करते हैं। वर्तमान में हम केवल USA को व्यक्तिगत डेटा अंतरित कर रहे हैं।
यदि व्यक्तिगत डेटा की प्रोसेसिंग आपकी सहमति पर आधारित है, तो आप GDPR के अनु. 7 के तहत भविष्यव्यापी प्रभाव से किसी भी समय अपने व्यक्तिगत डेटा के उपयोग की अपनी सहमति वापस लेने के अधिकारी हैं, जिसमें सहमति वापसी की घोषणा करना उतना ही आसान है जितना सहमति की घोषणा करना। कृपया ध्यान दें कि सहमति की वापसी केवल भविष्य के लिए प्रभावी होती है। सहमति वापसी से पहले हो चुकी प्रोसेसिंग प्रभावित नहीं होती है। कृपया ध्यान दें कि जो प्रोसेसिंग सहमति पर आधारित नहीं है वह सहमति की वापसी से प्रभावित नहीं होती है।
अनुशेष B: जापान
यदि आप जापान में निवास करते हैं तो आप पर अतिरिक्त रूप से निम्नलिखित लागू होता है।
B1. जापानी विनियमों से संबंधित जानकारी
हम जापानी कानूनों और विनियमों, जिनमें जापान का व्यक्तिगत जानकारी का संरक्षण अधिनियम (एक्ट ऑन द प्रोटेक्शन ऑफ़ पर्सनल इन्फ़ॉर्मेशन ऑफ़ जापान, “APPI”) शामिल है, का अनुपालन करते हैं। यह सेक्शन APPI में यथा परिभाषित “व्यक्तिगत जानकारी” की हमारे द्वारा हैंडलिंग पर लागू होता है जो इस बायोमेट्रिक डेटा सहमति फ़ॉर्म के अन्य अंशों पर वरीयता रखता है।
हम जापानी कानूनों और विनियमों, जिनमें जापान का व्यक्तिगत जानकारी का संरक्षण अधिनियम (एक्ट ऑन द प्रोटेक्शन ऑफ़ पर्सनल इन्फ़ॉर्मेशन ऑफ़ जापान, “APPI”) शामिल है, का अनुपालन करते हैं। यह सेक्शन APPI में यथा परिभाषित “व्यक्तिगत जानकारी” की हमारे द्वारा हैंडलिंग पर लागू होता है जो इस निजता नोटिस के अन्य अंशों पर वरीयता रखता है।
B2. डेटा साझाकरण
तब के सिवाय जब लागू कानून अन्यथा अनुमति देते हों, हम किसी भी तृतीय पक्ष को आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी का प्रकटन, की बिक्री, प्रदान, साझा या अंतरित नहीं करते हैं।
B3. सुरक्षा नियंत्रण उपाय
हम हैंडल की जा रही आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के किसी भी रिसाव या हानि, या को किसी भी क्षति की रोकथाम के लिए, और व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की सुरक्षा अन्यथा कायम रखने के लिए आवश्यक और उपयुक्त उपाय करते हैं, जैसे व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की हैंडलिंग के नियम स्थापित करने, व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की हैंडलिंग की नियमित निगरानी करने, कर्मचारियों को व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की हैंडलिंग में नियमित प्रशिक्षण प्रदान करने, व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की हैंडलिंग में प्रयुक्त उपकरणों की चोरी या हानि की रोकथाम करने और पहुँच नियंत्रण लागू करने के द्वारा। हम व्यक्तिगत जानकारी हैंडल करने वाले हमारे कॉन्ट्रेक्टरों और कर्मचारियों का भी उपयुक्त पर्यवेक्षण करते हैं। आप आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की हैंडलिंग के संबंध में लागू सुरक्षा नियंत्रण उपायों के बारे में और विवरण हमसे हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
पर संपर्क करके पा सकते हैं।
B4. विदेशों में व्यक्तिगत डेटा प्रोसेस करने के बारे में संदर्भ जानकारी
आपका व्यक्तिगत डेटा EU और USA में प्रोसेस होता है।
B5. APPI के तहत सांविधिक अधिकार
APPI के तहत प्रदत्त अपने अधिकारों का उपयोग करने के लिए कृपया हमसे हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
पर संपर्क करें।
अनुशेष C: आर्जेंटीना
यदि आप आर्जेंटीना गणराज्य के स्थायी निवासी हैं, तो हम आपको सूचित करते हैं कि सार्वजनिक जानकारी पहुँच अभिकरण (एजेंसी ऑफ़ एक्सेस टू पब्लिक इन्फ़ॉर्मेशन), कानून सं. 25,326 के नियंत्रक अभिकरण (कंट्रोल एजेंसी) के बतौर अपनी क्षमता में, के पास उन व्यक्तियों द्वारा दायर शिकायतों और दावों की सुनवाई की शक्ति है जिनके अधिकार व्यक्तिगत डेटा संरक्षण के संबंध में प्रभावी नियमों के गैर-अनुपालन से प्रभावित हुए हैं।
अभिकरण से निम्नवत संपर्क किया जा सकता है:
पता: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
पोस्टल कोड: C1067ABP
फोन नंबर: (54-11) 3988-3968
ई-मेल : datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
अनुशेष D: सिंगापुर
यदि आप सिंगापुर के निवासी हैं तो आप पर निम्नलिखित लागू होता है:
D1. आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा का एकत्रण, उपयोग और प्रकटन
यदि आप सिंगापुर के निवासी हैं तो और आपकी सहमति के साथ, हम हमारी निजता सूचना में यथा वर्णित प्रत्येक उद्देश्य के लिए आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा का एकत्रण, उपयोग या अन्यथा प्रकटन करेंगे। आप अपनी सहमति वापस लेने का अपना अधिकार जब चाहें तब प्रयोग कर सकते हैं, पर कृपया ध्यान दें कि संभव है कि आपके अनुरोध की प्रकृति और दायरे के आधार पर हम आपको हमारी सेवाएँ प्रदान करना जारी न रख पाएँ। कृपया इस पर भी ध्यान दें कि सहमति वापस लेने से हमारे द्वारा व्यक्तिगत डेटा का एकत्रण, उपयोग और प्रकटन वहाँ जारी रखने का हमारा अधिकार प्रभावित नहीं होता है जहाँ उक्त बिना-सहमति एकत्रण, उपयोग और प्रकटन को लागू कानूनों के तहत अनुमति हो या आवश्यक किया गया हो।[1]
D2. आपके डेटा आयत्त अधिकारों का उपयोग
आप हमसे हमारे
अनुरोध पोर्टल
पर संपर्क करके हमारे द्वारा एकत्र व्यक्तिगत डेटा को नियंत्रित कर सकते हैं और अपने किसी भी अधिकार का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। हम जल्द-से-जल्द, आम तौर पर 30 दिनों के भीतर आपके अनुरोध का उत्तर देने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। यदि हम 30 दिनों के भीतर आपके अनुरोध का उत्तर देने में असमर्थ हुए, या यदि हम आपके अनुरोध की पूर्ति में असमर्थ हैं तो हम आपको अग्रिम में सूचित करेंगे और कारण भी बताएँगे।[2]
जहाँ कानून में अनुमति हो वहाँ, हम आपके अनुरोध की पूर्ति के लिए आपसे प्रशासनिक शुल्क ले सकते हैं।
D3. अन्य देशों को आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा का अंतरण
यदि आप सिंगापुर के निवासी हैं और हमने आपका डेटा एकत्र किया है, तो हम समय-समय पर आपका डेटा सिंगापुर से बाहर भी अंतरित कर सकते हैं। हालाँकि, हम हमेशा सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा को ऐसे स्तर का संरक्षण मिलना जारी रहे जो कम-से-कम सिंगापुर व्यक्तिगत डेटा संरक्षण अधिनियम (सिंगापोर पर्सनल डेटा प्रोटेक्शन एक्ट), 2012 के तहत मिलने वाले संरक्षण से तुलनीय हो, जैसे, ASEAN आदर्श आनुबंधिक खंडों (मॉडल कॉन्ट्रेक्चुअल क्लॉज़ेज़) के उपयोग द्वारा।
अनुशेष E – दक्षिण कोरिया
यदि आप कोरियाई डेटा आयत्त हैं तो कोरियाई डेटा आयत्तों हेतु यह अनुशेष हमारे साथ आपके संबंध के सिलसिले में हमारे द्वारा प्रोसेस की जाने वाली व्यक्तिगत जानकारी से संबंधित हमारी कार्यप्रथाओं की व्याख्या करता है।
E.1 – व्यक्तिगत जानकारी का अंतरण
हम व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की प्रोसेसिंग के लिए उसे नीचे यथा निर्दिष्ट तृतीय पक्षों को प्रदान करते हैं:
- तृतीय पक्षों को व्यक्तिगत जानकारी प्रदान करना
प्राप्तकर्ता का नाम
प्राप्तकर्ता द्वारा उपयोग के उद्देश्य
प्राप्तकर्ता को प्रदत्त व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के बिंदु
प्राप्तकर्ता द्वारा व्यक्तिगत जानकारी अपने पास रखने की अवधियाँ
Tools for Humanity GmbH
इस सूचना में ऊपर सेक्शन 6 में वर्णित उद्देश्य।
इस सूचना में ऊपर सेक्शन 5 में वर्णित बिंदु।
इस सूचना में ऊपर सेक्शन 11 में परिभाषित स्टोरेज अवधियाँ।
- तृतीय पक्षों को व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की प्रोसेसिंग की आउटसोर्सिंग:
आउटसोर्स की गई समस्त डेटा प्रोसेसिंग और संबंधित कंपनियों की सूची कृपया यहाँ देखें:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
हम आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की प्रोसेसिंग को और/या स्टोरिंग के उद्देश्य से आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी को कोरिया से बाहर स्थित तृतीय पक्षों को आउटसोर्स और/या अंतरित कर सकते हैं:
यदि आप अपनी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी विदेश भेजना नहीं चाहते, तो आप व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के अंतरण पर सहमति न देकर, या हमसे सीमापार अंतरण रोकने का अनुरोध करके इंकार कर सकते हैं, पर यदि आप इंकार करते हैं तो संभव है कि आप हमारी सेवाओं का उपयोग न कर पाएँ। उपर्युक्त व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के सीमापार अंतरण का कानूनी आधार यह तथ्य है कि यह अंतरण “व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की आउटसोर्स की गई उस प्रोसेसिंग या स्टोरेज का गठन करता है जो डेटा आयत्त से किए गए अनुबंध को निष्कर्ष तक पहुँचाने और उस अनुबंध की पूर्ति करने के लिए आवश्यक है” और सांविधिकतः विहित मामलों को निजता नीति में प्रकट किया जा चुका है (व्यक्तिगत जानकारी संरक्षण अधिनियम का अनुच्छेद 28-8(1)(iii))।
E.2 – व्यक्तिगत जानकारी का विनाश
जब व्यक्तिगत जानकारी अपने पास बनाए रखने की अवधि खत्म हो जाने या प्रोसेसिंग का उद्देश्य पूरा हो जाने इत्यादि के कारण व्यक्तिगत जानकारी अनावश्यक हो जाती है तो उसे बिना विलंब नष्ट कर दिया जाता है। विनाश की प्रक्रिया और विधि नीचे वर्णित हैं:
1) विनाश की प्रक्रिया: हम व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के कुछ बिंदुओं को नष्ट करने के लिए चुनते हैं और DPO की स्वीकृति के साथ उन्हें नष्ट कर देते हैं।
2) विनाश की विधि: हम इलेक्ट्रॉनिक फ़ाइल्स के रूप में रिकॉर्ड और स्टोर की हुई व्यक्तिगत जानकारी को किसी तकनीकी विधि (जैसे, निम्नस्तरीय फ़ॉर्मेट) से नष्ट करके यह सुनिश्चित करते हैं कि रिकॉर्ड दोबारा प्राप्त या बनाए न जा सकते हों, वहीं कागज़ी दस्तावेज़ों के रूप में रिकॉर्ड और स्टोर की हुई व्यक्तिगत जानकारी को हम महीन टुकड़ों में काटकर या भस्म करके नष्ट करते हैं।
E.3 – व्यक्तिगत जानकारी की स्टोरेज
यदि हमारे लिए लागू कानूनों के अनुसरण में आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी हमारे पास बनाए रखना आवश्यक किया जाता है तो हम निम्नलिखित उद्देश्यों के लिए और लागू कानूनों द्वारा आवश्यक की गई अवधियों तक ऐसा करेंगे।
E.4 – आपके अधिकार
आप लागू कानूनों, जिनमें व्यक्तिगत जानकारी संरक्षण अधिनियम (पर्सनल इन्फ़ॉर्मेशन प्रोटेक्शन एक्ट) शामिल है, द्वारा उपबंधित के अनुसार, व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के संबंध में हमारे विरुद्ध आपके अधिकारों, जिनमें आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी तक पहुँचने, उसमें संशोधन करने या उसे मिटाने, या उसकी प्रोसेसिंग स्थगित करने का अनुरोध शामिल हैं, का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। आप व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के एकत्रण/उपयोग/प्रदायगी की सहमति वापस लेने के अपने अधिकार, पोर्टेबिलिटी के अधिकार और स्वचालित निर्णय प्रक्रिया से संबंधित अधिकारों का भी उपयोग कर सकते हैं। आप अपने कानूनी प्रतिनिधियों या अन्य विधिवत अधिकृत व्यक्तियों के माध्यम से भी ऐसे अधिकारों का उपयोग कर सकते हैं।
आप ऊपर वर्णित किसी भी लागू अधिकार का उपयोग worldcoin.org/requestportal पर स्थित हमारे अनुरोध पोर्टल पर हमसे संपर्क करके कर सकते हैं।
E.5 – सुरक्षा के उपाय
हम व्यक्तिगत जानकारी के संरक्षण के लिए लागू कोरियाई कानूनों द्वारा विहित तकनीकी, संगठनात्मक और भौतिक सुरक्षा उपाय, जैसे वे जो नीचे लिखे हैं, लागू करेंगे:
1) प्रबंधकीय उपाय: डेटा संरक्षण अधिकारी (डेटा प्रोटेक्शन ऑफ़िसर) की नियुक्ति, आंतरिक प्रबंधन योजना की स्थापना और कार्यान्वयन, कर्मचारियों को डेटा संरक्षण का नियमित प्रशिक्षण, इत्यादि;
2) तकनीकी उपाय: व्यक्तिगत जानकारी प्रोसेसिंग सिस्टम तक पहुँच के प्राधिकार का प्रबंधन, एक पहुँच नियंत्रण सिस्टम की स्थापना, सुरक्षा कार्यक्रमों की स्थापना, इत्यादि; और
3) भौतिक उपाय: व्यक्तिगत जानकारी स्टोरेज इकाइयों और उपकरणों, जैसे कंप्यूटर कक्षों और डेटा स्टोरेज कक्षों इत्यादि तक की पहुँच पर प्रतिबंध।
E.6 – हमसे संपर्क करें
निजता और डेटा संरक्षण से संबंधित प्रश्नों या पूछताछ के लिए, कृपया हमारी डेटा संरक्षण टीम से
dpo@worldcoin.org
पर संपर्क करें।
अनुशेष F – USA
कैलिफ़ोर्निया निजता अधिकार अधिनियम (प्राइवेसी राइट्स एक्ट) द्वारा यथा संशोधित कैलिफ़ोर्निया उपभोक्ता निजता अधिनियम (कंस्यूमर प्राइवेसी एक्ट) हम पर वर्तमान में लागू नहीं होता है।
अनुशेष G - ब्राजील
G.1 लागू कानून, नियंत्रक और ऑपरेटर
यदि आप ब्राजील में रहते हैं, यदि आपका व्यक्तिगत डेटा ब्राजील में एकत्र किया गया था, या यदि आप ब्राजील में हमारी सेवाओं का उपयोग करते हैं, तो लागू कानून कानून संख्या 13,709/2018 (सामान्य डेटा संरक्षण कानून, या “LGPD”) है।
G.2 आपत्ति करने का अधिकार
आपको उन उद्देश्यों के लिए अपने व्यक्तिगत डेटा के उपयोग पर आपत्ति करने का अधिकार है जो सहमति पर निर्भर नहीं करते हैं यदि उद्देश्य LGPD के साथ असंगत है। यदि आपकी आपत्ति को बरकरार रखा जाता है, तो हम अब आपकी व्यक्तिगत जानकारी का उपयोग हमारी सेवाओं की सुविधाओं और अनुभवों को विकसित करने और सुधारने के लिए नहीं करेंगे।
ध्यान दें कि यदि आप कुछ व्यक्तिगत डेटा नहीं देते हैं या उनके संग्रह या प्रसंस्करण की अनुमति नहीं देते हैं, तो यह आपके अनुभव की गुणवत्ता को प्रभावित कर सकता है, हम अपनी सेवाओं के उद्देश्यों को पूरा करने में सक्षम नहीं हो सकते हैं, या हम आपको कुछ सेवाएं प्रदान करने में सक्षम नहीं हो सकते हैं।
कुछ मामलों में, आपका डेटा गुमनाम है, जिसका अर्थ है कि यह अब आपकी पहचान नहीं करता है। आप गुमनाम डेटा के उपयोग पर आपत्ति नहीं कर सकते क्योंकि यह आपकी पहचान की अनुमति नहीं देता है, जैसा कि LGPD में प्रदान किया गया है। हम अपने उत्पादों और सेवाओं को बेहतर बनाने के लिए इस गुमनाम डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं।
G.3 LGPD के तहत वैधानिक अधिकार
LGPD के अनुसार, आपको संसाधित डेटा की पोर्टेबिलिटी के प्रसंस्करण, पहुंच, सुधार या अनुरोध के अस्तित्व की पुष्टि करने का अधिकार है। इसके अलावा, आप उन सार्वजनिक और निजी संस्थाओं की जानकारी का अनुरोध कर सकते हैं, जिनके साथ हम संयुक्त रूप से आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं। आप सहमति नहीं देने और नकारात्मक परिणामों की संभावना के बारे में जानकारी का अनुरोध भी कर सकते हैं, और सहमति से संसाधित डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध कर सकते हैं। आप सेटिंग्स मेनू में World App में अपनी जानकारी को हटाने का चयन कर सकते हैं।
कुछ परिस्थितियों में, आपको आपत्ति करने या प्रतिबंधित करने का अधिकार है कि हम आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा को कैसे प्रोसेस करते हैं, या आपकी सहमति वापस लेने के लिए, जिस पर हम आपके द्वारा प्रदान की जाने वाली जानकारी को प्रोसेसिंग करने के लिए निर्भर करते हैं।
आप नीचे दिए गए अनुभाग H.4 में संपर्क विवरण का उपयोग करके या हमारे ऑनलाइन अनुरोध पोर्टल के माध्यम से हमारे DPO को अनुरोध सबमिट करके LGPD के तहत अपने अधिकारों का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। यदि आपको लगता है कि आपके अधिकारों को पर्याप्त रूप से संबोधित नहीं किया गया है, तो आप इस लिंक:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
पर उपलब्ध फ़ॉर्म को पूरा करके Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) के समक्ष शिकायत दर्ज कर सकते हैं।
G.4 आपके व्यक्तिगत डेटा का अंतर्राष्ट्रीय स्थानांतरण
यदि LGPD आप पर लागू होता है, और हमने आपका व्यक्तिगत डेटा एकत्र किया है, तो हम इसे देश के बाहर भी स्थानांतरित कर सकते हैं। हालांकि, हम हमेशा यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि आपका व्यक्तिगत डेटा केवल विदेशी देशों या अंतर्राष्ट्रीय संगठनों को स्थानांतरित किया जाए जो LGPD में प्रदान किए गए पर्याप्त सुरक्षा का स्तर प्रदान करते हैं, जैसा कि ANPD द्वारा जारी पर्याप्तता निर्णयों में मान्यता प्राप्त है। पर्याप्तता के निर्णय के अभाव में, हम सुरक्षा के मानक का पालन करना जारी रखेंगे जो ANPD में स्थापित मानक अनुबंधादात्मक नियमों का उपयोग करके कम से कम LGPD में प्रदान किए गए के समतुल्य है, या जब हम अंतर्राष्ट्रीय स्थानांतरण के लिए आपकी विशिष्ट और हाइलाइट की गई सहमति प्राप्त करते हैं।
संलग्नक 1 – क्षेत्राधिकारअनुसार Tools for Humanity की डेटा प्रोसेसिंग गतिविधियों के कानूनी आधार/उद्देश्य
उपयोगकर्ता
हम डेटा को प्रसंस्कृत क्यों करते हैं
कौन सा व्यक्तिगत डेटा प्रसंस्कृत किया जाता है
प्रसंस्करण के लिए कानूनी आधार
अवधारण अवधि
World App में अपना खाता बनाने के लिए
वॉलेट पता, मेटाडेटा, उपयोगकर्ता नाम
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि या जब तक आप डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध नहीं करते।
यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि आप पात्र उम्र के हैं
जन्म तिथि
वैध दायित्व
आपकी जन्म की सटीक तारीख कभी भी संग्रहित नहीं की जाती है। हम केवल यह सुनिश्चित करते हैं कि आप 18 वर्ष के हैं या नहीं। हम इस जानकारी को सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि के लिए या जब तक आप डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध नहीं करते तब तक संग्रहित करते हैं।
वैकल्पिक रूप से अपने संपर्कों को आसानी से संवाद करने और आपके साथ लेनदेन करने की अनुमति देने के लिए
फोन नंबर
सहमति
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि या जब तक आप डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध नहीं करते।
आपको आसानी से संवाद करने और अपने संपर्कों के साथ लेनदेन करने में सक्षम बनाने के लिए
अड्रेस बुक के संपर्क
सहमति
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि या जब तक आप डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध नहीं करते।
वैकल्पिक रूप से आपको अपने आस-पास Orbs दिखाने के लिए
स्थान जानकारी
सहमति
24 महीने तक।
खाते की रोकथाम के संदर्भ में धोखाधड़ी को रोकना
मेटाडाटा, आईपी पता, डिवाइस आईडी
वैध हित, अर्थात् कुछ प्रकार की धोखाधड़ी को रोकने में रुचि (प्रकारों की सूची)
24 महीने तक।
यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि आपके देश में सेवा की अनुमति है
IP पता, स्थान की जानकारी
वैध दायित्व
24 महीने तक।
अपने सेल्फ़-कस्टडी वाले वॉलेट को प्रदर्शित करने और वॉलेट लेनदेन के लिए एक इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करने के लिए
वॉलेट पता, लेनदेन डेटा
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
इस संदर्भ में कोई व्यक्तिगत डेटा संग्रहित नहीं किया जाता है।
अपनी सेल्फ़-कस्टडी वाली World ID प्रदर्शित करने और सत्यापन के लिए एक इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करने के लिए
World ID जानकारी
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
इस संदर्भ में कोई व्यक्तिगत डेटा संग्रहित नहीं किया जाता है।
अपने सेल्फ़-कस्टडी वाले क्रेडेंशियल्स को प्रदर्शित करने और क्रेडेंशियल्स को साझा करने के लिए एक इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करने के लिए
क्रेडेंशियल जानकारी, क्रेडेंशियल वैधता जानकारी
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
इस संदर्भ में कोई व्यक्तिगत डेटा संग्रहित नहीं किया जाता है।
हमारी सेवाओं का विश्लेषण और सुधार करने और डेटा विज्ञान अनुसंधान करने के लिए
उपयोग डेटा और मेटाडेटा, सार्वजनिक लेनदेन डेटा
सहमति
24 महीने तक।
लागू कानूनों, जैसे धनशोधन-रोधी कानून, और प्रतिबंधों का अनुपालन करने के लिए
लेनदेन डेटा, वॉलेट पता
वैध दायित्व
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि।
सामग्री विनियमों जैसे लागू कानूनों का पालन करने के लिए
मिनीऐप सामग्री
वैध दायित्व
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि।
संचार और विपणन को सक्षम करने के लिए
ईमेल पता, पुश नोटिफ़िकेशन
वैध हित
24 महीने तक।
आप से पत्राचार
वैध हित
24 महीने तक।
आपसे फीडबैक
वैध हित
24 महीने तक।
आपके ग्राहक सेवा अनुरोधों, शिकायतों, और प्रश्नों को संभालने के लिए।
संचार जानकारी और ईमेल या सोशल मीडिया प्रोफ़ाइल नाम, यदि आप ऐसे माध्यमों के माध्यम से हमारे साथ संवाद करना चाहते हैं
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि ऐप आपके लिए सुचारू रूप से चल रहा है
मेटाडाटा
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
24 महीने तक।
अपने डिवाइस को सत्यापित करने के लिए
डिवाइस World ID डेटा (डिवाइस फिंगरप्रिंट)
अनुबंध का निष्पादन
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि।
विवाद हल करने के लिए, समस्याओं का निवारण करने के लिए, और आपके साथ हमारे करारों, जिसमें यह निजता सूचना और उपयोगकर्ता शर्तें शामिल हैं, को लागू करने के लिए।
सेवाओं के उपयोग की अवधि।
व्यावसायिक भागीदार
हम डेटा को प्रसंस्कृत क्यों करते हैं
कौन सा व्यक्तिगत डेटा प्रसंस्कृत किया जाता है
प्रसंस्करण के लिए कानूनी आधार
अवधारण अवधि
संचार
फोन नंबर, ईमेल पता, नाम
वैध हित, यानी व्यावसायिक भागीदारों के साथ संवाद करने का हित।
व्यावसायिक संबंध की अवधि या जब तक आप डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध नहीं करते हैं।
व्यावसायिक संबंध बनाए रखना और उसका प्रबंधन करना
फोन नंबर, ईमेल पता, नाम, उद्यम डेटा
वैध हित यानी व्यावसायिक भागीदारों के साथ व्यावसायिक संबंधों को बनाए रखने और प्रशासित करने में रुचि।
व्यावसायिक संबंध की अवधि या जब तक आप डेटा को हटाने का अनुरोध नहीं करते हैं।
केवाईसी दायित्वों को पूरा करें
पासपोर्ट डेटा, उद्यम डेटा
वैध दायित्व
व्यावसायिक संबंधों की अवधि और समाप्ति के 3 साल बाद तक।
आपके आवेदन को प्रोसेस करने के लिए
आवेदन डेटा
अनुबंध में प्रवेश करने से पहले डेटा विषय के अनुरोध पर सहमति और कदम।
यदि आप प्रतिभा पूल का हिस्सा बनने के लिए सहमत हैं, तो डिफ़ॉल्ट रूप से 3 महीने या उससे अधिक समय तक।
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Pemberitahuan Privasi Tools for Humanity
Terima kasih telah memilih menjadi bagian dari Komunitas Worldcoin! Worldcoin adalah protokol sumber terbuka, yang didukung oleh komunitas pengembang, individu, dan kontributor global lainnya.
Pemberitahuan Privasi ini mencakup data yang Anda berikan kepada kami melalui penggunaan situs web, aplikasi (“Aplikasi Worldcoin”), serta layanan lain yang ditautkan dengan Pemberitahuan Privasi ini (secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “Layanan”). Pemberitahuan Privasi ini tercakup dalam dan diatur oleh
Syarat dan Ketentuan Pengguna
(“Ketentuan Pengguna”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH AS”), bersama anak perusahaannya di Jerman, Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Jerman”; secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “
TFH
” atau “
kami
”), berkontribusi terhadap pengembangan dan pertumbuhan protokol Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”) tetapi berbeda dengan Worldcoin Foundation yang mengendalikan pemrosesan data terkait Orb.
1. Pengendali
Kami adalah pengendali data seluruh “Data World App”, “Data Verifikasi Kredensial” dan “Data Bisnis” lainnya: Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 AS. TFH didirikan di Uni Eropa (“
UE
”) melalui Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Data World App” berarti semua data pribadi yang dikumpulkan dan diproses melalui penggunaan World App oleh Anda, sebagaimana dijelaskan lebih lanjut dalam Bagian 5 di bawah, kecuali data pribadi terkait penggunaan protokol Worldcoin atau token Worldcoin oleh Anda (seperti alamat dompet Anda dan data transaksi, yang tidak kami kendalikan).
Data Verifikasi Kredensial mengacu pada data yang diproses saat memverifikasi kredensial untuk menambahkannya ke World ID penyimpanan mandiri Anda. Ini berarti, misalnya, membaca chip NFC paspor Anda untuk menyimpan informasi paspor Anda dengan aman pada perangkat Anda. Data ini berada di bawah kendali Anda dan setelah memverifikasi validitas kredensial Anda, TFH menyimpan fragmen anonim dengan nilai hash dari tanda tangan kriptografis unik kredensial Anda (misalnya, paspor) untuk memastikan bahwa setiap kredensial hanya dapat ditambahkan ke World ID sekali.
“Data bisnis” berarti semua data pribadi yang dikumpulkan dan diproses melalui cara lain oleh perusahaan kami saat berkomunikasi atau dengan cara lain apa pun bekerja sama atau berinteraksi dengan kami melalui email, konferensi video, atau situs web kami. Untuk pemrosesan data dalam konteks Aplikasi Orb, harap baca Pemberitahuan Privasi Aplikasi Orb yang ditautkan dalam Aplikasi Orb. Untuk pemrosesan data dalam konteks pengumpulan dan pengujian data khusus, harap baca Pemberitahuan Privasi Pengumpulan dan Pengujian terkait yang terhubung dalam aplikasi uji Anda. Untuk pemrosesan dalam konteks situs web kami, harap baca Kebijakan Cookie kami yang ditautkan pada situs web kami.
2. Pembaruan pada Pemberitahuan Privasi ini
Kami terkadang memperbarui Pemberitahuan Privasi ini. Jika kami melakukan perubahan besar, seperti cara kami menggunakan informasi pribadi Anda, maka kami akan memberi tahu Anda melalui email atau pesan dalam Aplikasi Worldcoin Anda.
3. Apa yang ada dalam Pemberitahuan Privasi ini?
Komitmen kami untuk melindungi privasi dan data Anda
Informasi yang kami kumpulkan dan alasannya
Cara kami menggunakan data yang kami kumpulkan
Tempat kami memproses data Anda
Waktu kami membagikan data Anda
Cara data Anda dicatat pada blockchain publik
Cara kami menggunakan cookie
Seberapa lama kami menyimpan data Anda
Perbedaan Pemberitahuan Privasi ini bagi anak-anak dan remaja
Hak menurut undang-undang yang Anda miliki
Cara menghubungi kami tentang Pemberitahuan Privasi ini
4. Komitmen Kami untuk Melindungi Privasi dan Data Anda
Kami sangat berkomitmen untuk melindungi privasi Anda dan mengamankan data Anda. Kami mengakui bahwa kami hanya dapat memenuhi misi kami untuk mendistribusikan token digital kami secara adil kepada sebanyak mungkin orang jika orang memercayai kami, serta keamanan privasi dan data sangat penting untuk mendapatkan kepercayaan Anda.
Privasi
Kami merancang produk dan layanan kami dengan mempertimbangkan privasi Anda. Kami mengumpulkan data untuk meningkatkan produk dan layanan kami. Kami akan selalu memberi tahu Anda, di sini dalam Pemberitahuan Privasi ini atau dalam formulir persetujuan data untuk produk atau layanan tertentu, data yang kami kumpulkan, alasan kami mengumpulkan data tersebut, dan hal yang kami lakukan terhadap data tersebut.
Keamanan Data
Kami memiliki tim khusus untuk menjaga data Anda dan telah menerapkan pengamanan fisik dan elektronik yang melindungi data Anda baik pada saat transit maupun pada saat istirahat. Pada saat yang sama, tidak ada layanan yang benar-benar aman. Apabila Anda memiliki kekhawatiran tentang akun atau data Anda, hubungi kami melalui
Portal Permintaan
kami atau kirimkan surat kepada kami ke Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 AS.
5. Informasi yang Kami Kumpulkan dan Alasannya
5.1 Data yang Anda Berikan Kepada Kami
Sebagai pengguna, Anda tidak diwajibkan untuk memberikan data untuk mengakses Aplikasi. Namun, Anda mungkin perlu memberikan data tertentu kepada kami untuk menggunakan fitur dalam Layanan. Dasar hukum untuk pemrosesan dalam kasus di bawah adalah persetujuan pengguna dan pelaksanaan kontrak (komitmen kami untuk menyediakan Layanan). Di bawah adalah daftar data yang dapat Anda berikan dan penggunaan data tersebut oleh kami:
Dalam Konteks World App:
Nomor telepon.
Anda dapat memilih untuk memasukkan nomor telepon agar dikaitkan dengan akun Anda. Dengan izin Anda, pengguna lain mungkin dapat menemukan akun Anda melalui nomor telepon Anda. Kami dapat memerlukan nomor telepon saat Anda mengirimkan permintaan subjek data. Dasar hukum untuk memproses data ini adalah pelaksanaan Layanan berdasarkan Ketentuan Pengguna.
Nama pengguna.
Anda dapat menautkan nama pengguna ke alamat dompet Anda dan mengubah nama pengguna setiap saat.
Tanggal Lahir.
Anda dapat mengungkapkan tanggal lahir Anda untuk memastikan kepatuhan terhadap persyaratan pembatasan usia. Kami tidak akan pernah menyimpan data kelahiran Anda tetapi hanya pemeriksaan jumlah data tersebut dan apakah Anda berusia di atas 18 tahun atau tidak.
Masukan dan korespondensi dari Anda.
Ini mencakup email, pesan obrolan, atau komunikasi lain yang Anda kirimkan kepada kami melalui email atau situs web media sosial pihak ketiga. Dapat mencakup pemrosesan alamat email atau nama profil media sosial jika Anda ingin berkomunikasi dengan kami melalui cara tersebut. Kami dapat menggunakan penyedia layanan pihak ketiga untuk memfasilitasi survei tentang penggunaan Layanan kami oleh Anda. Dasar hukum untuk memproses data ini adalah pelaksanaan Layanan berdasarkan Ketentuan Pengguna.
Kontak buku alamat.
Anda dapat menyediakan Aplikasi dengan akses ke buku alamat Anda untuk mengaktifkan fitur yang memudahkan Anda menemukan dan berinteraksi dengan pengguna lain yang mungkin terdapat dalam buku alamat Anda. Dasar hukum untuk memproses data ini adalah kepentingan sah subjek yang ditemukan dalam Aplikasi Worldcoin dan kepentingan pengguna yang berbagi untuk menemukan kontaknya dalam Aplikasi Worldcoin.
Harap diperhatikan:
Anda bertanggung jawab untuk memastikan bahwa pembagian informasi kontak Anda mematuhi undang-undang yang berlaku. Hal ini mungkin mengharuskan Anda mendapatkan izin dari kontak Anda dan Anda tidak boleh membagikan perincian kontak apa pun kepada TFH dari orang lain tanpa persetujuan tegas mereka. Anda dapat berubah pikiran dan menonaktifkan akses kami ke kontak Anda setiap saat dalam pengaturan perangkat Anda. Jika Anda memutuskan untuk mengimpor kontak buku alamat pada perangkat Anda ke Aplikasi Worldcoin untuk menemukan kontak yang menggunakan Layanan kami atau mengundang mereka untuk bergabung dan menggunakan Layanan kami, kami akan menyinkronkan nomor telepon kontak Anda secara berkala dengan nomor tersebut dan alamat dompet terkait yang diberikan oleh pengguna lain di server kami.
Informasi lokasi
. Anda dapat memutuskan untuk mengaktifkan layanan berbasis lokasi (seperti fitur yang mengizinkan Anda menemukan Operator Orb di dekat Anda). Hanya dengan persetujuan khusus Anda, maka kami dapat mengumpulkan informasi tentang lokasi Anda melalui GPS untuk mengaktifkan layanan berbasis lokasi guna menunjukkan Orb di dekat Anda. Anda dapat mengubah izin Anda setiap saat pada pengaturan perangkat Anda. Jika Anda tidak tinggal di Korea Selatan, kami juga dapat menyimpan perkiraan lokasi Anda yang dipisahkan dari akun World App Anda. Kami menggunakan data ini untuk meningkatkan layanan kami secara khusus, namun tidak terbatas pada pemilihan lokasi Orb.
Lokapasar P2P
. Jika Anda menggunakan Layanan Lokapasar P2P (apabila tersedia) yang mengizinkan Anda untuk membeli token digital dari pengguna lain, maka kami dapat mengumpulkan informasi tambahan seperti alamat dompet Anda, informasi kontak Anda (yaitu, nomor telepon Anda), dan nomor akun Anda yang terkait dengan transaksi (seperti nomor M-PESA Anda). Kami mencatat data transaksi sebagai bagian dari penyediaan Layanan Lokapasar P2P. Kami juga dapat mengumpulkan informasi tambahan untuk mematuhi persyaratan KYC yang berlaku.
Metadata perangkat.
Apabila Anda menggunakan Aplikasi Worldcoin, kami mengumpulkan metadata dari perangkat Anda untuk memastikan Aplikasi Worldcoin berfungsi dengan benar serta Anda tidak melanggar Syarat dan Ketentuan kami. Hal ini termasuk mengumpulkan pengenal perangkat dan alamat IP.
Data World ID Perangkat.
Kami juga memproses metadata perangkat Anda untuk menghitung sidik jari perangkat unik. Hash sidik jari ini berfungsi sebagai sinyal yang membuktikan keunikan Anda dengan World ID perangkat.
Dalam konteks pemrosesan Data Bisnis:
Nama depan dan belakang.
Kami dapat memproses nama depan dan belakang Anda untuk mengupayakan kepentingan sah dalam memelihara dan mengelola hubungan bisnis dengan Anda.
Alamat surel.
Anda juga dapat memberikan email Anda untuk berlangganan milis kami agar tetap aktual dengan proyek Worldcoin. Kami dapat memerlukan email Anda saat mengirimkan permintaan subjek data. Kami dapat memproses alamat email Anda untuk mengupayakan kepentingan sah dalam memelihara dan mengelola hubungan bisnis dengan Anda.
Nomor telepon.
Kami dapat memproses nomor telepon Anda untuk mengupayakan kepentingan sah dalam memelihara dan mengelola hubungan bisnis dengan Anda.
Data Perusahaan
. Jika Anda memiliki hubungan bisnis dengan kami (seperti jika Anda adalah Operator Orb atau pemasok), maka kami dapat memerlukan informasi seperti nama, alamat surat, email, nomor telepon, alamat dompet, dan dokumentasi lainnya (seperti ID pemerintah Anda) sebagai bagian dari upaya melanjutkan hubungan bisnis tersebut dan guna memenuhi kewajiban mengenali pelanggan kami. Kami dapat menggunakan layanan pihak ketiga, seperti Onfido, untuk membantu kami mengumpulkan serta meninjau informasi dan dokumentasi di atas guna memenuhi kewajiban mengenali pelanggan.
Data aplikasi
. Jika Anda ingin bekerja untuk kami, Anda harus mengirimkan lamaran Anda kepada kami yang menyertakan surat lamaran dan CV Anda serta informasi pribadi yang ingin Anda ungkapkan.
Anda dapat menemukan dasar hukum pemrosesan untuk setiap aktivitas pemrosesan data di atas yang dijelaskan secara terperinci dalam
ANEKS I – Dasar hukum untuk aktivitas pemrosesan data Tools for Humanity
pada akhir pemberitahuan privasi ini.
5.2 Data yang Kami Kumpulkan Dari Sumber Pihak Ketiga
Dari waktu ke waktu, kami dapat memperoleh informasi tentang Anda dari sumber pihak ketiga berikut:
Data Blockchain
. Kami dapat menganalisis data blockchain publik untuk memastikan para pihak yang memanfaatkan Layanan kami tidak terlibat dalam kegiatan ilegal atau terlarang berdasarkan Ketentuan Pengguna, dan menganalisis tren transaksi untuk tujuan penelitian dan pengembangan.
Layanan Verifikasi Identitas
. Kami dapat memperoleh informasi dari layanan pihak ketiga menggunakan data Anda guna memverifikasi identitas Anda jika diwajibkan oleh undang-undang (seperti persyaratan mengenali pelanggan yang berlaku). Untuk memperjelas, kami
tidak
menggunakan data biometrik Anda saat kami memverifikasi identitas Anda sebagaimana diwajibkan oleh hukum.
Basis data talenta
. Kami dapat mengumpulkan data dari berbagai sumber untuk memberikan penawaran pekerjaan kepada individu bertalenta.
5.3 Data yang Kami Kumpulkan secara Otomatis
Jika diizinkan berdasarkan undang-undang yang berlaku, kami dapat mengumpulkan jenis data tertentu secara otomatis saat Anda berinteraksi dengan Layanan kami. Informasi ini membantu kami mengatasi masalah dukungan pelanggan, meningkatkan kinerja Layanan, memberikan pengalaman yang disederhanakan dan disesuaikan kepada Anda, serta mengamankan kredensial Akun Anda. Informasi yang dikumpulkan secara otomatis mencakup:
Pengenal Online:
Perincian geolokasi dan penelusuran (lihat di atas), sistem operasi komputer atau ponsel, nama dan versi peramban web, dan alamat IP. Dalam kasus yang sangat terbatas, data ini juga dimasukkan ke dalam pendeteksi penipuan dan alur keuangan ilegal kami. Data ini juga berfungsi untuk memberikan pengalaman perangkat lunak kami yang stabil dan bebas penipuan.
Data Penggunaan:
Data autentikasi, pertanyaan keamanan, dan data lain yang dikumpulkan melalui cookie dan teknologi serupa.
Cookie
: file data kecil yang disimpan di hard drive atau memori dalam perangkat yang membantu kami meningkatkan Layanan kami dan pengalaman Anda, melihat area dan fitur populer dari Layanan kami, serta menghitung kunjungan. Untuk dasar hukum pemrosesan data tersebut, bacalah
Kebijakan Cookie
kami yang menjelaskan berbagai jenis cookie yang kami gunakan.
Demikian pula, Aplikasi Worldcoin mengumpulkan informasi untuk pemecahan masalah dan peningkatan. Kami menggunakan layanan pihak ketiga, seperti Segment.io atau PostHog, untuk melihat informasi agregat tentang penggunaan dan interaksi pengguna akhir. Apabila memungkinkan, kami mengambil langkah untuk meminimalkan atau menyembunyikan informasi yang dikirimkan kepada pihak ketiga (seperti penyandian data).
5.4 Data Anonim dan Agregat
Penganoniman adalah teknik pemrosesan data yang menjadikan data tidak lagi tergolong sebagai data pribadi, sebab setelah dianonimkan data tidak lagi dapat dikaitkan dengan individu tertentu. Contoh data anonim mencakup:
Data transaksi
Data aliran klik
Metrik kinerja
Indikator penipuan (meskipun data pribadi juga digunakan untuk tujuan ini)
Kami juga melakukan agregasi terhadap data, yaitu menggabungkan sejumlah besar informasi secara bersama-sama agar tidak lagi mengidentifikasi atau merujuk kepada seseorang. Kami menggunakan data anonim atau agregat untuk tujuan bisnis kami, seperti memahami kebutuhan dan perilaku pengguna, meningkatkan Layanan kami, menjalankan inteligensi bisnis dan pemasaran, mendeteksi ancaman keamanan, serta melatih algoritma kami.
Dasar hukum untuk memproses data yang disebutkan di atas adalah kepentingan sah aplikasi atau situs web yang berfungsi, wawasan bisnis, dan pencegahan penipuan.
6. Cara Kami Menggunakan Data yang Kami Kumpulkan
6.1 Deskripsi umum
Kami harus memiliki alasan yang sah (atau “dasar yang sah untuk pemrosesan”) guna menggunakan informasi pribadi Anda. Dalam beberapa kasus, penggunaan informasi pribadi Anda tidak memerlukan persetujuan Anda sebelumnya. Kami menggunakan data Anda untuk tujuan berikut:
Untuk menyediakan serta mempertahankan produk dan layanan kami berdasarkan Ketentuan Pengguna. Layanan ini mencakup:
Aplikasi Worldcoin tempat pengguna dapat mengelola World ID dan token digital mereka serta mempelajari tentang mata uang kripto secara umum dan proyek Worldcoin secara khusus;
Aplikasi Operator tempat Operator Orb dapat mengelola dan mengawasi Orb mereka yang dikelola dan statistiknya;
P2P Marketplace tempat kami menghubungkan pengguna dengan agen (tidak berlaku untuk pengguna yang didirikan atau tinggal di Jerman atau memiliki tempat tinggal atau kantor terdaftar di Jerman);
Untuk meningkatkan dan mengembangkan produk serta layanan kami, termasuk untuk melakukan debug dan memperbaiki kesalahan dalam Layanan kami.
Untuk melakukan penelitian ilmu data.
Menganalisis penggunaan Layanan kami oleh Anda untuk memberikan dukungan yang lebih baik.
Untuk memungkinkan Anda memublikasikan informasi pada blockchain guna membuktikan keunikan Anda.
Untuk menggunakan alamat dompet Anda guna mengirimkan token digital yang kami dukung.
Untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang berlaku seperti undang-undang antipencucian uang dan sanksinya. Mencakup:
Menggunakan alamat IP Anda untuk memblokir individu yang negaranya tidak mengizinkan mereka mengakses Layanan;
Untuk menjawab permintaan subjek data berdasarkan undang-undang perlindungan data yang berlaku seperti permintaan akses atau penghapusan;
Memantau aliran keuangan yang berpotensi melanggar hukum, misalnya dari dompet yang masuk daftar hitam; dan
Untuk mematuhi hukum yang berlaku, seperti peraturan tentang konten ilegal.
Menangani permintaan, keluhan, dan pertanyaan layanan pelanggan Anda.
Menyelesaikan sengketa, memecahkan masalah, dan memberlakukan perjanjian kami dengan Anda, termasuk Pemberitahuan Privasi ini dan Ketentuan Pengguna.
Menghubungi Anda terkait pembaruan Layanan.
6.2 Kredensial
TFH mengizinkan Anda menyimpan kredensial tertentu secara lokal pada perangkat Anda untuk dibagikan dalam infrastruktur pengetahuan nol dari protokol World ID (“Kredensial”). Dalam konteks Kredensial, kami memproses data ini dengan cara berikut:
Kami memeriksa validitas kredensial Anda (jika paspor, ini berlaku melalui sertifikat root negara Anda).
Kami mengautentikasi Anda sebagai pemegang kredensial yang sah (untuk paspor, ini berfungsi secara lokal di perangkat Anda melalui foto wajah (selfie) Anda yang tidak pernah disimpan).
Kami mengenkripsi, menandatangani, dan menyimpan data kredensial Anda di lingkungan yang aman pada perangkat Anda.
Kami tidak pernah memiliki akses ke informasi pribadi yang tercantum dalam kredensial Anda.
Lalu, Anda dapat secara selektif membagikan informasi ini kepada pihak yang mengandalkan melalui perlindungan protokol World ID (misalnya, Anda dapat membuktikan bahwa Anda berusia paling sedikit 18 tahun tanpa mengungkapkan usia Anda atau jati diri Anda).
Untuk paspor, TFH hanya menyimpan pecahan anonim dengan nilai hash dari tanda tangan kriptografis unik pada paspor Anda untuk memastikan bahwa setiap paspor hanya dapat diverifikasi sekali.
Pemrosesan ini didasarkan pada persetujuan Anda dan kami tidak pernah mendapatkan akses ke data pribadi Anda dari paspor Anda yang disimpan pada perangkat Anda. Anda dapat menghapus data ini dari ponsel dengan menghapus World App.
6.3 Data World ID
World ID Anda (yaitu, nomor rahasia yang diperlukan untuk menggunakannya) hanya disimpan di perangkat Anda (apabila Anda memiliki cadangan, ada salinan terenkripsi di cadangan Anda). Baik TFH maupun orang lain tidak memiliki akses ke World ID Anda. Anda dapat menggunakan World ID Anda secara anonim. Setiap kali Anda menggunakan World ID dengan aplikasi baru, aplikasi hanya menerima angka sekali pakai (“Peniada”) yang tidak mengungkapkan World ID Anda. Ini diaktifkan melalui Zero-Knowledge Proof (Anda hanya membuktikan bahwa Anda memiliki World ID yang telah diverifikasi tetapi tidak tahu yang mana) dan memastikan bahwa World ID Anda tidak dapat digunakan untuk melacak Anda di seluruh aplikasi. Ini berarti bahwa World ID bukan ID pengguna umum untuk internet.
World ID membuktikan fungsi melalui protokol terbuka yang mengakses Merkle Tree publik dari hash World ID yang diverifikasi. World ID bukan layanan terpusat tetapi protokol yang dapat diakses oleh siapa saja. Kami menawarkan API untuk memfasilitasi akses ke Merkle Tree dan World ID Proofs tetapi tidak pernah menerima data pribadi dalam konteks ini.
Penting untuk diperhatikan bahwa kami juga tidak memproses data terkait World ID Anda yang akan memungkinkan kami mengidentifikasi Anda. Seluruh data pribadi yang diproses dalam konteks World App khususnya alamat dompet dan data transaksi Anda sengaja dirancang untuk dihapus dari data World ID.
7. Tempat Kami Memproses Data Anda
7.1 Pengalihan Data.
Saat Anda memberikan data Anda kepada kami, data Anda dapat dialihkan, disimpan, atau diproses di lokasi di luar tempat data Anda awalnya dikumpulkan. Negara tempat data Anda dialihkan, disimpan, atau diproses mungkin tidak memiliki undang-undang perlindungan data yang sama seperti negara tempat Anda pertama kali memberikan data tersebut.
Kami melakukan upaya terbaik untuk mematuhi prinsip yang dinyatakan di setiap yurisdiksi mengenai undang-undang privasi. Kami hanya membagikan data kepada pemroses data di luar yurisdiksi Anda jika pemindahan tersebut sah menurut hukum dan jika kami meyakini pemroses data akan melindungi data Anda sebagaimana diwajibkan berdasarkan undang-undang yang berlaku dan, lebih lanjut, sesuai dengan standar kami.
7.2 Risiko Pengalihan
Di bawah adalah daftar kemungkinan risiko yang dapat timbul jika kami mengalihkan data Anda ke Amerika Serikat, Uni Eropa, atau negara lain. Di bawah kami juga merangkum cara kami menanggulangi risiko masing-masing.
Meskipun kami mengerahkan segala upaya untuk memastikan subkontraktor kami berkewajiban secara kontraktual untuk melindungi data Anda secara memadai, subkontraktor ini mungkin tidak tunduk pada undang-undang privasi data di negara Anda. Jika subkontraktor tersebut memproses data Anda secara ilegal tanpa izin, maka mungkin sulit untuk memberlakukan hak privasi Anda terhadap subkontraktor tersebut. Kami menanggulangi risiko ini saat kami menutup perjanjian pemrosesan data yang ketat dengan subkontraktor kami yang mewajibkan mereka untuk melindungi data pada tingkat GDPR dan memenuhi permintaan subjek.
Ada kemungkinan bahwa undang-undang privasi data di negara Anda tidak konsisten dengan undang-undang privasi data di A.S. atau di Uni Eropa. Kami selalu mencoba untuk mematuhi standar perlindungan data tertinggi yang kami patuhi.
Data Anda mungkin akan tunduk pada akses pejabat dan otoritas pemerintah. Dalam kasus tersebut, kami telah berkomitmen untuk menantang permintaan pemerintah yang tidak sah, berlebihan, atau melanggar hukum untuk mengaksesnya di pengadilan. Kami lebih lanjut menggunakan enkripsi canggih untuk menghambat akses tanpa izin.
Harap diperhatikan bahwa daftar ini mencantumkan beberapa contoh, namun mungkin tidak mencakup semua kemungkinan risiko yang dapat menimpa Anda.
7.3 Kerangka Privasi Data untuk pengalihan data AS
TFH mematuhi Kerangka Privasi Data UE-A.S. (EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, EU-U.S. DPF), Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke UE-A.S. DPF, dan Kerangka Privasi Data Swiss-A.S. (Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, Swiss-U.S. DPF) sebagaimana ditetapkan oleh Departemen Perdagangan A.S. TFH telah menyatakan kepada Departemen Perdagangan A.S. bahwa mereka mematuhi Prinsip Kerangka Privasi Data UE-A.S. (EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles, EU-U.S. DPF Principles) sehubungan dengan pemrosesan data pribadi yang diterima dari Uni Eropa dengan mengandalkan DPF UE-A.S. dan dari Inggris Raya (dan Gibraltar) yang mengandalkan Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke EU-U.S. DPF. TFH telah menyatakan kepada Departemen Perdagangan A.S. bahwa mereka mematuhi Prinsip Kerangka Privasi Data Swiss-A.S. (Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles, Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) sehubungan dengan pemrosesan data pribadi yang diterima dari Swiss dengan mengandalkan Swiss-U.S. DPF. Jika ada pertentangan antara ketentuan dalam Pemberitahuan Kerangka Kerja Privasi Data ini dan Prinsip EU-U.S. DPF dan/atau Prinsip Swiss-U.S. DPF, Prinsip yang akan mengatur. Untuk mempelajari selengkapnya tentang program Kerangka Privasi Data (Data Privacy Framework, DPF), dan untuk melihat sertifikasi kami, harap kunjungi
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH bertanggung jawab atas pemrosesan data pribadi yang diterimanya berdasarkan DPF dan selanjutnya mengalihkan ke pihak ketiga yang bertindak sebagai agen atas namanya. TFH mematuhi Prinsip DPF untuk seluruh pengalihan data pribadi selanjutnya dari UE, Inggris Raya, dan Swiss, termasuk ketentuan tanggung jawab pengalihan selanjutnya.
Komisi Perdagangan Federal memiliki yurisdiksi atas kepatuhan TFH terhadap EU-U.S. DPF, Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke EU-U.S. DPF, dan Swiss-U.S. DPF. Dalam situasi tertentu, TFH dapat diwajibkan untuk mengungkapkan data pribadi sebagai tanggapan atas permintaan sah dari otoritas publik, termasuk untuk memenuhi persyaratan keamanan nasional atau penegakan hukum.
Sesuai dengan EU-U.S. DPF dan Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke EU-U.S. DPF dan Swiss-U.S. DPF, TFH berkomitmen untuk menyelesaikan keluhan terkait Prinsip DPF tentang pengumpulan dan penggunaan informasi pribadi Anda oleh kami. Individu UE dan Inggris Raya serta Swiss yang memiliki pertanyaan atau keluhan terkait penanganan data pribadi yang diterima berdasarkan EU-U.S. DPF dan Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke EU-U.S. DPF dan Swiss-U.S. DPF harus terlebih dahulu menghubungi TFH di dpo@worldcoin.org
Sesuai dengan EU-U.S. DPF dan Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke EU-U.S. DPF dan Swiss-U.S. DPF, TFH berkomitmen untuk bekerja sama dan masing-masing mematuhi saran panel yang dibentuk oleh otoritas perlindungan data UE (Data Protection Authority, DPA)} dan Kantor Komisaris Informasi (Information Commissioner’s Office, ICO) Inggris Raya dan Otoritas Regulasi Gibraltar (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) serta Komisaris Perlindungan Data dan Informasi Federal Swiss (Swisss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, FDPIC)} sehubungan dengan keluhan yang belum terselesaikan terkait penanganan data pribadi yang diterima oleh kami berdasarkan EU-U.S. DPF dan Perpanjangan Inggris Raya ke EU-U.S. DPF dan Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Untuk keluhan terkait kepatuhan DPF yang tidak diselesaikan oleh mekanisme DPF lainnya, Anda memiliki kemungkinan, dalam kondisi tertentu, untuk mengajukan arbitrase yang mengikat. Informasi lebih lanjut dapat ditemukan di situs web resmi DPF.
8. Waktu Kami Membagikan Data Anda
Kami tidak akan pernah menjual data Anda
.
Saat kami membagikan data Anda di luar organisasi kami, kami akan selalu:
Membagikan data tersebut dengan cara yang aman dan wajar;
Mengambil langkah-langkah untuk memastikan data tersebut ditangani dengan cara yang sejalan dengan komitmen kami terhadap privasi Anda; dan
Melarang perusahaan lain menggunakan data tersebut untuk tujuan mereka sendiri.
Kami membagikan data Anda dengan cara yang terbatas ini:
Dengan Worldcoin Foundation:
kami dapat bertindak sebagai pemroses Worldcoin Foundation untuk mengumpulkan data pribadi atas nama Worldcoin (Lihat pemberitahuan privasi Worldcoin untuk informasi lebih lanjut).
Di dalam organisasi kami:
Kami hanya mengungkapkan data kepada anggota tim kami yang memerlukan akses untuk melaksanakan tugas dan kewajiban mereka. Kami hanya mengungkapkan data sebanyak yang diperlukan untuk melaksanakan tugas dan kewajiban tertentu serta memiliki sistem pengendalian akses yang ketat.
Dengan vendor dan penyedia layanan di luar organisasi kami:
Kami hanya mengungkapkan data kepada penyedia layanan yang layanannya kami andalkan untuk memproses data dan menyediakan Layanan kami kepada Anda. Kami hanya mengungkapkan data kepada vendor verifikasi identitas jika diwajibkan oleh Hukum (yaitu, persyaratan mengenali pelanggan).
Kategori penyedia layanan tersebut adalah:
Penyedia layanan cloud (semua jenis data)
Penyedia SaaS; kami menggunakan produk SaaS dalam kategori berikut:
Manajemen basis data dan infrastruktur
Keamanan data
Perekrutan
Komunikasi
Survei
KYC/KYB, yaitu memeriksa dokumen resmi
Manajemen permintaan subjek data
Dukungan teknis
Dukungan pengguna
Pakar eksternal
Pengembang perangkat lunak spesialis
Spesialis hukum
Penasihat pajak
Bank
Penyedia layanan pelabelan (hanya dengan perlindungan khusus)
Layanan pemeriksaan latar belakang untuk pelamar dan Operator Orb
Dengan penegak hukum, pejabat, atau pihak ketiga lainnya:
Kami dapat mengungkapkan data Anda untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang berlaku dan menanggapi tuntutan hukum wajib. Kami akan secara saksama mempertimbangkan setiap permintaan untuk menentukan jika permintaan tersebut mematuhi hukum, dan, apabila sesuai, kami dapat menolak permintaan yang tidak sah, terlalu luas, atau melawan hukum. Kami dapat membagikan data pribadi kepada polisi dan otoritas pemerintah lain apabila kami secara wajar meyakini hal tersebut diperlukan demi mematuhi hukum, peraturan, atau proses maupun kewajiban hukum lainnya.
Kami dapat membagikan informasi pribadi Anda jika kami meyakini bahwa tindakan Anda tidak sesuai dengan Ketentuan Pengguna kami, jika kami meyakini bahwa Anda telah melanggar hukum, atau jika kami meyakini hal tersebut diperlukan demi melindungi hak, properti, dan keamanan kami, pengguna kami, khalayak publik, atau lainnya.
Kami dapat membagikan informasi pribadi Anda kepada pengacara kami dan penasihat profesional lainnya apabila diperlukan untuk mendapatkan saran atau melindungi dan mengelola kepentingan bisnis kami.
Kami dapat membagikan informasi pribadi Anda sehubungan dengan, atau selama negosiasi mengenai, merger, penjualan aset perusahaan, pendanaan, atau akuisisi seluruh atau sebagian bisnis kami oleh perusahaan lain.
Data, termasuk informasi pribadi Anda, dapat dibagikan antara dan di antara perusahaan induk, afiliasi, dan anak perusahaan kami saat ini dan mendatang, serta perusahaan yang berada di bawah kendali dan kepemilikan umum lainnya.
Kami dapat membagikan informasi pribadi Anda dengan persetujuan atau arahan Anda.
9. Cara Data Anda Dicatat dalam Blockchain Publik
Informasi transaksi terkait penggunaan Anda atas Layanan kami dapat dicatat dalam blockchain publik.
Harap diperhatikan:
Blockchain adalah buku besar publik dari transaksi yang disimpan pada jaringan terdesentralisasi yang dioperasikan oleh pihak ketiga yang tidak dikendalikan atau dioperasikan oleh Worldcoin. Karena buku besar blockchain bersifat publik dan tidak dapat diubah, kami tidak dapat menjamin kemampuan untuk mengubah, menghapus, atau mengendalikan pengungkapan data yang diunggah dan disimpan pada blockchain
10. Cara Kami Menggunakan Cookie
Kami menggunakan cookie untuk membantu Layanan kami bekerja dengan lebih baik. Selain cookie, kami dapat menggunakan teknologi serupa lainnya, seperti penanda web, untuk menelusuri pengguna Layanan kami. Penanda web (juga dikenal sebagai “clear gif”), adalah gambar kecil dengan pengenal unik, yang memiliki fungsi serupa dengan cookie.
Kebijakan Cookie
kami, yang tercakup ke dalam dokumen ini melalui penyebutannya.
Kami juga menggunakan Google Analytics. Informasi selengkapnya tentang cara Google menggunakan data Anda saat Anda menggunakan situs web dan aplikasi mitranya:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Dengan menggunakan Layanan, Anda menyetujui terhadap penyimpanan dan pengaksesan cookie dan data lain pada komputer atau perangkat seluler Anda oleh kami serta penggunaan Google Analytics oleh kami sehubungan dengan kegiatan tersebut. Harap baca informasi pada tautan yang disediakan sehingga Anda memahami hal yang Anda setujui.
11. Berapa Lama Kami Menyimpan Data Anda?
Kecuali jika ditetapkan lain oleh hukum yang berlaku, kami menyimpan data Anda selama diperlukan secara wajar untuk menyediakan Layanan kami kepada Anda, memenuhi tujuan bisnis kami yang sah, serta mematuhi kewajiban hukum dan peraturan kami. Jika Anda menutup akun dengan kami, kami akan menghapus data akun Anda dalam waktu satu bulan; jika tidak, kami akan menghapus data akun Anda setelah 2 tahun tidak aktif. Jika diwajibkan oleh undang-undang, kami akan terus menyimpan data pribadi Anda sesuai kebutuhan untuk mematuhi kewajiban hukum dan regulasi kami, termasuk kewajiban pemantauan, deteksi, dan pencegahan penipuan, serta kewajiban pelaporan pajak, akuntansi, dan keuangan.
Harap diperhatikan:
Blockchain adalah jaringan pihak ketiga terdesentralisasi yang tidak dikendalikan atau dioperasikan oleh kami. Karena teknologi blockchain bersifat publik dan tidak dapat diubah, kami tidak dapat mengubah, menghapus, atau mengendalikan pengungkapan data tersebut yang tersimpan pada blockchain.
12. Perbedaan Pemberitahuan Privasi ini untuk Anak-anak dan Remaja
Individu berusia di bawah 18 tahun tidak boleh menggunakan Layanan, dan kami tidak secara sengaja mengumpulkan data dari individu yang berusia di bawah 18 tahun. Apabila Anda meyakini bahwa anak-anak Anda yang berusia di bawah 18 tahun telah memperoleh akses ke Layanan tanpa seizin Anda, mintalah penghapusan data mereka dengan menghubungi kami melalui
Portal Permintaan
.
Jika kami mengetahui bahwa kami telah mengumpulkan data tentang anak berusia di bawah 18 tahun, kami akan sesegera mungkin menghapus data tersebut. Kami telah mengambil langkah-langkah seperti menerapkan model AI deteksi usia otomatis, instruksi kepada operator, dan konfirmasi mandiri untuk membatasi penggunaan Layanan bagi mereka yang berusia minimal 18 tahun. Kami tidak memasarkan produk atau layanan kepada anak-anak.
13. Cara Menghubungi kami Tentang Pemberitahuan Privasi ini
Anda dapat memilih untuk menghapus data Anda dari dalam Aplikasi Worldcoin dalam menu Pengaturan. Jika Anda memiliki pertanyaan atau masalah terkait Pemberitahuan Privasi ini, ingin menggunakan hak Anda, atau menghubungi Petugas Perlindungan Data (Data Protection Officer, DPO) kami, harap kirimkan permintaan Anda melalui
Portal Permintaan
kami atau kirimkan surat kepada kami ke Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 AS atau
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Kami menanggapi semua permintaan yang diterima dari individu yang ingin menggunakan hak perlindungan data mereka sesuai dengan undang-undang perlindungan data yang berlaku. Anda juga dapat menghapus data Anda dari dalam aplikasi World.
Jika Anda memiliki masalah privasi yang belum terselesaikan atau penggunaan data yang belum ditangani dengan cara yang memuaskan, harap hubungi pengawas perlindungan data di yurisdiksi Anda. Apabila Anda tinggal di UE, Anda dapat menemukan pengawas perlindungan data Anda
di sini
.
14. Hak Anda
Hak ini berlaku sejauh kami dapat mengidentifikasi pemohon dalam basis data kami dan sejauh kami tidak melanggar hak subjek data lain dengan melaksanakan hak pemohon:
Anda berhak memperoleh informasi dari kami, setiap saat dan atas permintaan, tentang data pribadi mengenai Anda yang kami proses. Anda berhak menerima data pribadi mengenai Anda dari kami.
Anda berhak meminta agar kami segera memperbaiki data pribadi mengenai Anda jika tidak benar.
Anda berhak meminta agar kami menghapus data pribadi mengenai Anda. Prasyarat ini secara khusus memberikan hak untuk penghapusan jika data pribadi tersebut tidak lagi diperlukan untuk tujuan pengumpulan atau pemrosesannya, dengan ketentuan bahwa persyaratan penghapusan berdasarkan undang-undang yang berlaku diberikan (misalnya, beberapa undang-undang yurisdiksi mewajibkan kami untuk menyimpan informasi transaksi selama jangka waktu tertentu)
Anda berhak menarik persetujuan Anda atas pemrosesan data berdasarkan persetujuan atau menolak pemrosesan data jika hal ini tidak didasarkan pada persetujuan.
15. ADENDUM
Berikut ini merupakan beberapa adendum yang menyediakan informasi yang diwajibkan secara hukum untuk masing-masing pasar tempat kami beroperasi. Informasi ini merupakan bagian dari persetujuan tergantung pada wilayah tempat subjek data berada. Informasi ini mungkin berbeda dari informasi di lokasi Anda karena kami memblokir layanan tertentu di yurisdiksi tertentu. Apabila terdapat ketidaksesuaian dengan pernyataan di atas, pernyataan yang lebih khusus mengenai yurisdiksi tertentu akan berlaku:
Adendum A: Wilayah Ekonomi Eropa (European Economic Area, “EEA”) dan Inggris Raya (United Kingdom, “UK”)
Apabila Anda berada di EEA atau Inggris Raya, hal berikut berlaku untuk Anda: Anda memiliki sekurang-kurangnya hak berikut. Anda mungkin memiliki hak tambahan berdasarkan Peraturan Perlindungan Data Umum, Peraturan UE 2016/679 tanggal 27.04.2016 (“GDPR”) sebagaimana tercantum di bawah ini. Untuk menggunakan hak Anda yang tersedia berdasarkan GDPR, hubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
. Selain kasus luar biasa, kami akan menyelesaikan permintaan Anda dalam batas waktu satu bulan menurut undang-undang. Penggunaan kata GDPR di bagian berikut juga mencakup GDPR-Inggris Raya yang dimasukkan ke dalam hukum nasional Inggris Raya sebagai Undang-Undang Perlindungan Data Inggris Raya tahun 2018 dan dipertahankan sebagai bagian dari hukum Inggris dan Wales, Skotlandia, dan Irlandia Utara berdasarkan
pasal 3
Undang-Undang Uni Eropa (Penarikan) Tahun 2018 dan sebagaimana diubah oleh
Lampiran
1
pada Peraturan Perlindungan Data, Privasi, dan Komunikasi Elektronik (Amendemen, dll.) (Penarikan dari UE) UE Tahun 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Hak menurut undang-undang berdasarkan GDPR
Bagian ini berlaku jika pemrosesan data Anda termasuk dalam cakupan penerapan GDPR (
misalnya
, jika Anda adalah penduduk EEA atau di Inggris Raya). Anda dapat memiliki hak tambahan berdasarkan GDPR sebagaimana tercantum di bawah. Untuk menggunakan hak Anda yang tersedia berdasarkan GDPR, hubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
.
Anda berhak memperoleh informasi dari kami, setiap saat dan atas permintaan, tentang data pribadi mengenai Anda yang kami proses dalam lingkup Pasal 15 GDPR.
Anda berhak meminta agar kami segera memperbaiki data pribadi mengenai Anda jika tidak benar.
Anda berhak, berdasarkan persyaratan yang dijelaskan dalam Pasal 17 GDPR, meminta agar kami menghapus data pribadi mengenai Anda. Prasyarat ini secara khusus memberikan hak penghapusan jika data pribadi tersebut tidak lagi diperlukan untuk tujuan yang menjadi alasan pengumpulan atau pemrosesannya, serta, dalam hal pemrosesan yang melanggar hukum, terdapat keberatan atau kewajiban untuk menghapus berdasarkan hukum Uni Eropa atau hukum Negara Bagian Anggota yang berlaku terhadap kami.
Anda berhak meminta agar kami membatasi pemrosesan sesuai dengan Pasal 18 GDPR.
Anda berhak menerima dari kami, data pribadi mengenai Anda yang telah Anda berikan kepada kami dalam format yang terstruktur, digunakan secara umum, dan dapat dibaca mesin sesuai dengan Pasal 20 GDPR.
Anda berhak mengajukan keberatan setiap saat, dengan alasan yang berkaitan dengan situasi khusus Anda, terhadap pemrosesan data pribadi mengenai Anda yang dilakukan, antara lain, berdasarkan Pasal 6 (1) kalimat 1 lit. f GDPR, sesuai dengan Pasal 21 GDPR.
Anda berhak menghubungi otoritas pengawasan yang berwenang saat mengajukan keluhan mengenai pemrosesan data yang dilakukan oleh pengendali. Otoritas pengawasan yang bertanggung jawab adalah: Kantor Pengawasan Perlindungan Data Negara Bagian Bavaria (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Jika pemrosesan data pribadi didasarkan pada persetujuan Anda, Anda berhak, berdasarkan Pasal 7 GDPR, mencabut persetujuan Anda atas penggunaan data pribadi Anda setiap saat yang berlaku untuk masa mendatang, apabila pencabutan tersebut dapat dinyatakan semudah persetujuan itu sendiri. Harap diperhatikan bahwa pencabutan tersebut hanya berlaku untuk masa mendatang. Pemrosesan yang dilakukan sebelum pencabutan dibuat tidak akan terpengaruh.
A.2 Pemindahan data
Saat mengalihkan data ke negara yang tidak memiliki keputusan yang memadai, kami menggunakan Klausul Kontrak Standar UE. Saat ini kami hanya memindahkan data pribadi ke AS.
Jika pemrosesan data pribadi didasarkan pada persetujuan Anda, Anda berhak, berdasarkan Pasal 7 GDPR, mencabut persetujuan Anda atas penggunaan data pribadi Anda setiap saat yang berlaku untuk masa mendatang, apabila pencabutan tersebut dapat dinyatakan semudah persetujuan itu sendiri. Harap diperhatikan bahwa pencabutan tersebut hanya berlaku untuk masa mendatang. Pemrosesan yang dilakukan sebelum pencabutan dibuat tidak akan terpengaruh. Harap diperhatikan juga bahwa pemrosesan yang tidak didasarkan pada persetujuan tidak terpengaruh oleh penarikan persetujuan.
ADENDUM B: JEPANG
Selain itu, jika Anda tinggal di Jepang, hal berikut berlaku untuk Anda.
B1. Informasi Terkait Peraturan Jepang
Kami mematuhi undang-undang dan peraturan Jepang, termasuk Undang-Undang Perlindungan Informasi Pribadi Jepang (Act on the Protection of Personal Information atau “APPI”). Bagian ini berlaku untuk penanganan kami atas “informasi pribadi” sebagaimana didefinisikan dalam APPI yang didahulukan dari bagian lain dalam Formulir Persetujuan Data Biometrik ini
Kami mematuhi undang-undang dan peraturan Jepang, termasuk Undang-Undang Perlindungan Informasi Pribadi Jepang (Act on the Protection of Personal Information atau “APPI”). Bagian ini berlaku untuk penanganan kami atas “informasi pribadi” sebagaimana didefinisikan dalam APPI yang didahulukan dari bagian lain dari Pemberitahuan Privasi ini.
B2. Pembagian Data
Kecuali jika diizinkan oleh undang-undang yang berlaku, kami tidak mengungkapkan, menjual, memberikan, membagikan, atau memindahkan informasi pribadi Anda kepada pihak ketiga mana pun.
B3. Langkah Pengendalian Keamanan
Kami mengambil langkah yang diperlukan dan tepat untuk mencegah kebocoran atau kehilangan, atau kerusakan, terhadap informasi pribadi Anda yang sedang ditangani, dan untuk menjaga keamanan informasi pribadi dengan cara lain, seperti dengan menetapkan aturan penanganan informasi pribadi, pemantauan rutin terhadap penanganan informasi pribadi, pelatihan rutin bagi karyawan dalam menangani informasi pribadi, pencegahan pencurian atau kehilangan peralatan yang digunakan untuk menangani informasi pribadi, dan penerapan pengendalian akses. Kami juga secara sesuai mengawasi kontraktor dan karyawan yang menangani informasi pribadi. Anda dapat memperoleh perincian lebih lanjut tentang langkah pengendalian keamanan yang diterapkan sehubungan dengan penanganan informasi pribadi Anda dengan menghubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
.
B4. Informasi Referensi tentang Pemrosesan Data Pribadi di Negara Asing
Data pribadi Anda diproses di UE dan AS.
B5. Hak menurut Undang-Undang berdasarkan APPI
Untuk menggunakan hak Anda yang tersedia berdasarkan APPI, harap hubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
.
ADENDUM C: ARGENTINA
Apabila Anda berdomisili di Republik Argentina, kami memberi tahu Anda bahwa LEMBAGA AKSES INFORMASI PUBLIK, dalam kapasitasnya sebagai Badan Pengawas Hukum No. 25.326, memiliki kuasa untuk mendengarkan keluhan dan klaim yang diajukan oleh mereka yang haknya terdampak oleh ketidakpatuhan terhadap aturan yang berlaku terkait perlindungan data pribadi.
Lembaga tersebut dapat dihubungi sebagai berikut:
Alamat: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Kota Otonom Buenos Aires
Kode Pos: C1067ABP
Nomor telepon: (54-11) 3988-3968
Email: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADENDUM D: SINGAPURA
Apabila Anda adalah penduduk Singapura, hal berikut berlaku untuk Anda:
D1. Pengumpulan, penggunaan, dan pengungkapan data pribadi Anda
Apabila Anda adalah penduduk Singapura dan atas persetujuan Anda, kami akan mengumpulkan, menggunakan, atau mengungkapkan data pribadi Anda untuk setiap tujuan sebagaimana ditetapkan dalam pemberitahuan privasi kami. Anda dapat menggunakan hak Anda untuk menarik persetujuan Anda kapan saja, tetapi harap diperhatikan bahwa kami mungkin tidak dapat terus menyediakan layanan kami kepada Anda, tergantung pada sifat dan cakupan permintaan Anda. Harap diperhatikan juga bahwa menarik persetujuan tidak memengaruhi hak kami untuk terus mengumpulkan, menggunakan, dan mengungkapkan data pribadi jika pengumpulan, penggunaan, dan pengungkapan tersebut diizinkan atau diwajibkan berdasarkan undang-undang yang berlaku.[1]
D2. Pelaksanaan hak subjek data Anda
Anda dapat mengendalikan data pribadi yang telah kami kumpulkan dan melaksanakan hak apa pun dengan menghubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan kami
. Kami akan berusaha menanggapi permintaan Anda sesegera mungkin, biasanya dalam 30 hari. Kami akan memberi tahu Anda sebelumnya jika kami tidak dapat menanggapi permintaan Anda dalam 30 hari, atau jika kami tidak dapat memenuhi permintaan Anda beserta alasannya.[2]
Apabila diizinkan oleh hukum, kami dapat mengenakan biaya administratif untuk memenuhi permintaan Anda.
D3. Pemindahan data pribadi Anda ke negara lain
Apabila Anda adalah penduduk Singapura dan kami telah mengumpulkan data Anda, kami juga dapat memindahkan data Anda ke luar Singapura dari waktu ke waktu. Namun demikian, kami akan selalu memastikan bahwa data pribadi Anda tetap menerima standar perlindungan yang setidaknya setara dengan yang ditetapkan berdasarkan Undang-Undang Perlindungan Data Pribadi Singapura 2012, seperti melalui penggunaan Klausul Kontrak Model ASEAN.
ADENDUM E – KOREA SELATAN
Adendum untuk Subjek Data Korea ini menjelaskan praktik kami sehubungan dengan informasi pribadi yang kami proses terkait dengan hubungan Anda dengan kami jika Anda adalah subjek data Korea.
E.1 – Pengalihan Informasi Pribadi
Kami memberikan informasi pribadi kepada atau mengalihdayakan pemrosesannya kepada pihak ketiga sebagaimana ditentukan di bawah ini:
- Penyediaan Informasi Pribadi kepada Pihak Ketiga
Nama Penerima
Tujuan penggunaan oleh penerima
Item informasi pribadi yang diberikan kepada penerima
Periode penyimpanan oleh penerima
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Tujuan yang dijelaskan dalam pemberitahuan ini pada bagian 6 di atas.
Item yang dijelaskan dalam pemberitahuan ini pada bagian 5 di atas
Periode penyimpanan yang ditetapkan dalam pemberitahuan ini pada bagian 11 di atas.
- Pengalihdayaan Pemrosesan Informasi Pribadi kepada Pihak Ketiga:
Harap temukan daftar seluruh pemrosesan data yang dialihdayakan dan masing-masing perusahaan dalam tautan ini:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Kami dapat mengalihdayakan pemrosesan informasi pribadi Anda dan/atau memindahkan informasi pribadi Anda untuk tujuan penyimpanan kepada pihak ketiga yang berlokasi di luar Korea:
Apabila Anda tidak ingin memindahkan informasi pribadi Anda ke luar negeri, Anda dapat menolak dengan tidak menyetujui pemindahan informasi pribadi, atau dengan meminta kami untuk menghentikan pemindahan lintas negara, tetapi jika Anda menolak, Anda mungkin tidak dapat menggunakan layanan kami. Dasar hukum untuk pemindahan lintas batas informasi pribadi di atas adalah fakta bahwa informasi tersebut merupakan “pemrosesan atau penyimpanan informasi pribadi yang dialihdayakan yang diperlukan untuk penyelesaian dan pemenuhan kontrak dengan subjek data” dan hal-hal yang ditetapkan secara sah telah diungkapkan dalam kebijakan privasi (Pasal 28-8(1)(iii) Undang-Undang Perlindungan Informasi Pribadi).
E.2 – Pemusnahan Informasi Pribadi
Apabila informasi pribadi menjadi tidak diperlukan karena berakhirnya periode penyimpanan atau tercapainya tujuan pemrosesan, dll., informasi pribadi akan segera dimusnahkan. Proses dan metode pemusnahan ditetapkan di bawah ini:
1) Proses Pemusnahan: Kami memilih item informasi pribadi tertentu yang akan dimusnahkan, dan memusnahkannya dengan persetujuan DPO.
2) Metode Pemusnahan: Kami memusnahkan informasi pribadi yang dicatat dan disimpan dalam bentuk file elektronik menggunakan metode teknis (misalnya, format tingkat rendah) untuk memastikan catatan tersebut tidak dapat diperbanyak, sedangkan informasi pribadi yang dicatat dan disimpan dalam bentuk dokumen cetak akan dihancurkan atau dibakar.
E.3 – Penyimpanan Informasi Pribadi
Apabila kami diwajibkan untuk menyimpan informasi pribadi Anda sesuai dengan undang-undang yang berlaku, kami akan melakukannya untuk tujuan dan periode berikut sebagaimana diwajibkan oleh undang-undang yang berlaku.
E.4 – Hak Anda
Anda dapat menggunakan hak Anda terkait informasi pribadi terhadap kami, termasuk permintaan akses, modifikasi atau penghapusan, atau penangguhan pemrosesan, informasi pribadi Anda sebagaimana ditetapkan oleh hukum yang berlaku, termasuk Undang-Undang Perlindungan Informasi Pribadi. Anda juga dapat menggunakan hak penarikan persetujuan Anda untuk mengumpulkan/menggunakan/menyediakan informasi pribadi, hak portabilitas, dan hak terkait pengambilan keputusan otomatis. Hak tersebut juga dapat dilaksanakan melalui perwakilan hukum Anda atau pihak berwenang lainnya.
Anda dapat menggunakan hak yang berlaku yang dijelaskan di atas dengan menghubungi kami di worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Langkah Keamanan
Kami akan menerapkan langkah keamanan teknis, organisasi, dan fisik yang ditetapkan oleh undang-undang Korea yang berlaku untuk melindungi informasi pribadi, seperti yang tercantum di bawah ini:
1) Langkah manajerial: Penunjukan Pejabat Perlindungan Data, penetapan dan penerapan rencana manajemen internal, pelatihan rutin karyawan mengenai perlindungan data, dll.;
2) Langkah teknis: Manajemen otoritas akses ke sistem pemrosesan informasi pribadi, pemasangan sistem pengendalian akses, pemasangan program keamanan, dll.; dan
3) Langkah fisik: Pembatasan akses ke fasilitas dan peralatan penyimpanan informasi pribadi, seperti ruang komputer dan ruang penyimpanan data, dll.
E.6 – Hubungi Kami
Untuk pertanyaan atau informasi terkait perlindungan privasi dan data, hubungi Tim Perlindungan Data kami di
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ADENDUM F – AS
Undang-Undang Privasi Konsumen California, sebagaimana diamendemen oleh Undang-Undang Hak Privasi California, saat ini tidak berlaku untuk kami.
ADENDUM G - BRASIL
G.1 Perundang-undangan, Pengendali, dan Operator yang berlaku
Jika Anda tinggal di Brasil, jika data pribadi Anda dikumpulkan di Brasil, atau jika Anda menggunakan Layanan kami di Brasil, perundang-undang yang berlaku adalah Undang-Undang No. 13.709/2018 (Undang-Undang Perlindungan Data Umum, atau “LGPD”).
G.2 Hak untuk menolak
Anda berhak menolak penggunaan data pribadi Anda untuk tujuan yang tidak bergantung pada persetujuan jika tujuan tersebut tidak sesuai dengan LGPD. Jika keberatan Anda ditegakkan, kami tidak akan lagi menggunakan informasi pribadi Anda untuk mengembangkan dan meningkatkan fitur dan pengalaman Layanan kami.
Perhatikan bahwa jika Anda tidak menyediakan atau tidak mengizinkan pengumpulan atau pemrosesan data pribadi tertentu, hal ini dapat memengaruhi kualitas pengalaman Anda, kami mungkin tidak dapat memenuhi tujuan Layanan kami, atau kami mungkin tidak dapat menyediakan Layanan tertentu kepada Anda.
Dalam beberapa kasus, data Anda dianonimkan, yang berarti tidak lagi mengidentifikasi Anda. Anda tidak dapat menolak penggunaan data anonim karena tidak memungkinkan identifikasi Anda, sebagaimana ditetapkan dalam LGPD. Kami menggunakan data anonim ini untuk meningkatkan produk dan layanan kami.
G.3 Hak hukum berdasarkan LGPD
Menurut LGPD, Anda berhak mengonfirmasi adanya pemrosesan, akses, perbaikan, atau permintaan portabilitas data yang diproses. Selain itu, Anda dapat meminta informasi entitas publik dan swasta yang bersama-sama kami gunakan data pribadi Anda. Anda juga dapat meminta informasi mengenai kemungkinan tidak memberikan persetujuan dan konsekuensi negatif, serta meminta penghapusan data yang diproses dengan persetujuan. Anda dapat memilih penghapusan informasi Anda di World App di menu Pengaturan.
Dalam keadaan tertentu, Anda berhak menolak atau membatasi cara kami memproses data pribadi Anda, atau menarik persetujuan Anda, yang kami andalkan untuk memproses informasi yang Anda berikan.
Anda dapat menggunakan hak Anda berdasarkan LGPD dengan mengajukan permintaan ke DPO kami menggunakan perincian kontak di bagian H.4 di bawah atau melalui portal permintaan online kami. Jika Anda merasa bahwa hak-hak Anda belum ditangani secara memadai, Anda dapat mengajukan keluhan kepada Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) dengan mengisi formulir yang tersedia di tautan ini:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Pengalihan Data Pribadi Anda secara Internasional
Jika LGPD berlaku untuk Anda, dan kami telah mengumpulkan data pribadi Anda, kami juga dapat mengalihkannya ke luar negeri. Namun demikian, kami akan selalu memastikan bahwa data pribadi Anda hanya dialihkan ke negara asing atau organisasi internasional yang memberikan tingkat perlindungan yang memadai sebagaimana ditetapkan dalam LGPD, sebagaimana diakui dalam keputusan kecukupan yang dikeluarkan oleh ANPD. Jika tidak ada keputusan yang memadai, kami akan terus mengikuti standar perlindungan yang paling sedikit setara dengan yang ditetapkan dalam LGPD menggunakan Klausul Kontrak Standar yang ditetapkan dalam peraturan ANPD atau ketika kami mendapatkan persetujuan khusus dan disorot untuk pengalihan internasional.
ANEKS I – Dasar/tujuan hukum untuk aktivitas pemrosesan data Tools for Humanity
Pengguna
Alasan Kami Memproses Data
Data Pribadi yang Diproses
Dasar Hukum Pemrosesan
Periode Penyimpanan
Untuk membuat akun Anda di World App
Alamat dompet, metadata, nama pengguna
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Durasi penggunaan layanan atau hingga Anda meminta penghapusan data.
Untuk memastikan Anda memenuhi syarat usia
Tanggal lahir
Kewajiban hukum
Tanggal lahir Anda tidak pernah disimpan. Kami hanya menyimpan jika Anda berusia 18 tahun. Kami menyimpan informasi ini selama durasi penggunaan layanan atau hingga Anda meminta penghapusan data.
Untuk secara opsional memungkinkan kontak Anda berkomunikasi dan bertransaksi dengan Anda dengan mudah
Nomor telepon
Persetujuan
Durasi penggunaan layanan atau hingga Anda meminta penghapusan data.
Untuk memudahkan Anda berkomunikasi dan bertransaksi dengan kontak Anda
Kontak buku alamat
Persetujuan
Durasi penggunaan layanan atau hingga Anda meminta penghapusan data.
Untuk secara opsional menampilkan Orb di dekat Anda
Informasi lokasi
Persetujuan
Hingga 24 bulan.
Untuk mencegah penipuan dalam konteks pencegahan rekening
Metadata, alamat IP, ID Perangkat
Kepentingan yang sah, yaitu kepentingan untuk mencegah jenis penipuan tertentu (DAFTAR JENIS)
Hingga 24 bulan.
Untuk memastikan layanan diizinkan di negara Anda
Alamat IP, informasi lokasi
Kewajiban hukum
Hingga 24 bulan.
Untuk menampilkan dompet penyimpanan mandiri Anda dan menyediakan antarmuka untuk transaksi dompet
Alamat dompet, data transaksi
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tidak ada data pribadi yang disimpan dalam konteks ini.
Untuk menampilkan World ID Anda sendiri dan menyediakan antarmuka untuk verifikasi
Informasi World ID
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tidak ada data pribadi yang disimpan dalam konteks ini.
Untuk menampilkan Kredensial penyimpanan mandiri Anda dan menyediakan antarmuka untuk membagikan Kredensial
Informasi kredensial, informasi validitas kredensial
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tidak ada data pribadi yang disimpan dalam konteks ini.
Untuk menganalisis dan meningkatkan layanan kami serta melakukan penelitian ilmu data
Data penggunaan dan metadata, data transaksi publik
Persetujuan
Hingga 24 bulan.
Untuk mematuhi hukum yang berlaku seperti undang-undang antipencucian uang dan sanksinya
Data transaksi, alamat dompet
Kewajiban hukum
Durasi penggunaan layanan.
Untuk mematuhi hukum yang berlaku, seperti peraturan konten
Konten Aplikasi Mini
Kewajiban hukum
Durasi penggunaan layanan.
Untuk memungkinkan komunikasi dan pemasaran
Alamat email, notifikasi push
Kepentingan yang sah
Hingga 24 bulan.
Korespondensi dari Anda
Kepentingan yang sah
Hingga 24 bulan.
Masukan dari Anda
Kepentingan yang sah
Hingga 24 bulan.
Menangani permintaan, keluhan, dan pertanyaan layanan pelanggan Anda.
Informasi komunikasi dan email atau nama profil media sosial jika Anda ingin berkomunikasi dengan kami melalui cara tersebut
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Untuk memastikan aplikasi berjalan lancar untuk Anda
Metadata
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Hingga 24 bulan.
Untuk memverifikasi perangkat Anda
Data World ID Perangkat (sidik jari perangkat)
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Durasi penggunaan layanan.
Menyelesaikan sengketa, memecahkan masalah, dan memberlakukan perjanjian kami dengan Anda, termasuk Pemberitahuan Privasi ini dan Ketentuan Pengguna.
Durasi penggunaan layanan.
Mitra bisnis
Alasan Kami Memproses Data
Data Pribadi yang Diproses
Dasar Hukum Pemrosesan
Periode Penyimpanan
Komunikasi
Nomor telepon, alamat email, Nama
Kepentingan yang sah, yaitu kepentingan untuk berkomunikasi dengan mitra bisnis.
Durasi hubungan bisnis atau hingga Anda meminta penghapusan data.
Menjaga dan mengelola hubungan bisnis
Nomor telepon, alamat email, Nama, data perusahaan
Kepentingan yang sah, yaitu kepentingan untuk memelihara dan mengelola hubungan bisnis dengan mitra bisnis.
Durasi hubungan bisnis atau hingga Anda meminta penghapusan data.
Memenuhi kewajiban KYC
Data paspor, Data perusahaan
Kewajiban hukum
Durasi hubungan bisnis dan hingga 3 tahun setelah pemutusan hubungan kerja.
Untuk memproses aplikasi Anda
Data aplikasi
Persetujuan dan langkah atas permintaan subjek data sebelum menandatangani kontrak.
Hingga 3 bulan secara default atau lebih jika Anda setuju untuk menjadi bagian dari kelompok talenta.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanityプライバシー通知
Worldcoinコミュニティにご参加いただきありがとうございます。Worldcoinは、開発者、個人、その他の貢献者からなるグローバルコミュニティによってサポートされているオープンソースのプロトコルです。
本プライバシー通知は、当社のウェブサイト、アプリケーション（「本アプリ」）、および本プライバシー通知にリンクされているその他のサービス（総称して「本サービス」）の使用を通じてお客様が当社に提供するデータに適用されます。本プライバシー通知は、
ユーザー利用規約
（「利用規約」）に組み込まれ、これに準拠します。Tools for Humanity Corporation（「TFH US」）は、ドイツの子会社であるTools for Humanity GmbH（「TFH Germany」、総称して「
TFH
」または「
当社
」
）とともに、Worldcoinプロトコル（「Worldcoin」）の開発と成長に貢献していますが、Orb（オーブ）関連のデータ処理を管理するWorldcoin財団とは異なります。
1. 管理者
当社は、「World Appデータ」、「クレデンシャル認証データ」、その他の「ビジネスデータ」のデータ管理者です。Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFHは、Tools for Humanity GmbHを通じて欧州連合（「
EU
」）に設立されています。
「World Appデータ」とは、WorldcoinプロトコルまたはWorldcoinトークンの使用に関連する個人データ（お客様のウォレットアドレスおよび取引データなど、当社が管理しないもの）を除き、以下のセクション5でさらに定義されるとおり、お客様のWorld Appの使用を通じて収集および処理されるすべての個人データを意味します。
クレデンシャル認証データとは、クレデンシャルを認証してセルフカストディWorld IDに追加する際に処理されるデータを指します。これは例えば、パスポートのNFCチップを読み取り、パスポートの情報をデバイスに安全に保存することを意味します。このデータはお客様の管理下にあり、お客様のクレデンシャルの有効性を認証した後、TFHはお客様のクレデンシャル（パスポートなど）の一意の暗号化署名のハッシュ値の匿名化された断片を保存し、各クレデンシャルがWorld IDに一度だけ追加できるようにします。
「ビジネスデータ」とは、電子メール、ビデオ会議、または当社のウェブサイトを通じて、当社と連絡を取ったり、その他の方法で仕事をしたり、やり取りをしたりする際に、当社がその他の手段で収集および処理するすべての個人データを意味します。Orbアプリに関連するデータ処理については、OrbアプリにリンクされているOrbアプリプライバシー通知を参照してください。専用のデータ収集およびテストの文脈におけるデータ処理については、テストアプリにリンクされている各収集およびテストのプライバシー通知を参照してください。当社のウェブサイトにおける処理については、当社のウェブサイトにリンクされている当社のクッキーポリシーを参照してください。
2. 本プライバシー通知の更新
当社は、本プライバシー通知を更新することがあります。お客様の個人情報の使用方法など、当社が重大な変更を行う場合は、電子メールまたはアプリ内のメッセージでお知らせします。
3. 本プライバシー通知の内容
プライバシーとデータ保護への取り組み
当社が収集する情報とその理由
収集したデータの使用方法
当社がお客様のデータを処理する場所
データを共有する場面
お客様のデータがパブリックブロックチェーンに記録される仕組み
クッキーの使用方法
お客様のデータの保存期間
本プライバシー通知の子供および青少年に関する特則
お客様の法律上の権利
本プライバシー通知に関するお問い合わせ
4. プライバシーとデータ保護への取り組み
当社は、お客様のプライバシーの保護とデータの安全確保に深く取り組んでいます。当社は、人々からの信頼があってこそ、デジタルトークンをできるだけ多くの人々に公平に配布するという使命を果たすことができると認識しており、プライバシーとデータセキュリティはお客様の信頼を得るための中心的な要素です。
プライバシー
当社は、お客様のプライバシーを考慮して、当社の製品およびサービスを設計しています。当社は、当社の製品およびサービスを改善するためにデータを収集します。当社は、本プライバシー通知において、または特定の製品もしくはサービスに関するデータ同意書において、当社がどのようなデータを収集しているのか、なぜそのデータを収集しているのか、そしてそのデータを用いて何を行うのかについて、常にお客様にお伝えします。
データセキュリティ
当社では、お客様のデータを管理する専門チームを編成し、輸送中および保管中のデータを保護するための物理的および電子的な安全措置を実施しています。しかし同時に、完全に安全なサービスはありません。お客様のアカウントまたはお客様のデータに関してご不明な点がございましたら、
リクエストポータル
からご連絡いただくか、Tools For Humanity Corporation（548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA）まで書面にてご連絡ください。
5. 当社が収集する情報とその理由
5.1 お客様が当社に提供するデータ
お客様がユーザーとして本アプリにアクセスするためにデータを提供する必要はありません。ただし、本サービス内の機能を使用するために、特定のデータを提供する必要がある場合があります。以下のケースにおける処理の法的根拠は、ユーザーの同意および契約の履行（本サービスを提供するという当社の約束）です。以下は、お客様が提供する可能性のあるデータのリストと、当社がそのデータを使用する目的です。
World App関連：
電話番号
お客様は、自身のアカウントに関連付けるため、電話番号を入力することができます。お客様の許可があれば、他のユーザーがお客様の電話番号からお客様のアカウントを見つけることができる場合があります。データ主体の要請を提出する際、当社はお客様に電話番号を要求する場合があります。このデータ処理の法的根拠は、ユーザー利用規約に基づく本サービスの履行です。
ユーザー名
当社は、ユーザー名をウォレットアドレスにリンクし、いつでもユーザー名を変更することができます。
生年月日
年齢制限の要件を遵守できるよう、お客様から生年月日を開示する場合があります。当社は、お客様の生年月日データを保存することはありませんが、そのデータのチェックサムとお客様が18歳以上であるかどうかだけを保存します。
お客様からのフィードバックおよび通信
これには、お客様が電子メールまたは第三者のソーシャルメディアウェブサイトを通じて当社に送信する電子メール、チャットメッセージ、その他の通信が含まれます。これには、お客様がそのような手段で当社と連絡を取ろうとする場合、電子メールアドレスやソーシャルメディアのプロフィール名を処理することが含まれます。当社は、第三者サービスプロバイダーを利用して、本サービスの利用に関するアンケートを実施することがあります。このデータ処理の法的根拠は、ユーザー利用規約に基づく本サービスの履行です。
アドレス帳の連絡先
お客様は、お客様のアドレス帳に登録されている可能性のある他のユーザーを簡単に検索し、交流する機能を有効にするために、お客様のアドレス帳へのアクセスを本アプリに提供することができます。このデータ処理の法的根拠は、本アプリ内で検索される対象者の正当な利益、および本アプリ内で連絡先を検索する、共有を行うユーザーの利益です。
注意：
連絡先の共有が適用法に準拠していることを確認する責任は、お客様にあります。この場合、連絡先の許可を得る必要がある場合があります。また、連絡先の明確な同意なしに、他の人の連絡先情報をTFHと共有することはできません。連絡先へのアクセスは、デバイスの設定でいつでも変更および停止することができます。お客様が、お客様の連絡先のうち誰が本サービスを使用しているかを調べたり、お客様を本サービスの使用に招待したりするために、お客様のデバイスのアドレス帳の連絡先を本アプリにインポートすることを選択した場合、当社は、お客様の連絡先の電話番号を、当社のサーバ上の他のユーザーが提供する番号および対応するウォレットアドレスと定期的に同期します。
位置情報
お客様は、位置情報に基づくサービス（お近くのOrbオペレーターを検索できる機能など）を有効にすることができます。お客様の特別な同意がある場合に限り、位置情報サービスによりお客様のお近くのOrbをご案内するために、GPSを通じてお客様の位置情報を収集することがあります。アクセス許可はデバイスの設定でいつでも変更できます。お客様が韓国を拠点としていない場合、当社はお客様のおおよその所在地をお客様のWorld Appアカウントから切り離して保存することがあります。このデータは、特にOrbロケーションの選定に限らず、当社のサービスを向上させるために使用されます。
P2Pマーケットプレイス
他のユーザーからデジタルトークンを購入できるP2Pマーケットプレイスサービス（利用可能な場合）を使用する場合、当社は、お客様のウォレットアドレス、お客様の連絡先情報（電話番号など）、および取引に関連するお客様の口座番号（M-PESA番号など）などの追加情報を収集することがあります。当社は、P2Pマーケットプレイスサービスを提供する一環として、取引データを記録します。また、適用されるKYC要件を遵守するために、追加情報を収集する場合があります。
デバイスメタデータ
お客様が本アプリを使用している場合、当社は、本アプリが適切に機能していること、およびお客様が当社の利用規約に違反していないことを確認するために、お客様のデバイスからメタデータを収集しています。これには、デバイス識別子とIPアドレスの収集が含まれます。
デバイスWorld IDデータ
当社はまた、お客様のデバイスメタデータを処理して、固有のデバイスフィンガープリントを算出します。このフィンガープリントのハッシュは、デバイスWorld IDとの一意性を証明するシグナルとして機能します。
ビジネスデータ処理関連：
氏名（フルネーム）
当社は、お客様との取引関係を維持および管理するという正当な利益を追求するために、お客様の氏名（フルネーム）を処理することがあります。
電子メールアドレス
また、Worldcoinプロジェクトの最新情報を入手するために、メーリングリストに登録するために電子メールを提供することもできます。データ主体の要請を提出する際、当社はお客様に電子メールアドレスを要求する場合があります。当社は、お客様との取引関係を維持および管理するという正当な利益を追求するために、お客様の電子メールアドレスを処理することがあります。
電話番号
当社は、お客様との取引関係を維持および管理するという正当な利益を追求するために、お客様の電話番号を処理することがあります。
企業データ
お客様が当社と取引関係にある場合（例えば、お客様がOrbオペレーターまたはサプライヤーである場合）、当社は、その取引関係を促進する一環として、また当社の顧客確認義務を果たすために、氏名、住所、電子メール、電話番号、ウォレットアドレス、その他の書類（政府発行の身分証明書など）などの情報を要求することがあります。当社は、Onfidoなどの第三者サービスを使用して、上記の情報および書類の収集と確認を行い、顧客確認義務を満たすことがあります。
応募データ
当社で働くことを希望する場合は、カバーレターと履歴書、および開示を希望する個人情報を記載した応募書類をお送りください。
上記の各データ処理活動に関する処理の法的根拠は、本プライバシー通知の末尾にある
付属書I – Tools for Humanityのデータ処理活動に関する法的根拠
に詳しく記載されています。
5.2 当社が第三者情報源から収集するデータ
当社は随時、以下の第三者情報源からお客様に関する情報を取得する場合があります。
ブロックチェーンデータ
当社は、本サービスを利用する当事者がユーザー規約で禁止されている違法行為に関与していないことを確認するため、および研究開発目的で取引動向を分析するために、パブリックブロックチェーンデータを分析することがあります。
身元確認サービス
法律（顧客確認に関する要件など）で必要とされる場合、お客様の身元確認のために、お客様のデータを使用して第三者サービスから情報を取得することがあります。明確にするために、当社は、法律で義務付けられている本人確認を行う際にお客様のバイオメトリクスデータを使用することは
ありません
。
人材データベース
当社は、優秀な人材に求人オファーを行うために、様々な情報源からデータを収集することがあります。
5.3 自動的に収集するデータ
適用法で認められている場合、お客様が本サービスを使用する際に、当社は特定の種類のデータを自動的に収集することがあります。この情報は、カスタマーサポートの問題に対処し、本サービスのパフォーマンスを向上させ、お客様に合理化されたパーソナライズされた体験を提供し、お客様のアカウント認証情報を保護するために役立ちます。自動的に収集される情報には、以下の情報が含まれます。
オンライン識別子：
地理的位置情報および追跡の詳細（上記参照）、コンピュータまたは携帯電話のオペレーティングシステム、ウェブブラウザ名およびバージョン、IPアドレス。ごく限られたケースでは、これらのデータは不正および違法な資金流動の検出にも使用されます。また、安定した不正のないソフトウェア体験の提供にも役立っています。
利用データ：
認証データ、セキュリティに関する質問、およびクッキーや類似の技術を通じて収集されたその他のデータ。
クッキー
：お客様のハードドライブまたはデバイス内のメモリに保存される小さなデータファイルで、本サービスやお客様の体験の向上、本サービスのどのエリアや機能に人気があるのかの確認、訪問回数のカウントに役立ちます。これらのデータを処理する法的根拠については、
クッキーポリシー
をご覧ください。ここでは、当社が使用している様々な種類のクッキーについて説明しています。
同様に、本アプリはトラブルシューティングおよび改善のために情報を収集します。当社は、Segment.ioやPostHogなどの第三者サービスを利用して、エンドユーザーの利用状況や相互作用に関する集計情報を閲覧しています。可能な場合は、当社は、第三者に送信される情報を最小限に抑える、またはマスキングする（データを暗号化するなど）措置を講じます。
5.4 匿名化データおよび集計データ
匿名化とは、データが匿名化されると特定の個人と関連付けられなくなるため、データを個人データに該当しなくするデータ処理技術です。匿名化されたデータの例には以下が含まれます。
取引データ
クリックストリームデータ
パフォーマンス指標
不正の指標（ただしこの目的には個人データも使用されます）
また当社は、個人を特定または参照できなくなるように、大量の情報を組み合わせてデータを集計します。当社は、ユーザーのニーズや行動の把握、本サービスの改善、ビジネスインテリジェンスやマーケティングの実施、セキュリティ上の脅威の検出、アルゴリズムのトレーニングなど、事業目的のために匿名化または集約されたデータを使用します。
上記のデータを処理する法的根拠は、アプリまたはウェブサイトの機能、ビジネスインサイト、不正防止という正当な利益です。
6. 収集したデータの使用方法
6.1 概要
当社がお客様の個人情報を使用するには、正当な理由（または「処理の適法化根拠」）が必要です。場合によっては、お客様の個人情報の使用に事前の同意を必要としないことがあります。当社は、お客様のデータを以下の目的で使用します。
ユーザー規約に基づき、当社の製品およびサービスを提供し、維持するため。これらのサービスには以下が含まれます。
World IDやデジタルトークンを管理したり、暗号資産全般やWorldcoinプロジェクトについて学んだりできる本アプリ
管理しているOrbとその統計を管理・監督することができるOrbオペレーター
ユーザーと代理人をつなぐP2Pマーケットプレイス（ドイツに拠点または居住地を有しているユーザー、ドイツに常居所または登録事務所があるユーザーには適用されません）
本サービスにおけるエラーのデバッグおよび修復を含む、当社の製品およびサービスの改善および開発のため。
データサイエンス研究を行うため。
本サービスの使用状況を分析し、より良いサポートを提供するため。
ブロックチェーン上に情報を公開し、独自性を証明できるようにするため。
お客様のウォレットアドレスを使用して、当社がサポートするデジタルトークンを送信するため。
マネーロンダリング防止法や制裁措置など、適用法を遵守するため。これには以下が含まれます。
お客様のIPアドレスを使用して、その国が本サービスへのアクセスを許可していない個人をブロックすること
アクセスまたは削除の要請など、適用されるデータ保護法に基づくデータ主体の要請に応えること
ブラックリストに載ったウォレットからの不正な可能性がある資金の流れなどを監視すること
違法なコンテンツに対する規制など、適用法を遵守すること
お客様からのご要望、苦情、お問い合わせに対応するため。
紛争の解決、問題のトラブルシューティング、および本プライバシー通知およびユーザー規約を含むお客様との当社契約の履行のため。
本サービスの更新に関するご連絡のため。
6.2 クレデンシャル
TFHでは、特定のクレデンシャルをデバイスにローカルに保存し、World IDプロトコルのゼロ知識インフラで共有することができます（「クレデンシャル」）。クレデンシャルの文脈において、当社は以下の方法でこのデータを処理します。
当社はお客様のクレデンシャルの有効性をチェックします（パスポートの場合、これはお客様の国のルート証明書を介して機能します）。
当社は、クレデンシャルの正当な所持者としてお客様を認証します（パスポートの場合、これはお客様のデバイス上でローカルに機能しますが、お客様の顔の写真（自撮り）は保存されません）。
当社は、お客様のクレデンシャルのデータを暗号化し、署名し、お客様のデバイス上の安全な環境に保存します。
当社は、クレデンシャルに含まれる個人情報にアクセスすることはありません。
その後、World IDプロトコルの保護機能により、この情報を信頼できる当事者と選択的に共有することができます（例えば、正確な年齢やお客様が誰であるかを明かすことなく、少なくとも18歳であることを証明することができます）。
パスポートについては、TFHは、各パスポートが一度だけ認証されるように、パスポートの一意の暗号署名のハッシュ値の匿名化されたシャードのみを保持します。
この処理はお客様の同意に基づいており、お客様のデバイスに保存されているパスポートからお客様の個人データにアクセスすることはありません。World Appを削除することで、お客様は携帯電話からこのデータを削除できます。
6.3 World IDデータ
お客様のWorld ID（つまり、それを使用するために必要な秘密の番号）は、お客様のデバイスにのみ保存されます（バックアップがある場合は、バックアップに暗号化されたコピーが存在します）。TFHも他の誰も、お客様のWorld IDにアクセスすることはできません。World IDは匿名で使用できます。新しいアプリケーションでWorld IDを使用するたびに、アプリケーションは使い捨ての番号（「ナリファイア」）を受け取るだけで、World IDが明らかになることはありません。これはゼロ知識証明（認証済みのWorld IDを持っていることを証明するだけで、どのWorld IDを持っているかは証明しない）によって可能になり、World IDがアプリケーションをまたいでお客様を追跡するのに使われることがないようにします。つまり、World IDはインターネット上の一般的なユーザーIDではないということです。
World IDの証明は、認証済みWorld IDのハッシュの公開マークルツリーにアクセスするオープンプロトコルによって機能します。World IDは中央集権的なサービスではなく、誰でもアクセスできるプロトコルです。当社は、マークルツリーおよびWorld ID証明へのアクセスを容易にするAPIを提供していますが、このような状況で個人データを受け取ることはありません。
また、お客様個人を特定できるようなWorld IDに関するデータも当社は一切処理しないことにご留意ください。World Appの文脈で処理されるすべての個人データ、特にお客様のウォレットアドレスと取引データは、World IDデータから意図的に切り離されるように設計されています。
7. 当社がお客様のデータを処理する場所
7.1 データ移転
お客様が当社にお客様のデータを提供された場合、そのデータは、お客様のデータが最初に収集された場所以外の場所に移転、保存、または処理されることがあります。お客様のデータが移転、保存、または処理される国は、お客様が最初にデータを提供した国と同じデータ保護法を有するとは限りません。
当社は、プライバシー法に関して各法域で規定されている原則を遵守するために最善の努力を払います。当社は、そのような移転が適応であり、データ処理者が適用法の下で要求されるように、さらに当社の基準に従ってお客様のデータを保護すると確信できる場合に限り、お客様の法域外のデータ処理者とデータを共有します。
7.2 移転のリスク
以下は、当社がお客様のデータを米国、欧州連合、またはその他の国に移転する場合に発生する可能性のあるリスクの一覧です。以下では、当社がそれぞれのリスクをどのように軽減するかもまとめています。
当社は、当社の業務委託先がお客様のデータを適切に保護する契約上の義務を負っていることを確保するためにできる限りのことをしていますが、これらの業務委託先がお客様の国のデータプライバシー法の適用を受けるとは限りません。業務委託先が許可なく違法にお客様のデータを処理した場合、その業務委託先に対してお客様のプライバシー権を主張することが難しい場合もあります。当社は、GDPRレベルのデータ保護とデータ主体の要請に応じることを義務付ける厳格なデータ処理契約を業務委託先と締結することにより、このリスクを軽減しています。
お客様の国のデータプライバシー法が、米国やEUのデータプライバシー法と矛盾している可能性があります。当社は常に、当社が従うべきデータ保護の最高基準を遵守するよう努めています。
お客様のデータは、政府関係者や当局によるアクセス対象となる可能性があります。このような場合、当社は、政府からのアクセス要請が無効、過剰、または違法なものであれば、裁判所で異議を申し立てることを約束します。さらに、当社は不正アクセスを防ぐために高度な暗号化を使用しています。
このリストには例が含まれていますが、お客様に起こりうるすべてのリスクが含まれているわけではないことにご注意ください。
7.3 米国データ移転のためのデータプライバシーフレームワーク
TFHは、米国商務省が定める、EU-米国データプライバシーフレームワーク（EU-米国DPF）、EU-米国DPFの英国拡張版、およびスイス-米国データプライバシーフレームワーク（スイス-米国DPF）を遵守しています。TFHは、EU-米国DPFに基づき欧州連合から、およびEU-米国DPFの英国拡張版に基づき英国（およびジブラルタル）から受領した個人データの処理に関して、EU-米国データプライバシーフレームワーク原則（EU-米国DPF原則）を遵守することを米国商務省に証明しています。TFHは米国商務省に対し、スイス-米国DPFに基づきスイスから受領した個人データの処理に関して、スイス-米国データプライバシーフレームワーク原則（スイス-米国DPF原則）を遵守することを証明しています。本「データプライバシーフレームワーク通知」の条項とEU-米国DPF原則および／またはスイス-米国DPF原則との間に矛盾がある場合は、同原則に従うものとします。データプライバシーフレームワーク（DPF）プログラムの詳細、および当社の認証については、
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
をご覧ください。
TFHは、DPFに基づき受領し、その後自らの代理人として行動する第三者に移転する個人データの処理に責任を負います。TFHは、EU、英国、およびスイスからの個人データのすべての再移転について、再移転責任規定を含むDPF原則を遵守します。
連邦取引委員会は、TFHによるEU-米国DPF、EU-米国DPFの英国拡張、およびスイス-米国DPFへの準拠を管轄しています。特定の状況において、TFHは、国家安全保障または法執行の要件を満たすためなど、公的機関による適法な要請に応じ、個人データの開示を求められる場合があります。
EU-米国DPFおよびEU-米国DPFの英国拡張版ならびにスイス-米国DPFを遵守し、TFHは、お客様の個人情報の収集および使用に関するDPF原則関連の苦情を解決することを約束します。EU-米国DPFおよびEU-米国DPFの英国拡張版およびスイス-米国DPFに依拠して受領した個人データの取り扱いに関する問い合わせまたは苦情をお持ちのEU、英国、スイスの個人の方は、まずTFH（dpo@worldcoin.org）までご連絡ください。
EU-米国DPF、EU-米国DPFの英国拡張版、スイス-米国DPFに従って、TFHは、EU-米国DPF、EU-米国DPFの英国拡張版、スイス-米国DPFに従って受け取った個人データの取り扱いに関する当社の未解決の苦情に関して、EUデータ保護当局（DPA）および英国データ保護機関（ICO）、ジブラルタル規制当局（GRA）およびスイス連邦データ保護情報コミッショナー（FDPIC）が設置したパネルの助言にそれぞれ協力し、遵守することを約束します。
DPFの遵守に関する苦情が他のDPFメカニズムで解決されない場合、一定の条件の下、お客様は、拘束力のある仲裁を申し立てることができます。詳細はDPFの公式ウェブサイトをご覧ください。
8. データを共有する場面
当社はお客様のデータを販売することは決してありません
。
当社がお客様のデータを社外に共有する場合、当社は常に以下のことを行います。
合理的に安全な方法で共有します
お客様のプライバシーに対する当社の約束と一致する方法で取り扱われることを確保するための措置を講じます
他社が独自の目的で使用することを禁止します
当社は、以下の限られた方法でお客様のデータを共有します。
Worldcoin財団との共有：
当社は、Worldcoinに代わって個人データを収集するWorldcoin財団の処理者として行動することがあります（詳細については、Worldcoinのプライバシー通知をご確認ください）。
当社内での共有：
当社は、業務および職務を遂行するためにアクセスを必要とする当社のチームメンバーにのみデータを開示します。当社は、特定の業務や職務を遂行するために必要な範囲のデータのみを開示し、厳格なアクセス管理体制を敷いています。
当社外のベンダーおよびサービスプロバイダーとの共有：
当社は、データを処理し、お客様に本サービスを提供するために、当社がそのサービスに依拠しているサービスプロバイダーにのみデータを開示します。当社は、法律で義務付けられている場合に限り、本人確認ベンダーにデータを開示します。
そのようなサービスプロバイダーのカテゴリーは以下のとおりです。
クラウドサービスプロバイダー（すべてのデータタイプ）
SaaSプロバイダー（当社は以下のカテゴリーのSaaS製品を使用しています）：
データベースとインフラ管理
データセキュリティ
採用
コミュニケーション
アンケート調査
KYC/KYB（つまり公的書類のチェック）
データ主体要請の管理
技術サポート
ユーザーサポート
外部専門家
専門ソフトウェア開発者
法律専門家
税務アドバイザー
銀行
ラベリングサービスプロバイダー（特別な安全措置のある場合のみ）
応募者とOrbオペレーターの身元調査サービス
法執行機関、当局、またはその他の第三者との共有：
当社は、適用法を遵守し、強制的な法的要求に対応するために、お客様のデータを開示することがあります。当社は、各要請を慎重に検討し、その要請が法律に準拠しているかどうかを判断し、適切な場合には、無効、過剰または違法な要請に異議を唱えることがあります。当社は、法律、規制、その他の法的手続または義務を遵守するために必要であると合理的に判断した場合、個人データを警察その他の政府当局と共有することがあります。
当社は、お客様の行為が当社のユーザー規約と矛盾すると当社が判断した場合、お客様が法律に違反したと当社が判断した場合、または当社の権利、財産、安全、当社のユーザー、公衆、もしくは他者を保護するために必要であると当社が判断した場合、お客様の個人情報を共有することがあります。
当社は、助言を得るため、または当社の事業利益を保護し管理するために必要な場合、お客様の個人情報を当社の弁護士およびその他の専門アドバイザーと共有することがあります。
当社は、合併、会社資産の売却、資金調達、または他社による当社事業の全部もしくは一部の買収に関連して、またはこれらに関する交渉中に、お客様の個人情報を共有することがあります。
お客様の個人情報を含むデータは、当社の現在および将来の親会社、関連会社、子会社、および共通の支配下および所有下にあるその他の会社間で共有される場合があります。
当社は、お客様の同意を得て、またはお客様の指示により、お客様の個人情報を共有することがあります。
9. お客様のデータがパブリックブロックチェーンに記録される仕組み
お客様による当社のサービスの使用に関連する取引情報は、パブリックブロックチェーンに記録される場合があります。
注意：
ブロックチェーンは、Worldcoinが管理または運営していない第三者によって運営されている分散型ネットワーク上で維持されている取引の公開台帳です。ブロックチェーン台帳の公開性と不変性のため、ブロックチェーンにアップロードされ保存されたデータを修正、消去、または開示を制御できることを保証することはできません。
10. クッキーの使用方法
当社は、本サービスの機能を向上させるためクッキーを使用しています。クッキーのほかにも、ウェブビーコンなどの同様の技術を使用して本サービスのユーザーを追跡することがあります。ウェブビーコン（「クリアGIF」とも呼ばれます）は、クッキーと似た機能を持つ、固有の識別子を持つ小さな画像です。当社の
クッキーポリシー
は、参照により本書に組み込まれます。
また当社は、Google Analyticsも使用しています。Googleのパートナーのウェブサイトやアプリケーションを使用する際に、Googleがお客様のデータをどのように使用するかについての詳細は、
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
をご覧ください。本サービスを使用することにより、お客様は、当社がお客様のコンピュータまたはモバイルデバイスにクッキーやその他のデータを保存およびアクセスすること、および、これらの活動に関連してGoogle Analyticsを使用することに同意するものとします。上記リンクに記載の情報をお読みいただき、同意していただく内容について理解してください。
11. お客様のデータの保存期間
適用法に別段の定めがない限り、当社は、本サービスをお客様に提供し、当社の正当な事業目的を果たし、当社の法的義務および規制上の義務を遵守するために合理的に必要な期間、お客様のデータを保持します。お客様が当社のアカウントを閉鎖した場合、当社はお客様のアカウントデータを1か月以内に削除します。それ以外の場合、当社はお客様のアカウントデータをお客様が本サービスを2年間使用しなかった後に削除します。法律で義務付けられている場合、当社は、不正行為の監視、検出、防止、および税務、会計、財務報告の義務など、当社の法律上および規制上の義務を遵守するために必要なお客様の個人データを保持し続けます。
注意：
ブロックチェーンは、当社が管理または運営していない分散型の第三者ネットワークです。ブロックチェーン技術は公開かつ不変であるため、ブロックチェーンに保存されたデータの修正、消去、開示の管理はできません。
12. 本プライバシー通知の子供および青少年に関する特則
18歳未満の個人が本サービスを使用することは禁じられており、当社は18歳未満の個人から故意にデータを収集することはありません。18歳未満のお子様が、お客様の許可なく本サービスにアクセスしていると思われる場合は、当社の
リクエストポータル
からご連絡いただき、お子様のデータの削除を要請してください。
当社は、18歳未満の子供に関するデータを収集したことが判明した場合、可能な限り速やかに当該データを削除します。当社は、本サービスの使用を18歳以上の方に限定するため、自動年齢検知AIモデルの導入、オペレーターへの指示、自己確認などの措置を講じています。当社は、子供に対して製品やサービスを販売することはありません。
13. 本プライバシー通知に関するお問い合わせ
お客様は、本アプリ内の設定メニューからデータの削除を選択することができます。本プライバシー通知に関するご質問やご不明な点がある場合、ご自身の権利を行使したい場合、またはデータ保護責任者（DPO）に連絡したい場合は、
リクエストポータル
、またはTools For Humanity Corporation（548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA）まで書面にて、または
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
までご連絡ください。当社は、適用されるデータ保護法に従いデータ保護権を行使することを希望する個人からのすべての要請に対応します。World App内からデータを削除することもできます。
当社が適切に対処できなかったプライバシーまたはデータ使用に関する懸念事項が未解決の場合は、お客様の法域のデータ保護規制当局までお問い合わせください。EUにお住まいの場合は、
こちら
からデータ保護規制機関をご覧ください。
14. お客様の権利
以下の権利は、当社のデータベースで要請者を特定できる限りにおいて、また、当社が要請者の権利を行使することによって他のデータ主体の権利を侵害しない限りにおいて、適用されます。
お客様は、要請があればいつでも、当社が処理するお客様の個人データに関する情報を当社から入手する権利を有します。お客様は、当社からお客様に関する個人データを受領する権利を有します。
お客様は、お客様に関する個人データが誤っている場合、直ちに訂正するよう要求する権利を有します。
お客様は、当社に対し、お客様に関する個人データの削除を要求する権利を有します。これらの前提条件は、特に、個人データが収集またはその他の方法で処理された目的のために必要でなくなった場合、適用法に基づく削除要件が満たされることを条件に（例えば、複数の法域の法律により、当社は一定期間取引情報を保持することが義務付けられています）、削除する権利を規定しています。
お客様は、同意に基づくデータ処理に対する同意を自由に撤回する権利、または同意に基づかないデータ処理に異議を唱える権利を有します。
15. 補遺
以下では、当社が事業を展開する各市場について、法的に義務付けられている情報を追補しています。この情報は、データ主体が居住する地域に応じて、同意の一部を形成します。特定の法域では特定のサービスをブロックしているため、この情報はお客様の所在地の情報と異なる場合があります。上記と矛盾する場合は、特定の法域に関するより特別な記述が優先されます。
補遺A：欧州経済領域（「EEA」）および英国
EEAまたは英国にお住まいの方は、以下が適用されます。一般データ保護規則（EU規則2016年4月27日2016/679（「GDPR」））に基づき、お客様は少なくとも以下の権利を有します。GDPRの下で利用可能なお客様の権利を行使するには、当社の
リクエストポータル
までご連絡ください。例外的な場合を除き、当社は法定期限である1か月以内にお客様の要請を解決いたします。以下のセクションにおけるGDPRという言葉の使用は、2018年英国データ保護法として英国国内法に移管され、2018年欧州連合（離脱）法の
セクション3
、2019年データ保護、プライバシーおよび電子通信（改正等）（EU離脱）規則（SI 2019/419）の
別表
1
により改正されたイングランドおよびウェールズ、スコットランド、北アイルランドの法律の一部として保持される英国GDPRを含みます。
A.1 GDPRに基づく法的権利
本セクションは、お客様のデータの処理がGDPRの適用範囲（
お客様がEEAの居住者または英国の居住者である場合など）に該当する場合に適用されます。お客様は、GDPRに基づき、以下に列挙する追加の権利を有する場合があります。GDPRの下で利用可能なお客様の権利を行使するには、当社の
リクエストポータル
までご連絡ください。
お客様は、GDPR第15条の範囲内で、要請があればいつでも、当社が処理するお客様の個人データに関する情報を当社から入手する権利を有します。
お客様は、お客様に関する個人データが誤っている場合、直ちに訂正するよう要求する権利を有します。
お客様は、GDPR第17条に記載されている条件に基づき、当社に対し、お客様に関する個人データの削除を要求する権利を有します。これらの前提条件には、特に、個人データが収集された目的またはその他の方法で処理された目的のために必要でなくなった場合、および違法な処理の場合、異議申立ての存在、またはEU法もしくは当社が従う加盟国の法律に基づく消去義務の存在の場合に、個人データを消去する権利が規定されています。
お客様は、GDPR第18条に従い、処理の制限を要求する権利を有します。
お客様は、GDPR第20条に従い、当社に提供したお客様に関する個人データを、構造化され、一般的に使用され、機械で読み取り可能な形式で、当社から受け取る権利を有します。
お客様は、GDPR第21条に従い、特にGDPR第6条(1)1項fに基づいて実施されるお客様に関する個人情報の処理に対して、お客様の特定の状況に関連する理由により、いつでも異議を唱える権利を有します。
お客様は、管理者によって行われたデータ処理について苦情がある場合、管轄の監督当局に連絡する権利を有します。監督当局は、バイエルン州データ保護監督局（Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz）です。
個人データの処理がお客様の同意に基づいている場合、お客様はGDPR第7条に基づき、お客様の個人データの使用に対する同意を将来に向かっていつでも撤回する権利を有します。その場合、同意の撤回は同意そのものと同様に簡単に宣言することができます。撤回は将来に向かってのみ有効となりますのでご注意ください。撤回前に行われた処理は影響を受けません。
A.2 データ移転
十分性認定を受けていない国にデータを転送する場合、当社はEU標準契約条項を利用します。当社は現在、個人データを米国にのみ移転しています。
個人データの処理がお客様の同意に基づいている場合、お客様はGDPR第7条に基づき、お客様の個人データの使用に対する同意を将来に向かっていつでも撤回する権利を有します。その場合、同意の撤回は同意そのものと同様に簡単に宣言することができます。撤回は将来に向かってのみ有効となりますのでご注意ください。撤回前に行われた処理は影響を受けません。また、同意に基づかない処理は、同意を撤回しても影響を受けないことにご注意ください。
補遺B：日本
日本在住の方は、さらに以下が適用されます。
B1. 日本の規制に関する情報
当社は、個人情報の保護に関する法律（「APPI」）を含む日本の法令を遵守します。本セクションは、本バイオメトリクスデータ同意書の他の部分に優先して、APPIに定義された「個人情報」の当社の取り扱いに適用されます。
当社は、個人情報の保護に関する法律（「APPI」）を含む日本の法令を遵守します。本セクションは、本プライバシー通知の他の部分に優先して、APPIに定義された「個人情報」の当社の取り扱いに適用されます。
B2. データ共有
当社は、適用法で認められている場合を除き、お客様の個人情報を第三者に開示、販売、提供、共有、移転することはありません。
B3. 安全管理措置
当社は、取り扱う個人情報の漏洩、滅失またはき損の防止その他の個人情報の安全管理のため、個人情報取扱規程等の整備、個人情報の取扱いに関する定期的なモニタリング、個人情報の取扱いに関する従業員教育の実施、個人情報を取り扱う機器の盗難や紛失の防止、アクセス管理の徹底等の必要かつ適切な措置を講じます。また当社は、個人情報を取り扱う委託先および従業員に対し、適切な監督を行います。お客様の個人情報の取り扱いに関する安全管理措置の詳細については、
リクエストポータル
までお問い合わせください。
B4. 外国における個人データの処理に関する参考情報
お客様の個人情報はEUおよび米国で処理されます。
B5. APPIに基づく法的権利
APPIの下で提供されるお客様の権利を行使するには、当社の
リクエストポータル
までご連絡ください。
補遺C：アルゼンチン
お客様がアルゼンチン共和国に居住している場合、法律第25,326号の管理機関としての権限を有する情報公開庁は、個人データ保護に関する現行規則の不履行により権利に影響を受ける者からの苦情および請求を聴取する権限を有することをお知らせします。
同庁の連絡先は以下のとおりです。
住所：Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
郵便番号：C1067ABP
電話番号：(54-11) 3988-3968
電子メール：datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
補遺D：シンガポール
シンガポールにお住まいの方は、以下が適用されます。
D1. 個人データの収集、使用および開示
お客様がシンガポールの居住者であり、お客様の同意がある場合、当社はプライバシー通知に定める各目的のためにお客様の個人情報を収集、使用またはその他の方法で開示します。お客様は、いつでも同意を撤回する権利を行使することができますが、要請の内容や範囲によっては、お客様へのサービスの提供が継続できなくなる場合がありますので、あらかじめご了承ください。また、同意の撤回が、同意なしでの個人データの収集、使用、開示が適用法で許可または要求されている場合、そのような個人データの収集、使用、開示を継続する当社の権利に影響を及ぼすものではないことにご注意ください。［1］
D2. データ主体の権利の行使
お客様は、当社の
リクエストポータル
に連絡することにより、当社が収集した個人データを管理し、権利を行使することができます。できる限り早く、通常は30日以内にご回答することを目指しています。30日以内に要請にお応えできない場合、または要請に応えることができない場合は、その旨と理由を事前にお知らせいたします。［2］
法律で認められている場合、当社はお客様の要請にお応えするために事務手数料を請求することがあります。
D3. お客様の個人データの他国への移転
お客様がシンガポールにお住まいで、当社がお客様のデータを収集した場合、当社はお客様のデータをシンガポール国外に移転することがあります。しかしながら、当社は、ASEANモデル契約条項の使用などを通じて、お客様の個人データが、少なくとも2012年シンガポール個人データ保護法の下で提供されるものと同等の保護基準を継続的に受けることを常に確保します。
補遺E – 韓国
韓国のデータ主体に関するこの補遺は、お客様が韓国のデータ主体である場合、当社との関係に関連して当社が処理する個人情報に関する当社の慣行について説明するものです。
E.1 – 個人情報の移転
当社は、以下のとおり個人情報を第三者に提供し、または処理を委託します。
- 個人情報の第三者提供
受領者の名称
受領者の使用目的
受領者に提供される個人情報の項目
受領者による保持期間
Tools for Humanity GmbH
本通知に記載されている上記セクション6の目的。
本通知に記載されている上記セクション5の項目。
本通知に記載されている上記セクション11の保存期間。
- 個人情報処理の第三者への委託：
データ処理の委託および委託先の一覧は、
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
をご覧ください。
当社は、国外にある第三者に対してお客様の個人情報の処理を委託したり、保管目的のためにお客様の個人情報を移転したりすることがあります。
お客様が個人情報の国外移転を希望されない場合、お客様は個人情報の国外移転に同意しないか、または越境移転の停止を当社に要請することにより拒否することができますが、拒否された場合は当社のサービスを使用いただけない場合があります。上記の個人情報の越境移転の法的根拠は、「データ主体との契約の締結および履行に必要な個人情報の処理または保存の委託」を構成するという事実であり、個人情報保護法第28条の8第1項第3号に定める法定事項がプライバシーポリシーで開示されていることです。
E.2 – 個人情報の破棄
保持期間の満了、利用目的の達成等により個人情報が不要となった場合は、当社は遅滞なく個人情報を破棄します。破棄のプロセスと方法は以下のとおりです。
1) 破棄プロセス：当社は、破棄する個人情報の一部を選択し、DPOの承認を得て破棄します。
2) 破棄方法：電子ファイルとして記録・保管されている個人情報については、技術的な方法（ローレベルフォーマット等）により、複製が不可能な状態で破棄し、紙文書として記録・保管されている個人情報については、シュレッダーまたは焼却処分いたします。
E.3 – 個人情報の保管
適用法に従ってお客様の個人情報を保持する必要がある場合、当社は、適用法が要求する以下の目的および期間について保持します。
E.4 – お客様の権利
お客様は、当社に対して、個人情報保護法を含む適用法に定めるところに従い、お客様の個人情報へのアクセス、修正もしくは削除、または処理の停止を要請する等、個人情報に関する権利を行使することができます。また、個人情報の収集、使用、提供に関する同意の撤回権、ポータビリティ権、自動意思決定に関する権利を行使することができます。かかる権利は、お客様の法定代理人またはその他の正当な権限を有する者を通じて行使することもできます。
お客様は、worldcoin.org/requestportalに連絡することで、上記の該当する権利を行使することができます。
E.5 – セキュリティ措置
当社は、個人情報を保護するために、以下のような適用される韓国の法律で定められた技術的、組織的、物理的なセキュリティ措置を実施します。
1）管理的措置：データ保護責任者の任命、内部管理計画の策定と実施、データ保護に関する従業員の定期的な研修など
2) 技術的措置：個人情報処理システムへのアクセス権限の管理、アクセス制御システムの設置、セキュリティプログラムの設置など
3）物理的措置：コンピュータ室、データ保管室などの個人情報保管施設や機器へのアクセス制限など
E.6 – お問い合わせ
プライバシーおよびデータ保護に関するご質問やお問い合わせは、データ保護チーム（
dpo@worldcoin.org
）までご連絡ください。
補遺F – 米国
カリフォルニア消費者プライバシー法は、カリフォルニアプライバシー権法により改正されていますが、現時点では当社には適用されません。
補遺G - ブラジル
G.1 適用法令、管理者、オペレーター
お客様がブラジルに居住する場合、お客様の個人データがブラジルで収集された場合、またはお客様がブラジルで本サービスを使用する場合、適用法は、法律第13,709/2018号（一般データ保護法、「LGPD」）です。
G.2 異議を唱える権利
同意によらない目的での個人データの使用について、その目的がLGPDと矛盾する場合、お客様は異議を唱える権利があります。お客様の異議が正当である場合、当社はお客様の個人情報を、本サービスの機能や体験を開発・改善するために使用することはありません。
お客様が特定の個人データを提供しない場合、または収集もしくは処理を許可しない場合、お客様の体験の質に影響を与える可能性があり、当社は本サービスの目的を達成できない可能性があり、またはお客様に特定の本サービスを提供できない可能性があることにご注意ください。
場合によっては、お客様のデータは匿名化され、それにより当社はお客様を特定できなくなります。匿名化されたデータでは、LGPDで規定されているように個人を特定することができないため、お客様は匿名化されたデータの使用に異議を唱えることはできません。この匿名化されたデータは、当社の製品やサービスを改善するために使用されます。
G.3 LGPDに基づく法的権利
LGPDに基づき、お客様は、処理の存在を確認し、アクセスし、修正し、または処理されるデータのポータビリティを要請する権利を有します。さらに、お客様は、当社がお客様の個人データを共同使用する公的機関および民間企業の情報を要請することができます。また、同意を与えない可能性とその否定的な結果に関する情報を要請し、同意を得て処理されるデータの削除を要求することもできます。World Appの設定メニューで情報の削除を選択できます。
特定の状況下では、お客様は、当社がお客様から提供された情報を処理するために依拠する、お客様の個人データの処理方法について異議を唱える権利、制限する権利、またはお客様の同意を撤回する権利を有します。
お客様は、以下のセクションH.4に記載されている連絡先を使用して、または当社のオンラインリクエストポータルを通じて、当社のDPOに要請を提出することにより、LGPDに基づくお客様の権利を行使することができます。ご自身の権利が適切に対応されていないとお感じになった場合は、以下のリンクから入手可能なフォームにご記入の上、Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais（ANPD）に苦情を申し立てることができます：
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
G.4 お客様の個人データの国際移転
LGPDがお客様に適用され、当社がお客様の個人データを収集している場合、当社はその個人データを国外に移転する場合があります。ただし、当社は、お客様の個人データが、常に、ANPDが発行した十分性認定で認められたとおり、LGPDで規定されている保護レベルと十分な保護レベルを提供する外国または国際機関にのみ移転されるようにします。十分性認定がない場合、当社は、ANPDの規制で定められた標準契約条項を使用して、少なくともLGPDの規定と同等の保護基準に従い続けるか、または、国際移転についてお客様の具体的かつ強調された同意を得るものとします。
付属書I – Tools for Humanityによるデータ処理活動の法的根拠／目的
ユーザー
データを処理する理由
どのような個人データが処理されるか
処理の法的根拠
保持期間
World Appでアカウントを作成するため
ウォレットアドレス、メタデータ、ユーザー名
契約の履行
サービスの使用期間、またはお客様がデータの削除を要請するまで。
対象年齢であることを確認するため
生年月日
法的義務
お客様の正確な生年月日が保存されることはありません。当社は、お客様が18歳以上であるかどうかだけを保存します。当社はこの情報をサービスの使用期間、またはお客様がデータの削除を要請するまで保存します。
オプションとして、お客様の連絡先がお客様と簡単に連絡を取り、取引できるようにするため
電話番号
同意
サービスの使用期間、またはお客様がデータの削除を要請するまで。
お客様が連絡先と簡単に連絡を取り、取引できるようにするため
アドレス帳の連絡先
同意
サービスの使用期間、またはお客様がデータの削除を要請するまで。
オプションとして、近くのOrbを表示するため
位置情報
同意
最長24か月
アカウント不正防止のため
メタデータ、IPアドレス、デバイスID
正当な利益、すなわち特定の種類の不正行為を防止する利益（種類一覧）
最長24か月
お客様の国でサービスが許可されていることを確認するため
IPアドレス、位置情報
法的義務
最長24か月
セルフカストディウォレットを表示し、ウォレット取引のためのインターフェースを提供するため
ウォレットアドレス、取引データ
契約の履行
この文脈では個人データは保存されません。
お客様のセルフカストディWorld IDを表示し、認証のためのインターフェースを提供するため
World ID情報
契約の履行
この文脈では個人データは保存されません。
セルフカストディクレデンシャルを表示し、クレデンシャルを共有するためのインターフェースを提供するため
クレデンシャル情報、クレデンシャル有効性情報
契約の履行
この文脈では個人データは保存されません。
当社サービスの分析・改善およびデータサイエンス調査の実施
利用データとメタデータ、公開取引データ
同意
最長24か月
マネーロンダリング防止法、制裁法など適用法を遵守するため
取引データ、ウォレットアドレス
法的義務
サービスの使用期間。
コンテンツ規制など適用法を遵守するため
ミニアプリコンテンツ
法的義務
サービスの使用期間。
連絡とマーケティングのため
電子メールアドレス、プッシュ通知
正当な利益
最長24か月
お客様からの連絡
正当な利益
最長24か月
お客様からのフィードバック
正当な利益
最長24か月
お客様からのご要望、苦情、お問い合わせに対応するため。
お客様が当社と連絡を取ろうとする場合、連絡先情報、電子メールまたはソーシャルメディアのプロフィール名
契約の履行
アプリをスムーズにお使いいただくため
メタデータ
契約の履行
最長24か月
デバイスを認証するため
デバイスWorld IDデータ（デバイスフィンガープリント）
契約の履行
サービスの使用期間。
紛争の解決、問題のトラブルシューティング、および本プライバシー通知およびユーザー規約を含むお客様との当社契約の履行のため。
サービスの使用期間。
取引先
データを処理する理由
どのような個人データが処理されるか
処理の法的根拠
保持期間
コミュニケーション
電話番号、電子メールアドレス、氏名
正当な利益、すなわち取引先と連絡を取るための利益。
取引関係の存続期間、またはお客様がデータの削除を要請されるまで。
取引関係の維持・管理
電話番号、電子メールアドレス、氏名、企業データ
正当な利益、すなわち取引先との取引関係を維持・管理するための利益。
取引関係の存続期間、またはお客様がデータの削除を要請されるまで。
KYC義務の履行
パスポートデータ、企業データ
法的義務
取引関係の存続期間および終了後3年間。
お客様の応募処理のため
応募データ
同意および契約締結前のデータ主体の要請による手順。
デフォルトでは最長3か月、人材プールの一員となることに同意した場合はそれ以上。
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity 개인정보 처리방침
Worldcoin 커뮤니티에 가입해 주셔서 감사합니다! Worldcoin은 개발자, 개인 및 기타 기여자로 구성된 글로벌 커뮤니티의 지원을 받는 오픈 소스 프로토콜입니다.
본 개인정보 처리방침은 사용자가 당사 웹사이트, 애플리케이션(이하 “앱”) 및 본 개인정보 처리방침이 링크된 기타 서비스(이하 “서비스”로 총칭함)를 이용하여 당사에 제공하는 데이터에 적용됩니다. 본 개인정보 처리방침은
사용자 이용 약관
(이하“사용자 이용 약관”)의 일부를 구성하며 이에 따라 규율됩니다. Tools for Humanity Corporation(이하 “TFH US”)과 독일 자회사 Tools for Humanity GmbH(이하 “TFH Germany”라고 하며, 통칭하여 “
TFH
” 또는 “
당사
,” “
당사를
”이라고 함)는 Worldcoin 프로토콜(이하 “Worldcoin”)의 개발 및 성장에 기여하고 있지만, Orb 관련 데이터 처리를 관리하는 Worldcoin Foundation과는 다른 조직입니다.
1. 컨트롤러
당사는 모든 “World App 데이터”, “자격 인증 데이터” 및 기타 “비즈니스 데이터”의 데이터 컨트롤러입니다. Tools for Humanity Corporation(주소지: 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA). TFH는 Tools for Humanity GmbH를 통해 유럽연합(“
EU
”)에서 설립되었습니다.
“World App 데이터”는 아래 5항에 자세히 설명된 바와 같이 World App 이용 시 수집 및 처리된 모든 개인 데이터를 의미하며, Worldcoin 프로토콜 또는 Worldcoin 토큰(예: 당사가 통제하지 않는 가상화폐지갑 주소 및 거래 데이터) 이용과 관련된 개인 데이터는 제외됩니다.
자격 증명 인증 데이터는 자격 증명 확인 시 처리되어 사용자의 자체 보관 World ID에 추가되는 데이터를 의미합니다. 즉, 여권의 NFC 칩을 읽어 기기에 여권 정보를 안전하게 저장하는 것을 의미합니다. 이 데이터는 사용자가 직접 관리하며 자격 증명의 유효성을 확인한 후 TFH는 자격 증명(예: 여권)의 고유한 암호화 서명의 해시 값의 익명화된 조각을 저장하여 각 자격 증명이 World ID에 한 번만 추가될 수 있도록 보장합니다.
“비즈니스 데이터”는 이메일, 화상 회의 또는 당사 웹사이트를 통해 당사와 소통하거나 기타 방식으로 업무 또는 상호 작용할 때 당사가 다른 수단을 통해 수집하고 처리하는 모든 개인 데이터를 의미합니다. Orb 앱의 데이터 처리에 관한 자세한 내용은 Orb 앱에 링크된 Orb 앱 개인정보 처리방침을 참조하시기 바랍니다. 전용 데이터 수집 및 테스트와 관련된 데이터 처리는 테스트 앱에 링크된 각 수집 및 테스트 개인정보 처리방침을 참조하십시오. 당사 웹사이트 관련 처리는 당사 웹사이트에 링크된 쿠키 정책을 참조하십시오.
2. 본 개인정보 처리방침 업데이트
당사는 때때로 본 개인정보 처리방침을 업데이트합니다. 개인정보를 사용하는 방식 등 중대한 변경 사항이 있는 경우 이메일 또는 앱 내 메시지를 통해 알려드립니다.
3. 본 개인정보 처리방침에서 다루는 사항
개인정보 및 데이터 보호에 대한 약속
수집하는 정보 및 이유
수집하는 개인 데이터를 이용하는 방법
개인 데이터를 처리하는 장소
개인 데이터를 공유하는 시점
퍼블릭 블록체인에 개인 데이터가 기록되는 방식
쿠키 사용 방법
개인 데이터를 보관하는 기간
어린이와 청소년을 위한 본 개인정보 처리방침의 차이점
데이터 주체의 법적 권리
본 개인정보 처리방침과 관련하여 연락하는 방법
4. 개인정보 및 데이터 보호에 대한 약속
당사는 개인정보를 보호하고 데이터 보안을 유지하기 위해 최선을 다하고 있습니다. 사람들이 신뢰할 때만 가능한 한 많은 사람들에게 디지털 토큰을 공정하게 분배하고자 하는 사명을 달성할 수 있으며, 이를 위해 개인정보 보호와 데이터 보안이 매우 중요함을 잘 알고 있습니다.
개인정보 보호
당사는 개인정보 보호를 염두에 두고 제품과 서비스를 설계했으며, 제품과 서비스를 개선하기 위해 데이터를 수집합니다. 당사는 본 개인정보 처리방침 또는 특정 제품이나 서비스에 대한 데이터 동의서를 통해 당사가 수집하는 데이터 유형과 수집하는 이유, 이를 이용하는 방법을 반드시 알려드립니다.
데이터 보안
데이터를 관리하는 전담 팀을 두고 있으며, 전송 중이거나 보관할 때 데이터를 보호하기 위한 물리적, 전자적 보호 조치를 시행하고 있습니다. 물론, 어떠한 서비스도 완벽하게 안전할 수 없습니다. 계정이나 데이터에 관한 우려 사항이 있는 경우
요청 포털
을
통해 연락하거나 Tools For Humanity Corporation(주소지: 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA)으로 서신을 보내주십시오.
5. 수집하는 정보 및 이유
5.1 사용자가 당사에 제공하는 데이터
사용자는 앱에 접속하기 위해 데이터를 제공할 필요가 없습니다. 하지만, 서비스 내에서 기능을 사용하려면 당사에 특정 데이터를 제공해야 할 수 있습니다. 아래의 경우 처리에 대한 법적 근거는 사용자의 동의 및 계약 이행(서비스 제공에 대한 당사의 약속)입니다. 아래는 사용자가 제공할 수 있는 데이터 목록과 당사가 해당 데이터를 사용할 수 있는 용도입니다.
World App:
전화번호.
전화번호를 입력하여 계정과 연결하도록 선택할 수 있습니다. 동의하에 다른 사용자가 전화번호를 통해 계정을 찾을 수 있습니다. 당사는 사용자가 데이터 주체로서 요청을 제출할 때 전화번호를 요구할 수 있으며 이 데이터를 처리하는 법적 근거는 사용자 이용 약관에 따른 서비스 이행입니다.
사용자 ID.
사용자 ID를 가상화폐지갑 주소에 연결할 수 있으며, 언제든지 사용자 ID를 변경할 수 있습니다.
생년월일.
연령 제한 요건을 준수하기 위해 생년월일을 공개할 수 있습니다. 당사는 생년월일 데이터를 저장하지 않고 해당 데이터의 체크섬과 사용자가 18세 이상인지 여부만 저장합니다.
사용자의 피드백 및 서신.
여기에는 이메일이나 제3자 소셜 미디어 웹사이트를 통해 당사에 보내는 이메일, 채팅 메시지 또는 기타 커뮤니케이션이 포함됩니다. 이러한 수단을 통해 당사와 소통하고자 하는 경우 이메일 주소 또는 소셜 미디어 프로필 이름 처리도 포함될 수 있습니다. 당사는 제3자 서비스 제공업체를 이용하여 서비스 이용에 대한 설문조사를 진행할 수 있습니다. 이 데이터를 처리하는 법적 근거는 사용자 이용 약관에 따른 서비스 이행입니다.
주소록 연락처.
앱에 주소록에 대한 접근 권한을 제공하여 주소록에 있는 다른 사용자를 쉽게 찾고 상호 작용할 수 있는 기능을 활성화할 수 있습니다. 이 데이터를 처리하는 법적 근거는 앱에서 연락처를 찾는 주체의 정당한 이익과 앱에서 연락처를 찾는 공유 사용자의 이익입니다.
참고:
사용자는 연락처 정보 공유 시 관련 법률을 준수해야 합니다. 이를 위해 연락처에 있는 사람들의 허가를 받고, 이들의 명시적인 동의 없이 다른 사람의 연락처 정보를 TFH와 공유해서는 안 됩니다. 마음이 바뀌면 언제든지 기기 설정에서 연락처에 대한 접근 권한을 해제할 수 있습니다. 기기의 주소록 연락처를 앱으로 가져와서 연락처 중 당사 서비스를 이용하는 사람을 찾거나 당사 서비스 이용에 참여하도록 초대하는 경우, 당사는 주기적으로 연락처 전화번호를 당사 서버의 다른 사용자가 제공한 번호와 해당 가상화폐지갑 주소와 동기화합니다.
위치 정보
. 위치 기반 서비스(예: 가까운 Orb 오퍼레이터를 찾을 수 있는 기능)를 사용하도록 설정할 수 있습니다. 구체적으로 동의한 경우에만 당사는 위치 기반 서비스를 통해 근처에 있는 Orb가 표시되도록 GPS를 통해 사용자의 위치 정보를 수집할 수 있습니다. 기기 설정에서 언제든지 권한을 변경할 수 있습니다. 한국에 거주하지 않는 경우, 당사는 World App 계정과 연결되지 않은 대략적인 위치를 저장할 수도 있습니다. 당사는 특히 Orb 위치 선택을 포함하여 서비스 개선을 위해 이 데이터를 사용합니다.
P2P 마켓플레이스
. 다른 사용자로부터 디지털 토큰을 구매할 수 있는 P2P 마켓플레이스 서비스(이용 가능한 경우)를 이용하는 경우, 당사는 가상화폐지갑 주소, 연락처 정보(예: 전화번호) 및 거래와 관련된 계정 번호(예: M-PESA 번호)와 같은 추가 정보를 수집할 수 있습니다. 당사는 P2P 마켓플레이스 서비스 제공의 일부로 거래 데이터를 기록하며, 해당 KYC 요건을 준수하기 위해 추가 정보를 수집할 수도 있습니다.
기기 메타데이터.
앱을 사용하는 경우 당사는 앱이 정상적으로 작동하고 사용자가 이용 약관을 위반하지 않는지 확인하기 위해 사용자의 기기에서 메타데이터를 수집하며, 여기에는 기기 식별자 및 IP 주소 수집도 포함됩니다.
기기 World ID 데이터.
또한 고유한 기기 지문을 계산하기 위해 기기 메타데이터를 처리합니다. 이 지문의 해시는 기기 World ID의 고유성을 증명하는 신호 역할을 합니다.
비즈니스 데이터 처리:
이름 및 성.
당사는 사용자와 비즈니스 관계를 유지하고 관리하는 등 정당한 이익을 추구하기 위해 사용자의 이름과 성을 처리할 수 있습니다.
이메일 주소.
Worldcoin 프로젝트에 대한 최신 소식을 받아보기 위해 메일링 리스트 가입을 위해 이메일을 제공할 수 있습니다. 데이터 주체 요청을 제출할 때 이메일이 필요할 수 있습니다. 당사는 사용자와 비즈니스 관계를 유지하고 관리하는 등 정당한 이익을 추구하기 위해 사용자의 이메일 주소를 처리할 수 있습니다.
전화번호.
당사는 사용자와 비즈니스 관계를 유지하고 관리하는 등 정당한 이익을 추구하기 위해 사용자의 전화번호를 처리할 수 있습니다.
기업 데이터
. 당사와 비즈니스 관계를 맺고 있는 경우(예: Orb 오퍼레이터 또는 공급업체인 경우), 비즈니스 관계를 발전시키고 고객 확인 의무를 이행하기 위해 이름, 우편 주소, 이메일, 전화번호, 가상화폐지갑 주소 및 기타 문서(예: 정부 ID)와 같은 정보를 요구할 수 있습니다. 당사는 위의 정보 및 문서를 수집 및 검토하고 고객 확인 의무를 이행하기 위해 Onfido와 같은 제3자 서비스를 이용할 수 있습니다.
지원 데이터
. 당사에 입사하려면 자기소개서와 이력서, 공개하고자 하는 개인정보가 포함된 지원서를 제출해야 합니다.
위의 각 데이터 처리 활동에 대한 법적 근거는 본 개인정보 처리방침 마지막에 있는
부록 I – Tools for Humanity 데이터 처리 활동에 대한 법적 근거에서
확인할 수 있습니다.
5.2 당사가 제3자 출처로부터 수집하는 데이터
당사는 때때로 다음과 같은 제3자 출처로부터 개인정보를 얻을 수 있습니다.
블록체인 데이터
. 당사는 서비스를 이용하는 당사자가 사용자 이용 약관에 따라 불법적이거나 금지된 활동에 관여하지 않도록 하고 연구 및 개발 목적으로 거래 동향을 분석하기 위해 퍼블릭 블록체인 데이터를 분석할 수 있습니다.
신원 인증 서비스
. 당사는 법률에 명시된 경우(예: 관련 고객 확인 요건) 신원을 확인하기 위해 개인 데이터를 사용하여 제3자 서비스로부터 정보를 얻을 수 있습니다. 좀 더 구체적으로 설명하면 당사는 법에서 요구하는 신원 확인 시 사용자의 생체 데이터를 사용하지
않습니다.
인재 데이터베이스
. 당사는 다양한 출처에서 데이터를 수집하여 유능한 인재에게 채용 제안을 할 수 있습니다.
5.3 당사가 자동으로 수집하는 데이터
관련 법률에 따라 허용되는 경우, 당사는 서비스와 상호 작용할 때 특정 유형의 데이터를 자동으로 수집할 수 있습니다. 이 정보는 고객 지원 문제를 해결하고, 서비스 성능을 개선하며, 효율적이고 맞춤화된 사용 환경을 제공하고, 계정 자격 증명을 보호하는 데 도움이 됩니다. 자동으로 수집되는 정보는 다음과 같습니다.
온라인 식별자:
지리적 위치 및 추적 정보(위 참조), 컴퓨터 또는 휴대폰 운영 체제, 웹 브라우저 이름 및 버전, IP 주소. 매우 드물지만, 이 데이터는 사기 및 불법 금융 흐름을 탐지하는 데에도 사용됩니다. 또한 안정적이고 사기 없는 소프트웨어 경험을 제공하는 역할도 합니다.
사용 데이터:
인증 데이터, 보안 질문 및 쿠키와 유사한 기술을 통해 수집된 기타 데이터
쿠키
: 당사의 서비스와 사용 경험을 개선하고 서비스 중 인기 있는 영역과 기능을 파악하고, 방문 횟수를 집계하는 데 도움이 되는 하드 드라이브 또는 기기 내 메모리에 저장된 작은 데이터 파일. 이러한 데이터 처리에 대한 법적 근거는 당사가 사용하는 다양한 유형의 쿠키가 설명되어 있는
쿠키 정책
을
참조하십시오.
마찬가지로 앱은 문제 해결 및 개선을 위한 정보를 수집합니다. 당사는 최종 사용자 사용 및 상호 작용에 대한 집계된 정보를 확인하기 위해 Segment.io 또는 PostHog와 같은 제3자 서비스를 이용합니다. 가능한 경우, 당사는 제3자에게 전송되는 정보를 최소화하거나 마스킹하는 조치(예: 데이터 인코딩)를 취합니다.
5.4 익명화 및 집계된 데이터
익명화된 데이터는 더 이상 특정 개인과 연관시킬 수 없으므로 익명화는 개인 데이터의 자격을 박탈하는 데이터 처리 기법이며, 구체적인 예는 다음과 같습니다.
거래 데이터
클릭 스트림 데이터
성과 지표
사기 지표(개인 데이터도 이러한 목적으로 사용됨)
또한 대량의 정보를 결합하여 개인을 더 이상 식별하거나 참조할 수 없도록 데이터를 집계합니다. 당사는 사용자 요구 및 행동을 파악하고, 서비스를 개선하고, 비즈니스 인텔리전스 및 마케팅을 수행하고, 보안 위협을 탐지하고, 알고리즘을 학습시키는 등 비즈니스 목적으로 익명화되거나 집계된 데이터를 사용합니다.
위에 언급된 데이터를 처리하는 법적 근거는 앱 또는 웹사이트의 정상적인 작동, 비즈니스 인사이트 및 사기 방지 등의 정당한 이익입니다.
6. 수집하는 개인 데이터를 이용하는 방법
6.1 일반 설명
당사는 개인정보를 이용하려면 정당한 사유(또는 “처리에 대한 법적 근거”)가 있어야 합니다. 경우에 따라 사전 동의 없이 개인정보를 이용할 수 있으며, 당사는 다음과 같은 목적으로 개인 데이터를 사용합니다.
사용자 이용 약관에 따라 제품 및 서비스를 제공하고 유지하기 위한 목적으로 사용하며, 이러한 서비스에는 다음이 포함됩니다.
사용자가 World ID 및 디지털 토큰을 관리하고 일반적인 암호화폐와 특정 Worldcoin 프로젝트에 대해 알아볼 수 있는 앱
Orb 오퍼레이터가 관리 중인 Orb 및 통계를 관리하고 감독할 수 있는 오퍼레이터 앱
당사가 사용자와 에이전트를 연결하는 P2P 마켓플레이스(독일에 설립 또는 거주하거나 독일에 주소 또는 등록 사무소를 둔 사용자에게는 적용되지 않음)
당사 서비스의 오류 디버깅 및 수리를 포함하여 당사 제품 및 서비스를 개선하고 개발
데이터 과학 연구 수행
더 나은 지원을 제공하기 위해 서비스 이용 현황 분석
블록체인에 정보를 게시하여 고유성 증명
가상화폐지갑 주소를 사용하여 당사가 지원하는 디지털 토큰 전송
자금 세탁 방지법 및 제재와 같은 관련 법률을 준수하기 위한 목적으로 사용하며, 여기에는 다음이 수반됩니다.
사용자의 IP 주소를 사용하여 해당 국가에서 서비스 접근을 허용하지 않는 개인을 차단합니다.
접근 또는 삭제 요청과 같은 해당 데이터 보호법에 따른 데이터 주체의 요청에 응답합니다.
블랙리스트에 오른 가상화폐지갑 등 잠재적으로 불법적인 금융 흐름을 모니터링합니다.
불법 콘텐츠에 대한 규정 등 관련 법률 준수
고객 서비스 요청, 불만 및 문의 처리
분쟁 해결, 문제 해결, 본 개인정보 처리방침 및 사용자 이용 약관을 포함한 사용자와의 계약 이행
서비스 업데이트와 관련하여 사용자에게 연락
6.2 자격 증명
TFH를 통해 특정 자격 증명을 기기에 로컬로 저장하여 World ID 프로토콜(“자격 증명”)의 제로 지식 인프라에서 공유할 수 있습니다. 자격 증명과 관련하여 당사는 다음과 같은 방식으로 이 데이터를 처리합니다.
자격 증명의 유효성을 확인합니다(여권의 경우 해당 국가의 루트 인증서를 통해 확인).
자격 증명의 올바른 소유자인지 인증합니다(여권의 경우, 얼굴 사진(셀카)을 통해 기기에서 로컬로 처리되며, 이 사진은 저장되지 않습니다).
자격 증명 데이터를 암호화하고 서명하여 사용자 기기의 안전한 환경에 저장합니다.
당사는 자격 증명에 포함된 개인정보에 접근할 수 없습니다.
이후 World ID 프로토콜의 보호를 통해 이 정보를 신뢰하는 당사자와 선택적으로 공유할 수 있습니다(예: 정확한 나이나 누구인지 공개하지 않고도 18세 이상임을 증명할 수 있습니다).
여권의 경우, TFH는 각 여권을 한 번만 확인할 수 있도록 여권의 고유한 암호화 서명에 해당하는 해시 값의 익명화된 조각만 유지합니다.
이러한 처리는 사용자의 동의를 근거로 하며 당사는 사용자의 기기에 저장된 여권에서 개인 데이터를 확인할 수 없습니다. World App을 삭제하여 휴대폰에서 이 데이터를 삭제할 수 있습니다.
6.3 World ID 데이터
World ID(즉, 이를 사용하는 데 필요한 비밀번호)는 사용자의 기기에만 저장됩니다(백업이 있는 경우 백업에 암호화된 사본이 있음). TFH 또는 다른 누구도 사용자의 World ID에 접근할 수 없으며, World ID는 익명으로 사용할 수 있습니다. 새 애플리케이션에서 World ID를 사용할 때마다 애플리케이션은 World ID가 표시되지 않는 일회용 번호(“널리파이어”)만 받습니다. 이는 영지식 증명(인증된 World ID가 있다는 사실만 증명할 뿐 어떤 아이디인지 증명하지 않음)을 통해 활성화되며, World ID로 모든 애플리케이션에서 사용자를 추적할 수 없습니다. 즉, World ID는 인터넷의 일반적인 사용자 ID가 아닙니다.
World ID 증명은 검증된 World ID 해시의 공개 머클 트리에 액세스하는 개방형 프로토콜을 통해 작동합니다. World ID는 중앙 집중식 서비스가 아니지만 누구나 액세스할 수 있는 프로토콜입니다. 당사는 머클 트리 및 World ID 증명에 쉽게 액세스할 수 있도록 API를 제공하지만, 이와 관련하여 어떠한 개인 데이터도 수신하지 않습니다.
또한 당사는 사용자의 신원을 확인할 수 있는 World ID와 관련된 어떠한 데이터도 처리하지 않습니다. World App에서 처리되는 모든 개인 데이터, 특히 가상화폐지갑 주소와 거래 데이터는 의도적으로 World ID 데이터와 분리되도록 설계되었습니다.
7. 개인 데이터를 처리하는 장소
7.1 데이터 이전.
당사에 개인 데이터를 제공할 때, 해당 데이터는 원래 수집된 장소가 아닌 다른 곳에 이전, 저장 또는 처리될 수 있습니다. 데이터가 이전, 저장 또는 처리되는 국가는 처음에 데이터를 제공한 국가와 동일한 데이터 보호법을 시행하지 않을 수 있습니다.
당사는 개인정보 보호법과 관련하여 각 관할권에 명시된 원칙을 준수하기 위해 최선을 다하고 있습니다. 당사는 데이터 이전이 합법적이고 데이터 프로세서가 관련 법률에 명시된 바에 따라, 나아가 당사의 표준에 따라 사용자의 데이터를 보호할 것이라고 확신하는 경우에만 사용자의 관할권 외부에 있는 데이터 프로세서와 데이터를 공유합니다.
7.2 이전 위험
다음은 당사가 개인 데이터를 미국, 유럽연합 또는 다른 국가로 이전할 때 발생할 수 있는 위험의 목록입니다. 각 위험을 완화하는 방법도 요약되어 있습니다.
당사는 협력업체가 개인 데이터를 적절히 보호할 계약상 의무를 이행하도록 최선을 다하고 있지만, 사용자 거주 국가의 데이터 개인정보 보호법의 적용을 받지 않을 수 있습니다. 협력업체가 승인 없이 사용자의 데이터를 불법적으로 처리하더라도 해당 업체를 상대로 개인정보 보호 권리를 주장하기 어려울 수 있습니다. 당사는 협력업체와 엄격한 데이터 처리 계약을 체결하여 GDPR 수준에서 데이터를 보호하고 데이터 주체의 요청 이행을 의무화하여 이러한 위험을 완화하고 있습니다.
거주 국가의 데이터 개인정보 보호법이 미국 또는 EU의 데이터 개인정보 보호법과 다를 수 있습니다. 당사는 항상 적용되는 가장 엄격한 데이터 보호 표준을 준수하기 위해 노력합니다.
개인 데이터를 정부 공무원과 당국에서 확인할 수도 있습니다. 이러한 경우 당사는 무효이거나 과도하거나 불법적인 정부의 접근 요청에 대해 법원에 이의를 제기할 것을 약속합니다. 또한 고급 암호화를 사용하여 무단 접근을 차단합니다.
이 목록에는 예시가 들어 있으나, 가능한 모든 위험이 포함되어 있지 않습니다.
7.3 미국 데이터 이전에 관한 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크
TFH는 미국 상무부가 규정한 유럽연합-미국 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크(EU-미국 DPF), EU-미국 DPF의 영국 확장판 및 스위스-미국 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크(스위스-미국 DPF)를 준수합니다. TFH는 EU-미국 DPF에 의거하여 유럽연합으로부터 받은 개인 데이터와 EU-미국 DPF 영국 확장판에 의거하여 영국(및 지브롤터)으로부터 받은 개인 데이터 처리와 관련하여 EU-미국 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크 원칙(EU-미국 DPF 원칙)을 준수함을 미국 상무부에 인증했습니다. TFH는 스위스-미국 DPF에 의거하여 스위스로부터 받은 개인 데이터 처리와 관련하여 스위스-미국 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크 원칙(스위스-미국 DPF 원칙)을 준수함을 미국 상무부에 인증했습니다. 본 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크 고지와 EU-미국 DPF 원칙 및/또는 스위스-미국 DPF 원칙이 상충하는 경우 해당 원칙이 우선합니다. 데이터 개인정보 보호 프레임워크(DPF) 프로그램 정보와 당사의 인증에 관한 자세한 내용은
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
에서 확인할 수 있습니다.
TFH는 DPF에 따라 수신한 개인 데이터의 처리에 대한 책임이 있으며, 이후 이를 대리하는 제3자에게 이전합니다. TFH는 향후 이전에 따른 책임 조항을 포함하여 EU, 영국 및 스위스로부터 받은 모든 개인 데이터 이전 시 DPF 원칙을 준수합니다.
연방거래위원회는 TFH의 EU-미국 DPF, EU-미국 DPF의 영국 확장판, 스위스-미국 DPF 준수에 대한 관할권을 가지고 있습니다. 특정 상황에서 TFH는 국가 안보 또는 법 집행 요건을 충족하는 등 공공 기관의 합법적인 요청에 따라 개인 데이터를 공개해야 할 수 있습니다.
EU-미국 DPF 및 EU-미국 DPF의 영국 확장판, 스위스-미국 DPF에 따라 TFH는 당사의 개인정보 수집 및 사용 시 적용되는 DPF 원칙 관련 불만 사항을 해결합니다. EU-미국 DPF 및 EU-미국 DPF의 영국 확장판, 스위스-미국 DPF에 따라 수신한 개인 데이터의 처리와 관련하여 문의 또는 불만이 있는 경우 먼저 TFH(dpo@worldcoin.org)로 문의하시기 바랍니다.
EU-미국 DPF 및 EU-미국 DPF의 영국 확장판, 스위스-미국 DPF을 준수하여 TFH는 EU-미국 DPF 및 EU-미국 DPF의 영국 확장판, 스위스-미국 DPF에 따라 수신한 개인 데이터의 처리와 관련하여 해결되지 않은 불만 사항은 EU 데이터 보호 당국(DPA) 및 영국 정보위원회(ICO), 지브롤터 규제 당국(GRA) 및 스위스 연방 데이터 보호 및 정보위원회(FDPIC)에서 구성한 패널의 조언에 따르고 협조할 것을 약속합니다.
다른 DPF 메커니즘으로 해결되지 않는 DPF 준수 관련 불만 사항의 경우 특정 조건에 따라 구속력 있는 중재를 요청할 수 있습니다. 자세한 정보는 공식 DPF 웹사이트를 참조하십시오.
8. 개인 데이터를 공유하는 시점
당사는 절대 개인 데이터를 판매하지 않습니다
.
당사가 개인 데이터를 조직 외부로 공유할 때, 항상 다음을 준수합니다.
합리적이고 안전한 방법으로 공유합니다.
개인정보 보호에 대한 당사의 약속에 부합하는 방식으로 처리되도록 조치를 취합니다.
다른 회사가 자체 목적으로 사용하는 것을 금지합니다.
당사는 다음과 같이 제한적으로 개인 데이터를 공유합니다.
Worldcoin Foundation:
당사는 Worldcoin을 대신하여 개인 데이터를 수집하는 Worldcoin Foundation 처리자 역할을 할 수 있습니다(자세한 내용은 Worldcoin의 개인정보 처리방침을 확인하십시오).
조직 내:
당사는 업무를 수행하기 위해 접근이 필요한 팀원에게만 데이터를 공개하며, 특정 업무를 수행하는 데 필요한 데이터만 공개하고 엄격한 접근 통제 시스템을 갖추고 있습니다.
조직 외부의 벤더 및 서비스 제공업체:
당사는 데이터를 처리하고 사용자에게 서비스를 제공하기 위해 이용하는 서비스 제공업체에만 데이터를 공개합니다. 당사는 법률에 명시된 경우(고객 확인 요건)에만 신원 확인 벤더에게 데이터를 공개합니다.
해당하는 서비스 제공업체 범주는 다음과 같습니다.
클라우드 서비스 제공업체(모든 데이터 유형)
SaaS 제공업체. 당사는 다음 범주에 해당하는 SaaS 제품을 사용합니다.
데이터베이스 및 인프라 관리
데이터 보안
채용
커뮤니케이션
설문조사
KYC/KYB, 즉 공식 문서 확인
데이터 주체 요청 관리
기술 지원
사용자 지원
외부 전문가
전문 소프트웨어 개발자
법률 전문가
세무 자문가
은행
라벨링 서비스 제공업체(특별 보호 조치가 적용되는 경우에만)
지원자 및 Orb 오퍼레이터에 대한 신원 조회 서비스
법 집행 기관, 공무원 또는 기타 제3자:
당사는 관련 법률을 준수하고 의무적인 법적 요구에 대응하기 위해 개인 데이터를 공개할 수 있습니다. 당사는 각 요청을 신중하게 검토하여 해당 요청이 법률을 준수하는지 여부를 결정하며, 적절한 경우 무효이거나 과도하거나 불법적인 요청에 대해 이의를 제기할 수 있습니다. 당사는 법률, 규정 또는 기타 법적 절차나 의무를 준수하기 위해 필요하다고 합리적으로 판단되는 경우 경찰 및 기타 정부 당국과 개인 데이터를 공유할 수 있습니다.
사용자의 행위가 사용자 이용 약관을 위반하거나 사용자가 법을 위반했다고 판단되는 경우 또는 당사의 권리, 재산, 안전, 다른 사용자, 일반 대중 또는 기타 관계자를 보호하는 데 필요하다고 판단되는 경우 개인정보를 공유할 수 있습니다.
자문을 구하거나 기타 당사의 사업적 이익을 보호 및 관리하기 위해 필요한 경우 변호사 및 기타 전문 고문과 공유할 수 있습니다.
합병, 회사 자산 매각, 자금 조달 또는 다른 회사에서 당사 사업의 전부 또는 일부를 인수하는 경우 이와 관련하여 또는 협상 과정에서 개인정보를 공유할 수 있습니다.
개인정보를 포함한 데이터는 당사의 현재 및 미래의 모회사, 계열사, 자회사, 공동 경영권 및 소유권을 보유한 다른 회사와 공유할 수 있습니다.
당사는 사용자의 동의 또는 지시에 따라 개인정보를 공유할 수 있습니다.
9. 퍼블릭 블록체인에 개인 데이터가 기록되는 방식
사용자의 서비스 이용과 관련된 거래 정보는 퍼블릭 블록체인에 기록될 수 있습니다.
참고:
블록체인은 Worldcoin이 통제하거나 운영하지 않는 제3자가 운영하는 분산형 네트워크에서 유지되는 거래의 공개 장부입니다. 블록체인 원장의 공개적이고 변경 불가능한 특성으로 인해 당사는 블록체인에 업로드 및 저장된 데이터를 수정하거나 삭제 또는 공개를 통제할 수 있다고 보장할 수 없습니다.
10. 쿠키 사용 방법
당사는 서비스가 더 효율적으로 작동하도록 쿠키를 사용합니다. 쿠키 외에도 웹 비콘과 같은 기타 유사한 기술을 사용하여 서비스 이용자를 추적할 수 있습니다. 웹 비콘('클리어 GIF'라고도 함)은 쿠키와 유사한 기능을 하는 고유 식별자를 가진 작은 그래픽입니다. 본 방침에 명시된
쿠키 정책
을 참조하십시오.
또한 Google 애널리틱스를 사용합니다. Google이 파트너 웹사이트 및 애플리케이션을 사용할 때 데이터를 사용하는 방법에 대한 자세한 내용은
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
를 참조하십시오. 서비스를 이용함으로써 당사가 사용자의 컴퓨터 또는 모바일 기기에 쿠키 및 기타 데이터를 저장 및 액세스하고 그러한 활동과 관련하여 Google 애널리틱스를 사용하는 데 동의하는 것으로 간주됩니다. 동의한 구체적인 내용을 숙지할 수 있도록 제공된 링크의 정보를 읽어 보십시오.
11. 개인 데이터를 보관하는 기간
관련 법률에서 달리 규정하지 않는 한, 당사는 서비스를 제공하고 당사의 합법적인 사업 목적을 달성하며 당사의 법적 및 규제 의무를 준수하는 데 합리적으로 필요한 기간 동안 개인 데이터를 보관합니다. 계정을 해지하는 경우 1개월 이내에 계정 데이터를 삭제합니다. 그 외에는 2년 동안 활동이 없으면 계정 데이터를 삭제합니다. 법률에 명시된 경우 당사는 사기 모니터링, 탐지 및 예방, 세금, 회계 및 재무 보고 의무를 포함한 법적 및 규제 의무를 준수하기 위해 필요한 경우 개인 데이터를 계속 보관합니다.
참고:
블록체인은 당사가 통제하거나 운영하지 않는 분산형 제3자 네트워크입니다. 블록체인 기술의 공개적 및 변경 불가능한 특성으로 인해 블록체인에 저장된 데이터를 수정하거나 삭제 또는 공개를 통제할 수 없습니다.
12. 어린이와 청소년을 위한 본 개인정보 처리방침의 차이점
만 18세 미만은 서비스를 이용할 수 없으며, 당사는 만 18세 미만으로부터 고의로 데이터를 수집하지 않습니다. 만 18세 미만 자녀가 허락 없이 서비스에 접속했다고 생각되면 당사의
요청 포털
을 통해 당사에 연락하여 자녀의 데이터 삭제를 요청하시기 바랍니다.
당사가 만 18세 미만 아동에 대한 데이터를 수집한 사실을 알게 되면 최대한 신속하게 해당 데이터를 삭제합니다. 당사는 자동 연령 감지 AI 모델 구현, 오퍼레이터 지침 및 본인 확인 등의 조치를 통해 만 18세 이상 사용자로 서비스 이용을 제한하고 있습니다. 당사는 어린이를 대상으로 제품이나 서비스를 마케팅하지 않습니다.
13. 본 개인정보 처리방침과 관련하여 연락하는 방법
설정 메뉴의 앱에서 데이터를 삭제할 수 있습니다. 본 개인정보 처리방침과 관련하여 질문이나 우려 사항이 있거나, 데이터 주체로서 권리를 행사하거나 당사의 데이터 보호 책임자(DPO)에게 문의하려면 당사의
요청 포털
을 통해 요청을 제출하거나 우편(Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA) 또는
이메일(
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
)로 보내주시기 바랍니다. 당사는 관련 데이터 보호법에 따라 데이터 보호 권리를 행사하고자 하는 개인으로부터 받는 모든 요청에 응답합니다. 사용자가 직접 World App 내에서 데이터를 삭제할 수도 있습니다.
당사가 만족스럽게 해결하지 못한 개인정보 보호 또는 데이터 사용 관련 문제가 있는 경우, 관할 지역의 데이터 보호 규제 기관에 문의하시기 바랍니다. EU에 거주하는 경우,
여기
에서 데이터 보호 규제 기관을 찾을 수 있습니다.
14. 데이터 주체의 권리
이러한 권리는 당사의 데이터베이스에서 요청자를 확인할 수 있으며, 요청자가 권리를 행사함으로써 다른 데이터 주체의 권리를 침해하지 않는 경우에 적용됩니다.
언제든지 당사가 처리하는 개인 데이터에 대한 정보를 요청할 권리가 있습니다. 당사로부터 개인 데이터 사본을 받을 권리가 있습니다.
개인 데이터가 부정확한 경우 즉시 이를 정정하도록 요청할 권리가 있습니다.
당사에 개인 데이터 삭제를 요청할 권리가 있습니다. 단, 특히 관련 법률에 삭제 요건이 명시된 경우(예: 여러 관할권의 법률에 따라 당사는 일정 기간 동안 의무적으로 거래 정보를 보관해야 함)에 한하여 개인 데이터가 수집 또는 달리 처리된 목적에 더 이상 필요하지 않은 경우에 삭제를 요청할 수 있는 권리가 부여됩니다.
동의에 근거한 데이터 처리에 대한 동의를 자유롭게 철회하거나 동의에 근거하지 않은 경우 데이터 처리에 이의를 제기할 권리가 있습니다.
15. 부록
아래 부록은 당사가 사업을 운영하는 각 시장에서 법률상 요구되는 정보입니다. 이 정보는 데이터 주체가 거주하는 지역에 따라 동의의 일부를 구성하며 특정 관할권에서 특정 서비스를 차단하기 때문에 이 정보는 사용자의 위치 정보와 다를 수 있습니다. 위 내용과 일치하지 않는 경우 특정 관할권에 대한 설명이 우선합니다.
부록 A: 유럽경제지역(“EEA”) 및 영국(“영국”)
EEA 또는 영국에 거주하는 경우 다음 항목이 적용됩니다. 사용자는 최소한 다음 권리를 가지며, 또한 아래 설명된 대로 일반 데이터 보호 규칙(“GDPR”), 즉 2016년 4월 27일자 EU 규정 2016/679에 따라 추가적인 권리를 가질 수 있습니다. GDPR에 따른 권리를 행사하려면
요청 포털
을 통해 당사에 문의하십시오. 예외적인 경우를 제외하고는 법정 기한인 1개월 이내에 요청을 해결합니다. 아래 언급된 GDPR에는 2018년 영국 데이터 보호법에 따라 영국 국내법으로 전환되고, 2018년 유럽연합(탈퇴)법
제3조
및 2019년 데이터 보호, 개인정보 보호 및 전자통신(수정 등)(EU 탈퇴) 규정(SI 2019/419)
제
1
부에
의해 수정되어, 잉글랜드 및 웨일즈, 스코틀랜드 및 북아일랜드 법률의 일부로 유지되는 영국-GDPR도 포함됩니다.
A.1 GDPR에 따른 법적 권리
이 조항은 데이터 처리가 GDPR의 적용 범위에 해당하는 경우(
예:
EEA 또는 영국에 거주하는 경우) 적용됩니다. 아래 설명된 GDPR에 따른 추가 권리를 가질 수 있습니다. GDPR에 따른 권리를 행사하려면
요청 포털
을 통해 당사에 문의하십시오.
GDPR 제15조의 범위 내에서 당사가 처리하는 개인 데이터에 대한 정보를 언제든지 요청할 권리가 있습니다.
개인 데이터가 부정확한 경우 즉시 이를 정정하도록 요청할 권리가 있습니다.
GDPR 제17조에 명시된 조건에 따라 당사에 개인 데이터 삭제를 요청할 권리가 있습니다. 단, 개인 데이터가 수집 또는 달리 처리된 목적에 더 이상 필요하지 않은 경우, 불법적으로 처리된 경우, 유럽 연합 법률 또는 당사에 적용되는 회원국 법률에 따라 삭제할 의무가 있는 경우 삭제를 요청할 수 있는 권리가 부여됩니다.
GDPR 제18조에 따라 처리를 제한하도록 당사에 요구할 권리가 있습니다.
GDPR 제20조에 따라 당사에 제공한 개인 데이터를 구조화되고 일반적으로 사용되는 기계 판독 가능한 형식으로 제공받을 권리가 있습니다.
GDPR 제21조에 따라, 특히 GDPR 제6조(1)항 (1)(f)호에 근거하여 수행되는 개인 데이터 처리에 대해 특정 상황과 관련된 이유로 언제든지 이의를 제기할 권리가 있습니다.
컨트롤러가 수행하는 데이터 처리에 대한 불만이 있는 경우 관할 감독 기관에 연락할 권리가 있습니다. 담당 감독 당국은 바이에른주 데이터 보호 감독청(Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz)입니다.
개인 데이터 처리가 동의에 근거하는 경우, GDPR 제7조에 따라 언제든지 개인 데이터 사용에 대한 동의를 철회할 수 있습니다. 철회는 향후에 적용되며, 철회 절차는 동의와 동일하게 간단합니다. 철회는 향후에 효력이 발생합니다. 철회 전에 발생한 처리에는 영향을 미치지 않습니다.
A.2 데이터 이전
적정성 결정이 없는 국가로 데이터를 이전할 때, 당사는 EU 표준 계약 조항을 활용하며, 현재는 미국으로만 개인 데이터를 이전하고 있습니다.
개인 데이터 처리가 동의에 근거하는 경우, GDPR 제7조에 따라 언제든지 개인 데이터 사용에 대한 동의를 철회할 수 있습니다. 철회는 향후에 적용되며, 철회 절차는 동의와 동일하게 간단합니다. 철회는 향후에 효력이 발생합니다. 철회 전에 발생한 처리에는 영향을 미치지 않습니다. 또한 동의에 근거하지 않은 처리는 동의를 철회해도 영향을 받지 않습니다.
부록 B: 일본
일본에 거주하는 경우 다음 사항이 추가로 적용됩니다.
B1. 일본 규정에 관한 정보
당사는 일본 개인정보 보호법(“APPI”)을 포함한 일본 법률 및 규정을 준수합니다. 이 조항은 생체인식 데이터 동의서의 다른 부분보다 우선하며, APPI에 정의된 “개인정보” 취급에 적용됩니다.
당사는 일본 개인정보 보호법(“APPI”)을 포함한 일본 법률 및 규정을 준수합니다. 이 조항은 본 개인정보 처리방침의 다른 부분보다 우선하며, APPI에 정의된 “개인정보” 취급에 적용됩니다.
B2. 데이터 공유
관련 법률에서 달리 허용하는 경우를 제외하고 당사는 제3자에게 개인정보를 공개, 판매, 제공, 공유 또는 이전하지 않습니다.
B3. 보안 통제 조치
개인정보 취급에 관한 규칙을 정하고, 이에 대한 정기적인 모니터링, 직원 정기 교육, 개인정보 취급 시 사용되는 장비의 도난 또는 분실 방지, 접근 통제를 시행하는 등 취급하는 개인정보의 유출 또는 분실 또는 손상을 방지하고, 보안을 유지하기 위해 필요하고 적절한 조치를 취하고 있습니다. 또한 당사는 개인정보를 취급하는 계약업체와 직원을 적절히 감독합니다. 개인정보 취급과 관련하여 시행 중인 보안 통제 조치에 대한 자세한 내용은 당사의
요청 포털
을 통해 당사에 연락하시기 바랍니다.
B4. 외국에서 개인정보 처리에 대한 참고 정보
사용자의 개인정보는 EU와 미국에서 처리됩니다.
B5. APPI에 따른 법적 권리
APPI에 따른 권리를 행사하려면
요청 포털
을 통해 당사에 문의하십시오.
부록 C: 아르헨티나
아르헨티나에 거주하는 경우, 법률 제25,326호에 따른 관리 기관의 자격으로 공공 정보 접근 기관에서 개인 데이터 보호와 관련해 시행 규칙의 위반으로 권리가 침해된 당사자가 제기한 불만 및 청구를 심리할 수 있음을 알려드립니다.
해당 기관 연락처입니다.
주소: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
우편번호: C1067ABP
전화번호: (54-11) 3988-3968
이메일: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
부록 D: 싱가포르
싱가포르 거주자는 다음 항목이 적용됩니다.
D1. 개인 데이터의 수집, 사용 및 공개
싱가포르 거주자이고 동의한 경우 당사는 당사의 개인정보 처리방침에 명시된 각각의 목적으로 개인 데이터를 수집, 사용 또는 공개합니다. 언제든지 동의를 철회할 수 있지만, 당사는 요청의 성격과 범위에 따라 서비스를 계속 제공하지 못할 수 있습니다. 또한 동의를 철회하더라도 관련 법률에서 동의 없이 개인 데이터를 수집, 사용 및 공개하는 것이 허용되거나 명시되어 있는 경우 개인 데이터를 계속 수집, 사용 및 공개할 수 있는 당사의 권리에는 영향을 미치지 않습니다.[1]
D2. 데이터 주체의 권리 행사
당사가 수집한 개인 데이터를 관리하고 당사의
요청 포털
을 통해 연락하여 권리를 행사할 수 있습니다. 당사는 가능한 한 빨리, 보통 30일 이내에 요청에 응답합니다. 당사는 30일 이내에 요청에 응답할 수 없거나 요청을 이행할 수 없는 경우 그 사유를 알려드립니다.[2]
법률이 허용하는 경우, 당사는 요청을 이행하기 위해 관리 수수료를 청구할 수 있습니다.
D3. 다른 국가로의 개인 데이터 이전
싱가포르 거주자이고 당사가 개인 데이터를 수집한 경우, 당사는 또한 때때로 해당 데이터를 싱가포르 외부로 이전할 수 있습니다. 하지만 당사는 아세안 모델 계약 조항을 사용하는 등 개인 데이터가 최소한 2012년 싱가포르 개인정보 보호법에 명시된 것과 유사한 수준의 보호를 받을 수 있도록 하고 있습니다.
부록 E – 한국
한국 데이터 주체를 위한 이 부록에서는 사용자가 한국인인 경우 당사와 관계와 관련하여 당사에서 처리하는 개인정보에 관한 관행을 설명합니다.
E.1 – 개인정보 이전
당사는 아래에 명시된 대로 개인정보를 제3자에게 제공하거나 그 처리를 위탁합니다.
- 제3자에게 개인정보 제공
수탁자 이름
수탁자의 이용 목적
수탁자에게 제공하는 개인정보 항목
수탁자의 보유 기간
Tools for Humanity GmbH
본 방침 위 6항에 설명된 목적.
본 방침 위 5항에 설명된 목적.
본 방침 위 11항에 설명된 보관 기간.
- 제3자에게 개인정보 처리 위탁:
모든 위탁 데이터 처리 및 각 회사 목록은
링크(
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
)에서 확인할 수 있습니다.
당사는 개인정보 처리를 위탁하거나 보관 목적으로 개인정보를 한국 외 지역에 위치한 제3자에게 이전할 수 있습니다.
개인정보 국외 이전을 원치 않는 경우 개인정보 이전에 동의하지 않거나 국외 이전 중단을 요청하여 거부할 수 있으나, 거부할 경우 당사 서비스를 이용하지 못할 수 있습니다. 위 개인정보 국외 이전의 법적 근거는 “정보 주체와 계약 체결 및 이행을 위해 필요한 개인정보의 처리 또는 보관 위탁”에 해당하는 사실이며, 개인정보 처리방침에 공개된 법적으로 규정된 사항(개인정보보호법 제28-8(1)항 (iii))입니다.
E.2 – 개인정보 파기
보관 기간이 만료되거나 처리 목적을 달성하여 개인정보가 더 이상 필요하지 않은 경우 즉시 파기합니다. 파기 절차 및 방법은 아래와 같습니다.
1) 파기 절차: 당사는 파기할 특정 개인정보 항목을 선택하고 DPO의 승인을 받아 파기합니다.
2) 파기 방법: 당사는 전자 파일 형태로 기록 및 저장된 개인정보는 기록을 재생할 수 없는 기술적 방법(예: 로우 레벨 포맷)을 이용하여 파기하며, 종이 문서 형태로 기록 및 저장된 개인정보는 파쇄 또는 소각합니다.
E.3 – 개인정보 보관
당사가 관련 법률에 따라 개인정보를 보관해야 하는 경우, 다음 목적으로 관련 법률에 명시된 기간 동안 정보를 보관합니다.
E.4 – 정보 주체의 권리
개인정보보호법 등 관련 법률에서 정하는 바에 따라 개인정보 열람, 정정, 삭제 또는 처리 일시 중단을 요청하는 등 당사에 개인정보와 관련된 권리를 행사할 수 있습니다. 또한 개인정보 수집/이용/제공에 대한 동의 철회권, 이동권 및 자동화된 의사 결정과 관련된 권리를 행사할 수 있습니다. 이러한 권리는 또한 법정 대리인 또는 기타 권한을 부여받은 대리인을 통해 행사할 수 있습니다.
위에 설명된 모든 권리는 worldcoin.org/requestportal로 문의하여 행사할 수 있습니다.
E.5 – 보안 조치
당사는 개인정보를 보호하기 위해 아래와 같이 국내 관련 법령에서 규정하는 기술적, 조직적, 물리적 보안 조치를 시행하고 있습니다.
1) 관리 조치: 데이터 보호 책임자 지정, 내부 관리 계획 수립 및 시행, 데이터 보호에 대한 정기적인 직원 교육 등
2) 기술적 조치: 개인정보 처리 시스템에 대한 접근 권한 관리, 접근 통제 시스템 설치, 보안 프로그램 설치 등
3) 물리적 조치: 전산실, 자료 보관실 등 개인정보 보관 시설 및 장비에 대한 출입 제한 등
E.6 – 문의하기
개인정보 및 데이터 보호와 관련된 질문이나 문의는 당사의 데이터
보호팀(
dpo@worldcoin.org
)에 연락하십시오.
부록 F – 미국
캘리포니아주 개인정보 보호 권리법으로 개정된 소비자 개인정보 보호법은 현재 당사에는 적용되지 않습니다.
부록 G - 브라질
G.1 관련 법률, 컨트롤러 및 오퍼레이터
브라질에 거주하고, 개인 데이터가 브라질에서 수집된 경우, 또는 브라질에서 서비스를 이용하는 경우, 관련 법률은 법률 번호 13,709/2018(일반 데이터 보호법(“LGPD”))입니다.
G.2 반대할 권리
동의에 근거하지 않은 목적으로 개인 데이터를 사용하는 경우 그 목적이 LGPD와 일치하지 않는 경우 이를 반대할 권리가 있습니다. 반대가 인정되는 경우 당사는 더 이상 서비스 기능 및 환경을 개발 및 개선하기 위해 개인정보를 사용하지 않습니다.
특정 개인정보를 제공하지 않거나 수집 또는 처리를 허용하지 않는 경우, 이는 이용 경험의 질에 영향을 미치거나 당사가 서비스 목적을 달성하지 못하거나 특정 서비스를 제공하지 못할 수 있습니다.
경우에 따라 개인 데이터는 익명화되어 더 이상 당사자를 식별할 수 없게 됩니다. LGPD에 규정된 대로 신원을 확인할 수 없기 때문에 익명화된 데이터의 사용에 반대할 수 없습니다. 당사는 이 익명화된 데이터를 사용하여 제품과 서비스를 개선합니다.
G.3 LGPD에 따른 법적 권리
LGPD에 따라 처리된 데이터를 확인하거나, 열람, 정정 또는 이동을 요청할 권리가 있습니다. 또한 당사가 개인 데이터를 공동으로 사용하는 공공 및 민간 기관의 정보를 요청할 수 있습니다. 또한 동의를 하지 않을 경우 발생할 수 있는 부정적인 결과에 대한 정보를 요청할 수 있으며, 동의하에 처리된 데이터의 삭제를 요청할 수 있습니다. 설정 메뉴의 World App에서 정보를 삭제할 수 있습니다.
특정 상황에서 당사가 개인 데이터를 처리하는 방법을 반대하거나 제한하거나, 사용자가 제공한 정보를 처리하는 근거인 동의를 철회할 권리가 있습니다.
아래 H.4항에 나와 있는 연락처 또는 온라인 요청 포털을 통해 당사 DPO에 요청을 제출하여 LGPD에 따른 권리를 행사할 수 있습니다. 권리가 적절하게 다루어지지 않았다고 생각되면 이 링크(
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
)에 있는 양식을 작성하여 개인정보 보호국(Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD))에 불만을 제기할 수 있습니다.
G.4 개인 데이터의 국외 이전
LGPD가 적용되고 당사에서 개인 데이터를 수집한 경우, 이를 국외로 이전할 수도 있습니다. 하지만 당사는 항상 개인 데이터가 ANPD의 적정성 결정에서 인정한 대로 LGPD에 규정된 수준의 보호를 제공하는 외국 또는 국제 기구로만 이전합니다. 적정성 결정이 없는 경우, 당사는 ANPD 규정에 명시된 표준 계약 조항을 사용하거나 사용자로부터 국외 이전을 강조하는 구체적인 동의를 얻어 LGPD에 규정된 수준과 최소 동등한 수준의 보호 기준을 따를 것입니다.
부록 I – Tools for Humanity 데이터 처리 활동에 대한 법적 근거/목적
사용자
데이터를 처리하는 이유
처리하는 개인 데이터 유형
처리에 대한 법적 근거
보관 기간
World App에서 계정을 생성하는 방법
가상화폐지갑 주소, 메타데이터, 사용자 ID
계약 이행
서비스를 이용하는 동안 또는 데이터 삭제를 요청할 때까지
적합한 연령인지 확인
생년월일
법적 의무
정확한 생년월일은 저장되지 않습니다. 당사는 만 18세인지 여부만 저장합니다. 당사는 서비스를 이용하는 동안 또는 데이터 삭제를 요청할 때까지 이 정보를 저장합니다.
연락처를 이용하여 손쉽게 소통하고 거래할 수 있도록 하기 위해(선택 사항)
전화번호
동의
서비스를 이용하는 동안 또는 데이터 삭제를 요청할 때까지
연락처를 이용하여 손쉽게 소통하고 거래할 수 있도록 하기 위해
주소록 연락처
동의
서비스를 이용하는 동안 또는 데이터 삭제를 요청할 때까지
가까운 Orbs 표시(선택 사항)
위치 정보
동의
최대 24개월
계좌 사기를 방지하기 위해
메타데이터, IP 주소, 기기 ID
정당한 이익, 즉 특정 유형의 사기를 방지하기 위해(유형 목록)
최대 24개월
거주 국가에서 서비스를 제공하기 위해
IP 주소, 위치 정보
법적 의무
최대 24개월
자가 수탁형 가상화폐지갑을 표시하고 가상화폐지갑 거래를 위한 인터페이스 제공
가상화폐지갑 주소, 거래 데이터
계약 이행
이 경우 개인 데이터는 저장되지 않습니다.
자체 보관 World ID를 표시하고 인증을 위한 인터페이스 제공
World ID 정보
계약 이행
이 경우 개인 데이터는 저장되지 않습니다.
자체 보관 자격 증명을 표시하고 자격 증명을 공유하기 위한 인터페이스 제공
자격 증명 정보, 자격 증명 유효성 정보
계약 이행
이 경우 개인 데이터는 저장되지 않습니다.
당사의 서비스를 분석 및 개선하고 데이터 과학 연구 수행
사용 데이터 및 메타데이터, 공개 거래 데이터
동의
최대 24개월
자금 세탁 방지법 및 제재와 같은 관련 법률 준수
거래 데이터, 가상화폐지갑 주소
법적 의무
서비스를 이용하는 기간 동안
불법 콘텐츠과 같은 관련 법률 준수
MiniApp 콘텐츠
법적 의무
서비스를 이용하는 기간 동안
소통 및 마케팅 목적
이메일 주소, 푸시 알림
정당한 이익
최대 24개월
사용자의 서신
정당한 이익
최대 24개월
사용자의 피드백
정당한 이익
최대 24개월
고객 서비스 요청, 불만 및 문의 처리
해당 수단을 통해 당사와 소통하고자 하는 경우, 통신 정보 및 이메일 또는 소셜 미디어 프로필 이름
계약 이행
원활한 앱 실행
메타데이터
계약 이행
최대 24개월
기기 인증
기기 World ID 데이터(기기 지문)
계약 이행
서비스를 이용하는 기간 동안
분쟁 해결, 문제 해결, 본 개인정보 처리방침 및 사용자 이용 약관을 포함한 사용자와의 계약 이행
서비스를 이용하는 기간 동안
사업 파트너
데이터를 처리하는 이유
처리하는 개인 데이터 유형
처리에 대한 법적 근거
보관 기간
커뮤니케이션
전화번호, 이메일 주소, 이름
정당한 이익, 즉 사업 파트너와의 소통
사업 관계를 유지하는 동안 또는 데이터 삭제를 요청할 때까지
사업 관계 유지 및 관리
전화번호, 이메일 주소, 이름, 기업 데이터
정당한 이익, 즉 사업 파트너와의 사업 관계 유지 및 관리
사업 관계를 유지하는 동안 또는 데이터 삭제를 요청할 때까지
KYC 의무 이행
여권 데이터, 기업 데이터
법적 의무
사업 관계를 유지하는 동안 및 관계 종료 후 최대 3년
신청 처리
지원 데이터
계약 체결 전 데이터 주체의 요청에 따른 동의 및 절차
기본적으로 최대 3개월 또는 인재 풀에 등록하는 데 동의한 경우 그 이상
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Notis Privasi Tools for Humanity
Terima kasih kerana memilih untuk menjadi sebahagian daripada Komuniti Worldcoin! Worldcoin ialah protokol sumber terbuka, disokong oleh komuniti global pembangun, individu dan penyumbang lain.
Notis Privasi ini meliputi data yang anda berikan kepada kami melalui penggunaan laman web, aplikasi (“Aplikasi”) kami, dan perkhidmatan lain yang dikaitkan dengan Notis Privasi ini (secara kolektif, “Perkhidmatan”). Notis Privasi ini digabungkan ke dalam dan ditadbir urus oleh
Terma dan Syarat Pengguna
(“Terma Pengguna”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), bersama anak syarikat Jerman Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; bersama-sama, “
TFH
” atau “
kami
, ”“
kita
”), sedang menyumbang kepada perkembangan dan pertumbuhan protokol Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”) tetapi berbeza daripada Worldcoin Foundation yang mengawal pemprosesan data berkaitan Orb.
1. Pengawal
Kami ialah pengawal data semua “Data World App”, “Data Pengesahan Bukti Kelayakan” dan “Data Perniagaan” yang lain: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH ditubuhkan di Kesatuan Eropah (“
EU
”) melalui Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Data World App” bermaksud semua data peribadi yang dikumpul dan diproses melalui penggunaan World App anda, seperti yang ditakrifkan selanjutnya dalam Seksyen 5 di bawah, kecuali sebarang data peribadi yang berkaitan dengan penggunaan protokol Worldcoin atau token Worldcoin anda (seperti alamat dompet anda dan data transaksi, yang tidak dikawal oleh kami).
Data Pengesahan Bukti Kelayakan merujuk kepada data yang diproses semasa mengesahkan bukti kelayakan untuk menambahkannya pada World ID milik sendiri anda. Ini bermakna, sebagai contoh membaca cip NFC pasport anda untuk menyimpan maklumat pasport anda dengan selamat. Data ini berada di bawah kawalan anda dan selepas mengesahkan kesahihan bukti kelayakan anda, TFH menyimpan sebahagian kecil nilai cincangan tanpa nama tandatangan kriptografi unik kelayakan anda (contohnya, pasport) bagi memastikan setiap bukti kelayakan hanya boleh ditambah kepada satu World ID sahaja.
“Data perniagaan” merujuk kepada semua maklumat peribadi yang dikumpul dan diproses melalui pelbagai cara oleh syarikat kami semasa berkomunikasi atau berinteraksi dengan kami melalui e-mel, persidangan video atau laman web kami. Untuk pemprosesan data dalam konteks Aplikasi Orb, sila rujuk Notis Privasi Aplikasi Orb yang dipautkan dalam Aplikasi Orb. Untuk pemprosesan data dalam konteks pengumpulan dan ujian data khusus, sila rujuk Notis Privasi Pengumpulan dan Pengujian masing-masing yang dipautkan dalam aplikasi ujian anda. Untuk pemprosesan dalam konteks laman web kami, sila rujuk Dasar Kuki kami yang dipautkan di laman web kami.
2. Kemas Kini Notis Privasi ini
Kami kadangkala mengemas kini Notis Privasi ini. Jika kami membuat perubahan besar, seperti cara kami menggunakan maklumat peribadi anda, maka kami akan memberitahu anda melalui e-mel atau mesej dalam Aplikasi anda.
3. Apakah yang terkandung dalam Notis Privasi ini?
Komitmen kami untuk melindungi privasi dan data anda
Maklumat yang dikumpul oleh kami dan sebabnya
Cara kami menggunakan data yang dikumpul oleh kami
Tempat kami memproses data anda
Bila kami berkongsi data anda
Cara data anda direkodkan pada rantaian blok awam
Cara kami menggunakan kuki
Berapa lama kami menyimpan data anda
Bagaimana Notis Privasi ini berbeza untuk kanak-kanak dan remaja
Hak undang-undang yang anda miliki
Cara untuk menghubungi kami mengenai Notis Privasi ini
4. Komitmen kami untuk melindungi privasi dan data anda
Kami amat komited untuk melindungi privasi anda dan melindungi data anda. Kami faham bahawa hanya dengan kepercayaan anda, kami boleh memenuhi misi kami untuk mengedarkan token digital secara adil kepada sebanyak mungkin orang, dan privasi serta keselamatan data adalah kunci dalam mendapatkan kepercayaan tersebut.
Privasi
Kami telah mereka bentuk produk dan perkhidmatan kami dengan mengambil kira privasi anda. Kami mengumpul data untuk menambah baik produk dan perkhidmatan kami. Kami akan selalu memberitahu anda, sama ada di dalam Notis Privasi ini atau dalam borang persetujuan data untuk produk atau perkhidmatan tertentu, mengenai jenis data yang dikumpul oleh kami, tujuan kami mengumpulkan data itu, dan cara kami menggunakannya.
Keselamatan Data
Kami mempunyai pasukan khusus untuk menjaga data anda dan telah melaksanakan perlindungan fizikal dan elektronik yang melindungi data anda semasa transit dan dalam keadaan tidak aktif. Pada masa yang sama, tidak ada perkhidmatan yang boleh dijamin keselamatannya sepenuhnya. Jika anda ada sebarang kebimbangan mengenai akaun atau data anda, sila hubungi kami melalui
Portal Permintaan
kami atau tulis kepada kami di Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA.
5. Maklumat yang Dikumpul oleh Kami dan Sebabnya
5.1 Data yang Anda Berikan Kepada Kami
Sebagai pengguna, anda tidak perlu memberikan sebarang data untuk mengakses Aplikasi. Walau bagaimanapun, anda mungkin perlu memberikan kami data tertentu untuk menggunakan ciri dalam Perkhidmatan. Alasan undang-undang untuk pemprosesan dalam kes-kes di bawah adalah persetujuan pengguna dan pelaksanaan kontrak (komitmen kami untuk menyediakan Perkhidmatan). Di bawah adalah senarai data yang anda mungkin sediakan dan data yang kami boleh gunakan untuk:
Dalam Konteks World App:
Nombor telefon.
Anda boleh memasukkan nombor telefon anda untuk mengaitkannya dengan akaun anda. Dengan kebenaran anda, pengguna lain mungkin boleh mencari akaun anda melalui nombor telefon anda. Kami mungkin memerlukan nombor telefon anda apabila anda menghantar permintaan subjek data. Asas undang-undang untuk memproses data ini ialah prestasi Perkhidmatan di bawah Terma Pengguna.
Nama pengguna.
Anda boleh memautkan nama pengguna ke alamat dompet anda dan menukar nama pengguna pada bila-bila masa.
Tarikh Lahir.
Anda boleh mendedahkan tarikh lahir anda untuk memastikan pematuhan kepada keperluan sekatan umur. Kami tidak akan menyimpan data tarikh lahir anda, sebaliknya hanya menyimpan ringkasan data itu dan maklumat sama ada anda berusia lebih daripada 18 tahun atau tidak.
Maklum balas dan surat-menyurat daripada anda.
Ini termasuk sebarang e-mel, mesej sembang atau komunikasi lain yang anda hantar kepada kami melalui e-mel atau laman web media sosial pihak ketiga. Ini mungkin termasuk memproses alamat e-mel atau nama profil media sosial jika anda ingin berkomunikasi dengan kami melalui cara demikian. Kami mungkin menggunakan pembekal perkhidmatan pihak ketiga untuk memudahkan tinjauan tentang penggunaan Perkhidmatan kami oleh anda. Asas undang-undang untuk memproses data ini ialah prestasi Perkhidmatan di bawah Terma Pengguna.
Buku alamat kenalan.
Anda boleh memberikan Aplikasi akses kepada buku alamat anda untuk membolehkan ciri yang memudahkan anda untuk mencari dan berinteraksi dengan pengguna lain yang mungkin berada dalam buku alamat anda. Asas undang-undang bagi pemprosesan data ini adalah kepentingan sah subjek untuk ditemui dalam Aplikasi dan kepentingan pengguna berkongsi untuk mencari kenalan mereka dalam Aplikasi.
Sila ambil perhatian:
Anda bertanggungjawab untuk memastikan perkongsian maklumat kenalan anda mematuhi undang-undang yang terpakai. Ini mungkin memerlukan anda mendapatkan kebenaran kenalan anda dan anda tidak boleh berkongsi dengan TFH sebarang butiran hubungan daripada orang lain tanpa kebenaran mereka yang jelas. Anda boleh mengubah fikiran anda dan mematikan akses kami kepada kenalan anda pada bila-bila masa dalam tetapan peranti anda. Jika anda memilih untuk mengimport senarai kenalan buku alamat peranti anda ke Aplikasi untuk mengetahui antara kenalan anda yang menggunakan Perkhidmatan kami atau menjemput mereka untuk bergabung dengan anda menggunakan Perkhidmatan kami, kami akan secara berkala menyelaras nombor telefon kenalan anda dengan nombor tersebut dan alamat dompet yang sepadan yang diberikan oleh pengguna lain di pelayan kami.
Maklumat lokasi
. Anda boleh memutuskan untuk mengaktifkan perkhidmatan berasaskan lokasi (seperti ciri yang membolehkan anda mencari Pengendali Orb berhampiran anda). Hanya dengan persetujuan khusus anda, kami boleh mengumpul maklumat tentang lokasi anda melalui GPS untuk membolehkan perkhidmatan berasaskan lokasi menunjukkan Orb yang berhampiran dengan anda. Anda boleh menukar kebenaran anda pada bila-bila masa dalam tetapan peranti anda. Jika anda tidak menetap di Korea Selatan, kami juga mungkin akan menyimpan lokasi anggaran anda yang diasingkan daripada akaun World App anda. Pertamanya, kami menggunakan data ini untuk meningkatkan perkhidmatan kami, tetapi tidak terhad kepada pemilihan lokasi Orb.
Pasaran P2P
. Jika anda menggunakan Perkhidmatan Pasaran P2P (jika tersedia) yang membolehkan anda membeli token digital daripada pengguna lain, maka kami mungkin mengumpul maklumat tambahan seperti alamat dompet anda, maklumat hubungan anda (iaitu nombor telefon anda), dan nombor akaun anda yang berkaitan dengan transaksi (seperti nombor M-PESA anda). Kami mengelog data transaksi sebagai sebahagian daripada penyediaan Perkhidmatan Pasaran P2P. Kami juga mungkin mengumpul maklumat tambahan untuk mematuhi keperluan KYC yang berkenaan.
Metadata peranti.
Jika anda menggunakan Aplikasi, kami sedang mengumpul metadata daripada peranti anda untuk memastikan Aplikasi berfungsi dengan betul dan anda tidak melanggar Terma dan Syarat kami. Ini termasuk mengumpul pengecam peranti dan alamat IP.
Data peranti World ID.
Kami juga memproses metadata peranti anda untuk mengira cap jari peranti yang unik. Cincangan cap jari ini berperanan sebagai isyarat yang menunjukkan keunikan untuk World ID anda dengan peranti.
Dalam konteks pemprosesan Data Perniagaan:
Nama pertama dan keluarga.
Kami mungkin memproses nama pertama dan keluarga anda untuk memenuhi kepentingan sah dalam mengekalkan dan mengurus hubungan perniagaan dengan anda.
Alamat e-mail.
Anda juga boleh memberikan e-mel anda untuk melanggan senarai mel kami untuk mengikuti perkembangan terkini projek Worldcoin. Kami mungkin memerlukan e-mel anda apabila anda menghantar permintaan subjek data. Kami mungkin memproses alamat e-mel anda untuk memenuhi kepentingan sah dalam mengekalkan dan mengurus hubungan perniagaan dengan anda.
Nombor telefon.
Kami mungkin memproses nombor telefon anda untuk memenuhi kepentingan sah dalam mengekalkan dan mengurus hubungan perniagaan dengan anda.
Data Perniagaan
. Jika anda mempunyai hubungan perniagaan dengan kami (seperti jika anda seorang Pengendali Orb atau pembekal), maka kami mungkin memerlukan maklumat seperti nama, alamat surat-menyurat, e-mel, nombor telefon, alamat dompet dan dokumentasi lain (seperti ID kerajaan anda) sebagai sebahagian daripada melanjutkan hubungan perniagaan itu dan memenuhi kewajipan mengenali pelanggan kami. Kami mungkin menggunakan perkhidmatan pihak ketiga, seperti Onfido, untuk membantu kami mengumpul dan menyemak maklumat dan dokumentasi di atas untuk memenuhi kewajipan mengenali pelanggan anda.
Data permohonan
. Jika anda ingin bekerja untuk kami, anda perlu menghantar permohonan anda kepada kami yang termasuk surat iringan dan CV anda serta maklumat peribadi yang anda ingin dedahkan.
Anda boleh mendapatkan asas undang-undang untuk pemprosesan bagi setiap aktiviti pemprosesan data di atas yang diperincikan dalam
LAMPIRAN I – Asas undang-undang untuk aktiviti pemprosesan data Tools for Humanity bagi setiap bidang kuasa
di penghujung notis privasi ini.
5.2 Data Yang Kami Kumpul Daripada Sumber Pihak Ketiga
Dari semasa ke semasa, kami mungkin mendapatkan maklumat tentang anda daripada sumber pihak ketiga berikut:
Data Rantaian Blok
. Kami boleh menganalisis data rantaian blok awam untuk memastikan pihak yang menggunakan Perkhidmatan kami tidak terlibat dalam aktiviti yang menyalahi undang-undang atau dilarang di bawah Terma Pengguna, dan untuk menganalisis trend transaksi untuk tujuan penyelidikan dan pembangunan.
Perkhidmatan Pengesahan Identiti
. Kami boleh mendapatkan maklumat daripada perkhidmatan pihak ketiga menggunakan data anda untuk mengesahkan identiti anda jika dikehendaki oleh undang-undang (seperti keperluan mengenali pelanggan anda yang berkenaan). Untuk menjelaskan, kami
tidak
menggunakan data biometrik anda apabila kami mengesahkan identiti anda seperti yang dikehendaki oleh undang-undang.
Pangkalan data bakat
. Kami boleh mengumpul data daripada pelbagai sumber untuk membuat tawaran kerja kepada individu yang berbakat.
5.3 Data yang Kami Kumpul Secara Automatik
Jika dibenarkan di bawah undang-undang yang terpakai, kami mungkin mengumpul jenis data tertentu secara automatik apabila anda berinteraksi dengan Perkhidmatan kami. Maklumat ini membantu kami menangani isu sokongan pelanggan, meningkatkan prestasi Perkhidmatan, memberikan anda pengalaman yang diperkemas dan diperibadikan serta melindungi bukti kelayakan Akaun anda. Maklumat yang dikumpul secara automatik termasuk:
Pengecam Dalam Talian:
Geo-lokasi dan butiran penjejakan (lihat di atas), sistem pengendalian komputer atau telefon mudah alih, nama dan versi pelayar web serta alamat IP. Dalam kes-kes yang sangat terhad, data ini juga dimasukkan ke dalam pengesanan penipuan dan aliran kewangan haram kami. Ia juga berfungsi untuk memberikan pengalaman perisian kami yang stabil dan bebas penipuan.
Data Penggunaan:
Data pengesahan, soalan keselamatan dan data lain yang dikumpul melalui kuki dan teknologi seumpamanya.
Kuki
: fail data kecil yang disimpan pada pemacu keras atau memori dalam peranti anda yang membantu kami meningkatkan Perkhidmatan kami dan pengalaman anda, melihat kawasan dan ciri Perkhidmatan kami yang popular dan mengira lawatan. Untuk asas undang-undang pemprosesan data tersebut, sila rujuk kepada
Dasar Kuki
kami di mana kami menjelaskan jenis kuki yang kami gunakan.
Begitu juga, Aplikasi mengumpul maklumat untuk penyelesaian masalah dan penambahbaikan. Kami menggunakan perkhidmatan pihak ketiga, seperti Segment.io atau PostHog, untuk melihat maklumat agregat tentang penggunaan dan interaksi pengguna akhir. Jika boleh, kami mengambil langkah untuk meminimumkan atau menutup maklumat yang dihantar kepada pihak ketiga (seperti pengekodan data).
5.4 Data Tanpa Nama dan Agregat
Penyahnamaan merupakan teknik pemprosesan data yang menyebabkan data tidak lagi dianggap sebagai data peribadi kerana apabila telah dinyahnamakan, data tersebut tidak lagi boleh dikaitkan dengan individu tertentu. Contoh data tanpa nama termasuk:
Data transaksi
Data strim klik
Metrik prestasi
Penunjuk penipuan (walaupun data peribadi digunakan untuk tujuan ini juga)
Kami juga mengagregat data, menggabungkan sejumlah besar maklumat bersama-sama supaya ia tidak lagi mengenal pasti atau merujuk kepada seseorang individu. Kami menggunakan data tanpa nama atau agregat untuk tujuan perniagaan kami, seperti memahami keperluan dan tingkah laku pengguna, menambah baik Perkhidmatan kami, menjalankan risikan dan pemasaran perniagaan, mengesan ancaman keselamatan dan melatih algoritma kami.
Asas undang-undang untuk memproses data yang disebutkan di atas ialah kepentingan sah aplikasi atau laman web yang berfungsi, pemahaman perniagaan dan pencegahan penipuan.
6. Cara Kami Menggunakan Data yang Dikumpul oleh Kami
6.1 Penerangan umum
Kami mesti mempunyai sebab yang sah (atau “asas sah untuk memproses”) untuk menggunakan maklumat peribadi anda. Dalam sesetengah kes, penggunaan maklumat peribadi anda tidak memerlukan kebenaran anda terlebih dahulu. Kami menggunakan data anda untuk tujuan berikut:
Untuk menyediakan dan mengekalkan produk dan perkhidmatan kami di bawah Terma Pengguna. Perkhidmatan ini termasuk:
Aplikasi di mana pengguna boleh mengurus World ID dan token digital mereka serta belajar tentang mata wang kripto secara umum dan projek Worldcoin secara khusus;
Aplikasi Pengendali di mana Pengendali Orb boleh mengurus dan mengawasi Orb mereka di bawah pengurusan dan statistik mereka;
Pasaran P2P di mana kami menghubungkan pengguna dengan ejen (tidak terpakai kepada pengguna yang bertapak atau bermastautin di Jerman atau mempunyai kediaman biasa atau pejabat berdaftar mereka di Jerman);
Untuk menambah baik dan membangunkan produk dan perkhidmatan kami, termasuk untuk menyahpepijat dan membaiki ralat dalam Perkhidmatan kami.
Untuk menjalankan penyelidikan sains data.
Untuk menganalisis penggunaan Perkhidmatan kami bagi memberikan sokongan yang lebih baik.
Untuk membolehkan anda menerbitkan maklumat pada rantaian blok untuk membuktikan keunikan anda.
Untuk menggunakan alamat dompet anda bagi menghantar token digital yang kami sokong.
Untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang terpakai seperti undang-undang anti pengubahan wang haram dan sekatan. Ini melibatkan:
Menggunakan alamat IP anda untuk menyekat individu yang negaranya tidak membenarkan mereka mengakses Perkhidmatan;
Untuk menjawab permintaan subjek data di bawah undang-undang perlindungan data yang berkenaan seperti permintaan untuk akses atau pemadaman;
Memantau aliran kewangan yang mungkin melanggar undang-undang seperti dari dompet yang disenarai hitam; dan
Untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang terpakai seperti peraturan terhadap kandungan yang menyalahi undang-undang.
Untuk mengendalikan permintaan perkhidmatan pelanggan, aduan dan pertanyaan anda.
Untuk menyelesaikan pertikaian, menyelesaikan masalah dan menguatkuasakan perjanjian kami dengan anda, termasuk Notis Privasi ini dan Terma Pengguna.
Untuk menghubungi anda mengenai kemas kini kepada Perkhidmatan.
6.2 Bukti Kelayakan
TFH membolehkan anda menyimpan bukti kelayakan tertentu secara setempat pada peranti anda untuk dikongsi dalam infrastruktur pengetahuan sifar protokol World ID (“Bukti Kelayakan”). Dalam konteks Bukti Kelayakan, kami memproses data ini dengan cara berikut:
Kami menyemak kesahihan bukti kelayakan anda (dalam kes pasport, ini dilakukan melalui sijil asal negara anda).
Kami mengesahkan anda sebagai pemegang sah dokumen bukti kelayakan tersebut (untuk pasport, proses ini dilakukan secara setempat pada peranti anda melalui foto muka anda (swafoto) yang tidak akan disimpan).
Kami menyulitkan, menandatangani dan menyimpan data bukti kelayakan anda dalam persekitaran yang selamat pada peranti anda.
Kami tidak pernah mempunyai akses kepada maklumat peribadi yang terkandung pada bukti kelayakan anda.
Anda kemudian boleh berkongsi maklumat ini secara terpilih dengan pihak yang bergantung melalui perlindungan protokol World ID (cth. anda boleh membuktikan bahawa anda berumur sekurang-kurangnya 18 tahun tanpa mendedahkan umur sebenar atau identiti anda).
Untuk pasport, TFH hanya menyimpan sebahagian kecil daripada nilai cincangan tanpa nama tandatangan kriptografi unik pasport anda untuk memastikan setiap pasport hanya boleh disahkan sekali sahaja.
Pemprosesan ini dilakukan berdasarkan persetujuan anda, dan kami tidak pernah mengakses data peribadi anda daripada pasport anda yang disimpan di peranti anda. Anda boleh memadamkan data ini daripada telefon anda dengan memadamkan World App.
6.3 Data World ID
World ID anda (iaitu nombor rahsia yang diperlukan untuk menggunakannya) disimpan pada peranti anda sahaja (sekiranya anda mempunyai sandaran, terdapat salinan yang disulitkan dalam sandaran anda). Baik TFH mahupun orang lain tidak mempunyai akses kepada World ID anda. Anda boleh menggunakan World ID anda secara tanpa nama. Setiap kali anda menggunakan World ID dengan aplikasi baharu, aplikasi hanya menerima nombor pakai buang (“Pembatal”) yang tidak mendedahkan World ID anda. Ini dicapai melalui Bukti Sifar Pengetahuan (anda hanya membuktikan bahawa anda mempunyai World ID yang disahkan tanpa mendedahkan yang mana satu) dan memastikan World ID anda tidak dapat digunakan untuk menjejaki anda merentasi aplikasi. Ini bermakna World ID bukanlah ID pengguna umum untuk internet.
Fungsi pengesahan World ID melalui protokol terbuka yang mengakses Merkle Tree awam bagi cincangan World ID yang telah disahkan. World ID bukanlah perkhidmatan terpusat tetapi protokol yang boleh diakses oleh sesiapa sahaja. Kami menawarkan API untuk memudahkan akses kepada Merkle Tree dan pengesahan World ID tetapi tidak menerima sebarang data peribadi dalam konteks ini.
Perlu diberi perhatian bahawa kami tidak memproses sebarang data berkaitan World ID anda yang boleh digunakan untuk mengenal pasti anda. Semua data peribadi yang diproses dalam konteks World App terutamanya alamat dompet dan data transaksi anda sengaja dirancang untuk dinyahpautkan daripada data World ID.
7. Tempat Kami Memproses Data Anda
7.1 Pemindahan Data.
Apabila anda memberikan kami data anda, ia mungkin dipindahkan, disimpan atau diproses di lokasi di luar tempat asal data anda dikumpulkan. Negara tempat data anda dipindahkan, disimpan atau diproses mungkin tidak mempunyai undang-undang perlindungan data yang sama seperti negara tempat anda memberikan data pada mulanya.
Kami berusaha sebaik mungkin untuk mematuhi prinsip yang dinyatakan dalam setiap bidang kuasa berkenaan undang-undang privasi. Kami hanya berkongsi data dengan pemproses data di luar bidang kuasa anda jika pemindahan sedemikian adalah sah dan jika kami yakin bahawa pemproses data akan melindungi data anda seperti yang diperlukan di bawah undang-undang yang terpakai dan, seterusnya, mengikut standard kami.
7.2 Risiko Pemindahan
Di bawah ialah senarai risiko yang mungkin timbul jika kami memindahkan data anda ke Amerika Syarikat, Kesatuan Eropah atau negara lain. Di bawah ini kami juga meringkaskan cara kami mengurangkan risiko masing-masing.
Walaupun kami melakukan apa yang kami mampu untuk memastikan bahawa subkontraktor diwajibkan secara kontrak untuk melindungi data anda dengan secukupnya, subkontraktor ini mungkin tidak tertakluk kepada undang-undang privasi data negara anda. Jika subkontraktor memproses data anda tanpa kebenaran dan melanggar undang-undang, anda mungkin akan menghadapi kesulitan dalam menuntut hak privasi anda daripada subkontraktor tersebut. Kami mengurangkan risiko ini sementara kami mengadakan perjanjian pemprosesan data yang ketat dengan subkontraktor kami yang mewajibkan mereka melindungi data pada tahap GDPR dan memenuhi permintaan subjek.
Terdapat kemungkinan bahawa undang-undang privasi data di negara anda tidak konsisten dengan undang-undang privasi data di Amerika Syarikat atau di Eropah. Kami sentiasa cuba mematuhi standard tertinggi perlindungan data yang perlu kami patuhi.
Data anda mungkin akan diakses oleh pihak kerajaan seperti pegawai dan pihak berkuasa. Dalam kes tersebut, kami bertekad untuk mencabar sebarang permintaan kerajaan yang tidak sah, melampaui batas atau menyalahi undang-undang untuk mengakses di mahkamah. Kami selanjutnya menggunakan penyulitan lanjutan untuk menghalang akses tanpa kebenaran.
Sila ambil perhatian bahawa senarai ini mengandungi contoh, tetapi mungkin tidak termasuk semua kemungkinan risiko kepada anda.
7.3 Rangka Kerja Privasi Data untuk pemindahan data AS
TFH mematuhi Rangka Kerja Privasi Data EU-A.S. (EU-U.S. DPF), Sambungan UK kepada EU-A.S. DPF, dan Rangka Kerja Privasi Data Swiss-A.S. (Swiss-U.S. DPF) seperti yang ditetapkan oleh Jabatan Perdagangan A.S. TFH telah disahkan oleh Jabatan Perdagangan A.S. bahawa ia mematuhi Prinsip-Prinsip Rangka Kerja Privasi Data EU-A.S. (Prinsip-Prinsip DPF EU-AS) berkenaan dengan pemprosesan data peribadi yang diterima daripada Kesatuan Eropah berdasarkan DPF EU-A.S. dan daripada United Kingdom (dan Gibraltar) berdasarkan Sambungan UK kepada DPF EU-A.S. TFH telah disahkan oleh Jabatan Perdagangan A.S. bahawa ia mematuhi Prinsip Rangka Kerja Privasi Data Switzerland-A.S. (Prinsip-Prinsip DPF Switzerland-A.S.) berkenaan dengan pemprosesan data peribadi yang diterima dari Switzerland berdasarkan DPF Switzerland-A.S. Jika terdapat sebarang percanggahan antara terma dalam Notis Rangka Kerja Privasi Data ini dan Prinsip DPF EU-A.S. dan/atau Prinsip DPF Switzerland-A.S., Prinsip tersebut akan diutamakan. Untuk mengetahui lebih lanjut tentang program Rangka Kerja Privasi Data (DPF), dan untuk melihat pensijilan kami, sila lawati
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH bertanggungjawab untuk pemprosesan data peribadi yang diterimanya di bawah DPF dan seterusnya memindahkan kepada pihak ketiga yang bertindak sebagai ejen bagi pihaknya. TFH mematuhi Prinsip DPF untuk semua pemindahan data peribadi seterusnya dari EU, UK, dan Switzerland, termasuk peruntukan liabiliti pemindahan selanjutnya.
Suruhanjaya Perdagangan Persekutuan mempunyai bidang kuasa ke atas pematuhan TFH terhadap DPF EU-A.S., Sambungan UK kepada DPF EU-A.S. dan DPF Swiss-A.S. Dalam situasi tertentu, TFH mungkin dikehendaki mendedahkan data peribadi sebagai tindak balas kepada permintaan yang sah oleh pihak berkuasa awam, termasuk untuk memenuhi keperluan keselamatan negara atau penguatkuasaan undang-undang.
Bagi mematuhi DPF EU-A.S. serta Sambungan UK ke DPF EU-A.S. dan DPF Swiss-A.S., TFH komited untuk menyelesaikan aduan berkaitan Prinsip DPF tentang pengumpulan dan penggunaan maklumat peribadi anda. Individu dari EU, UK dan Switzerland yang mempunyai pertanyaan atau aduan mengenai pengendalian data peribadi kami yang diterima berdasarkan DPF EU-A.S. dan Sambungan UK kepada DPF EU-A.S. dan DPF Swiss-U.S. harus menghubungi TFH terlebih dahulu di dpo@worldcoin.org
Bagi mematuhi DPF EU-A.S. dan Sambungan UK kepada DPF EU-A.S. dan DPF Swiss-A.S., TFH komited untuk bekerjasama dan mematuhi nasihat panel yang ditubuhkan oleh pihak berkuasa perlindungan data EU (DPA)} dan Pejabat Pesuruhjaya Maklumat UK (ICO) dan Pihak Berkuasa Pengawalseliaan Gibraltar (GRA) dan Pesuruhjaya Perlindungan Data dan Maklumat Persekutuan Switzerland (FDPIC)} berkenaan aduan yang tidak dapat diselesaikan berkaitan pengendalian kami terhadap data peribadi yang diterima berdasarkan DPF EU-A.S. dan Sambungan UK kepada DPF EU-A.S. dan DPF Swiss-A.S.
Untuk aduan berkaitan pematuhan DPF yang tidak diselesaikan oleh mana-mana mekanisme DPF yang lain, anda berpeluang, di bawah syarat tertentu, untuk menggunakan timbang tara yang mengikat. Maklumat lanjut boleh didapati di laman web rasmi DPF.
8. Bila Kami Berkongsi Data Anda
Kami tidak akan menjual data anda
.
Apabila kami berkongsi data anda di luar organisasi kami, kami akan sentiasa:
Berkongsi dengan cara yang selamat;
Mengambil langkah untuk memastikan ia dikendalikan dengan cara yang konsisten dengan komitmen kami terhadap privasi anda; dan
Melarang syarikat lain daripada menggunakann data yang dikongsi itu untuk tujuan mereka sendiri.
Kami berkongsi data anda dengan cara terhad ini:
Dengan Worldcoin Foundation:
kami boleh bertindak sebagai pemproses Worldcoin Foundation untuk mengumpul data peribadi bagi pihak Worldcoin (sila semak notis privasi Worldcoin untuk maklumat lanjut).
Dalam organisasi kami:
Kami hanya mendedahkan data kepada ahli pasukan kami yang memerlukan akses untuk melaksanakan kerja dan tugas mereka. Kami hanya mendedahkan seberapa banyak data yang diperlukan untuk melaksanakan kerja dan tugas tertentu dan memiliki sistem kawalan akses yang ketat.
Dengan vendor dan pembekal perkhidmatan di luar organisasi kami:
Kami hanya mendedahkan maklumat kepada pembekal perkhidmatan yang perkhidmatannya kami perlukan untuk memproses data dan menyediakan Perkhidmatan kepada anda. Kami hanya mendedahkan data dengan vendor pengesahan identiti jika dikehendaki oleh Undang-undang (iaitu, keperluan mengenali pelanggan anda).
Kategori penyedia perkhidmatan tersebut ialah:
Pembekal perkhidmatan Awan (semua jenis data)
Pembekal SaaS; kami menggunakan produk SaaS dalam kategori berikut:
Pengurusan pangkalan data dan infrastruktur
Keselamatan data
Perekrutan
Komunikasi
Tinjauan
KYC/KYB iaitu menyemak dokumen rasmi
Pengurusan permintaan subjek data
Sokongan teknikal
Sokongan pengguna
Pakar luar
Pakar pembangun perisian
Pakar undang-undang
Penasihat cukai
Bank
Pembekal perkhidmatan pelabelan (hanya di bawah perlindungan khas)
Perkhidmatan semakan latar belakang untuk pemohon dan Pengendali Orb
Dengan penguatkuasa undang-undang, pegawai atau pihak ketiga yang lain:
Kami boleh mendedahkan data anda untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang terpakai dan bertindak balas terhadap tuntutan undang-undang mandatori. Kami akan mempertimbangkan dengan teliti setiap permintaan untuk menentukan sama ada permintaan itu mematuhi undang-undang dan, jika sesuai, kami mungkin mencabar permintaan yang tidak sah, melampaui batas atau menyalahi undang-undang. Kami boleh berkongsi data peribadi dengan polis dan pihak berkuasa kerajaan lain di mana kami secara munasabah percaya adalah perlu untuk mematuhi undang-undang, peraturan atau proses atau kewajipan undang-undang lain.
Kami boleh berkongsi maklumat peribadi anda jika kami percaya bahawa tindakan anda tidak konsisten dengan Terma Pengguna kami, jika kami percaya bahawa anda telah melanggar undang-undang, atau jika kami percaya adalah perlu untuk melindungi hak, harta dan keselamatan kami, pengguna kami, orang awam, atau orang lain.
Kami boleh berkongsi maklumat peribadi anda dengan peguam kami dan penasihat profesional lain jika perlu untuk mendapatkan nasihat atau sebaliknya melindungi dan mengurus kepentingan perniagaan kami.
Kami boleh berkongsi maklumat peribadi anda berkaitan dengan, atau semasa rundingan mengenai, sebarang penggabungan, penjualan aset syarikat, pembiayaan, atau pemerolehan semua atau sebahagian perniagaan kami oleh syarikat lain.
Data, termasuk maklumat peribadi anda, mungkin dikongsi antara dan di kalangan syarikat induk, sekutu dan anak syarikat semasa dan masa depan kami serta syarikat lain di bawah kawalan dan pemilikan bersama.
Kami mungkin berkongsi maklumat peribadi anda dengan persetujuan anda atau atas arahan anda.
9. Cara Data Anda Direkodkan pada Rantaian Blok Awam
Maklumat transaksi yang berkaitan dengan penggunaan Perkhidmatan kami oleh anda mungkin direkodkan pada rantaian blok awam.
Sila ambil perhatian:
Rantaian blok ialah lejar awam transaksi yang dikekalkan pada rangkaian desentralisasi yang dikendalikan oleh pihak ketiga yang tidak dikawal atau dikendalikan oleh Worldcoin. Disebabkan oleh sifat awam dan sifat tidak berubah bagi lejar rantaian blok, kami tidak dapat menjamin keupayaan untuk meminda, memadam atau mengawal pendedahan data yang dimuat naik dan disimpan pada rantaian blok
10. Cara Kami Menggunakan Kuki
Kami menggunakan kuki untuk membantu Perkhidmatan kami berfungsi dengan lebih baik. Selain kuki, kami mungkin menggunakan teknologi lain yang serupa, seperti suar web, untuk menjejaki pengguna Perkhidmatan kami. Suar web (juga dikenali sebagai "gif jelas") ialah grafik kecil dengan pengecam unik, fungsi yang serupa dengan kuki.
Dasar Kuki kami
, digabungkan di sini dengan rujukan.
Kami juga menggunakan Google Analytics. Maklumat lanjut tentang cara Google menggunakan data anda apabila anda menggunakan laman web dan aplikasi:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Dengan menggunakan Perkhidmatan, anda membenarkan kita menyimpan dan mengakses kuki dan data lain pada komputer atau peranti mudah alih anda dan penggunaan Google Analytics berkaitan dengan aktiviti tersebut. Sila baca maklumat di pautan yang diberikan supaya anda memahami perkara yang anda persetujui.
11. Berapa Lama Kami Menyimpan Data Anda?
Kecuali undang-undang yang berkenaan menetapkan sebaliknya, kami akan menyimpan maklumat anda hanya untuk tempoh yang diperlukan bagi memberi perkhidmatan kami kepada anda, memenuhi keperluan perniagaan kami yang sah, dan mematuhi undang-undang serta peraturan. Jika anda menutup akaun anda dengan kami, kami akan memadamkan data akaun anda dalam masa satu bulan; jika tidak, kami akan memadamkan data akaun anda selepas 2 tahun tidak aktif. Jika dikehendaki oleh undang-undang, kami akan terus mengekalkan data peribadi anda seperti yang diperlukan untuk mematuhi kewajipan undang-undang dan kawal selia kami, termasuk pemantauan, pengesanan dan pencegahan penipuan, serta cukai, perakaunan dan kewajipan pelaporan kewangan.
Sila ambil perhatian:
Rantaian blok rangkaian pihak ketiga desentralisasi yang tidak dikawal atau dikendalikan oleh kami. Disebabkan oleh sifat awam dan sifat tidak berubah bagi teknologi rantaian blok, kami tidak boleh meminda, memadam atau mengawal pendedahan data yang disimpan pada rantaian blok.
12. Bagaimana Notis Privasi ini Berbeza untuk Kanak-kanak dan Remaja
Individu di bawah umur 18 tahun tidak dibenarkan menggunakan Perkhidmatan dan kami tidak mengumpul data daripada individu di bawah umur 18 tahun dengan sengaja. Jika anda percaya bahawa anak anda di bawah umur 18 tahun telah mendapat akses kepada Perkhidmatan tanpa kebenaran anda, sila meminta pemadaman data mereka dengan menghubungi kami melalui
Portal Permintaan
kami.
Jika kami mengetahui bahawa kami telah mengumpul data tentang kanak-kanak di bawah umur 18 tahun, kami akan memadamkan data tersebut secepat mungkin. Kami telah mengambil langkah seperti melaksanakan model AI pengesanan usia automatik, memberikan arahan kepada pengendali, dan pengesahan diri untuk mengehadkan penggunaan Perkhidmatan kepada mereka yang berusia sekurang-kurangnya 18 tahun. Kami tidak memasarkan produk atau perkhidmatan kepada kanak-kanak.
13. Cara untuk Menghubungi Kami Mengenai Notis Privasi ini
Anda boleh memilih untuk memadam data anda dari dalam Aplikasi di bawah menu Tetapan. Jika anda ada soalan atau kebimbangan mengenai Notis Privasi ini, ingin menggunakan hak anda, atau menghubungi Pegawai Perlindungan Data (DPO), sila serahkan permintaan anda melalui
Portal Permintaan
kami atau tulis kepada kami di Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. Kami menjawab semua permintaan yang kami terima daripada individu yang ingin menggunakan hak perlindungan data mereka mengikut undang-undang perlindungan data yang berkenaan. Anda juga boleh memadam data anda dari dalam World App.
Jika anda ada kebimbangan tentang privasi atau penggunaan data yang belum kami selesaikan dengan memuaskan, sila hubungi pengawal selia perlindungan data di bidang kuasa anda. Jika anda tinggal di EU, maka anda boleh menghubungi pengawal selia perlindungan data anda
di sini
.
14. Hak Anda
Hak ini terpakai setakat kami boleh mengenal pasti peminta dalam pangkalan data kami dan setakat kami tidak melanggar hak subjek data lain dengan menggunakan hak peminta:
Anda berhak untuk mendapatkan maklumat tentang data peribadi yang kami proses mengenai anda daripada kami pada bila-bila masa atas permintaan. Anda berhak untuk menerima daripada kami data peribadi berkenaan anda.
Anda berhak untuk meminta kami membetulkan data peribadi anda dengan segera jika ia tidak betul.
Anda berhak untuk menuntut kami memadamkan data peribadi berkenaan anda. Prasyarat ini memperuntukkan khususnya hak untuk memadam jika data peribadi tidak lagi diperlukan untuk tujuan ia dikumpul atau diproses sebaliknya, dengan syarat keperluan untuk pemadaman di bawah undang-undang yang terpakai diberikan (contohnya beberapa bidang kuasa undang-undang mewajibkan kami untuk mengekalkan maklumat transaksi untuk tempoh masa tertentu)
Anda berhak untuk menarik balik persetujuan anda secara bebas terhadap sebarang pemprosesan data berdasarkan persetujuan atau membantah pemprosesan data jika ia tidak berdasarkan persetujuan anda.
15. ADENDUM
Berikut, beberapa adendum menyediakan maklumat yang diperlukan oleh undang-undang untuk setiap pasaran di mana kami menjalankan operasi. Maklumat ini membentuk sebahagian daripada persetujuan bergantung kepada wilayah tempat subjek data berada. Maklumat ini mungkin berbeza daripada maklumat lokasi anda kerana kami menyekat perkhidmatan tertentu dalam bidang kuasa tertentu. Jika terdapat percanggahan antara perkara di atas dengan kenyataan yang lebih khusus tentang bidang kuasa tertentu, kenyataan yang lebih khusus itu akan diutamakan:
Adendum A: Kawasan Ekonomi Eropah (“EEA”) dan United Kingdom (“UK”)
Jika anda berada di EEA atau UK, perkara berikut terpakai kepada anda: Sekurang-kurangnya anda berhak ke atas perkara berikut. Anda mungkin mempunyai hak tambahan di bawah Peraturan Perlindungan Data Umum, Peraturan EU 2016/679 pada 27.04.2016 (“GDPR”) seperti yang disenaraikan di bawah. Untuk melaksanakan hak anda yang tersedia di bawah GDPR, sila hubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
kami. Selain daripada kes luar biasa, kami akan menyelesaikan permintaan anda dalam tarikh akhir berkanun selama sebulan. Penggunaan perkataan GDPR dalam bahagian berikut juga memerlukan UK-GDPR diubah menjadi undang-undang negara UK sebagai Akta Perlindungan Data UK 2018 dan dikekalkan sebagai sebahagian daripada undang-undang England dan Wales, Scotland dan Ireland Utara berdasarkan
seksyen 3
Akta Kesatuan Eropah (Pengeluaran) 2018 dan sebagaimana yang dipinda oleh
Jadual
1
kepada Peraturan 2019 Perlindungan Data, Privasi dan Komunikasi Elektronik (Pindaan dan lain-lain) (Pengeluaran EU) (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Hak berkanun di bawah GDPR
Seksyen ini terpakai jika pemprosesan data anda berada di bawah skop penggunaan GDPR (
cth.
, jika anda adalah pemastautin EEA atau di UK). Anda mungkin mempunyai hak tambahan di bawah GDPR seperti yang disenaraikan di bawah. Untuk melaksanakan hak anda yang tersedia di bawah GDPR, sila hubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
kami.
Anda berhak untuk mendapatkan daripada kami pada bila-bila masa atas permintaan maklumat tentang data peribadi yang kami proses mengenai anda menurut skop Perkara 15 GDPR.
Anda berhak untuk meminta kami membetulkan data peribadi anda dengan segera jika ia tidak betul.
Anda berhak, di bawah syarat-syarat yang dihuraikan dalam Perkara 17 GDPR, untuk menuntut kami memadamkan data peribadi berkenaan anda. Prasyarat ini memperuntukkan khususnya hak untuk memadam jika data peribadi tidak lagi diperlukan untuk tujuan ia dikumpul atau diproses sebaliknya, serta dalam kes pemprosesan yang menyalahi undang-undang, kewujudan bantahan atau kewujudan kewajipan untuk memadam di bawah undang-undang Kesatuan atau undang-undang Negara Anggota yang kami perlu patuhi.
Anda berhak untuk menuntut kami menyekat pemprosesan menurut Perkara 18 GDPR.
Anda berhak untuk menerima daripada kami data peribadi berkenaan anda yang telah anda berikan kepada kami dalam format berstruktur, digunakan secara umum, dan boleh dibaca oleh mesin menurut Perkara 20 GDPR.
Anda berhak untuk membantah pada bila-bila masa, atas sebab berkaitan dengan situasi tertentu anda, terhadap pemprosesan data peribadi anda yang dijalankan, antara lain, berdasarkan Perkara 6 (1) ayat 1 lit. f GDPR, selaras dengan Perkara 21 GDPR.
Anda berhak untuk menghubungi pihak berkuasa penyeliaan yang berwibawa sekiranya terdapat aduan mengenai pemprosesan data yang dijalankan oleh pengawal. Pihak berkuasa penyeliaan yang bertanggungjawab ialah: Pejabat Penyeliaan Perlindungan Data Negeri Bavaria (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Jika pemprosesan data peribadi bergantung kepada persetujuan anda, anda berhak di bawah Perkara 7 GDPR untuk menarik balik persetujuan anda untuk penggunaan data peribadi anda pada bila-bila masa yang akan berkuat kuasa pada masa hadapan, di mana penarikan balik itu sama mudahnya untuk dinyatakan seperti persetujuan itu sendiri. Sila ambil perhatian bahawa pembatalan hanya berkuat kuasa untuk masa hadapan. Pemprosesan yang berlaku sebelum pembatalan tidak terjejas.
A.2 Pemindahan data
Apabila memindahkan data ke negara yang tidak mempunyai keputusan yang mencukupi, kami menggunakan Klausa Kontrak Standard EU. Pada masa ini kami hanya memindahkan data peribadi ke AS.
Jika pemprosesan data peribadi bergantung kepada persetujuan anda, anda berhak di bawah Perkara 7 GDPR untuk menarik balik persetujuan anda untuk penggunaan data peribadi anda pada bila-bila masa yang akan berkuat kuasa pada masa hadapan, di mana penarikan balik itu sama mudahnya untuk dinyatakan seperti persetujuan itu sendiri. Sila ambil perhatian bahawa pembatalan hanya berkuat kuasa untuk masa hadapan. Pemprosesan yang berlaku sebelum pembatalan tidak terjejas. Sila ambil perhatian juga bahawa pemprosesan yang tidak berdasarkan persetujuan tidak terjejas dengan menarik balik persetujuan.
ADENDUM B: JEPUN
Jika anda menetap di Jepun, sebagai tambahan, perkara berikut terpakai kepada anda.
B1. Maklumat Berkenaan Peraturan Jepun
Kami mematuhi undang-undang dan peraturan Jepun, termasuk Akta Perlindungan Maklumat Peribadi Jepun (“APPI”). Seksyen ini terpakai kepada pengendalian kami terhadap “maklumat peribadi” seperti yang ditakrifkan dalam APPI sebelum bahagian lain Borang Persetujuan Data Biometrik ini
Kami mematuhi undang-undang dan peraturan Jepun, termasuk Akta Perlindungan Maklumat Peribadi Jepun (“APPI”). Seksyen ini terpakai kepada pengendalian kami terhadap “maklumat peribadi” seperti yang ditakrifkan dalam APPI sebelum bahagian lain Notis Privasi ini.
B2. Perkongsian Data
Kecuali dibenarkan oleh undang-undang yang terpakai, kami tidak mendedahkan, menjual, memberikan, berkongsi atau memindahkan maklumat peribadi anda kepada mana-mana pihak ketiga.
B3. Langkah Kawalan Keselamatan
Kami mengambil langkah-langkah yang diperlukan dan sesuai untuk mengelakkan sebarang kebocoran, kehilangan, atau kerosakan kepada maklumat peribadi anda yang kami uruskan, dan juga untuk mengekalkan keselamatan maklumat peribadi tersebut, seperti menetapkan peraturan untuk pengendalian maklumat peribadi, memantau secara berkala pengendalian maklumat peribadi, memberikan latihan berkala kepada kakitangan dalam pengendalian maklumat peribadi, mengelakkan pencurian atau kehilangan peralatan yang digunakan untuk pengendalian maklumat peribadi, dan melaksanakan kawalan akses. Kami juga mengawasi kontraktor dan pekerja kami yang mengendalikan maklumat peribadi dengan sewajarnya. Anda boleh mendapatkan butiran lanjut tentang langkah-langkah kawalan keselamatan yang dilaksanakan berhubung dengan pengendalian maklumat peribadi anda dengan menghubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
kami.
B4. Maklumat Rujukan mengenai Pemprosesan Data Peribadi di Negara Asing
Data peribadi anda diproses di EU dan AS.
B5. Hak Berkanun di bawah APPI
Untuk melaksanakan hak anda yang tersedia di bawah APPI, sila hubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
kami.
ADENDUM C: ARGENTINA
Jika anda tinggal di Republik Argentina, kami ingin maklumkan bahawa AGENSI AKSES MAKLUMAT AWAM, dalam kapasitinya sebagai Agensi Kawalan bagi Undang-undang No. 25,326, mempunyai kuasa untuk mendengar aduan dan tuntutan yang dikemukakan oleh individu yang merasa hak mereka terjejas akibat ketidakpatuhan terhadap peraturan yang berkuat kuasa berkenaan perlindungan data peribadi.
Agensi boleh dihubungi seperti berikut:
Alamat : Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
Poskod: C1067ABP
Nombor telefon: (54-11) 3988-3968
E-mel: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADENDUM D: SINGAPURA
Jika anda seorang penduduk Singapura, perkara berikut terpakai kepada anda:
D1. Pengumpulan, penggunaan dan pendedahan data peribadi anda
Jika anda seorang penduduk Singapura dan dengan persetujuan anda, kami akan mengumpul, menggunakan atau sebaliknya mendedahkan data peribadi anda untuk setiap tujuan seperti yang dinyatakan dalam notis privasi kami. Anda boleh menggunakan hak anda untuk menarik balik persetujuan anda pada bila-bila masa, tetapi sila ambil perhatian bahawa kami mungkin tidak dapat meneruskan perkhidmatan kami kepada anda, bergantung kepada jenis dan skop permintaan anda. Sila ambil perhatian juga bahawa penarikan balik kebenaran tidak menjejaskan hak kami untuk terus mengumpul, menggunakan dan mendedahkan data peribadi di mana pengumpulan, penggunaan dan pendedahan tersebut tanpa kebenaran dibenarkan atau diperlukan di bawah undang-undang yang berkenaan.[1]
D2. Menjalankan hak subjek data anda
Anda boleh mengawal data peribadi yang kami kumpulkan dan melaksanakan mana-mana hak dengan menghubungi kami di
Portal Permintaan
kami. Kami menyasarkan untuk membalas permintaan anda secepat mungkin, biasanya dalam masa 30 hari. Kami akan memaklumkan anda terlebih dahulu jika kami tidak dapat menjawab permintaan anda dalam masa 30 hari, atau jika kami tidak dapat memenuhi permintaan anda dan sebab-sebabnya.[2]
Jika dibenarkan oleh undang-undang, kami mungkin mengenakan bayaran pentadbiran untuk memenuhi permintaan anda.
D3. Pemindahan data peribadi anda ke negara lain
Jika anda seorang penduduk Singapura dan kami telah mengumpul data anda, kami juga mungkin memindahkan data anda ke luar dari Singapura dari semasa ke semasa. Walau bagaimanapun, kami akan sentiasa memastikan data peribadi anda terus menerima standard perlindungan yang sekurang-kurangnya setanding dengan yang disediakan di bawah Akta Perlindungan Data Peribadi Singapura 2012, seperti melalui penggunaan Klausa Kontrak Model ASEAN.
ADENDUM E – KOREA SELATAN
Tambahan untuk Subjek Data Korea ini menerangkan amalan kami berkenaan dengan maklumat peribadi yang kami proses berkaitan dengan hubungan anda dengan kami di mana anda merupakan subjek data Korea.
E.1 – Pemindahan Maklumat Peribadi
Kami memberikan maklumat peribadi kepada atau penyumberan luar pemprosesannya kepada pihak ketiga seperti yang dinyatakan di bawah:
- Penyediaan Maklumat Peribadi kepada Pihak Ketiga
Nama Penerima
Tujuan penggunaan oleh penerima
Item maklumat peribadi yang diberikan kepada penerima
Tempoh pengekalan oleh penerima
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Tujuan yang diterangkan dalam notis ini dalam seksyen 6 di atas.
Tujuan yang diterangkan dalam notis ini dalam seksyen 5 di atas
Tempoh penyimpanan yang ditakrifkan dalam notis ini dalam seksyen 11 di atas.
- Penyumberan Luar Pemprosesan Maklumat Peribadi kepada Pihak Ketiga:
Sila cari senarai semua pemprosesan data penyumberan luar dan syarikat masing-masing di bawah pautan ini:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Kami boleh mendapatkan perkhidmatan daripada sumber luar untuk memproses maklumat peribadi anda dan/atau memindahkan maklumat peribadi anda untuk tujuan penyimpanan kepada pihak ketiga yang terletak di luar Korea:
Jika anda tidak mahu memindahkan maklumat peribadi anda ke luar negara, anda boleh menolak dengan tidak bersetuju dengan pemindahan maklumat peribadi, atau dengan meminta kami menghentikan pemindahan rentas sempadan, tetapi jika anda menolak, anda mungkin tidak boleh menggunakan perkhidmatan kami. Asas undang-undang bagi pemindahan rentas sempadan maklumat peribadi di atas ialah kerana ia merupakan “pemprosesan atau penyimpanan maklumat peribadi yang diserahkan kepada pihak luar yang diperlukan untuk penyelesaian dan pemenuhan kontrak dengan subjek data” serta perkara-perkara yang ditetapkan secara undang-undang yang telah dinyatakan dalam dasar privasi (Perkara 28-8(1)(iii) Akta Perlindungan Maklumat Peribadi).
E.2 – Pemusnahan Maklumat Peribadi
Apabila maklumat peribadi tidak diperlukan lagi kerana tamat tempoh penyimpanan atau pencapaian tujuan pemprosesan, maklumat peribadi tersebut akan dimusnahkan dengan segera. Proses dan kaedah pemusnahan dinyatakan di bawah:
1) Proses Pemusnahan: Kami memilih item tertentu maklumat peribadi untuk dimusnahkan, dan memusnahkannya dengan kelulusan DPO.
2) Kaedah Pemusnahan: Kami memusnahkan maklumat peribadi yang direkodkan dan disimpan dalam bentuk fail elektronik dengan menggunakan kaedah teknikal (cth., format aras rendah) untuk memastikan rekod tidak boleh diterbitkan semula, manakala maklumat peribadi yang direkodkan dan disimpan dalam bentuk dokumen kertas akan dicincang atau dibakar.
E.3 – Penyimpanan Maklumat Peribadi
Jika kami dikehendaki menyimpan maklumat peribadi anda mengikut undang-undang yang terpakai, kami akan berbuat demikian untuk tujuan dan tempoh berikut seperti yang dikehendaki oleh undang-undang yang terpakai.
E.4 – Hak Anda
Anda boleh menggunakan hak anda yang berkaitan dengan maklumat peribadi terhadap kami, termasuk permintaan untuk akses kepada, pengubahsuaian atau pemadaman, atau penggantungan pemprosesan, maklumat peribadi anda seperti yang diperuntukkan oleh undang-undang terpakai termasuk Akta Perlindungan Maklumat Peribadi. Anda juga boleh menggunakan hak anda untuk menarik balik kebenaran untuk pengumpulan/penggunaan/penyediaan maklumat peribadi, hak untuk mudah alih, dan hak yang berkaitan dengan pembuatan keputusan automatik. Hak tersebut juga boleh dilaksanakan melalui wakil undang-undang anda atau orang lain yang diberi kuasa.
Anda boleh menggunakan mana-mana hak terpakai yang diterangkan di atas dengan menghubungi kami di worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Langkah Keselamatan
Kami akan melaksanakan langkah keselamatan teknikal, organisasi dan fizikal yang ditetapkan oleh undang-undang Korea yang berkenaan untuk melindungi maklumat peribadi, seperti yang disenaraikan di bawah:
1) Langkah pengurusan: Pelantikan Pegawai Perlindungan Data, penubuhan dan pelaksanaan pelan pengurusan dalaman, memberi latihan berkala kepada pekerja tentang perlindungan data, dsb.;
2) Langkah teknikal: Pengurusan autoriti akses kepada sistem pemprosesan maklumat peribadi, pemasangan sistem kawalan akses, pemasangan program keselamatan, dsb.; dan
3) Langkah fizikal: Sekatan akses kepada fasiliti dan peralatan penyimpanan maklumat peribadi seperti bilik komputer dan bilik penyimpanan data, dsb.
E.6 – Hubungi Kami
Untuk pertanyaan berkaitan privasi dan perlindungan data, sila hubungi Pasukan Perlindungan Data kami di
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ADENDUM F – AS
Akta Privasi Pengguna California, sebagaimana yang dipinda oleh Akta Hak Privasi California, tidak terpakai kepada kami pada masa ini.
ADENDUM G - BRAZIL
G.1 Undang-undang Terpakai, Pengawal dan Pengendali
Jika anda menetap di Brazil, jika data peribadi anda dikumpul di Brazil, atau jika anda menggunakan Perkhidmatan kami di Brazil, undang-undang yang terpakai ialah Undang-undang No. 13,709/2018 (Undang-undang Perlindungan Data Umum, atau “LGPD”).
G.2 Hak untuk membantah
Anda berhak untuk membantah penggunaan data peribadi anda untuk tujuan yang tidak bergantung kepada persetujuan jika tujuan itu tidak konsisten dengan LGPD. Jika bantahan anda diterima, kami tidak akan lagi menggunakan maklumat peribadi anda untuk membangunkan dan menambah baik ciri serta pengalaman Perkhidmatan kami.
Sila ambil perhatian bahawa jika anda tidak memberikan atau tidak membenarkan pengumpulan atau pemprosesan data peribadi tertentu, ia mungkin menjejaskan kualiti pengalaman anda, kami mungkin tidak dapat memenuhi objektif Perkhidmatan kami, atau kami mungkin tidak dapat menyediakan Perkhidmatan tertentu kepada anda.
Dalam sesetengah kes, data anda akan dirahsiakan, bermakna ia tidak lagi mengenal pasti anda. Anda tidak boleh membantah penggunaan data tanpa nama kerana ia tidak mengenal pasti anda, seperti yang diperuntukkan dalam LGPD. Kami menggunakan data tanpa nama ini untuk meningkatkan produk dan perkhidmatan kami.
G.3 Hak berkanun di bawah LGPD
Menurut LGPD, anda berhak untuk mengesahkan kewujudan pemprosesan data, mengakses, membetulkan, atau meminta pemindahan data yang diproses. Selain itu, anda boleh meminta maklumat mengenai entiti awam dan swasta yang kami gunakan bersama data peribadi anda. Anda juga boleh meminta maklumat mengenai kemungkinan untuk tidak memberikan persetujuan dan akibat negatifnya, serta meminta penghapusan data yang diproses dengan persetujuan anda. Anda boleh memilih pemadaman maklumat anda dalam World App dalam menu Tetapan.
Dalam keadaan tertentu, anda mempunyai hak untuk membantah atau menyekat cara kami memproses data peribadi anda, atau untuk menarik balik persetujuan anda, yang kami gunakan untuk memproses maklumat yang anda berikan.
Anda boleh menggunakan hak-hak anda di bawah LGPD dengan menghantar permintaan kepada DPO kami menggunakan butiran hubungan dalam bahagian H.4 di bawah atau melalui portal permintaan dalam talian kami. Jika anda berpendapat bahawa hak anda tidak ditangani dengan sewajarnya, anda boleh memfailkan aduan kepada Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) dengan melengkapkan borang yang tersedia di pautan ini:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Pemindahan Antarabangsa Data Peribadi Anda
Jika LGPD terpakai kepada anda, dan kami telah mengumpul data peribadi anda, kami juga mungkin memindahkannya ke luar negara. Namun begitu, kami akan sentiasa memastikan bahawa data peribadi anda hanya dipindahkan ke negara-negara asing atau organisasi antarabangsa yang menyediakan tahap perlindungan yang mencukupi seperti yang ditetapkan dalam LGPD, sebagaimana yang diiktiraf dalam keputusan kecukupan yang dikeluarkan oleh ANPD. Sekiranya tiada keputusan yang mencukupi, kami akan terus mengikuti piawaian perlindungan yang sekurang-kurangnya setara dengan yang diperuntukkan dalam LGPD menggunakan Klausa Kontrak Standard yang ditetapkan dalam peraturan ANPD atau apabila kami mendapatkan persetujuan khusus dan diserlahkan anda untuk antarabangsa. pemindahan.
LAMPIRAN I – Alasan/tujuan undang-undanguntuk aktiviti pemprosesan data Tools for Humanity bagi setiap bidang kuasa
Pengguna
Mengapa kami Memproses Data
Apakah Data Peribadi yang Diproses
Asas Undang-undang untuk Pemprosesan
Tempoh Pengekalan
Untuk membuat akaun anda dalam World App
Alamat dompet, metadata, nama pengguna
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan atau sehingga anda meminta pemadaman data.
Untuk memastikan anda mencapai umur yang layak
Tarikh lahir
Kewajipan undang-undang
Tarikh lahir anda yang tepat tidak pernah disimpan. Kami hanya menyimpan sama ada anda berumur 18 tahun. Kami menyimpan maklumat untuk tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan atau sehingga anda meminta pemadaman data.
Untuk memberi pilihan kepada kenalan anda supaya mereka mudah berkomunikasi dan berurus niaga dengan anda.
Nombor telefon
Persetujuan
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan atau sehingga anda meminta pemadaman data.
Untuk membenarkan anda berkomunikasi dan bertransaksi dengan kenalan anda
Kenalan buku alamat
Persetujuan
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan atau sehingga anda meminta pemadaman data.
Untuk menunjukkan secara pilihan kepada anda Orb yang berdekatan dengan anda
Maklumat lokasi
Persetujuan
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Untuk mengelakkan penipuan dalam konteks pencegahan akaun
Metadata, alamat IP, ID Peranti
Kepentingan yang sah, iaitu kepentingan untuk mencegah jenis penipuan tertentu (SENARAI JENIS)
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Untuk memastikan perkhidmatan itu dibenarkan di negara anda
Alamat IP, maklumat lokasi
Kewajipan undang-undang
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Untuk memaparkan dompet kawalan kendiri anda dan menyediakan antara muka untuk transaksi dompet
Alamat dompet, data transaksi
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tiada data peribadi disimpan dalam konteks ini.
Untuk memaparkan World ID kawalan kendiri anda dan menyediakan antara muka untuk pengesahan
Maklumat World ID
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tiada data peribadi disimpan dalam konteks ini.
Untuk memaparkan Bukti kelayakan kawalan kendiri anda dan menyediakan antara muka untuk berkongsi Bukti kelayakan
Maklumat bukti kelayakan, maklumat pengesahan kelayakan
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tiada data peribadi disimpan dalam konteks ini.
Untuk menganalisis dan menambah baik perkhidmatan kami dan menjalankan penyelidikan sains data
Data penggunaan dan metadata, data transaksi awam
Persetujuan
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang terpakai seperti undang-undang anti-pengubahan wang haram, dan sekatan
Data transaksi, alamat dompet
Kewajipan undang-undang
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan.
Untuk mematuhi undang-undang yang terpakai seperti peraturan terhadap kandungan
Kandungan Miniapp
Kewajipan undang-undang
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan.
Untuk membolehkan komunikasi dan pemasaran
Alamat e-mel, pemberitahuan tolak
Kepentingan sah
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Surat-menyurat daripada anda
Kepentingan sah
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Maklum balas daripada anda
Kepentingan sah
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Untuk mengendalikan permintaan perkhidmatan pelanggan, aduan dan pertanyaan anda.
Maklumat komunikasi dan e-mel atau nama profil media sosial jika anda ingin berkomunikasi dengan kami melalui cara sedemikian
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Untuk memastikan apl berjalan lancar untuk anda
Metadata
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Sehingga 24 bulan.
Untuk mengesahkan peranti anda
Data World ID Peranti (cap jari peranti)
Pelaksanaan kontrak
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan.
Untuk menyelesaikan pertikaian, menyelesaikan masalah dan menguatkuasakan perjanjian kami dengan anda, termasuk Notis Privasi ini dan Terma Pengguna.
Tempoh penggunaan perkhidmatan.
Rakan kongsi perniagaan
Mengapa kami Memproses Data
Apakah Data Peribadi yang Diproses
Asas Undang-undang untuk Pemprosesan
Tempoh Pengekalan
Komunikasi
Nombor telefon, alamat e-mel, Nama
Kepentingan yang sah, iaitu minat untuk berkomunikasi dengan rakan niaga.
Tempoh perhubungan perniagaan atau sehingga anda meminta pemadaman data.
Mengekalkan dan mentadbir hubungan perniagaan
Nombor telefon, alamat e-mel, Nama, data perusahaan
Kepentingan yang sah iaitu kepentingan untuk mengekalkan dan mentadbir hubungan perniagaan dengan rakan kongsi perniagaan.
Tempoh perhubungan perniagaan atau sehingga anda meminta pemadaman data.
Penuhi kewajipan KYC
Data pasport, data Perusahaan
Kewajipan undang-undang
Tempoh perhubungan perniagaan dan sehingga 3 tahun selepas penamatan.
Untuk memproses permohonan anda
Data permohonan
Persetujuan dan langkah atas permintaan subjek data sebelum membuat kontrak.
Sehingga 3 bulan secara lalai atau lebih lama jika anda bersetuju untuk menyertai kumpulan bakat.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Informacja o ochronie prywatności Tools for Humanity
Dziękujemy za zostanie częścią społeczności Worldcoin! Worldcoin jest protokołem typu open source, wspieranym przez globalną społeczność programistów, osób prywatnych i innych twórców.
Niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności ma zastosowanie do danych, które użytkownik przekazuje nam korzystając z naszej witryny, aplikacji (zwanych dalej “Aplikacjami”) i innych usług powiązanych z niniejszą Informacją o ochronie prywatności (zwanych łącznie “Usługami”). Niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności jest włączona do
Regulaminu świadczenia usług
(zwanego dalej “Regulaminem”) i podlega jego postanowieniom. Spółka Tools for Humanity Corporation (zwana dalej “amerykańskim oddziałem TFH”), wraz ze swoim niemieckim podmiotem zależnym Tools for Humanity GmbH (zwanym dalej “niemieckim oddziałem TFH”; zwane łącznie “
TFH
”, “
my
”, “
nas
”), przyczynia się do początkowego opracowania i rozwoju protokołu Worldcoin (zwanego dalej “Worldcoin”).
1. Administrator danych
Jesteśmy administratorem wszystkich “Danych aplikacji World App”, “Danych weryfikacyjnych” i innych “Danych biznesowych”: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH posiada podmiot Tools for Humanity GmbH z siedzibą w Unii Europejskiej (zwanej dalej “
UE
”).
“Dane aplikacji World App” oznaczają wszystkie dane osobowe gromadzone i przetwarzane w związku z korzystaniem przez użytkownika z aplikacji World App, zgodnie z definicją w części 5 poniżej, z wyjątkiem wszelkich danych osobowych związanych z korzystaniem przez niego z protokołu Worldcoin lub tokenów Worldcoin (takich jak adres portfela i dane transakcyjne, których nie kontrolujemy).
Dane weryfikacyjne oznaczają dane przetwarzane podczas weryfikacji metody uwierzytelniania w celu dodania jej do samodzielnego identyfikatora World ID użytkownika. Obejmuje to np. odczytywanie chipa NFC umieszczonego w paszporcie w celu bezpiecznego przechowywania danych paszportu na urządzeniu. Dane te pozostają pod kontrolą użytkownika, a po sprawdzeniu ważności metody uwierzytelniania TFH przechowuje zanonimizowany fragment skrótu unikalnego podpisu kryptograficznego metody uwierzytelnienia (np. paszportu), aby zapewnić, że każda poszczególna metoda uwierzytelniania może zostać dodana do World ID tylko raz.
„Dane biznesowe” oznaczają wszystkie dane osobowe zgromadzone i przetwarzane przez naszą firmę w inny sposób podczas komunikacji lub w ramach współpracy bądź interakcji pomiędzy nami a użytkownikiem np. za pośrednictwem poczty elektronicznej, wideokonferencji lub naszych witryn internetowych. Informacje na temat przetwarzania danych w kontekście Aplikacji Orb można znaleźć w Informacji o ochronie prywatności aplikacji Orb, do której łącze znajduje się w Aplikacji Orb. Informacje na temat przetwarzania danych w kontekście dedykowanego gromadzenia i testowania danych można znaleźć w odpowiedniej Informacji o ochronie prywatności dotyczącej gromadzenia i testowania, które można znaleźć w aplikacji testowej. Informacje na temat przetwarzania w kontekście naszej witryny internetowej można znaleźć w naszej Polityce dotyczącej plików cookie, do której łącze znajduje się na naszej stronie internetowej.
2. Zmiany w niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności
Okresowo aktualizujemy niniejszą Informację o ochronie prywatności. Jeśli wprowadzimy do niej istotne zmiany, na przykład dotyczące sposobu wykorzystywania danych osobowych użytkownika, poinformujemy go o tym za pośrednictwem poczty e-mail lub wiadomości w Aplikacji.
3. Co zawiera niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności?
Nasze zobowiązanie do ochrony prywatności i danych użytkownika
Gromadzone przez nas dane i powód ich gromadzenia
Sposób wykorzystywania gromadzonych przez nas danych
Miejsce przetwarzania danych użytkownika
Okoliczności udostępniania danych użytkownika
Sposób zapisywania danych użytkownika w publicznej sieci blockchain
Sposób wykorzystywania plików cookie
Jak długo przechowujemy dane użytkownika
Czym różni się niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności w przypadku dzieci i młodzieży
Przysługujące użytkownikowi prawa ustawowe
Jak skontaktować się z nami w sprawie niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności
4. Nasze zobowiązanie do ochrony prywatności i danych użytkownika
Jesteśmy głęboko zaangażowani na rzecz ochrony prywatności użytkownika i ochrony jego danych. Zdajemy sobie sprawę, że możemy wypełnić naszą misję sprawiedliwej dystrybucji naszych tokenów cyfrowych wśród jak największej liczby osób tylko wtedy, gdy inni będą nam ufać, a ochrona prywatności i bezpieczeństwa danych mają kluczowe znaczenie dla zdobycia zaufania użytkowników.
Prywatność
Nasze produkty i usługi stworzyliśmy z myślą o ochronie prywatności użytkownika. Dane gromadzimy w celu ulepszania naszych produktów i usług. Zawsze będziemy informować użytkownika, w niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności lub w formularzach zgody na przetwarzanie danych dotyczących konkretnych produktów lub usług, jakie dane gromadzimy, dlaczego je gromadzimy i jak je wykorzystujemy.
Bezpieczeństwo danych
Mamy dedykowany zespół, który dba o dane użytkownika i wdrożyliśmy fizyczne i elektroniczne zabezpieczenia, które chronią jego dane zarówno podczas przesyłania, jak i przechowywania danych. Nie jesteśmy jednak w stanie zapewnić całkowitego bezpieczeństwa jakiejkolwiek usługi. W przypadku jakichkolwiek wątpliwości dotyczących swojego konta lub swoich danych prosimy o kontakt za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
lub napisanie do nas na adres Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA.
5. Gromadzone przez nas dane i powód ich gromadzenia
5.1 Dane, które użytkownik nam przekazuje
Użytkownik nie musi podawać żadnych danych w celu uzyskania dostępu do Aplikacji. Podanie określonych danych może jednak być konieczne w celu skorzystania z funkcji w ramach Usług. Podstawą prawną przetwarzania w poniższych przypadkach jest zgoda użytkownika oraz wykonanie umowy (nasze zobowiązanie do świadczenia Usług). Poniżej znajduje się lista danych, które użytkownik może podać i do czego możemy je wykorzystać:
W kontekście aplikacji World App:
Numer telefonu.
Użytkownik może podać swój numer telefonu, aby powiązać go ze swoim kontem. Za zgodą użytkownika inni użytkownicy mogą być w stanie znaleźć jego konto za pomocą numeru telefonu. Możemy wymagać podania numeru telefonu użytkownika, gdy składa on żądanie jako osoba, której dane dotyczą. Podstawą prawną przetwarzania tych danych jest świadczenie Usługi na podstawie Regulaminu świadczenia usług.
Nazwa użytkownika.
Użytkownik może powiązać nazwę użytkownika ze swoim adresem w portfelu i zmienić nazwę użytkownika w dowolnym momencie.
Data urodzenia.
Użytkownik może ujawnić swoją datę urodzenia, aby zapewnić zgodność z wymogami dotyczącymi ograniczeń wiekowych. Nigdy nie będziemy przechowywać danych dotyczących daty urodzenia użytkownika – zamiast tego przechowujemy wyłącznie sumę kontrolną tych danych oraz to, czy użytkownik ma ukończone 18 lat.
Informacje zwrotne i korespondencja od użytkownika.
Obejmuje to wszelkie wiadomości e-mail, wiadomości na czacie lub inne wiadomości, które użytkownik wysyła nam za pośrednictwem poczty elektronicznej lub zewnętrznych serwisów społecznościowych. Może to obejmować przetwarzanie adresów e-mail lub nazw profili w mediach społecznościowych, jeśli użytkownik chce się z nami skontaktować za pośrednictwem jednego z tych kanałów. Możemy korzystać z usług zewnętrznego usługodawcy w celu przeprowadzania ankiet dotyczących korzystania z naszych Usług. Podstawą prawną przetwarzania tych danych jest świadczenie Usługi na podstawie Regulaminu świadczenia usług.
Kontakty z książki adresowej.
Użytkownik może dać Aplikacji dostęp do swojej książki adresowej, aby włączyć funkcję ułatwiającą wyszukiwanie innych użytkowników, którzy mogą znajdować się w książce adresowej użytkownika, i wchodzenie z nimi w interakcje. Podstawą prawną przetwarzania tych danych jest uzasadniony interes osoby, której dane dotyczą, polegający na możliwości odnalezienia go w Aplikacji oraz interes użytkownika udostępniającego dane polegający na możliwości odnalezienia jego kontaktów w Aplikacji.
Uwaga:
Użytkownik ponosi odpowiedzialność za zapewnienie, że udostępnianie jego danych kontaktowych jest zgodne z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa. Może to wymagać uzyskania zgody osób, do których należą dane kontaktowe, a użytkownik nie będzie udostępniać TFH żadnych danych kontaktowych innych osób bez ich wyraźnej zgody. Użytkownik może zmienić zdanie i wyłączyć nasz dostęp do jego kontaktów w dowolnym momencie w ustawieniach urządzenia. Jeśli użytkownik zdecyduje się zaimportować kontakty z książki adresowej swojego urządzenia do Aplikacji, aby dowiedzieć się, które osoby z jego listy kontaktów korzystają z naszych Usług lub zaprosić je do korzystania z naszych Usług, będziemy okresowo synchronizować numery telefonów jego kontaktów z tymi numerami i odpowiadającymi im adresami portfela podanymi przez innych użytkowników na naszych serwerach.
Informacje o lokalizacji
. Użytkownik może zdecydować się włączyć usługę wykorzystującą dane o lokalizacji (taką jak funkcja umożliwiająca znalezienie operatora Orb w pobliżu). Za wyraźną zgodą użytkownika możemy wówczas gromadzić informacje o lokalizacji użytkownika za pomocą funkcji GPS, aby umożliwić usłudze wykorzystującej lokalizację użytkownika wyświetlenie użytkownikowi listy Orbów w jego okolicy. Użytkownik może w dowolnym momencie dostosować uprawnienia w ustawieniach urządzenia. Pod warunkiem, że użytkownik nie znajduje się na terytorium Korei Południowej, możemy również przechowywać jego przybliżoną lokalizację niepowiązaną z jego kontem w aplikacji World App. Dane te wykorzystujemy w celu ulepszania naszych usług, w szczególności, ale nie wyłącznie, w celu wyboru lokalizacji Orbów.
Platforma P2P Marketplace
. Jeśli użytkownik korzysta z usług platformy P2P Marketplace (jeśli są dostępne), które umożliwiają zakup tokenów cyfrowych od innych użytkowników, możemy gromadzić dodatkowe dane, takie jak adres portfela, dane kontaktowe (np. numer telefonu) i numer konta powiązany z transakcją (np. numer M-PESA). Rejestrujemy dane transakcji w ramach świadczenia Usług P2P Marketplace. Możemy również gromadzić dodatkowe dane w celu spełnienia obowiązujących wymogów ZK.
Metadane urządzenia.
Jeśli użytkownik korzysta z Aplikacji, gromadzimy metadane z jego urządzenia, aby upewnić się, że Aplikacja działa prawidłowo i że nie narusza on naszych Regulaminów. Obejmuje to gromadzenie identyfikatorów urządzeń i adresów IP.
Dane urządzenia World ID.
Przetwarzamy również metadane urządzenia użytkownika w celu obliczenia unikalnego cyfrowego odcisku palca urządzenia. Skrót tego odcisku palca służy jako sygnał potwierdzający unikalność urządzenia użytkownika World ID.
W kontekście przetwarzania danych biznesowych:
Imię i nazwisko.
Możemy przetwarzać imię i nazwisko użytkownika w celu realizacji uzasadnionego interesu związanego z utrzymywaniem i administrowaniem relacją biznesową z użytkownikiem.
Adres e-mail.
Użytkownik może również podać swój adres e-mail, aby zapisać się na naszą listę mailingową i otrzymywać aktualne informacje na temat projektu Worldcoin. Możemy wymagać podania adresu e-mail użytkownika, gdy składa on żądanie jako osoba, której dane dotyczą. Możemy przetwarzać adres e-mail użytkownika w celu realizacji uzasadnionego interesu związanego z utrzymywaniem i administrowaniem relacją biznesową z użytkownikiem.
Numer telefonu.
Możemy przetwarzać numer telefonu użytkownika w celu realizacji uzasadnionego interesu związanego z utrzymywaniem i administrowaniem relacją biznesową z użytkownikiem.
Dane przedsiębiorstwa
. Jeśli użytkownik utrzymuje z nami relacje biznesowe (np. jeśli jest on operatorem Orb lub usługodawcą), możemy wymagać podania takich informacji, jak imię i nazwisko, adres korespondencyjny, adres e-mail, numer telefonu, adres portfela i inne dokumenty (takie jak dowód tożsamości) w ramach rozwijania tych relacji biznesowych i w celu spełnienia naszych zobowiązań dotyczących znajomości klienta (ZK). Możemy korzystać z usług podmiotów zewnętrznych, takich jak Onfido, które pomagają nam w gromadzeniu i przeglądaniu powyższych danych i dokumentacji w celu wypełnienia obowiązków w zakresie znajomości swoich klientów.
Dane dotyczące podania o pracę
. W przypadku chęci podjęcia pracy dla nas użytkownik zostanie poproszony o przesłanie nam swojego podania o pracę zawierającego list motywacyjny i CV, a także dane osobowe, które pragnie ujawnić.
Podstawę prawną przetwarzania w kontekście każdej z powyższych czynności przetwarzania danych można znaleźć na końcu niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności w
ZAŁACZNIKU I – Podstawy prawne/cele przetwarzania danych przez Tools for Humanity w podziale na jurysdykcje.
5.2 Dane gromadzone przez nas ze źródeł zewnętrznych
Możemy okresowo uzyskiwać informacje na temat użytkownika z następujących źródeł zewnętrznych:
Dane sieci blockchain.
Możemy uzyskiwać i analizować publiczne dane blockchain, aby się upewnić, że osoby korzystające z naszych Usług nie prowadzą niezgodnej z prawem lub zakazanej działalności zgodnie z Regulaminem świadczenia usług, a także w celu analizy trendów transakcyjnych do celów badawczo-rozwojowych.
Usługi weryfikacji tożsamości
. Możemy uzyskiwać informacje od usługodawców zewnętrznych wykorzystujących dane użytkownika w celu weryfikacji jego tożsamości, jeśli jest to wymagane przez przepisy prawa (np. obowiązujące wymogi dotyczące znajomości klienta). Dla wyjaśnienia,
nie
wykorzystujemy danych biometrycznych użytkownika podczas weryfikacji jego tożsamości zgodnie z wymogami prawa.
Bazy danych talentów.
Możemy gromadzić dane z różnych źródeł, aby składać oferty pracy utalentowanym osobom.
5.3 Dane, które gromadzimy automatycznie
Jeśli zezwalają na to obowiązujące przepisy prawa, możemy gromadzić pewne rodzaje danych automatycznie podczas interakcji użytkownika z naszymi Usługami. Dane te pomagają nam rozwiązywać problemy związane z obsługą klienta, poprawiać wydajność Usług, poprawiać komfort użytkowania i personalizować usługi oraz zabezpieczać dane uwierzytelniające kont. Dane gromadzone automatycznie obejmują:
Identyfikatory online:
Dane dotyczące geolokalizacji i śledzenia (opisane powyżej), systemu operacyjnego komputera lub telefonu komórkowego, nazwy i wersji przeglądarki internetowej oraz adresów IP. W bardzo ograniczonych przypadkach dane te są również wykorzystywane do wykrywania oszustw i niezgodnych z prawem przepływów finansowych. Służą one również zapewnieniu płynnego korzystania z naszego oprogramowania i zapobiegania oszustwom.
Dane dotyczące użytkowania:
Dane uwierzytelniające, pytania zabezpieczające i inne dane gromadzone za pośrednictwem plików cookie i podobnych technologii.
Pliki cookie
: niewielkie pliki danych przechowywane na dysku twardym lub w pamięci urządzenia użytkownika, które pomagają nam ulepszać nasze Usługi i komfort użytkowania, sprawdzać, które obszary i funkcje naszych Usług są popularne oraz jaka jest liczba wizyt na stronie. Aby uzyskać informacje na temat podstawy prawnej przetwarzania tych danych, należy zapoznać się z naszą
Polityką plików cookie
, w której opisujemy różne rodzaje plików cookie, których używamy.
Na podobnej zasadzie Aplikacja gromadzi dane w celu rozwiązywania problemów i wprowadzania ulepszeń. Korzystamy z usług podmiotów zewnętrznych, takich jak Segment.io lub PostHog, aby wyświetlać zagregowane dane dotyczące użytkowania witryny i interakcji użytkowników końcowych. Gdy to możliwe, podejmujemy działania w celu zminimalizowania lub zamaskowania danych wysyłanych do podmiotów zewnętrznych (np. szyfrowanie danych).
5.4 Dane zanonimizowane i zbiorcze
Anonimizacja to technika przetwarzania danych, po zastosowaniu której dane przestają stanowić dane osobowe, ponieważ po anonimizacji dane nie mogą zostać już powiązane z konkretną osobą fizyczną. Przykłady zanonimizowanych danych obejmują:
dane dotyczące transakcji;
dane dotyczące sekwencji odwiedzanych stron;
wskaźniki wydajności; oraz
wskaźniki oszustw (chociaż dane osobowe również są wykorzystywane w tym celu).
Agregujemy również dane, łącząc ze sobą duże ilości informacji, tak aby nie pozwalały one na ustalenie tożsamości ani nie odnosiły się do konkretnej osoby. Używamy zanonimizowanych lub zagregowanych danych do naszych celów biznesowych, takich jak zrozumienie potrzeb i zachowań użytkowników, ulepszanie naszych Usług, analityka biznesowa i marketing, wykrywanie zagrożeń dla bezpieczeństwa i szkolenie naszych algorytmów.
Podstawą prawną przetwarzania wyżej wymienionych danych jest uzasadniony interes związany z funkcjonowaniem aplikacji lub witryny internetowej, analiza działalności i zapobieganie oszustwom.
6. Sposób wykorzystywania gromadzonych przez nas danych
6.1 Opis ogólny
Aby być w stanie wykorzystywać dane osobowe użytkownika, musimy dysponować ku temu uzasadnionym powodem (czyli „podstawą prawną przetwarzania”). W niektórych przypadkach wykorzystywanie danych osobowych użytkownika nie wymaga uzyskania jego uprzedniej zgody. Wykorzystujemy dane użytkownika do następujących celów:
do zapewniania i obsługi naszych produktów i usług zgodnie z Regulaminem świadczenia usług. Usługi te obejmują:
Aplikację, w której użytkownicy mogą zarządzać swoimi identyfikatorami World ID i tokenami cyfrowymi, a także dowiedzieć się więcej o kryptowalutach i projekcie Worldcoin;
aplikację Operator App, za pomocą której operatorzy Orb mogą zarządzać swoimi Orbami i nadzorować je oraz wyświetlać ich statystyki;
platformę P2P Marketplace, dzięki której łączymy użytkowników z agentami (nie dotyczy użytkowników posiadających główne miejsce zamieszkania lub mieszkających w Niemczech bądź posiadających główny ośrodek życiowy lub siedzibę w Niemczech);
ulepszanie i rozwijanie naszych produktów i usług, w tym usuwanie i naprawianie błędów w naszych Usługach;
prowadzenie badań w zakresie nauki o danych;
analizowanie korzystania przez użytkownika z naszych Usług w celu zapewnienia lepszego wsparcia;
umożliwienie użytkownikowi publikowania informacji w sieci blockchain w celu udowodnienia swojej unikalności;
korzystanie z adresu portfela do wysyłania użytkownikowi tokenów cyfrowych, które obsługujemy;
przestrzeganie obowiązujących przepisów prawa, takich jak przepisy dotyczące przeciwdziałania praniu pieniędzy i sankcje. Obejmuje to:
używanie adresu IP użytkownika do blokowania osób mieszkających w kraju, który nie zezwala na uzyskiwanie dostępu do Usług;
udzielanie odpowiedzi na żądania osób, których dane dotyczą, zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami o ochronie danych, takie jak żądania dostępu do danych lub ich usunięcia;
monitorowanie potencjalnie niezgodnych z prawem przepływów finansowych, np. z portfeli wpisanych na czarną listę; oraz
zachowanie zgodności z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa, np. regulacjami przeciwdziałającymi nielegalnym treściom.
obsługę żądań, skarg i zapytań użytkownika dotyczących obsługi klienta;
rozstrzyganie sporów, rozwiązywanie problemów i egzekwowanie postanowień naszych umów z użytkownikiem, w tym niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności i Regulaminu świadczenia usług;
kontaktowanie się z użytkownikiem w sprawie aktualizacji Usług.
6.2 Dane uwierzytelniające
TFH umożliwia użytkownikowi przechowywanie określonych danych uwierzytelniających lokalnie na urządzeniu użytkownika w celu udostępniania ich wewnątrz infrastruktury wykorzystującej zerową wiedzę protokołu World ID („Dane uwierzytelniające”). W kontekście Danych uwierzytelniających przetwarzamy wspomniane dane w następujący sposób:
sprawdzamy ważność Danych uwierzytelniających użytkownika (w przypadku paszportów odbywa się to za pomocą sprawdzenia certyfikatu głównego kraju użytkownika);
weryfikujemy użytkownika jako uprawnionego posiadacza metody uwierzytelniania (w przypadku paszportów odbywa się to lokalnie na urządzeniu użytkownika, a zdjęcie jego twarzy (selfie) nigdy nie jest zapisywane).
Szyfrujemy, podpisujemy i przechowujemy Dane uwierzytelniające użytkownika w bezpiecznym środowisku na jego urządzeniu.
Nigdy nie mamy dostępu do danych osobowych zawartych w Danych uwierzytelniających użytkownika.
Użytkownik może następnie selektywnie udostępniać te informacje stronom polegającym na tych informacjach za pośrednictwem zabezpieczeń protokołu World ID (np. użytkownik może udowodnić, że ma ukończone 18 lat bez ujawniania swojego dokładnego wieku lub tożsamości).
W przypadku paszportów TFH zachowuje zanonimizowany fragment skrótu unikalnego podpisu kryptograficznego paszportu, aby zapewnić, że każdy pojedynczy paszport może zostać zweryfikowany tylko raz.
Przetwarzanie to jest oparte na zgodzie użytkownika i nigdy nie uzyskujemy dostępu do jego danych osobowych z paszportu, który jest przechowywany na urządzeniu użytkownika. Dane te można usunąć ze swojego telefonu, usuwając aplikację World App.
6.3 Dane World ID
Identyfikator World ID użytkownika (tj. tajny numer wymagany do użycia protokołu World) jest przechowywany tylko na urządzeniu użytkownika (w przypadku posiadania kopii zapasowej, zaszyfrowana kopia zostanie zapisana wewnątrz kopii zapasowej). Ani spółka TFH, ani nikt inny nie ma dostępu do identyfikatora World ID użytkownika. Użytkownik może korzystać ze swojego identyfikatora World ID anonimowo. Za każdym razem, gdy użytkownik używa identyfikatora World ID w połączeniu z nową aplikacją, aplikacja otrzymuje wyłącznie jednorazowy numer („Szyfr”) nieujawniający identyfikatora World ID użytkownika. Jest to możliwe dzięki wykorzystaniu funkcji dowodów z wiedzą zerową (użytkownik musi udowodnić, że jest posiadaczem identyfikatora World ID, jednak nie musi przedstawiać konkretnego identyfikatora), a cały proces zapewnia, że nie jest możliwe śledzenie identyfikatora World ID używanego przez użytkownika. Oznacza to, że World ID nie jest identyfikatorem użytkownika przeznaczonym do użytku w Internecie.
Dowody w kontekście identyfikatorów World ID działają na podstawie otwartego protokołu uzyskującego dostęp do publicznego drzewa skrótów zawierającego skróty zweryfikowanych identyfikatorów World ID. Identyfikator World ID nie jest scentralizowaną usługą – jest to protokół, do którego każdy może uzyskać dostęp. Oferujemy interfejsy API ułatwiające dostęp do drzewa skrótów i dowodów w odniesieniu do identyfikatorów World ID, ale nigdy w tym kontekście nie otrzymujemy żadnych danych osobowych.
Ważne jest również, aby pamiętać, że nie przetwarzamy też żadnych danych związanych z identyfikatorem World ID użytkownika, które pozwoliłyby nam go zidentyfikować. Wszystkie przypadki przetwarzania danych osobowych w kontekście aplikacji World App, w szczególności adres portfela i dane dotyczące transakcji, są celowo zaprojektowane w taki sposób, aby dane te były odłączone od danych identyfikatora World ID.
7. Miejsce przetwarzania danych użytkownika
7.1 Przekazywanie danych.
Gdy użytkownik przekazuje swoje dane, mogą one być przekazywane, przechowywane lub przetwarzane w miejscu innym niż to, w którym zostały one pierwotnie zgromadzone. W kraju, w którym dane użytkownika są przekazywane, przechowywane lub przetwarzane, mogą nie obowiązywać te same przepisy dotyczące ochrony danych, co w kraju, w którym użytkownik pierwotnie podał dane.
Dokładamy wszelkich starań, aby przestrzegać zasad określonych w przepisach dotyczących ochrony prywatności w każdej jurysdykcji. Udostępniamy dane podmiotom przetwarzającym znajdującym się poza jurysdykcją użytkownika tylko wtedy, gdy takie przekazywanie jest zgodne z prawem i jeśli mamy pewność, że podmiot przetwarzający będzie chronił te dane zgodnie z wymogami obowiązującego prawa oraz zgodnie z naszymi standardami.
7.2 Ryzyko związane z przekazywaniem danych
Poniżej znajduje się lista możliwych zagrożeń, które mogą zaistnieć w przypadku przekazywania przez nas danych użytkownika do Stanów Zjednoczonych, Unii Europejskiej lub innego kraju. Poniżej podsumowujemy również, w jaki sposób zapobiegamy poszczególnemu ryzyku.
Robimy, co w naszej mocy, aby zapewnić, że nasi podwykonawcy są umownie zobowiązani do odpowiedniej ochrony danych użytkownika, jednak podwykonawcy ci mogą nie podlegać przepisom o ochronie danych obowiązującym w kraju zamieszkania użytkownika. W przypadku dopuszczenia się przez podwykonawców przetwarzania danych użytkownika bez jego zgody, w sposób niezgodny z przepisami prawa, może być trudno dochodzić praw do prywatności użytkownika wobec tego podwykonawcy. Ograniczamy ryzyko w tym zakresie, zawierając z naszymi podwykonawcami rygorystyczne umowy dotyczące przetwarzania danych, które zobowiązują ich do ochrony danych na poziomie RODO i realizacji wniosków osób, których dane dotyczą.
Istnieje możliwość, że przepisy dotyczące ochrony prywatności danych w kraju zamieszkania użytkownika są niespójne z przepisami dotyczącymi ochrony prywatności danych obowiązującymi w Stanach Zjednoczonych lub UE. Zawsze staramy się przestrzegać najwyższych standardów w zakresie ochrony danych, którym podlegamy.
Istnieje możliwość, że do danych użytkownika dostęp będą mieli funkcjonariusze rządowi i urzędnicy. W takich przypadkach zobowiązaliśmy się kwestionować wszelkie nieważne, nadmierne lub niezgodne z prawem wnioski o dostęp w sądzie. Ponadto stosujemy zaawansowane szyfrowanie, aby uniemożliwić uzyskanie dostępu w sposób nieupoważniony.
Należy pamiętać, że lista ta zaledwie zawiera przykłady i może nie obejmować wszystkich możliwych czynników ryzyka, które mogą mieć zastosowanie do użytkownika.
7.3 Ramy ochrony danych dla danych przekazywanych do USA
TFH przestrzega Ram ochrony danych osobowych (Data Privacy Framework, DPF) UE-USA (DPF UE-USA), aneksu do Ram ochrony danych osobowych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii oraz Ram ochrony danych osobowych Szwajcaria-USA (DPF Szwajcaria-USA) określonych przez Departament Handlu USA. TFH poświadczyła Departamentowi Handlu USA, że przestrzega zasad Ram ochrony danych UE-USA (Zasady Ram ochrony danych UE-USA) w odniesieniu do przetwarzania danych osobowych otrzymywanych z Unii Europejskiej w oparciu o Ramy ochrony danych UE-USA oraz z Wielkiej Brytanii (i Gibraltaru) w oparciu o aneks do Ram ochrony danych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii. TFH poświadczyła Departamentowi Handlu USA, że przestrzega zasad Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA (Zasady Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA) w odniesieniu do przetwarzania danych osobowych otrzymywanych ze Szwajcarii w oparciu o Ramy ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA. W przypadku rozbieżności pomiędzy postanowieniami niniejszej Informacji o Ramach ochrony danych i Zasadami Ram ochrony danych UE-USA lub Szwajcaria-USA, Zasady te mają znaczenie nadrzędne. Aby uzyskać więcej informacji na temat Ram ochrony danych (DPF) i zapoznać się z naszą certyfikacją, należy odwiedzić witrynę
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH odpowiada za przetwarzanie danych osobowych, które otrzymuje na mocy Ram ochrony danych, a następnie przekazuje podmiotom zewnętrznym działającym jako przedstawiciele w naszym imieniu. TFH przestrzega zasad Ram ochrony danych w odniesieniu do wszelkich przypadków dalszego przekazywania danych osobowych z UE, Wielkiej Brytanii i Szwajcarii, w tym postanowień dotyczących odpowiedzialności w związku z dalszym przekazywaniem.
Federalna Komisja Handlu (Federal Trade Commission, FTC) ma jurysdykcję nad przestrzeganiem przez TFH zasad Ram ochrony danych UE-USA, aneksu do Ram ochrony danych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii i Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA. W określonych okolicznościach TFH może być zmuszona ujawnić dane osobowe w odpowiedzi na zgodne z prawem żądania organów władzy państwowej, w tym w celu spełnienia wymogów dotyczących bezpieczeństwa narodowego i egzekwowania prawa.
Zgodnie z postanowieniami Ram ochrony danych UE-USA i aneksu do Ram ochrony danych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii oraz Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA TFH zobowiązuje się rozstrzygnąć związane z zasadami Ram ochrony danych skargi dotyczące gromadzenia i wykorzystywania przez nas danych osobowych użytkownika. Osoby fizyczne z UE i Wielkiej Brytanii oraz Szwajcarii, które mają pytania albo skargi dotyczące naszego postępowania z Danymi osobowymi otrzymanymi w oparciu o postanowienia Ram ochrony danych UE-USA i aneksu do Ram ochrony danych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii oraz Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA powinny w pierwszej kolejności skontaktować się z TFH pod adresem: dpo@worldcoin.org.
Zgodnie z postanowieniami Ram ochrony danych UE-USA i aneksu do Ram ochrony danych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii oraz Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA TFH zobowiązuje się współpracować i postępować zgodnie z zaleceniami panelu ustanowionego przez organy ochrony danych (Data Protection Authorities, DPA) UE, brytyjskie Biuro Komisarza ds. Informacji (Information Commissioner’s Office, ICO), Organ regulacyjny Gibraltaru (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) i szwajcarskiego Federalnego Komisarza ds. Ochrony Danych i Informacji (Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, FDPIC) w odniesieniu do nierozstrzygniętych skarg dotyczących naszego postępowania z danymi osobowymi otrzymanymi w oparciu o postanowienia Ram ochrony danych UE-USA i aneksu do Ram ochrony danych UE-USA w sprawie Wielkiej Brytanii oraz Ram ochrony danych Szwajcaria-USA.
W określonych okolicznościach użytkownik ma możliwość powołać się na prawo do rozstrzygnięcia sporu dotyczącego skarg w zakresie Tarczy Prywatności w drodze wiążącego arbitrażu, gdy mechanizmy Ram ochrony danych nie pozwolą na rozstrzygnięcie sporu. Więcej informacji można znaleźć na oficjalnej stronie Ram ochrony danych.
8. Kiedy udostępniamy dane użytkownika
Nigdy nie sprzedamy danych użytkownika.
Gdy udostępniamy dane użytkownika podmiotom poza naszą organizacją, zawsze:
udostępniamy je w bezpieczny i odpowiedzialny sposób;
podejmujemy kroki mające na celu zapewnienie, że są one traktowane w sposób zgodny z naszym zobowiązaniem na rzecz zachowania prywatności; oraz
zabraniamy innym firmom wykorzystywania ich do celów własnych.
Udostępniamy dane użytkownika w ograniczony sposób:
Fundacji Worldcoin Foundation:
możemy działać w charakterze podmiotów przetwarzających fundacji Worldcoin Foundation w celu gromadzenia danych osobowych w imieniu Worldcoin (więcej informacji na ten temat znajduje się w Informacji o ochronie prywatności Worldcoin).
Wewnątrz naszej organizacji:
ujawniamy dane wyłącznie członkom naszego zespołu, którzy potrzebują dostępu do nich w celu wykonywania swoich zadań i obowiązków. Ujawniamy tylko taką ilość danych, jaka jest potrzebna do wykonania określonych zadań i obowiązków oraz posiadamy system ścisłej kontroli dostępu.
Kontrahentom i usługodawcom spoza naszej organizacji:
ujawniamy dane wyłącznie usługodawcom, na których usługach polegamy w celu przetwarzania danych i świadczenia użytkownikowi naszych Usług. Ujawniamy dane podmiotom weryfikującym tożsamość wyłącznie, gdy jest to wymagane przez prawo (np. wymogi dotyczące znajomości klienta).
Kategorie takich usługodawców to:
Podmioty świadczące usługi w chmurze
Dostawcy rozwiązań SaaS; korzystamy z produktów SaaS w ramach następujących działań:
zarządzanie bazą danych i infrastrukturą;
bezpieczeństwo danych;
rekrutacja;
komunikacja;
ankiety;
znajomość klienta/biznesu, czyli weryfikacja oficjalnych dokumentów;
zarządzanie wniosków od osób, których dane dotyczą;
wsparcie techniczne;
wsparcie użytkowników.
Ekspertom zewnętrznym:
wyspecjalizowanym programistom;
specjalistom ds. prawnych;
doradcom podatkowym;
bankom;
dostawcom usług etykietowania (wyłącznie po zastosowaniu szczególnych zabezpieczeń);
usługodawcom sprawdzającym przeszłość kandydatów i operatorów Orb;
organom porządkowym, urzędnikom lub innymi podmiotom zewnętrznym:
możemy ujawnić dane użytkownika w celu zachowania zgodności z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa i udzielenia odpowiedzi na bezwzględnie obowiązujące żądania prawne. Dokładnie przeanalizujemy każde żądanie, aby ustalić, czy jest ono zgodne z prawem, a w stosownych przypadkach możemy zakwestionować żądania, które będą nieważne, niezgodne z prawem lub których zakres będzie zbyt szeroki. Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe policji i innym organom rządowym, jeśli będziemy mieć uzasadnione przekonanie, że jest to konieczne do przestrzegania przepisów prawa lub innego procesu prawnego lub wywiązania się z obowiązku prawnego.
Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika, jeśli uznamy, że jego działania są niezgodne z naszym Regulaminem świadczenia usług, jeśli uznamy, że naruszył on prawo lub że jest to konieczne w celu ochrony naszych praw, własności i bezpieczeństwa, naszych użytkowników, społeczeństwa lub innych osób.
Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika naszym prawnikom i innym profesjonalnym doradcom, gdy będzie to konieczne w celu uzyskania porady lub ochrony naszych interesów biznesowych i zarządzania nimi.
Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika w związku z dowolną fuzją, sprzedażą aktywów spółki, finansowaniem bądź przejęciem całości lub części naszej działalności na rzecz innego przedsiębiorstwa albo podczas prowadzenia negocjacji w tym zakresie.
Dane, w tym dane osobowe użytkownika, mogą być udostępniane pomiędzy naszymi obecnymi i przyszłymi spółkami dominującymi, jednostkami stowarzyszonymi i zależnymi oraz innymi spółkami powiązanymi z nami na zasadzie wspólnej własności albo kontroli.
Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika za jego zgodą lub na jego polecenie.
9. Sposób zapisywania danych użytkownika w publicznej sieci blockchain
Informacje o transakcjach związanych z korzystaniem przez użytkownika z naszych Usług mogą być rejestrowane w publicznej sieci blockchain.
Uwaga:
Sieci blockchain to publiczny rejestr transakcji prowadzony w rozproszonych sieciach obsługiwanych przez podmioty zewnętrzne, które nie są kontrolowane ani zarządzane przez Worldcoin. Ze względu na publiczny i niezmienny charakter rejestru sieci blockchain, nie możemy zagwarantować możliwości zmiany, usunięcia lub kontrolowania ujawnianych danych, które są przesyłane i przechowywane w sieci blockchain.
10. Jak wykorzystujemy pliki cookie?
Używamy plików cookie, aby poprawić działanie naszych Usług. Oprócz plików cookie możemy wykorzystywać inne podobne technologie, takie jak sygnały nawigacyjne, do śledzenia użytkowników naszych Usług. Sygnały nawigacyjne (zwane również „czystymi plikami GIF”) to niewielkie elementy graficzne o unikatowym identyfikatorze, działające podobnie do plików cookie. Nasza
Polityka plików cookie
została włączona do niniejszego dokumentu przez odniesienie.
Korzystamy również z Google Analytics. Więcej informacji o tym, w jaki sposób Google wykorzystuje dane użytkownika, gdy korzysta on z witryn i aplikacji partnerów Google:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Korzystając z Usług, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na przechowywanie i uzyskiwanie przez nas dostępu do plików cookie i innych danych na jego komputerze lub urządzeniu mobilnym oraz na korzystanie z Google Analytics w związku z takimi działaniami. Użytkownik powinien zapoznać się z informacjami dostępnymi w podanym łączu, aby wiedzieć, na co wyraża zgodę.
11. Okres przechowywania danych użytkownika
O ile obowiązujące przepisy prawa nie stanowią inaczej, przechowujemy dane użytkownika przez okres zasadnie konieczny do świadczenia mu naszych Usług, realizacji naszych uzasadnionych celów biznesowych oraz wypełniania naszych obowiązków prawnych. Jeśli użytkownik zlikwiduje swoje konta u nas, usuniemy jego dane z konta w ciągu jednego miesiąca; w przeciwnym razie usuniemy dane użytkownika z konta po dwóch latach braku aktywności. Jeśli będzie to wymagane przez prawo, będziemy nadal przechowywać jego dane osobowe w zakresie niezbędnym do wypełnienia naszych obowiązków prawnych, w tym monitorowania, wykrywania i zapobiegania oszustwom, a także wywiązywania się z obowiązków podatkowych, księgowych i sprawozdawczości finansowej.
Uwaga:
Sieci blockchain to rozproszone sieci zewnętrzne, których nie kontrolujemy ani nie obsługujemy. Ze względu na publiczny i niezmienny charakter technologii blockchain, nie możemy zmieniać, usuwać ani kontrolować ujawnianych danych, które są przechowywane w sieci blockchain.
12. Czym różni się niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności w przypadku dzieci i młodzieży?
Osoby poniżej 18. roku życia nie mogą korzystać z Usług, a my nie gromadzimy celowo danych od osób poniżej 18. roku życia. Jeśli użytkownik uważa, że jego dziecko w wieku poniżej 18 lat uzyskało dostęp do Usług bez jego zgody, należy zażądać usunięcia jego danych, kontaktując się z nami za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
.
Jeśli dowiemy się, że zgromadziliśmy dane dotyczące dziecka poniżej 18. roku życia, niezwłocznie usuniemy takie dane. Podjęliśmy działania, takie jak wdrożenie automatycznego modelu sztucznej inteligencji wykrywającego wiek, instrukcje dla operatorów i potwierdzenia, aby ograniczyć korzystanie z Usług wyłącznie do osób, które ukończyły 18 lat. Nie sprzedajemy produktów ani usług dzieciom.
13. Jak skontaktować się z nami w sprawie niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności?
Użytkownik może zdecydować się na usunięcie swoich danych z poziomu aplikacji w menu Ustawienia. W przypadku pytań lub wątpliwości dotyczących niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności, chęci skorzystania ze swoich praw lub skontaktowania się z naszym Inspektorem ochrony danych (IOD), należy przesłać żądanie za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
lub napisać do nas na adres Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104, USA bądź na adres
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Udzielamy odpowiedzi na każde żądanie otrzymane od osób, które chcą skorzystać z prawa do ochrony danych zgodnie z przepisami obowiązującego prawa o ochronie danych. Użytkownik może również usunąć swoje dane z poziomu aplikacji World.
W przypadku nierozstrzygniętych wątpliwości dotyczących ochrony prywatności albo wykorzystania danych, których nie rozwiązaliśmy w sposób zadowalający, można również kontaktować się z organem regulacyjnym ds. ochrony danych w danej jurysdykcji. Użytkownicy zamieszkujący w UE mogą znaleźć swój organ regulacyjny ds. ochrony danych
tutaj
.
14. Prawa użytkownika
Prawa te mają zastosowanie w zakresie, w jakim możemy zidentyfikować wnioskodawcę w naszej bazie danych i w zakresie, w jakim umożliwiając wykonawcy skorzystanie z praw nie naruszamy praw innych osób, których dane dotyczą:
Użytkownik ma prawo do uzyskania od nas w dowolnym momencie na żądanie informacji o przetwarzanych przez nas danych osobowych, które go dotyczą. Użytkownik ma prawo do otrzymania od nas dotyczących jego danych osobowych.
Użytkownik ma prawo żądać od nas niezwłocznego sprostowania dotyczących jego danych osobowych, jeżeli są one nieprawidłowe.
Użytkownik ma prawo zażądać od nas usunięcia dotyczących go danych osobowych. Przesłanki te przewidują w szczególności prawo do usunięcia danych, jeżeli dane osobowe nie są już niezbędne do celów, dla których zostały zgromadzone lub są przetwarzane, pod warunkiem spełnienia wymogów dotyczących usunięcia danych wynikających z obowiązujących przepisów prawa (np. przepisy obowiązujące w niektórych jurysdykcjach zobowiązują nas do przechowywania informacji o transakcjach przez określony czas).
Użytkownik ma prawo do dobrowolnego wycofania zgody na przetwarzanie danych na podstawie zgody lub do wniesienia sprzeciwu wobec przetwarzania danych, jeśli nie odbywa się ono na podstawie zgody.
15. DODATEK
Poniżej kilka dodatków zawiera wymagane prawem informacje na temat poszczególnych rynków, na których prowadzimy działalność. Informacje te stanowią część zgody w zależności od regionu, w którym mieszka osoba, której dane dotyczą. Informacje te mogą różnić się od informacji o Twojej lokalizacji, ponieważ blokujemy określone usługi w niektórych jurysdykcjach. W przypadku jakichkolwiek rozbieżności z powyższymi bardziej szczególnymi stwierdzeniami dotyczącymi danej jurysdykcji pierwszeństwo mają następujące postanowienia:
Dodatek A: Europejski Obszar Gospodarczy (“EOG”) i Wielka Brytania (“UK”)
Jeśli użytkownik przebywa na terenie EOG albo lub Wielkiej Brytanii, zastosowanie mają następujące postanowienia: Użytkownikowi przysługują co najmniej poniższe prawa. Mogą przysługiwać mu też dodatkowe, wymienione poniżej prawa wynikające z ogólnego rozporządzenia o ochronie danych osobowych – rozporządzenia UE 2016/679 z 27 kwietnia 2016 r. (zwanego dalej “RODO”). Aby skorzystać ze swoich praw dostępnych na mocy RODO, należy skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
. Oprócz wyjątkowych przypadków rozpatrzymy wniosek w ustawowym terminie jednego miesiąca. Użycie słowa RODO w poniższym punkcie obejmuje również brytyjskie RODO transponowane do brytyjskiego prawa krajowego jako brytyjska Ustawa o ochronie danych z 2018 r. i zachowane w ramach prawa Anglii i Walii, Szkocji i Irlandii Północnej na mocy
ust. 3
Ustawy Unii Europejskiej (wycofanie) z 2018 r. i zmienionej
Załącznikiem
1
do Rozporządzenia o ochronie danych, prywatności i łączności elektronicznej (zmiany itp.) (wyjście z UE) z 2019 r. (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Prawa ustawowe wynikające z RODO
Niniejszy ustęp ma zastosowanie, jeśli do przetwarzania danych użytkownika mają zastosowanie postanowienia RODO (
np
. jeśli użytkownik jest rezydentem EOG lub Wielkiej Brytanii). Użytkownikowi mogą przysługiwać dodatkowe wymienione poniżej prawa na mocy RODO. Aby skorzystać ze swoich praw dostępnych na mocy RODO, należy skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
.
Użytkownik ma prawo do uzyskania od nas informacji na temat danych osobowych, które przetwarzamy na jego temat, na żądanie, w zakresie art. 15 RODO.
Użytkownik ma prawo żądać od nas niezwłocznego sprostowania dotyczących jego danych osobowych, jeżeli są one nieprawidłowe.
Zgodnie z warunkami opisanymi w art. 17 RODO użytkownik ma prawo zażądać od nas usunięcia jego danych osobowych. Te warunki wstępne przewidują w szczególności prawo do usunięcia danych osobowych, jeżeli nie są one już potrzebne do celów, dla których zostały zebrane lub w inny sposób przetworzone, a także w przypadku niezgodnego z prawem przetwarzania, istnienia sprzeciwu lub obowiązku usunięcia danych na mocy prawa Unii lub prawa państwa członkowskiego, któremu podlegamy.
Użytkownik ma prawo zażądać ograniczenia przetwarzania zgodnie z art. 18 RODO.
Użytkownik ma prawo do otrzymania od nas danych osobowych, które nam przekazał, w ustrukturyzowanym, powszechnie używanym, nadającym się do odczytu maszynowego formacie zgodnie z art. 20 RODO.
Użytkownik ma prawo w dowolnym momencie wnieść sprzeciw – z przyczyn związanych z jego szczególną sytuacją – wobec przetwarzania dotyczących go danych osobowych, które odbywa się między innymi na podstawie art. 6 ust. 1 zdanie 1 lit. f RODO, zgodnie z art. 21 RODO.
Użytkownik ma prawo skontaktować się z właściwym organem nadzorczym w przypadku skarg dotyczących przetwarzania danych przez administratora. Odpowiedzialnym organem nadzorczym jest: Bawarskie Państwowe Biuro Nadzoru nad Ochroną Danych (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Jeśli przetwarzanie danych osobowych odbywa się na podstawie zgody użytkownika, na mocy art. 7 RODO użytkownik ma prawo wycofać swoją zgodę na wykorzystywanie swoich danych osobowych w dowolnym momencie ze skutkiem na przyszłość, przy czym wycofanie jest równie łatwe, jak samo wyrażenie zgody. Należy pamiętać, że odwołanie wejdzie w życie tylko w przyszłości. Nie ma to wpływu na przetwarzanie, które miało miejsce przed odwołaniem.
A.2 Przekazywanie danych
W przypadku przekazywania danych do kraju, w odniesieniu do którego nie wydano decyzji stwierdzającej odpowiedni stopień ochrony, stosujemy standardowe klauzule umowne UE. Obecnie przekazujemy dane osobowe wyłącznie do Stanów Zjednoczonych.
Jeśli przetwarzanie danych osobowych odbywa się na podstawie zgody użytkownika, na mocy art. 7 RODO użytkownik ma prawo wycofać swoją zgodę na wykorzystywanie swoich danych osobowych w dowolnym momencie ze skutkiem na przyszłość, przy czym wycofanie jest równie łatwe, jak samo wyrażenie zgody. Należy pamiętać, że odwołanie wejdzie w życie tylko w przyszłości. Nie ma to wpływu na przetwarzanie, które miało miejsce przed odwołaniem. Należy pamiętać, że wycofanie zgody nie ma wpływu na przetwarzanie, które nie odbywa się w oparciu o zgodę.
DODATEK B: JAPONIA
W przypadku użytkowników zamieszkujących w Japonii zastosowanie mają następujące postanowienia dodatkowe:
B1. Informacje dotyczące japońskich przepisów
Przestrzegamy japońskich przepisów i regulacji, w tym Ustawy o ochronie danych osobowych w Japonii (“APPI”). Niniejszy ustęp dotyczy przetwarzania przez nas “danych osobowych” zgodnie z definicją zawartą w APPI i ma znaczenie nadrzędne w stosunku do innych części niniejszego Formularza zgody na przetwarzanie danych biometrycznych.
Przestrzegamy japońskich przepisów i regulacji, w tym Ustawy o ochronie danych osobowych w Japonii (“APPI”). Niniejszy ustęp dotyczy przetwarzania przez nas “danych osobowych” zgodnie z definicją zawartą w APPI i ma znaczenie nadrzędne w stosunku do innych części niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności.
B2. Udostępnianie danych
O ile obowiązujące przepisy prawa nie stanowią inaczej, nie ujawniamy, nie sprzedajemy, nie przekazujemy, nie udostępniamy ani nie przekazujemy danych osobowych użytkownika żadnym osobom trzecim.
B3. Środki kontroli bezpieczeństwa
Stosujemy niezbędne i odpowiednie środki, aby zapobiec wyciekowi, utracie lub uszkodzeniu danych osobowych użytkownika oraz aby w inny sposób zachować bezpieczeństwo jego danych osobowych, takie jak ustanowienie zasad przetwarzania danych osobowych, regularne monitorowanie przetwarzania danych osobowych, regularne szkolenia pracowników w zakresie przetwarzania danych osobowych, zapobieganie kradzieży lub utracie sprzętu używanego do przetwarzania danych osobowych oraz wdrożenie kontroli dostępu. Ponadto odpowiednio nadzorujemy naszych wykonawców i pracowników, którzy mają do czynienia z danymi osobowymi. Więcej informacji na temat środków kontroli bezpieczeństwa stosowanych w związku z przetwarzaniem danych osobowych można uzyskać, kontaktując się z nami za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
.
B4. Informacje referencyjne dotyczące przekazywania danych osobowych podmiotom zewnętrznym w innych krajach
Dane osobowe użytkownika są przetwarzane w UE i USA.
B5. Prawa ustawowe wynikające z APPI
Aby skorzystać ze swoich praw przysługujących w ramach APPI, prosimy o kontakt z nami za pośrednictwem naszego
Portalu wniosków
.
DODATEK C: ARGENTYNA
Użytkowników zamieszkujących w Republice Argentyńskiej informujemy, że AGENCJA DOSTĘPU DO INFORMACJI PUBLICZNYCH, działając jako Agencja Kontroli Prawa nr 25,326, ma prawo do rozpatrywania skarg i roszczeń składanych przez osoby, których prawa są uzależnione od nieprzestrzegania obowiązujących zasad dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych.
Z Agencją można się kontaktować w następujący sposób:
Adres Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5. piętro – Autonomiczne miasto Buenos Aires
Kod pocztowy: C1067ABP
Numer telefonu (54-11) 3988-3968
Adres e-mail: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
DODATEK D: SINGAPOR
W przypadku mieszkańców Singapuru zastosowanie mają następujące postanowienia:
D1. Gromadzenie, wykorzystywanie i ujawnianie danych osobowych użytkownika
Jeśli użytkownik jest mieszkańcem Singapuru i za jego zgodą, będziemy gromadzić, wykorzystywać lub w inny sposób ujawniać jego dane osobowe w każdym z celów określonych w naszej informacji o ochronie prywatności. Użytkownik może skorzystać z prawa do wycofania zgody w dowolnym momencie, ale należy pamiętać, że możemy nie być w stanie nadal świadczyć mu naszych usług w zależności od charakteru i zakresu wniosku. Należy również pamiętać, że wycofanie zgody nie wpływa na nasze prawo do dalszego gromadzenia, wykorzystywania i ujawniania danych osobowych, jeśli takie gromadzenie, wykorzystywanie i ujawnianie bez zgody jest dozwolone lub wymagane przez obowiązujące prawo[1].
D2. Korzystanie z praw osób, których dane dotyczą
Użytkownik może kontrolować zgromadzone przez nas dane osobowe i skorzystać z dowolnych praw, kontaktując się z nami za pośrednictwem naszego
portalu wniosków
. Naszym celem jest niezwłoczne udzielenie odpowiedzi na żądanie użytkownika, zazwyczaj w ciągu 30 dni. Poinformujemy użytkownika z wyprzedzeniem, jeśli nie będziemy w stanie odpowiedzieć na jego żądanie w ciągu 30 dni lub jeśli nie będziemy w stanie spełnić jego żądania i przekażemy uzasadnienie[2].
Tam, gdzie jest to dozwolone przez prawo, możemy obciążyć użytkownika opłatą administracyjną w celu spełnienia jego żądania.
D3. Przekazywanie danych osobowych użytkownika do innych krajów
Jeśli użytkownik jest mieszkańcem Singapuru, a zgromadziliśmy jego dane, możemy od czasu do czasu przekazywać jego dane poza Singapur. Zawsze będziemy jednak zapewniać objęcie danych osobowych użytkownika standardem ochrony, który będzie co najmniej porównywalny ze standardem zapewnionym na mocy singapurskiej Ustawy o ochronie danych osobowych z 2012 r., np. poprzez stosowanie standardowych klauzul umownych ASEAN.
DODATEK E – KOREA POŁUDNIOWA
Niniejszy Dodatek dla osób, których dane dotyczą, mieszkających w Korei dotyczy naszych praktyk w odniesieniu do danych osobowych, które przetwarzamy w związku z relacją użytkownika z nami, gdy jest on osobą, której dane dotyczą, zamieszkującą w Korei.
E.1 – Przekazywanie danych osobowych
Przekazujemy dane osobowe podmiotom zewnętrznym lub zlecamy ich przetwarzanie podmiotom zewnętrznym w sposób określony poniżej:
– Przekazywanie danych osobowych podmiotom zewnętrznym
Nazwa odbiorcy
Cele wykorzystywania przez odbiorcę
Dane osobowe przekazywane odbiorcy
Okresy przechowywania danych przez odbiorcę
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Cele opisane w części 6 niniejszej Informacji powyżej.
Pozycje opisane w części 5 niniejszej Informacji powyżej.
Okresy przechowywania określone w części 11 niniejszej Informacji powyżej.
– Powierzenie przetwarzania danych osobowych podmiotom zewnętrznym:
Listę wszystkich danych powierzonych do przetwarzania i odnośnych podmiotów przetwarzających można znaleźć pod adresem:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Użytkownik może zlecać przetwarzanie jego danych osobowych lub przekazywać jego dane osobowe do celów przechowywania podmiotom zewnętrznym znajdującym się poza Koreą:
Jeśli użytkownik nie chce przekazywać swoich danych osobowych za granicę, może odmówić i nie wyrazić zgody na przekazywanie danych osobowych lub zażądać od nas zaprzestania transgranicznego przekazywania danych, jednak w przypadku odmowy użytkownik może nie być w stanie korzystać z naszych usług. Podstawą prawną powyższego transgranicznego transferu danych osobowych jest fakt, że stanowi on powierzenie przetwarzania lub przechowywania danych osobowych, które jest niezbędne do zawarcia i wykonania umowy z osobą, której dane dotyczą, a kwestie określone ustawowo zostały przedstawione w polityce prywatności (art. 28-8 ust. 1 lit. iii) ustawy o ochronie danych osobowych).
E.2 – Niszczenie danych osobowych
Gdy dane osobowe stają się zbędne z powodu upływu okresu przechowywania lub osiągnięcia celu przetwarzania itp., są niezwłocznie niszczone. Proces i metoda niszczenia zostały przedstawione poniżej:
1) Proces niszczenia: Wybieramy określone elementy danych osobowych do zniszczenia i niszczymy je za zgodą IOD.
2) Metoda niszczenia: Niszczymy dane osobowe zapisane i przechowywane w formie plików elektronicznych, stosując metodę techniczną (np. formatowanie niskiego poziomu) w celu zapewnienia, że dane nie będą mogły zostać odtworzone, a dane osobowe zapisane i przechowywane w formie dokumentów papierowych są niszczone lub spalane.
E.3 – Przechowywanie danych osobowych
W przypadku gdy mamy obowiązek przechowywać dane osobowe użytkownika zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa, będziemy to robić w następujących celach i przez okres wymagany na mocy obowiązujących przepisów prawa.
E.4 – Prawa przysługujące użytkownikom
Użytkownik może dochodzić wobec nas swoich praw związanych z danymi osobowymi, w tym żądać dostępu do jego danych osobowych, ich modyfikacji, usunięcia lub zawieszenia ich przetwarzania, zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa, w tym Ustawą o ochronie danych osobowych. Użytkownik może również skorzystać z prawa do wycofania zgody na gromadzenie/wykorzystywanie/podawanie danych osobowych, prawa do przenoszenia danych oraz prawa dotyczącego zautomatyzowanego podejmowania decyzji. Z takich praw można również skorzystać za pośrednictwem przedstawicieli prawnych użytkownika lub innych należycie upoważnionych przez niego osób.
Użytkownik może skorzystać z przysługujących mu praw opisanych powyżej, kontaktując się z nami pod adresem worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Środki bezpieczeństwa
Wdrożymy techniczne, organizacyjne i fizyczne środki bezpieczeństwa określone przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa koreańskiego w celu ochrony danych osobowych, w tym te wymienione poniżej:
1) Środki zarządcze: Wyznaczenie inspektora ochrony danych, opracowanie i wdrożenie wewnętrznego planu zarządzania, regularne szkolenia pracowników w zakresie ochrony danych itp;
2) Środki techniczne: Zarządzanie uprawnieniami dostępu do systemu przetwarzania danych osobowych, instalacja systemu kontroli dostępu, instalacja programów kontroli bezpieczeństwa itp.; oraz
3) Środki fizyczne: Ograniczenie dostępu do pomieszczeń i urządzeń służących do przechowywania danych osobowych, takich jak sale komputerowe i pomieszczenia do przechowywania danych itp.
E.6 – Kontakt z nami
W przypadku pytań lub wątpliwości związanych z prywatnością i ochroną danych należy skontaktować się z naszym Zespołem ds. ochrony danych pod adresem
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
.
DODATEK F – USA
Kalifornijska ustawa dotycząca ochrony prywatności konsumentów, z późniejszymi zmianami wprowadzonymi na mocy przepisów kalifornijskiej ustawy dotyczącej praw w zakresie ochrony prywatności, nie ma obecnie do nas zastosowania.
DODATEK G – BRAZYLIA
G.1 Obowiązujące przepisy prawa, Administrator danych i Operator
Jeśli użytkownik mieszka w Brazylii, jeśli jego dane osobowe zostały zebrane w Brazylii lub jeśli korzysta z naszych usług w Brazylii, zastosowanie ma ustawa nr 13,709/2018 (Ogólne prawo o ochronie danych, “LGPD”).
G.2 Prawo do sprzeciwu
Jeśli cel przetwarzania jest niezgodny z ustawą LGPD, użytkownik ma prawo wnieść sprzeciw wobec przetwarzania dotyczących go danych osobowych, które są przetwarzane na podstawie innej niż zgoda użytkownika. Jeśli sprzeciw użytkownika zostanie uhonorowany, nie będziemy już wykorzystywać jego danych osobowych do opracowywania i ulepszania funkcji i doświadczeń związanych z naszymi Usługami.
Należy pamiętać, że jeśli użytkownik nie poda określonych danych osobowych ani nie zezwoli na ich gromadzenie lub przetwarzanie, może to wpłynąć na jakość jego doświadczeń, możemy nie być w stanie zrealizować celów naszych Usług lub możemy nie być w stanie świadczyć na rzecz użytkownika określonych Usług.
W niektórych przypadkach dane użytkownika poddawane są anonimizacji, co oznacza, że nie będą one określać tożsamości użytkownika. Wobec wykorzystywania zanonimizowanych danych nie będzie możliwe wniesienie sprzeciwu, ponieważ danego tego rodzaju, zgodnie z ustawą LGPD, nie pozwalają na identyfikację użytkownika. Zanonimizowane dane wykorzystujemy do ulepszania naszych produktów i usług.
G.3 Prawa ustawowe wynikające z ustawy LGPD
Zgodnie z ustawą LGPD użytkownik ma prawo potwierdzić fakt dokonywania przetwarzania, uzyskania dostępu, wprowadzenia sprostowania lub żądania przeniesienia przetwarzanych danych. Ponadto użytkownik może zażądać informacji na temat zarówno publicznych, jak i prywatnych podmiotów, z którymi wspólnie wykorzystujemy jego dane osobowe. Może on również zażądać informacji dotyczących możliwości nieudzielenia zgody i negatywnych konsekwencji takiego działania oraz zażądać usunięcia danych przetwarzanych za zgodą użytkownika. W aplikacji World App w menu Ustawienia można wybrać opcję usunięcia swoich danych.
W określonych okolicznościach użytkownik ma prawo sprzeciwić się przetwarzaniu jego danych osobowych lub ograniczyć sposób ich przetwarzania bądź wycofać swoją zgodę, na której polegamy przy przetwarzaniu przekazanych przez użytkownika informacji.
Użytkownik może skorzystać ze swoich praw wynikających z ustawy LGPD, składając wniosek do naszego IOD, korzystając z danych kontaktowych podanych w części H.4 poniżej lub za pośrednictwem naszego internetowego portalu wniosków. Jeśli użytkownik uważa, że jego prawa nie zostały odpowiednio poszanowane, może wówczas złożyć skargę do Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD), wypełniając formularz dostępny pod adresem:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Przekazywanie danych osobowych użytkownika za granicę
Jeśli LGPD ma zastosowanie do użytkownika i zgromadziliśmy jego dane osobowe, możemy również przesłać je poza granice kraju. Zawsze będziemy jednak zapewniać, że dane osobowe użytkownika są przekazywane wyłącznie do innych krajów lub organizacji międzynarodowych, które zapewniają poziom ochrony adekwatny do tego, który przewidziano w LGPD, zgodnie z decyzjami stwierdzającymi odpowiedni stopień ochrony wydanymi przez ANPD. W przypadku braku decyzji stwierdzającej odpowiedni stopień ochrony będziemy nadal przestrzegać standardu ochrony, który jest co najmniej równoważny standardowi przewidzianemu w LGPD, z wykorzystaniem Standardowych klauzul umownych ustanowionych w przepisach ANPD lub po uzyskaniu przez nas wyraźnej i wyróżnionej zgody użytkownika na przekazywanie danych za granicę.
ZAŁĄCZNIK I – Podstawy prawne/cele przetwarzania danych przez Tools for Humanity
Użytkownicy
Cel przetwarzania danych
Przetwarzane dane osobowe
Podstawa prawna przetwarzania
Okres przechowywania
Utworzenie konta w aplikacji World App
Adres portfela, metadane, nazwa użytkownika
Realizacja umowy
Czas korzystania z usług lub do momentu zażądania usunięcia danych.
Upewnienie się, że użytkownik spełnia wymagania wiekowe
Data urodzenia
Obowiązek prawny
Dokładna data urodzenia użytkownika nigdy nie jest przechowywana. Odnotowujemy jedynie fakt, czy użytkownik ma ukończone 18 lat. Informację tę przechowujemy przez czas korzystania z usług lub do momentu zażądania usunięcia danych.
Opcjonalne umożliwienie kontaktom łatwej komunikacji i transakcji z użytkownikiem
Numer telefonu
Zgoda
Czas korzystania z usług lub do momentu zażądania usunięcia danych.
Umożliwienie użytkownikowi łatwej komunikacji i transakcji z jego kontaktami
Kontakty z książki adresowej
Zgoda
Czas korzystania z usług lub do momentu zażądania usunięcia danych.
Opcjonalne pokazanie użytkownikowi organizacji w jego okolicy
Informacje o lokalizacji
Zgoda
Do 24 miesięcy.
Zapobieganie oszustwom w kontekście zabezpieczania konta
Metadane, adres IP, identyfikator urządzenia
Uzasadniony interes, a mianowicie interes mający na celu zapobieganie określonym rodzajom oszustw (SPIS RODZAJÓW)
Do 24 miesięcy.
Aby zapewnić, że usługa jest dozwolona w kraju użytkownika
Adres IP, informacje o lokalizacji
Obowiązek prawny
Do 24 miesięcy.
Wyświetlenie portfela osobistego i zapewnienie interfejsu do transakcji w ramach portfela
Adres portfela, dane dotyczące transakcji
Realizacja umowy
W tym kontekście nie są przechowywane żadne dane osobowe.
Wyświetlenie własnego identyfikatora World ID użytkownika i zapewnienie interfejsu do weryfikacji
Informacje o identyfikatorze World ID
Realizacja umowy
W tym kontekście nie są przechowywane żadne dane osobowe.
Wyświetlenie danych uwierzytelniających do samodzielnego przechowywania danych i zapewnienie interfejsu do udostępniania danych uwierzytelniających
Informacje na temat danych uwierzytelniających, informacje o ważności metody uwierzytelniania
Realizacja umowy
W tym kontekście nie są przechowywane żadne dane osobowe.
Analizowanie i ulepszanie naszych usług oraz prowadzenie badań w zakresie nauki o danych
Dane dotyczące użytkowania i metadane, dane dotyczące transakcji publicznych
Zgoda
Do 24 miesięcy.
Przestrzeganie obowiązujących przepisów prawa, takich jak przepisy dotyczące przeciwdziałania praniu pieniędzy i sankcje
Dane dotyczące transakcji, adres portfela
Obowiązek prawny
Czas korzystania z usług.
Zachowanie zgodności z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa, np. regulacjami przeciwdziałającymi nielegalnym treściom
Treść mini aplikacji
Obowiązek prawny
Czas korzystania z usług.
Umożliwienie prowadzenia komunikacji i marketingu
Adres e-mail, powiadomienia push
Prawnie uzasadniony interes
Do 24 miesięcy.
Korespondencja od użytkownika
Prawnie uzasadniony interes
Do 24 miesięcy.
Opinie użytkownika
Prawnie uzasadniony interes
Do 24 miesięcy.
obsługę żądań, skarg i zapytań użytkownika dotyczących obsługi klienta;
Informacje dotyczące komunikacji oraz adresów e-mail lub nazw profili w mediach społecznościowych, jeśli użytkownik chce się z nami skontaktować za pośrednictwem jednego z tych kanałów
Realizacja umowy
Zapewnienie płynnego działania aplikacji
Metadane
Realizacja umowy
Do 24 miesięcy.
Weryfikacja urządzenia
Dane identyfikatora World ID urządzenia (odcisk palca urządzenia)
Realizacja umowy
Czas korzystania z usług.
rozstrzyganie sporów, rozwiązywanie problemów i egzekwowanie postanowień naszych umów z użytkownikiem, w tym niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności i Regulaminu świadczenia usług;
Czas korzystania z usług.
Partnerzy biznesowi
Cel przetwarzania danych
Przetwarzane dane osobowe
Podstawa prawna przetwarzania
Okres przechowywania
komunikacja;
Numer telefonu, adres e-mail, imię i nazwisko
Uzasadnione interesy, tj. interes polegający na komunikacji z partnerami biznesowymi.
Czas trwania relacji biznesowej lub do momentu zażądania usunięcia danych.
Utrzymywanie i administrowanie relacjami biznesowymi
Numer telefonu, adres e-mail, imię i nazwisko, dane przedsiębiorstwa
Uzasadnione interesy, tj. interes polegający na utrzymywaniu i administrowaniu relacjami biznesowymi z partnerami biznesowymi.
Czas trwania relacji biznesowej lub do momentu zażądania usunięcia danych.
Realizacja zobowiązań w zakresie ZK
Dane dotyczące paszportu, dane przedsiębiorstwa
Obowiązek prawny
Czas trwania relacji biznesowej i do 3 lat po rozwiązaniu umowy.
Rozpatrzenie podania
Dane dotyczące podania o pracę
Zgoda i kroki podejmowane na wniosek osoby, której dane dotyczą, przed zawarciem umowy.
Domyślnie do 3 miesięcy lub dłużej, jeśli użytkownik zgodzi się na włączenie do puli talentów.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Declaração de Confidencialidade da Tools for Humanity
Obrigado por escolher fazer parte da Comunidade Worldcoin! A Worldcoin é um protocolo de código-fonte aberto, apoiado por uma comunidade global de programadores, indivíduos e outros contribuidores.
Esta Declaração de Confidencialidade abrange os dados que nos fornece através da sua utilização dos nossos websites, aplicações (“App”) e outros serviços associados a esta Declaração de Confidencialidade (coletivamente, os “Serviços”). Esta Declaração de Confidencialidade é regida pelos
Termos e Condições do Utilizador
(“Termos do Utilizador”), dos quais faz parte integrante. A Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), juntamente com a sua subsidiária alemã Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; coletivamente, “
TFH
” ou “
nós
,” “
nos
”), contribui para o desenvolvimento e crescimento do protocolo Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”), mas é diferente da Worldcoin Foundation, que controla o tratamento dos dados relacionados com o Orb.
1. Responsável pelo tratamento
Somos o responsável pelo tratamento de todos os “Dados da World App”, “Dados de Verificação de Credenciais” e outros “Dados Comerciais”: Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EUA. A TFH está estabelecida na União Europeia (“
UE
”) através da Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Dados da World App” refere-se a todos os dados pessoais recolhidos e tratados através da sua utilização da World App, tal como definido na Secção 5 abaixo, exceto quaisquer dados pessoais relacionados com a sua utilização do protocolo Worldcoin ou dos tokens Worldcoin (tais como o endereço da sua wallet e os dados de transações, que não controlamos).
Dados de Verificação de Credenciais refere-se aos dados tratados ao verificar uma credencial para a adicionar à sua World ID autodetida. Isto significa, por exemplo, ler o chip NFC do seu passaporte para armazenar com segurança as respetivas informações no seu dispositivo. Estes dados estão sob o seu controlo e, após verificar a validade da sua credencial, o TFH armazena um fragmento anonimizado de um valor hash de uma assinatura criptográfica única da sua credencial (por exemplo, passaporte) para garantir que cada credencial só pode ser adicionada a uma World ID uma vez.
“Dados comerciais” refere-se a todos os dados pessoais recolhidos e tratados através de outros meios pela nossa empresa quando comunica ou de qualquer outra forma trabalha ou interage connosco por correio eletrónico, videoconferência ou através dos nossos websites. Relativamente ao tratamento de dados no contexto da Orb App, consulte a Declaração de Confidencialidade da Orb App associada à Orb App. Relativamente ao tratamento de dados no contexto da recolha e teste de dados dedicados, consulte a respetiva Declaração de Confidencialidade de Recolha e Teste associada à sua app de teste. Relativamente ao tratamento no contexto do nosso website, consulte a nossa Política de Cookies associada ao nosso website.
2. Atualizações à presente Declaração de Confidencialidade
Por vezes, atualizamos esta Declaração de Confidencialidade. Se fizermos alterações importantes, tais como a forma como utilizamos as suas informações pessoais, será informado por e-mail ou por uma mensagem na sua App.
3. O que contém esta Declaração de Confidencialidade?
O nosso compromisso em proteger a sua privacidade e dados
Informações que recolhemos e porquê
Como utilizamos os dados que recolhemos
Onde é que tratamos os seus dados
Quando partilhamos os seus dados
Como são registados os seus dados na blockchain pública
Como utilizamos cookies
Durante quanto tempo conservamos os seus dados
Em que difere esta Declaração de Confidencialidade no que toca a crianças e adolescentes
Os seus direitos legais
Como contactar-nos sobre esta Declaração de Confidencialidade
4. O nosso compromisso em proteger a sua privacidade e dados
Estamos profundamente empenhados na proteção da sua privacidade e na segurança dos seus dados. Reconhecemos que só podemos cumprir a nossa missão de distribuir os nossos tokens digitais de forma justa ao maior número de pessoas possível se as pessoas confiarem em nós, e a privacidade e a segurança dos dados são fundamentais para conquistar a sua confiança.
Privacidade
Concebemos os nossos produtos e serviços tendo em mente a sua privacidade. Recolhemos dados para melhorar os nossos produtos e serviços. Iremos sempre informá-lo, seja aqui nesta Declaração de Confidencialidade ou em formulários de consentimento de dados para produtos ou serviços específicos, sobre os dados que estamos a recolher, porque os recolhemos e o que fazemos com eles.
Segurança de dados
Temos uma equipa dedicada para cuidar dos seus dados e implementámos salvaguardas físicas e eletrónicas que protegem os seus dados em trânsito e inativos (“em repouso”). Em contrapartida, nenhum serviço pode ser completamente seguro. Se tiver alguma preocupação sobre a sua conta ou os seus dados, contacte-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
ou escreva-nos para Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EUA.
5. Informações que recolhemos e porquê
5.1 Dados que nos fornece
Como utilizador, não é obrigado a fornecer quaisquer dados para aceder à App. No entanto, poderá ter de nos fornecer determinados dados para utilizar uma funcionalidade nos Serviços. Os fundamentos jurídicos para o tratamento dos dados, nos casos abaixo indicados, são o consentimento do utilizador e a execução de um contrato (o nosso compromisso de prestar os Serviços). Segue-se uma lista de dados que pode fornecer e dos fins para os quais poderemos utilizar os dados:
No contexto da World App:
Número de telefone.
Pode optar por introduzir o seu número de telefone para o associar à sua conta. Mediante a sua autorização, é possível que outros utilizadores encontrem a sua conta através do seu número de telefone. Poderemos exigir um número de telefone quando envia um pedido na qualidade titular de dados. O fundamento jurídico para o tratamento destes dados é a execução do Serviço ao abrigo dos Termos do Utilizador.
Nome de utilizador.
Pode associar um nome de utilizador ao endereço da sua wallet e alterar o nome de utilizador em qualquer momento.
Data de nascimento.
Pode divulgar a sua data de nascimento para garantir o cumprimento dos requisitos de restrição de idade. Nunca armazenaremos os seus dados de nascimento, mas apenas uma soma de verificação desses dados e se tem mais de 18 anos de idade ou não.
Comentários e correspondência recebida de si.
Estes incluem quaisquer e-mails, mensagens de chat ou outras comunicações que nos envia por e-mail ou websites de redes sociais de terceiros. Tal pode incluir o tratamento de endereços de e-mail ou nomes de perfil em redes sociais se tentar comunicar connosco por esses meios. Poderemos utilizar um fornecedor de serviços externo para facilitar a realização de inquéritos sobre a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços. O fundamento jurídico para o tratamento destes dados é a execução do Serviço ao abrigo dos Termos do Utilizador.
Contactos do livro de endereços.
Pode fornecer à App acesso ao seu livro de endereços para ativar a funcionalidade que lhe permite encontrar e interagir facilmente com outros utilizadores que figurem no seu livro de endereços. O fundamento jurídico para o tratamento destes dados é o interesse legítimo do titular em ser encontrado na App e o interesse do utilizador que partilha em encontrar os seus contactos na App.
Nota:
cabe-lhe a si garantir que a partilha das informações dos seus contactos está em conformidade com a legislação aplicável. Para tal, poderá ser necessário obter a autorização dos seus contactos, pelo que não deverá partilhar com a TFH quaisquer dados de contacto de outras pessoas sem o consentimento explícito das mesmas. Pode mudar de ideias e desativar o nosso acesso aos seus contactos em qualquer momento, nas definições do seu dispositivo. Se optar por importar os contactos do livro de endereços do seu dispositivo para a App, para saber qual dos seus contactos utiliza os nossos Serviços ou convidá-los a juntar-se a si através dos nossos Serviços, sincronizaremos periodicamente os seus números de telefone de contacto com esses números e endereços de wallet correspondentes, fornecidos por outros utilizadores, nos nossos servidores.
Informações de localização
. Pode decidir ativar um serviço baseado na localização (tal como uma funcionalidade que lhe permite encontrar um Operador Orb perto de si). Apenas com o seu consentimento específico, poderemos recolher informações sobre a sua localização através de GPS para permitir que o serviço baseado na localização lhe indique um Orb perto de si. Pode alterar as suas permissões, em qualquer momento, nas definições do seu dispositivo. Se o utilizador não estiver sediado na Coreia do Sul, também poderemos armazenar a sua localização aproximada dissociada da sua conta World App. Utilizamos estes dados para melhorar os nossos serviços, nomeadamente, mas sem caráter limitativo, a seleção de locais Orb.
P2P Marketplace
. Se o utilizar os Serviços do P2P Marketplace (quando disponíveis), que lhe permitem comprar tokens digitais de outros utilizadores, poderemos recolher informações adicionais, tais como o endereço da wallet, as informações de contacto (i.e., o seu número de telefone) e o número de conta associado à transação (tal como, o seu número M-PESA). Registamos os dados da transação como parte da prestação dos Serviços do P2P Marketplace. Também poderemos recolher informações adicionais para cumprir os requisitos de “conhecer o seu cliente” (Know Your Customer, KYC) aplicáveis.
Metadados do dispositivo.
Se estiver a utilizar a App, recolhemos metadados do seu dispositivo para garantir que a App está a funcionar corretamente e que o utilizador não está a infringir os nossos Termos e Condições. Isto inclui a recolha de identificadores de dispositivos e endereços IP.
Dados de World ID do dispositivo.
Também tratamos os metadados do seu dispositivo para calcular uma impressão digital única do dispositivo. O hash desta impressão digital serve como sinal que prova a singularidade do seu dispositivo com o World ID.
No contexto do tratamento de Dados Comerciais:
Nome próprio e apelido.
Poderemos tratar o seu nome próprio e apelido com base no interesse legítimo de manter e gerir uma relação comercial consigo.
Endereço de e-mail.
Pode também fornecer o seu e-mail para subscrever a nossa lista de distribuição para se manter a par do projeto Worldcoin. Poderemos exigir o seu e-mail quando envia um pedido na qualidade de titular de dados. Poderemos tratar o seu endereço de e-mail com base no interesse legítimo de manter e gerir uma relação comercial consigo.
Número de telefone.
Poderemos tratar o seu número de telefone com base no interesse legítimo de manter e gerir uma relação comercial consigo.
Dados empresariais
. Se tiver uma relação comercial connosco (como, por exemplo, se for um Operador Orb ou um fornecedor), poderemos solicitar informações como nomes, endereço postal, e-mail, número de telefone, endereço da wallet e outra documentação (como o seu ID emitido pelo Governo) como parte da promoção dessa relação comercial e para satisfazer as nossas obrigações relativas a “conhecer os seus clientes”. Poderemos recorrer a serviços externos, como o Onfido, para nos ajudar a recolher e analisar as informações e a documentação acima referidas, a fim de cumprir as obrigações relativas a “conhecer os seus clientes”.
Dados da candidatura
. Se quiser trabalhar connosco, tem de nos enviar a sua candidatura, incluindo a sua carta de apresentação e o seu CV, bem como as informações pessoais que pretende divulgar.
Pode encontrar uma descrição pormenorizada do fundamento jurídico para o tratamento de cada uma das atividades de tratamento de dados referidas anteriormente no
ANEXO I – Fundamentos jurídicos para as atividades de tratamento de dados da Tools for Humanity
no final desta declaração de confidencialidade.
5.2 Dados que recolhemos de fontes terceiras
Ocasionalmente, poderemos obter informações sobre si junto das seguintes fontes terceiras:
Dados de blockchain
. Poderemos analisar dados de blockchain públicos para garantir que as partes que utilizam os nossos Serviços não estão envolvidas em atividades ilegais ou proibidas ao abrigo dos Termos do Utilizador, e para analisar tendências de transações para fins de investigação e desenvolvimento.
Serviços de verificação de identidade
. Poderemos obter informações junto de serviços de terceiros que utilizam os seus dados para verificar a sua identidade, quando exigido por lei (tais como requisitos aplicáveis do conhecimento do seu cliente). Para que fique claro,
não
utilizamos os seus dados biométricos quando verificamos a sua identidade, conforme exigido por lei.
Bases de dados de talentos
. Poderemos recolher dados de várias fontes para fazer ofertas de emprego a indivíduos talentosos.
5.3 Dados que recolhemos automaticamente
Se permitido pela lei aplicável, poderemos recolher automaticamente determinados tipos de dados quando interage com os nossos Serviços. Estas informações ajudam-nos a resolver problemas de apoio ao cliente, melhorar o desempenho dos Serviços, proporcionar-lhe uma experiência simplificada e personalizada e proteger as credenciais da sua Conta. A informação recolhida automaticamente inclui:
Identificadores online:
Informações de localização geográfica e de monitorização (ver acima), sistema operativo de computador ou telemóvel, nome e versão do navegador de Internet e endereços IP. Em casos muito limitados, estes dados são também introduzidos no nosso sistema de deteção de fraudes e de fluxos financeiros ilícitos. Também servem para proporcionar uma experiência estável e sem fraudes no nosso software.
Dados de utilização:
Dados de autenticação, perguntas de segurança e outros dados recolhidos através de cookies e tecnologias semelhantes.
Cookies
: pequenos ficheiros de dados armazenados no seu disco rígido ou na memória do seu dispositivo que nos ajudam a melhorar os nossos Serviços e a sua experiência, ver que áreas e funcionalidades dos nossos Serviços são populares e contar visitas. Para saber qual é o fundamento jurídico para o tratamento desses dados, consulte a nossa
Política de Cookies
, onde explicamos os diferentes tipos de cookies que utilizamos.
Da mesma forma, a App recolhe informações para fins de resolução de problemas e melhoria. Utilizamos serviços de terceiros, tais como Segment.io ou PostHog, para visualizar informações agregadas sobre a utilização e interações do utilizador final. Sempre que possível, tomamos medidas para minimizar ou mascarar as informações enviadas a terceiros (tal como codificar os dados).
5.4 Dados anonimizados e agregados
A anonimização é uma técnica de tratamento de dados que descaracteriza os dados enquanto dados pessoais, já que, uma vez anonimizados, os dados deixam de poder ser associados a uma pessoa específica. Alguns exemplos de dados anonimizados incluem:
Dados de transações
Dados de fluxos de cliques
Métricas de desempenho
Indicadores de fraude (embora os dados pessoais também sejam utilizados para este fim)
Também agregamos dados, combinando grandes quantidades de informação de modo a que esta deixe de identificar ou fazer referência a um indivíduo. Utilizamos dados anónimos ou agregados para as nossas finalidades comerciais, tais como para compreender as necessidades e os comportamentos dos utilizadores, melhorar os nossos Serviços, realizar análises comerciais e de marketing, detetar ameaças à segurança e treinar os nossos algoritmos.
O fundamento jurídico para o tratamento dos dados acima mencionados é o interesse legítimo de manter uma app ou um website em funcionamento, obter perspetivas comerciais e prevenir fraudes.
6. Como utilizamos os dados que recolhemos
6.1 Descrição geral
Temos de ter um motivo válido (ou “fundamento jurídico para o tratamento”) para utilizar as suas informações pessoais. Em alguns casos, a utilização das suas informações pessoais não requer o seu consentimento prévio. Utilizamos os seus dados para as seguintes finalidades:
Fornecer e manter os nossos produtos e serviços ao abrigo dos Termos do Utilizador. Estes serviços incluem:
a App onde os utilizadores podem gerir o seu World ID e tokens digitais, bem como aprender sobre criptomoedas em geral e o projeto Worldcoin em particular;
a Operator App onde os Operadores Orb podem gerir e supervisionar os seus Orbs sob gestão e as suas estatísticas;
o Marketplace P2P onde ligamos os utilizadores a agentes (não se aplica a utilizadores sediados ou residentes na Alemanha ou que tenham a sua residência habitual ou sede social na Alemanha);
Melhorar e desenvolver os nossos produtos e serviços, incluindo detetar e reparar erros nos nossos Serviços.
Realizar investigação no domínio da ciência de dados.
Analisar a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços a fim de prestar um melhor apoio ao cliente.
Permitir que publique informações numa blockchain para provar a sua singularidade.
Utilizar o endereço da sua wallet para lhe enviar tokens digitais que suportamos.
Cumprir a legislação aplicável, como a lei de combate ao branqueamento de capitais e sanções. Isto implica:
utilizar o seu endereço IP para bloquear indivíduos cujo país não lhes permite aceder aos Serviços;
responder a pedidos de titulares de dados ao abrigo das leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis, como pedidos de acesso ou apagamento;
monitorizar fluxos financeiros potencialmente ilícitos, por exemplo, de wallets na lista negra; e
cumprir a legislação aplicável, como regulamentos contra conteúdos ilegais.
Tratar os seus pedidos de assistência ao cliente, reclamações e questões.
Resolver litígios, solucionar problemas e fazer cumprir os acordos que temos consigo, incluindo esta Declaração de Confidencialidade e os Termos do Utilizador.
Contactá-lo sobre atualizações aos Serviços.
6.2 Credenciais
A TFH permite-lhe armazenar determinadas credenciais localmente no seu dispositivo para as partilhar na infraestrutura “zero knowledge” do protocolo World ID (“Credenciais”). No contexto das Credenciais, tratamos estes dados das seguintes formas:
Verificamos a validade da sua credencial (no caso dos passaportes, isto funciona através do certificado raiz do seu país).
Autenticamos o utilizador como o titular legítimo da credencial (no caso dos passaportes, isto funciona localmente no seu dispositivo através de uma fotografia do seu rosto (selfie) que nunca é armazenada).
Encriptamos, assinamos e armazenamos os dados da sua credencial num ambiente seguro no seu dispositivo.
Nunca temos acesso às informações pessoais contidas na sua credencial.
Posteriormente, pode partilhar seletivamente estas informações com pessoas de confiança através das proteções do protocolo World ID (por exemplo, pode provar que tem, pelo menos, 18 anos de idade sem revelar a sua idade exata ou quem é).
No caso dos passaportes, a TFH apenas mantém um fragmento anonimizado de um valor hash de uma assinatura criptográfica única do seu passaporte, para garantir que cada passaporte só pode ser verificado uma vez.
Este tratamento baseia-se no seu consentimento e nunca obtemos acesso aos seus dados pessoais que constam no seu passaporte, que são armazenados no seu dispositivo. Pode eliminar estes dados do seu telefone eliminando a World App.
6.3 Dados da World ID
A sua World ID (ou seja, o número secreto necessário para a utilizar) é guardada apenas no seu dispositivo (caso tenha uma cópia de segurança, existe uma cópia encriptada na sua cópia de segurança). Nem a TFH nem nenhuma outra entidade tem acesso à sua World ID. Pode utilizar a sua World ID anonimamente. Sempre que utilizar a World ID com uma nova aplicação, a aplicação apenas recebe um número descartável (“Anonimizador”) que não revela a sua World ID. Isto é possibilitado através de Comprovativos “Zero-Knowledge” (apenas comprova que tem uma World ID verificada, mas não qual) e garante que a sua World ID não pode ser utilizada para o localizar em várias aplicações. Tal significa que a World ID não é uma ID de utilizador geral para a Internet.
Os comprovativos World ID funcionam através de um protocolo aberto que acede a uma árvore de Merkle pública dos hashes de World ID verificados. A World ID não é um serviço centralizado, mas sim um protocolo ao qual qualquer pessoa pode aceder. Oferecemos API para facilitar o acesso à árvore de Merkle e a Comprovativos World ID, mas nunca recebemos quaisquer dados pessoais neste contexto.
É importante notar que também não tratamos quaisquer dados relacionados com a sua World ID que nos permitam identificá-lo. Todos os dados pessoais tratados no contexto da World App, nomeadamente o endereço da sua wallet e dados de transações, foram deliberadamente concebidos para serem dissociados dos dados da World ID.
7. Onde é que tratamos os seus dados
7.1 Transferência de dados.
Quando nos fornece os seus dados, estes podem ser transferidos, armazenados ou tratados num local fora daquele em que os seus dados foram originalmente recolhidos. O país para o qual os seus dados são transferidos, ou no qual são armazenados ou tratados, pode não ter as mesmas leis de proteção de dados que o país onde forneceu inicialmente os dados.
Envidamos os melhores esforços para cumprir os princípios declarados em cada jurisdição relativamente às leis de privacidade. Apenas partilhamos dados com responsáveis pelo tratamento de dados fora da sua jurisdição se essa transferência for lícita e se estivermos confiantes de que o subcontratante protegerá os seus dados conforme exigido pelas leis aplicáveis e, além disso, de acordo com as nossas normas.
7.2 Riscos da transferência
Segue-se uma lista de possíveis riscos que podem surgir se transferirmos os seus dados para os Estados Unidos, a União Europeia ou outro país. Em seguida, resumimos também a forma como mitigamos os respetivos riscos.
Apesar de fazermos o possível para garantir que os nossos subcontratantes estão contratualmente obrigados a proteger adequadamente os seus dados, estes subcontratantes podem não estar sujeitos à lei de privacidade de dados do seu país. Se os subcontratantes tratarem ilegalmente os seus dados sem autorização, poderá ser difícil invocar os seus direitos de privacidade contra esse subcontratante. Mitigamos este risco ao celebrarmos acordos rigorosos de tratamento de dados com os nossos subcontratantes, que os obrigam a proteger os dados ao nível do RGPD e a satisfazer os pedidos dos participantes.
É possível que a legislação em matéria de privacidade de dados no seu país seja incompatível com a dos EUA ou da UE. Tentamos sempre observar as normas mais rigorosas de proteção de dados a que estamos sujeitos.
É possível que os seus dados estejam sujeitos a acesso governamental por parte de funcionários e autoridades públicas. Nestes casos, comprometemo-nos a contestar em tribunal qualquer pedido de acesso governamental inválido, excessivo ou ilegal. Utilizamos ainda encriptação avançada para impedir o acesso não autorizado.
De notar que esta lista contém exemplos, mas pode não incluir todos os riscos possíveis para si.
7.3 Quadro de Privacidade de Dados para transferências de dados para os EUA
A TFH cumpre o disposto no Quadro de Privacidade de Dados UE-EUA (QPD UE-EUA), a extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA, e o Quadro de Privacidade de Dados Suíça-EUA (QPD Suíça-EUA), conforme estabelecidos pelo Departamento de Comércio dos EUA. A TFH certificou perante o Departamento de Comércio dos EUA que cumpre os Princípios do Quadro de Privacidade de Dados UE-EUA (Princípios do QPD UE-EUA) no que diz respeito ao tratamento de dados pessoais recebidos da União Europeia com base no QPD UE-EUA e do Reino Unido (e Gibraltar) com base na extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA. A TFH certificou perante o Departamento de Comércio dos EUA que cumpre os Princípios do Quadro de Privacidade de Dados Suíça-EUA (Princípios do QPD Suíça-EUA) no que diz respeito ao tratamento de dados pessoais recebidos da Suíça com base no QPD Suíça-EUA. Em caso de conflito entre os termos da presente Declaração do Quadro de Privacidade de Dados e o Princípios do QPD UE-EUA e/ou os Princípios do QPD Suíça-EUA, regem os Princípios. Para mais informações sobre o programa do Quadro de Privacidade de Dados (QPD) e para ver a nossa certificação, visite
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
A TFH é responsável pelo tratamento de dados pessoais que recebe ao abrigo do QPD e que subsequentemente transfere para um terceiro que atua como agente em seu nome. A TFH cumpre os Princípios do QPD em todas as transferências de dados pessoais com origem na UE, no Reino Unido e na Suíça, incluindo as disposições relativas à responsabilidade por transferências subsequentes.
A Comissão Federal do Comércio tem jurisdição sobre a conformidade da TFH com o QPD UE-EUA, a extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA e o QPD Suíça-EUA. Em determinadas situações, a TFH pode ser obrigada a divulgar dados pessoais em resposta a pedidos legais por parte de autoridades públicas, incluindo para cumprir requisitos de segurança nacional ou de aplicação da lei.
Em conformidade com o QPD UE-EUA, a extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA e o QPD Suíça-EUA, a TFH compromete-se a resolver reclamações sobre a nossa recolha e utilização das suas informações pessoais relacionadas com os Princípios do QPD. As pessoas da UE, do Reino Unido e da Suíça com questões ou queixas relativamente ao nosso tratamento de dados pessoais recebidos com base no QPD UE-EUA, na extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA e no QPD Suíça-EUA devem, numa primeira instância, contactar a TFH através do e-mail dpo@worldcoin.org
Em conformidade com o QPD UE-EUA, a extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA e o QPD Suíça-EUA, a TFH compromete-se a cooperar e cumprir, respetivamente, com as orientações do painel estabelecido pelas autoridades de proteção de dados (APD) da UE, o Gabinete do Comissário de Informação (Information Commissioner’s Office, ICO) do Reino Unido, a Autoridade Reguladora de Gibraltar (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) e o Comissário Federal de Proteção de Dados e Informação (Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, FDPIC) da Suíça no que diz respeito a reclamações não resolvidas relativas ao nosso tratamento de dados pessoais recebidos com base no QPD UE-EUA, na extensão do Reino Unido ao QPD UE-EUA e no QPD Suíça-EUA.
Para reclamações relativas à conformidade com o QPD que não tenham sido resolvidas por qualquer um dos outros mecanismos do QPD, tem a possibilidade, em determinadas condições, de invocar arbitragem vinculativa. Encontrará mais informações no website oficial do QPD.
8. Quando partilhamos os seus dados
Nunca venderemos os seus dados.
Quando partilhamos os seus dados fora da nossa empresa, iremos sempre:
partilhar de forma razoavelmente segura;
tomar medidas para garantir que são tratados de forma consistente com o nosso compromisso para com a sua privacidade; e
proibir outras empresas de os utilizarem para os seus próprios fins.
Partilhamos os seus dados das seguintes formas limitadas:
Com a Worldcoin Foundation:
poderemos atuar como subcontratantes da Worldcoin Foundation para a recolha de dados pessoais em nome da Worldcoin (consulte a declaração de confidencialidade da Worldcoin para mais informações).
Dentro da nossa organização:
apenas divulgamos dados aos membros da nossa equipa que necessitem de acesso para o desempenho das suas tarefas e funções. Apenas divulgamos os dados necessários para fins de cumprimento de tarefas e funções específicas e temos um sistema rigoroso de controlo de acessos.
Com fornecedores e prestadores de serviços fora da nossa organização:
apenas divulgamos dados a prestadores de serviços em cujos serviços confiamos, para tratar os dados e prestar-lhe os nossos Serviços. Apenas divulgamos dados a operadores de verificação de identidade se tal for exigido por Lei (ou seja, requisitos de “conhecer o seu cliente”).
As categorias desses prestadores de serviços são:
Prestadores de serviços em nuvem (todos os tipos de dados)
Fornecedores SaaS; utilizamos produtos SaaS das seguintes categorias:
Gestão de bases de dados e de infraestruturas
Segurança de dados
Recrutamento
Comunicação
Inquéritos
KYC/KYB, ou seja, verificação de documentos oficiais
Gestão de pedidos de titulares de dados
Assistência técnica
Apoio ao utilizador
Especialistas externos
Programadores de software especializados
Especialistas jurídicos
Consultores fiscais
Bancos
Prestadores de serviços de rotulagem (apenas sob salvaguardas especiais)
Serviços de verificação de antecedentes para candidatos e Operadores Orb.
Com autoridades policiais, funcionários públicos e outras entidades externas:
Poderemos divulgar os seus dados para dar cumprimento às leis aplicáveis e responder a exigências legais obrigatórias. Consideraremos cuidadosamente cada pedido para determinar se está com conformidade com a lei e, sempre que apropriado, podemos contestar pedidos inválidos, excessivos ou ilegais. Poderemos partilhar dados pessoais com a polícia e outras autoridades governamentais quando tivermos motivos razoáveis para acreditar que tal é necessário para dar cumprimento à lei, a um regulamento ou outro processo ou obrigação legal.
Poderemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais se tivermos motivos para acreditar que as suas ações contrariam os nossos Termos de Utilizador, que violou a lei ou que tal é necessário para proteger os nossos direitos, propriedade e segurança, os nossos utilizadores, o público ou outrem.
Poderemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais com os nossos advogados e outros consultores profissionais sempre que tal for necessário para obter aconselhamento ou de outra forma proteger e gerir os nossos interesses comerciais.
Poderemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais no âmbito de ou durante negociações relativas a qualquer fusão, venda de ativos da empresa, financiamento ou aquisição de toda ou parte da nossa atividade por outra empresa.
Os dados, incluindo as suas informações pessoais, podem ser partilhados entre as nossas atuais e futuras empresas-mãe, afiliadas e subsidiárias e outras empresas sob controlo e propriedade comuns.
Poderemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais com o seu consentimento ou sob as suas instruções.
9. Como são registados os seus dados na blockchain pública
As informações de transação relacionadas com a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços podem ser registadas numa blockchain pública.
Nota:
As blockchains são livros-razão públicos de transações que são mantidas em redes descentralizadas operadas por terceiros que não são controladas ou operadas pela Worldcoin. Devido à natureza pública e imutável dos livros-razão da blockchain, não podemos garantir a capacidade de alterar, apagar ou controlar a divulgação dos dados carregados e armazenados numa blockchain
10. Como utilizamos cookies
Utilizamos cookies como forma de melhorar o funcionamento dos nossos Serviços. Para além dos cookies, poderemos utilizar outras tecnologias semelhantes, como web beacons, para rastrear os utilizadores dos nossos Serviços. Os web beacons (também conhecidos como “clear gifs”) são pequenos gráficos com um identificador único, que funcionam de forma idêntica aos cookies. A nossa
Política de Cookies
, aqui incorporada por referência.
Também utilizamos o Google Analytics. Para mais informações sobre como o Google utiliza os seus dados, quando utilizar os websites e aplicações dos seus parceiros visite:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Ao utilizar os Serviços, está a dar o seu consentimento ao armazenamento e acesso, por nós, a cookies e outros dados no seu computador ou dispositivo móvel, bem como à nossa utilização do Google Analytics, no âmbito dessas atividades. Leia as informações na ligação fornecida para compreender o âmbito do seu consentimento.
11. Durante quanto tempo mantemos os seus dados?
Salvo disposição em contrário na legislação aplicável, conservamos os seus dados durante o tempo razoavelmente necessário para lhe prestar os nossos Serviços, servir os nossos fins comerciais legítimos e cumprir as nossas obrigações legais e regulamentares. Se fechar a sua conta, eliminaremos os respetivos dados no prazo de um mês; caso contrário, fá-lo-emos após 2 anos de inatividade. Se exigido por lei, continuaremos a conservar os seus dados pessoais conforme necessário para cumprir as nossas obrigações legais e regulamentares, incluindo de monitorização, deteção e prevenção de fraudes, bem como obrigações fiscais, contabilísticas e financeiras.
Nota:
Blockchains são redes descentralizadas de terceiros que não controlamos ou operamos. Devido à natureza pública e imutável da tecnologia blockchain, não podemos alterar, apagar ou controlar a divulgação de dados armazenados em blockchains.
12. Em que difere esta Declaração de Confidencialidade no que toca a crianças e adolescentes
Os indivíduos com idade inferior a 18 anos não estão autorizados a utilizar os Serviços e não recolhemos intencionalmente dados de indivíduos com idade inferior a 18 anos. Se tiver motivos para acreditar que o seu filho com menos de 18 anos obteve acesso aos Serviços sem a sua autorização, pode solicitar o apagamento dos seus dados contactando-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
Se tivermos conhecimento de que recolhemos dados sobre uma criança com menos de 18 anos, eliminaremos esses dados o mais rapidamente possível. Tomámos medidas, tais como a implementação de um modelo de IA de deteção de idade automatizado, de instruções para operadores e autoconfirmações, para restringir a utilização dos Serviços a pessoas com, pelo menos, 18 anos de idade. Não publicitamos produtos ou serviços a crianças.
13. Como contactar-nos sobre esta Declaração de Confidencialidade
Pode optar por eliminar os seus dados da App através do menu Definições. Se tiver dúvidas ou preocupações relativamente a esta Declaração de Confidencialidade, se pretender exercer os seus direitos ou contactar o nosso Encarregado da Proteção de Dados (EPD), envie o seu pedido através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
ou escreva-nos para Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EUA ou
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Respondemos a todos os pedidos que recebemos de indivíduos que desejam exercer os seus direitos de proteção de dados de acordo com as leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis. Também pode eliminar os seus dados da World App.
Se tiver uma questão relativamente à privacidade ou utilização de dados que não tenha sido resolvida de forma satisfatória, contacte a entidade reguladora de proteção de dados da sua jurisdição. Se reside na UE, pode encontrar o seu regulador de proteção de dados
aqui
.
14. Os seus direitos
Estes direitos aplicam-se contanto que nos seja possível identificar o requerente na nossa base de dados e não violemos os direitos de outros titulares de dados ao exercer os direitos do requerente:
Tem o direito de obter da nossa parte, em qualquer momento e mediante pedido, informações sobre os dados pessoais que tratamos e que lhe dizem respeito. Tem o direito de receber da nossa parte os dados pessoais que lhe dizem respeito.
Tem o direito de exigir da nossa parte a correção imediata dos dados pessoais que lhe dizem respeito, se estiverem incorretos.
Tem o direito de exigir da nossa parte a eliminação dos dados pessoais que lhe dizem respeito. Estes pré-requisitos preveem, nomeadamente, o direito ao apagamento se os dados pessoais deixarem de ser necessários para os efeitos para que foram recolhidos ou tratados, desde que sejam cumpridos os requisitos relativos ao apagamento previstos na legislação aplicável (por exemplo, as leis de várias jurisdições obrigam-nos a conservar as informações sobre transações durante um determinado período de tempo)
O utilizador tem o direito de retirar livremente o seu consentimento a qualquer tratamento de dados que dependa do seu consentimento ou de se opor ao tratamento de dados se este não depender do consentimento.
15. ADENDAS
Seguem-se várias adendas que fornecem informações legalmente exigidas para os respetivos mercados em que operamos. Dependendo da região em que o titular de dados reside, esta informação faz parte do consentimento. Estas informações podem diferir das informações disponíveis no seu local de residência, uma vez que bloqueamos o acesso a determinados serviços em certas jurisdições. Em caso de divergência com o acima exposto, prevalece a declaração mais específica sobre a jurisdição em causa:
Adenda A: Espaço Económico Europeu (“EEE”) e Reino Unido (“Reino Unido”)
Se estiver no EEE ou no Reino Unido, o que se segue aplica-se a si: Tem, pelo menos, os seguintes direitos. Pode ter direitos adicionais ao abrigo do Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados, Regulamento UE 2016/679 de 27.04.2016 (“RGPD”), conforme abaixo indicado. Para exercer os direitos que lhe assistem ao abrigo do RGPD, contacte-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
. Salvo em casos excecionais, daremos resposta ao seu pedido no prazo legal de um mês. A utilização da palavra RGPD na secção que se segue inclui também o RGPD do Reino Unido transposto para a legislação nacional do Reino Unido como Lei de Proteção de Dados do Reino Unido de 2018 e mantido como parte da legislação de Inglaterra e do País de Gales, da Escócia e da Irlanda do Norte em virtude da
secção 3
da Lei da União Europeia (Retirada) de 2018 e com as alterações introduzidas pelo
Anexo
1
ao Regulamento sobre Proteção de Dados, Privacidade e Comunicações Eletrónicas (Alterações, etc.) (Saída da UE) de 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Os direitos estatutários ao abrigo do RGPD
Esta secção aplica-se se o tratamento dos seus dados estiver abrangido pelo âmbito de aplicação do RGPD (
por exemplo
, se residir no EEE ou no Reino Unido). Pode ter direitos adicionais ao abrigo do RGPD, conforme abaixo se indica. Para exercer os direitos que lhe assistem ao abrigo do RGPD, contacte-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
De acordo com o Art.º 15.º do RGPD, tem o direito de obter da nossa parte, em qualquer momento e mediante pedido, informações sobre os dados pessoais que tratamos e que lhe dizem respeito.
Tem o direito de exigir da nossa parte a correção imediata dos dados pessoais que lhe dizem respeito, se estiverem incorretos.
Tem o direito, nas condições descritas no Art.º 17.º do RGPD, de exigir da nossa parte a eliminação dos dados pessoais que lhe dizem respeito. Estes pré-requisitos preveem, nomeadamente, o direito ao apagamento se os dados pessoais deixarem de ser necessários para os efeitos para que foram recolhidos ou tratados, bem como em casos de tratamento ilícito, de existência de uma objeção ou de uma obrigação de apagamento nos termos do direito da União ou do direito do Estado-Membro a que estamos sujeitos.
Nos termos do Art.º 18.º do RGPD, tem o direito de exigir da nossa parte a limitação do tratamento.
Nos termos do Art.º 20.º do RGPD, tem o direito de receber da nossa parte os dados pessoais que nos forneceu num formato estruturado, de uso corrente e de leitura automática.
Nos termos do Artigo 21.º do RGPD, tem o direito de se opor em qualquer momento, por motivos relacionados com a sua situação particular, ao tratamento de dados pessoais que lhe digam respeito, com base, inter alia, na alínea f), número 1, Artigo 6.º do RGPD.
Tem o direito de contactar a autoridade de controlo competente em caso de reclamações sobre o tratamento de dados realizado pelo responsável pelo tratamento. A autoridade de controlo responsável é a Secretaria de Estado da Baviera para a Supervisão da Proteção de Dados (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Se o tratamento de dados pessoais se basear no seu consentimento, tem o direito, nos termos do Art.º 7.º do RGPD, de revogar o seu consentimento para a utilização dos seus dados pessoais em qualquer altura com efeitos futuros, sendo a revogação tão fácil de declarar como o próprio consentimento. Note-se que a revogação só produz efeitos para o futuro. O tratamento efetuado antes da revogação não é afetado.
A.2 Transferência de dados
Quando transferimos dados para um país que não prevê uma decisão de adequação, utilizamos as Cláusulas Contratuais-Tipo da UE. Atualmente, apenas transferimos dados pessoais para os EUA.
Se o tratamento de dados pessoais se basear no seu consentimento, tem o direito, nos termos do Art.º 7.º do RGPD, de revogar o seu consentimento para a utilização dos seus dados pessoais em qualquer altura com efeitos futuros, sendo a revogação tão fácil de declarar como o próprio consentimento. Note-se que a revogação só produz efeitos para o futuro. O tratamento efetuado antes da revogação não é afetado. Tenha também em atenção que o tratamento que não dependa de um consentimento não é afetado pela retirada do consentimento.
ADENDA B: JAPÃO
Se reside no Japão, também se lhe aplica o seguinte.
B1. Informações sobre os regulamentos japoneses
Cumprimos legislação e regulamentação japonesa, incluindo a Lei sobre a Proteção de Informações Pessoais do Japão (“APPI”). Esta secção aplica-se ao nosso tratamento de “informações pessoais”, conforme definido na APPI, com precedência sobre as outras partes deste Formulário de Consentimento de Dados Biométricos
Cumprimos legislação e regulamentação japonesa, incluindo a Lei sobre a Proteção de Informações Pessoais do Japão (“APPI”). Esta secção aplica-se ao nosso tratamento de “informações pessoais”, conforme definido na APPI, com precedência sobre as outras partes desta Declaração de Confidencialidade.
B2. Partilha de dados
Exceto quando permitido pela legislação aplicável, não divulgamos, vendemos, fornecemos, partilhamos ou transferimos as informações pessoais do utilizador a terceiros.
B3. Medidas de controlo de segurança
Tomamos as medidas necessárias e apropriadas para evitar qualquer fuga, perda ou danos no que diz respeito às suas informações pessoais que estejam a ser tratadas, e para manter a segurança das informações pessoais, tais como o estabelecimento de regras para o tratamento das informações pessoais, a monitorização regular do tratamento das informações pessoais, a formação regular dos colaboradores em matéria de tratamento das informações pessoais, a prevenção do roubo ou perda de equipamento utilizado para tratar as informações pessoais e a implementação de controlos de acesso. Também supervisionamos de forma adequada os nossos contratantes e colaboradores que lidam com informações pessoais. Poderá obter mais informações sobre as medidas de controlo de segurança em vigor relativamente ao tratamento das suas informações pessoais contactando-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
B4. Informações de referência sobre o tratamento de dados pessoais em países estrangeiros
Os seus dados pessoais são tratados na UE e nos EUA.
B5. Os direitos estatutários ao abrigo da APPI
Para exercer os seus direitos previstos na APPI, contacte-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
ADENDA C: ARGENTINA
Se tem domicílio na República Argentina, informamos que a AGÊNCIA DE ACESSO À INFORMAÇÃO PÚBLICA, na sua qualidade de Órgão de Controlo da Lei n.º 25.326, tem competência para receber as queixas e reclamações apresentadas por aqueles cujos direitos sejam lesados pelo incumprimento das normas em vigor em matéria de proteção de dados pessoais.
A Agência pode ser contactada da seguinte forma:
Endereço: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5.º andar - Cidade Autónoma de Buenos Aires
Código postal: C1067ABP
Número de telemóvel: (54-11) 3988-3968
E-mail: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADENDA D: SINGAPURA
Se reside em Singapura, o que se segue aplica-se a si:
D1. Recolha, utilização e divulgação dos seus dados pessoais
Se reside em Singapura e mediante o seu consentimento, recolheremos, utilizaremos ou divulgaremos os seus dados pessoais para cada uma das finalidades definidas na nossa declaração de confidencialidade. Pode exercer o seu direito de retirar o seu consentimento em qualquer momento, mas tenha em atenção que poderemos não conseguir continuar a prestar-lhe os nossos serviços, dependendo da natureza e do âmbito do seu pedido. De notar também que a retirada do consentimento não prejudica o nosso direito de continuar a recolher, utilizar e divulgar dados pessoais quando essa recolha, utilização e divulgação sem consentimento for permitida ou exigida pela legislação aplicável.[1]
D2. Exercício dos seus direitos enquanto titular dos dados
Pode controlar os dados pessoais que recolhemos e exercer qualquer um dos direitos contactando-nos através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
. Procuramos responder ao seu pedido assim que possível, normalmente no prazo de 30 dias. Será antecipadamente informado, caso não nos seja possível responder ao seu pedido no prazo de 30 dias ou satisfazer o seu pedido, bem como dos motivos.[2]
Nos casos permitidos por lei, poderemos cobrar uma taxa administrativa para satisfazer o seu pedido.
D3. Transferência dos seus dados pessoais para outros países
Se reside em Singapura e tivermos recolhido os seus dados, poderemos também transferi-los ocasionalmente para fora do país. No entanto, garantiremos sempre que os seus dados pessoais continuam a beneficiar de um nível de proteção que seja, pelo menos, comparável ao previsto na Lei de Proteção de Dados Pessoais de Singapura de 2012, por exemplo, através da utilização das Cláusulas Contratuais Normalizadas da ASEAN.
ADENDA E – COREIA SUL
Esta Adenda para Titulares de Dados Coreanos explica as nossas práticas no que diz respeito às informações pessoais que tratamos no âmbito da sua relação connosco, caso seja um titular de dados coreano.
E.1 – Transferência de informações pessoais
Fornecemos informações pessoais ou subcontratamos as operações de tratamento a entidades terceiras, tal como seguidamente se indica:
- Fornecimento de informações pessoais a terceiros
Nome do destinatário
Finalidades de utilização pelo destinatário
Elementos de informação pessoal fornecidos ao destinatário
Períodos de conservação pelo destinatário
Tools for Humanity GmbH
As finalidades descritas no presente aviso na secção 6 supra.
Os pontos descritos no presente aviso na secção 5 supra
Os períodos de armazenamento definidos neste aviso na secção 11 supra.
- Subcontratação do tratamento de informações pessoais a terceiros:
Nesta hiperligação, encontra uma lista de todos os tratamentos de dados subcontratados e as respetivas empresas:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
s:https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Poderemos subcontratar entidades terceiras localizadas fora da Coreia para o tratamento das suas informações pessoais e/ou transferir-lhes a suas informações pessoais para fins de armazenamento:
Se não pretender transferir as suas informações pessoais para o estrangeiro, pode recusar, não aceitando a transferência de informações pessoais ou solicitando-nos a suspensão de transferências transfronteiriças. Contudo, se o fizer, poderá não conseguir utilizar os nossos serviços. O fundamento jurídico para a transferência transfronteiriça de informações pessoais atrás referida é o facto de constituir “tratamento ou armazenamento externalizado de informações pessoais que são necessários para a celebração e execução de um contrato com o titular de dados”, tendo as matérias prescritas por lei sido divulgadas na política de privacidade (alínea iii) do n.º 1 do artigo 28-8.º da Lei de Proteção de Informações Pessoais).
E.2 – Destruição de informações pessoais
Quando as informações pessoais deixam de ser necessárias por ter expirado o prazo de conservação ou realização da finalidade do tratamento, etc., as informações pessoais devem ser imediatamente destruídas. O tratamento e o método de destruição são indicados a seguir:
1) Processo de Destruição: Selecionamos determinados elementos de informação pessoal que devem ser destruídos e destruímo-los com a aprovação do DPO.
2) Método de Destruição: Destruímos as informações pessoais registadas e armazenadas sob a forma de ficheiros eletrónicos utilizando um método técnico (por exemplo, formatação de baixo nível) para garantir que os registos não podem ser reproduzidos, ao passo que as informações pessoais registadas e armazenadas sob a forma de documentos em papel são trituradas ou incineradas.
E.3 – Armazenamento de informações pessoais
Se formos obrigados a conservar as suas informações pessoais de acordo com a legislação aplicável, fá-lo-emos para os seguintes fins e durante os períodos exigidos pela legislação aplicável.
E.4 – Os seus direitos
Pode exercer os seus direitos relacionados com as informações pessoais junto de nós, incluindo através de um pedido de acesso, modificação ou eliminação ou suspensão do tratamento das suas informações pessoais, tal como previsto na legislação aplicável, incluindo na Lei de Proteção de Informações Pessoais. Pode também exercer o seu direito de retirar o consentimento para a recolha/utilização/fornecimento de informações pessoais, o direito à portabilidade e os direitos relativos à tomada de decisões automatizada. Estes direitos também podem ser exercidos através dos seus representantes legais ou de outras pessoas devidamente autorizadas.
Poderá exercer quaisquer dos direitos aplicáveis acima descritos, contactando-nos através do worldcoin.org/requestportal
E.5 – Medidas de segurança
Por forma a proteger as informações pessoais, implementaremos medidas de segurança técnicas, organizativas e físicas prescritas pela legislação coreana aplicável, como as enumeradas abaixo:
1) Medidas de gestão: Designação de um Encarregado da Proteção de Dados; estabelecimento e implementação de um plano de gestão interno; formação regular dos colaboradores sobre proteção de dados, etc.;
2) Medidas técnicas: Gestão da autorização de acesso ao sistema de tratamento de informações pessoais; instalação de um sistema de controlo de acesso; instalação de programas de segurança, etc.; e
3) Medidas físicas: Restrição do acesso a instalações e equipamentos de armazenamento de informações pessoais, tais como salas de computadores e salas de armazenamento de dados, etc.
E.6 – Contacte-nos
Em caso de dúvidas ou questões relacionadas com a privacidade e a proteção de dados, contacte a nossa Equipa de Proteção de Dados através do e-mail
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
ADENDA F – EUA
A Lei da Privacidade do Consumidor da Califórnia, com as alterações introduzidas pela respetiva Lei de Direitos de Privacidade, de momento não se aplica a nós.
ADENDA G - BRASIL
G.1 Legislação aplicável, Responsável pelo Tratamento e Operador
Se reside no Brasil, se seus dados pessoais foram recolhidos no Brasil, ou se utiliza os nossos Serviços no Brasil, a legislação aplicável é a Lei n.º 13.709/2018 (Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados, ou “LGPD”).
G.2 Direito de oposição
Tem o direito de se opor à utilização dos seus dados pessoais para fins que não dependem do consentimento se a finalidade for incoerente com a LGPD. Se a sua objeção for aceite, deixaremos de utilizar as suas informações pessoais para desenvolver e melhorar as funcionalidades e experiências dos nossos Serviços.
Tenha em atenção que, se não fornecer ou não permitir a recolha ou tratamento de determinados dados pessoais, a qualidade da sua experiência poderá ser afetada, poderemos não conseguir cumprir os objetivos dos nossos Serviços ou poderemos não conseguir prestar-lhe determinados Serviços.
Em alguns casos, os seus dados são anonimizados, o que significa que já não o identificam. Não se pode opor à utilização de dados anonimizados, já que estes não permitem a sua identificação, conforme previsto na LGPD. Utilizamos estes dados anonimizados para melhorar os nossos produtos e serviços.
G.3 Os direitos legais ao abrigo da LGPD
De acordo com a LGPD, tem o direito de confirmar a existência do tratamento, bem como de aceder, retificar ou solicitar a portabilidade dos dados tratados. Além disso, pode solicitar informações junto de entidades públicas e privadas com as quais utilizamos conjuntamente os seus dados pessoais. Também pode solicitar informações sobre a possibilidade de não dar consentimento e as consequências negativas, e solicitar a eliminação dos dados tratados com base num consentimento. Pode optar pela eliminação das suas informações na World App através do menu Definições.
Em determinadas circunstâncias, tem o direito de se opor ao tratamento ou de limitar a forma como tratamos os seus dados pessoais, ou ainda de retirar o seu consentimento em que nos baseamos para tratar as informações que fornece.
Pode exercer os seus direitos ao abrigo da LGPD enviando um pedido para o nosso EPD utilizando os dados de contacto na secção H.4 infra ou através do nosso portal de pedidos online. Se considerar que os seus direitos não foram devidamente acautelados, pode apresentar uma reclamação junto da Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) preenchendo o formulário disponível nesta ligação:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Transferência internacional dos seus dados pessoais
Se a LGPD se aplicar a si e tivermos recolhido os seus dados pessoais, também os poderemos transferir para fora do país. No entanto, iremos sempre garantir que os seus dados pessoais são transferidos apenas para países estrangeiros ou organizações internacionais que oferecem um nível de proteção adequado face ao previsto na LGPD, conforme reconhecido nas decisões de adequação emitidas pela ANPD. Na ausência de uma decisão de adequação, continuaremos a seguir uma norma de proteção que seja, pelo menos, equivalente ao previsto na LGPD utilizando Cláusulas Contratuais-Tipo estabelecidas nos regulamentos da ANPD ou quando obtivermos o seu consentimento específico e destacado para a transferência internacional.
ANEXO I – Fundamentos jurídicos/finalidades das atividades de tratamento de dados da Tools for Humanity por jurisdição
Utilizadores
Por que motivo tratamos os dados
Que dados pessoais são tratados
Fundamento jurídico do tratamento
Prazo de conservação
Para criar a sua conta na World App
Endereço da wallet, metadados, nome de utilizador
Execução do contrato
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços ou até solicitar a eliminação dos dados.
Para garantir que tem idade elegível
Data de nascimento
Obrigação legal
A sua data de nascimento exata nunca é armazenada. Apenas armazenamos a indicação de que tem, ou não, 18 anos. Armazenamos esta informação enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços ou até solicitar a eliminação dos dados.
Opcionalmente, para permitir que os seus contactos comuniquem e transacionem consigo facilmente
Número de telemóvel
Consentimento
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços ou até solicitar a eliminação dos dados.
Para lhe permitir comunicar e fazer transações facilmente com os seus contactos
Contactos do livro de endereços
Consentimento
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços ou até solicitar a eliminação dos dados.
Para mostrar-lhe opcionalmente Orbs perto de si
Informações de localização
Consentimento
Até 24 meses.
Para prevenir fraudes no contexto da prevenção de contas
Metadados, endereço IP, ID do dispositivo
Interesse legítimo, nomeadamente o interesse em prevenir determinados tipos de fraudes (LISTA DE TIPOS)
Até 24 meses.
Para garantir que o serviço é permitido no seu país
Endereço IP, informações de localização
Obrigação legal
Até 24 meses.
Para exibir a sua wallet autodetida e fornecer uma interface para transações da wallet
Endereço da wallet, dados de transações
Execução do contrato
Não são armazenados dados pessoais neste contexto.
Para apresentar a sua World ID autodetida e fornecer uma interface para verificações
Informações da World ID
Execução do contrato
Não são armazenados dados pessoais neste contexto.
Para apresentar as suas Credenciais autodetidas e fornecer uma interface para partilhar as Credenciais
Informações de credenciais, informações de validade de credenciais
Execução do contrato
Não são armazenados dados pessoais neste contexto.
Para analisar e melhorar os nossos serviços e realizar investigação no domínio da ciência de dados
Dados de utilização e metadados, dados de transações públicos
Consentimento
Até 24 meses.
Para cumprir a legislação aplicável, como a lei de combate ao branqueamento de capitais e sanções
Dados da transação, endereço da wallet
Obrigação legal
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços.
Para cumprir as leis aplicáveis, tais como regulamentos relativos ao conteúdo
Conteúdo da Miniapp
Obrigação legal
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços.
Para permitir a comunicação e o marketing
Endereço de e-mail, notificações push
Interesse legítimo
Até 24 meses.
Correspondência recebida de si
Interesse legítimo
Até 24 meses.
Feedback recebido de si
Interesse legítimo
Até 24 meses.
Tratar os seus pedidos de assistência ao cliente, reclamações e questões.
Informações de comunicação e e-mail ou nome de perfil nas redes sociais se procurar comunicar connosco através desses meios
Execução do contrato
Para garantir que a app está a funcionar sem problemas para si
Metadados
Execução do contrato
Até 24 meses.
Para verificar o seu dispositivo
Dados World ID do dispositivo (impressão digital do dispositivo)
Execução do contrato
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços.
Para resolver litígios, solucionar problemas e fazer cumprir os acordos que temos consigo, incluindo esta Declaração de Confidencialidade e os Termos do Utilizador.
Enquanto durar a utilização dos serviços.
Parceiros comerciais
Por que motivo tratamos os dados
Que dados pessoais são tratados
Fundamento jurídico do tratamento
Prazo de conservação
Comunicação
Número de telefone, endereço de e-mail, nome
Interesses legítimos, ou seja, o interesse em comunicar com parceiros comerciais.
Durante a relação comercial ou até solicitar a eliminação dos dados.
Manter e administrar uma relação comercial
Número de telefone, endereço de e-mail, nome, dados empresariais
Interesses legítimos, ou seja, o interesse em manter e administrar uma relação comercial com parceiros comerciais.
Durante a relação comercial ou até solicitar a eliminação dos dados.
Cumprir as obrigações KYC
Dados de passaporte, dados empresariais
Obrigação legal
Durante a relação comercial e até 3 anos após a cessação.
Para tratar a sua candidatura
Dados de candidatura
Consentimento e passos a pedido do titular dos dados antes de celebrar um contrato.
Até 3 meses, por defeito, ou durante mais tempo, se concordar em fazer parte de uma reserva de talentos.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Política de Privacidade da Tools for Humanity
Obrigado por escolher fazer parte da Comunidade World! World é um protocolo de código-fonte aberto, apoiado por uma comunidade global de programadores, indivíduos e outros contribuidores.
Esta Política de Privacidade abrange os dados pessoais que você nos fornece através da utilização que faz dos nossos websites e aplicativos (“World App”) e outros serviços associados a esta Política de Privacidade (coletivamente, os “Serviços”). Esta Política de Privacidade é parte integrante e é regida pelos
Termos e Condições da Tools for Humanity
(“Termos e Condições”). A Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), juntamente com a sua subsidiária alemã Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; juntos, “
TFH
” ou “
nós
,” “
nos
”), contribuiu para o desenvolvimento inicial e contribui para o crescimento do protocolo World (“World”).
1. Responsável pelo tratamento
Somos responsáveis pelo tratamento de todos os “Dados do World App” e outros “Dados Comerciais”, com sede em Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EUA. A TFH está estabelecida na União Europeia (“
UE
”) através da Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Dados do World App” refere-se a todos os dados pessoais coletados e tratados através da utilização que o titular faz da World App, tal como definido na Seção 5 abaixo, exceto quaisquer dados pessoais relacionados com a utilização que o titular faz do protocolo World ou dos tokens Worldcoin (tais como o endereço da sua carteira digital e os dados de transações, os quais não controlamos).
“Dados Comerciais” designa todos os dados pessoais coletados e tratados através de outros meios pela nossa empresa, quando você se comunica ou, de qualquer outra forma, trabalha ou interage conosco através de e-mail, de videoconferência ou dos nossos websites.
2. Alterações da Política de Privacidade
Por vezes, atualizamos esta Política de Privacidade. Se fizermos alterações importantes, tais como a forma como utilizamos a sua informação pessoal, tais alterações serão informadas a você através de um e-mail ou de uma mensagem no seu World App.
3. O que está nesta Política de Privacidade?
O nosso compromisso em proteger a sua privacidade e os seus dados
Quais informações coletamos e porquê
Como utilizamos os dados que coletamos
Onde é que tratamos os seus dados
Quando compartilhamos os seus dados
Como são armazenados os seus dados na blockchain pública
Como utilizamos cookies
Por quanto tempo armazenamos os seus dados
Como esta Política de Privacidade é aplicada para crianças e adolescentes
Quais são os seus direitos legais
Como entrar em contato conosco sobre esta Política de Privacidade
4. O nosso compromisso em proteger a sua privacidade e os seus dados
Estamos profundamente empenhados em proteger a sua privacidade e proteger os seus dados. Reconhecemos que só podemos cumprir a nossa missão de distribuir os nossos tokens digitais de forma justa ao maior número de pessoas possível se as pessoas confiarem em nós, e a privacidade e a segurança dos dados são fundamentais para conquistar a sua confiança.
Privacidade
Desenvolvemos os nossos produtos e serviços tendo em mente a sua privacidade. Coletamos dados para melhorar os nossos produtos e serviços. Iremos sempre informar você, seja aqui nesta Política de Privacidade, seja em formulários de consentimento de tratamento de dados para produtos ou serviços específicos, sobre quais dados estamos coletando, porque coletamos e o que fazemos com eles.
Segurança de dados
Temos uma equipe dedicada para cuidar dos seus dados e implementamos salvaguardas físicas e eletrônicas que protegem os seus dados em trânsito (enviados de um sistema para outro) e inativos (armazenados “em repouso”). Entretanto, nenhum serviço pode ser completamente seguro. Se você tiver alguma preocupação sobre a sua conta ou os seus dados, por favor entre em contato conosco através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
ou escreva para Tools For Humanity Corporation no endereço 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EUA.
5. Quais informações coletamos e porquê
5.1 Dados que você nos fornece
Como usuário, você não é obrigado a fornecer quaisquer dados para acessar o World App. No entanto, você poderá ter que nos fornecer determinados dados para utilizar uma funcionalidade nos Serviços. As bases legais para o tratamento dos dados, nos casos abaixo indicados, são o consentimento do usuário e a execução de um contrato (o nosso compromisso de prestar os Serviços). Abaixo está uma lista de dados que você pode ter que fornecer e as finalidades do tratamento que realizaremos dos seus dados:
Nome e sobrenome
. Você pode optar por cadastrar o seu nome para o associá-lo à sua conta. Nós podemos e outros usuários podem ver o seu nome quando eles optarem por interagir com a sua conta. Poderemos exigir o seu nome e sobrenome quando você enviar um pedido de exercício de direitos de titular de dados. A base legal para o tratamento destes dados é a execução contratual dos Serviços conforme os Termos e Condições.
Endereço de e-mail
. Você pode optar por cadastrar o seu e-mail para associá-lo à sua conta. Você também pode fornecer o seu e-mail para assinar a
mailing list
para se manter atualizado sobre o projeto World. Nós poderemos exigir o seu e-mail quando você enviar um pedido de exercício de direitos de titular de dados. A base legal para o tratamento destes dados é a execução contratual dos Serviços conforme os Termos e Condições.
Número de telefone
. Você pode optar por cadastrar o seu número de telefone para associá-lo à sua conta. Com a sua permissão, outros usuários poderão encontrar a sua conta através do seu número de telefone. Quando enviar um pedido de exercício de direitos de titular de dados, poderemos necessitar de um número de telefone. A base legal para o tratamento destes dados é a execução contratual dos Serviços conforme os Termos e Condições.
Feedback
e correspondências recebidas devocê
. Estes incluem quaisquer e-mails, mensagens de chat ou outras comunicações que você nos enviar por e-mail ou por redes sociais de terceiros. Podemos utilizar um fornecedor de serviços externo para facilitar pesquisas sobre a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços. A base legal para o tratamento destes dados é a execução contratual dos Serviços conforme os Termos e Condições.
Acesso aos seus contatos
. Você pode autorizar o forneço acesso pelo World App aos seus contatos do seu celular para ativar a funcionalidade que facilita a sua localização e interação com outros usuários que possam estar nos seus contatos. Os contatos permanecem no seu dispositivo. A base legal para o tratamento destes dados é o interesse legítimo do usuário em ser encontrado no World App e o interesse do usuário em encontrar os seus contatos no World App.
Nota
: você é responsável por garantir que o compartilhamento das informações dos seus contatos está em conformidade com a legislação aplicável. Para tanto, poderá ser necessário obter a autorização dos seus contatos e você não deverá compartilhar com a TFH quaisquer dados de contato de outras pessoas sem o consentimento explícito das mesmas. Você pode mudar de ideia e desativar o nosso acesso aos seus contatos a qualquer momento nas definições do seu dispositivo. Se você optar por importar os contatos do seu dispositivo para a World App, para saber qual dos seus contatos usa os nossos Serviços ou convidá-los a utilizar os nossos Serviços, sincronizaremos periodicamente os números de telefone dos seus contatos com esses mesmos números e endereços armazenados em outras carteiras cadastrados por outros usuários nos nossos servidores.
Dados de localização
. Você pode decidir habilitar um serviço baseado na localização (tal como uma funcionalidade que permite encontrar um Operador de Orb perto de você). Nós podemos coletar informações sobre a sua localização através de GPS, endereço de IP, informações sobre torres de comunicações móveis ou informações sobre pontos de acesso Wi-Fi. O tipo de dado de localização coletado depende do serviço que você estiver utilizando, do dispositivo que estiver usando (por exemplo, Apple ou Android) e das configurações do seu dispositivo (se as permissões estão habilitadas ou desabilitadas). Você pode alterar as suas permissões a qualquer momento nas configurações do seu dispositivo.
Dados empresariais
. Se você tiver uma relação comercial conosco (como, por exemplo, se for um Operador de Orb ou um fornecedor), poderemos solicitar informações como nomes, endereço postal, e-mail, número de telefone, endereço da carteira digital e outra documentação (como o seu documento de identidade oficial) como parte da promoção dessa relação comercial e para
cumprir as nossas obrigações de“Conheça Seu Cliente”
(KYC – Know Your Customer). Nós podemos recorrer a serviços externos, como o Onfido, para nos ajudar a coletar e analisar as informações e a documentação acima referida, a fim de cumprir as obrigações relativas a “Conheça Seu Cliente”.
P2P Marketplace
. Se você utilizar os Serviços de P2P Marketplace (quando disponíveis no World App), que permitem comprar tokens digitais de outros usuários, poderemos coletar informações adicionais, tais como o endereço da carteira digital, suas informações de contato (por exemplo, o seu número de telefone) e o número de conta associado à transação (como seu número M-PESA). Registramos os dados da transação como parte da prestação dos Serviços de P2P Marketplace. Também podemos coletar informações adicionais para cumprir os requisitos de “Conheça Seu Cliente” aplicáveis.
Metadados do dispositivo
. Se você utilizar o World App, coletaremos metadados do seu dispositivo para garantir que o World App está funcionando corretamente e que você não está violando os nossos Termos e Condições. Isto inclui a coleta de identificadores do dispositivo e endereços de IP.
Dados de World ID do dispositivo
. Também tratamos os metadados do seu dispositivo para calcular uma impressão digital única do dispositivo. O hash desta impressão digital serve como sinal que prova a singularidade do seu dispositivo com o World ID.
Dados da candidatura de emprego
. Se você quiser trabalhar conosco, você deverá nos enviar a sua candidatura, incluindo a sua carta de apresentação e o seu currículo, bem como as informações pessoais que pretende divulgar.
Você pode encontrar as bases legais para o tratamento de cada uma das atividades de tratamento de dados referidas anteriormente em detalhes no
“ANEXO I – Finalidades jurídicas das atividades de tratamento de dados da Tools for Humanity por jurisdição”
no final desta Política de Privacidade.
5.2 Dados que recolhemos de fontes terceiras
Ocasionalmente, poderemos obter informações sobre você junto das seguintes fontes terceiras:
Dados de blockchain
. Podemos analisar dados de blockchain públicos para garantir que as partes que utilizam os nossos Serviços não estão envolvidas em atividades ilegais ou proibidas conforme os Termos e Condições, e para analisar tendências de transações para fins de pesquisa e desenvolvimento.
Serviços de verificação de identidade
. Podemos obter informações de serviços de terceiros que utilizam os seus dados para verificar a sua identidade se for exigido por lei (tais como requisitos aplicáveis para “Conheça Seu Cliente”). Para que fique claro, nós não utilizamos os seus dados biométricos quando verificamos a sua identidade, conforme exigido por lei.
Bases de dados de talentos
. Podemos coletar dados de várias fontes com o intuito de fazer ofertas de emprego a indivíduos talentosos.
5.3 Dados que coletamos automaticamente
Se permitido pela lei aplicável, poderemos coletar determinados tipos de dados automaticamente quando você interagir com os nossos Serviços. Estas informações nos ajudam a resolver problemas de suporte ao cliente, melhorar o desempenho dos Serviços, proporcionar uma experiência simplificada e personalizada para você e proteger as credenciais da sua conta. As informações coletadas automaticamente incluem:
Identificadores online
: dados de geolocalização e de monitorização (ver acima), sistemas operacionais de computador ou celular, nome e versão de navegadores de Internet e endereços de IP. Em casos excepcionais, estes dados também são utilizados na nossa detecção de fraudes e de fluxos financeiros ilícitos. Os dados também servem para proporcionar uma experiência estável e sem fraudes do nosso software.
Dados de utilização
: dados de autenticação, perguntas de segurança e outros dados coletados através de cookies e tecnologias semelhantes.
Cookies
: pequenos arquivos de dados armazenados no seu disco rígido ou na memória do seu dispositivo que nos ajudam a melhorar os nossos Serviços e a sua experiência, verificar quais áreas e funcionalidades dos nossos Serviços são populares e contabilizar visitas. Para saber qual é a base legal do tratamento desses dados, consulte, por favor, a nossa
Política de Cookies
, onde explicamos os diferentes tipos de cookies que utilizamos.
Da mesma forma, o World App coleta informações para resolver problemas e proporcionar melhorias de uso. Utilizamos serviços de terceiros, tais como Segment.io ou PostHog, para visualizar informações agregadas sobre a utilização e as interações do usuário final. Sempre que possível, nós tomamos medidas para minimizar ou mascarar as informações enviadas a terceiros (tal como a codificação dos dados).
5.4 Dados anonimizados e agregados
A anonimização é uma técnica de tratamento de dados que desqualifica os dados como dados pessoais. Uma vez anonimizados, os dados deixam de ser capazes de identificar uma pessoa específica. Exemplos de dados anonimizados incluem:
Dados da transação
Dados de fluxo de cliques
Métricas de desempenho
Indicadores de fraude (embora os dados pessoais também sejam utilizados para este fim)
Também agregamos dados, combinando grandes quantidades de informação de modo a deixar de identificar ou de fazer referência a um indivíduo. Utilizamos dados anonimizados ou dados agregados para as nossas finalidades comerciais, tais como para compreender as necessidades e os comportamentos dos usuários, melhorar os nossos Serviços, realizar análises comerciais e de marketing, detectar ameaças à segurança e treinar os nossos algoritmos.
A base legal para o tratamento dos dados acima mencionados é o legítimo interesse de manter o World App ou o website em funcionamento, obter perspectivas comerciais e prevenir fraudes.
6. Como utilizamos os dados que coletamos
Devemos ter um motivo válido (ou “bases legais para o tratamento”) para utilizar as suas informações pessoais. Em alguns casos, o tratamento dos seus dados pessoais não requer o seu consentimento prévio. Utilizamos os seus dados para as seguintes finalidades:
Para fornecer e manter os nossos produtos e serviços conforme os Termos e Condições. Estes serviços incluem:
O World App onde os usuários podem gerir o seu World ID e tokens digitais, bem como aprender sobre criptoativos em geral e o projeto World em particular;
O Operator App onde os Operadores de Orb podem gerir e supervisionar os Orbs sob sua gestão e as suas estatísticas;
O P2P Marketplace onde conectamos usuários a agentes;
Para melhorar e desenvolver os nossos produtos e serviços, incluindo para depurar (
debug
) e corrigir erros nos nossos Serviços.
Para realizar pesquisa científica de dados.
Para analisar a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços a fim de prestar um suporte melhor.
Para permitir que você publique suas informações numa blockchain para provar a sua singularidade.
Para utilizar o endereço da sua carteira digital para enviar a você tokens digitais que suportamos.
Para cumprir a legislação aplicável, como a lei de prevenção à lavagem de dinheiro e sanções internacionais. Isto implica em:
Utilizar o seu endereço de IP para bloquear indivíduos cujo país não permite que eles acessem os Serviços;
Responder a pedidos de exercício regular de direitos de titulares de dados conforme as leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis, como pedidos para acessar ou deletar dados pessoais;
Monitorar fluxos financeiros potencialmente ilícitos (por exemplo, carteiras incluídas na lista restritiva); e
Lidar com os seus pedidos de assistência ao cliente, reclamações e perguntas.
Para resolver litígios, solucionar problemas e cumprir os acordos que temos com você, incluindo esta Política de Privacidade e os Termos e Condições.
Para entrar em contato sobre as atualizações dos Serviços.
7. Onde é que tratamos os seus dados
7.1 Transferência de dados.
Quando você nos fornece os seus dados, estes podem ser transferidos, armazenados ou tratados num local diverso do local onde os seus dados foram originalmente coletados. O país para o qual os seus dados são transferidos, ou no qual são armazenados ou tratados, pode não ter as mesmas leis de proteção de dados que o país onde você forneceu inicialmente os seus dados.
Envidamos os melhores esforços para cumprir os princípios previstos em cada jurisdição relativamente às leis de privacidade. Apenas partilhamos dados pessoais com agentes de tratamento fora da sua jurisdição se tal transferência for lícita e estivermos confiantes de que o subcontratado protegerá os seus dados conforme exigido pelas leis aplicáveis e, além disso, de acordo com os nossos padrões.
7.2 Riscos da transferência
Segue, abaixo, uma lista de possíveis riscos que podem surgir se transferirmos os seus dados pessoais para os Estados Unidos, a União Europeia ou outro país. Abaixo, também resumimos como mitigamos os respectivos riscos.
Embora façamos o possível para garantir que os nossos subcontratados estão contratualmente obrigados a proteger adequadamente os seus dados, estes subcontratados podem não estar sujeitos à lei de privacidade e proteção de dados do seu país. Se os subcontratados tratarem ilegalmente os seus dados sem autorização, poderá ser difícil reivindicar os seus direitos de privacidade contra esses subcontratados. Mitigamos este risco à medida que celebramos acordos rigorosos de tratamento de dados com os nossos subcontratados, que os obrigam a proteger os dados a um nível exigido pelo Regulamento Geral sobre a Proteção de Dados (RGPD) e a atender aos pedidos de exercício regular de direito dos titulares dos dados.
É possível que a legislação em matéria de privacidade e proteção de dados no seu país seja incompatível com a legislação dos EUA ou da União Europeia (UE). Tentamos sempre observar os padrões mais rigorosos de proteção de dados a que estamos sujeitos.
É possível que os seus dados pessoais estejam sujeitos ao acesso por agentes públicos e autoridades governamentais. Nesses casos, nos comprometemos a contestar em tribunal qualquer pedido de acesso governamental inválido, genérico ou ilegal. Utilizamos ainda encriptação avançada para impedir acessos não-autorizados.
Observe que esta lista contém exemplos, mas pode não incluir todos os possíveis riscos aplicáveis a você.
7.3 Estrutura de Privacidade de Dados para transferências de dados dos EUA
TFH cumpre com a Estrutura de Privacidade de Dados UE-EUA (EU-U.S. DPF), a Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF e a Estrutura de Privacidade de Dados Suíça-EUA (Swiss-U.S. DPF), conforme estabelecido pelo Departamento de Comércio dos EUA. A TFH certificou ao Departamento de Comércio dos EUA que aderiu aos Princípios da Estrutura de Privacidade de Dados UE-EUA (Princípios EU-U.S. DPF) no que diz respeito ao processamento de dados pessoais recebidos da União Europeia com base na EU-U.S. DPF e do Reino Unido (e Gibraltar) com base na Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF. A TFH certificou ao Departamento de Comércio dos EUA que adere aos Princípios da Estrutura de Privacidade de Dados Suíça-EUA (Princípios Swiss-U.S. DPF) no que diz respeito ao tratamento de dados pessoais recebidos da Suíça com base na Swiss-U.S. DPF. Se houver qualquer conflito entre os termos desta Política de Privacidade e os Princípios EU-U.S. DPF e/ou os Princípios Swiss-U.S. DPF, os Princípios prevalecerão. Para saber mais sobre o programa da Estrutura de Privacidade de Dados (DPF) e para ver nossa certificação, visite
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
A TFH é responsável pelo tratamento de dados pessoais que recebe sob a DPF e subsequentemente transfere para um terceiro atuando como agente de tratamento em seu nome. A TFH cumpre com os Princípios da DPF para todas as transferências subsequentes de dados pessoais da UE, Reino Unido e Suíça, incluindo as disposições de responsabilidade de transferência subsequente.
A Comissão Federal Americana de Comércio tem jurisdição sobre a conformidade da TFH com a EU-U.S. DPF, a Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF e a Swiss-U.S. DPF. Em certas situações, a TFH pode ser obrigada a divulgar dados pessoais em resposta a solicitações legais por autoridades governamentais, inclusive para atender a requisitos de segurança nacional ou de aplicação da lei.
Em conformidade com a EU-U.S. DPF, a Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF e a Swiss-U.S. DPF, a TFH compromete-se a resolver reclamações relacionadas aos Princípios da DPF sobre nossa coleta e uso de seus dados pessoais. Indivíduos da UE, Reino Unido e Suíça com perguntas ou reclamações sobre nosso manuseio de dados pessoais recebidos com base na EU-U.S. DPF, na Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF e na Swiss-U.S. DPF devem primeiro entrar em contato com a TFH em
dpo@world.org
Em conformidade com a EU-U.S. DPF, a Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF e a Swiss-U.S. DPF, a TFH compromete-se a cooperar e cumprir respectivamente com o aconselhamento do painel estabelecido pelas autoridades de proteção de dados da UE (DPAs), o Gabinete do Comissário de Informação do Reino Unido (ICO), a Autoridade Reguladora de Gibraltar (GRA) e o Comissário Federal de Proteção de Dados e Informação da Suíça (FDPIC) em relação a reclamações não resolvidas sobre nosso manuseio de dados pessoais recebidos com base na EU-U.S. DPF, na Extensão do Reino Unido para a EU-U.S. DPF e na Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Para reclamações sobre a conformidade da DPF não resolvidas por qualquer um dos outros mecanismos da DPF, você tem a possibilidade, sob certas condições, de invocar a arbitragem vinculante. Mais informações podem ser encontradas no site oficial da DPF.
8. Quando compartilhamos os seus dados
Nunca venderemos os seus dados.
Quando compartilhamos os seus dados para fora da nossa organização, iremos sempre:
compartilhar de forma razoavelmente segura;
tomar medidas para garantir que são tratados de forma consistente com o nosso compromisso para com a sua privacidade; e
proibir outras empresas de utilizarem para os seus dados para fins próprios.
Compartilhamos os seus dados pessoais de forma limitada das seguintes maneiras:
Com a World Foundation
: podemos atuar como operadores da World Foundation para a coleta de dados pessoais em nome da World (consulte a política de privacidade da World para mais informações).
Dentro da nossa organização
: apenas compartilhamos os seus dados pessoais com os membros da nossa equipe que necessitem de acesso para realizarem as suas tarefas e os seus deveres. Apenas compartilhamos os dados necessários para realizar tarefas e deveres específicos, e temos um sistema rigoroso de controle de acessos.
Com fornecedores e prestadores de serviços fora da nossa organização
: apenas compartilhamos os seus dados pessoais com prestadores de serviços cujos serviços confiamos para tratar os dados e prestar os nossos Serviços a você. Apenas compartilhamos dados pessoais com operadores de verificação de identidade se isso for exigido por Lei (ou seja, obrigações de “Conheça Seu Cliente”).
As categorias desses prestadores de serviços são:
Prestadores de serviços em nuvem (todos os tipos de dados)
Fornecedores de Software-as-a-Service (“SaaS”); utilizamos produtos SaaS nas seguintes categorias:
Gestão de bases de dados e de infraestruturas
Segurança de dados
Recrutamento
Comunicação
Pesquisas
KYC/KYB, ou seja, verificação de documentos oficiais
Gestão de pedidos de exercício regular de direitos de titulares de dados
Assistência técnica
Suporte ao usuário
Especialistas externos
Programadores de software especializados
Especialistas jurídicos
Consultores fiscais
Bancos
Prestadores de serviços de rotulagem (apenas sob salvaguardas especiais)
Serviços de verificação de antecedentes para candidatos e Operadores de Orb.
Com autoridades policiais, funcionários públicos e outras entidades externas
: Podemos divulgar os seus dados para cumprir as leis aplicáveis e responder a exigências legais obrigatórias. Consideraremos cuidadosamente cada pedido para determinar se o pedido está em conformidade com a lei e, sempre que apropriado, podemos contestar pedidos inválidos, excessivos ou ilegais. Podemos compartilhar dados pessoais com a polícia e outras autoridades governamentais quando acreditarmos que é razoavelmente necessário para cumprir a lei, regulação ou outros processos ou obrigações legais.
Podemos compartilhar os seus dados pessoais se acreditarmos que as suas ações são incompatíveis com os nossos Termos e Condições, se acreditarmos que você violou a lei ou se acreditarmos que é necessário proteger os direitos, propriedade e segurança, quer sejam os nossos, dos nossos usuários, do público ou de outrem.
Podemos compartilhar os seus dados pessoais com os nossos advogados e outros consultores profissionais, quando necessário, para obter aconselhamento ou de outra forma proteger e gerir os nossos interesses comerciais.
Podemos compartilhar os seus dados pessoais no âmbito de ou durante negociações relativas a qualquer fusão, venda de ativos da empresa, financiamento ou aquisição de toda ou parte da nossa atividade por outra empresa.
Os dados, incluindo as suas informações pessoais, podem ser compartilhados entre as nossas atuais e futuras matrizes, afiliadas e subsidiárias e outras empresas sob controle e propriedade comuns.
Podemos compartilhar as suas informações pessoais com o seu consentimento ou sob as suas instruções.
9. Como são armazenados os seus dados na blockchain pública
As informações de transação relacionadas com a sua utilização dos nossos Serviços podem ser registradas numa blockchain pública.
Nota
: As blockchains são livros-razão públicos de transações que são mantidas em redes descentralizadas operadas por terceiros que não são controladas ou operadas pela World. Devido à natureza pública e imutável dos livros-razão da blockchain, não podemos garantir a capacidade de alterar, apagar ou controlar a divulgação dos dados que são carregados e armazenados numa blockchain.
10. Como utilizamos cookies
Usamos cookies para ajudar os nossos Serviços a funcionarem melhor. Além dos cookies, poderemos utilizar outras tecnologias semelhantes, como web beacons, para identificar os usuários dos nossos Serviços. Os web beacons (também conhecidos como “clear gifs”) são pequenos gráficos com um identificador único com função semelhante à função dos cookies. A nossa
Política de Cookies
é incorporada aqui por referência.
Também utilizamos o Google Analytics. Para mais informações sobre como o Google usa os seus dados, quando utiliza os websites e aplicativos dos seus parceiros, acesse aqui:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Ao usar os Serviços, você consente que armazenemos e acessemos cookies e outros dados no seu computador ou dispositivo móvel e que utilizemos o Google Analytics, no âmbito dessas atividades. Leia as informações no link acima para entender com o que você está consentindo.
11. Por quanto tempo armazenamos os seus dados
Salvo disposição em contrário na legislação aplicável, mantemos os seus dados durante o tempo razoavelmente necessário para lhe prestar os nossos Serviços, atender aos nossos fins comerciais legítimos e cumprir as nossas obrigações legais e regulatórias. Se você encerrar a sua conta, nós eliminaremos os dados da sua conta no prazo de um mês; caso a sua conta não seja encerrada, eliminaremos os dados da sua conta após 2 anos de inatividade. Se for exigido por lei, continuaremos a manter armazenados os seus dados pessoais conforme necessário para cumprir as nossas obrigações legais e regulatórias, incluindo monitoramento, detecção e prevenção de fraudes, bem como obrigações fiscais, contábeis e financeiras.
Nota
: Blockchains são redes descentralizadas de terceiros que não controlamos ou operamos. Devido à natureza pública e imutável da tecnologia blockchain, não podemos alterar, apagar ou controlar a divulgação de dados armazenados em blockchains.
12. Como esta Política de Privacidade é aplicada para crianças e adolescentes
Os indivíduos menores de 18 anos não estão autorizados a utilizar os Serviços e não coletamos intencionalmente dados de indivíduos menores de 18 anos. Se você acredita que o seu filho menor de 18 (dezoito) anos teve acesso aos Serviços sem a sua autorização, por favor solicite a eliminação dos dados pessoais dele através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
Se nós soubermos que coletamos dados de uma criança ou adolescente menor de 18 anos, eliminaremos esses dados o mais rápido possível. Tomamos todas as medidas necessárias, incluindo a implementação de um modelo de IA de detecção automática de idade, instruções para operadores e autoconfirmações, para restringir a utilização dos Serviços por pessoas menores de 18 anos de idade. Não fazemos publicidade de produtos ou serviços a crianças.
13. Como entrar em contato conosco a respeito desta Política de Privacidade
Você pode escolher excluir os seus dados do World App no menu de Configurações. Se você tiver dúvidas ou preocupações sobre esta Política de Privacidade, se pretender exercer os seus direitos ou entrar em contato com o nosso Encarregado da proteção de dados (
data protection officer
, ou DPO), por favor enviar o seu pedido através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
ou escrever para Tools For Humanity Corporation, no endereço 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EUA. Respondemos a todos os pedidos que recebemos de indivíduos que desejam exercer os seus direitos de proteção de dados de acordo com as leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis. Você também pode excluir os seus dados a partir do World App.
Se você tiver uma questão de privacidade ou de utilização de dados que não tenha sido resolvida de forma satisfatória, entre em contato com o regulador de proteção de dados da sua jurisdição. Se residir na UE, pode encontrar o seu regulador de proteção de dados
aqui
.
14. Quais são os seus direitos legais
Estes direitos aplicam-se na medida em que possamos identificar o requerente na nossa base de dados e na medida em que não violemos os direitos de outros titulares de dados ao exercer os direitos do requerente:
Você tem o direito de obter de nós a qualquer momento, mediante pedido, informações sobre os dados pessoais que tratamos a seu respeito.
Você tem o direito de receber de nós os dados pessoais sobre você.
Você tem o direito de exigir que corrijamos imediatamente os dados pessoais sobre você se estiverem incorretos.
Você tem o direito de exigir que eliminemos os dados pessoais sobre você. Este direito inclui, em particular, o direito à eliminação de dados se os dados pessoais já não forem mais necessários para os fins para os quais foram coletados ou tratados, desde que sejam indicados os requisitos para a eliminação em conformidade com as leis aplicáveis (por exemplo, as leis de várias jurisdições nos obrigam a manter as informações sobre transações durante um determinado período de tempo).
Você tem o direito de revogar livremente o seu consentimento a qualquer tratamento de dados baseado no consentimento ou de se opor ao tratamento de dados se este não se basear no consentimento.
15. ADENDOS
Os adendos a seguir fornecem informações legalmente exigidas para os respetivos mercados em que operamos. Estas informações fazem parte do consentimento dependendo da região em que o titular de dados reside. As informações previstas acima podem ser distintas das informações da sua localidade (descritas nos adendos abaixo) porque bloqueamos determinados serviços em certas jurisdições. Em caso de inconsistência com o exposto anteriormente, prevalecerá a declaração mais específica sobre determina jurisdição (descritas nos adendos abaixo):
ADENDO A: Espaço Económico Europeu (“EEE”) e Reino Unido (“Reino Unido”)
Se estiver no EEE ou no Reino Unido, o que se segue é aplicável a você: você tem, pelo menos, os seguintes direitos. Você pode ter direitos adicionais conforme o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados, Regulamento UE 2016/679 de 27.04.2016 (“RGPD”), conforme abaixo indicado. Para exercer os seus direitos disponíveis previstos no RGPD, por favor entre em contato conosco através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
. Salvo em casos excepcionais, daremos resposta ao seu pedido no prazo legal de um mês. A utilização do termo RGPD na seção seguinte também implica o RGPD do Reino Unido incorporado na legislação nacional do Reino Unido como Lei de Proteção de Dados do Reino Unido de 2018 e mantido como parte da legislação de Inglaterra e do País de Gales, da Escócia e da Irlanda do Norte em virtude da
seção 3
da Lei da União Europeia (Retirada) de 2018 e com as alterações introduzidas pelo
Anexo
1
ao Regulamento sobre Proteção de Dados, Privacidade e Comunicações Eletrônicas (conforme alterações, etc.) (Saída da UE) de 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Os direitos legais conforme o RGPD
Esta seção é aplicável se o tratamento dos seus dados estiver abrangido pelo âmbito de aplicação do RGPD (
por exemplo
, se residir no EEE ou no Reino Unido). Você pode ter direitos adicionais previstos no RGPD, conforme indicado abaixo. Para exercer os seus direitos previstos no RGPD, por favor entre em contato conosco através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
Você tem o direito de obter da nossa parte, a qualquer momento, mediante pedido, informações sobre os dados pessoais que tratamos a seu respeito, no âmbito do Art. 15 do RGPD.
Você tem o direito de exigir que corrijamos imediatamente os dados pessoais sobre você se estiverem incorretos.
Você tem o direito, nas condições descritas no Art. 17 do RGPD, de exigir que eliminemos os dados pessoais sobre você. Estes pré-requisitos preveem, em particular, o direito à eliminação de dados se os dados pessoais deixarem de ser necessários para as finalidades para as quais foram coletados ou tratados, bem como em casos de tratamento ilícito, de existência de uma objeção ou de existência de uma obrigação de eliminação nos termos do direito da lei da União Europeia ou da lei do Estado-Membro a que estamos sujeitos.
Você tem o direito de exigir que restrinjamos o tratamento de acordo com o Art. 18 do RGPD.
Você tem o direito de receber de nós os dados pessoais que nos forneceu num formato estruturado, de uso corrente e de leitura automática, de acordo com o Art. 20 do RGPD.
Você tem o direito de se opor a qualquer momento, por motivos relacionados com a sua situação particular, ao tratamento de dados pessoais sobre você que seja realizado,
inter alia
, com base na frase 1 da alínea f), número 1, Artigo 6º do RGPD (1), de acordo com o Artigo 21 do RGPD.
Você tem o direito de entrar em contato com a autoridade de controle competente em caso de reclamações sobre o tratamento de dados realizado pelo responsável pelo tratamento. A autoridade de controle responsável é: a Secretaria de Estado da Baviera para a Supervisão da Proteção de Dados (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Se o tratamento de dados pessoais se basear no seu consentimento, você tem o direito, nos termos do Art. 7º do RGPD, de revogar o seu consentimento para a utilização dos seus dados pessoais em qualquer momento com efeitos futuros, sendo a revogação tão fácil de declarar quanto o próprio consentimento. Note-se que a revogação só produz efeitos para o futuro. O tratamento efetuado antes da revogação não é afetado.
A.2 Transferência de dados
Quando transferimos dados para um país que não tem uma decisão de adequação, nós utilizamos as Cláusulas Contratuais-Tipo da UE. Atualmente, estamos transferindo dados pessoais somente para os EUA.
Quando o tratamento de dados pessoais for baseado no seu consentimento, você tem o direito, nos termos do Art. 7º do RGPD, de revogar o seu consentimento para a utilização dos seus dados pessoais em qualquer altura com efeitos futuros, sendo a revogação tão fácil de declarar quanto o próprio consentimento. Note-se que a revogação só produz efeitos para o futuro. O tratamento efetuado antes da revogação não é afetado. Tenha também em atenção que o tratamento que não se baseia no consentimento não é afetado pela revogação do consentimento.
ADENDO B: JAPÃO
Se você residir no Japão, adicionalmente, o que se segue é aplicável a você.
B1. Informações sobre as regulações japonesas
Cumprimos as leis e regulações japonesas, incluindo a Lei sobre a Proteção de Informações Pessoais do Japão (“APPI”). Esta seção aplica-se ao nosso tratamento de “informações pessoais”, conforme definido na APPI, com prevalência sobre as outras partes do Formulário de Consentimento de Dados Biométricos.
B2. Compartilhamento de dados
Não obstante o disposto na Seção 3.5 do Formulário de Consentimento de Dados Biométricos, exceto se permitido pela legislação aplicável, não divulgamos, vendemos, fornecemos, compartilhamos ou transferimos as suas informações pessoais a terceiros.
B3. Medidas de controle de segurança
No que diz respeito à Seção 3.6 do Formulário de Consentimento de Dados Biométricos, nós tomamos as medidas necessárias e apropriadas para evitar qualquer fuga ou perda, ou danos, das suas informações pessoais que estejam sendo tratadas, e para manter a segurança das informações pessoais, tais como o estabelecimento de regras para o tratamento de dados pessoais, o monitoramento regular do tratamento de dados pessoais, o treinamento regular de empregados em matéria de tratamento de dados pessoais, a prevenção de roubo ou perda de equipamentos utilizados para tratar os dados pessoais e a implementação de controles de acesso. Também supervisionamos adequadamente os nossos prestadores de serviços e empregados que lidam com dados pessoais.
B4. Informações de referência sobre o fornecimento de dados pessoais a terceiros em países estrangeiros
Os seus dados pessoais são tratados na UE e nos EUA.
B5. Os direitos legais conforme a APPI
Para exercer os seus direitos previstos na APPI, por favor entre em contato conosco através do nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
ADENDO C: ARGENTINA
Se você está domiciliado na República da Argentina, informamos que a AGÊNCIA DE ACESSO À INFORMAÇÃO PÚBLICA, na sua qualidade de Órgão de Controle da Lei n.º 25.326, tem competência para receber as queixas e reclamações apresentadas por aqueles cujos direitos sejam lesados pelo descumprimento das normas em vigor em matéria de proteção de dados pessoais.
A Agência pode ser contatada da seguinte forma:
Endereço: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5º andar - Cidade Autônoma de Buenos Aires
Código postal: C1067ABP
Número de celular: (54-11) 3988-3968
E-mail: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ADENDO D: SINGAPURA
Se você residir em Singapura, o que se segue é aplicável a você:
D1. Coleta, utilização e divulgação dos seus dados pessoais
Se você residir em Singapura e com o seu consentimento, nós coletaremos, utilizaremos ou divulgaremos os seus dados pessoais para cada uma das finalidades definidas na nossa Política de Privacidade. Você pode exercer o seu direito de revogar o consentimento a qualquer momento, mas preste atenção que podemos não conseguir continuar a prestar os nossos serviços, dependendo da natureza e do âmbito do seu pedido. Também preste atenção que a revogação do consentimento não prejudica o nosso direito de continuar a coletar, usar e divulgar dados pessoais quando essa coleta, uso e divulgação sem consentimento for permitida ou exigida pela legislação aplicável.[1]
D2. Exercício regular dos seus direitos de titular dos dados
Você pode controlar os dados pessoais que coletamos e exercer qualquer um dos direitos entrando em contato conosco pelo nosso
Portal de Pedidos
. Pretendemos responder ao seu pedido assim que possível, normalmente no prazo de 30 dias. Informaremos antecipadamente se não pudermos responder ao seu pedido no prazo de 30 dias, ou se não pudermos atender ao seu pedido e quais são os motivos.[2]
Nos casos permitidos por lei, podemos cobrar uma taxa administrativa para atender ao seu pedido.
D3. Transferência dos seus dados pessoais para outros países
Se você residir em Singapura e nós tivermos coletado os seus dados, poderemos também transferi-los ocasionalmente para fora do país. No entanto, garantiremos sempre que os seus dados pessoais continuem seguindo um padrão de proteção que seja, pelo menos, comparável ao previsto na Lei de Proteção de Dados Pessoais de Singapura de 2012, por exemplo, através da utilização das Cláusulas Contratuais Modelo da ASEAN.
ADENDO E – COREIA SUL
Este Adendo para Titulares de Dados Coreanos explica as nossas práticas no que diz respeito aos dados pessoais que tratamos no âmbito da sua relação conosco, caso você seja um titular de dados coreano.
E.1 – Transferência de informações pessoais
Fornecemos informações pessoais ou subcontratamos o tratamento das mesmas para terceiros, conforme especificado abaixo:
- Fornecimento de informações pessoais a terceiros
Nome do destinatário (se o destinatário for uma empresa, então o nome e informações de contato da empresa)
Finalidades de utilização pelo destinatário
Elementos de informação pessoal fornecidos ao destinatário
Períodos de retenção pelo destinatário
Países para onde as informações pessoais serão transferidas e a data, hora e métodos de transferência
Tools for Humanity GmbH
(dpo@toolsforhumanity.com)
As finalidades descritas no presente aviso na seção 6 supra.
Os pontos descritos na seção 5 supra
Os períodos de armazenamento definidos na seção 11 supra.
Alemanha
Através das redes de internet relevantes após a coleta
Tools for Humanity Corp.
(dpo@toolsforhumanity.com)
As finalidades descritas na seção 6 supra.
Os pontos descritos na seção 5 supra
Os períodos de armazenamento definidos na seção 11 supra.
EUA
Através das redes de internet relevantes após a coleta
- Terceirização do tratamento de informações pessoais:
Por favor veja uma lista de todos os tratamentos de dados terceirizados e as respectivas empresas terceirizadas:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Podemos terceirizar o tratamento das suas informações pessoais e/ou transferi-las para fins de armazenamento a entidades terceiras localizadas fora da Coreia:
Se você não pretender transferir as suas dados pessoais para o estrangeiro, você pode recusar-se, não aceitando a transferência de dados pessoais ou nos solicitando a interrupção da transferência internacional, mas se você recusar, você poderá não conseguir utilizar os nossos serviços. A base legal para a transferência internacional de dados pessoais é o fato de constituir “tratamento ou armazenamento externo de dados pessoais que são necessários para a celebração e execução de um contrato com o titular de dados” e as matérias previstas em lei foram divulgadas na política de privacidade (alínea iii do n.º 1 do artigo 28-8.º da Lei de Proteção de Informações Pessoais).
E.2 – Destruição de informações pessoais
Quando as informações pessoais se tornam desnecessárias devido à expiração do período de armazenamento ou à realização da finalidade do tratamento, etc., as informações pessoais devem ser imediatamente destruídas. O tratamento e o método de destruição são indicados a seguir:
1) Processo de Destruição: Selecionamos determinados elementos de informação pessoal que devem ser destruídos e destruímos com a aprovação do DPO.
2) Método de Destruição: Destruímos as informações pessoais registradas e armazenadas sob a forma de arquivos eletrônicos utilizando um método técnico (por exemplo, formatação de baixo nível) para garantir que os arquivos não possam ser reproduzidos, enquanto os dados pessoais registrados e armazenados sob a forma de documentos em papel são triturados ou incinerados.
E.3 – Armazenamento de informações pessoais
Se nós formos obrigados a manter os seus dados pessoais de acordo com a legislação aplicável, nós os manteremos armazenados para os fins e durante os períodos exigidos pela legislação aplicável.
E.4 – Os seus direitos
Você pode exercer os seus direitos relacionados com as informações pessoais junto a nós, incluindo através de um pedido de acesso, modificação ou eliminação ou suspensão do tratamento das suas informações pessoais, tal como previsto na legislação aplicável, incluindo na Lei de Proteção de Informações Pessoais. Você também pode exercer o seu direito de retirar o consentimento para a coleta/utilização/fornecimento de informações pessoais, o direito à portabilidade e os direitos relativos à tomada de decisões automatizada. Tais direitos também podem ser exercidos através dos seus representantes legais ou outras pessoas devidamente autorizadas.
Você pode exercer quaisquer direitos aplicáveis descritos acima entrando em contato conosco no nosso
Portal de Pedidos
.
E.5 – Medidas de segurança
Nós implementaremos medidas de segurança técnicas, organizacionais e físicas previstas na legislação coreana aplicável para proteger os dados pessoais, incluindo:
1) Medidas de gestão: Designação de um Encarregado da Proteção de Dados; estabelecimento e implementação de um plano de gestão interno; treinamento regular dos empregados sobre proteção de dados etc.;
2) Medidas técnicas: Gestão da autorização de acesso ao sistema de tratamento de dados pessoais; instalação de um sistema de controle de acesso; instalação de programas de segurança etc.; e
3) Medidas físicas: Restrição de acesso a instalações e equipamentos de armazenamento de informações pessoais, tais como salas de computadores e salas de armazenamento de dados etc.
E.6 – Entre em Contato Conosco
Em caso de dúvidas ou questões relacionadas com a privacidade e a proteção de dados, entre em contato com o nosso Time de Proteção de Dados através do e-mail
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
.
ADENDO F – EUA
A Lei da Privacidade do Consumidor da Califórnia, com as alterações introduzidas pela respetiva Lei de Direitos de Privacidade da Califórnia, atualmente não é aplicável a nós.
ADENDO G – PERU
Esta seção é aplicável quando o tratamento de dados pessoais realizado por nós é enquadrado na Lei 29733 – Lei Peruana de Proteção de Dados Pessoais.
G.1 Identificação da Base de Dados
Os seus dados pessoais serão armazenados na base de dados da Tools for Humanity chamada “Users”.
G.2 Consequências em fornecer ou não fornecer os seus dados pessoais
Caso você não forneça seus dados pessoais, nós não seremos capazes de cumprir os objetivos descritos neste documento.
G.3 Identidade de quem é ou pode ser destinatário
Os seus dados pessoais podem ser compartilhados com os seguintes destinatários:
Destinatário
Endereço
Finalidade
Tools for Humanity Corporation
548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104-5401 EUA
Conforme descrito na seção 6 acima.
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Allee am Röthelheimpark 41, 91052 Erlangen Deutschland
Conforme descrito na seção 6 acima.
Caso ocorram alterações nos destinatários, nós comunicaremos através do aplicativo.
G.4 Período de Retenção de Dados Pessoais
Exceto se a legislação aplicável dispuser de outra forma, nós manteremos seus dados pelo tempo que for razoavelmente necessário para fornecer nossos Serviços a você, atender aos nossos interesses comerciais legítimos e cumprir com nossas obrigações legais e regulatórias. Se você encerrar sua conta conosco, excluiremos os dados da sua conta em até um mês; caso a sua conta não seja encerrada, eliminaremos os dados da sua conta após 2 anos de inatividade. Caso seja exigido por lei, nós continuaremos a manter os seus dados pessoais conforme necessário para cumprir com nossas obrigações legais e regulatórias, incluindo monitoramento, detecção e prevenção de fraudes, bem como obrigações fiscais, contábeis e financeiras.
G.5 Exercício regular de direitos previsto na Lei 29733 – Lei Peruana de Proteção de Dados Pessoais
Você pode exercer seus direitos previstos na Lei 29733 – Lei Peruana de Proteção de Dados Pessoais, incluindo, mas não se limitando os direitos ARCO (Acesso, Retificação, Cancelamento e Oposição), enviando um pedido ao nosso DPO:
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
ou através do nosso Portal de Pedidos. Adicionalmente, se você considerar que o exercício dos seus direitos não foram atendidos de forma adequada, você pode apresentar uma reclamação para a Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais entrando em contato com a Mesa de Partes do Ministério da Justiça e dos Direitos Humanos: Calle Scipión Llona Nº 350, distrito de Miraflores, provincia y departamento de Lima, Peru, com o preenchimento de formulário disponível neste link: https://www.minjus.gob.pe/wp-content/uploads/2018/12/FORMULARIO-DE-PROCEDIMIENTO-TRILATERAL-DE-TUTELA.pdf
ADENDO H - BRASIL
H.1 Legislação Aplicável e Identificação de Agentes de Tratamento
Se você mora no Brasil, se os seus dados pessoais foram coletados no Brasil ou se você usa nossos Serviços no Brasil, a legislação aplicável é a Lei n.º 13.709/218 (Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados, ou “LGPD”). Nos termos da LGPD, a Tools For Humanity é a operadora e a World é a controladora responsável por seus dados pessoais quando você utiliza os nossos Serviços.
H.2 Direito de Oposição
Você tem o direito de se opor ao uso dos seus dados pessoais para finalidades que não dependam de consentimento caso a finalidade esteja em desacordo com a LGPD. Se sua oposição for atendida, a partir de então, nós não usaremos as suas informações pessoais para desenvolver e melhorar os recursos e as experiências dos nossos Serviços.
Destacamos que, se você não fornecer ou não permitir a coleta ou o tratamento de determinados dados pessoais, é possível que a qualidade da sua experiência seja afetada, que não consigamos cumprir os objetivos dos nossos Serviços ou que não possamos prestar determinados Serviços a você.
Em alguns casos, os seus dados são anonimizados e assim eles deixam de identificar você. Você não pode se opor ao uso de dados anonimizados porque não permitem a sua identificação, conforme previsto na LGPD. Usamos esses dados anonimizados para melhorar nossos produtos e serviços.
H.3 Exercício regular de direitos previsto na LGPD
De acordo com a LGPD, você tem o direito de confirmar a existência de tratamento, acessar, retificar ou solicitar a portabilidade dos dados tratados. Além disso, você pode solicitar informação das entidades públicas e privadas com as quais nós realizamos uso compartilhado dos seus dados pessoais. Você também pode solicitar informações sobre a possibilidade de não fornecer consentimento e consequências negativas, e pedir para excluir dados tratados com o consentimento. Você pode escolher excluir os seus dados da World App no menu de Configurações.
Em determinadas circunstâncias, você também tem o direito de se opor a e restringir o tratamento dos seus dados pessoais, ou de revogar seu consentimento que usamos como base para tratar os dados fornecidos por você.
Você pode exercer seus direitos previstos na LGPD enviando um pedido ao nosso DPO através do contato indicado no item H.4 abaixo, ou através do nosso Portal de Pedidos. Caso você entenda que não conseguiu exercer os seus direitos de forma adequada, você pode peticionar para a Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD), com o preenchimento de formulário disponível neste link:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
H.4 Encarregado de Proteção de Dados (
Data Protection Officer
– DPO)
Se a LGPD é a legislação aplicável a você, as informações do nosso DPO são:
DPO: Jannick Preiwisch
Dados de contato: dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
H.5 Transferência internacional dos seus dados pessoais
Se a LGPD é a legislação aplicável a você, e nós tivermos coletado os seus dados pessoais, nós também poderemos transferi-los para fora do país. No entanto, nós garantiremos sempre que os seus dados pessoais serão transferidos somente para países estrangeiros ou organismos internacionais que proporcionem grau de proteção adequado ao previsto na LGPD conforme reconhecido em decisões de adequação proferidas pela ANPD. Caso não haja uma decisão de adequação, nós continuaremos seguindo um padrão de proteção que seja, no mínimo, equivalente ao previsto na LGPD através da utilização das Cláusulas-Padrão Contratuais estabelecidas nas normas da ANPD ou quando obtivermos o seu consentimento específico e em destaque para a transferência internacional.
ANEXO I – Bases legais/finalidades das atividades de tratamento de dados da Tools for Humanity por jurisdição
Bases Legais // País
Fundamento jurídico // País
Estatísticas opcionais do World App
Dados da transação
Localização, para mostrar estações Orb
Análise de fraudes e tratamento de metadados para efeitos de funcionalidade
Sincronização de contatos e números de telefone
Notificações push
RGPD/RGPD Reino Unido
Consentimento
Execução de contrato
Consentimento
Legítimo Interesse
Consentimento
Consentimento
Hong Kong
A
PDPO
apenas requer notificação
A
PDPO
apenas requer notificação
A
PDPO
apenas requer notificação
A
PDPO
apenas requer notificação
A
PDPO
apenas requer notificação
A
PDPO
apenas requer notificação
Singapura
Consentimento
Consentimento presumido por notificação
Exceção de melhoria de negócios
Consentimento
Consentimento presumido por necessidade contratual
Consentimento presumido por conduta
Consentimento presumido por notificação
Consentimento
Consentimento presumido por notificação
Exceção aos interesses legítimos
Obrigações legais
Exceção aos legítimos interesses
Consentimento
Consentimento
Japão
É necessário apenas uma notificação APPI
É necessário apenas uma notificação APPI
É necessário apenas uma notificação APPI
É necessário apenas uma notificação APPI
Consentimento
Consentimento
Coreia do Sul
Execução do contrato
Execução do contrato
Execução do contrato
Execução do contrato
Consentimento
Consentimento
Argentina
Consentimento
Execução do contrato
Consentimento
Consentimento (exceto se existir uma obrigação legal local específica, como, por exemplo, a realização de KYC, caso em que o fundamento jurídico seria uma obrigação legal)
Consentimento
Consentimento
México
Consentimento
Consentimento
Consentimento
Consentimento
Consentimento
Consentimento
Brasil
Consentimento
Execução de Contrato
Consentimento
Legítimo Interesse
Consentimento
Consentimento
TFHPS20241108 - OT
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Ilani ya Faragha ya Tools for Humanity
Asante kwa kuchagua kuwa mmoja wa Jamii ya Worldcoin! Worldcoin ni teknolojia huria, inayoungwa mkono na jamii ya kimataifa ya watengenezezaji programu, watu binafsi, na wachangiaji wengine.
Ilani hii ya Faragha inasimamia data unazotupatia kupitia matumizi yako ya tovuti, programu (“Programu”), mfumo wetu, na pia huduma nyingine zinazohusiana na Ilani hii ya Faragha (kwa pamoja, “Huduma”). Kauli hii ya Faragha imejumuishwa kwenye na inatawaliwa na
Sheria na Masharti ya Mtumiaji
(“Sheria za Mtumiaji”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), pamoja na kampuni yake tanzu ya Ujerumani Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; kwa pamoja, “
TFH
” au “
sisi
,” “
yetu
”), inachangia kwenye utengenezaji na ukuzaji wa teknolojia ya Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”) lakini ni tofauti na Asasi ya Worldcoin ambayo inadhibiti uchakataji wa data zinazohusiana na kifaa cha Orb.
1. Mdhibiti
Sisi ni wadhibiti data wa “Data zote za Programu ya World”, “Data za Kuthibitisha Stakabadhi” na “Data nyingine za Biashara”: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH ina kituo katika Umoja wa Ulaya (European Union, “
EU
”) kupitia Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Data za Programu ya World” inamaanisha data zote za kibinafsi zilizokusanywa na kuchakatwa kupitia matumizi yako ya programu ya World App, kama ilivyobainishwa zaidi katika Sehemu ya 5 hapa chini, isipokuwa data zozote za kibinafsi zinazohusiana na matumizi yako ya mfumo wa Worldcoin au sarafu za Worldcoin (kama vile anwani yako ya pochi na data za miamala, ambazo hatukusanyi).
Data za Kuthibitisha Stakabadhi inamaanisha data zinazochakatwa unapothibitisha maelezo ili kuyaongeza kwenye World ID yako ya umiliki wa kibinafsi. Hii inamaanisha K.m., kusoma kifaa cha NFC kwenye pasipoti yako ili kuhifadhi maelezo tako ya pasipoti kwenye kifaa chako. Data hizi ziko chini ya udhibiti wako na baada ya kuythibitisha uhalali wa stakabadhi yako, TFH inahifadhi kipande bila utambulisho cha kiwango cha hash cha sahihi ya kipekee ya kriptografia ya maelezo yako (k.m., pasipoti) ili kuhakikisha kwamba kila stakabadhi inaweza kuongezwa mara moja tu kwenye World ID.
“Data za biashara” inamaanisha data zote za kibinafsi zilizokusanywa na kuchakatwa kupitia njia nyingine za kampuni yetu wakati wa kuwasiliana au njia yoyote nyingine ya kushirikiana au kutangamana nasi kupitia barua pepe, mikutano kwa video au tovuti zetu. Kwa uchakataji data katika muktadha wa Programu ya Orb tafadhali rejelea Ilani ya Faragha ya Programu ya Orb iliyounganishwa kwenye Programu ya Orb. Kwa uchakataji data katika muktadha wa ukusanyaji na majaribio ya data maalum tafadhali rejelea Ilani husika ya Faragha ya Ukusanyaji na Majaribio iliyounganishwa kwenye programu yako ya majaribio. Kwa uchakataji data katika muktadha wa tovuti yetu tafadhali rejelea Sera ya Kuki kwenye tovuti yetu.
2. Visasisho vya Ilani hii ya Faragha
Wakati mwingine tunasasisha Kauli hii ya Faragha. Tukifanya mabadiliko makubwa, kama vile jinsi tunavyotumia maelezo yako ya kibinafsi, basi tutakuarifu kupitia barua pepe au ujumbe katika Programu yako.
3. Nini kiko ndani ya Kauli hii ya Faragha?
Jitihadi zetu za kulinda faragha yako na data zako
Maelezo tunayokusanya na kwa nini
Jinsi tunavyotumia data tunazokusanya
Mahali ambako tunachakata data zako
Wakati ambao tunashiriki data zako
Jinsi data zako zinavyorekodiwa kwenye blockchain ya umma
Jinsi tunavyotumia kuki
Muda tunaohifadhi data zako
Jinsi Ilani hii ya Faragha ilivyo tofauti kwa watoto na vijana
Haki za kisheria ulizo nazo
Jinsi ya kuwasiliana nasi kuhusu Ilani hii ya Faragha
4. Jitihadi Zetu za Kulinda Faragha yako na Data zako
Tunajitahidi kwa dhati kulinda faragha yako na kulinda data zako. Tunatambua kwamba tunaweza tu kutimiza misheni yetu ya kusambaza sarafu zetu za Kidijitali kwa njia ya haki kwa watu wengi kadri iwezekanavyo ikiwa watu watakuwa na imani nasi, na faragha na usalama wa data ni jambo la msingi ili kupata imani yako.
Usiri
Tumebuni bidhaa na huduma haswa tukijali faragha yako. Tunakusanya data ili kuboresha bidhaa na huduma zetu. Daima tutakueleza, hapa kwenye Kauli hii ya Faragha au katika fomu za idhini ya data za bidhaa na huduma maalum, ni data gani tunazokusanya, na kwa nini tunakusanya data hizo, na tunachofanya na data hizo.
Usalama wa Data
Tumeteua timu ya kutunza data zako na tumeweka kinga halisia na za kielektroniki zinazolinda data zako zinaposafirishwa na zinapohifadhiwa. Wakati huo huo, hakuna huduma inayoweza kuwa salama kabisa. Ikiwa una wasiwasi zozote kuhusu akaunti yako au data zako, tafadhali wasiliana nasi kupitia
Lango letu la Maombi
au kwa kututumia barua kwa anwani Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA.
5. Maelezo Tunayokusanya na Kwa Nini
5.1 Data Unazotupatia
Wewe kama mtumiaji, hauhitajiki kupatiana data zozote ili kufikia Programu. Hata hivyo, unaweza kuhitajika kutupatia data fulani ili uweze kutumia kipengele fulani ndani ya Huduma. Misingi ya kisheria ya kuchakata katika matukio yaliyo hapa chini ni idhini ya mtumiaji na utekelezaji wa mkataba (ahadi yetu ya kutoa Huduma). Hapa chini kuna orodha ya data unazoweza kupatiana na tunachoweza kufanya na data hizo:
Katika Muktadha wa Programu ya World:
Nambari ya simu.
Unaweza kuchagua kuweka nambari yako ya simu ili kuihusisha na akaunti yako. Kwa kibali chako, watumiaji wengine wanaweza kutafuta akaunti yako kwa kutumia nambari yako ya simu. Huenda tukahitaji nambari yako ya simu unapowasilisha ombi la data za mhusika. Misingi ya kisheria ya kuchakata data hizi ni utekelezaji Huduma chini ya Sheria za Mtumiaji.
Jina la Mtumiaji.
Unaweza kuunganisha jina la mtumiaji kwenye anwani ya pochi lako na kubadilisha jina la mtumiaji wakati wowote.
Tarehe ya Kuzaliwa.
Unaweza kufichua tarehe yako ya kuzaliwa ili kuhakikisha uambatanaji na vigezo vya umri unaohitajika. Hatutawahi kuhifadhi tarehe yako ya kuzaliwa lakini ni “checksum” ya data hizo na kama una umri wa zaidi ya miaka 18 au la.
Maoni na mawasiliano kutoka kwako.
Hii inajumuisha barua pepe zozote, ujumbe wowote, au mawasiliano mengine yoyote unayotutumia kupitia barua pepe au tovuti za mitandao ya kijamii ya wahusika wengine. Hii inaweza kujumuisha kuchakata anwani za barua pepe au wasifu za mitandao ya kijamii ikiwa unataka kuwasiliana nasi kupitia mbinu kama hizo. Tunaweza kutumia mtoa husuma mwingine ili kuwezesha utafiti kuhusu matumizi yako ya Huduma zetu. Misingi ya kisheria ya kuchakata data hizi ni utekelezaji Huduma chini ya Sheria za Mtumiaji.
Waasiliani kwenye kitabu cha waasiliani.
Unaweza kuruhusu Programu kufikia kitabu chako cha anwani ili kuwezesha kipengele ambacho kinakurahisishia kutafuta na kutangamana na watumiaji wengine ambao huenda wakawa katika kitabu chako cha anwani. Misingi ya kisheria wa kuchakata data hizi ni nia halali ya mhusika kupatikana ndani ya Programu na nia ya mtumiaji aneyeshiriki kupata waasiliani wake ndani ya Programu.
Tafadhali kumbuka:
Una jukumu la kuhakikisha kwamba kusambaza maelezo yako ya mawasiliano kunaambatana na sheria husika. Hii inaweza kukuhitaji upewe ruhusa na waasiliani wako na hautasambaza kwa TFH maelezo yoyote ya mawasiliano kutoka kwa watu wengine bila idhini yao ya moja kwa moja. Unaweza kubadilisha uamuzi wako na kuondoa uwezo wetu wa kufikia waasiliani wako wakati wowote katika mipangilio ya kifaa chako. Ukichagua kuleta waasiliani katika kitabu cha anwani cha kifaa chako kwenye Programu ili kujua ni waasiliani wagani wanatumia Huduma zetu au ili kuwaalika wajiunge nawe katika kutumia Huduma zetu, mara kwa mara tutalandanisha nambari za simu za waasiliani wako na nambari hizo na anwani husiani za pochi zilizopatianwa na watumiaji wengine kwenye seva setu.
Maelezo ya Eneo
. Unaweza kuamua kuwezesha huduma inayotegemea eneo (kama vile kipengele kinachokuruhusu kumpata Mhudumu wa Orb aliyekaribu nawe). Ni kwa idhini yako maalum pekee, tunaweza kukusanya maelezo kuhusu eneo lako kupitia GPS ili kuwezesha husuma inayotegemea eneo ili kukuonyesha kifaa cha Orb kilicho karibu nawe. Unaweza kubadilisha vibali vyako wakati wowote katika mipangilio ya kifaa chako. Ikiwa hayuko nchini Korea Kusini tunaweza pia kuhifadhi kadirio la eneo lako bila kuhusishwa na akaunti yako ya Programu ya World. Tunatumia data hizi ili kuboresha huduma zetu haswa lakini sio tu katika kuchagua maeneo ya kifaa cha Orb.
Soko la P2P
. Ikiwa unatumia Huduma za Soko la P2P (zinakopatikana) ambazo zinakuwezesha kununua sarafu za kidijitali kutoka kwa watumiaji wengine, basi tunaweza kuchukua maelezo ya ziada kama vile anwani yako ya pochi, maelezo yako ya mawasiliano, na nambari ya akaunti yako inayohusishwa na muamala (kama vile nambari yako ya M-PESA). Tunarekodi data za muamala kama sehemu ya kutoa Huduma za Soko la P2P. Pia tunaweza kuchukua maelezo ya ziada ili kuambatana na mahitaji husika ya KYC.
Metadata za kifaa.
Ikiwa unatumia Programu tunakusanya metadata kutika kwenye kifaa chako ili kuhakikisha kwamba Programu inafanya kazi vizuri na kwamba haukiuki Sheria na Masharti yetu. Hii inajumuisha kukusanya vitambulishi vya kifaa na anwani za IP.
Data za World ID za Kifaa.
Pia tunachakata metadata za kifaa chako ili kutathmini utambulisho wa kipekee wa kifaa. Msimbo wa utambulisho huu unatumika kama ishara inayothibitisha ubinafsi wako unapotumia World ID ya kifaa.
Katika muktadha wa uchakataji Data za Kibiashara:
Jina la kwanza na la mwisho.
Tunaweza kuchakata jina lako la kwanza na la mwisho ili kutimiza nia halali ya kudumisha na kudhibiti uhusiano wa kibiashara pamoja nawe.
Anwani ya Barua Pepe.
Pia unaweza kupatiana anwani yako ya barua pepe kwenye orodha yetu ya mapasho ili kufahamishwa kuhusu habari mpya za mradi wa Worldcoin. Huenda tukahitaji anwani yako ya barua pepe unapowasilisha ombi la mmiliki data. Tunaweza kuchakata anwani yako ya barua pepe ili kutimiza nia halali ya kudumisha na kudhibiti uhusiano wa kibiashara pamoja nawe.
Nambari ya Simu.
Tunaweza kuchakata nambari yako ya simu ili kutimiza nia halali ya kudumisha na kudhibiti uhusiano wa kibiashara pamoja nawe.
Data za Biashara
. Ikiwa una uhusiano wa kibiashara nasi (kama vile wewe ni Mhudumu wa Orb au mletaji wetu), basi tunaweza kuhitaji maelezo kama vile majina, anwani ya barua, barua pepe, nambari ya simu, anwani ya pochi, na nyaraka zingine (kama vile kitambulisho chako cha serikali) kama sehemu ya kuimarisha uhusiano huo wa kibiashara na ili kutimiza majukumu ya kumjua-mteja-wako. Tunaweza kutumia huduma za wahusika wengine, kama vile Onfido, ili kutusaidia kukusanya na kuhakiki maelezo na nyaraka zilizotajwa hapa juu ili kutimiza majukumu ya kumjua-mteja-wako.
Data za utumaji ombi
. Ikiwa ungependa kufanya kazi nasi ni lazima ututumie ombi lako linalojumuisha barua ya kujieleza pamoja na CV na vile vile maelezo ya kibinafsi ambayo ungependa kufichua.
Unaweza kupata msingi wa kisheria wa kila shughuli ya kuchakata data hapa juu kwa kina zaidi kwenye
AMBATISHO LA I – Misingi ya kisheria ya shughuli za Tools for Humanity za kuchakata data
mwishoni mwa ilani hii ya faragha.
5.2 Data Tunazokusanya Kutoka Kwa Vyanzo Vingine
Mara kwa mara, huenda tukapata maelezo kukuhusu wewe kutoka kwa vyanzo vingine vifuatavyo:
Data za Blockchain
. Tunaweza kuchambua data za blockchain ya umma ili kuhakikisha kwamba watu wanaotumia Huduma zetu hawajihusishi katika shughuli haramu au zilizopigwa marufuku chini ya Sheria za Mtumiaji, na ili kuchambua mitindo ya miamala kwa madhumuni ya utafiti na utengenezaji.
Huduma za Uthibitishaji Utambulisho
. Tunaweza kupata maelezo kutoka kwa huduma za wahusika wengine kwa kutumia data zako ili kuthibitisha utambulisho wako ikiwa inahitajika na sheria (kama vile mahitaji husika ya kumjua-mteja-wako). Ili kufafanua,
hatutumii
data zako za bayometriki tunapothibitisha utambulisho wako kama inavyohitajika na sheria.
Hifadhidata za talanta
. Huenda tukakusanya data kutoka kwa vyanzo mbali mbali ili kupeana kazi kwa watu walio na talanta.
5.3 Data Tunazokusanya Kiotomatiki
Tukiruhusiwa chini ya sheria husika, tunaweza kukusanya aina fulani za data kiotomatiki unapotumia Huduma zetu. Maelezo haya yanatusaidia kuangazia masuala ya uhudumiaji wateja, kuimarisha utendakazi wa Huduma, kukupa huduma fanisi na ya kibinafsi, na ili kulinda stakabadhi za Akaunti yako. Maelezo yanayokusanya kiotomatiki yanajumuisha:
Vitambulishi vya Mtandaoni:
Maelezo ya eneo la kijiografia (tazama hapa juu), mfumo msingi wa uendeshaji kompyuta au simu tamba, jina na toleo la kivinjari, na anwani za IP. Katika matukio chache sana data hizi pia zinawekwa katika rekodi yetu ya ugunduaji ulaghai na mtiririko haramu wa fedha. Pia vinahudumu kama njia ya kutoa huduma iliyostawi na bila ulaghai ya maunzitepe yetu.
Data za Matumizi:
Data za uthibitishaji, maswali ya kiusalama, na data nyingine zilizokusanywa kupitia kuki na teknolojia sawa.
Kuki
: faili ndogo za data zinazohifadhiwa kwenye hifadhi yako au kwenye kumbukumbu ya kifaa chako zinazotusaidia kuimarisha Huduma zetu na hisia zako, kuona ni maeneo na vipengele gani vya Huduma zetu ni maarufu, na kuhesabu mara unayotembelea Huduma. Ili kupata misingi ya kisheria ya kuchakata data hizo tafadhali rejelea
Sera yetu ya Kuki
ambapo tumeelezea aina tofauti ya kuki tunazotumia.
Hivyo hivyo, Programu inakusanya maelezo kwa ajili ya usuluhishaji matatizo na uimarishaji. Tunatumia huduma za wahusika wengine, kama vile Segment.io au PostHog, ili kufanya makadirio ya maelezo kuhusu matumizi ya watumiaji. Inapowezekana, tunachukua hatua ili kupunguza au kuficha maelezo yanayotumwa kwa wahusika wengine (kama vile kusimba data).
5.4 Data Bila Utambulisho na Zilizokadiriwa
Uondoaji utambulisho ni mbinu ya kuchakata data ambayo inageuza data kutozingatiwa kama data za kibinafsi kwani baada ya utambulisho kuondolewa data hizo haiwezi tena kuhusishwa na mtu fulani binafsi. Mifano ya data bila utambulisho zinajumuisha:
Data za miamala
Data za ubonyezaji maeneo ya skrini
Metriki za utendakazi
Vigunduaji ulaghai (ingawa data za kibinafsi zinatumika kwa malengo haya, pia)
Pia tunakadiria data, kwa kuunganisha pamoja viwango vikubwa vya maelezo ili yasimtambulishe tena wala kumrejelea mtu binafsi. Tunaweza kutumia data bila utambulisho au zilizokadiriwa kwa madhumuni yetu ya kibiashara, kama vile kuelewa mahitaji na tabia za watumiaji, kuimarisha Huduma zetu, kufanya shughuli za umaizi na uuzaji wa kibiashara. kugundua hatari za kiusalama, na kufunza teknolojia zetu.
Msingi wa kisheria wa kuchakata data zilizotajwa hapa juu ni nia halali ya kuwa na programu au tovuti inayofanya kazi, dhana za kibiashara na uzuiaji ulaghai.
6. Jinsi Tunavyotumia Data Tunazokusanya
6.1 Maelezo Jumla
Ni lazima tuwe na sababu halali (au “msingi wa kisheria wa kuchakata”) ya kutumia maelezo yako za kibinafsi. Katika baadhi ya matukio, matumizi ya maelezo yako ya kibinafsi hayahitaji idhini yako ya mapema. Tunatumia data zako kwa malengo yafuatayo pekee:
Kutoa na kudumisha bidhaa na huduma zetu chini ya Sheria za Mtumiaji. Huduma hizi zinajumuisha:
Programu ambapo watumiaji wanaweza kudhibiti World ID yao na sarafu zake za kidijitali na pia kujifunza kuhusu sarafu za kidijitali kwa ujumla na mradi wa Worldcoin haswa;
Programu ya Mhudumu ambapo Wahudumu wa Orb wanaweza kudhibiti na kusimamia vifaa vyao vya Orb na takwimu za vifaa hivyo;
Soko la P2P ambapo tunapatanisha watumiaji na maajenti (haihusu watumiaji walio nchini Ujerumani au wana makazi yao au ofisi rasmi nchini Ujerumani);
Kuimarisha na kutengeneza bidhaa na huduma zetu, ikijumuisha kuondoa hitilafu na kukarabati kasoro kwenye Huduma zetu.
Kufanya utafiti wa sayansi ya data.
Kuchambua matumizi yako ya Huduma zetu ili kukupa usaidizi bora.
Kukuwezesha kuchapisha maelezo kwenye blockchain ili kuthibitisha wewe ni mtu binafsi.
Kutumia anwani ya pochi lako ili kukutumia sarafu za kidijitali ambazo tunahusika nazo.
Kuambatana na sheria husika kama vile sheria na vikwazo vya dhidi ya utakatishaji pesa. Hii inajumuisha:
Kutumia anwani yako ya IP ili kuwazuia watu binafsi kutoka mataifa au nchi zilizopigwa marufuku kutumia Huduma;
Kujibu maombi ya mmiliki data chini ya sheria husika za ulindaji data kama vile maombi ya kufikia au kufuta data;
Kufuatilia mitiririko ya fedha ambazo zinaweza kuwa chafu k.m. anwani zilizowekwa kwenye orodha nyeusi; na
Kuambatana na sheria husika kama vile kanuni dhidi ya maudhui haramu.
Kushughulikia maombi ya huduma, malalamishi na maswali yako kama mteja.
Kusuluhisha migogoro, kutatua masuala, na kutekeleza makubaliano yetu nawe, pamoja na Ilani hii ya Faragha na Sheria za Mtumiaji.
Kuwasiliana nawe kuhusiana na visasisho kwenye Huduma.
6.2 Stakabadhi
TFH inakuwezesha kuhifadhi maelezo fulani ya kuingia kwenye akaunti kwenye kifaa chako ili kuyasambaza katika muundombinu wa “zero knowledge” wa teknolojia ya World ID protocol (“Stakabadhi”). Katika muktadha wa Stakabadhi tunachakata data hizi kwa njia zifuatazo:
Tunakagua uhalali wa stakabadhi yako (kama ni pasipoti hii inafanywa kupitia thibitisho la nchi yako).
Tunakuthibitisha kama mmiliki halali wa stakabadhi hiyo (kwa pasipoti hii inafanywa kwenye kifaa chako kupitia picha ya uso wako (selfie) ambayo haihifadhiwi kamwe).
Tunasimba, kuweka sahihi na kuhifadhi data za stakabadhi yako katika mazingira salama kwenye kifaa chako.
Hatuwezi kufikia maelezo ya kibinafsi yaliyo kwenye stakabadhi yako.
Kisha baadaye unaweza kusambaza maelezo haya na wahusika wanaohitaji kupitia ulinzi wa teknolojia ya World ID (k.m., unaweza kuthibitisha kwamba una umri wa anaglau miaka 18 bila kuvumbua umri wako haswa au wewe ni nani).
Kwa pasipoti, TFH inadumisha tu maelezo bila utambulisho wa kiwango cha hash cha sahihi ya kipekee ya kriptografia ya pasipoti yako ili kuhakikisha kwamba kila pasipoti inaweza kuthibitishwa mara moja tu.
Uchakataji huu unategemea idhini yako na hatuwezi kufikia data zako za kibinafsi kutoka kwenye pasipoti yako ambazo zimehifadhiwa kwenye kifaa chako. Unaweza kufuta data hizi kwenye simu yako kwa kufuta Programu ya World.
6.3 Data za World ID
World ID yako (yaani nambari ya siri inayohitajika ili kuitumia) inahifadhiwa kwenye kifaa chako pekee (ikiwa una hifadhi rudufu kuna nakala iliyosimbwa ndani ya hifadhi rudufu yako). TFH au mwtu mwingine hawawezi kufikia World ID yako. Unaweza kutumia World ID yako bila kujitambulisha. Kila wakati unapotumia World ID kwenye programu mpya, programu hiyo inapokea tu nambari inayoweza kufutwa (“Kibatilishaji”) ambayo haivumbui World ID yako. Hii inawezeshwa kupitia teknolojia ya “Zero Knowledge Proofs” (unathibitisha tu kuwa una World ID lakini si gani) na kuhakikisha kwamba World ID yako haiwezi kutumiwa kukufuatilia kwenye programu nyingi. Hii inamaanisha kwamba WorldID si kitambulisho jumla cha mtumiaji kwenye Intaneti.
World In inathibitisha utendaji kupitia teknolojia huria inayofikia “Merkle Tree” ya hadharani ya hash za World ID zilizothibitishwa. World ID si huduma yenye mamlaka kuu lakini ni teknolojia inayoweza kutumiwa na mtu yeyote. Tunatoa APIs ili kuwezesha ufikiaji wa “Merkle Tree” na World ID Proofs lakini hatupokei data zozote za kibinafsi katika muktadha huu.
Ni muhimu kukukbuka kwamba hatuchakati data zozote zinazohusiana na World ID yako ambazo zinaweza kutuwezesha kukutambulisha. Data zote za kibinafsi zinazochakatwa katika muktadha huu wa Programu ya World haswa anwani ya pochi lako na data za miamala zimepangwa kutohusishwa na data za World ID.
7. Mahali Ambako Tunachakata Data Zako
7.1 Utumaji Data.
Unapotupatia data zako, huenda zikatumwa, kuhifadhiwa, au kusindikwa katika eneo nje ya mahali ambako data zako zilikusanywa. Nchi ambako data zako zinatumwa, kuhifadhiwa, au kusindikwa huenda zikawa hazina sheria za ulindaji data ambazo ni sawa na zile za nchi ambako ulikuwa wakati ulipatiana data.
Tunafanya juhudi bora zaidi ili kuambatana na misimamo iliyotajwa katika kila eneo la mamlaka kuhusiana na sheria za faragha. Tunashiriki tu data na wasindikaji data walio nje ya eneo lako la mamlaka ikiwa utumaji huo wa data ni wa kisheria na ikiwa tuna imani kwamba msindikaji data huyo atalinda data zako kama inavyohitajika chini ya sheria husika na, aidha, kwa kuambatana na viwango vyetu.
7.2 Hatari Zinazoweza Kukumba Utumaji Data
Hapa chini ni orodha ya hatari zinazoweza kutokea tunapotuma data zako hadi Marekani, Umoja wa ulaya, au nchini nyingine. Hapa chini pia tumeweka muhtasari wa jinsi ya kuzuia hatari husika.
Tunapofanya kadri tuwezayo ili kuhakikisha kwamba wanakandarasi wetu wadogo wana jukumu la kimkataba la kulinda data zako vya kutosha, wanakandarasi hawa wadogo huenda wasiwe chini ya sheria za faragha ya data za nchi yako. Wakandarasi wakichakata data zako kwa njia isiyo ya kisheria bila idhini, basi huenda ikawa vigumu kudai haki zako za faragha dhidi ya wakandarasi hao. Tunazuia hatari hii kwa kuwa na makubaliano dhabiti ya uchakataji data na wakandarasi wetu ambayo inawabidi kulinda data kwa kiwango cha GDPR na kutimiza maombi ya mhusika.
Kuna uwezekano kwamba sheria ya faragha ya data nchini mwako haiendanishi na sheria za faragha ya data nchini Marekani, au katika EU. Daima tutajaribu kuambatana na kiwango cha juu zaidi cha ulindaji data ambacho tunatumia.
Kuna uwezekano kwamba data zako zitaweza kufikia na maafisa au mamlaka za kiserikali. Katika matukio hayo tumejitayarisha kupinga mahakamani ombi lolote la kiserikali la kufikia data ambalo si halali, linapita mipaka, au si la kisheria. Aidha tunatumia usimbaji wa hali ya juu ili kuzuia ufikiaji bila idhini.
Tafadhali kumbuka kwamba orodha hii ina mifano, lakini huenda haijajumuisha hatari zote zinazoweza kukukumba.
7.3 Mfumo wa Faragha ya Data kwa utumaji data Marekani
TFH inaambatana na Mfumo wa Faragha ya Data wa EU-U.S. (EU-U.S. DPF), Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF, na Mfumo wa Faragha ya Data ya Swiss-U.S. (Swiss-U.S. DPF) kama ilivyobainishwa na Idara ya Biashara ya Marekani. TFH imethibitishia Idara ya Biashara ya Marekani kwamba inaambatana na Kanuni za Mfumo wa Faragha ya Data za EU-U.S. (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) kuhusiana na uchakataji wa data za kibinafsi zilizopokewa kutoka kwa Umoja wa Ulaya kwa kutegemea EU-U.S. DPF na zilizopokewa kutoka Uingereza (na Jibrata) kwa kutegemea Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF. TFH imethibitishia Idara ya Biashara ya Marekani kwamba inaambatana na Kanuni za Mfumo wa Faragha ya Data za Swiss-U.S. (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) kuhusiana na uchakataji wa data za kibinafsi zilizopokewa kutoka Uswizi kwa kutegemea Swiss-U.S. DPF. Ikiwa kuna ukinzani wowote kati ya masharti yaliyo katika Ilani hii ya Kanuni za Faragha ya Data na Kanuni za DPF ya EU-U.S. na/au Kanuni za DPF ya Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, kanuni hizo zitatawala. Ili kujua mengi zaidi kuhusu mpango wa Mfumo wa Faragha ya Data (Data Privacy Framework, DPF), na ili kutazama thibitisho letu, tembelea
https://www.privacyshield.gov/
.
TFH ina wajibu wa kuchakata data za kibinafsi ambazo inapokea chini ya DPF na kisha kuzituma kwa wahusika wengine ambao ni maajenti wake. TFH inaambatana na Kanuni za DPF kwa utumaji wote wa data za kibinafsi kutoka EU, Uingereza, na Uswizi, pamoja na kauli a dhima ya utumaji.
Tume ya Baishara ya Kitaifa ina mamlaka juu ya uambatanaji wa TFH na EU-U.S. DPF, Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF, na pia Swiss-U.S. DPF. Katika hali fulani, TFH inaweza kuhitajika kufichua data za kibinafsi katika kujibu maombi ya kisheria kutoka kwa mamlaka za umma, pamoja na kutimiza vigezo vya usalama wa kitaifa au utekelezaji sheria.
Katika kuambatana na EU-U.S. DPF na Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF na pia Swiss-U.S. DPF, TFH inajitahidi kusuluhisha malalamishi yanayohusiana na Kanuni za DPF kuhusu ukusanyaji na matumizi yetu ya maelezo yako ya kibinafsi.. Watu wa EU na Uingezeza na Uswizi walio na maombi au malalamishi kuhusiana na jinsi tunavyoshughulikia data za kibinafsi zilizopokewa kwa kutegemea EU-U.S. DPF na Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF na pia Swiss-U.S. DPF kwanza wanapaswa kuwasiliana na TFH kwa anwani dpo@worldcoin.org
Katika kuambatana na EU-U.S. DPF na Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF na pia Swiss-U.S. DPF, TFH inajitahidi kushirikiana na kuambatana na ushauri wa jopo lililotengenezwa na mamlaka za ulinzi wa data za EU (Data Protection Authorities, DPAs)} na Ofisi ya Kamishna wa Maelezo (Information Commissioner’s Office, ICO) wa Uingereza na Mamlaka ya Udhibiti ya Gibraltar (Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, GRA) na Kamishna wa Ulinzi wa Data na Maelezo wa Kitaifa (Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, FDPIC) wa Uswizi kuhusiana na ushughulikiaji wa data za kibinafsi zilizopokewa kwa kutegemea EI-U.S. DPF na Nyongeza ya Uingereza kwenye EU-U.S. DPF na pia Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Kwa malalamishi kuhusiana na uambatanaji na DPF ambayo hayajasuluhishwa na mbinu nyingine zozote za DPF, una wajibu, chini ya hali fulani, kuagiza mchakato wa usuluhishaji. Maelezo zaidi yanaweza kupatikana kwenye tovuti rasmi ya DPF.
8. Wakati ambao Tunashiriki Data Zako
Hatutawahi kuuza data zako
.
Wakati ambapo tunasambaza data zako nje ya shirika letu, kila wakati:
Tunazishiriki kwa njia salama;
Kuchukua hatua kuhakikisha kwamba inashughulikiwa kwa njia ambayo inaendanisha na jitihada zetu kwa faragha yako; na
Tunazuia kampuni zingine kutozitumia kwa malengo yao binafsi.
Tunasambazai data zako kwa njia hizi chache:
Tunazambazia Asasi ya Worldcoin:
Tunaweza kutenda kama wachakataji wa Asasi ya Worldcoin wa data za kibinafsi kwa niaba ya Worldcoin (tafadhali tazama kauli ya faragha ya Worldcoin ili kupata maelezo zaidi).
Kusambaza ndani ya shirika letu:
Tunafichua tu data kwa wanatimu wetu ambao wanahitaji kuzifikia ili kuweza kufanya kazi na majukumu yao. Tunafichua tu kiwango cha data ambacho kinahitajika ili kufanya kazi na majukumu fulani na kuwa na mfumo ulio na udhibiti mkali wa ufikiaji.
Kusambaza kwa wachuuzi na watoa huduma nje ya shirika letu:
Tunafichua tu data kwa watoa huduma ambao huduma zao tunazitegemea ili kuchakata data na kukupa Huduma zetu. Tunafichua tu data kwa wachuuzi wa huduma ya uthibitishaji utambulisho ikiwa inahitajika na Sheria (yaani, mahitaji-ya-kumjua-mteja-wako).
Kategoria za watoa huduma hao ni:
Watoa huduma ya wingu (aina zote za data)
Watoa bidhaa za SaaS; tunatumia bidhaa za SaaS katika kategoria zifuatazo:
Menejimenti ya hifadhidata na miundombinu
Usalama wa Data
Uteuzi
Mawasiliano
Utafiti
KYC/KYB yaani. kukagua hati rasmi
Menejimenti ya maombi ya data
Usaidizi wa kiufundi
Huduma kwa watumiaji
Wataalamu wa nje
Watengenezaji maunzitepe maalum
Wataalamu wa kisheria
Washauri wa ushuru
Benki
Watoa huduma ya kuweka lebo (chini ya ulinzi maalum pekee)
Huduma za ukaguaji historia za watumaji maombi na Wahudumu wa Orb
Kwa watekelezaji sheria, maafisa, au wahusika wengine:
Tunaweza kufichua data zako ili kuambatana na sheria husika na kutii mahitaji ya lazima ya kisheria. Kwa uangalifu tunazingatia kila ombi ili kubaini kana kwamba ombi hilo linaambatana na sheria na, panapofaa, tunaweza kupinga maombi ambayo si halali, yanayopita mpaka, au yasiyo ya kisheria. Tunaweza kushiriki data za kibinafsi na polisi na mamlaka nyingine za serikali ambapo tunaamini ni muhimu ili kuambatana na sheria, kanuni au mchakato au jukumu nyingine la kisheria.
Tunaweza kushiriki maelezo yako ya kibinafsi ikiwa tunaamini kwamba matendo yako hayaendanishi na Sheria zetu za Mtumiaji, ikiwa tunaamini kwamba umekiuka sheria, au ikiwa tunaamini kwamba ni muhimu ili kulinda haki zetu, mali yetu, na usalama wetu, watumiaji wetu, umma, na wengine.
Tunaweza kushiriki maelezo yako ya kibinafsi na mawakili wetu na washauri wengine wataalamu ambapo ni muhimu ili kupata ushauri au vinginevyo kulinda na kudhibiti bia zetu za kibiashara.
Tunaweza kushiriki maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kuhusiana, au wakati wa majadiliano kuhusiana na, ununuzi wowote, mali ya kampuni kuuzwa, ufadhili, au sehemu ya biashara au biashara yote kununuliwa na kampuni nyingine.
Data, ikijumuisha maelezo yako ya kibinafsi, zinaweza kushirikiwa miongoni mwa kampuni mzazi, washirika, na kampuni tanzu za siku zijazo na kampuni nyingine chini ya udhibiti na umiliki wa pamoja.
Tunaweza kushiriki maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kwa idhini yako au kwa maagizo yako.
9. Jinsi Data Zako Zinavyorekodiwa kwenye Blockchain ya Umma
Maelezo ya miamala yanayohusiana na matumizi yako ya Huduma zetu yanaweza kurekodiwa katika blockchain ya umma.
Tafadhali kumbuka:
Blockchain ni rekodi ya hadgharani ya miamala ambazo zinadumuishwa kwenye mitandao isiyo na mamlaka kuu inayoendeshwa na wahusika wengine ambayo haidhibitiwi wala kuendeshwa na Worldcoin. Kwa ajili ya hali ya rekodi za blockchain kuwa za umma na zisizoweza kubadilishwa, hatuwezi kutoa hakikisho la uwezo wa kurekebisha, kufuta, wala kudhibiti ufichuaji wa data zilizopkiwa na kuhifadhiwa kwenye blockchain
10. Jinsi Tunavyotumia Kuki
Tunatumia kuki ili kusaidia Huduma zetu kufanya kazi vyema zaidi. Kando na kuki, tunaweza kutumia teknolojia nyingine sawa na hiyo, kama vile web beacons, ili kuwafuatilia watumiaji wa Huduma zetu. Web beacons, (pia zinaitwa "clear gifs") ni grafiki ndogo sana zilizo na kitambulishi cha kipekee, zilizo na utendaji sawa na kuki.
Sera yetu ya Kuki
, imejumuishwa hapa kama rejeleo.
Pia tunatumia huduma ya Google Analytics. Maelezo mengi zaidi kuhusu jinsi Google inavyotumia data zako unapotumia tovuti na programu za wabia wake:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Kwa kutumia Huduma hizi, unatuidhinisha kuhifadhi na kufikia kuki na data nyingine kwenye kompyuta yako au kifaa chako tamba na kutumia huduma ya Google Analytics kuhusiana na shughuli hizo. Tafadhali soma maelezo yaliyo kwenye kiungo kilichopatianwa ili uelewe unachoidhinisha.
11. Tunahifadhi Data Zako Kwa Muda Gani?
Isipokuwa iwe imetajwa vinginevyo na sheria husika, tunahifadhi data zako kwa muda ambao unahitajika ili kukupa Huduma zetu, kutimiza malengo yetu ya kibiashara, na kuambatana na majukumu yetu ya kisheria na kiudhibiti. Ukifunga akaunti yako, tutafuta data za akaunti yako ndani ya mwezi mmoja; vinginevyo tutafuta data za akaunti yako baada ya miaka 2 ya kukosa shughuli. Ikiwa inahitajika na sheria, tutaendelea kuhifadhi data zako za kibinafsi kadri inavyohitajika ili kuambatana na majukumu yetu ya kisheria na kiudhibiti, pamoja na kufuatilia, kugundua, na kuzuia ulaghai, na pia majukumu ya ripoti za ushuru, uhasibu, na kifedha.
Tafadhali kumbuka:
Blockchain ni mitandao ya wahusika wengine ambayo hatudhibiti wala kuendesha. Kwa ajili ya hali ya teknolojia ya blockchain kuwa ya umma na isiyoweza kubadilishwa, hatuwezi kurekebisha, kufuta, wala kudhibiti ufichuaji wa data zilizohifadhiwa kwenye blockchain.
12. Jinsi Ilani hii ya Faragha ilivyo Tofauti kwa Watoto na Vijana
Watu chini ya umri wa miaka 18 hawaruhusiwi kutumia Huduma, na hatukusanyi data kutoka kwa watu walio na umri wa chini ya miaka 18. Ikiwa unaamini kwamba mtoto wako aliye chini ya umri wa miaka 18 amefikia Huduma bila kibali chako, unaweza kuomba data zake kufutwa kwa kuwasiliana nasi kupitia
Lango letu la Maombi
.
Tukijua kwamba tumekusanya data kumhusu mtoto chini ya umri wa miaka 18, tutafuta data hizo haraka iwezekanavyo. Tumechukua hatua kama vile kuweka teknolojia ya AI ya kugundua umri kiotomatiki, maagizo kwa wahudumu na uthibitisho wa mtu binafsi ili kuwekea vikwazo matumizi ya Huduma kwa watu walio na umri wa angalau miaka 18. Hatutengenezi bidhaa au huduma za sokoni kwa ajili ya watoto.
13. Jinsi ya Kuwasiliana Nasi kuhusu Ilani hii ya Faragha
Pia unaweza kuchagua kufuta data zako kutoka kwenye ndani ya Programu chini ya menyu ya Mipangilio. Ikiwa una maswali au wasiwasi zozote kuhusu Ilani hii ya Faragha, ungependa kutumia haki zako, au kuwasiliana na Afisa wa Ulinzi wa Data, tafadhali wasilisha ombi lako kupitia
Lango letu la Maombi
au kwa kututumia barua kwa anwani Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA au
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Tutajibu maombi yote yunayopokea kutoka kwa watu wanaotaka kutumia haki zao za ulindaji data kulingana na sheria husika za ulindaji data. Pia unaweza kufuta data zako kutoka kwenye ndani ya Programu ya World.
Ikiwa una wasiwasi zozote za faragha au matumizi data ambazo hazijasuluhishwa na ambazo hazikushughulikiwa mpaka ukaridhika, tafadhali wasiliana na mdhibiti ulinzi wa data katika eneo lako. Ikiwa unaishi EU, basi unaweza kupata mdhibiti ulinzi wa data wako
hapa
.
14. Haki Zako
Haki hizi zinatumika pale tu ambapo tunaweza kumtambulisha mwombaji katika hifadhidata yetu na pale tu ambapo hatukiuki haki zingine za mmiliki data kwa kutekeleza haki za mwombaji:
Una haki ya kupata kutoka kwetu wakati wowote baada ya kutuma ombi maelezo kuhusu data za kibinafsi tunazochakata kukuhusu. Una haki ya kupata kutoka kwetu data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu.
Una haki ya kuagiza kwamba mara moja tusahihishe data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu ikiwa si sahihi.
Una haki ya kuagiza kwamba tufute data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu. Mahitaji haya yanaonyesha haki ya kufutwa ikiwa data za kibinafsi si muhimu tena kwa madhumuni ambayo ilifanya zikusanywe au kuchakatwa, mradi mahitaji ya kufuta chini ya sheria husika yamebainishwa (k.m. sheria kadhaa za maeneo ya mamlaka zinatuhitaji kuhifadhi maelezo ya miamala kwa kipindi fulani cha muda)
Una haki ya kuondoa kwa hiari idhini yako ya uchakataji wowote wa data kwa idhini au kukataa uchakataji wa data ikiwa si kwa idhini.
15. HATI ZA NYONGEZA
Ifuatayo, hati kadhaa za nyongeza zinatoa maelezo yanahitajika kisheria kwa masoko husika ambapo tunaendesha shughuli. Maelezo haya ni sehemu ya idhini kulingana na eneo ambako mmiliki data anaishi. Maelezo haya yanaweza kutofautiana na maelezo ya eneo lako kwa sababu tunazuilia huduma fulani katika maeneo fulani ya mamlaka. Endapo kuna tofauti na yaliyo hapa juu kauli maalum kuhusu eneo fulani la mamlaka inatumika:
Nyongeza ya A: Eneo la Kiuchumi la Ulaya (“EEA”) na Uingereza (“UK”)
Ikiwa upo katika EEA au UK yafuatayo yanatumika kwako: Una angalau haki zifuatazo. Unaweza kuwa na haki za ziada chini ya Kanuni Jumla za Ulinzi wa Data, Kanuni ya EU ya 2016/679 ya 27.04.2016 (“GDPR”) kama ilivyoorodheshwa hapa chini. Ili kutumia haki zako zinazopatikana chini ya GDPR, tafadhali wasiliana nasi kwenye
Lango letu la Maombi
. Kando na matukio ya kipekee, tutajibu ombi lako ndani ya makataa ya kisheria ya mwezi mmoja. Matumizi ya neno GDPR katika sehemu ifuatayo pia yanajumuisha UK-GDPR iliyojumuishwa katika sheria za kitaifa za Uingereza kama Sheria ya UK ya Ulinzi wa Data ya 2018 na kuhifadhiwa kama sehemu ya sheria za Uingereza na Wales, Scotilandi na Ayalandi Kaskazini kwa
Sehemu ya 3
ya sheria ya European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 na kama ilivyorekebishwa na
Schedule
1
kwenye Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019 (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Haki za kisheria chini ya GDPR
Sehemu hii inatumika ikiwa uchakataji data zako upo chini ya wigo wa matumizi ya GDPR (
k.m.
, ikiwa wewe ni mkaazi katika EEA au nchini UK). Huenda ikawa una haki za ziada chini ya GDPR kama ilivyoorodheshwa hapa chini. Ili kutumia haki zako zinazopatikana chini ya GDPR, tafadhali wasiliana nasi kwenye
Lango letu la Maombi
.
Una haki ya kupata kutoka kwetu wakati wowote baada ya kutuma ombi maelezo kuhusu data za kibinafsi tunazochakata kuhusiana na ndani ya wigo wa Kifungu cha 15 cha GDPR.
Una haki ya kuagiza kwamba mara moja tusahihishe data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu ikiwa si sahihi.
Una haki, chini ya hali zilizoelezewa katika Kifungu cha 17 cha GDPR, kuagiza kwamba tufute data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu. Mahitaji haya yanaonyesha haki ya kufutwa ikiwa data za kibinafsi si muhimu tena kwa madhumuni ambao ilifanya zikusanywe au kuchakatwa, na pia katika matukio ya uchakataji usio wa kisheria, uwepo wa pingamizi au uwepo wa jukumu la kufuta chini ya sheria la Umoja au sheria ya Jimbo kwa ambayo tupo chini yake.
Una haki ya kuagiza kwamba tuwekee vikwazo uchakataji kulingana na Kifungu cha 18 cha GDPR.
Una haki ya kupokea kutoka kwetu data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu ambazo umetupatia kwa umbizo sambamba, linalotumika kwa kawaida, na linalosomeka na mashine kulingana na Kifungu cha 20 cha GDPR.
Wakati wowote, kwa misingi inayohusiana na hali yako haswa, una haki ya kupinga uchakataji wa data za kibinafsi zinazokuhusu ambao umefanywa, na kadhalika, kwa misingi ya Kifungu cha 6 (1) sentensi ya 1, eneo la f kwenye GDPR, kulingana na Kifungu cha 21 cha GDPR.
Una haki ya kuwasiliana na mamlaka adilifu ya usimamizi endapo kutakuwa na malalamishi kuhusu uchakataji data unaofanywa na mdhibiti. Mamlaka ya usimamizi inayowajibika ni: the Bavarian State Office for Data Protection Supervision (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Ikiwa uchakataji wa data za kibinafsi unategemea idhini yako, una haki chini ya Kifungu cha 7 cha GDPR una haki ya kughairi idhini yako ya matumizi ya data zako za kibinafsi wakati wowote katika siku zijazo, ambapo kughairi huku ni rahisi kufanya kama ilivyo kuwa rahisi kupatiana idhini. Tafadhali kumbuka kwamba kughairi kunaathiri tu siki zijazo. Uchakataji uliofanyika kabla ya kughairi hauathiriki.
A.2 Utumaji Data
Tunapotuma data hadi kwenye nchi ambayo hatuna uamuzi wa utoshelevu, tunatumia EU Standard Contractual Clauses (Vipengee vya Kimkataba vya Kawaida vya EU). Kwa sasa tunatuma tu data za kibinafsi hadi Marekani.
Ikiwa uchakataji wa data za kibinafsi unategemea idhini yako, una haki chini ya Kifungu cha 7 cha GDPR una haki ya kughairi idhini yako ya matumizi ya data zako za kibinafsi wakati wowote katika siku zijazo, ambapo kughairi huku ni rahisi kufanya kama ilivyo kuwa rahisi kupatiana idhini. Tafadhali kumbuka kwamba kughairi kunaathiri tu siki zijazo. Uchakataji uliofanyika kabla ya kughairi hauathiriki. Tafadhali pia kumbuka kwamba kuchakata hayo hakutegemei idhini na hivyo hakuathiriki na uondoaji idhini.
NYONGEZA YA B: JAPANI
Ikiwa unaishi Japani, aidha, yafuatayo yanatumika kwako.
B1. Maelezo Kuhusiana na Kanuni za Japani
Tunaambatana na sheria na kanuni za Japani, pamoja na Sheria ya Japani ya Ulinzi wa Maelezo ya Kibinafsi (Act on the Protection of Personal Information, “APPI”). Sehemu hii inatumika katika jinsi tunavyoshughulikia “maelezo ya kibinafsi” kama ilivyobainishwa katika APPI kwa pamoja na sehemu nyingine za Fomu hii ya Idhini ya Data za Bayometriki
Tunaambatana na sheria na kanuni za Japani, pamoja na Sheria ya Japani ya Ulinzi wa Maelezo ya Kibinafsi (Act on the Protection of Personal Information, “APPI”). Sehemu hii inatumika katika jinsi tunavyoshughulikia “maelezo ya kibinafsi” kama ilivyobainishwa katika APPI kwa pamoja na sehemu nyingine za Ilani hii ya Faragha.
B2. Kusambaza Data
Isipokuwa iwe imeruhusiwa vinginevyo na sheria husika, hatufichui, kuuza, kupatiana, kusambaza, wala kutuma maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kwa mhusika yeyote mwingine.
B3. Hatua za Udhibiti wa Kiusalama
Tunachukua hatua hitajika na mwafaka ili kuzuia uvujaji, au upotezaji, au uharibifu wa maelezo yako ya kibinafsi yanayoshughulikiwa, na pia kudumisha usalama wa maelezo ya kibinafsi, kama vile kwa kuweka sheria za kushughulikia maelezo ya kibinafsi, ufuatiliaji wa mara kwa mara, mafunzo ya mara kwa mara kwa waajiriwa katika kushughulikia maelezo ya kibinafsi, uzuiaji wizi au upotezaji wa vifaa vinavyotumika kushughulikia maelezo ya kibinafsi, na utekelezaji wa vidhibiti vya ufikiaji. Pia tunazimamia ipasavyo wanakandarasi na waajiriwa wetu wanaoshughulikia maelezo ya kibinafsi. Unaweza kupata maelezo ya ziada kuhusu hatua za kudhibiti usalama zilizowekwa kuhusiana na kushughuikia maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kwa kuwasiliana nasi kwenye
Lango letu la Maombi
.
B4. Maelezo ya Marejeleo kuhusu Kuchakata Data za Kibinafsi katika Nchi za Kigeni
Data zako za kibinafsi zinachakatwa katika EU na Marekani.
B5. Haki za Kisheria chini ya APPI
Ili kutumia haki zako zinazopatikana chini ya APPI tafadhali wasiliana nasi kwenye
Lango letu la Maombi
.
NYONGEZA YA C: AJENTINA
Ikiwa makazi yako ni Jamhuri ya Ajentina, tunakufahamisha kwamba SHIRIKA LA UFIKIAJI WA MAELEZO YA HADHARANI, kwa uwezo wake kama Shirika la Udhibiti la Sheria Na. 25,326, lina mamlaka ya kusikia malalamishi na madai yaliyoandikishwa na wale ambao haki zao zimeathiriwa na kukosa kuambatana na sheria zilizowekwa kuhusiana na ulinzi wa data za kibinafsi.
Shirika hili linaweka kufikiwa kama ifuatavyo:
Anwani: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
Postal Code: C1067ABP
Nambari ya simu: (54-11) 3988-3968
Barua pepe: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
NYONGEZA YA D: SINGAPOO
Ikiwa wewe ni mkaazi wa Singapoo yafuatayo yanatumika kwako:
D1. Ukusanyaji, matumizi na ufichuaji wa data zako za kibinafsi
Ikiwa wewe ni mkaazi wa Singapoo na kwa idhini yako, tutakusanya, kutumia na vinginevyo kufichua data zako za kibinafsi kwa ajili ya kila moja ya malengo yaliyobainishwa kwenye kauli yetu ya faragha. Unaweza kutumia haki yako ya kuondoa idhini yako wakati wowote, lakini tafadhali kumbuka kwamba huenda tunashindwa kuendelea kukupa huduma zetu kulingana na hali na wigo wa ombi lako. Tafadhali pia kumbuka kwamba kuondoa idhini hakuathiri haki yetu ya kuendelea kukusanya, kutumia na kufichua data za kibinafsi pale ambapo ukusanyaji, matumizi na ufichuaji huo bila idhini unaruhusiwa au unahitajika chini ya sheria husika.[1]
D2. Kutumia haki zako kama mmiliki data
Unaweza kudhibiti data za kibinafsi ambazo tumekusanya na kutumia haki zozote kwa kuwasiliana nasi kwenye
Lango letu la Maombi
. Tunalenga kujibu ombi lako punde iwezekanavyo, kwa kawaida ndani ya siku 30. Tutakufahamisha mapema ikiwa hatujaweza kujibu ombi lako ndani ya siku 30, au ikiwa hatuwezi kutimiza ombi lako na sababu kwa nini.[2]
Inaporuhusiwa na sheria, tunaweza kukutoza ada ya kiutawala ili kutimiza ombi lako.
D3. Kutuma data zako za kibinafsi hadi nchi zingine
Ikiwa wewe ni mkaazi wa Singapoo na tumekusanya data zako, tunaweza pia kutuma data zako nje ya Singapoo mara kwa mara. Hata hivyo, kila wakati tutahakikisha data zako za kibinafsi zinaendelea kupokea kiwango cha ulinzi ambacho kinafanana na ulinzi unaotolewa na Sheria ya Singapoo ya Ulinzi wa Data za Kibinafsi ya 2012, kama vile kupitia matumizi ya ASEAN Model Contractual Clauses.
NYONGEZA YA E – KOREA KUSINI
Hati hii ya Nyongeza ya Wamiliki Data Wakorea inaelezea mazoea yetu kuhusiana na maelezo ya kibinafsi tunayochakata kuhusiana na uhusiano wako nasi ambapo wewe ni mmiliki data Mkorea.
E.1 – Kutuma Maelezo ya Kibinafsi
Tunapatiana maelezo ya kibinafsi au kupeana kazi ya kuchakata maelezo ya kibinafsi kwa wahusika wengine kama ilivyobainishwa hapa chini:
- Kupeana Maelezo ya Kibinafsi kwa Wahusika Wengine
Jina la Mpokeaji
Malengo ya matumizi ya mpokeaji
Vipengee vya maelezo ya kibinafsi vya kutumwa kwa mpokeaji
Vipindi vya kuhifadhiwa na mpokeaji
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Malengo yaliyoelezewa katika ilani hii katika sehemu ya 6 hapa juu.
Vipengee vilivyoelezewa katika ilani hii katika sehemu ya 5 hapa juu
Vipindi vya uhifadhi vilivyooelezewa katika ilani hii katika sehemu ya 11 hapa juu.
- Kupeana Kazi ya Kuchakata Maelezo ya Kibinafsi kwa Wahusika Wengine:
Tafadhali pata orodha ya kazi zote za kuchakata data zilizopeanwa na kampuni husika chini ya kiungo hiki:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Tunaweza kupeana kazi ya kuchakata maelezo yako ya kibinafsi na/au kutuma maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kwa malengo ya kuhifadhiwa na wahusika wengine nje ya Korea:
Ikiwa hautaki kutuma maelezo yako ya kibinafsi nje ya nchi, unaweza kukataa kwa kutokubaliana na utumaji wa maelezo ya kibinafsi, au kwa kutuomba kusitisha utumaji nje ya nchi, lakini ukikataa, hautaweza kutumia huduma zetu. Msingi wa kisheria wa utumaji wa maelezo ya kibinafsi nje ya nchi ulio hapa juu ni kwamba inajumuisha “kazi iliyopeanwa ya uchakataji au uhifadhi wa maelezo ya kibinafsi ambao ni wa muhimu katika kutatamisha na kutimiza mkataba wa mmiliki data” na masuala ya kisheria yamefichuliwa kwenye sera ya faragha (Kifungu cha 28-8(1)(iii) cha Sheria ya Ulinzi wa Maelezo ya Kibinafsi).
E.2 – Kuharibu Maelezo ya Kibinafsi
Wakati maelezo ya kibinafsi yanakuwa hayahitajiki kwa ajili ya kipindi cha uhifadhi kuisha au baada ya kufanikisha lengo la uchakataji, n.k. maelezo hayo ya kibinafsi yataharibiwa bila kuchelewa. Mchakato na mbinu ya kuharibu imebainishwa hapa chini:
1) Mchakato wa Kuharibu: Tunachagua vipengee fulani vya maelezo ya kibinafsi ambavyo vinaharibiwa, na kuviharibu kwa idhini ya DPO.
2) Mbinu ya Kuharibu: Tunaharibu maelezo ya kibinafsi yaliyorekodiwa na kuhifadhiwa kwa mfumo wa faili za kielektroniki kwa kutumia mbinu ya kiufundi (k.m. mfumo wa ngazi ya chini) ili kuhakikisha kwamba rekodi haziwezi kutolewa tena, huku maelezo ya kibinafsi yaliyorekodiwa na kuhifadhiwa kwa mfumo wa hati za makaratasi yanakatwa katwa au kuchomwa.
E.3 – Kuhifadhi Maelezo ya Kibinafsi
Ikiwa tunahitajika kuhifadhi maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kulingana na sheria husika, tutafanya hivyo kwa malengo yafuatayo na vipindi vifuatavyo inavyohitajika na sheria husika.
E.4 – Haki Zako
Unaweza kutumia haki zako zinazhusiana na maeleo ya kibinafsi dhidi yako, pamoja na ombi la kufikia, kurekebishwa au kufuta, au uahirishaji uchakataji wa, maelezo yako ya kibinafsi kama ilivyobainishwa na sheria husika ikijumuisha Sheria ya Ulinzi wa Maelezo ya Kibinafsi. Pia unaweza kutekeleza haki yako ya kuondoa idhini ya kukusanya/kutumia/kupeana maelezo ya kibinafsi, haki ya kuhamisha, na haki zinazohusiana na ufanyaji maamuzi kiotomatiki. Haki hizo pia zinaweza kutekelezwa kupitia wawakilishi wako wa kisheria au watu wengine walioidhinishwa kikamilifu.
Unaweza kutekeleza haki zozote husika zilizoelezewa hapa juu kwa kuwasiliana nasi kwenye worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Hatua za Kiusalama
Tutatekeleza hatua za kiusalama za kiufundi, kimpangilio, na halisia zilizobainishwa na sheria husika za Korea ili kulinda maelezo ya kibinafsi, kama vile zile zilizoorodheshwa hapa chini:
1) Hatua za kiusimamizi: Uteuzi wa Afisa wa Ulinzi wa Data, uwekaji na utekelezaji wa mpango wa usimamizi wa ndani, mafunzo ya waajiriwa mara kwa mara kuhusu ulinzi wa data, n.k.;
2) Hatua za kiufundi: Usimamiaji mamlaka ya kufikia mfumo wa kuchakata maelezo ya kibinafsi, uwekaji mfumo wa kudhibiti ufikiaji, uwekaji mipango ya ulinzi, n.k.; na
3) Hatua halisia: Kuzuia ufikiaji vituo vya kuhifadhi maelezo ya kibinafsi na vifaa kama vile vyumba vya kompyuta na vyumba vya kuhifadhi data, n.k.
E.6 – Wasiliana Nasi
Ikiwa una maswali na maombi yanayohusiana na faragha na ulinzi wa data, tafadhali wasiliana na Timu yetu ya Ulinzi wa Data kwa anwani
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
NYONGEZA YA F – MAREKANI
Sheria ya Faragha ya Mtumiaji ya California, kama ilivyorekebishwa na Sheria ya Haki za Faragha ya California, kwa sasa haitumiki kwetu.
NYONGEZA YA G - BRAZILI
G.1 Sheria Husika, Mdhibiti na Opereta
Ikiwa unaishi nchini Brazili, ikiwa data zako za kibinafsi zilizkusanywa nchini Brazili, au ikiwa unatumia Huduma zetu nchini Brazili, sheria husika ni Sheria Na. 13,709/2018 (Sheria Jumla za Ulinzi wa Data, au “LGPD”).
G.2 Haki ya kukataa
Una haki ya kukataa matumizi ya data zako za kibinafsi kwa malengo ambayo hayategemei idhini ikiwa malengo hayo hayaambatani na LGPD. Ukiamua kukataa, hatutatumia tena maelezo yako ya kibinafsi ili kutengeneza na kuboresha vipengele na huduma ya Huduma zetu.
Kumbuka kwamba ukikosa tupatiana au ukikosa kuruhusu ukusanyaji au uchakataji wa data fulani za kibinafsi, inaweza kuathiri ubora wa huduma yako, huenda tukashindwa kutimiza malengo ya Huduma zetu, au huenda tukashindwa kukupa Huduma fulani.
Katika hali zingine, data zako zinaondolewa utambulisho, kumaanisha haziwezi kukutambulisha tena. Hauwezi kukataa matumizi ya data bila utambulishi kwa sababu haziruhusu utambulishwe, kama ilivyobainishwa kwenye LGPD. Tunatumia data hizi bila utambulisho ili kuboresha bidhaa na huduma zetu.
G.3 Haki za kisheria chini ya LGPD
Kulingana na LGPD, una haki ya kuthibitisha uwepo wa uchakataji, ufikiaji, urekebishaji, au ombi la uhamishaji wa data zilizochakatwa. Aidha, unaweza kuomba maelezo ya mashirika ya umma na kibinafsi ambayo kwa pamoja tunatumia data zako za kibinafsi. Pia unaweza kuomba maelezo kuhusiana na uwezekano wa kutopatiana idhini na madhara yake, na uombe kufutwa kwa data zilizochakatwa kwa idhini. Unaweza kuchagua maelezo yako kufutwa kwenye Programu ya World kwenye menyu ya Mipangilio.
Katika hali fulani, una haki ya kukataa au kuweka kipimo cha jinsi tunavyochakata data zako za kibinafsi, au kuondoa idhini yako, ambayo tunategemea ili kuchakata maelezo unayopatiana.
Unaweza kutekeleza haki zako chini ya LGPD kwa kuwasilisha ombi kwa DPO wetu ukitumia maelezo ya mawasiliano yaliyo katika sehemu ya H.4 hapa chini au kupitia lango letu la maombi la mtandaoni. Ukihisi kwamba haki zako hazijazingatiwa vya kutosha, unaweza kuandikisha lalamishi kwa Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) kwa kujaza fomu inayopatikana kwenye kiungo hiki:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Kutuma Data Zako za Kibinafsi Kimataifa
Ikiwa LGPD inatumika kwako, na tumekusanya data zako za kibinafsi, tunaweza pia kuzituma nje ya nchi. Hata hivyo, kila wakati tutahakikisha kwamba data zako za kibinafsi zinatumwa tu hadi nchi za kigeni aukwa mashirika ya kimataifa ambayo yana kiwango cha ulinzi ambacho ni sawa na cha LGPD, kama inavyotambuliwa katika maamuzi ya kutosha uanayotolewa na ANPD. Endapo hakutakuwa na uamuzi kuhusu kutosha, tutaendelea kufuata kiwango cha ulinzi ambacho angalau ni sawa na kinachotolewa na LGPD kwa kutumia Vifungu vya Kimkataba vilivyowekwa katika kanuni za ANPD au tunapopokea idhini yako maalum ya kutuma kimataifa.
AMBATISHO LA I – Misingi/malengo ya kisheria ya shughuli za Tools for Humanity za kuchakata data
Watumiaji
Kwa Nini Tunachakata Data
Ni Data Gani za Kibinafsi Zinachakatwa
Msingi wa Kisheria wa Uchakataji
Kipindi cha Kuhifadhi Data
Kutengeneza akaunti yako katika Programu ya World
Anwani ya pochi, metadata, jina la mtumiaji
Utekelezaji mkataba
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma au mpaka uombe data hizo zifutwe.
Kuhakikisha una umri unaofaa
Tarehe ya kuzaliwa
Jukumu la kisheria
Tarehe yako haswa ya kuzaliwa haihifadhiwi. Tunahifadhi tu kama umefikisha miaka 18. Tunahifadhi maelezo kwa kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma au mpaka uombe data hizo zifutwe.
Ili kuwezesha waasiliani wako kuwasiliana na kufanya miamala nawe kwa urahisi
Nambari ya simu
Idhini
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma au mpaka uombe data hizo zifutwe.
Ili kukuwezesha kuwasiliana na kufanya miamala na waasiliani wako kwa urahisi
Waasiliani katika kitabu cha waasiliani
Idhini
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma au mpaka uombe data hizo zifutwe.
Ili kukuonyesha vifaa vya Orb vilivyo karibu nawe
Maelezo ya Eneo
Idhini
Hadi miezi 24.
Ili kuzuia ulaghai katika muktadha wa kuzuia akaunti
Metadata, anwani ya IP address, kitambulisho cha Kifaa
Nia halali, haswa nia ua kuzuia aina fulani ya ulaghai (ORODHA YA AINA)
Hadi miezi 24.
Ili kuhakikisha huduma zinaruhusiwa katika nchi yako
Anwani ya IP, maelezo ya eneo
Jukumu la kisheria
Hadi miezi 24.
Ili kuonyesha pochi la umiliki wa kibinafsi na kuonyesha kiolesura cha miamala ya pochi
Anwani ya pochi, data za miamala
Utekelezaji mkataba
Hakuna maelezo ya kibinafsi yanayohifadhiwa katika muktadha huu.
Ili kuonyesha World ID yako ya umiliki wa kibinafsi na kuonyesha kiolesura cha uthibitishaji
Maelezo ya World ID
Utekelezaji mkataba
Hakuna maelezo ya kibinafsi yanayohifadhiwa katika muktadha huu.
Ili kuonyesha Stakabadhi zako za umiliki wa kibinafsi na kuonyesha kiolesura cha kushiriki Stakabadhi hizo
Maelezo ya Stakabadhi, maelezo ya uhalali wa stakabadhi
Utekelezaji mkataba
Hakuna maelezo ya kibinafsi yanayohifadhiwa katika muktadha huu.
Ili kuchambua na kutoa huduma zetu na kuendesha mazoesi ya tafiti za data
Data za matumizi na metadata, data za miamala za hadharani
Idhini
Hadi miezi 24.
Ili kuambatana na sheria husika kama vile sheria na vikwazo dhidi ya utakatishaji pesa
Data za miamala, anwani ya pochi
Jukumu la kisheria
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma.
Ili kuambatana na sheria husika kama vile kanuni za maudhui
Maudhui ya Miniapp
Jukumu la kisheria
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma.
Ili kuwezesha mawasiliano na uuzaji
Anwani ya barua pepe, arifa za papo hapo
Nia Halali
Hadi miezi 24.
Mawasiliano kutoka kwako
Nia Halali
Hadi miezi 24.
Maoni kutoka kwako
Nia Halali
Hadi miezi 24.
Kushughulikia maombi ya huduma, malalamishi na maswali yako kama mteja.
Maelezo ya mawasiliano na barua pepe au jina la wasifu wa mtandao wa kijamii ikiwa unataka kuwasiliana nasi kupitia mbinu kama hizo
Utekelezaji mkataba
Ili kuhakikisha programu yako inafanya kazi vizuri
Metadata
Utekelezaji mkataba
Hadi miezi 24.
Ili kuthibitisha kifaa chako
Data za World ID ya Kifaa (alama ya kidole ya kifaa)
Utekelezaji mkataba
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma.
Kusuluhisha migogoro, kutatua masuala, na kutekeleza makubaliano yetu nawe, pamoja na Ilani hii ya Faragha na Sheria za Mtumiaji.
Kipindi cha matumizi ya huduma.
Washirika wa kibiashara
Kwa Nini Tunachakata Data
Ni Data Gani za Kibinafsi Zinachakatwa
Msingi wa Kisheria wa Uchakataji
Kipindi cha Kuhifadhi Data
Mawasiliano
Nambari ya simu, anwani ya barua pepe, Jina
Nia halali, yaani, nia ya kuwasiliana na washirika wa kibiashara.
Kipindi cha uhusiano wa kibiashara au mpaka uombe data hizo zifutwe.
Kudumisha na kudhibiti uhusiano wa kibiashara
Nambari ya simu, anwani ya barua pepe, Jina, data za kampuni
Nia halali yaani nia ya kudumisha na kudhibiti uhusiano wa kibiashara na washirika wa kibiashara.
Kipindi cha uhusiano wa kibiashara au mpaka uombe data hizo zifutwe.
Kutimiza majukumu ya KYC
Data za pasipoti, Data za kampuni
Jukumu la kisheria
Kipindi cha uhusiano wa kibiashara na hadi miaka 3 baada ya kusitishwa.
Ili kuchakata programu yako
Data za programu
Idhini na hatua kwa ombi la mmiliki data kabla ya kuingia kwenye mkataba.
Hadi miezi 3 kama chaguomsingi au muda mrefu zaidi ikiwa unakubali kuwa katika kundi la talanta.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของ
Tools for Humanity
ขอขอบคุณที่เลือกเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของคอมมูนิตี้
Worldcoin! Worldcoin
เป็นโปรโตคอลโอเพนซอร์สที่ได้รับการสนับสนุนจากชุมชนนักพัฒนา บุคคลธรรมดา และผู้ให้การสนับสนุนอื่น ๆ ในทั่วโลก
นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้มีเนื้อหาครอบคลุมเกี่ยวกับข้อมูลที่ท่านมอบให้เราผ่านการใช้เว็บไซต์ แอปพลิเคชัน (“แอป”) และบริการอื่น ๆ ที่เชื่อมโยงกับนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้ (เรียกรวมกันว่า “บริการ”) นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้จะรวมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งและอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของ
ข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขสำหรับผู้ใช้
(“ข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้”)
Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”)
และ
Tools for Humanity GmbH
ซึ่งเป็นบริษัทย่อยในประเทศเยอรมนี
(“TFH Germany”
) (โดยเรียกรวมกันว่า “
TFH
”
หรือ “
เรา
”) มีส่วนร่วมในการพัฒนาและการเติบโตของโปรโตคอล
Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”)
แต่เป็นคนละนิติบุคคลกับ
Worldcoin Foundation
ซึ่งควบคุมการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ
Orb
1.
ผู้ควบคุมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
เราเป็นผู้ควบคุมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลซึ่งควบคุม “ข้อมูล
World App” “
ข้อมูลการยืนยันสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน” และ “ข้อมูลธุรกิจ” อื่น ๆ ทั้งหมด:
Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. TFH
จดทะเบียนจัดตั้งในสหภาพยุโรป (“
EU
”)
ผ่านทาง
Tools for Humanity GmbH
“
ข้อมูล
World App”
หมายถึงข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลทั้งหมดที่เก็บรวบรวมและประมวลผลผ่านการใช้
World App
ของท่าน ตามที่อธิบายเพิ่มเติมในข้อ
5
ด้านล่างนี้ ยกเว้นข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการใช้โปรโตคอล
Worldcoin
หรือโทเคน
Worldcoin
ของท่าน (เช่น ที่อยู่วอลเล็ตและข้อมูลธุรกรรมของท่าน ซึ่งไม่อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมของเรา)
ข้อมูลการยืนยันสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน หมายถึงข้อมูลที่ประมวลผลเมื่อยืนยันสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนเพื่อเพิ่มลงใน
World ID
ที่อยู่ภายใต้การดูแลของท่าน เช่น การอ่านชิป
NFC
ของหนังสือเดินทางของท่านเพื่อจัดเก็บข้อมูลหนังสือเดินทางนั้นอย่างปลอดภัยในอุปกรณ์ของท่าน ข้อมูลนี้อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมของท่าน และหลังจากยืนยันความถูกต้องของสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนของท่านแล้ว
TFH
จะจัดเก็บส่วนที่ไม่ระบุตัวตนของ
hash value
ของ
cryptographic signature
ที่ไม่ซ้ำกันของสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนของท่าน (เช่น หนังสือเดินทาง) เพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนแต่ละรายการจะสามารถเพิ่มลงใน
World ID
ได้เพียงครั้งเดียวเท่านั้น
“ข้อมูลธุรกิจ” หมายถึงข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลทั้งหมดที่บริษัทของเราเก็บรวบรวมและประมวลผลผ่านวิธีการอื่น ๆ เมื่อมีการสื่อสารหรือการดำเนินการหรือโต้ตอบในลักษณะอื่นกับเราผ่านทางอีเมล การประชุมทางวิดีโอ หรือเว็บไซต์ของเรา สำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลใน
Orb App
โปรดดูนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของ
Orb App
ในลิงก์ที่แสดงอยู่ใน
Orb App
สำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลในการเก็บรวบรวมและการทดสอบข้อมูลเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ใดวัตถุประสงค์หนึ่งโดยเฉพาะ โปรดดูนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวในการเก็บรวบรวมและการทดสอบข้อมูลในลิงก์ที่แสดงอยู่ในแอปทดสอบของท่าน สำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลในเว็บไซต์ของเรา โปรดดูนโยบายการใช้คุกกี้ในลิงก์ที่แสดงอยู่ในเว็บไซต์ของเรา
2.
การปรับปรุงนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้
เราจะปรับปรุงนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้เป็นครั้งคราว หากเรามีการเปลี่ยนแปลงที่สำคัญ เช่น วิธีที่เราใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบผ่านทางอีเมลหรือข้อความในแอปของท่าน
3.
นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้มีเนื้อหาเรื่องใดบ้าง
ความมุ่งมั่นของเราในการคุ้มครองความเป็นส่วนตัวและข้อมูลของท่าน
เราเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลใดบ้าง และเพราะเหตุใด
เราใช้ข้อมูลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมอย่างไร
เราประมวลผลข้อมูลของท่านที่ใด
เราแบ่งปันข้อมูลของท่านเมื่อใด
ข้อมูลของท่านถูกบันทึกบนบล็อกเชนสาธารณะอย่างไร
เราใช้คุกกี้อย่างไรบ้าง
เราเก็บรักษาข้อมูลของท่านไว้เป็นเวลานานเท่าใด
นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้มีความแตกต่างสำหรับเด็กและวัยรุ่นอย่างไรบ้าง
สิทธิตามกฎหมายที่ท่านมี
วิธีติดต่อเราเกี่ยวกับนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้
4. ความมุ่งมั่นของเราในการคุ้มครองความเป็นส่วนตัวและข้อมูลของท่าน
เรามุ่งมั่นอย่างยิ่งในการคุ้มครองความเป็นส่วนตัวและรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัยของข้อมูลของท่าน เราตระหนักว่าเราจะสามารถบรรลุภารกิจในการแจกจ่ายโทเคนดิจิทัลอย่างเป็นธรรมให้กับผู้คนเป็นจำนวนมากที่สุดได้เท่าที่จะเป็นไปได้ ต่อเมื่อผู้คนไว้วางใจเราเท่านั้น และความเป็นส่วนตัวและความมั่นคงปลอดภัยของข้อมูลก็เป็นสิ่งสำคัญในการที่เราจะได้รับความไว้วางใจจากท่าน
ความเป็นส่วนตัว
เราออกแบบผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการของเราโดยคำนึงถึงความเป็นส่วนตัวของท่าน เราเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลเพื่อปรับปรุงผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการของเรา เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบเสมอในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้หรือในแบบฟอร์มยินยอมให้ใช้ข้อมูลสำหรับผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการที่เฉพาะเจาะจงว่าเราเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลใดบ้าง เพราะเหตุใดเราจึงเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลนั้น และเราจะดำเนินการกับข้อมูลนั้นอย่างไร
ความมั่นคงปลอดภัยของข้อมูล
เรามีทีมที่ดูแลข้อมูลของท่านโดยเฉพาะและใช้มาตรการป้องกันทางกายภาพและทางอิเล็กทรอนิกส์เพื่อคุ้มครองข้อมูลของท่านทั้งในระหว่างการส่งข้อมูลและขณะจัดเก็บข้อมูล อย่างไรก็ตาม ไม่มีบริการใดที่ปลอดภัยอย่างสมบูรณ์ หากท่านมีข้อกังวลเกี่ยวกับบัญชีหรือข้อมูลของท่าน โปรดติดต่อเราผ่าน
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา หรือส่งไปรษณีย์ถึงเราที่
Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA
5. เราเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลใดบ้าง และเพราะเหตุใด
5.1 ข้อมูลที่ท่านมอบให้เรา
ในฐานะผู้ใช้ ท่านไม่จำเป็นต้องให้ข้อมูลใด ๆ เพื่อเข้าถึงแอป อย่างไรก็ตาม ท่านอาจต้องให้ข้อมูลบางอย่างกับเราเพื่อใช้ฟีเจอร์ภายในบริการ ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลในกรณีด้านล่างนี้ได้แก่ความยินยอมของผู้ใช้และการปฏิบัติตามสัญญา (ความมุ่งมั่นของเราในการให้บริการ) ต่อไปนี้นี้คือรายการข้อมูลที่ท่านอาจมอบให้เรา และวัตถุประสงค์ที่เราอาจใช้ข้อมูลดังกล่าว
ในกรณีของ
World App
หมายเลขโทรศัพท์
ท่านสามารถเลือกกรอกหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่านเพื่อเชื่อมโยงกับบัญชีของท่าน หากท่านอนุญาต ผู้ใช้รายอื่นจะสามารถค้นหาบัญชีของท่านผ่านทางหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่านได้ เราอาจขอให้ท่านระบุหมายเลขโทรศัพท์เมื่อท่านส่งคำขอของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลนี้คือการให้บริการตามข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้
ชื่อผู้ใช้
ท่านสามารถเชื่อมโยงชื่อผู้ใช้กับที่อยู่วอลเล็ตของท่านและเปลี่ยนชื่อผู้ใช้ได้ตลอดเวลา
วันเดือนปีเกิด
ท่านอาจเปิดเผยวันเดือนปีเกิดของท่านเพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าท่านปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดเรื่องอายุที่กำหนด เราจะไม่จัดเก็บข้อมูลวันเดือนปีเกิดของท่าน แต่จะจัดเก็บเฉพาะค่า
checksum
ของข้อมูลนั้น และการยืนยันว่าท่านมีอายุเกิน
20
ปีหรือไม่
คำติชมและการติดต่อจากท่าน
ซึ่งรวมถึงอีเมล ข้อความแชท หรือการสื่อสารอื่น ๆ ที่ท่านส่งถึงเราผ่านทางอีเมลหรือเว็บไซต์สื่อสังคมออนไลน์ของบุคคลภายนอก การดำเนินการดังกล่าวอาจรวมถึงการประมวลผลที่อยู่อีเมลหรือชื่อโปรไฟล์สื่อสังคมออนไลน์หากท่านต้องการสื่อสารกับเราผ่านช่องทางดังกล่าว เราอาจใช้ผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกเพื่ออำนวยความสะดวกในการสำรวจความคิดเห็นของท่านเกี่ยวกับการใช้บริการ ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลนี้คือการให้บริการตามข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้
รายชื่อผู้ติดต่อในสมุดที่อยู่
ท่านอาจอนุญาตให้แอปเข้าถึงสมุดที่อยู่ของท่านเพื่อเปิดใช้งานฟีเจอร์ที่ช่วยให้ท่านสามารถค้นหาและโต้ตอบกับผู้ใช้รายอื่นที่มีรายชื่ออยู่ในสมุดที่อยู่ของท่านได้อย่างง่ายดาย ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลนี้คือประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในการถูกพบภายในแอป และประโยชน์ของผู้ใช้ที่มอบสิทธิในการเข้าถึงในการค้นหาผู้ติดต่อของตนในแอป
หมายเหตุ
: ท่านมีหน้าที่ในการดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าการแบ่งปันข้อมูลผู้ติดต่อของท่านเป็นไปตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ โดยท่านอาจต้องขออนุญาตจากผู้ติดต่อของท่านก่อน และท่านต้องไม่แบ่งปันรายละเอียดการติดต่อของบุคคลอื่นกับ
TFH
โดยไม่ได้รับความยินยอมอย่างชัดแจ้งจากบุคคลนั้น ท่านสามารถเปลี่ยนใจและปิดการเข้าถึงผู้ติดต่อของท่านได้ตลอดเวลาในการตั้งค่าอุปกรณ์ของท่าน หากท่านเลือกที่จะนำเข้ารายชื่อผู้ติดต่อในสมุดที่อยู่บนอุปกรณ์ของท่านไปยังแอปเพื่อค้นหาว่ามีผู้ติดต่อรายใดใช้บริการของเราบ้าง หรือเพื่อเชิญชวนให้บุคคลดังกล่าวมาใช้บริการของเรา เราจะซิงค์หมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของผู้ติดต่อของท่านกับหมายเลขและที่อยู่วอลเล็ตที่เกี่ยวข้องที่ผู้ใช้รายอื่นมอบให้เราซึ่งจัดเก็บไว้บนเซิร์ฟเวอร์ของเราเป็นระยะ ๆ
ข้อมูลตำแหน่ง
ท่านอาจตัดสินใจเปิดใช้งานบริการที่อิงตามตำแหน่งของผู้ใช้ (เช่น ฟีเจอร์ที่ช่วยให้ท่านค้นหา
Orb Operator
ใกล้ท่าน) เราจะสามารถเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับตำแหน่งของท่านผ่าน
GPS
เพื่อเปิดใช้งานบริการที่อิงตามตำแหน่งของผู้ใช้เพื่อแสดง
Orb
ที่ตั้งอยู่ใกล้ท่านต่อเมื่อได้รับความยินยอมจากท่านอย่างเฉพาะเจาะจงเท่านั้น ท่านสามารถเปลี่ยนการอนุญาตได้ตลอดเวลาในการตั้งค่าอุปกรณ์ของท่าน หากท่านไม่ได้อยู่ในเกาหลีใต้ เราอาจจัดเก็บตำแหน่งโดยประมาณของท่านโดยแยกจากบัญชี
World App
ของท่าน เราใช้ข้อมูลนี้เพื่อปรับปรุงบริการของเรา โดยเฉพาะแต่ไม่จำกัดเพียงการเลือกตำแหน่งที่ตั้งของ
Orb
P2P Marketplace
หากท่านใช้บริการ
P2P Marketplace (
ในกรณีที่มีให้บริการดังกล่าว) ที่ช่วยให้ท่านสามารถซื้อโทเคนดิจิทัลจากผู้ใช้รายอื่น เราอาจเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลเพิ่มเติม เช่น ที่อยู่วอลเล็ตของท่าน ข้อมูลการติดต่อของท่าน (กล่าวคือ หมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่าน) และหมายเลขบัญชีที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการทำธุรกรรม (เช่น หมายเลข
M-PESA
ของท่าน) การบันทึกข้อมูลธุรกรรมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของการให้บริการ
P2P Marketplace
นอกจากนี้ เรายังอาจเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมเพื่อปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดกระบวนการพิสูจน์ตัวตนในการทําความรู้จักลูกค้า (
KYC
) ที่ใช้บังคับ
Metadata
ของอุปกรณ์
หากท่านใช้แอป เราจะเก็บรวบรวม
metadata
จากอุปกรณ์ของท่านเพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าแอปทำงานได้อย่างถูกต้องและท่านไม่ได้ละเมิดข้อกำหนดและเงื่อนไขของเรา ซึ่งรวมถึงการเก็บรวบรวมตัวระบุอุปกรณ์และที่อยู่
IP
ข้อมูล
Device World ID
เราประมวลผล
metadata
ของอุปกรณ์ของท่านเพื่อคำนวณ
device fingerprint
ที่มีเอกลักษณ์ โดย
hash
ของ
fingerprint
นี้จะทำหน้าที่ในการพิสูจน์ว่า
Device World ID
ของท่านไม่ซ้ำกับผู้ใช้รายอื่น
ในการประมวลผลข้อมูลธุรกิจ
ชื่อจริงและนามสกุล
เราอาจประมวลผลชื่อจริงและนามสกุลของท่านเพื่อดำเนินการเพื่อประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในการรักษาและบริหารความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจกับท่าน
ที่อยู่อีเมล
ท่านอาจให้ที่อยู่อีเมลของท่านเพื่อสมัครรับจดหมายข่าวของเราเพื่อรับข้อมูลอัปเดตเกี่ยวกับ
Worldcoin Project
เราอาจต้องการที่อยู่อีเมลของท่านเมื่อท่านส่งคำขอของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล เราอาจประมวลผลที่อยู่อีเมลของท่านเพื่อดำเนินการเพื่อประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในการรักษาและบริหารความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจกับท่าน
หมายเลขโทรศัพท์
เราอาจประมวลผลหมายเลขโทรศัพท์ของท่านเพื่อดำเนินการเพื่อประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายในการรักษาและบริหารความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจกับท่าน
ข้อมูลองค์กร
หากท่านมีความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจกับเรา (เช่น หากท่านเป็น
Orb Operator
หรือ ผู้จัดหาสินค้าหรือบริการ) เราอาจต้องการข้อมูล เช่น ชื่อ ที่อยู่ไปรษณีย์ อีเมล หมายเลขโทรศัพท์                ที่อยู่วอลเล็ต และเอกสารอื่น ๆ (เช่น บัตรประจำตัวประชาชนของท่าน) เพื่อดำเนินการในเรื่องที่เกี่ยวข้องกับความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจนั้นและปฏิบัติหน้าที่ของเราเกี่ยวกับกระบวนการพิสูจน์ตัวตนในการทําความรู้จักค้า
(know-your-customers
หรือ
KYC)
เราอาจใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอก เช่น
Onfido
เพื่อช่วยเราเก็บรวบรวมและตรวจสอบข้อมูลและเอกสารข้างต้นเพื่อปฏิบัติหน้าที่ของเราเกี่ยวกับการทําความรู้จักค้า
ข้อมูลการสมัครงาน
หากท่านประสงค์ที่จะทำงานกับเรา ท่านต้องส่งใบสมัครงานซึ่งรวมถึงจดหมายสมัครงานและประวัติย่อของท่าน รวมถึงข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ท่านต้องการเปิดเผย
ท่านสามารถดูฐานทางกฎหมายในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลสำหรับกิจกรรมการประมวลผลข้อมูลแต่ละรายการข้างต้นได้ใน
ภาคผนวก
I –
ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับกิจกรรมการประมวลผลข้อมูลของ
Tools for Humanity
ซึ่งอยู่ที่ส่วนท้ายของนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้
5.2 ข้อมูลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมจากแหล่งข้อมูลของบุคคลภายนอก
เราอาจได้รับข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับท่านจากแหล่งข้อมูลของบุคคลภายนอกดังต่อไปนี้เป็นครั้งคราว
ข้อมูลบล็อกเชน
เราอาจวิเคราะห์ข้อมูลบล็อกเชนที่เป็นข้อมูลสาธารณะเพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าผู้ใช้บริการของเราไม่ได้มีส่วนเกี่ยวข้องในกิจกรรมผิดกฎหมายหรือที่ห้ามดำเนินการตามข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้ และเพื่อวิเคราะห์แนวโน้มการทำธุรกรรมเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ในการวิจัยและพัฒนา
บริการยืนยันตัวตน
เราอาจได้รับข้อมูลจากบริการของบุคคลภายนอกที่ใช้ข้อมูลของท่านเพื่อยืนยันตัวตนหากกฎหมายกำหนด (เช่น ข้อกำหนดที่ใช้บังคับเกี่ยวกับการทําความรู้จักค้า) เพื่อไม่ให้มีข้อสงสัย เราจะ
ไม่ใช้
ข้อมูลไบโอเมตริกซ์ของท่านเมื่อเรายืนยันตัวตนของท่านตามที่กฎหมายกำหนด
ฐานข้อมูล
Talent
เราอาจเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลจากแหล่งข้อมูลต่าง ๆ เพื่อเสนอการจ้างงานให้กับบุคคลที่มีความสามารถโดดเด่น
5.3 ข้อมูลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมโดยอัตโนมัติ
หากกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับอนุญาต เราอาจเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลบางประเภทโดยอัตโนมัติเมื่อท่านโต้ตอบกับบริการของเรา ข้อมูลนี้ช่วยให้เราจัดการปัญหาเกี่ยวกับการสนับสนุนลูกค้า ปรับปรุงประสิทธิภาพของบริการ มอบประสบการณ์ที่ราบรื่นและปรับแต่งสำหรับท่านโดยเฉพาะให้กับท่าน และรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัยของข้อมูลลงชื่อเข้าใช้บัญชีของท่าน (
Account credential
) ข้อมูลที่เก็บรวบรวมโดยอัตโนมัติจะรวมถึง
ตัวระบุออนไลน์ (
online identifier
)
ข้อมูลตำแหน่งทางภูมิศาสตร์และการติดตาม (ดูด้านบน) ระบบปฏิบัติการของคอมพิวเตอร์หรือโทรศัพท์มือถือ ชื่อและเวอร์ชันของเว็บเบราว์เซอร์ และที่อยู่
IP
ในบางกรณีซึ่งเกิดขึ้นน้อยมาก ข้อมูลเหล่านี้จะถูกป้อนเข้าสู่ระบบตรวจจับการทุจริตและการเคลื่อนย้ายเงินตราผิดกฎหมายของเรา นอกจากนี้ ข้อมูลเหล่านี้ยังช่วยให้ประสบการณ์การใช้ซอฟต์แวร์ของเรามีความเสถียรและปราศจากการทุจริต
ข้อมูลการใช้งาน
ข้อมูลการยืนยันตัวตน คำถามเพื่อความปลอดภัย (
security question
) และข้อมูลอื่น ๆ ที่เก็บรวบรวมผ่านทางคุกกี้และเทคโนโลยีที่คล้ายกัน
คุกกี้
ไฟล์ข้อมูลขนาดเล็กที่จัดเก็บไว้ในฮาร์ดไดรฟ์หรือหน่วยความจำในอุปกรณ์ของท่านที่ช่วยให้เราปรับปรุงบริการและประสบการณ์ของท่าน ตรวจสอบว่าพื้นที่และฟีเจอร์ใดของบริการของเราเป็นที่นิยม และนับจำนวนการเข้าชม สำหรับฐานทางกฎหมายในการประมวลผลข้อมูลเหล่านี้ โปรดดู
นโยบายการใช้คุกกี้
ของเราซึ่งอธิบายคุกกี้ประเภทต่าง ๆ ที่เราใช้
ในทำนองเดียวกัน แอปจะรวบรวมข้อมูลเพื่อใช้ในการแก้ไขปัญหาและปรับปรุงการทำงาน เราใช้บริการของบุคคลภายนอก เช่น
Segment.io
หรือ
PostHog
เพื่อดูข้อมูลรวมเกี่ยวกับการใช้งานและการโต้ตอบของผู้ใช้ปลายทาง เมื่อเป็นไปได้ เราจะดำเนินการเพื่อลดหรือปกปิดข้อมูลที่ส่งไปยังบุคคลภายนอก (เช่น การเข้ารหัสข้อมูล)
5.4 ข้อมูลที่ไม่ระบุตัวตนและข้อมูลรวม
การทำให้ข้อมูลไม่สามารถใช้ระบุตัวตนได้เป็นเทคนิคการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่ทำให้ข้อมูลไม่ถือเป็นข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลอีกต่อไป เนื่องจากเมื่อข้อมูลถูกทำให้ไม่สามารถใช้ระบุตัวตนได้แล้ว ข้อมูลนั้นจะไม่สามารถเชื่อมโยงกับบุคคลใดบุคคลหนึ่งได้อีก ตัวอย่างของข้อมูลที่ไม่ระบุตัวตน ได้แก่
ข้อมูลธุรกรรม
ข้อมูลพฤติกรรมการเข้าชม
ตัวชี้วัดประสิทธิภาพ
ตัวบ่งชี้การทุจริต (อย่างไรก็ตาม จะมีการใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์นี้ด้วย)
นอกจากนี้ เราจัดทำข้อมูลรวมโดยการรวมข้อมูลจำนวนมากเข้าด้วยกันเพื่อให้ข้อมูลนั้นไม่สามารถใช้ในการระบุตัวตนหรืออ้างอิงถึงบุคคลใดบุคคลหนึ่งได้อีกต่อไป เราใช้ข้อมูลที่ไม่ระบุตัวตนหรือข้อมูลรวมเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ทางธุรกิจของเรา เช่น การทำความเข้าใจความต้องการและพฤติกรรมของผู้ใช้ ปรับปรุงบริการของเรา ดำเนินกิจกรรมที่เกี่ยวข้องกับข้อมูลเชิงลึกทางธุรกิจและการตลาด ตรวจจับภัยคุกคามด้านความปลอดภัย และฝึกฝนอัลกอริทึมของเรา
ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่กล่าวถึงข้างต้นคือประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายเพื่อให้แอปหรือเว็บไซต์สามารถทำงานได้ ข้อมูลเชิงลึกทางธุรกิจ และการป้องกันการทุจริต
6.
เราใช้ข้อมูลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมอย่างไ
6.1 รายละเอียดทั่วไป
เราต้องมีเหตุผลที่สมเหตุสมผล (หรือ “ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูล”) ในการใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน ในบางกรณี การใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านไม่จำเป็นต้องได้รับความยินยอมจากท่านก่อน เราใช้ข้อมูลของท่านเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ดังต่อไปนี้
เพื่อจัดหาและบำรุงรักษาผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการของเราตามข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้ บริการดังกล่าวรวมถึง
แอปที่ผู้ใช้สามารถจัดการ
World ID
และโทเคนดิจิทัลของตน รวมถึงเรียนรู้เกี่ยวกับคริปโทเคอร์เรนซีโดยทั่วไปและ
Worldcoin Project
โดยเฉพาะ
Operator App
ที่
Orb Operator
สามารถจัดการและดูแล
Orb
ภายใต้การจัดการของตนและสถิติที่เกี่ยวข้องของตนได้
P2P Marketplace
ที่เราเชื่อมต่อผู้ใช้กับตัวแทน (ไม่ใช้กับผู้ใช้ที่จดทะเบียนจัดตั้งหรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ในเยอรมนี หรือมีถิ่นที่อยู่ตามปกติหรือสำนักงานจดทะเบียนในเยอรมนี)
เพื่อปรับปรุงและพัฒนาผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการของเรา รวมถึงแก้จุดบกพร่องและแก้ไขข้อผิดพลาดในบริการของเรา
เพื่อดำเนินการวิจัยวิทยาการข้อมูล
เพื่อวิเคราะห์การใช้บริการของท่านเพื่อให้การสนับสนุนที่ดียิ่งขึ้น
เพื่อให้ท่านสามารถเผยแพร่ข้อมูลบนบล็อกเชนเพื่อพิสูจน์ความเป็นเอกลักษณ์ของท่าน
เพื่อใช้ที่อยู่วอลเล็ตของท่านในการส่งโทเคนดิจิทัลที่เราสนับสนุนให้กับท่าน
เพื่อปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ เช่น กฎหมายและมาตรการต่อต้านการฟอกเงิน ซึ่งรวมถึง
การใช้ที่อยู่
IP
ของท่านเพื่อปิดกั้นการเข้าถึงในกรณีที่อยู่ในประเทศที่ไม่อนุญาตให้เข้าถึงบริการ
การดำเนินการตามคำขอของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลที่ใช้บังคับ เช่น คำขอเข้าถึงหรือลบข้อมูล
การติดตามตรวจสอบธุรกรรมที่อาจเป็นการเคลื่อนย้ายเงินตราผิดกฎหมาย เช่น ธุรกรรมจากวอลเล็ตที่ถูกขึ้นบัญชีดำ
เพื่อปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ เช่น ข้อบังคับเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหาผิดกฎหมาย
เพื่อจัดการคำขอ ข้อร้องเรียน และข้อซักถามของท่านที่มีไปยังฝ่ายบริการลูกค้า
เพื่อระงับข้อพิพาท แก้ไขปัญหา และบังคับตามข้อตกลงระหว่างเรากับท่าน รวมถึงนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้และข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้
เพื่อติดต่อท่านเกี่ยวกับการปรับปรุงบริการ
6.2 สิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน
TFH
อนุญาตให้ท่านจัดเก็บสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนบางอย่างไว้ในอุปกรณ์ของท่านเพื่อแบ่งปันในโครงสร้างพื้นฐาน
Zero Knowledge
ของโปรโตคอล
World ID (“
สิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน”) สำหรับสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน เราประมวลผลข้อมูลดังกล่าวในลักษณะต่อไปนี้
เราตรวจสอบความถูกต้องของสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนของท่าน (ในกรณีของหนังสือเดินทาง การตรวจสอบนี้ดำเนินการผ่านทาง Root Certificate
ของประเทศของท่าน)
เราตรวจสอบว่าท่านเป็นฐานะผู้ถือสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนที่ถูกต้อง (สำหรับหนังสือเดินทาง การยืนยันนี้ดำเนินการในอุปกรณ์ของท่านผ่านทางภาพถ่ายใบหน้าของท่าน (เซลฟี่) ซึ่งจะไม่ถูกจัดเก็บไว้)
เราเข้ารหัส ลงลายมือชื่อ และจัดเก็บสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนของท่านในสภาพแวดล้อมที่ปลอดภัยในอุปกรณ์ของท่าน
เราจะไม่เข้าถึงข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่อยู่ในสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนของท่านโดยเด็ดขาด
ท่านสามารถเลือกที่จะแบ่งปันข้อมูลนี้กับบุคคลที่จำเป็นต้องใช้ข้อมูลดังกล่าว (relying party
) ได้ในภายหลังผ่านระบบการป้องกันของโปรโตคอล
World ID (
เช่น ท่านสามารถพิสูจน์ได้ว่าท่านมีอายุ
20
ปีขึ้นไปโดยไม่ต้องเปิดเผยอายุที่แท้จริงหรือตัวตนของท่าน)
สำหรับหนังสือเดินทาง TFH
จะจัดเก็บเพียงส่วนที่ไม่ระบุตัวตนของ
hash value
ของ
cryptographic signature
ที่ไม่ซ้ำกันของ
หนังสือเดินทางของท่านเพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าหนังสือเดินทางแต่ละเล่มสามารถใช้ในการพิสูจน์ตัวตนได้เพียงครั้งเดียวเท่านั้น
การประมวลผลนี้ขึ้นอยู่กับความยินยอมของท่าน และเราจะไม่เข้าถึงข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านซึ่งอยู่ในหนังสือเดินทางซึ่งถูกจัดเก็บในอุปกรณ์ของท่านอย่างเด็ดขาด ท่านสามารถลบข้อมูลนี้ออกจากโทรศัพท์ของท่านได้โดยการลบ World App
6.3 ข้อมูล
World ID
World ID
ของท่าน (กล่าวคือ หมายเลขที่เป็นความลับที่จำเป็นต้องมีเพื่อใช้
World ID
) จะถูกจัดเก็บไว้ในอุปกรณ์ของท่านเท่านั้น (ในกรณีที่ท่านมีการสำรองข้อมูล จะมีการจัดเก็บสำเนาข้อมูลที่ถูกเข้ารหัสไว้ในข้อมูลสำรองของท่าน) ทั้ง
TFH
และบุคคลอื่นไม่มีสิทธิเข้าถึง
World ID
ของท่าน ท่านสามารถใช้
World ID
ของท่านโดยไม่ระบุตัวตนได้ ทุกครั้งที่ท่านใช้
World ID
กับแอปพลิเคชันใหม่ แอปพลิเคชันนั้นจะได้รับเพียงหมายเลขที่ใช้ครั้งเดียว (“
Nullifier”)
ที่ไม่เปิดเผย
World ID
ของท่าน การดำเนินการดังกล่าวสามารถทำได้โดยใช้หลักการ
Zero Knowledge Proofs (
ท่านเพียงพิสูจน์ว่าท่านมี
World ID
ที่ได้รับการยืนยันแล้ว แต่ไม่เปิดเผยว่า
World ID
นั้นคืออะไร) และท่านสามารถมั่นใจได้ว่า
World ID
ของท่านจะไม่สามารถใช้เพื่อติดตามท่านผ่านแอปพลิเคชันต่าง ๆ ได้ ซึ่งหมายความว่า
World ID
ไม่ใช่รหัสผู้ใช้ทั่วไปสำหรับอินเทอร์เน็ต
การพิสูจน์ World ID
ทำงานผ่านโปรโตคอลแบบเปิด โดยจะมีการเข้าถึง
Merkle Tree
สาธารณะซึ่งใช้ในการจัดเก็บ
hash
ของ
World ID
ที่ยืนยันตัวตนแล้ว
World ID
ไม่ใช่บริการแบบรวมศูนย์ แต่เป็นโปรโตคอลที่ทุกคนสามารถเข้าถึงได้ เรามี
API
ที่ช่วยอำนวยความสะดวกในการเข้าถึง
Merkle Tree
และการพิสูจน์
World ID
แต่เราจะไม่ได้รับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลใด ๆ ในการดำเนินการดังกล่าว
เป็นเรื่องสำคัญที่เราต้องเน้นย้ำว่าเราจะไม่ประมวลผลข้อมูลใด ๆ ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ World ID
ของท่านอันจะทำให้เราสามารถระบุตัวตนของท่านได้ การประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลทั้งหมดที่เกี่ยวกับ
World App
โดยเฉพาะที่อยู่วอลเล็ตและข้อมูลธุรกรรมของท่าน ได้รับการออกแบบมาโดยเฉพาะเพื่อให้ไม่มีความเชื่อมโยงใด ๆ กับข้อมูล
World ID
7. เราประมวลผลข้อมูลของท่านที่ใด
7.1 การส่งหรือโอนข้อมูล
เมื่อท่านมอบข้อมูลของท่านให้เรา ข้อมูลนั้นอาจถูกส่งหรือโอน เก็บรักษา หรือประมวลผลในประเทศอื่นซึ่งไม่ใช่ประเทศที่ข้อมูลของท่านถูกเก็บรวบรวมในตอนแรก ประเทศปลายทางที่ข้อมูลของท่านถูกส่งหรือโอน เก็บรักษา หรือประมวลผลอาจบังคับใช้กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลซึ่งไม่เหมือนกับกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของประเทศต้นทางที่ท่านได้มอบข้อมูลให้ในตอนแรก
เราพยายามอย่างดีที่สุดที่จะดำเนินการตามหลักการเกี่ยวกับกฎหมายความเป็นส่วนตัวที่กำหนดในแต่ละประเทศ เราจะแบ่งปันข้อมูลกับผู้ประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลนอกประเทศของท่านต่อเมื่อการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลดังกล่าวถูกต้องตามกฎหมายและเรามั่นใจว่าผู้ประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลนั้นจะคุ้มครองข้อมูลของท่านตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับและมาตรฐานของเรา
7.2 ความเสี่ยงของการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูล
ต่อไปนี้เป็นรายการความเสี่ยงที่อาจเกิดขึ้นหากเราส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลของท่านไปยังสหรัฐอเมริกา สหภาพยุโรป หรือประเทศอื่น ๆ นอกจากนี้ เรายังได้สรุปแนวทางที่เราใช้ในการลดความเสี่ยงที่เกี่ยวข้องอีกด้วย
แม้ว่าเราจะทำทุกอย่างที่ทำได้เพื่อให้มั่นใจได้ว่าผู้รับจ้างช่วงอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของหน้าที่ตามสัญญาในการคุ้มครองข้อมูลของท่านอย่างเพียงพอ ผู้รับจ้างช่วงดังกล่าวอาจไม่ได้อยู่ภายใต้บังคับของกฎหมายว่าด้วยความเป็นส่วนตัวของข้อมูลในประเทศของท่าน หากผู้รับจ้างช่วงประมวลผลข้อมูลของท่านโดยไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาต อาจเป็นเรื่องยากที่จะยืนยันสิทธิความเป็นส่วนตัวของท่านต่อผู้รับจ้างช่วงนั้น เราลดความเสี่ยงนี้โดยการทำข้อตกลงว่าด้วยการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่เข้มงวดกับ ผู้รับจ้างช่วงของเรา ซึ่งบังคับให้ผู้รับจ้างช่วงดังกล่าวคุ้มครองข้อมูลในระดับเดียวกันกับข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป (
GDPR
) และปฏิบัติตามคำขอของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
มีความเป็นไปได้ที่กฎหมายว่าด้วยความเป็นส่วนตัวของข้อมูลในประเทศของท่านจะไม่สอดคล้องกับกฎหมายว่าด้วยความเป็นส่วนตัวของข้อมูลในสหรัฐอเมริกาหรือในสหภาพยุโรป เราพยายามปฏิบัติตามมาตรฐานการคุ้มครองข้อมูลในระดับสูงสุดที่เราต้องปฏิบัติตามเสมอ
มีความเป็นไปได้ที่ข้อมูลของท่านต้องถูกเข้าถึงโดยเจ้าหน้าที่และหน่วยงานของรัฐ ในกรณีดังกล่าว เรามุ่งมั่นที่จะคัดค้านคำขอของเจ้าหน้าที่หรือหน่วยงานของรัฐที่ไม่ถูกต้อง มีขอบเขตกว้างเกินไป หรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายในศาล นอกจากนี้ เรายังใช้การเข้ารหัสขั้นสูงเพื่อป้องกันการเข้าถึงโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตอีกด้วย
โปรดทราบว่ารายการข้างต้นเป็นเพียงตัวอย่างเท่านั้น ซึ่งไม่ครอบคลุมความเสี่ยงที่อาจเกิดขึ้นต่อท่านทั้งหมด
7.3 กรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลสำหรับการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลไปยังสหรัฐอเมริกา
TFH
ปฏิบัติตามกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลในการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลจากสหภาพยุโรปไปยังสหรัฐอเมริกา (
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework: EU-U.S. DPF)
การขยายขอบเขตการบังคับใช้
EU-U.S. DPF
ให้มีผลครอบคลุมถึงสหราชอาณาจักร (
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF
) และกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลในการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลจากสวิตเซอร์แลนด์ไปยังสหรัฐอเมริกา (
Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework: Swiss-U.S. DPF)
ตามที่กำหนดโดยกระทรวงพาณิชย์สหรัฐอเมริกา โดย
TFH
ได้รับรองต่อกระทรวงพาณิชย์สหรัฐอเมริกาว่า
TFH
ปฏิบัติตามหลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
ในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ได้รับจากสหภาพยุโรปโดยอาศัยกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
และข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ได้รับจากสหราชอาณาจักร (และยิบรอลตาร์) โดยอาศัยกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
UK Extension to the EU-U.S
และ
TFH
ได้รับรองต่อกระทรวงพาณิชย์สหรัฐอเมริกาว่า
TFH
ปฏิบัติตามหลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF
ในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ได้รับจากสวิตเซอร์แลนด์โดยอาศัยกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF
ในกรณีที่ข้อกำหนดของนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวฉบับนี้ขัดแย้งกับหลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
และ/หรือหลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF
ให้หลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลดังกล่าวมีผลบังคับเหนือกว่า ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมเกี่ยวกับโปรแกรมกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล (
DPF)
และดูคำรับรองของเราได้ที่
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
TFH
มีความรับผิดชอบในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ได้รับมาตามกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล และจากนั้นจึงส่งต่อข้อมูลดังกล่าวไปยังบุคคลภายนอกที่กระทำการในฐานะตัวแทนในนามของตน
TFH
จะปฏิบัติตามหลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลในการส่งต่อข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลทั้งหมดจากสหภาพยุโรป สหราชอาณาจักร และสวิตเซอร์แลนด์ รวมถึงข้อกำหนดเกี่ยวกับความรับผิดในการส่งต่อข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
คณะกรรมาธิการการค้าแห่งสหพันธรัฐ (
Federal Trade Commission)
มีอำนาจในการกำกับดูแลการปฏิบัติตามกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
การขยายขอบเขตการบังคับใช้
EU-U.S. DPF
ให้มีผลครอบคลุมถึงสหราชอาณาจักร (
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF)
และกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF
ของ
TFH
ในบางสถานการณ์
TFH
อาจต้องเปิดเผยข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเพื่อปฏิบัติตามคำขอที่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายของหน่วยงานของรัฐ รวมถึงเพื่อปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดด้านความมั่นคงแห่งชาติหรือการบังคับใช้กฎหมาย
เพื่อปฏิบัติตามกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
การขยายขอบเขตการบังคับใช้
EU-U.S. DPF
ให้มีผลครอบคลุมถึงสหราชอาณาจักร (
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF)
และกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF TFH
มุ่งมั่นที่จะแก้ไขข้อร้องเรียนเกี่ยวกับการเก็บรวบรวมและการใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับหลักการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล บุคคลที่อยู่ในสหภาพยุโรป สหราชอาณาจักร และสวิตเซอร์แลนด์ที่มีข้อสงสัยหรือข้อร้องเรียนเกี่ยวกับการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เราได้รับมาภายใต้กรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
การขยายขอบเขตการบังคับใช้
EU-U.S. DPF
ให้มีผลครอบคลุมถึงสหราชอาณาจักร (
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF)
และกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF
กรุณาติดต่อ
TFH
เป็นอันดับแรกที่
dpo@worldcoin.org
เพื่อปฏิบัติตามกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
การขยายขอบเขตการบังคับใช้
EU-U.S. DPF
ให้มีผลครอบคลุมถึงสหราชอาณาจักร (
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF)
และกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF TFH
มุ่งมั่นที่จะให้ความร่วมมือและปฏิบัติตามคำแนะนำของคณะกรรมการซึ่งได้รับการแต่งตั้งโดยหน่วยงานคุ้มครองข้อมูลของสหภาพยุโรป (
DPAs)
สำนักงานคณะกรรมการข้อมูลข่าวสารของสหราชอาณาจักร (
ICO)
หน่วยงานกำกับดูแลของยิบรอลตาร์ (
GRA)
และคณะกรรมาธิการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลและข้อมูลข่าวสารแห่งสวิตเซอร์แลนด์ (
FDPIC)
เกี่ยวกับข้อร้องเรียนที่ยังไม่ได้รับการแก้ไข ซึ่งเกี่ยวข้องกับการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ได้รับโดยอาศัยกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
EU-U.S. DPF
การขยายขอบเขตการบังคับใช้
EU-U.S. DPF
ให้มีผลครอบคลุมถึงสหราชอาณาจักร (
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF)
และกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
Swiss-U.S. DPF
สำหรับข้อร้องเรียนเกี่ยวกับการปฏิบัติตามกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลที่ไม่ได้รับการแก้ไขโดยกลไกของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูลอื่น ๆ ท่านอาจสามารถเรียกร้องให้นำข้อร้องเรียนดังกล่าวเข้าสู่กระบวนการอนุญาโตตุลาการที่มีผลผูกพันได้โดยอยู่ภายใต้เงื่อนไขบางประการ ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมได้ในเว็บไซต์อย่างเป็นทางการของกรอบการคุ้มครองข้อมูล
8. เราแบ่งปันข้อมูลของท่านเมื่อใด
เราจะไม่ขายข้อมูลของท่าน
โดยเด็ดขาด
เมื่อเราแบ่งปันข้อมูลของท่านนอกองค์กรของเรา เราจะดำเนินการดังนี้เสมอ
แบ่งปันข้อมูลอย่างปลอดภัย
ตามสมควร
ดำเนินการให้มั่นใจว่าแนวทางการจัดการข้อมูลจะสอดคล้องกับความมุ่งมั่นของเราในการรักษาความเป็นส่วนตัวของท่าน และ
ป้องกันไม่ให้บริษัทอื่นใช้ข้อมูลเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ของตนเอง
เราจะแบ่งปันข้อมูลของท่านภายในขอบเขตจำกัด ดังนี้
Worldcoin Foundation
เราอาจทำหน้าที่เป็นผู้ประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของ
Worldcoin Foundation
ในการเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในนามของ
Worldcoin (
โปรดดูข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของ
Worldcoin
)
ภายในองค์กรของเรา
เราเปิดเผยข้อมูลต่อสมาชิกทีมที่จำเป็นต้องเข้าถึงข้อมูลเพื่อปฏิบัติงานและหน้าที่ของตนเท่านั้น เราเปิดเผยข้อมูลเท่าที่จำเป็นเพื่อปฏิบัติงานและหน้าที่ที่เฉพาะเจาะจง และมีระบบควบคุมการเข้าถึงที่เข้มงวด
ผู้จัดหาสินค้าหรือบริการและผู้ให้บริการนอกองค์กรของเรา
เราเปิดเผยข้อมูลต่อผู้ให้บริการที่ให้บริการแก่เราเพื่อประมวลผลข้อมูลและให้บริการแก่ท่านเท่านั้น เราเปิดเผยข้อมูลต่อผู้จัดหาสินค้าด้านการยืนยันตัวตนต่อเมื่อกฎหมายกำหนดเท่านั้น (กล่าวคือ ข้อกำหนด
เกี่ยวกับการทําความรู้จักค้า
)
ประเภทของผู้ให้บริการดังกล่าว ได้แก่
ผู้ให้บริการคลาวด์ (ข้อมูลทุกประเภท)
ผู้ให้บริการ SaaS
เราใช้ผลิตภัณฑ์
SaaS
ในการดำเนินการประเภทต่าง ๆ ต่อไปนี้
การจัดการฐานข้อมูลและโครงสร้างพื้นฐาน
การรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัยของข้อมูล
การสรรหาบุคลากร
การสื่อสาร
การสำรวจ
KYC
กระบวนการพิสูจน์ตัวตนในการทําความรู้จักลูกค้า
/KYB
กระบวนการตรวจสอบธุรกิจของลูกค้า
กล่าวคือ การตรวจสอบเอกสารที่ออกโดยหน่วยงานราชการ
การจัดการคำขอของเจ้าของข้อมูล
ส่วนบุคค
ล
การสนับสนุนทางเทคนิค
การสนับสนุนผู้ใช้
ผู้เชี่ยวชาญที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอก
นักพัฒนาซอฟต์แวร์เฉพาะทาง
ผู้เชี่ยวชาญด้านกฎหมาย
ที่ปรึกษาด้านภาษี
ธนาคาร
ผู้ให้บริการ
ระบุประเภทข้อมูล
(อยู่ภายใต้การรักษาความปลอดภัยเป็นพิเศษเท่านั้น)
บริการตรวจสอบประวัติสำหรับผู้สมัครและ Orb Operator
หน่วยงานบังคับใช้กฎหมาย เจ้าหน้าที่ หรือบุคคลภายนอกอื่น ๆ
เราอาจเปิดเผยข้อมูลของท่านเพื่อปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับและตอบสนองต่อข้อเรียกร้องตามกฎหมายซึ่งบังคับให้เปิดเผยข้อมูลดังกล่าว เราจะพิจารณาคำขอแต่ละคำขออย่างรอบคอบเพื่อพิจารณาว่าคำขอนั้นเป็นไปตามกฎหมายหรือไม่ และในกรณีที่เหมาะสม เราอาจคัดค้านคำขอที่ไม่ถูกต้อง มีขอบเขตกว้างเกินไป หรือไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลกับตำรวจและหน่วยงานของรัฐอื่น ๆ ในกรณีที่เรามีเหตุให้เชื่อได้ตามสมควรว่ามีความจำเป็นต้องเปิดเผยข้อมูลนั้นเพื่อปฏิบัติตามกฎหมาย ข้อบังคับ หรือกระบวนการทางกฎหมายหรือหน้าที่อื่น ๆ
เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านหากเราเชื่อว่าการกระทำของท่านไม่สอดคล้องกับข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้ของเรา หากเราเชื่อว่าท่านได้ละเมิดกฎหมาย หรือหากเราเชื่อว่ามีความจำเป็นเพื่อปกป้องสิทธิ ทรัพย์สิน และความปลอดภัยของเรา ผู้ใช้ของเรา สาธารณชน หรือบุคคลอื่น ๆ
เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านกับทนายความและที่ปรึกษาทางวิชาชีพอื่น ๆ ของเราเมื่อจำเป็นต้องขอคำแนะนำหรือเพื่อปกป้องและจัดการผลประโยชน์ทางธุรกิจของเรา
เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านในระหว่างการควบรวมกิจการ การขายสินทรัพย์ของบริษัท การจัดหาเงินทุน หรือการเข้าซื้อกิจการของเราโดยบริษัทอื่นไม่ว่าทั้งหมดหรือเป็นบางส่วน รวมถึงอาจเปิดเผยข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านในระหว่างการเจรจาเกี่ยวกับการดำเนินการดังกล่าว
ข้อมูล รวมถึงข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน อาจถูกแบ่งปันระหว่างบริษัทแม่ บริษัทในเครือ และบริษัทย่อยของเราทั้งในปัจจุบันและอนาคต รวมทั้งบริษัทอื่น ๆ ที่อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมและความเป็นเจ้าของเดียวกัน
เราอาจแบ่งปันข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านโดยได้รับความยินยอมจากท่านหรือเมื่อท่านมีคำสั่ง
9. ข้อมูลของท่านถูกบันทึกบนบล็อกเชนสาธารณะอย่างไร
ข้อมูลธุรกรรมที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการใช้บริการของท่านอาจถูกบันทึกบนบล็อกเชนสาธารณะ
โปรดทราบ
บล็อกเชนเป็น public ledger
สำหรับเก็บข้อมูลธุรกรรมซึ่งจัดเก็บอยู่บนเครือข่ายแบบกระจายศูนย์ซึ่งดำเนินการโดยบุคคลภายนอกที่ไม่อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมหรือการดำเนินการของ
Worldcoin
เนื่องจากลักษณะที่เปิดเป็นสาธารณะและไม่สามารถเปลี่ยนแปลงได้ของบล็อกเชน เราไม่สามารถรับประกันความสามารถในการแก้ไข ลบ หรือควบคุมการเปิดเผยข้อมูลที่ถูกอัปโหลดและจัดเก็บบนบล็อกเชนได้
10.
เราใช้คุกกี้อย่างไรบ้าง
เราใช้คุกกี้เพื่อช่วยให้บริการของเราทำงานได้ดีขึ้น นอกจากคุกกี้แล้ว เราอาจใช้เทคโนโลยีอื่นที่คล้ายกัน เช่น เว็บบีคอน เพื่อติดตามผู้ใช้บริการของเรา เว็บบีคอน (หรือที่เรียกว่า "
clear gifs")
เป็นกราฟิกขนาดเล็กที่มาพร้อมกับตัวระบุเฉพาะซึ่งทำงานในลักษณะคล้ายกับคุกกี้ โดยการกล่าวถึง
นโยบายการใช้คุกกี้
ของเราในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวฉบับนี้ ให้ถือว่านโยบายการใช้คุกกี้ดังกล่าวเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวฉบับนี้ด้วย
นอกจากนี้ เรายังใช้
Google Analytics
อีกด้วย ท่านสามารถศึกษาข้อมูลเพิ่มเติมว่า
Google
ใช้ข้อมูลของท่านอย่างไรบ้างเมื่อท่านใช้เว็บไซต์และแอปพลิเคชันของพันธมิตรของ
Google
ได้ที่
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
โดยการใช้บริการของเรา ท่านยินยอมให้เราจัดเก็บและเข้าถึงคุกกี้และข้อมูลอื่น ๆ บนคอมพิวเตอร์หรืออุปกรณ์มือถือของท่าน และยินยอมให้เราใช้
Google Analytics
เกี่ยวกับการดำเนินการดังกล่าว โปรดอ่านข้อมูลตามลิงก์ที่แสดงข้างต้นเพื่อทำความเข้าใจสิ่งที่ท่านยินยอมให้เราดำเนินการ
11. เราเก็บรักษาข้อมูลของท่านไว้เป็นเวลานานเท่าใด
เว้นแต่เมื่อกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนดเป็นอย่างอื่น เราจะเก็บรักษาข้อมูลของท่านเป็นระยะเวลาเท่าที่จำเป็นตามสมควรเพื่อให้บริการแก่ท่าน ดำเนินการตามวัตถุประสงค์ทางธุรกิจที่ชอบด้วยกฎหมายของเรา และปฏิบัติหน้าที่ของเราตามกฎหมายและข้อบังคับ หากท่านปิดบัญชีกับเรา เราจะลบข้อมูลบัญชีของท่านภายในหนึ่งเดือน มิฉะนั้นเราจะลบข้อมูลบัญชีของท่านหลังจากไม่มีการใช้งานเป็นเวลา
2
ปี หากกฎหมายกำหนด เราจะยังคงเก็บรักษาข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านตามที่มีความจำเป็นเพื่อปฏิบัติหน้าที่ของเราตามกฎหมายและข้อบังคับ รวมถึงการตรวจสอบ การตรวจจับ และการป้องกันการทุจริต ตลอดจนหน้าที่เกี่ยวกับภาษี บัญชี และการรายงานทางการเงิน
โปรดทราบ
บล็อกเชนเป็นเครือข่ายของบุคคลภายนอกแบบกระจายศูนย์ที่
ไม่อยู่ภายใต้การควบคุมหรือการดำเนินการของเรา เนื่องจากลักษณะที่เปิดเป็นสาธารณะและไม่สามารถเปลี่ยนแปลงได้ของเทคโนโลยีบล็อกเชน เราไม่สามารถแก้ไข ลบ หรือควบคุมการเปิดเผยข้อมูลที่จัดเก็บบนบล็อกเชนได้
12. นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้มีความแตกต่างสำหรับเด็กและวัยรุ่นอย่างไรบ้าง
บุคคลที่มีอายุต่ำกว่า
20
ปีไม่ได้รับอนุญาตให้ใช้บริการ และเราจะไม่เก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลจากบุคคลที่มีอายุต่ำกว่า
20
ปีโดยตั้งใจ หากท่านเชื่อว่าบุตรหลานของท่านที่มีอายุต่ำกว่า
20
ปีได้เข้าถึงบริการโดยไม่ได้รับอนุญาตจากท่าน โปรดส่งคำขอให้ลบข้อมูลของบุคคลดังกล่าวผ่านทาง
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา
หากเราทราบว่ามีการเก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับเด็กที่มีอายุต่ำกว่า
20
ปี เราจะลบข้อมูลดังกล่าวโดยเร็วที่สุด เราได้ดำเนินการซึ่งรวมถึงการใช้โมเดล
AI
ตรวจจับอายุอัตโนมัติ การกำหนดแนวทางให้
Operator
ปฏิบัติตาม และการยืนยันตัวตนด้วยตนเองเพื่อให้บริการแก่ผู้ที่มีอายุ
20
ปีขึ้นไปเท่านั้น เราจะไม่ทำการตลาดผลิตภัณฑ์หรือบริการไปยังเด็ก
13.
วิธีติดต่อเราเกี่ยวกับนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้
ท่านสามารถเลือกที่จะลบข้อมูลของท่านจากภายในแอปได้โดยไปที่เมนูการตั้งค่า หากท่านมีข้อสงสัยหรือข้อกังวลเกี่ยวกับนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้ ต้องการใช้สิทธิของท่าน หรือต้องการติดต่อเจ้าหน้าที่คุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของเรา โปรดยื่นคำขอของท่านผ่าน
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเราหรือส่งไปรษณีย์ถึงเราที่
Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA
หรือ
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
เราจะตอบกลับคำขอทั้งหมดที่เราได้รับจากบุคคลที่ต้องการใช้สิทธิในการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลที่ใช้บังคับ นอกจากนี้ ท่านยังสามารถลบข้อมูลของท่านจากภายใน
World App
ได้
หากท่านมีข้อกังวลเกี่ยวกับความเป็นส่วนตัวหรือการใช้ข้อมูลที่ยังไม่ได้รับการแก้ไขจนเป็นที่พอใจ โปรดติดต่อหน่วยงานกำกับดูแลด้านการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในประเทศของท่าน หากท่านอาศัยอยู่ในสหภาพยุโรป ท่านสามารถค้นหาหน่วยงานกำกับดูแลด้านการคุ้มครองข้อมูลของท่านได้
ที่นี่
หากท่านอาศัยอยู่ในประเทศไทย ท่านอาจติดต่อบริษัท ติลลิกีแอนด์กิบบินส์ ดิจิทัล โซลูชั่นส์ จำกัด ซึ่งเป็นตัวแทนของเราในประเทศไทยที่ 1011 อาคารศุภาลัย แกรนด์ ทาวเวอร์ ชั้นที่ 20-26 ถนนพระราม 3 แขวงช่องนนทรี เขตยานนาวา กรุงเทพมหานคร 10120 ประเทศไทย หรืออีเมลที่
digital@tilleke.com
.
14.
สิทธิของท่าน
สิทธิเหล่านี้จะมีผลบังคับใช้ตราบใดที่เราสามารถระบุตัวตนผู้ขอใช้สิทธิในฐานข้อมูลของเราได้ และเราไม่ละเมิดสิทธิของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลรายอื่นจากการใช้สิทธิของผู้ขอใช้สิทธิ
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะได้รับข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เราประมวลผลเกี่ยวกับท่านจากเราในเวลาใดก็ตามเมื่อท่านมีคำขอ ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะได้รับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเกี่ยวกับท่านจากเรา
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะเรียกร้องให้เราทำการแก้ไขข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เกี่ยวกับท่านทันทีหากข้อมูลนั้นไม่ถูกต้อง
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะเรียกร้องให้เราลบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เกี่ยวกับท่าน โดยการใช้สิทธิในการลบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลดังกล่าวต้องเป็นไปตามเงื่อนไขที่กำหนด โดยเฉพาะข้อกำหนดที่ว่าข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลนั้นต้องไม่มีความจำเป็นสำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ในการเก็บรวบรวมหรือประมวลผลข้อมูลดังกล่าวโดยประการอื่นอีกต่อไป โดยมีเงื่อนไขว่าการลบข้อมูลดังกล่าวต้องเป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดของกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับด้วย (เช่น กฎหมายของหลายประเทศมีข้อกำหนดให้เราเก็บรักษาข้อมูลการทำธุรกรรมไว้เป็นระยะเวลาหนึ่ง)
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะถอนความยินยอมของท่านสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลใด ๆ ที่ดำเนินการโดยอ้างอิงตามความยินยอมได้อย่างอิสระ หรือคัดค้านการประมวลผลข้อมูลหากการประมวลผลข้อมูลนั้นดำเนินการโดยไม่ได้รับความยินยอม
15.
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม
ในหัวข้อต่อไปนี้ ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมแต่ละหัวข้อจะแสดงข้อมูลที่กฎหมายกำหนดสำหรับแต่ละตลาดที่เราดำเนินธุรกิจ ข้อมูลนี้เป็นส่วนหนึ่งของความยินยอมซึ่งขึ้นอยู่กับภูมิภาคที่เจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลอาศัยอยู่ ข้อมูลนี้อาจแตกต่างจากข้อมูลของประเทศของท่านเนื่องจากเราปิดกั้นบริการบางอย่างในบางประเทศ ในกรณีที่ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมกับข้อกำหนดด้านบนนี้ไม่สอดคล้องกัน ให้ข้อกำหนดเฉพาะของแต่ละประเทศซึ่งมีความเฉพาะเจาะจงมากกว่ามีผลบังคับเหนือกว่า
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม ก: เขตเศรษฐกิจยุโรป (“EEA”) และสหราชอาณาจักร (“UK”)
หากท่านอยู่ในเขตเศรษฐกิจยุโรปหรือสหราชอาณาจักร ข้อความต่อไปนี้จะใช้บังคับกับท่าน
ท่านมีสิทธิขั้นต่ำดังต่อไปนี้ ท่านอาจมีสิทธิเพิ่มเติมตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
EU Regulation
2016/679 ลงวันที่ 27 เมษายน 2559 (“กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป”) ตามรายการด้านล่างนี้ ในการใช้สิทธิของท่านที่มีอยู่ตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป โปรดติดต่อเราโดยใช้
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา เว้นแต่กรณีที่เป็นข้อยกเว้น เราจะดำเนินการตามคำขอของท่านภายในหนึ่งเดือนซึ่งเป็นระยะเวลาที่กฎหมายกำหนด การใช้คำว่า “กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป” ในหัวข้อนี้ให้รวมถึง “กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหราชอาณาจักร” ซึ่งถูกถ่ายรวมเข้ากับกฎหมายระดับชาติของสหราชอาณาจักรเป็นกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหราชอาณาจักรปี
2018
(2561) และเป็นส่วนหนึ่งของกฎหมายของอังกฤษและเวลส์ สกอตแลนด์ และไอร์แลนด์เหนือโดยอาศัยอำนาจแห่ง
มาตรา
3
แห่งกฎหมายการถอนตัวจากสหภาพยุโรปปี
2018
(2561) ตามที่มีการแก้ไขเพิ่มเติมโดย
ภาคผนวก
1
ของข้อบังคับการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล ความเป็นส่วนตัว และการสื่อสารทางอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ (ตามที่มีการแก้ไขเพิ่มเติม) (การถอนตัวจากสหภาพยุโรป) ปี
2019
(2562)
(SI 2019/419)
ก.
1
สิทธิตามกฎหมายภายใต้กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
หัวข้อนี้จะใช้บังคับหากการประมวลผลข้อมูลของท่านอยู่ภายใต้ขอบเขตการบังคับใช้ของ
กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
(
เช่น หากท่านเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในเขตเศรษฐกิจยุโรปหรือสหราชอาณาจักร
)
ท่านอาจมีสิทธิเพิ่มเติมตาม
กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
ตามที่ระบุด้านล่างนี้ ในการใช้สิทธิของท่านที่มีอยู่ตาม
กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
โปรดติดต่อเราที่
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะได้รับข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เราประมวลผลเกี่ยวกับท่านจากเราในเวลาใดก็ตามเมื่อท่านมีคำขอ ภายในขอบเขตของมาตรา
15
แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะเรียกร้องให้เราแก้ไขข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เกี่ยวกับท่านทันทีหากข้อมูลนั้นไม่ถูกต้อง
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะเรียกร้องให้เราลบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เกี่ยวกับท่านตามข้อกำหนดที่ระบุในมาตรา
17
แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป โดยการใช้สิทธิในการลบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลดังกล่าวต้องเป็นไปตามเงื่อนไขที่กำหนด โดยเฉพาะข้อกำหนดที่ว่าข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลนั้นต้องไม่มีความจำเป็นสำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ในการเก็บรวบรวมหรือประมวลผลข้อมูลดังกล่าวอีกต่อไป รวมทั้งในกรณีของการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลโดยไม่ชอบด้วยกฎหมาย การคัดค้านการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล หรือในกรณีที่เรามีหน้าที่ในการลบข้อมูลดังกล่าวตามกฎหมายของสหภาพยุโรปหรือกฎหมายของรัฐสมาชิกที่ใช้บังคับกับเรา
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะเรียกร้องให้เราจำกัดการประมวลผลข้อมูลตามมาตรา
18
แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะได้รับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เกี่ยวกับท่านซึ่งท่านได้มอบให้กับเราในรูปแบบที่มีโครงสร้าง ใช้กันทั่วไป และอ่านได้ด้วยเครื่องมือหรืออุปกรณ์อัตโนมัติ (
structured, commonly used, machine-readable format
)  ตามมาตรา
20
แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะคัดค้านการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เกี่ยวกับท่านซึ่งดำเนินการโดยอยู่บนพื้นฐานของมาตรา
6 (1)
ประโยคที่
1
ข้อเอฟ (และมาตราอื่น ๆ) แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรปได้ทุกเมื่อ โดยอ้างอิงเหตุผลที่เกี่ยวข้องกับสถานการณ์เฉพาะของท่าน ตามมาตรา
21
แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรป
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะติดต่อหน่วยงานกำกับดูแลที่มีอำนาจเพื่อร้องเรียนเกี่ยวกับการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลโดยผู้ควบคุมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล หน่วยงานกำกับดูแลที่รับผิดชอบคือ: สำนักงานคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลแห่งรัฐบาวาเรีย (
Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz)
หากการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลดำเนินการโดยอาศัยความยินยอมของท่าน ท่านมีสิทธิตามมาตรา
7
แห่งกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรปที่จะถอนความยินยอมในการใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านได้ตลอดเวลา โดยการถอนความยินยอมนั้นจะมีผลบังคับในอนาคต การถอนความยินยอมนั้นง่ายพอ ๆ กับการให้ความยินยอม โปรดทราบว่าการถอนความยินยอมจะมีผลบังคับในอนาคตเท่านั้น การประมวลผลข้อมูลที่ดำเนินการก่อนที่จะมีการการถอนความยินยอมจะไม่ได้รับผลกระทบแต่อย่างใด
ก.
2
การส่งหรือโอนข้อมูล
เมื่อส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลไปยังประเทศที่ไม่มี
คำตัดสินเกี่ยวกับความเพียงพอของมาตรฐานการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
(adequacy decision
) เราจะนำข้อสัญญามาตรฐานของสหภาพยุโรปมาใช้ ปัจจุบันเราส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลไปยังสหรัฐอเมริกาเพียงประเทศเดียวเท่านั้น
หากการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลดำเนินการโดยอาศัยความยินยอมของท่าน ท่านมีสิทธิตามมาตรา
7
ของกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสหภาพยุโรปที่จะถอนความยินยอมในการใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านได้ตลอดเวลา โดยการถอนความยินยอมนั้นจะมีผลบังคับในอนาคต การถอนความยินยอมนั้นง่ายพอ ๆ กับการให้ความยินยอม โปรดทราบว่าการถอนความยินยอมจะมีผลบังคับในอนาคตเท่านั้น การประมวลผลข้อมูลที่ดำเนินการก่อนที่จะมีการการถอนความยินยอมจะไม่ได้รับผลกระทบแต่อย่างใด
โปรดทราบด้วยว่าการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่ไม่ได้ดำเนินการโดยอาศัยความยินยอมจะไม่ได้รับผลกระทบจากการถอนความยินยอมนั้น
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม ข: ญี่ปุ่น
หากท่านอาศัยอยู่ในญี่ปุ่น ข้อความต่อไปนี้จะใช้บังคับกับท่านเพิ่มเติม
ข
.1.
ข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับระเบียบข้อบังคับของญี่ปุ่น
เราปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายและข้อบังคับของญี่ปุ่น รวมถึงกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของญี่ปุ่น (“
APPI”)
เนื้อหาส่วนนี้มีผลบังคับกับการจัดการ "ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล" ตามที่กำหนดในกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของญี่ปุ่น โดยจะมีผลบังคับเหนือส่วนอื่น ๆ ของแบบฟอร์มยินยอมให้ใช้ข้อมูลไบโอเมตริกซ์นี้
เราปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายและข้อบังคับของญี่ปุ่น รวมถึงกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของญี่ปุ่น (“
APPI”)
เนื้อหาส่วนนี้มีผลบังคับกับการจัดการ "ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล" ตามที่กำหนดในกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของญี่ปุ่น โดยจะมีผลบังคับเหนือส่วนอื่น ๆ ของนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้
ข
.2.
การแบ่งปันข้อมูล
เว้นแต่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับจะอนุญาต เราจะไม่เปิดเผย ขาย มอบให้ แบ่งปัน หรือโอนหรือส่งข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านให้กับบุคคลภายนอกใด ๆ
ข
.3.
มาตรการรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัย
เราดำเนินมาตรการที่จำเป็นและเหมาะสมเพื่อป้องกันการรั่วไหล การสูญหาย หรือความเสียหายต่อข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านที่มีการประมวลผล และเพื่อรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัยของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลโดยประการอื่น เช่น การกำหนดข้อบังคับสำหรับการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล การตรวจสอบการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเป็นประจำ การฝึกอบรมพนักงานเรื่องการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเป็นประจำ การป้องกันการโจรกรรมหรือการสูญหายของอุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ในการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล และการบังคับใช้มาตรการควบคุมการเข้าถึง นอกจากนี้ เรายังควบคุมดูแลผู้รับจ้างและพนักงานของเราที่จัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลอย่างเหมาะสม ท่านสามารถขอทราบรายละเอียดเพิ่มเติมเกี่ยวกับมาตรการรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัยที่ใช้บังคับในการจัดการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านได้โดยติดต่อเราที่
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา
ข
.4.
ข้อมูลอ้างอิงเกี่ยวกับการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในต่างประเทศ
ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านถูกประมวลผลในสหภาพยุโรปและสหรัฐอเมริกา
ข
.5.
สิทธิตามกฎหมายภายใต้กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของญี่ปุ่น
ในการใช้สิทธิของท่านที่มีอยู่ตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของญี่ปุ่น โปรดติดต่อเราที่
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม ค: อาร์เจนตินา
หากท่านมีภูมิลำเนาอยู่ในสาธารณรัฐอาร์เจนตินา เราขอแจ้งให้ท่านทราบว่า สำนักงานการเข้าถึงข้อมูลสาธารณะ (
AGENCY OF ACCESS TO PUBLIC INFORMATION
) ในฐานะหน่วยงานควบคุมกฎหมาย (
Control Agency of Law
) เลขที่
25,326
มีอำนาจในการรับฟังข้อร้องเรียนและข้อเรียกร้องที่ยื่นโดยบุคคลซึ่งเป็นเจ้าของสิทธิที่ได้รับผลกระทบจากการไม่ปฏิบัติตามข้อบังคับที่มีผลบังคับใช้เกี่ยวกับการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
ท่านสามารถติดต่อหน่วยงานได้ดังนี้
ที่อยู่:
Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
รหัสไปรษณีย์:
C1067ABP
หมายเลขโทรศัพท์: (
54-11) 3988-3968
อีเมล:
datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม ง: สิงคโปร์
หากท่านเป็นผู้อยู่อาศัยในสิงคโปร์ ข้อความต่อไปนี้จะใช้บังคับกับท่าน
ง
.1.
การเก็บรวบรวม การใช้ และการเปิดเผยข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน
หากท่านเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในสิงคโปร์และให้ความยินยอม เราจะเก็บรวบรวม ใช้ หรือเปิดเผยข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์แต่ละข้อตามที่ระบุในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของเรา ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิในการถอนความยินยอมของท่านได้ทุกเมื่อ แต่โปรดทราบว่าเราอาจไม่สามารถให้บริการแก่ท่านต่อไปได้ ขึ้นอยู่กับลักษณะและขอบเขตของคำขอของท่าน โปรดทราบว่าการถอนความยินยอมจะไม่มีผลกระทบต่อสิทธิของเราในการเก็บรวบรวม ใช้ และเปิดเผยข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลต่อไป ในกรณีที่กฎหมายอนุญาตหรือกำหนดให้เราเก็บรวบรวม ใช้ และเปิดเผยข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลดังกล่าวได้โดยไม่ต้องได้รับความยินยอม
[1]
ง
.2.
การใช้สิทธิของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน
ท่านสามารถควบคุมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เราเก็บรวบรวมและใช้สิทธิใด ๆ ก็ตามได้โดยติดต่อเราที่
พอร์ทัลคำขอ
ของเรา เรามุ่งมั่นที่จะตอบสนองคำขอของท่านโดยเร็วที่สุด ซึ่งโดยปกติแล้วจะดำเนินการภายใน
30
วัน เราจะแจ้งให้ท่านทราบล่วงหน้าหากเราไม่สามารถตอบสนองคำขอของท่านได้ภายใน
30
วัน หรือหากเราไม่สามารถปฏิบัติตามคำขอของท่านได้ โดยเราจะแจ้งเหตุผลให้ท่านทราบ
[2]
ในกรณีที่กฎหมายอนุญาต เราอาจเรียกเก็บค่าธรรมเนียมการจัดการเพื่อปฏิบัติตามคำขอของท่าน
ง
.3.
การส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านไปยังต่างประเทศ
หากท่านเป็นผู้มีถิ่นที่อยู่ในสิงคโปร์และเราได้เก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลของท่าน เราอาจส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลของท่านออกนอกสิงคโปร์เป็นครั้งคราว อย่างไรก็ตาม เราจะดำเนินการให้มั่นใจเสมอว่าข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านจะได้รับการคุ้มครองตามมาตรฐานในระดับที่เทียบเท่ากับที่กำหนดตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของสิงคโปร์ปี
2012
(2555) เป็นอย่างน้อย เช่น ผ่านการใช้ข้อสัญญาต้นแบบของอาเซียน (
ASEAN Model Contractual Clauses
)
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม จ – เกาหลีใต้
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติมสำหรับเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในเกาหลีนี้อธิบายแนวทางปฏิบัติของเราเกี่ยวกับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เราประมวลผลโดยเกี่ยวข้องกับความสัมพันธ์ระหว่างท่านกับเราในกรณีที่ท่านเป็นเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลซึ่งอยู่ในเกาหลีใต้
จ.
1 –
การส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
เรามอบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลแก่บุคคลภายนอกหรือจ้างบุคคลภายนอกในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลตามรายละเอียดที่ระบุด้านล่างนี้
การมอบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลแก่บุคคลภายนอก
ชื่อผู้รับ
วัตถุประสงค์ในการใช้ข้อมูลโดยผู้รับ
รายการข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่มอบให้กับผู้รับ
ระยะเวลาการเก็บรักษาข้อมูลโดยผู้รับ
Tools for Humanity GmbH
วัตถุประสงค์ที่ระบุในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้ในข้อ
6
ด้านบนนี้
รายการที่ระบุในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้ในข้อ
5
ด้านบนนี้
ระยะเวลาการเก็บรักษาที่กำหนดไว้ในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้ในข้อ
11
ด้านบนนี้
- การจ้างบุคคลภายนอกในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
โปรดดูรายการการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่เราจ้างบุคคลภายนอกในการดำเนินการทั้งหมดและบริษัทที่เกี่ยวข้องได้ที่ลิงก์นี้:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
เราอาจจ้างบุคคลภายนอกในการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านและ/หรือส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ในการจัดเก็บไปยังบุคคลภายนอกซึ่งตั้งอยู่นอกเกาหลี
หากท่านไม่ต้องการให้ส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านไปต่างประเทศ ท่านสามารถปฏิเสธการดำเนินการดังกล่าวได้โดยไม่ยินยอมให้ส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล หรือขอให้เราหยุดการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลไปยังต่างประเทศ แต่หากท่านปฏิเสธไม่ให้เราดำเนินการดังกล่าว ท่านอาจไม่สามารถใช้บริการของเราได้ ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลไปยังต่างประเทศข้างต้นคือข้อเท็จจริงที่ว่าการประมวลผลหรือการจัดเก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่จ้างบุคคลภายนอกในการดำเนินการนั้นจำเป็นสำหรับการทำสัญญาและการปฏิบัติหน้าที่ตามสัญญาที่มีต่อเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
”
และข้อเท็จจริงตามที่กฎหมายกำหนดได้ถูกเปิดเผยในนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวแล้ว (มาตรา
28-8(1)(iii)
ของกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล)
จ.
2 –
การทำลายข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
เมื่อข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลไม่มีความจำเป็นอีกต่อไปเนื่องจากสิ้นสุดระยะเวลาการเก็บรักษาข้อมูลนั้นแล้วหรือการประมวลผลข้อมูลตามวัตถุประสงค์เสร็จสิ้นลงแล้ว ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลนั้นจะถูกทำลายโดยไม่ชักช้า กระบวนการและวิธีการทำลายข้อมูลมีรายละเอียดดังนี้
กระบวนการทำลาย: เราเลือกข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลบางรายการที่จะทำลาย และทำลายข้อมูลนั้นเมื่อได้รับการอนุมัติจากเจ้าหน้าที่คุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
วิธีการทำลาย: เราทำลายข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่บันทึกและจัดเก็บในรูปแบบไฟล์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์โดยใช้วิธีการทางเทคนิค (เช่น กระบวนการ
low level format
) เพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าบันทึกข้อมูลนั้นไม่สามารถสร้างขึ้นใหม่ได้ ส่วนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่บันทึกและจัดเก็บในรูปแบบกระดาษจะถูกย่อยทำลายหรือเผา
จ.
3 –
การจัดเก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
หากเราจำเป็นต้องเก็บรักษาข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ เราจะเก็บรักษาข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์และเป็นระยะเวลาตามที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนด
จ.
4 –
สิทธิของท่าน
ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิที่เกี่ยวข้องกับข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลกับเรา รวมถึงการขอเข้าถึง แก้ไข หรือลบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล หรือขอให้เราระงับการประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านตามที่กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับกำหนด รวมถึงกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล
(Personal Information Protection Act)
นอกจากนี้ ท่านยังสามารถใช้สิทธิในการถอนความยินยอมในการเก็บรวบรวม/ใช้/มอบข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล สิทธิในการขอให้โอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล และสิทธิที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการตัดสินใจแทนโดยอัตโนมัติ นอกจากนี้ ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิเหล่านี้ผ่านตัวแทนผู้มีอำนาจหรือบุคคลที่ได้รับมอบอำนาจอย่างถูกต้องตามกฎหมายของท่านได้ด้วย
ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิที่เกี่ยวข้องข้างต้นได้โดยติดต่อเราที่
worldcoin.org/requestportal
จ.
5 –
มาตรการรักษาความมั่นคงปลอดภัย
เราจะบังคับใช้มาตรการป้องกันด้านเทคนิค มาตรการป้องกันเชิงองค์กร และมาตรการป้องกันทางกายภาพตามที่กฎหมายเกาหลีกำหนดเพื่อคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล เช่นมาตรการต่อไปนี้
มาตรการป้องกันด้านการจัดการ: การแต่งตั้งเจ้าหน้าที่คุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล การจัดทำและดำเนินการตามแผนการจัดการภายในองค์กร การฝึกอบรมพนักงานเกี่ยวกับการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลเป็นประจำ เป็นต้น
มาตรการป้องกันด้านเทคนิค: การจัดการสิทธิการเข้าถึงระบบประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล การติดตั้งระบบควบคุมการเข้าถึง การติดตั้งโปรแกรมรักษาความปลอดภัย เป็นต้น และ
มาตรการป้องกันทางกายภาพ: การจำกัดการเข้าถึงสถานที่และอุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล เช่น ห้องคอมพิวเตอร์และห้องจัดเก็บข้อมูล เป็นต้น
จ.
6 –
ติดต่อเรา
หากท่านมีคำถามหรือข้อสงสัยที่เกี่ยวข้องกับความเป็นส่วนตัวและการคุ้มครองข้อมูล โปรดติดต่อฝ่ายคุ้มครองข้อมูลของเราที่
dpo@worldcoin.org
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม ฉ – สหรัฐอเมริกา
ในเวลานี้ กฎหมายว่าด้วยความเป็นส่วนตัวของผู้บริโภคของรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนีย (
California Consumer Privacy Act)
ตามที่แก้ไขเพิ่มเติมโดยกฎหมายว่าด้วยสิทธิความเป็นส่วนตัวของรัฐแคลิฟอร์เนีย (
California Privacy Rights Act)
ไม่ใช้บังคับกับเรา
ข้อกำหนดเพิ่มเติม ช – บราซิล
ช.
1
กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ ผู้ควบคุมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล และผู้ดำเนินการ
หากท่านอาศัยอยู่ในบราซิล หรือหากข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านถูกเก็บรวบรวมในบราซิล หรือหากท่านใช้บริการของเราในบราซิล กฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับจะได้แก่กฎหมายหมายเลข
13,709/2018 (
กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไป หรือ “
LGPD”)
ช.
2
สิทธิในการคัดค้าน
ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะคัดค้านการใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านเพื่อวัตถุประสงค์ใด ๆ ที่ไม่ได้อาศัยฐานความยินยอม หากวัตถุประสงค์นั้นไม่สอดคล้องกับกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไป เมื่อการคัดค้านของท่านได้รับการยอมรับ เราจะไม่ใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านเพื่อพัฒนาและปรับปรุงฟีเจอร์และประสบการณ์ของบริการของเราอีกต่อไป
โปรดทราบว่าหากท่านไม่ให้หรือไม่อนุญาตให้เก็บรวบรวมหรือประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลบางอย่าง อาจส่งผลต่อคุณภาพของประสบการณ์ที่ท่านจะได้รับ เราอาจไม่สามารถบรรลุวัตถุประสงค์ในการให้บริการ หรืออาจไม่สามารถให้บริการบางอย่างแก่ท่านได้
ในบางกรณี ข้อมูลของท่านจะถูกทำให้ไม่สามารถใช้ระบุตัวตนได้ ซึ่งหมายความว่าข้อมูลนั้นจะไม่สามารถระบุตัวตนของท่านได้อีกต่อไป ท่านไม่สามารถคัดค้านการใช้ข้อมูลที่ไม่ระบุตัวตนได้เนื่องจากข้อมูลนั้นไม่สามารถใช้ระบุตัวตนของท่านได้ตามที่กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไปกำหนด เราใช้ข้อมูลที่ไม่ระบุตัวตนนี้เพื่อปรับปรุงผลิตภัณฑ์และบริการของเรา
ช.
3
สิทธิตามกฎหมายภายใต้กฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไป
ตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไป ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะได้รับการยืนยันว่ามีการประมวลผล การเข้าถึง หรือการแก้ไขข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน หรือขอให้โอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่มีการประมวลผล  รวมทั้งสามารถขอข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับหน่วยงานรัฐและเอกชนที่ใช้ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านร่วมกันกับเราได้ นอกจากนี้ ท่านสามารถขอข้อมูลเกี่ยวกับความเป็นไปได้ที่ท่านจะไม่ให้ความยินยอมในการประมวลผลข้อมูลและผลกระทบเชิงลบที่อาจเกิดขึ้น และขอให้ลบข้อมูลที่ประมวลผลโดยได้รับความยินยอมจากท่าน ท่านสามารถเลือกที่จะลบข้อมูลของท่านใน
World App
ได้ในเมนูการตั้งค่า
ในบางกรณี ท่านมีสิทธิที่จะคัดค้านหรือจำกัดวิธีที่เราประมวลผลข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน หรือถอนความยินยอมของท่านซึ่งเราอ้างอิงในการประมวลผลข้อมูลที่ท่านมอบให้
ท่านสามารถใช้สิทธิของท่านตามกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไปได้ โดยยื่นคำขอไปยังเจ้าหน้าที่คุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของเราโดยใช้รายละเอียดการติดต่อในข้อ ช.
4
ด้านล่าง หรือผ่านพอร์ทัลคำขอออนไลน์ของเรา หากท่านรู้สึกว่าการขอใช้สิทธิของท่านไม่ได้รับการดำเนินการอย่างเพียงพอ ท่านสามารถยื่นข้อร้องเรียนต่อ
Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD)
โดยใช้แบบฟอร์มที่อยู่ที่ลิงก์นี้:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
ช.
4
การส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านไปต่างประเทศ
หากกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไปใช้บังคับกับท่าน และเราได้เก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่าน เราอาจส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลนั้นออกนอกประเทศ อย่างไรก็ตาม เราจะดำเนินการให้มั่นใจอยู่เสมอว่าประเทศหรือองค์กรระหว่างประเทศที่จะมีการส่งหรือโอนข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของท่านไปจะมีการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในระดับที่เพียงพอตามที่กำหนดในกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไป ซึ่งได้รับการยอมรับตามคำตัดสินเกี่ยวกับความเพียงพอของมาตรฐานการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลซึ่งออกโดยสำนักงานคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของบราซิล หรือ
ANPD
ในกรณีที่ไม่มีคำตัดสินดังกล่าว เราจะปฏิบัติตามมาตรฐานการคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่เทียบเท่ากับที่กำหนดไว้ในกฎหมายคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ใช้บังคับทั่วไปเป็นอย่างน้อย โดยใช้ข้อสัญญามาตรฐานที่กำหนดไว้ในข้อบังคับของสำนักงานคุ้มครองข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลของบราซิล หรือเมื่อเราได้รับความยินยอมที่เฉพาะเจาะจงและอย่างชัดแจ้งของท่านในการโอนหรือส่งข้อมูลไปยังต่างประเทศ
ภาคผนวก I – ฐานทางกฎหมาย/วัตถุประสงค์สำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูลของ Tools for Humanity
ผู้ใช้
เหตุผลที่เราประมวลผลข้อมูล
ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ประมวลผล
ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูล
ระยะเวลาการเก็บรักษาข้อมูล
เพื่อสร้างบัญชีของท่านใน World App
ที่อยู่วอลเล็ต metadata
ชื่อผู้ใช้
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ หรือจนกว่าท่านจะขอลบข้อมูล
เพื่อตรวจสอบให้มั่นใจว่าท่านมีอายุตามข้อกำหนดในการใช้งาน
วันเดือนปีเกิด
หน้าที่ตามกฎหมาย
เราจะไม่จัดเก็บวันเดือนปีเกิดของท่าน เราจัดเก็บเพียงข้อมูลที่ระบุว่าท่านมีอายุ 20
ปีหรือไม่เท่านั้น เราจัดเก็บข้อมูลนี้ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ หรือจนกว่าท่านจะขอลบข้อมูล
เพื่ออนุญาตให้ผู้ติดต่อของท่านสามารถสื่อสารและทำธุรกรรมกับท่านได้อย่างง่ายดาย (สามารถเลือกได้)
หมายเลขโทรศัพท์
ความยินยอม
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ หรือจนกว่าท่านจะขอลบข้อมูล
เพื่อให้ท่านสามารถสื่อสารและทำธุรกรรมกับผู้ติดต่อของท่านได้อย่างง่ายดาย
ผู้ติดต่อในสมุดที่อยู่
ความยินยอม
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ หรือจนกว่าท่านจะขอลบข้อมูล
เพื่อแสดง Orbs
ใกล้ท่าน (สามารถเลือกได้)
ข้อมูลตำแหน่ง
ความยินยอม
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
เพื่อป้องกันการทุจริตในการป้องกันความปลอดภัยของบัญชี
metadata
ที่อยู่
IP, ID
อุปกรณ์
ประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมาย กล่าวคือ ประโยชน์ในการป้องกันการทุจริตบางประเภท (รายการประเภท)
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
เพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าบริการได้รับอนุญาตในประเทศของท่าน
ที่อยู่ IP
ข้อมูลตำแหน่ง
หน้าที่ตามกฎหมาย
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
เพื่อแสดงวอลเล็ตที่ท่านเก็บรักษาเอง และแสดงอินเทอร์เฟสสำหรับการทำธุรกรรมวอลเล็ต
ที่อยู่วอลเล็ต ข้อมูลธุรกรรม
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
ไม่มีการจัดเก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในบริบทนี้
เพื่อแสดง World ID
ที่ท่านเก็บรักษาเอง และแสดงอินเทอร์เฟสสำหรับการยืนยันตัวตน
ข้อมูล World ID
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
ไม่มีการจัดเก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในบริบทนี้
เพื่อแสดงสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตนที่ท่านเก็บรักษาเอง และแสดงอินเทอร์เฟสสำหรับการแบ่งปันสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน
ข้อมูลสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน ข้อมูลความถูกต้องของสิ่งที่ใช้รับรองตัวตน
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
ไม่มีการจัดเก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลในบริบทนี้
เพื่อวิเคราะห์และปรับปรุงบริการของเราและดำเนินการวิจัยวิทยาการข้อมูล
ข้อมูลการใช้งานและ metadata
ข้อมูลธุรกรรมที่เป็นข้อมูลสาธารณะ
ความยินยอม
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
เพื่อปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ เช่น กฎหมายและมาตรการต่อต้านการฟอกเงิน
ข้อมูลธุรกรรม ที่อยู่วอลเล็ต
หน้าที่ตามกฎหมาย
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ
เพื่อปฏิบัติตามกฎหมายที่ใช้บังคับ เช่น ข้อบังคับเกี่ยวกับเนื้อหา
เนื้อหา Miniapp
หน้าที่ตามกฎหมาย
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ
เพื่อเปิดใช้งานการสื่อสารและการตลาด
ที่อยู่อีเมล การแจ้งเตือนแบบพุช
ประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
การติดต่อจากท่าน
ประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
คำติชมจากท่าน
ประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมาย
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
เพื่อจัดการคำขอที่ท่านมีไปยังฝ่ายบริการลูกค้า ข้อร้องเรียน และข้อซักถามของท่าน
ข้อมูลการสื่อสาร ที่อยู่อีเมล หรือชื่อบัญชีสื่อสังคมออนไลน์หากท่านต้องการสื่อสารกับเราผ่านช่องทางดังกล่าว
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
เพื่อให้มั่นใจว่าแอปทำงานได้อย่างราบรื่นสำหรับท่าน
metadata
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
สูงสุด 24
เดือน
เพื่อยืนยันอุปกรณ์ของท่าน
ข้อมูล World ID
ของอุปกรณ์ (ข้อมูลระบุตัวตนของอุปกรณ์)
การปฏิบัติตามสัญญา
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ
เพื่อระงับข้อพิพาท แก้ไขปัญหา และบังคับใช้ข้อตกลงของเรากับท่าน รวมถึงนโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวนี้และข้อกำหนดสำหรับผู้ใช้
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่ใช้บริการ
พันธมิตรทางธุรกิจ
เหตุผลที่เราประมวลผลข้อมูล
ข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลที่ประมวลผล
ฐานทางกฎหมายสำหรับการประมวลผลข้อมูล
ระยะเวลาการเก็บรักษา
การสื่อสาร
หมายเลขโทรศัพท์ ที่อยู่อีเมล ชื่อ
ประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมาย กล่าวคือ ประโยชน์ในการสื่อสารกับพันธมิตรทางธุรกิจ
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่มีความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจ หรือจนกว่าท่านจะขอลบข้อมูล
การรักษาและบริหารความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจ
หมายเลขโทรศัพท์ ที่อยู่อีเมล ชื่อ ข้อมูลองค์กร
ประโยชน์อันชอบธรรม กล่าวคือ ประโยชน์ในการรักษาและบริหารความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจกับพันธมิตรทางธุรกิจ
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่มีความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจ หรือจนกว่าท่านจะขอลบข้อมูล
ปฏิบัติหน้าที่เกี่ยวกับการทําความรู้จักค้า
ข้อมูลหนังสือเดินทาง ข้อมูลองค์กร
หน้าที่ตามกฎหมาย
ตลอดระยะเวลาที่มีความสัมพันธ์ทางธุรกิจ และสูงสุด 3
ปีหลังจากสิ้นสุดความสัมพันธ์
เพื่อประมวลผลใบสมัครของท่าน
ข้อมูลใบสมัคร
ความยินยอมและการดำเนินการตามคำขอของเจ้าของข้อมูลส่วนบุคคลก่อนเข้าทำสัญญา
เบื้องต้นจะเก็บรักษาไว้สูงสุด 3
เดือน หรือนานกว่านั้นหากท่านยินยอมให้เก็บข้อมูลไว้ในฐานข้อมูล
Talent
TFHPS
20241017a
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Thông báo Quyền riêng tư của Tools for Humanity
Cảm ơn quý vị đã chọn tham gia Cộng đồng Worldcoin! Worldcoin là giao thức mã nguồn mở, được hậu thuẫn bởi cộng đồng các nhà phát triển, cá nhân và những người đóng góp khác trên toàn cầu.
Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này bao gồm dữ liệu quý vị cung cấp cho chúng tôi thông qua việc quý vị sử dụng các trang web, ứng dụng của chúng tôi (“Ứng dụng”) cũng như các dịch vụ khác được liên kết với Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này (gọi chung là “Dịch vụ”). Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này được kết hợp và điều chỉnh bởi
Điều khoản và Điều kiện Người dùng
(“Điều khoản Người dùng”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH Hoa Kỳ”), cùng với công ty con tại Đức là Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Đức”; gọi chung là “
TFH
” hoặc “
chúng tôi
”),
đang đóng góp vào sự phát triển và tăng trưởng của giao thức Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”) nhưng khác biệt với Worldcoin Foundation, tổ chức kiểm soát việc xử lý dữ liệu liên quan đến Orb.
1. Bên kiểm soát
Chúng tôi là bên kiểm soát dữ liệu của tất cả “Dữ liệu Ứng dụng World”, “Dữ liệu Xác minh Thông tin Xác thực” và “Dữ liệu Kinh doanh” khác: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 Hoa Kỳ. TFH được thành lập tại Liên minh Châu Âu (“
EU
”) thông qua Tools for Humanity GmbH.
“Dữ liệu Ứng dụng World” nghĩa là tất cả dữ liệu cá nhân được thu thập và xử lý thông qua việc quý vị sử dụng Ứng dụng World, như được định nghĩa thêm trong Mục 5 dưới đây, ngoại trừ bất kỳ dữ liệu cá nhân nào liên quan đến việc quý vị sử dụng giao thức Worldcoin hoặc mã thông báo Worldcoin (chẳng hạn như địa chỉ ví của quý vị và dữ liệu giao dịch mà chúng tôi không kiểm soát).
Dữ liệu Xác minh Thông tin Xác thực nghĩa là dữ liệu được xử lý khi xác minh thông tin xác thực để thêm thông tin đó vào World ID tự lưu giữ của quý vị. Ví dụ: Điều này có nghĩa là đọc chip NFC của hộ chiếu để lưu trữ an toàn thông tin hộ chiếu trên thiết bị của quý vị. Dữ liệu này thuộc quyền kiểm soát của quý vị và sau khi xác minh thông tin xác thực hợp lệ, TFH lưu trữ một phần được ẩn danh của giá trị băm của chữ ký mật mã duy nhất được tạo từ thông tin xác thực của quý vị (ví dụ: hộ chiếu) để đảm bảo rằng mỗi thông tin xác thực chỉ có thể được thêm vào một World ID một lần.
“Dữ liệu kinh doanh” nghĩa là tất cả dữ liệu cá nhân được công ty chúng tôi thu thập và xử lý thông qua các phương tiện khác khi giao tiếp hoặc khi làm việc hoặc tương tác với chúng tôi theo bất kỳ cách nào khác qua email, cuộc gọi truyền hình hoặc trang web của chúng tôi. Để xử lý dữ liệu trong ngữ cảnh Ứng dụng Orb, vui lòng tham khảo Thông báo Quyền riêng tư của Ứng dụng Orb được liên kết trong Ứng dụng Orb. Để xử lý dữ liệu trong bối cảnh thu thập và thử nghiệm dữ liệu chuyên biệt, vui lòng tham khảo Thông báo tương ứng về Quyền riêng tư khi Thu thập và Thử nghiệm được liên kết trong ứng dụng thử nghiệm của quý vị. Đối với xử lý dữ liệu trong bối cảnh trang web của chúng tôi, vui lòng tham khảo Chính sách Cookie được liên kết trên trang web của chúng tôi.
2. Cập nhật Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này
Chúng tôi cập nhật Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này theo từng thời điểm. Nếu chúng tôi thực hiện những thay đổi lớn, chẳng hạn như cách chúng tôi sử dụng thông tin cá nhân của quý vị, chúng tôi sẽ thông báo cho quý vị qua email hoặc tin nhắn trong Ứng dụng.
3. Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này có nội dung gì?
Cam kết của chúng tôi trong việc bảo vệ quyền riêng tư và dữ liệu của quý vị
Thông tin chúng tôi thu thập và lý do thu thập
Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu thu thập như thế nào
Chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu của quý vị ở đâu
Khi nào chúng tôi chia sẻ dữ liệu của quý vị
Dữ liệu của quý vị được ghi lại trên blockchain công khai như thế nào
Chúng tôi sử dụng cookie như thế nào
Chúng tôi lưu giữ dữ liệu của quý vị trong bao lâu
Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này khác biệt như thế nào đối với trẻ em và thanh thiếu niên
Các quyền của quý vị theo luật định
Cách liên hệ với chúng tôi về Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này
4. Cam kết của chúng tôi trong việc bảo vệ quyền riêng tư và dữ liệu của quý vị
Chúng tôi cam kết mạnh mẽ trong việc bảo vệ quyền riêng tư và bảo mật dữ liệu của quý vị. Chúng tôi hiểu rằng chúng tôi chỉ có thể hoàn thành sứ mệnh phân phối mã thông báo kỹ thuật số một cách công bằng cho càng nhiều người càng tốt nếu mọi người tin tưởng chúng tôi, và quyền riêng tư và bảo mật dữ liệu là yếu tố cốt lõi để có được sự tin tưởng của quý vị.
Quyền riêng tư
Chúng tôi thiết kế các sản phẩm và dịch vụ của mình với mục đích bảo vệ quyền riêng tư của quý vị. Chúng tôi thu thập dữ liệu để cải thiện sản phẩm và dịch vụ của mình. Chúng tôi sẽ luôn cho quý vị biết, trong Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này hoặc trong phiếu chấp thuận cung cấp dữ liệu cho các sản phẩm hoặc dịch vụ cụ thể, dữ liệu nào chúng tôi thu thập, lý do chúng tôi thu thập dữ liệu đó và chúng tôi làm gì với dữ liệu đó.
Bảo mật dữ liệu
Chúng tôi có đội ngũ chuyên trách để quản lý dữ liệu của quý vị và đã triển khai các biện pháp bảo vệ vật lý và điện tử để bảo vệ dữ liệu của quý vị khi truyền và lưu trữ. Tuy nhiên, không có dịch vụ nào có thể an toàn tuyệt đối. Nếu quý vị có bất kỳ mối lo ngại nào về tài khoản hoặc dữ liệu của mình, vui lòng liên hệ với chúng tôi qua
Cổng Yêu cầu
hoặc gửi thư cho chúng tôi theo địa chỉ Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 Hoa Kỳ.
5. Thông tin chúng tôi thu thập và lý do thu thập
5.1 Dữ liệu quý vị cung cấp cho chúng tôi
Với tư cách là người dùng, quý vị không bắt buộc phải cung cấp bất kỳ dữ liệu nào để truy cập Ứng dụng. Tuy nhiên, quý vị có thể phải cung cấp cho chúng tôi một số dữ liệu nhất định để sử dụng một tính năng nào đó trong Dịch vụ. Cơ sở pháp lý để xử lý dữ liệu trong các trường hợp dưới đây là sự chấp thuận của người dùng và việc thực hiện hợp đồng (cam kết cung cấp Dịch vụ của chúng tôi). Dưới đây là danh sách dữ liệu quý vị có thể cung cấp và mục đích chúng tôi có thể sử dụng dữ liệu đó:
Trong bối cảnh Ứng dụng World:
Số điện thoại.
Quý vị có thể chọn nhập số điện thoại của mình để liên kết với tài khoản của quý vị. Nếu quý vị cho phép, những người dùng khác có thể tìm thấy tài khoản của quý vị thông qua số điện thoại này. Chúng tôi có thể yêu cầu số điện thoại khi quý vị gửi yêu cầu của chủ thể dữ liệu. Cơ sở pháp lý để xử lý dữ liệu này là việc thực hiện Dịch vụ theo Điều khoản Người dùng.
Tên người dùng.
Quý vị có thể liên kết tên người dùng với địa chỉ ví của mình và thay đổi tên người dùng bất cứ lúc nào.
Ngày sinh.
Quý vị có thể tiết lộ ngày sinh của mình để đảm bảo tuân thủ các yêu cầu về giới hạn độ tuổi. Chúng tôi sẽ không bao giờ lưu trữ dữ liệu ngày sinh của quý vị mà chỉ lưu trữ giá trị tổng kiểm của dữ liệu đó và thông tin về việc quý vị có trên 18 tuổi hay không.
Phản hồi và thông tin liên lạc từ quý vị.
Những thông tin này bao gồm email, tin nhắn trò chuyện hoặc thông tin liên lạc khác mà quý vị gửi cho chúng tôi qua email hoặc các trang web mạng xã hội của bên thứ ba. Điều này có thể bao gồm việc xử lý địa chỉ email hoặc tên hồ sơ mạng xã hội nếu quý vị muốn liên lạc với chúng tôi thông qua các phương tiện đó. Chúng tôi có thể sử dụng nhà cung cấp dịch vụ bên thứ ba để tiến hành khảo sát về việc quý vị sử dụng các Dịch vụ của chúng tôi. Cơ sở pháp lý để xử lý dữ liệu này là việc thực hiện Dịch vụ theo Điều khoản Người dùng.
Danh bạ sổ địa chỉ.
Quý vị có thể cung cấp cho Ứng dụng quyền truy cập vào sổ địa chỉ của mình để kích hoạt tính năng giúp quý vị dễ dàng tìm và tương tác với những người dùng khác có thể có trong sổ địa chỉ của quý vị. Cơ sở pháp lý để xử lý dữ liệu này là lợi ích hợp pháp của chủ thể được tìm thấy trong Ứng dụng và lợi ích của người dùng chia sẻ trong việc tìm kiếm liên hệ của mình trong Ứng dụng.
Xin lưu ý:
Quý vị có trách nhiệm đảm bảo việc chia sẻ thông tin liên hệ của mình tuân thủ luật hiện hành. Điều này có thể yêu cầu quý vị phải được sự cho phép của các liên hệ của mình và quý vị không được chia sẻ với TFH bất kỳ chi tiết liên hệ nào từ người khác mà không có sự chấp thuận rõ ràng của họ. Quý vị có thể thay đổi ý định và tắt quyền truy cập của chúng tôi vào danh bạ bất cứ lúc nào trong cài đặt thiết bị. Nếu quý vị chọn nhập danh bạ trong sổ địa chỉ của thiết bị vào Ứng dụng để tìm hiểu xem những liên hệ nào của quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ hoặc mời họ tham gia sử dụng Dịch vụ cùng quý vị, chúng tôi sẽ định kỳ đồng bộ các số điện thoại trong danh bạ của quý vị với những số đó và địa chỉ ví tương ứng do những người dùng khác cung cấp trên máy chủ của chúng tôi.
Thông tin vị trí
. Quý vị có thể quyết định bật dịch vụ dựa trên vị trí (chẳng hạn như một tính năng cho phép quý vị tìm kiếm Bên vận hành Orb gần quý vị). Chỉ khi có sự chấp thuận cụ thể của quý vị thì chúng tôi mới có thể thu thập thông tin về vị trí của quý vị thông qua GPS để cho phép dịch vụ dựa trên vị trí hiển thị cho quý vị một Orb gần quý vị. Quý vị có thể thay đổi quyền truy cập bất kỳ lúc nào trong phần cài đặt thiết bị. Nếu quý vị không ở Hàn Quốc, chúng tôi cũng có thể lưu trữ vị trí gần đúng của quý vị không liên kết với tài khoản Ứng dụng World của quý vị. Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu này để cải thiện dịch vụ của mình, đặc biệt bao gồm nhưng không giới hạn ở việc lựa chọn các địa điểm Orb.
Nền tảng P2P
. Nếu quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ Nền tảng P2P (khi khả dụng) cho phép quý vị mua mã thông báo kỹ thuật số từ những người dùng khác, thì chúng tôi có thể thu thập thêm thông tin như địa chỉ ví, thông tin liên hệ (tức là số điện thoại) và số tài khoản liên quan đến giao dịch (chẳng hạn như số M-PESA của quý vị). Chúng tôi ghi lại dữ liệu giao dịch trong quá trình cung cấp Dịch vụ Nền tảng P2P. Chúng tôi cũng có thể thu thập thông tin bổ sung để tuân thủ các yêu cầu KYC liên quan.
Siêu dữ liệu thiết bị.
Nếu quý vị đang sử dụng Ứng dụng, chúng tôi sẽ thu thập siêu dữ liệu từ thiết bị của quý vị để đảm bảo Ứng dụng hoạt động bình thường và quý vị không vi phạm Điều khoản và Điều kiện của chúng tôi. Thông tin được thu thập bao gồm mã định danh thiết bị và địa chỉ IP.
Dữ liệu World ID thiết bị.
Chúng tôi cũng xử lý siêu dữ liệu thiết bị của quý vị để tính toán dấu vân tay duy nhất của thiết bị. Giá trị băm của dấu vân tay này đóng vai trò là tín hiệu chứng minh tính duy nhất của World ID thiết bị của quý vị.
Trong bối cảnh xử lý Dữ liệu Kinh doanh:
Họ và tên.
Chúng tôi có thể xử lý thông tin họ và tên của quý vị để đảm bảo lợi ích hợp pháp của việc duy trì và quản lý mối quan hệ kinh doanh với quý vị.
Địa chỉ email.
Quý vị cũng có thể cung cấp email của mình để đăng ký vào danh sách gửi thư của chúng tôi để luôn được cập nhật về dự án Worldcoin. Chúng tôi có thể yêu cầu email của quý vị khi quý vị gửi yêu cầu của chủ thể dữ liệu. Chúng tôi có thể xử lý thông tin địa chỉ email của quý vị để đảm bảo lợi ích hợp pháp của việc duy trì và quản lý mối quan hệ kinh doanh với quý vị.
Số điện thoại.
Chúng tôi có thể xử lý thông tin số điện thoại của quý vị để đảm bảo lợi ích hợp pháp của việc duy trì và quản lý mối quan hệ kinh doanh với quý vị.
Dữ liệu Doanh nghiệp
. Nếu quý vị có mối quan hệ kinh doanh với chúng tôi (chẳng hạn như nếu quý vị là Bên vận hành Orb hoặc nhà cung cấp), thì chúng tôi có thể yêu cầu thông tin như tên, địa chỉ gửi thư, email, số điện thoại, địa chỉ ví và các tài liệu khác (chẳng hạn như căn cước công dân của quý vị) nhằm thúc đẩy mối quan hệ kinh doanh đó và để đáp ứng nghĩa vụ hiểu biết khách hàng của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi có thể sử dụng các dịch vụ của bên thứ ba, chẳng hạn như Onfido, để giúp chúng tôi thu thập và xem xét thông tin và tài liệu nêu trên nhằm đáp ứng nghĩa vụ xác minh danh tính khách hàng.
Dữ liệu hồ sơ ứng tuyển
. Nếu quý vị muốn làm việc cho chúng tôi, quý vị phải gửi cho chúng tôi hồ sơ ứng tuyển của quý vị, bao gồm thư ứng tuyển và CV cũng như thông tin cá nhân mà quý vị muốn tiết lộ.
Quý vị có thể tìm hiểu cơ sở pháp lý để xử lý cho từng hoạt động xử lý dữ liệu nêu trên chi tiết tại
PHỤ LỤC I – Cơ sở pháp lý cho các hoạt động xử lý dữ liệu của Tools for Humanity
ở cuối Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này.
5.2 Dữ liệu chúng tôi thu thập từ các nguồn bên thứ ba
Tùy từng thời điểm, chúng tôi có thể thu thập thông tin về quý vị từ các nguồn của bên thứ ba sau:
Dữ liệu blockchain
. Chúng tôi có thể phân tích dữ liệu blockchain công khai để đảm bảo các bên sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi không tham gia vào hoạt động bất hợp pháp hoặc bị cấm theo Điều khoản Người dùng, đồng thời phân tích xu hướng giao dịch cho mục đích nghiên cứu và phát triển.
Dịch vụ xác minh danh tính
. Chúng tôi có thể thu thập thông tin từ các dịch vụ bên thứ ba sử dụng dữ liệu của quý vị để xác minh danh tính của quý vị nếu luật pháp yêu cầu (chẳng hạn như các yêu cầu hiện hành về xác minh danh tính khách hàng). Để làm rõ, chúng tôi
không
sử dụng dữ liệu sinh trắc học của quý vị khi xác minh danh tính của quý vị theo yêu cầu của pháp luật.
Cơ sở dữ liệu nhân tài
. Chúng tôi có thể thu thập dữ liệu từ nhiều nguồn khác nhau để đưa ra lời mời làm việc cho những cá nhân tài năng.
5.3 Dữ liệu chúng tôi thu thập tự động
Nếu được luật hiện hành cho phép, chúng tôi có thể tự động thu thập một số loại dữ liệu nhất định khi quý vị tương tác với Dịch vụ của chúng tôi. Thông tin này giúp chúng tôi giải quyết các vấn đề hỗ trợ khách hàng, cải thiện hiệu suất Dịch vụ, cung cấp cho quý vị trải nghiệm đơn giản hóa và cá nhân hóa, đồng thời bảo mật thông tin xác thực Tài khoản của quý vị. Thông tin được thu thập tự động bao gồm:
Mã định danh trực tuyến:
Vị trí địa lý và thông tin theo dõi (xem ở trên), hệ điều hành máy tính hoặc điện thoại di động, tên và phiên bản trình duyệt web cùng với địa chỉ IP. Trong một số trường hợp rất hạn chế, những dữ liệu này cũng được sử dụng cho hệ thống phát hiện gian lận và luồng tài chính bất hợp pháp của chúng tôi. Chúng cũng giúp mang lại trải nghiệm ổn định và ngăn chặn gian lận khi sử dụng phần mềm của chúng tôi.
Dữ liệu Sử dụng:
Dữ liệu xác thực, câu hỏi bảo mật và các dữ liệu khác được thu thập thông qua cookie và các công nghệ tương tự.
Cookie
: các tệp dữ liệu nhỏ được lưu trữ trên ổ cứng hoặc bộ nhớ trong thiết bị giúp chúng tôi cải thiện Dịch vụ và trải nghiệm của quý vị, xác định các lĩnh vực và tính năng nào của Dịch vụ là phổ biến, và đếm số lượt truy cập. Để biết cơ sở pháp lý về việc xử lý các dữ liệu đó, vui lòng tham khảo
Chính sách Cookie
của chúng tôi, trong đó giải thích các loại cookie khác nhau mà chúng tôi đang sử dụng.
Tương tự, Ứng dụng thu thập thông tin nhằm mục đích khắc phục sự cố và cải tiến. Chúng tôi sử dụng các dịch vụ bên thứ ba, chẳng hạn như Segment.io hoặc PostHog, để xem thông tin tổng hợp về cách sử dụng và tương tác của người dùng cuối. Nếu có thể, chúng tôi thực hiện các bước để giảm thiểu hoặc che giấu thông tin gửi đến bên thứ ba (chẳng hạn như mã hóa dữ liệu).
5.4 Dữ liệu ẩn danh và tổng hợp
Ẩn danh hóa là một kỹ thuật xử lý dữ liệu làm cho dữ liệu không còn được coi là dữ liệu cá nhân, vì sau khi được ẩn danh, dữ liệu không thể liên kết với một cá nhân cụ thể nữa. Ví dụ về dữ liệu ẩn danh bao gồm:
Dữ liệu giao dịch
Dữ liệu luồng nhấp chuột
Chỉ số hiệu suất
Các chỉ báo về gian lận (mặc dù dữ liệu cá nhân cũng được sử dụng cho mục đích này)
Chúng tôi cũng tổng hợp dữ liệu, kết hợp một lượng lớn thông tin lại với nhau để dữ liệu không còn xác định hoặc tham chiếu đến một cá nhân cụ thể nữa. Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu ẩn danh hoặc dữ liệu tổng hợp cho mục đích kinh doanh, chẳng hạn như hiểu nhu cầu và hành vi của người dùng, cải thiện Dịch vụ, thực hiện phân tích kinh doanh và tiếp thị, phát hiện các mối đe dọa bảo mật và đào tạo thuật toán.
Cơ sở pháp lý để xử lý dữ liệu được đề cập ở trên là lợi ích hợp pháp của một ứng dụng hoặc trang web đang hoạt động, thông tin chuyên sâu kinh doanh và phòng chống gian lận.
6. Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu thu thập như thế nào
6.1 Mô tả chung
Chúng tôi phải có lý do hợp lệ (hoặc “cơ sở hợp pháp để xử lý”) để sử dụng thông tin cá nhân của quý vị. Trong một số trường hợp, việc sử dụng thông tin cá nhân không cần phải có sự chấp thuận trước của quý vị. Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu của quý vị cho các mục đích sau:
Để cung cấp và duy trì các sản phẩm và dịch vụ của chúng tôi theo Điều khoản Người dùng. Các dịch vụ này bao gồm:
Ứng dụng trong đó người dùng có thể quản lý World ID và mã thông báo kỹ thuật số của họ cũng như tìm hiểu về tiền điện tử nói chung và dự án Worldcoin nói riêng;
Ứng dụng Operator, qua đó Bên vận hành Orb có thể quản lý và giám sát các Orb của mình cũng như số liệu thống kê của chúng;
Nền tảng P2P trong đó chúng tôi kết nối người dùng với các đại lý (không áp dụng cho người dùng được thành lập hoặc cư trú tại Đức hoặc có nơi cư trú thường xuyên hoặc văn phòng đăng ký tại Đức);
Để cải thiện và phát triển sản phẩm và dịch vụ của chúng tôi, bao gồm cả việc gỡ lỗi và sửa lỗi trong Dịch vụ.
Để tiến hành nghiên cứu khoa học dữ liệu.
Để phân tích việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi nhằm hỗ trợ quý vị tốt hơn.
Để cho phép quý vị công bố thông tin trên blockchain nhằm chứng minh tính duy nhất của quý vị.
Để sử dụng địa chỉ ví của quý vị để gửi cho quý vị mã thông báo kỹ thuật số mà chúng tôi hỗ trợ.
Để tuân thủ luật hiện hành như luật phòng chống rửa tiền và các lệnh trừng phạt. Điều này đòi hỏi:
Sử dụng địa chỉ IP của quý vị để chặn những cá nhân mà quốc gia của họ không cho phép họ truy cập Dịch vụ;
Để phản hồi các yêu cầu của chủ thể dữ liệu theo luật bảo vệ dữ liệu hiện hành như yêu cầu truy cập hoặc xóa;
Để theo dõi các luồng tài chính có khả năng bất hợp pháp, ví dụ như từ các ví nằm trong danh sách đen; và
Để tuân thủ luật hiện hành, chẳng hạn như các quy định chống lại nội dung bất hợp pháp.
Để xử lý các yêu cầu, khiếu nại và thắc mắc về dịch vụ khách hàng của quý vị.
Để giải quyết tranh chấp, khắc phục sự cố và thực thi các thỏa thuận giữa chúng tôi và quý vị, bao gồm Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này và Điều khoản Người dùng.
Để liên hệ với quý vị về các bản cập nhật của Dịch vụ.
6.2 Thông tin xác thực
TFH cho phép quý vị lưu trữ một số thông tin xác thực nhất định cục bộ trên thiết bị của quý vị để chia sẻ trong hạ tầng không tiết lộ thông tin (zero knowledge) của giao thức World ID (“Thông tin Xác thực”). Trong bối cảnh Thông tin Xác thực, chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu này theo những cách sau đây:
Chúng tôi kiểm tra tính hợp lệ của thông tin xác thực của quý vị (trong trường hợp là hộ chiếu, thông tin này sẽ được cung cấp thông qua chứng nhận gốc từ quốc gia của quý vị).
Chúng tôi xác thực quý vị là chủ sở hữu hợp pháp của thông tin xác thực (đối với hộ chiếu, việc này thực hiện trực tiếp trên thiết bị của quý vị thông qua ảnh chụp khuôn mặt (selfie) của quý vị mà không bao giờ được lưu trữ).
Chúng tôi mã hóa, ký và lưu trữ dữ liệu thông tin xác thực trong một môi trường an toàn trên thiết bị của quý vị.
Chúng tôi không bao giờ có quyền truy cập thông tin cá nhân có trong thông tin xác thực của quý vị.
Sau đó, quý vị có thể chia sẻ thông tin này một cách chọn lọc với các bên liên quan thông qua các biện pháp bảo vệ của giao thức World ID (ví dụ: quý vị có thể chứng minh rằng quý vị ít nhất 18 tuổi mà không cần tiết lộ tuổi chính xác của quý vị hoặc quý vị là ai).
Đối với hộ chiếu, TFH chỉ duy trì một phần ẩn danh của giá trị băm của chữ ký mã hóa duy nhất từ hộ chiếu của quý vị để đảm bảo rằng mỗi hộ chiếu chỉ có thể được xác minh một lần.
Việc xử lý này dựa trên sự chấp thuận của quý vị và chúng tôi không bao giờ có quyền truy cập dữ liệu cá nhân từ hộ chiếu được lưu trữ trên thiết bị của quý vị. Quý vị có thể xóa dữ liệu này khỏi điện thoại của mình bằng cách xóa Ứng dụng World.
6.3 Dữ liệu World ID
World ID của quý vị (tức là số bí mật cần thiết để sử dụng nó) chỉ được lưu trữ trên thiết bị của quý vị (trong trường hợp quý vị có bản sao lưu, một bản sao mã hóa sẽ tồn tại trong bản sao lưu của quý vị). Cả TFH và bất kỳ ai khác đều không có quyền truy cập World ID của quý vị. Quý vị có thể sử dụng World ID của mình một cách ẩn danh. Mỗi lần quý vị sử dụng World ID với một ứng dụng mới, ứng dụng chỉ nhận được số dùng một lần (“Nullifier”) và không tiết lộ World ID của quý vị. Điều này được kích hoạt thông qua Bằng chứng Không tiết lộ Thông tin (Zero Knowledge Proof) (quý vị chỉ chứng minh rằng quý vị có World ID đã được xác minh nhưng không phải World ID cụ thể nào) và đảm bảo rằng World ID của quý vị không thể sử dụng để truy dấu quý vị trên các ứng dụng. Điều này có nghĩa là World ID không phải là ID người dùng chung cho internet.
Bằng chứng World ID hoạt động thông qua một giao thức mở truy cập vào Cây Merkle công khai của các giá trị băm của các World ID đã được xác minh. World ID không phải là dịch vụ tập trung mà là một giao thức mà bất kỳ ai cũng có thể truy cập. Chúng tôi cung cấp API để tạo điều kiện truy cập vào Cây Merkle và Bằng chứng World ID nhưng không bao giờ nhận bất kỳ dữ liệu cá nhân nào trong bối cảnh này.
Điều quan trọng cần lưu ý là chúng tôi cũng không xử lý bất kỳ dữ liệu nào liên quan đến World ID của quý vị mà cho phép chúng tôi xác định danh tính của quý vị. Tất cả dữ liệu cá nhân được xử lý trong bối cảnh Ứng dụng World, đặc biệt là địa chỉ ví và dữ liệu giao dịch của quý vị được chủ ý thiết kế để hủy liên kết khỏi dữ liệu World ID.
7. Chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu của quý vị ở đâu
7.1 Chuyển dữ liệu.
Khi quý vị cung cấp dữ liệu cho chúng tôi, dữ liệu đó có thể được chuyển, lưu trữ hoặc xử lý ở một địa điểm bên ngoài nơi dữ liệu của quý vị được thu thập ban đầu. Quốc gia nơi dữ liệu của quý vị được chuyển, lưu trữ hoặc xử lý có thể không có cùng luật bảo vệ dữ liệu như quốc gia nơi quý vị cung cấp dữ liệu ban đầu.
Chúng tôi nỗ lực hết sức để tuân thủ các nguyên tắc tại mỗi khu vực pháp lý liên quan đến luật về quyền riêng tư. Chúng tôi chỉ chia sẻ dữ liệu với các bên xử lý dữ liệu bên ngoài khu vực pháp lý của quý vị nếu việc chuyển dữ liệu như vậy là hợp pháp và nếu chúng tôi tin tưởng rằng bên xử lý dữ liệu sẽ bảo vệ dữ liệu của quý vị theo yêu cầu của luật hiện hành và theo các tiêu chuẩn của chúng tôi.
7.2 Rủi ro chuyển dữ liệu
Dưới đây là danh sách các rủi ro có thể phát sinh nếu chúng tôi chuyển dữ liệu của quý vị đến Hoa Kỳ, Liên minh Châu Âu hoặc một quốc gia khác. Dưới đây chúng tôi cũng tóm tắt cách chúng tôi giảm thiểu các rủi ro tương ứng.
Mặc dù chúng tôi nỗ lực hết sức để đảm bảo các nhà thầu phụ của mình có nghĩa vụ theo hợp đồng phải bảo vệ dữ liệu của quý vị một cách đầy đủ, nhưng các nhà thầu phụ này có thể không buộc phải tuân theo luật bảo mật dữ liệu của quốc gia quý vị. Nếu các nhà thầu phụ xử lý dữ liệu của quý vị một cách bất hợp pháp mà không được phép, thì quý vị có thể gặp khó khăn khi khẳng định quyền riêng tư của mình đối với nhà thầu phụ đó. Chúng tôi giảm thiểu rủi ro này khi chúng tôi ký kết các thỏa thuận xử lý dữ liệu nghiêm ngặt với các nhà thầu phụ, yêu cầu họ phải bảo vệ dữ liệu ở cấp độ GDPR và đáp ứng yêu cầu của chủ thể dữ liệu.
Có thể luật bảo mật dữ liệu ở quốc gia của quý vị không nhất quán với luật bảo mật dữ liệu ở Hoa Kỳ hoặc ở EU. Chúng tôi luôn cố gắng tuân thủ tiêu chuẩn bảo vệ dữ liệu cao nhất áp dụng cho chúng tôi.
Dữ liệu của quý vị có thể được truy cập bởi các viên chức và cơ quan chức năng của chính phủ. Trong những trường hợp đó, chúng tôi cam kết sẽ phản đối mọi yêu cầu truy cập thông tin không hợp lệ, quá rộng hoặc bất hợp pháp của chính phủ tại tòa án. Chúng tôi sử dụng mã hóa nâng cao để ngăn chặn truy cập trái phép.
Xin lưu ý rằng danh sách này chỉ đưa ra các ví dụ nhưng chưa bao gồm tất cả các rủi ro có thể xảy ra với quý vị.
7.3 Khung bảo mật dữ liệu để chuyển dữ liệu tại Hoa Kỳ
TFH tuân thủ Khung Bảo mật Dữ liệu EU-Hoa Kỳ (DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ), Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và Khung Bảo mật Dữ liệu Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ (DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ) theo quy định của Bộ Thương mại Hoa Kỳ. TFH đã chứng nhận với Bộ Thương mại Hoa Kỳ rằng công ty tuân thủ các Nguyên tắc về Khung Bảo mật Dữ liệu EU-Hoa Kỳ (Nguyên tắc DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ) liên quan đến việc xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân nhận được từ Liên minh Châu Âu dựa trên DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và từ Vương quốc Anh (và Gibraltar) dựa trên Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ. TFH đã chứng nhận với Bộ Thương mại Hoa Kỳ rằng công ty tuân thủ các Nguyên tắc về Khung Bảo mật Dữ liệu Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ (Nguyên tắc DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ) liên quan đến việc xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân nhận được từ Thụy Sĩ dựa trên DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ. Nếu có bất kỳ xung đột nào giữa các điều khoản trong Thông báo về Khung Bảo mật Dữ liệu này và Nguyên tắc DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và/hoặc Nguyên tắc DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ, thì Nguyên tắc sẽ được ưu tiên áp dụng. Để tìm hiểu thêm về chương trình Khung Bảo mật Dữ liệu (DPF) và xem chứng nhận của chúng tôi, vui lòng truy cập
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
TFH chịu trách nhiệm xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân mà mình nhận được theo DPF và sau đó chuyển cho bên thứ ba hoạt động với tư cách là đại lý thay mặt TFH. TFH tuân thủ các Nguyên tắc DPF đối với mọi hoạt động chuyển dữ liệu cá nhân từ EU, Vương quốc Anh và Thụy Sĩ, bao gồm các điều khoản về trách nhiệm chuyển dữ liệu.
Ủy ban Thương mại Liên bang có thẩm quyền đối với việc TFH tuân thủ DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ, Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ. Trong một số trường hợp nhất định, TFH có thể được yêu cầu tiết lộ dữ liệu cá nhân để đáp ứng các yêu cầu hợp pháp của cơ quan công quyền, bao gồm việc đáp ứng các yêu cầu về an ninh quốc gia hoặc thực thi pháp luật.
Để tuân thủ DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ, TFH cam kết giải quyết các khiếu nại liên quan đến Nguyên tắc DPF về việc chúng tôi thu thập và sử dụng thông tin cá nhân của quý vị. Cư dân EU, Vương quốc Anh và Thụy Sĩ có thắc mắc hoặc khiếu nại liên quan đến cách chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân nhận được dựa trên DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ trước hết nên liên hệ với TFH theo địa chỉ dpo@worldcoin.org
Để tuân thủ DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ, TFH cam kết hợp tác và tuân thủ theo lời khuyên của hội đồng do các cơ quan bảo vệ dữ liệu EU (DPA) và Văn phòng Ủy viên Thông tin Vương quốc Anh (ICO) và Cơ quan Quản lý Gibraltar (GRA) và Ủy viên Thông tin và Bảo vệ Dữ liệu Liên bang Thụy Sĩ (FDPIC) thành lập liên quan đến các khiếu nại chưa được giải quyết về cách chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân nhận được dựa trên DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và Phần mở rộng cho Vương quốc Anh đối với DPF EU-Hoa Kỳ và DPF Thụy Sĩ-Hoa Kỳ.
Đối với các khiếu nại liên quan đến việc tuân thủ DPF chưa được giải quyết thông qua bất kỳ cơ chế DPF nào khác, trong một số điều kiện nhất định, quý vị có thể yêu cầu phân xử trọng tài mang tính ràng buộc. Quý vị có thể tìm thấy thông tin chi tiết hơn trên trang web chính thức của DPF.
8. Khi nào chúng tôi chia sẻ dữ liệu của quý vị
Chúng tôi sẽ không bao giờ bán dữ liệu của quý vị
.
Khi chúng tôi chia sẻ dữ liệu của quý vị ra bên ngoài tổ chức của mình, chúng tôi sẽ luôn:
Chia sẻ theo cách an toàn hợp lý;
Thực hiện các biện pháp để đảm bảo rằng thông tin được xử lý theo cách phù hợp với cam kết của chúng tôi về quyền riêng tư của quý vị; và
Cấm các công ty khác sử dụng dữ liệu đó cho mục đích riêng của họ.
Chúng tôi chia sẻ dữ liệu của quý vị theo những cách hạn chế sau:
Với Worldcoin Foundation:
chúng tôi có thể đóng vai trò là bên xử lý của Worldcoin Foundation để thu thập dữ liệu cá nhân thay mặt cho Worldcoin (vui lòng kiểm tra thông báo quyền riêng tư của Worldcoin để biết thêm thông tin).
Trong tổ chức của chúng tôi:
Chúng tôi chỉ tiết lộ dữ liệu cho các thành viên trong nhóm cần có quyền truy cập để thực hiện nhiệm vụ và công việc của họ. Chúng tôi chỉ tiết lộ lượng dữ liệu cần thiết để thực hiện các nhiệm vụ và công việc cụ thể và có hệ thống kiểm soát truy cập chặt chẽ.
Với người bán và nhà cung cấp dịch vụ bên ngoài tổ chức của chúng tôi:
Chúng tôi chỉ tiết lộ dữ liệu cho các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ mà chúng tôi tin tưởng để xử lý dữ liệu và cung cấp Dịch vụ cho quý vị. Chúng tôi chỉ tiết lộ dữ liệu với các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ xác minh danh tính nếu được Luật pháp yêu cầu (tức là yêu cầu xác minh danh tính khách hàng).
Các loại nhà cung cấp dịch vụ như vậy bao gồm:
Nhà cung cấp dịch vụ đám mây (tất cả các loại dữ liệu)
Nhà cung cấp SaaS; chúng tôi sử dụng các sản phẩm SaaS trong các danh mục sau:
Quản lý cơ sở dữ liệu và cơ sở hạ tầng
Bảo mật dữ liệu
Tuyển dụng
Truyền thông
Khảo sát
KYC/KYB, tức là kiểm tra tài liệu chính thức
Quản lý yêu cầu của chủ thể dữ liệu
Hỗ trợ kỹ thuật
Hỗ trợ người dùng
Chuyên gia bên ngoài
Chuyên viên phát triển phần mềm
Chuyên gia pháp lý
Cố vấn thuế
Ngân hàng
Nhà cung cấp dịch vụ gắn nhãn (chỉ khi có biện pháp bảo vệ đặc biệt)
Dịch vụ kiểm tra lý lịch cho ứng viên và Bên vận hành Orb
Với cơ quan thực thi pháp luật, viên chức hoặc bên thứ ba khác:
Chúng tôi có thể tiết lộ dữ liệu của quý vị để tuân thủ luật hiện hành và đáp ứng các yêu cầu pháp lý bắt buộc. Chúng tôi sẽ cân nhắc cẩn thận từng yêu cầu để xác định xem yêu cầu đó có tuân thủ luật pháp hay không và nếu cần thiết, chúng tôi có thể phản đối những yêu cầu không hợp lệ, quá rộng hoặc bất hợp pháp. Chúng tôi có thể chia sẻ dữ liệu cá nhân với cảnh sát và các cơ quan chính phủ khác khi chúng tôi có lý do chính đáng để tin rằng điều đó là cần thiết nhằm tuân thủ luật pháp, quy định hoặc quy trình hoặc nghĩa vụ pháp lý khác.
Chúng tôi có thể chia sẻ thông tin cá nhân của quý vị nếu chúng tôi tin rằng hành động của quý vị không phù hợp với Điều khoản Người dùng của chúng tôi, nếu chúng tôi tin rằng quý vị đã vi phạm pháp luật hoặc nếu chúng tôi tin rằng điều đó là cần thiết để bảo vệ quyền, tài sản và sự an toàn của chúng tôi, người dùng của chúng tôi, công chúng hoặc những người khác.
Chúng tôi có thể chia sẻ thông tin cá nhân của quý vị với luật sư và cố vấn chuyên môn khác khi cần thiết để xin tư vấn hoặc bảo vệ và quản lý lợi ích kinh doanh của chúng tôi.
Chúng tôi có thể chia sẻ thông tin cá nhân của quý vị liên quan đến hoặc trong quá trình đàm phán về bất kỳ hoạt động sáp nhập, bán tài sản công ty, tài trợ hoặc mua lại toàn bộ hoặc một phần doanh nghiệp của chúng tôi bởi một công ty khác.
Dữ liệu, bao gồm thông tin cá nhân của quý vị, có thể được chia sẻ giữa các công ty mẹ, công ty liên kết, công ty con hiện tại và tương lai của chúng tôi cũng như các công ty khác cùng chung quyền sở hữu và kiểm soát.
Chúng tôi có thể chia sẻ thông tin cá nhân của quý vị khi có sự chấp thuận hoặc theo chỉ đạo của quý vị.
9. Dữ liệu của quý vị được ghi lại trên blockchain công khai như thế nào
Thông tin giao dịch liên quan đến việc quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ có thể được ghi lại trên một blockchain công khai.
Xin lưu ý:
Blockchain là sổ cái công khai về các giao dịch được duy trì trên các mạng phi tập trung do bên thứ ba vận hành và không do Worldcoin kiểm soát hoặc vận hành. Do tính chất công khai và không thể thay đổi của sổ cái blockchain, chúng tôi không thể đảm bảo khả năng sửa đổi, xóa hoặc kiểm soát việc tiết lộ dữ liệu được tải lên và lưu trữ trên blockchain
10. Chúng tôi sử dụng cookie như thế nào
Chúng tôi sử dụng cookie để giúp Dịch vụ hoạt động tốt hơn. Ngoài cookie, chúng tôi có thể sử dụng các công nghệ tương tự khác, như đèn hiệu web, để theo dõi người dùng Dịch vụ. Đèn hiệu web (còn gọi là “gif trong suốt”) là những đồ họa nhỏ có mã định danh duy nhất, có chức năng tương tự như cookie.
Chính sách Cookie
của chúng tôi, được đưa vào đây bằng cách viện dẫn.
Chúng tôi cũng sử dụng Google Analytics. Thông tin thêm về cách Google sử dụng dữ liệu của quý vị khi quý vị sử dụng các trang web và ứng dụng của đối tác:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Bằng việc sử dụng Dịch vụ, quý vị đồng ý cho chúng tôi lưu trữ và truy cập cookie và dữ liệu khác trên máy tính hoặc thiết bị di động của quý vị và sử dụng Google Analytics liên quan đến các hoạt động đó. Vui lòng đọc thông tin tại liên kết được cung cấp để hiểu rõ quý vị đang chấp thuận những gì.
11. Chúng tôi lưu giữ dữ liệu của quý vị trong bao lâu?
Trừ khi luật hiện hành có quy định khác, chúng tôi sẽ lưu giữ dữ liệu của quý vị trong thời gian cần thiết hợp lý để cung cấp Dịch vụ cho quý vị, phục vụ mục đích kinh doanh hợp pháp của chúng tôi và tuân thủ các nghĩa vụ pháp lý và quy định của chúng tôi. Nếu quý vị đóng tài khoản với chúng tôi, chúng tôi sẽ xóa dữ liệu tài khoản của quý vị trong vòng một tháng; nếu không, chúng tôi sẽ xóa dữ liệu tài khoản của quý vị sau 2 năm không hoạt động. Nếu pháp luật yêu cầu, chúng tôi sẽ tiếp tục lưu giữ dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị khi cần thiết để tuân thủ các nghĩa vụ pháp lý và quy định của chúng tôi, bao gồm giám sát, phát hiện và ngăn chặn gian lận, cũng như các nghĩa vụ về thuế, kế toán và báo cáo tài chính.
Xin lưu ý:
Blockchain là mạng phi tập trung của bên thứ ba mà chúng tôi không kiểm soát hoặc vận hành. Do tính chất công khai và không thể thay đổi của công nghệ blockchain, chúng tôi không thể sửa đổi, xóa hoặc kiểm soát việc tiết lộ dữ liệu được lưu trữ trên blockchain.
12. Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này khác biệt như thế nào đối với trẻ em và thanh thiếu niên
Những người dưới 18 tuổi không được phép sử dụng Dịch vụ và chúng tôi không cố ý thu thập dữ liệu từ những người dưới 18 tuổi. Nếu quý vị tin rằng con quý vị dưới 18 tuổi đã truy cập vào Dịch vụ mà không có sự cho phép của quý vị, hãy yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu của con quý vị bằng cách liên hệ với chúng tôi thông qua
Cổng Yêu cầu
.
Nếu chúng tôi biết rằng chúng tôi đã thu thập dữ liệu về trẻ em dưới 18 tuổi, chúng tôi sẽ xóa dữ liệu đó nhanh nhất có thể. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện các biện pháp như triển khai mô hình AI phát hiện độ tuổi tự động, hướng dẫn bên vận hành và tự xác nhận để hạn chế chỉ những người từ 18 tuổi trở lên mới được sử dụng Dịch vụ. Chúng tôi không tiếp thị sản phẩm hoặc dịch vụ cho trẻ em.
13. Cách liên hệ với chúng tôi về Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này
Quý vị có thể chọn xóa dữ liệu của mình trong Ứng dụng ở menu Cài đặt. Nếu quý vị có thắc mắc hoặc lo ngại liên quan đến Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này, muốn thực thi các quyền của mình hoặc liên hệ với Chuyên viên Bảo vệ Dữ liệu (DPO) của chúng tôi, vui lòng gửi yêu cầu của quý vị thông qua
Cổng Yêu cầu
hoặc gửi thư cho chúng tôi theo địa chỉ Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 Hoa Kỳ hoặc
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
. Chúng tôi phản hồi mọi yêu cầu nhận được từ những người muốn thực thi quyền bảo vệ dữ liệu của mình theo luật bảo vệ dữ liệu hiện hành. Quý vị cũng có thể xóa dữ liệu của mình từ trong Ứng dụng World.
Nếu quý vị có thắc mắc chưa được giải đáp về quyền riêng tư hoặc việc sử dụng dữ liệu mà chúng tôi chưa giải quyết thỏa đáng, vui lòng liên hệ với cơ quan quản lý bảo vệ dữ liệu tại khu vực pháp lý của quý vị. Nếu quý vị cư trú tại EU, quý vị có thể tìm cơ quan quản lý bảo vệ dữ liệu của mình tại
đây
.
14. Quyền của quý vị
Các quyền này được áp dụng với điều kiện chúng tôi có thể xác định được người yêu cầu trong cơ sở dữ liệu của mình và với điều kiện chúng tôi không vi phạm quyền của chủ thể dữ liệu khác khi thực hiện các quyền của người yêu cầu:
Quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi cung cấp thông tin về dữ liệu cá nhân mà chúng tôi xử lý liên quan đến quý vị bất kỳ lúc nào. Quý vị có quyền nhận từ chúng tôi dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị.
Quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi ngay lập tức chỉnh sửa dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị nếu dữ liệu đó không chính xác.
Quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi xóa dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị. Các điều kiện tiên quyết này quy định cụ thể về quyền xóa nếu dữ liệu cá nhân không còn cần thiết cho mục đích mà chúng được thu thập hoặc xử lý theo cách khác, với điều kiện là yêu cầu xóa tuân theo luật hiện hành được đáp ứng (ví dụ: luật của một số khu vực pháp lý yêu cầu chúng tôi phải lưu giữ thông tin giao dịch trong một khoảng thời gian nhất định)
Quý vị có quyền tự do rút lại sự chấp thuận của mình đối với bất kỳ việc xử lý dữ liệu nào dựa trên sự chấp thuận, hoặc phản đối việc xử lý dữ liệu nếu việc đó không dựa trên sự chấp thuận.
15. PHỤ LỤC
Dưới đây là một số phụ lục cung cấp thông tin bắt buộc theo luật định cho từng thị trường nơi chúng tôi hoạt động. Thông tin này là một phần của sự chấp thuận tùy thuộc vào khu vực cư trú của chủ thể dữ liệu. Thông tin này có thể khác với thông tin tại địa điểm của quý vị vì chúng tôi chặn một số dịch vụ nhất định ở một số khu vực pháp lý nhất định. Trong trường hợp có bất kỳ sự không nhất quán nào với nội dung trên, tuyên bố đặc thù hơn về quyền tài phán cụ thể sẽ được ưu tiên áp dụng:
Phụ lục A: Khu vực Kinh tế Châu Âu (“EEA”) và Vương quốc Anh (“UK”)
Nếu quý vị ở EEA hoặc Vương quốc Anh thì những điều sau đây áp dụng cho quý vị: Quý vị có ít nhất những quyền sau đây Quý vị có thể có thêm các quyền theo Quy định Chung về Bảo vệ Dữ liệu, Quy định EU 2016/679 ngày 27.04.2016 (“GDPR”) như được liệt kê dưới đây. Để thực thi các quyền của quý vị theo GDPR, vui lòng liên hệ với chúng tôi tại
Cổng Yêu cầu
. Ngoại trừ những trường hợp ngoại lệ, chúng tôi sẽ giải quyết yêu cầu của quý vị trong thời hạn theo luật định là một tháng. Việc sử dụng cụm từ GDPR trong mục sau cũng bao hàm GDPR của Vương Quốc Anh được chuyển theo luật pháp quốc gia Vương quốc Anh thành Đạo luật Bảo vệ Dữ liệu Vương quốc Anh năm 2018 và được duy trì như một phần của luật pháp Anh và xứ Wales, Scotland và Bắc Ireland theo hiệu lực của
mục 3
của Đạo luật (Rút khỏi) Liên minh Châu Âu năm 2018 và được sửa đổi bởi
Phụ biểu
1
của Quy định (Rời khỏi EU) năm 2019 về Bảo vệ Dữ liệu, Quyền riêng tư và Truyền thông Điện tử (Sửa đổi, v.v.) (SI 2019/419).
A.1 Các quyền theo luật định theo GDPR
Mục này được áp dụng nếu việc xử lý dữ liệu của quý vị nằm trong phạm vi áp dụng của GDPR (
ví dụ
: nếu quý vị là cư dân của EEA hoặc cư trú tại Vương quốc Anh). Quý vị có thể có các quyền bổ sung theo GDPR như được liệt kê dưới đây. Để thực thi các quyền của quý vị theo GDPR, vui lòng liên hệ với chúng tôi tại
Cổng Yêu cầu
.
Quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi cung cấp thông tin về dữ liệu cá nhân mà chúng tôi xử lý liên quan đến quý vị bất kỳ lúc nào trong phạm vi của Điều 15 GDPR.
Quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi ngay lập tức chỉnh sửa dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị nếu dữ liệu đó không chính xác.
Theo các điều kiện nêu tại Điều 17 GDPR, quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi xóa dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị. Các điều kiện tiên quyết này quy định cụ thể quyền xóa nếu dữ liệu cá nhân không còn cần thiết cho mục đích mà dữ liệu được thu thập hoặc xử lý theo cách khác, cũng như trong trường hợp xử lý bất hợp pháp, có sự phản đối hoặc có nghĩa vụ xóa theo luật Liên minh hoặc luật của Quốc gia Thành viên mà chúng tôi phải tuân thủ.
Quý vị có quyền yêu cầu chúng tôi hạn chế xử lý theo Điều 18 GDPR.
Quý vị có quyền nhận từ chúng tôi dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị mà quý vị đã cung cấp cho chúng tôi theo định dạng có cấu trúc, được sử dụng phổ biến và có thể đọc được bằng máy theo Điều 20 GDPR.
Quý vị có quyền phản đối bất kỳ lúc nào, vì lý do liên quan đến tình huống cụ thể của quý vị, đối với việc xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân liên quan đến quý vị được thực hiện trên cơ sở Điều 6 (1) câu 1 điểm f GDPR, theo Điều 21 GDPR, ngoài những lý do khác.
Quý vị có quyền liên hệ với cơ quan giám sát có thẩm quyền trong trường hợp có khiếu nại về việc xử lý dữ liệu do bên kiểm soát thực hiện. Cơ quan giám sát chịu trách nhiệm là: Văn phòng Giám sát Bảo vệ Dữ liệu Bang Bavaria (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Nếu việc xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân dựa trên sự chấp thuận của quý vị, theo Điều 7 GDPR, quý vị có quyền rút lại chấp thuận cho sử dụng dữ liệu cá nhân của mình bất kỳ lúc nào với hiệu lực trong tương lai, khi đó việc rút lại chấp thuận cũng dễ dàng như việc đưa ra chấp thuận. Xin lưu ý rằng việc rút lại chấp thuận chỉ có hiệu lực trong tương lai. Việc xử lý đã diễn ra trước khi rút lại chấp thuận sẽ không bị ảnh hưởng.
A.2 Chuyển dữ liệu
Khi chuyển dữ liệu đến một quốc gia không có quyết định về mức độ bảo vệ đầy đủ, chúng tôi sử dụng Điều khoản Hơp đồng Tiêu chuẩn của EU. Hiện tại chúng tôi chỉ chuyển dữ liệu cá nhân sang Hoa Kỳ.
Nếu việc xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân dựa trên sự chấp thuận của quý vị, theo Điều 7 GDPR, quý vị có quyền rút lại chấp thuận cho sử dụng dữ liệu cá nhân của mình bất kỳ lúc nào với hiệu lực trong tương lai, khi đó việc rút lại chấp thuận cũng dễ dàng như việc đưa ra chấp thuận. Xin lưu ý rằng việc rút lại chấp thuận chỉ có hiệu lực trong tương lai. Việc xử lý đã diễn ra trước khi rút lại chấp thuận sẽ không bị ảnh hưởng. Xin lưu ý rằng việc xử lý không dựa trên sự chấp thuận sẽ không bị ảnh hưởng khi quý vị rút lại chấp thuận.
PHỤ LỤC B: NHẬT BẢN
Nếu quý vị cư trú tại Nhật Bản, những điều sau đây cũng áp dụng cho quý vị.
B1. Thông tin liên quan đến các quy định của Nhật Bản
Chúng tôi tuân thủ luật pháp và quy định của Nhật Bản, bao gồm Đạo luật Bảo vệ Thông tin Cá nhân của Nhật Bản (“APPI”). Mục này áp dụng đối với cách chúng tôi xử lý “thông tin cá nhân” theo định nghĩa tại APPI, có giá trị ưu tiên hơn so với các quy định khác của Phiếu Chấp thuận Dữ liệu Sinh trắc học này
Chúng tôi tuân thủ luật pháp và quy định của Nhật Bản, bao gồm Đạo luật Bảo vệ Thông tin Cá nhân của Nhật Bản (“APPI”). Phần này áp dụng cho việc chúng tôi xử lý “thông tin cá nhân” như được định nghĩa trong APPI, có giá trị ưu tiên hơn so với các phần khác của Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này.
B2. Chia sẻ dữ liệu
Trừ khi được pháp luật hiện hành cho phép, chúng tôi sẽ không tiết lộ, bán, cung cấp, chia sẻ hoặc chuyển thông tin cá nhân của quý vị cho bất kỳ bên thứ ba nào.
B3. Các biện pháp kiểm soát bảo mật
Chúng tôi thực hiện các biện pháp cần thiết và phù hợp để ngăn chặn mọi rò rỉ, mất mát hoặc tổn hại đối với thông tin cá nhân của quý vị đang được xử lý và để duy trì tính bảo mật của thông tin cá nhân, chẳng hạn như bằng cách thiết lập các quy tắc xử lý thông tin cá nhân, giám sát thường xuyên việc xử lý thông tin cá nhân, đào tạo thường xuyên cho nhân viên về cách xử lý thông tin cá nhân, phòng ngừa trộm cắp hoặc mất mát thiết bị dùng để xử lý thông tin cá nhân và triển khai các biện pháp kiểm soát truy cập. Chúng tôi cũng giám sát chặt chẽ các nhà thầu và nhân viên xử lý thông tin cá nhân. Quý vị có thể tìm hiểu thêm thông tin chi tiết về các biện pháp kiểm soát bảo mật liên quan đến việc xử lý thông tin cá nhân của quý vị bằng cách liên hệ với chúng tôi thông qua
Cổng Yêu cầu
.
B4. Thông tin tham khảo về xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân ở nước ngoài
Dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị được xử lý tại EU và Hoa Kỳ.
B5. Các quyền theo luật định theo APPI
Để thực hiện các quyền được quy định trong APPI, vui lòng liên hệ với chúng tôi thông qua
Cổng Yêu cầu
.
PHỤ LỤC C: ARGENTINA
Nếu quý vị cư trú tại Cộng hòa Argentine, chúng tôi xin thông báo rằng CƠ QUAN TIẾP CẬN THÔNG TIN CÔNG CỘNG, với tư cách là Cơ quan Kiểm soát theo Luật số 25.326, có thẩm quyền giải quyết các khiếu nại và yêu cầu bồi thường do những người có quyền bị ảnh hưởng do việc không tuân thủ các quy tắc hiện hành liên quan đến bảo vệ dữ liệu cá nhân đệ trình.
Quý vị có thể liên hệ với Cơ quan này theo thông tin sau:
Địa chỉ: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
Mã bưu chính: C1067ABP
Số điện thoại: (54-11) 3988-3968
Email: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
PHỤ LỤC D: SINGAPORE
Nếu quý vị là cư dân Singapore, những điều sau đây áp dụng cho quý vị:
D1. Việc thu thập, sử dụng và tiết lộ dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị
Nếu quý vị là cư dân Singapore và với sự chấp thuận của quý vị, chúng tôi sẽ thu thập, sử dụng hoặc tiết lộ dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị cho từng mục đích được nêu trong thông báo quyền riêng tư của chúng tôi. Quý vị có thể thực thi quyền rút lại sự chấp thuận của mình bất kỳ lúc nào, nhưng xin lưu ý rằng có thể chúng tôi sẽ không tiếp tục cung cấp dịch vụ được cho quý vị tùy thuộc vào bản chất và phạm vi yêu cầu của quý vị. Xin lưu ý rằng việc rút lại sự chấp thuận không ảnh hưởng đến quyền của chúng tôi trong việc tiếp tục thu thập, sử dụng và tiết lộ dữ liệu cá nhân khi việc thu thập, sử dụng và tiết lộ mà không có sự chấp thuận đó được phép hoặc theo yêu cầu của luật pháp hiện hành.[1]
D2. Thực hiện quyền của chủ thể dữ liệu của quý vị
Quý vị có thể kiểm soát dữ liệu cá nhân mà chúng tôi đã thu thập và thực hiện bất kỳ quyền nào bằng cách liên hệ với chúng tôi thông qua
Cổng Yêu cầu
. Chúng tôi sẽ cố gắng phản hồi yêu cầu của quý vị sớm nhất có thể, thường là trong vòng 30 ngày. Chúng tôi sẽ thông báo cho quý vị trước nếu chúng tôi không thể phản hồi yêu cầu của quý vị trong vòng 30 ngày hoặc nếu chúng tôi không thể đáp ứng yêu cầu của quý vị và nêu rõ lý do.[2]
Theo quy định của pháp luật, chúng tôi có thể thu phí hành chính để thực hiện yêu cầu của quý vị.
D3. Chuyển dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị sang các quốc gia khác
Nếu quý vị là cư dân Singapore và chúng tôi đã thu thập dữ liệu của quý vị, chúng tôi cũng có thể chuyển dữ liệu của quý vị ra khỏi Singapore theo từng thời điểm. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi sẽ luôn đảm bảo dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị tiếp tục nhận được tiêu chuẩn bảo vệ ít nhất phải tương đương với tiêu chuẩn được quy định tại Đạo luật Bảo vệ Dữ liệu Cá nhân Singapore năm 2012, chẳng hạn như thông qua việc sử dụng Điều khoản Hợp đồng Mẫu ASEAN.
PHỤ LỤC E – HÀN QUỐC
Phụ lục dành cho Chủ thể Dữ liệu tại Hàn Quốc này giải thích các hoạt động của chúng tôi liên quan đến thông tin cá nhân mà chúng tôi xử lý liên quan đến mối quan hệ giữa quý vị với chúng tôi khi quý vị là chủ thể dữ liệu tại Hàn Quốc.
E.1 – Chuyển thông tin cá nhân
Chúng tôi cung cấp thông tin cá nhân hoặc thuê ngoài việc xử lý thông tin đó cho bên thứ ba theo quy định dưới đây:
- Cung cấp thông tin cá nhân cho bên thứ ba
Tên người nhận
Mục đích sử dụng của người nhận
Các mục thông tin cá nhân được cung cấp cho người nhận
Thời hạn lưu giữ của người nhận
Tools for Humanity GmbH
Các mục đích được mô tả trong thông báo này tại mục 6 trên đây.
Các mục được mô tả trong thông báo này tại mục 5 trên đây
Thời hạn lưu trữ được xác định trong thông báo này tại mục 11 trên đây.
- Thuê ngoài việc xử lý thông tin cá nhân cho bên thứ ba:
Vui lòng xem danh sách tất cả các dịch vụ xử lý dữ liệu được thuê ngoài và các công ty tương ứng tại liên kết này:
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
Chúng tôi có thể thuê ngoài việc xử lý thông tin cá nhân của quý vị và/hoặc chuyển thông tin cá nhân của quý vị cho mục đích lưu trữ cho các bên thứ ba ở bên ngoài Hàn Quốc:
Nếu quý vị không muốn chuyển thông tin cá nhân của mình ra nước ngoài, quý vị có thể từ chối bằng cách không đồng ý chuyển thông tin cá nhân hoặc yêu cầu chúng tôi dừng việc chuyển thông tin xuyên biên giới, nhưng nếu quý vị từ chối, quý vị sẽ không sử dụng được dịch vụ của chúng tôi. Cơ sở pháp lý cho việc chuyển thông tin cá nhân xuyên biên giới nêu trên là thực tế rằng việc này cấu thành “việc xử lý hoặc lưu trữ thông tin cá nhân được thuê ngoài cần thiết cho việc ký kết và thực hiện hợp đồng với chủ thể dữ liệu” và các vấn đề theo quy định của luật định đã được công bố trong chính sách quyền riêng tư (Điều 28-8(1)(iii) của Đạo luật Bảo vệ Thông tin Cá nhân).
E.2 – Hủy thông tin cá nhân
Khi thông tin cá nhân trở nên không cần thiết do hết thời hạn lưu giữ hoặc đã đạt được mục đích xử lý, v.v., thông tin cá nhân sẽ được hủy không chậm trễ. Quy trình và phương pháp hủy thông tin được trình bày dưới đây:
1) Quy trình hủy thông tin: Chúng tôi chọn một số thông tin cá nhân nhất định để hủy và thực hiện việc hủy khi có sự chấp thuận của DPO.
2) Phương thức hủy thông tin: Chúng tôi hủy thông tin cá nhân được ghi lại và lưu trữ dưới dạng tệp điện tử bằng phương pháp kỹ thuật (ví dụ: định dạng cấp thấp) để đảm bảo hồ sơ không thể được sao chép, trong khi thông tin cá nhân được ghi lại và lưu trữ dưới dạng tài liệu giấy sẽ được cắt nhỏ hoặc thiêu hủy.
E.3 – Lưu trữ thông tin cá nhân
Nếu luật hiện hành yêu cầu chúng tôi lưu giữ thông tin cá nhân của quý vị, chúng tôi sẽ thực hiện việc này cho các mục đích và thời hạn sau đây theo yêu cầu của luật hiện hành.
E.4 – Quyền của quý vị
Quý vị có thể thực hiện các quyền liên quan đến thông tin cá nhân đối với chúng tôi, bao gồm yêu cầu truy cập, sửa đổi hoặc xóa hoặc tạm dừng xử lý thông tin cá nhân của quý vị theo quy định của luật hiện hành bao gồm Đạo luật Bảo vệ Thông tin Cá nhân. Quý vị cũng có thể thực thi quyền rút lại chấp thuận cho thu thập/sử dụng/cung cấp thông tin cá nhân, quyền di chuyển dữ liệu và các quyền liên quan đến việc ra quyết định tự động. Những quyền đó cũng có thể được thực thi thông qua đại diện hợp pháp của quý vị hoặc những người được ủy quyền hợp lệ khác.
Quý vị có thể thực thi bất kỳ quyền nào nêu trên bằng cách liên hệ với chúng tôi tại worldcoin.org/requestportal.
E.5 – Biện pháp bảo mật
Chúng tôi sẽ triển khai các biện pháp bảo mật mang tính kỹ thuật, tổ chức và vật lý theo quy định của luật pháp Hàn Quốc hiện hành nhằm bảo vệ thông tin cá nhân, chẳng hạn như các biện pháp được liệt kê dưới đây:
1) Biện pháp quản lý: Chỉ định Chuyên viên Bảo vệ Dữ liệu, thiết lập và triển khai kế hoạch quản lý nội bộ, đào tạo thường xuyên cho nhân viên về bảo vệ dữ liệu, v.v.;
2) Biện pháp kỹ thuật: Quản lý quyền truy cập vào hệ thống xử lý thông tin cá nhân, cài đặt hệ thống kiểm soát truy cập, cài đặt chương trình bảo mật, v.v.; và
3) Biện pháp vật lý: Hạn chế quyền truy cập vào các cơ sở và thiết bị lưu trữ thông tin cá nhân như phòng máy tính, phòng lưu trữ dữ liệu, v.v.
E.6 – Liên hệ với chúng tôi
Đối với các câu hỏi hoặc thắc mắc liên quan đến quyền riêng tư và bảo vệ dữ liệu, vui lòng liên hệ với Nhóm Bảo vệ Dữ liệu của chúng tôi theo địa chỉ
dpo@worldcoin.org
.
PHỤ LỤC F – HOA KỲ
Đạo luật về Quyền riêng tư của Người tiêu dùng California, được sửa đổi bởi Đạo luật về Quyền riêng tư của California, hiện không áp dụng cho chúng tôi.
PHỤ LỤC G - BRAZIL
G.1 Luật hiện hành, Bên kiểm soát và Bên vận hành
Nếu quý vị cư trú tại Brazil, nếu dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị được thu thập tại Brazil hoặc nếu quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi tại Brazil, luật hiện hành là Luật số 13.709/2018 (Luật Chung về Bảo vệ Dữ liệu, hay “LGPD”).
G.2 Quyền phản đối
Quý vị có quyền phản đối việc sử dụng dữ liệu cá nhân của mình cho các mục đích không phụ thuộc vào sự chấp thuận nếu mục đích đó không phù hợp với LGPD. Nếu yêu cầu phản đối của quý vị được chấp thuận, chúng tôi sẽ không còn sử dụng thông tin cá nhân của quý vị để phát triển và cải thiện các tính năng và trải nghiệm của Dịch vụ.
Lưu ý rằng nếu quý vị không cung cấp hoặc không cho phép thu thập hoặc xử lý một số dữ liệu cá nhân nhất định, điều đó có thể ảnh hưởng đến chất lượng trải nghiệm của quý vị, chúng tôi có thể không đáp ứng được các mục tiêu của Dịch vụ hoặc chúng tôi có thể không cung cấp được một số Dịch vụ nhất định cho quý vị.
Trong một số trường hợp, dữ liệu của quý vị được ẩn danh, có nghĩa là dữ liệu đó không còn xác định quý vị được nữa. Quý vị không thể phản đối việc sử dụng dữ liệu ẩn danh vì dữ liệu này không cho phép xác định danh tính của quý vị, như được quy định trong LGPD. Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu ẩn danh này để cải tiến sản phẩm và dịch vụ của mình.
G.3 Các quyền theo luật định theo LGPD
Theo LGPD, quý vị có quyền xác nhận sự tồn tại của việc xử lý, truy cập, chỉnh sửa hoặc yêu cầu di chuyển dữ liệu đã được xử lý. Ngoài ra, quý vị có thể yêu cầu thông tin của các tổ chức nhà nước và tư nhân mà chúng tôi cùng sử dụng dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị. Quý vị cũng có thể yêu cầu thông tin liên quan đến khả năng không đưa ra chấp thuận và các hậu quả tiêu cực có thể xảy ra, đồng thời yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu được xử lý dựa trên sự chấp thuận. Quý vị có thể chọn xóa thông tin của mình trong Ứng dụng World trong menu Cài đặt.
Trong một số trường hợp nhất định, quý vị có quyền phản đối hoặc hạn chế cách chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị hoặc rút lại sự chấp thuận của quý vị mà chúng tôi dựa vào để xử lý thông tin quý vị cung cấp.
Quý vị có thể thực thi các quyền của mình theo LGPD bằng cách gửi yêu cầu cho DPO của chúng tôi dựa trên chi tiết liên hệ trong mục H.4 bên dưới hoặc thông qua cổng yêu cầu trực tuyến của chúng tôi. Nếu cảm thấy các quyền của mình chưa được giải quyết đầy đủ, quý vị có thể khiếu nại với Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) bằng cách điền vào biểu mẫu có sẵn tại liên kết này:
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
.
G.4 Chuyển dữ liệu cá nhân trên phạm vi quốc tế
Nếu LGPD áp dụng cho quý vị và chúng tôi đã thu thập dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị, chúng tôi cũng có thể chuyển dữ liệu đó ra bên ngoài quốc gia. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi sẽ luôn đảm bảo rằng dữ liệu cá nhân của quý vị chỉ được chuyển đến các nước hoặc các tổ chức quốc tế mà cung cấp mức độ bảo vệ phù hợp với mức độ được quy định trong LGPD, như được công nhận trong các quyết định về mức độ bảo vệ đầy đủ do ANPD ban hành. Trong trường hợp không có quyết định về mức độ bảo vệ đầy đủ, chúng tôi sẽ tiếp tục tuân theo tiêu chuẩn bảo vệ ít nhất tương đương với tiêu chuẩn được quy định trong LGPD bằng các Điều khoản Hợp đồng Tiêu chuẩn được thiết lập trong các quy định của ANPD hoặc khi chúng tôi có được sự chấp thuận cụ thể và rõ ràng của quý vị đối với việc chuyển dữ liệu quốc tế.
PHỤ LỤC I – Căn cứ pháp lý/mục đích cho các hoạt động xử lý dữ liệu của Tools for Humanity
Người dùng
Tại sao chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu
Dữ liệu cá nhân nào được xử lý
Căn cứ pháp lý để xử lý
Thời hạn lưu giữ
Để tạo tài khoản của quý vị trong Ứng dụng World
Địa chỉ ví, siêu dữ liệu, tên người dùng
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ hoặc cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu.
Để đảm bảo quý vị đáp ứng điều kiện độ tuổi
Ngày sinh
Nghĩa vụ pháp lý
Chúng tôi không bao giờ lưu trữ ngày sinh chính xác của quý vị. Chúng tôi chỉ lưu trữ thông tin về việc quý vị đủ 18 tuổi hay không. Chúng tôi lưu trữ thông tin này trong thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ hoặc cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu.
Để tùy chọn cho phép các liên hệ của quý vị dễ dàng liên lạc và giao dịch với quý vị
Số điện thoại
Sự chấp thuận
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ hoặc cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu.
Để cho phép quý vị dễ dàng liên lạc và giao dịch với các liên hệ của mình
Danh bạ sổ địa chỉ
Sự chấp thuận
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ hoặc cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu.
Để tùy chọn hiển thị cho quý vị các Orb gần quý vị
Thông tin vị trí
Sự chấp thuận
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Để ngăn chặn gian lận trong bối cảnh phòng ngừa tài khoản
Siêu dữ liệu, địa chỉ IP, ID thiết bị
Lợi ích hợp pháp, cụ thể là lợi ích để ngăn ngừa một số hoạt động gian lận (DANH SÁCH HOẠT ĐỘNG GIAN LẬN)
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Để đảm bảo dịch vụ được cho phép tại quốc gia của quý vị
Địa chỉ IP, thông tin vị trí
Nghĩa vụ pháp lý
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Để hiển thị ví tự lưu giữ của quý vị và cung cấp giao diện cho các giao dịch ví
Địa chỉ ví, dữ liệu giao dịch
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Không dữ liệu cá nhân nào được lưu trữ trong bối cảnh này.
Để hiển thị World ID tự lưu giữ của quý vị và cung cấp giao diện nhằm mục đích xác minh
Thông tin World ID
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Không dữ liệu cá nhân nào được lưu trữ trong bối cảnh này.
Để hiển thị Thông tin Xác thực tự lưu giữ của quý vị và cung cấp giao diện để chia sẻ Thông tin Xác thực
Thông tin xác thực, thông tin hiệu lực của thông tin xác thực
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Không dữ liệu cá nhân nào được lưu trữ trong bối cảnh này.
Để phân tích và cải tiến dịch vụ của chúng tôi và tiến hành nghiên cứu khoa học dữ liệu
Dữ liệu sử dụng và siêu dữ liệu, dữ liệu giao dịch công khai
Sự chấp thuận
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Để tuân thủ luật hiện hành như luật phòng chống rửa tiền và các biện pháp trừng phạt
Dữ liệu giao dịch, địa chỉ ví
Nghĩa vụ pháp lý
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ.
Để tuân thủ luật hiện hành như các quy định về nội dung
Nội dung Miniapp
Nghĩa vụ pháp lý
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ.
Để hỗ trợ hoạt động truyền thông và tiếp thị
Địa chỉ email, thông báo đẩy
Lợi ích hợp pháp
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Thông tin liên lạc từ quý vị
Lợi ích hợp pháp
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Phản hồi từ quý vị
Lợi ích hợp pháp
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Để xử lý các yêu cầu, khiếu nại và thắc mắc về dịch vụ khách hàng của quý vị.
Thông tin liên lạc và email hoặc tên hồ sơ mạng xã hội nếu quý vị tìm cách liên lạc với chúng tôi thông qua các phương tiện đó
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Để đảm bảo ứng dụng chạy mượt mà với quý vị
Siêu dữ liệu
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Tối đa 24 tháng.
Để xác minh thiết bị của quý vị
Dữ liệu World ID thiết bị (dấu vân tay thiết bị)
Thực hiện hợp đồng
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ.
Để giải quyết tranh chấp, khắc phục sự cố và thực thi các thỏa thuận giữa chúng tôi và quý vị, bao gồm Thông báo Quyền riêng tư này và Điều khoản Người dùng.
Thời hạn sử dụng dịch vụ.
Đối tác kinh doanh
Tại sao chúng tôi xử lý dữ liệu
Dữ liệu cá nhân nào được xử lý
Căn cứ pháp lý để xử lý
Thời hạn lưu giữ
Truyền thông
Số điện thoại, địa chỉ email, tên
Lợi ích hợp pháp, tức là lợi ích khi liên hệ với các đối tác kinh doanh.
Thời gian duy trì mối quan hệ kinh doanh hoặc cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu.
Duy trì và quản lý mối quan hệ kinh doanh
Số điện thoại, địa chỉ email, tên, dữ liệu doanh nghiệp
Lợi ích hợp pháp, tức là lợi ích duy trì và quản lý mối quan hệ kinh doanh với các đối tác kinh doanh.
Thời gian duy trì mối quan hệ kinh doanh hoặc cho đến khi quý vị yêu cầu xóa dữ liệu.
Thực hiện nghĩa vụ KYC
Dữ liệu hộ chiếu, dữ liệu doanh nghiệp
Nghĩa vụ pháp lý
Thời gian duy trì mối quan hệ kinh doanh và tối đa 3 năm sau khi chấm dứt.
Để xử lý hồ sơ ứng tuyển của quý vị
Dữ liệu hồ sơ ứng tuyển
Sự chấp thuận và các biện pháp theo yêu cầu của chủ thể dữ liệu trước khi ký kết hợp đồng.
Tối đa 3 tháng theo mặc định hoặc lâu hơn nếu quý vị đồng ý tham gia nhóm nhân tài.
TFHPS20241017
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity 私隱聲明
感謝您選擇加入 Worldcoin 社群！Worldcoin 是由開發人員、個人和其他貢獻者所組成全球社群所支援的開源協定。
本私隱聲明涵蓋您透過使用我方網站、應用程式（「應用程式」）和其他與本私隱聲明相關的服務（統稱為「服務」）而提供給我們的資料。本私隱聲明已納入並受
用戶條款和條件
（「用戶條款」）並受其管限。Tools for Humanity Corporation（「美國 TFH」）及其德國附屬公司 Tools for Humanity GmbH（「德國 TFH」；統稱為「
TFH
」或「
我們
」或「
我方
」），為 Worldcoin 協定（「Worldcoin」）的發展和增長作出貢獻，但有別於控制 Orb 相關的資料處理的 Worldcoin Foundation。
1. 控制方
我們是所有「World App 資料」、「憑證驗證資料」和其他「業務資料」的資料控制方：Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA。TFH 透過 Tools for Humanity GmbH 在歐盟（「
EU
」） 成立。
「World App 資料」是指透過您使用 World App 收集和處理的所有個人資料，如以下第 5 節進一步定義，但與您使用 Worldcoin 協定或 Worldcoin 代幣有關的任何個人資料除外（例如您的錢包地址和交易資料，我們對其並無控制權）。
憑證驗證資料是指驗證憑證以將其新增至您的自我保管 World ID 時處理的資料。它指，例如是，閱讀您護照的 NFC 晶片，以將護照資料安全地儲存在您的裝置上。此資料由您控制，在驗證您憑證的有效性後，TFH 將儲存您憑證（例如護照）的唯一加密簽名雜湊值的匿名片段，以確保每個憑證只能新增到 World ID 一次。
「業務資料」是指本公司在您透過電郵、視像會議或我方網站與我們溝通或互動時，以其他方式收集和處理的所有個人資料。有關在 Orb App 背景下的資料處理，請參閱 Orb App 中已作連結的 Orb App 私隱聲明。有關在專門資料收集和測試背景下的資料處理，請參閱您的測試應用程式中已作連結的相應收集和測試私隱聲明。有關在我們網站背景下的處理，請參閱我們網站上連結的 Cookie 政策。
2. 本私隱聲明的更新
我們有時會更新本私隱聲明。如果我們作出重大變更，例如我們使用您個人資訊的方式，我們將會透過電郵或您應用程式中的訊息通知您。
3. 本私隱聲明有何內容？
我們對保護您私隱和資料的承諾
我們收集的資訊及原因
我們如何使用收集的資料
我們在哪裏處理您的資料
當我們分享您的資料時
如何在公共區塊鏈上記錄您的資料
我們如何使用 Cookie
我們保留您的資料多久
本私隱聲明對於兒童和青少年有何不同
您擁有的法定權利
如何就本私隱聲明聯絡我們
4. 我們對保護您私隱和資料的承諾
我們堅定承諾保護您的私隱和資料。我們明白，只有在人們信任我們的情況下，我們才能履行使命，將我們的數碼代幣公平地分發給盡可能多的人，而保障私隱和資料安全正是贏得您信任的核心。
私隱
我們在設計產品和服務時考慮到了您的私隱。我們收集資料以改善產品和服務。我們始終會在本私隱聲明或特定產品或服務的資料同意書中告知您，我們收集哪些資料、我們為何收集該等資料以及我們如何處理該等資料。
資料安全
我們有專門的團隊來守護您的資料，並實施實體和電子保護措施，在資料傳輸和靜態狀況下保護您的資料。同時，沒有任何服務是絕對安全的。如果您對您的帳戶或資料有任何疑慮，請透過我們的
請求入口網站
聯絡我們，或致函給我們，地址為：Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA。
5. 我們收集的資訊及原因
5.1 您提供給我們的資料
身為用戶，您不用提供任何資料即可存取應用程式。然而，您可能要向我們提供特定資料，才能使用服務內的功能。在以下情況下，處理資料的法律依據是用戶同意和合約履行（我們提供服務的承諾）。以下列出您可能提供的資料，以及我們可能使用這些資料的目的：
在 World App 的背景下：
電話號碼。
您可以選擇輸入電話號碼以將其與您的帳戶關聯。在您的許可下，其他用戶或許可以透過您的電話號碼找到您的帳戶。當您提交資料當事人請求時，我們可能會要求您提供電話號碼。處理此資料的法律依據是根據用戶條款履行服務。
用戶名稱。
您可以隨時將用戶名稱連結至您的錢包地址並變更用戶名稱。
出生日期。
您可以披露您的出生日期，以確保遵守年齡限制要求。我們絕不會儲存您的出生資料，只會儲存該資料的檢查總和，以及您是否已年滿 18 歲。
您的意見和通訊。
其中包括您透過電郵或第三方社交媒體網站傳送給我們的任何電郵、聊天訊息或其他通訊。如果您試圖透過此類方式與我們通訊，這可能包括處理電郵地址或社交媒體檔案名稱。我們可能會使用第三方服務供應商，以進行有關您使用我方服務的調查。處理此資料的法律依據是根據用戶條款履行服務。
通訊錄聯絡人。
您可向應用程式提供通訊錄的存取權，以啟用此功能，讓您可以輕鬆尋找通訊錄中的其他用戶並與之互動。處理此資料的法律依據是在應用程式中尋找資料當事人的合法權益，以及分享用戶以在應用程式中尋找其聯絡人的權益。
請注意：
您有責任確保分享您聯絡人的資訊遵守適用法律。這可能需要您向聯絡人徵求許可，且未經 TFH 明確同意，您不得與 TFH 分享其他人的任何詳細聯絡資訊。您可以改變主意，隨時在裝置設定中關閉我們對您聯絡人的存取權限。如果您選擇將裝置的通訊錄聯絡人匯入應用程式，以找出您的哪些聯絡人使用我們的服務，或邀請對方使用我們的服務時加入您，我們將定期把您聯絡人的電話號碼同步到我方伺服器上其他用戶提供的號碼和對應錢包地址。
位置資訊
。您可以決定啟用基於位置的服務（例如允許您尋找您附近的 Orb 營運方的功能）。只有在您明確同意的情況下，我們才會透過 GPS 收集您的位置資訊，以啟用基於位置的服務向您顯示您附近的 Orb。您可以在裝置的設定中隨時變更權限。如果您不在南韓，我們可能也會儲存您與您的 World App 帳戶解除關聯的大概位置。我們使用這些資料來改善我們的服務，特別是但不限於 Orb 位置的選擇。
P2P 商貿平台
。若您使用允許您向其他用戶購買數碼代幣的 P2P 商貿平台服務（如有），則我們可能收集其他資訊，例如您的錢包地址、連絡人資訊（亦即您的電話號碼） 及與交易相關的帳號（例如您的 M-PESA 號碼）。我們會記錄交易資料，作為提供 P2P 商貿平台服務的一部分。我們也可能收集其他資訊，以符合適用的 KYC 要求。
裝置中繼資料。
如果您正在使用應用程式，我們將從您的裝置收集中繼資料，以確保應用程式正常運作，並確保您沒有侵犯我們的條款和條件。這包括收集裝置識別碼和 IP 位址。
裝置 World ID 資料。
我們也處理您的裝置中繼資料，以計算唯一的裝置指紋。此指紋的雜湊值是一種訊號，當中使用裝置 World ID 證明您的唯一身分。
在業務資料處理的背景下：
名字和姓氏。
我們可能會處理您的名字和姓氏，以追求與您維持業務關係和進行管理的合法利益。
電郵。
您也可以提供電郵以加入我們的郵寄清單，以掌握 Worldcoin 項目的最新資訊。當您提交資料當事人請求時，我們可能會要求您提供電郵地址。我們可能會處理您的電郵地址，以追求與您維持業務關係和進行管理的合法利益。
電話號碼。
我們可能會處理您的電話號碼，以追求與您維持業務關係和進行管理的合法利益。
企業資料
。若您與我們有業務關係（例如若您是 Orb 營運方或供應商），我們可能會要求您提供姓名、郵寄地址、電郵、電話號碼、錢包地址和其他文件（例如您的政府 ID）等資訊，以促進業務關係並履行我們「認識您的客戶」義務。我們可能會使用第三方服務，例如 Onfido，以幫助我們收集和審查上述資訊和文件，以滿足「認識您的客戶」的義務。
申請資料
。如果您想為我們工作，您必須向我們發送申請，當中包括您的求職信和簡歷，以及您希望披露的個人資訊。
在本私隱聲明結尾處，可查看
附件 I – Tools for Humanity 處理資料的法律依據，以了解上述各項資料處理活動
的法律基礎。
5.2 我們從第三方來源收集的資料
我們可能會不時從下列第三方來源取得有關您的資訊：
區塊鏈資料
。我們可能會分析公開區塊鏈資料，以確保使用我們服務的各方不會從事用戶條款下的非法或禁止活動，並基於研發目的分析交易趨勢。
身分驗證服務
。如果法律要求（例如適用的「認識您的客戶」要求），我們可能會使用您的資料從第三方服務獲取資訊，以驗證您的身分。為澄清起見，當我們依法律要求驗證您的身分時，我們
不會
使用您的生物識別資料。
人才資料庫
。我們可能會從各種來源收集資料，以便向人才提供工作機會。
5.3 我們自動收集的資料
在適用法律允許的情況下，當您與我們的服務互動時，我們可能會自動收集某些類型的資料。此資訊有助我們解決客戶支援問題、改善服務效能、為您提供精簡且個人化的體驗，以及保護您的帳戶憑證。自動收集的資訊包括：
網上識別碼：
地理位置和追蹤詳細資料（見上文）、電腦或手機作業系統、網頁瀏覽器名稱和版本以及 IP 位址。在非常有限的情況下，這些資料也會被饋送至我們的欺詐和非法的財務流量偵測中。它們還有助提供提供穩定和無欺詐的軟件體驗。
使用資料：
驗證資料、安全性問題以及透過 Cookie 和類似技術收集的其他資料。
Cookie
：儲存在您的硬碟或裝置記憶體中的小型資料檔案，幫助改善我方服務和您的體驗，查看我們服務的哪些領域和功能受歡迎，並計算到訪次數。有關處理這些資料的法律依據，請參閱我們的
Cookie 政策
，其中說明了我們使用的各類 Cookie。
同樣地，應用程式也會收集疑難排解和改善的資訊。我們使用第三方服務，例如 Segment.io 或 PostHog，以檢視有關最終用戶使用和互動的彙總資訊。在可能的情況下，我們會採取步驟，將傳送給第三方的資訊減至最少或作出掩蓋（例如為資料編碼）。
5.4 匿名和彙總資料
匿名化是一種資料處理技術，其會取消資料成為個人資料的資格，因為一旦匿名化，資料就無法再與特定個人建立關聯。匿名資料例如包括：
交易資料
點擊流資料
表現指標
欺詐指標（雖然個人資料也用於此目的）
我們也彙總資料，將大量資訊結合在一起，使其不再識別或引用個人身分。我們使用匿名或彙總資料進行業務目的，例如了解用戶的需求和行為、改善我們的服務、執行商業情報和營銷、偵測安全威脅，以及訓練我們的演算法。
處理上述資料的法律依據是運行應用程式或網站、提供商業見解和預防欺詐的合法權益。
6. 我們如何使用收集的資料
6.1 一般說明
我們必須有正當理由（或「合法的處理依據」）才能使用您的個人資訊。在某些情況下，使用您的個人資訊不需要事先向您徵求同意。我們會將您的資料用於下列目的：
根據用戶條款提供和維護我們的產品和服務。這些服務包括：
應用程式，用戶可從中管理其 World ID 和數碼代幣，以及了解一般的加密貨幣和特定 Worldcoin 項目；
營運方應用程式，Orb 營運方在從中管理和監督所管理的 Orb 及其統計資料；
我們用以連結用戶與代理的 P2P Marketplace（不適用於在德國成立或居住的用戶，或在德國擁有其慣常住所或註冊辦事處的用戶）；
改善和開發我們的產品和服務，包括解除和修復我們服務中的錯誤。
進行資料科學研究。
分析您對我們服務的使用情況，以提供更好的支援。
讓您能夠在區塊鏈上發佈資訊，以證明您的唯一身分。
使用您的錢包地址，以傳送我們支援的數碼代幣給您。
遵守適用的法律，例如反洗錢法律和制裁。這包括：
使用您的 IP 位址以封鎖其國家／地區不允許其存取服務的個人；
根據適用的資料保護法律回應資料當事人的請求，例如存取或刪除資料的請求；
監控潛在的非法財務流量，例如來自黑名單錢包；及
遵守適用法律，例如禁止非法內容的規定。
處理您的客戶服務請求、投訴和查詢。
解決爭議、排解疑難並執行我們與您之間的協議，包括本私隱聲明和用戶條款。
就服務更新事宜與您聯絡。
6.2 憑證
TFH 可讓您在本機裝置上儲存某些憑證，以便在 World ID 協定（「憑證」）的零知識基礎設施中進行分享。在憑證的背景下，我們以下列方式處理此資料：
我們會檢查您憑證的有效性（若為護照，則可透過您所在國家／地區的根憑證進行）。
我們會驗證您是憑證的合法持有者（對於護照，此功能會透過您從未儲存的臉部照片（自拍）在本地裝置上進行驗證）。
我們會將您憑證的資料加密、簽署並儲存至您裝置上的安全環境中。
我們永遠無法存取您認證中所載的個人資訊。
之後，您可以透過 World ID 協定的保護措施，選擇性地與依賴方分享此資訊（例如，您可以證明您已年滿 18 歲，而不會透露您的確切年齡或您是誰）。
對於護照，TFH 只會維持您護照唯一加密簽名的匿名雜湊值，以確保每本護照只能驗證一次。
此項處理是基於您的同意，我們絕不會從您儲存在裝置上的護照取得您的個人資料。您可以透過刪除 World App，從手機中刪除此資料。
6.3 World ID 資料
您的 World ID（即：使用它所需的秘密編號）僅儲存在您的裝置中（如果您有備份，備份中會出現加密副本）。TFH 或任何其他人均無法存取您的 World ID。您可以匿名使用您的 World ID。每次將 World ID 用於新應用程式時，應用程式僅會接收一個不透露您 World ID 的一次性號碼（「消除器」）。此功能可透過用零知識驗證啟用（您僅證明您已擁有已驗證的 World ID，而非擁有哪一個），並確保您的 World ID 無法用於跨應用程式追蹤您。這表示 World ID 不是網際網絡的一般用戶 ID。
World ID 驗證透過開放的協定來存取已驗證 World ID 的雜湊值公開 Merkle Tree。World ID 不是集中式服務，而是任何人都可以存取的協定。我們提供 API 以方便存取 Merkle Tree 和 World ID 驗證，但在此背景下絕不會接收任何個人資料。
請務必注意，我們也不會處理任何與您的 World ID 相關的資料，這些資料將使我們能夠識別您的身分。所有在 World App 背景下處理的個人資料，特別是您的錢包地址和交易資料，均經過刻意設計，以從 World ID 資料中移除連結。
7. 我們在哪裏處理您的資料
7.1 資料轉移。
當您向我們提供您的資料時，您的資料可能會在原本收集資料所在地點境外轉移、儲存或處理。轉移、儲存或處理您資料所在國家／地區的資料保護法律，可能與您最初提供資料所在國家／地區的法律不同。
我們盡最大努力遵守每個司法管轄區關於私隱法律的原則。我們僅會在轉移資料屬合法，且我們確信資料處理方將遵循適用法律的要求並進一步符合我方標準保護您的資料的情況下，才會與您所在司法管轄區境外的資料處理方分享資料。
7.2 轉移的風險
以下列出若我們將您的資料轉移至美國、歐盟或其他國家／地區時可能發生的風險。以下我們也概述了如何減輕個別風險。
雖然我們盡一切努力確保分包商按照合約義務充分保護您的資料，但這些分包商可能不受您所在國家／地區的資料私隱法律規限。如果分包商在未經授權的情況下非法處理您的資料，則可能很難向該分包商主張您的私隱權。我們與分包商簽訂嚴格的資料處理協議，要求其以 GDPR 層級保護資料，並滿足資料當事人的請求，以降低此風險。
您所在國家／地區的資料私隱法律可能與美國或歐盟的資料私隱法律不一致。我們始終努力遵循我方須守的最高資料保護標準。
您的資料可能會被政府官員和主管機關存取。在這些情況下，我們承諾會在法庭質疑任何無效、過度或非法的政府存取請求。我們進一步使用進階加密來阻止未經授權的存取。
請注意，此清單列載例子，但可能未包括所有可能對您造成的風險。
7.3 美國資料傳輸的資料私隱架構
TFH 遵守美國商務部訂明的歐盟-美國資料私隱架構（歐盟-美國 DPF）、英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF，以及瑞士-美國資料私隱框架（瑞士-美國 DPF）。TFH 已向美國商務部證明，在處理來自歐盟且根據歐盟-美國 DPF，以及來自英國（和直布羅陀）且根據英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF 的個人資料時，其遵守歐盟-美國資料私隱框架原則（歐盟-美國 DPF 原則）。TFH 已向美國商務部證明，在處理來自瑞士且依賴瑞士-美國 DPF 的個人資料時，其遵守瑞士-美國資料私隱框架原則（瑞士-美國 DPF 原則）。如果本資料私隱框架聲明的條款與歐盟-美國 DPF 原則和／或瑞士-美國 DPF 原則有任何衝突之處，概以該原則為準。如要深入了解資料私隱框架 (DPF) 計劃，以及查看我們的認證，請瀏覽
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
。
TFH 負責處理其根據 DPF 收到的個人資料，並隨後轉移給代表其擔任代理的第三方。對於所有從歐盟、英國和瑞士的個人資料轉移，TFH 遵守相關 DPF 原則，包括轉移責任條款。
聯邦貿易委員會對 TFH 遵守歐盟-美國 DPF，英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF 和瑞士-美國 DPF 具有司法管轄權。在某些情況下，TFH 可能需要披露個人資料，以回應公共當局的合法要求，包括滿足國家／地區安全或執法要求。
在遵守歐盟-美國 DPF 和英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF 和瑞士-美國 DPF 的同時，TFH 承諾解決有關我們收集和使用您個人資訊的 DPF 原則相關投訴。歐盟、英國和瑞士個人如對於我們依賴歐盟-美國 DPF 和英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF 和瑞士-美國 DPF 收到的個人資料的處理方式有疑問或投訴，應首先透過 dpo@worldcoin.org 聯絡 TFH。
在遵守歐盟-美國 DPF 和英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF 和瑞士-美國 DPF 的同時，針對我們處理依賴歐盟-美國 DPF 和英國伸延版歐盟-美國 DPF 和瑞士-美國 DPF 收到的個人資料處理方式的未解決投訴，TFH 承諾分別配合並遵守歐盟資料保護主管機關 (DPA) 和英國資訊專員辦公室 (ICO) 和直布羅陀監管機構 (GRA) 和瑞士聯邦資料保護與資訊委員會 (FDPIC)} 所成立小組的建議。
對於任何有關遵守 DPF 而未有任何其他 DPF 機制解決的投訴，在某些情況下，您可以借助具有約束力的仲裁。更多詳情請參閱官方 DPF 網站。
8. 當我們分享您的資料時
我們絕不會出售您的資料
。
當我們將您的資料分享到組織之外時，我們始終會：
以合理安全的方式分享；
採取措施確保以符合我們對您所秉持私隱承諾的方式處理；及
禁止其他公司將其用於自身目的。
我們確實以下列有限的方式分享您的資料：
對於 Worldcoin Foundation：
我們可能擔任 Worldcoin Foundation 處理方，代表 Worldcoin 收集個人資料（請查看 Worldcoin 的私隱聲明，以取得進一步資訊）。
在我們的組織內：
我們僅向需要存取權的團隊成員披露資料，以便其履行任務和職責。我們僅披露執行特定任務和職責所需的資料，並擁有嚴格的存取控制系統。
對於組織外部的供應商和服務供應商：
我們僅向我方依賴其服務的服務供應商披露資料，以便其處理資料並向您提供我們的服務。我們僅在法律要求（即「認識您的客戶」要求）的情況下向身分驗證供應商披露資料。
此等服務供應商的類別為：
雲端服務供應商（所有資料類型）
SaaS 提供者；我們使用下列類別的 SaaS 產品：
資料庫和基礎設施管理
資料安全
招聘
通訊
調查
KYC/KYB，即檢查官方文件
資料當事人請求管理
技術支援
用戶支援
外部專家
專業軟件開發人員
法律專家
稅務顧問
銀行
標籤服務供應商（僅在特殊保障下）
申請人和 Orb 營運方的背景審查服務
對於執法機構、官員或其他第三方：
我們可能會披露您的資料，以遵守適用法律並回應強制性法律要求。我們將仔細考慮每項請求，以確定請求是否符合法律，並在適當情況下可能質疑無效、過度或非法的請求。若我們合理認為有必要遵守法律、規例或其他法律程序或義務，我們可能會與警方和其他政府機構分享個人資料。
如果我們認為您的行為不符合我方用戶條款、如果我們認為您違反法律，或如果我們認為有必要保護我方權利、財產和安全、我方用戶、公眾或其他人，我們可能會分享您的個人資訊。
必要時，我們可能會與我方律師和其他專業顧問分享您的個人資訊，以獲取建議或以其他方式保護和管理我們的商業權益。
我們可能會在就合併、出售公司資產、融資或其他公司收購我方全部或部分業務而進行協商時，分享您的個人資訊。
資料（包括您的個人資訊）可能會在我們目前和未來的母公司、聯屬公司和附屬公司以及受共同控制和擁有的其他公司之間分享。
我們可能會在您同意或指示下分享您的個人資訊。
9. 如何在公共區塊鏈上記錄您的資料
與您使用我方服務有關的交易資訊可能會記錄在公開區塊鏈中。
請注意：
區塊鏈是交易的公開分類帳，由非 Worldcoin 控制或運作的第三方在分散式網絡上維護。由於區塊鏈分類帳的公開性和不可變性質，我們無法保證能夠修訂、清除或控制在區塊鏈上載和儲存的資料披露
10. 我們如何使用 Cookie
我們使用 Cookie 來改善我們的服務運作。除了 Cookie 之外，我們可能使用其他類似技術，例如網絡信標，來追蹤我們的服務用戶。網絡信標（又稱為「透明 GIF」）是具有唯一標識符的微小圖形，在功能上與 Cookie 相似。我們的
Cookie 政策
以引用的方式納入本文。
我們也使用 Google Analytics（分析）。若要進一步了解 Google 在您使用其合作夥伴的網站和應用程式時如何使用您的資料，請瀏覽：
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
。一經使用服務，即代表您同意我們儲存和存取您電腦或流動裝置上的 Cookie 和其他資料，以及與該等活動相關的 Google Analytics（分析）使用。請閱讀所提供連結中的資訊，以了解您同意的內容。
11. 我們保留您的資料多久？
除非適用法律另有規定，否則我們會在合理必要時保留您的資料，以便向您提供我們的服務、實現我們的合法業務目的，並遵守我們的法律和規例義務。如果您關閉我們的帳戶，我們將在一個月內刪除您的帳戶資料；否則，我們將在 2 年無活動後刪除您的帳戶資料。若然法律要求，我們將繼續保留您的個人資料，以遵守我們的法律和規例義務，包括監控、偵測和預防欺詐，以及履行稅務、會計和財務報告義務。
請注意：
區塊鏈是我們無法控制或運作的分散式第三方網絡。由於區塊鏈技術的公開性和不可變性質，我們無法修改、清除或控制在區塊鏈儲存的資料披露。
12. 本私隱聲明對於兒童和青少年有何不同
未滿 18 歲的個人不得使用服務，我們不會故意收集未滿 18 歲人士的資料。如果您認為未經您許可下，您未滿 18 歲的子女取得服務存取權，請透過
請求入口網站
聯絡我們，以請求刪除其資料。
如果我們得知我們收集了有關未滿 18 歲兒童的資料，我們將盡快刪除有關資料。我們已採取一些步驟，例如實施自動年齡偵測 AI 模型、營運方指引以及自我確認，以限制服務僅提供給年滿 18 歲者使用。我們不向兒童推銷產品或服務。
13. 如何就本私隱聲明聯絡我們
您可以選擇從應用程式內的設定選單下刪除您的資料。如果您對本私隱聲明有任何疑問或疑慮、希望行使您的權利或想聯絡我們的資料保護專員 (DPO)，請透過
請求入口網站
提交申請，或致函給我們，地址為 Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA 或可發送電郵至
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
。我們回應希望根據適用資料保護法律行使其資料保護權利之個人提出的所有請求。您也可以從 World App 中刪除您的資料。
如果您有我們未妥善解決的私隱或資料使用疑慮，請聯絡您所在司法管轄區的資料保護主管機關。如果您居住在歐盟，您可以
在此
找到您的資料保護監管機構。
14. 您的權利
只要我們可以在我方資料庫中識別請求者，並且只要我們不會因行使請求者的權利而違反其他資料當事人的權利，這些權利即予適用：
您有權隨時向我們索取我方所處理關於您個人資料的資訊。您有權向我們索取有關您的個人資料。
您有權要求我們在您的個人資料不正確時立即予以更正。
您有權要求我們刪除有關您的個人資料。這些先決條件特別規定如果個人資料不再需要用於收集或以其他方式處理的目的則有刪除權，但前提是適用法律要求刪除（例如有多個司法管轄區的法律要求我們在特定期間內保留交易資訊）
您有權自由撤銷允許任何根據同意而進行的資料處理，或拒絕並非根據同意而進行的資料處理工作。
15. 附錄
以下幾份附錄為我們經營的各自市場提供法律要求的資訊。此資訊構成同意書的一部分，具體視資料當事人居住的地區而定。此資訊可能與您所在地點的資訊不同，因為我們在某些司法管轄區封鎖了某些服務。若與上述內容有任何不一致之處，應以特定司法管轄區的具體特別聲明為準：
附錄 A：歐洲經濟區（「EEA」）和英國（「UK」）
如果您在歐洲經濟區或英國，則以下條款適用於您：您至少擁有以下權利。根據 27.04.2016 歐盟條例 2016/679 通用資料保護條例（「GDPR」），您可能擁有下列其他權利。若要行使 GDPR 賦予您的權利，請透過
請求入口網站
聯絡我們。除特殊情況外，我們將在一個月的法定期限內解決您的請求。以下章節使用 GDPR 一詞，也代表 UK-GDPR 轉變成英國國家法律，作為 2018 年英國資料保護法，並憑藉 2018 年歐盟（退出）法案 (UK Data Protection Act)
第 3 節
，以及 2019 年資料保護、私隱和電子通訊（修正案等）（歐盟退出）規例 (SI 2019/419)(Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019)
附錄
1
所修訂，保留作為英格蘭和威爾斯、蘇格蘭和北愛爾蘭法律的一部分。
A.1 GDPR 下的法定權利
如果處理您的資料屬於 GDPR 的應用範圍（
例如
，如果您是歐洲經濟區居民或英國居民），則本節適用。根據 GDPR，您可能擁有下列其他權利。若要行使 GDPR 賦予您的權利，請透過
請求入口網站
聯絡我們。
在 GDPR 第 15 條的範圍內，您有權隨時向我們索取我方所處理關於您個人資料的資訊。
您有權要求我們在您的個人資料不正確時立即予以更正。
根據 GDPR 第 17 條所述條件，您有權要求我們刪除有關您的個人資料。這些先決條件特別規定如果個人資料不再需要用於收集或以其他方式處理的目的則有刪除權，以及在非法處理的情況下，根據歐盟法律或我們受其約束的成員國法律，存在提出異議或履行刪除義務的權利。
您有權要求我們根據 GDPR 第 18 條限制處理資料。
根據 GDPR 第 20 條，您有權以結構化和常用的機器可讀格式，從我們接收您提供給我方而與您相關的個人資料。
根據 GDPR 第 21 條，您有權基於您的特定情況，隨時拒絕我們處理關於您的個人資料（尤其根據 GDPR 第 6 (1) 條第 1 句 f 項）。
若有控制方所執行資料處理方面的投訴，您有權聯絡主管監督機關。負責的監督機關為：巴伐利亞資料保護監督國家辦公室 (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz)。
如果我們基於您的同意而處理個人資料，您有權根據 GDPR 第 7 條，隨時撤銷您對我們未來使用您個人資料而作出的同意，而撤銷與聲明同意本身一樣輕鬆簡單。請注意，撤銷僅適用於未來。在撤銷前的資料處理不受影響。
A.2 資料轉移
將資料轉移至沒有充分決定的國家／地區時，我們會使用歐盟標準合約條款。我們目前僅將個人資料轉移至美國。
如果我們基於您的同意而處理個人資料，您有權根據 GDPR 第 7 條，隨時撤銷您對我們未來使用您個人資料而作出的同意，而撤銷與聲明同意本身一樣輕鬆簡單。請注意，撤銷僅適用於未來。在撤銷前的資料處理不受影響。另請注意，非基於同意的處理不會因撤銷同意而受到影響。
附錄 B：日本
如果您居住在日本，則以下條款也適用於您。
B1. 關於日本規例的資訊
我們遵守日本法律和規例，包括日本個人資訊保護法 (Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan)（「APPI」）。本節適用於我們處理 APPI 中定義的「個人資訊」，其優先於本生物識別資料同意書的其他部分
我們遵守日本法律和規例，包括日本個人資訊保護法 (Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan)（「APPI」）。本節適用於我們處理 APPI 中定義的「個人資訊」，其優先於本私隱聲明的其他部分。
B2. 資料分享
除非適用法律另有規定，否則我們不會向任何第三方披露、出售、提供、分享或轉移您的個人資訊。
B3. 安全控制措施
我們採取必要且適當的措施，以防止我們所處理與您相關的個人資訊有所洩漏、遺失或損毀，並以其他方式確保個人資訊安全，例如建立個人資訊處理規則，對個人資訊的處理進行定期監控，定期訓練員工處理個人資訊，防止用於處理個人資訊的設備遭竊或遺失，以及實施存取控制措施。我們也適當地監督處理個人資訊的承包商和員工。您可以透過
請求入口網站
聯絡我們，以進一步了解與處理您個人資訊相關的安全控制措施。
B4. 有關在外國處理個人資料的參考資訊
您的個人資料將在歐盟和美國處理。
B5. APPI 下的法定權利
若要行使根據 APPI 提供的權利，請透過
請求入口網站
聯絡我們。
附錄 C：阿根廷
如果您居住在阿根廷共和國，我們通知您，以第 25,326 號法律控制機構身分存取公開資訊的機構，有權聽取因未遵守有效個人資料保護規則而權利受到影響的人士所提出的投訴和索償。
您可透過以下方式聯絡機構：
地址：Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, 5th floor - Autonomous City of Buenos Aires
郵遞區號：C1067ABP
電話號碼：(54-11) 3988-3968
電郵：datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
附錄 D：新加坡
如果您是新加坡居民，則以下條款適用於您：
D1. 收集、使用和披露您的個人資料
如果您是新加坡居民，而且您已同意，我們將收集、使用或以其他方式披露您的個人資料，用於我們私隱聲明中所列的各項目的。您可隨時行使撤銷同意的權利，但請注意，依據您請求的性質和範圍，我們可能無法繼續為您提供服務。另請注意，若適用法律允許或要求在未經同意的情況下收集、使用和披露個人資料，則撤銷同意不會影響我們繼續收集、使用和披露個人資料的權利。[1]
D2. 行使您的資料當事人權利
您可以透過
請求入口網站
聯絡我們，以控制我們收集的個人資料並行使任何權利。我們致力盡快回應您的請求，通常是在 30 天內。若我們無法在 30 天內回應您的請求，或我們無法滿足您的請求，我們將提前通知您並說明原因。[2]
在法律允許的情況下，我們可能會向您收取行政費用以滿足您的請求。
D3. 將您的個人資料轉移至其他國家／地區
如果您是新加坡居民，而且我們已收集您的資料，我們也可能會不時將您的資料傳輸至新加坡境外。然而，我們將始終確保您的個人資料持續獲得至少與 2012 年新加坡個人資料保護法 (Singapore Personal Data Protection Act)，例如透過使用東盟標準合約條款 (ASEAN Model Contractual Clauses) 相等的保護標準。
附錄 E – 南韓
本韓國資料當事人附錄說明我們就您身為韓國資料當事人與我方關係所處理個人資訊的做法。
E.1 – 個人資訊的轉移
我們向以下指定的第三方提供個人資訊或將其處理外判給第三方：
- 向第三方提供個人資訊
接收方姓名
接收方的使用目的
提供給接收方的個人資訊項目
接收方的保留期限
Tools for Humanity GmbH
本聲明中上述第 6 節所述之目的。
本聲明中上述第 5 節所述的項目
本聲明中上述第 11 節定義的儲存期間。
- 將個人資訊的處理外判給第三方：
請在此連結查看所有外判資料處理和相應公司的清單：
https://www.toolsforhumanity.com/processors
我們可能會向韓國境外的第三方外判您個人資訊的處理工作，和／或傳輸您的個人資訊以作儲存目的：
如果您不想將個人資訊轉移至海外，您可以拒絕同意轉移個人資訊，或要求我們停止跨境轉移；但是如果您拒絕，您可能無法使用我們的服務。上述個人資訊跨境傳輸的法律依據是構成「與資料當事人簽訂和履行合約所必需個人資訊的外判處理或儲存工作」，法定規定的事項已在私隱政策（個人資訊保護法 (Personal Information Protection Act) 第 28-8(1)(iii) 條）中披露。
E.2 – 個人資訊的銷毀
基於保存期限屆滿或達成處理目的等因素以致再無必要保留個人資訊時，須立即銷毀個人資訊。銷毀程序和方法如下：
1) 銷毀程序：我們選擇要銷毀的特定個人資訊項目，並在 DPO 核准後銷毀。
2) 銷毀方式：我們使用技術方法（例如低階格式）銷毀以電子檔案形式記錄和儲存的個人資訊，以確保記錄不會複製，而以紙本文件形式記錄和儲存的個人資訊將被撕碎或焚化。
E.3 – 個人資訊的儲存
若我們依適用法律要求保留您的個人資訊，則將根據適用法律的下列目的及期限保留您的個人資訊。
E.4 – 您的權利
您可以對我們行使與個人資訊相關的權利，包括根據適用法律（包括個人資訊保護法 (Personal Information Protection Act)）規定要求存取、修改或刪除或暫停處理您的個人資訊。您也可以行使撤銷同意收集／使用／提供個人資訊的權利、資料可攜性權利以及與自動決策有關的權利。此等權利也可能透過您的法定代表或其他正式授權人員行使。
您可以透過 worldcoin.org/requestportal 聯絡我們以行使上述任何適用權利。
E.5 – 安全措施
為了保護個人資訊，我們將實施適用韓國法律規定的技術、組織和實體安全措施，例如：
1) 管理措施：指定資料保護專員，制定和實施內部管理計劃，定期對員工進行資料保護培訓等；
2) 技術措施：管理個人資訊處理系統的存取權限、安裝存取控制系統、安裝安全程式等；及
3) 實體措施：限制存取個人資訊儲存設施和設備，例如電腦室和資料儲存室等。
E.6 – 聯絡我們
有關私隱和資料保護的問題或查詢，請聯絡我們的資料保護團隊：
dpo@worldcoin.org
。
附錄 F – 美國
經加州私隱法案 (California Privacy Rights Act) 修訂的加州消費者私隱法案 (California Consumer Privacy Act) 目前不適用於我們。
附錄 G - 巴西
G.1 適用法規、控制方和營運方
如果您居住在巴西，且如果您的個人資料是在巴西收集，或者如果您在巴西使用我們的服務，則適用法規為編號 13,709/2018 的法律（一般資料保護法，或稱「LGPD」）。
G.2 反對權
對於並非取決於同意的目的，如果該目的與 LGPD 不一致，則您有權反對將您的個人資料用於該目的。如果您的反對意見獲得支持，我們將不再使用您的個人資訊來開發和改善我們服務的特色和體驗。
請注意，如果您不提供或不允許收集或處理某些個人資料，則有可能會影響您的體驗質素，我們亦有可能無法實現我們服務的目標，或者我們有可能無法為您提供某些服務。
在某些情況下，您的資料會匿名化，意即無法再識別您的身分。您無法反對使用匿名化資料，因為根據 LGPD 的規定，匿名資料不能識別您的身分。我們會使用匿名化資料來改善我們的產品和服務。
G.3 LGPD 的法定權利
根據 LGPD，您有權確認有處理、查閱和更正的情況存在，或要求已處理資料的可攜性。此外，您可以索取與我們共同使用您個人資料的公共和私人實體的資訊。您亦可以索取有關不提供同意的可能性和負面後果的資訊，並要求刪除經同意處理的資料。您可以在 World App 中的設定選單選擇刪除您的資訊。
在特定情況下，您有權反對或限制我們處理您個人資料的方式，或撤銷我們處理您所提供資訊所依據的同意。
您可使用下方第 H.4 節的聯絡資訊，或透過網上請求入口網站向我們的 DPO 提交申請，以根據 LGPD 行使您的權利。如果您認為您的權利未得到充分運用，您可以填寫以下連結所載表格，向 Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (ANPD) 提出投訴：
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br/canais_atendimento/cidadao-titular-de-dados
。
G.4 您個人資料的國際傳輸
若 LGPD 適用於您，且我們已收集您的個人資料，我們亦可能將其轉送至國外。然而，我們何時皆會確保您的個人資料僅傳輸至提供足以保護 LGPD 所規定等級的外國或國際組織，如 ANPD 所發佈的恰當決定所確認。如果沒有恰當決定，我們將繼續使用 ANPD 法規中規定的標準合約條款，或當我們就國際轉移取得您具體且醒目的同意時，繼續遵循至少相當於 LGPD 中規定的保護標準。
附件 I – Tools for Humanity 處理資料的法律依據／目的
用戶
我們為何要處理資料
會處理哪些個人資料
處理的法律依據
保留期
在 World App 中建立您的帳戶
錢包地址、中繼資料、用戶名稱
合約履行
服務使用期間，或直到您要求刪除資料為止。
確保您達到符合資格的年齡
出生日期
法律義務
絕不會儲存您確切的出生日期。我們只會儲存您是否年滿 18 歲。我們會在服務使用期間或直到您要求刪除資料之前儲存此資訊。
選擇性讓您的聯絡人能輕鬆與您溝通和交易
電話號碼
同意
服務使用期間，或直到您要求刪除資料為止。
讓您能輕鬆與聯絡人溝通和交易
通訊錄聯絡人
同意
服務使用期間，或直到您要求刪除資料為止。
選擇性地顯示您附近的 Orb
位置資訊
同意
最長 24 個月。
在帳戶預防的背景下防止詐欺
中繼資料、IP 位址、裝置 ID
合法利益，即防止某些類型的欺詐的利益（類型清單）
最長 24 個月。
確保服務在您的國家／地區獲得許可
IP 位址、位置資訊
法律義務
最長 24 個月。
顯示您的自我保管錢包並提供錢包交易介面
錢包地址、交易資料
合約履行
在此背景下不會儲存個人資料。
顯示您的自我保管 World ID 並提供驗證介面
World ID 資訊
合約履行
在此背景下不會儲存個人資料。
顯示您的自我保管憑證並提供用於共用憑證的介面
憑證資訊、憑證有效性資訊
合約履行
在此背景下不會儲存個人資料。
分析和改善我們的服務，並進行數據科學研究
使用資料和中繼資料、公開交易資料
同意
最長 24 個月。
遵守適用的法律，例如反洗錢法律和制裁
交易資料、錢包地址
法律義務
服務使用期間。
遵守適用法律，例如內容法規
迷你應用程式內容
法律義務
服務使用期間。
啟用通訊和行銷
電郵地址、推播通知
合法權益
最長 24 個月。
您的通訊
合法權益
最長 24 個月。
您的意見回饋
合法權益
最長 24 個月。
處理您的客戶服務請求、投訴和查詢。
如果您試圖透過此類方式與我們溝通，則需提供通訊資料和電郵或社交媒體個人檔案名稱
合約履行
為確保應用程式運作順暢
中繼資料
合約履行
最長 24 個月。
驗證您的裝置
裝置 World ID 資料（裝置指紋）
合約履行
服務使用期間。
解決爭議、排解疑難並執行我們與您之間的協議，包括本私隱聲明和用戶條款。
服務使用期間。
業務夥伴
我們為何要處理資料
會處理哪些個人資料
處理的法律依據
保留期
通訊
電話號碼、電郵地址、姓名
合法利益，即與業務夥伴溝通的利益。
業務關係的持續時間，或直到您要求刪除資料為止。
維持和管理業務關係
電話號碼、電郵地址、姓名、企業資料
合法利益，即維持和管理與業務夥伴業務關係的利益。
業務關係的持續時間，或直到您要求刪除資料為止。
履行 KYC 義務
護照資料，企業資料
法律義務
業務關係的持續時間及終止後最長 3 年。
處理您的申請
申請資料
在簽訂合約前，應資料當事人要求而同意及採取的步驟。
預設為最長 3 個月，如果您同意成為人才庫的一員，則會更長。
TFHPS20241017
Effective October 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
TFH Developer Portal Terms
Welcome to the developer portal (“Developer Portal”) for World App Miniapps Development (“Miniapps”) and APIs (“APIs”). These Terms between you (“Developers”) and Tools for Humanity Corporation, a Delaware corporation (collectively with our affiliates, "TFH", “we” or “us”) govern your use of and access to Miniapps and the World ID APIs and all of the associated functionality, content, and services we provide to you (the “Miniapps Services”). These Terms are incorporated into and governed by the
Tools for Humanity User Terms and Conditions
(“User Terms”). Definitions not defined in these terms are defined in the User Terms. In the event of a conflict between the User Terms and these Terms, these Terms shall prevail. Please read these Terms carefully before using or accessing the Developer Portal.
Please note these especially important parts of these Terms:
The Developer Portal and Miniapps Services do not allow for any offers to sell, or the solicitations of offers to buy, any securities or Digital Tokens. You agree you will not use the Developer Portal or Miniapps Services in connection with such activity. The Miniapps Services do not constitute investment advice.
By accepting these terms you are representing that you will not try to use the Developer Portal to sell or offer securities.
Further, you acknowledge that via the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services, TFH is providing a technology platform only connecting users and Developers. At no time does TFH transmit, store, take possession of, custody, or otherwise engage with any traditional or digital currency. TFH does not process transactions, act as a payment processor, or otherwise become involved in processing transactions. All transactions happen separately between users and Developers. All transactions and related liability exist between users and Developers only. TFH has no liability in regards to transactions between users and Developers, and TFH is unable to provide support in regards to transaction problems.
1. Scope of the Terms
1.1 Eligibility.
In order to use the Developer Portal, you must comply with these Terms and all applicable laws. You cannot use the Developer Portal to conduct, promote, or help others to carry out any unlawful activity. In addition, you must meet all of the criteria referred to in TFH’s general User Terms. If you do not meet all of these requirements, you are not allowed to access or use the Developer Portal and, accordingly, we may restrict your ability to access or use the Developer Portal.
1.2 Availability.
Webpages describing the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services are accessible worldwide, but this does not mean all Services or service features are lawful or available in your country. You must meet the eligibility requirements set forth in 1.1 to access and use the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services. You may not use VPN or similar tools for the purpose of circumventing any restrictions. It is your responsibility to make sure that your use of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services are lawful where you use them. The Developer Portal and Miniapps Services are not available in all languages.
1.3 Updates.
We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. You understand and agree that your continued use of the Developer Portal or Miniapps Services after we have made any such changes constitutes your acceptance of the updated Terms. You can stop using the Developer Portal or Miniapps Services at any time if you do not wish to adhere to these Terms. Because the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services are evolving over time, we may change or discontinue all or any part of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services, at any time and without notice, at our sole discretion. We hold no liability for how these changes may affect access to and services provided by the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services.
2. Services
2.1 Account and Registration.
In order to use the Developer Portal and the Miniapp Services you are required to create an account and register on the Developer Portal.
2.1.1 Entity Level Acceptance.
If you are using the Developer Portal on behalf of an entity, you represent and warrant that you have authority to bind that entity to the Developer Terms and by accepting the Developer Terms, you are doing so on behalf of that entity (and all references to "you" in the Developer Terms refer to that entity). You further represent that neither you, nor the entity, or nor those who own or control the entity are the subject or target or any laws of sanctions programs administered by the U.S. Treasury’s Office of Foreign Assets Control or are nationals of, ordinarily resident in, or organized under the laws of Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Russia, Sudan, Syria, or the Crimea, Luhansk, Donetsk, Kherson or Zaporizhzhia regions of Ukraine or any other jurisdiction that may become subject to comprehensive sanctions by the U.S government.
2.1.2 Registration.
In order to access certain features of the Developer Portal you may be required to provide certain information (such as identification or contact details) as part of the registration process for the Developer Portal, or as part of your continued use of the APIs. Any registration information you give to TFH will always be accurate and up to date and you'll inform us promptly of any updates.
2.1.3 Developer Credentials.
Developer credentials (such as passwords, keys, and client IDs) are intended to be used by you and identify your client. You will keep your credentials confidential and make reasonable efforts to prevent and discourage other clients from using your credentials.
2.2 Miniapps Services.
Miniapps is a feature of World App that allows users to access a platform of mini applications that can be accessed (“Apps”) within World App. In this platform, users can discover, purchase, and use Apps created by you; and other users can act as developers of Apps and create, display, and monetize their apps on Miniapps. These Apps are displayed to users within World App. TFH has sole discretion of determining how Apps are presented to users within its platform.
2.2.1 Payments and Transactions related to Miniapps.
World App users may pay for products or services related to the Miniapps viewable within World App using the Digital Tokens held in their self-custodial World App wallets.
With respect to any such transactions, you acknowledge that World ID and wallet are non-custodial services. TFH does not store or custody any World App user’s Digital Tokens, and does not transact, transmit, take possession of, or otherwise have any involvement with making any transactions. Digital Tokens are always stored and transmitted on their respective blockchain network. TFH does not guarantee that your transactions will process correctly.
A transaction in Miniapps can only occur between a user’s and your non-custodial wallet. TFH only connects users to third third-parties via the Miniapps platform and is not a party to any transactions. TFH is not able to assist with transaction-related problems. TFH has no role in processing payments and cannot govern refund or cancellation charges.
2.2.2 Third-Party Service.
All products and services offered via Miniapps are offered and managed by you, a third-party to TFH. You are also responsible for any continued operation and maintenance for your miniapp viewbale within World App. We are not affiliated with you, and we cannot operate or maintain your miniapp.
You are solely responsible for the content, products, goods, or services made available via your miniapp. For any queries or disputes, World App users shall contact you directly.
2.2.3 App Development and Distribution.
By submitting a miniapp to Miniapps, you grant TFH a non-exclusive, worldwide, royalty-free license to display and promote, if TFH in its sole discretion elects to, your app.
All miniapps must comply with our App Guidelines, which are available on our
website
. TFH reserves the right to remove any miniapp that violates these guidelines. Also, you must ensure that your miniapp complies with all applicable laws and regulations, including data protection, financial regulatory, consumer protection, and criminal laws.
The ranking of miniapps within Minapps platform is determined by the popularity of the App. TFH reserves its right to highlight some miniapps that are more likely to be downloaded or purchased by Miniapps users.
2.2.4 Reputation Score.
When users make transactions via Miniapps, we may allow them to provide feedback on their interaction with you as a Developer, including but not limited to a numerical score of how their interaction went, a ‘thumbs up’ or ‘thumbs down’ feedback score, and written commentary. Such feedback may be posted on your Developer profile for other users to see. We make no guarantees as to the accuracy of such feedback.
2.3 API services
2.3.1 Permitted Access.
You will only access (or attempt to access) an API by the means described in the documentation of that API. If TFH assigns you developer credentials (e.g. client IDs), you must use them with the applicable APIs. You will not misrepresent or mask either your identity or your API client's identity when using the APIs or developer accounts.
2.3.2 API Limitations.
TFH sets and enforces limits on your use of the APIs (e.g. limiting the number of API requests that you may make or the number of users you may serve), in our sole discretion. You agree to, and will not attempt to circumvent, such limitations documented with each API. Please contact TFH if you would like to use any API beyond these limits.
2.3.3 Security.
The APIs are designed to help you enhance your websites and applications. You will use commercially reasonable efforts to protect user information collected by your API client, including personal data, from unauthorized access or use and will promptly report to your users any unauthorized access or use of such information to the extent required by applicable law.
2.3.4 Ownership.
TFH does not acquire ownership in your API clients, and by using our APIs, you do not acquire ownership of any rights in our APIs or the data that is accessed through our APIs.
2.4 User Privacy and Terms.
You will comply with all applicable privacy laws and regulations including those applying to personal data. You will provide and adhere to a privacy policy for your application built with the help of the Developer Portal that clearly and accurately describes to users of your application what user information you collect and how you use and share such information with third parties. You will provide terms and conditions for your application built with the help of the Developer Portal that clearly and accurately describes your obligations and the users’ rights and adhere to those terms.
2.5 Open Source Software.
Some of the software required by or included in our Developer Portal may be offered under an open source license. Open source software licenses constitute separate written agreements. For certain APIs, open source software is listed in the documentation. To the limited extent the open source software license expressly supersedes the Developer Terms, the open source license instead sets forth your agreement with TFH for the applicable open source software.
2.6 Non-Exclusivity.
The Developer Terms are non-exclusive. You acknowledge that TFH may develop products or services similar to the applications built with the Developer Portal or any other products or services.
3. Prohibitions
In addition to the prohibited uses stated in our User Terms, when using the Developer Portal, you may not (or allow those acting on your behalf to):
Sublicense an API for use by a third party. Consequently, you will not create an client that functions substantially the same as the APIs and offer it for use by third parties.
Promote or facilitate unlawful online gambling or disruptive commercial messages or advertisements.
Reverse engineer or attempt to extract the source code from any API or any related software, except to the extent that this restriction is expressly prohibited by applicable law.
Use the APIs for any activities where the use or failure of the APIs could lead to death, personal injury, or environmental damage (such as the operation of nuclear facilities, air traffic control, or life support systems).
Use the APIs to process or store any data that is subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations maintained by the U.S. Department of State.
Remove, obscure, or alter any TFH terms of service or any links to or notices of those terms.
Unless otherwise specified in writing by TFH, TFH does not intend use of the APIs to create obligations under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, as amended ("HIPAA"), and makes no representations that the APIs satisfy HIPAA requirements. If you are (or become) a "covered entity" or "business associate" as defined in HIPAA, you will not use the APIs for any purpose or in any manner involving transmitting protected health information to TFH unless you have received prior written consent to such use from TFH.
4. Content and Content Contribution
4.1 Contribution.
“Contribution” shall mean any original work of authorship, including the client and any modifications or additions to an existing work (“Work”), that you submit to the Developer Portal.
4.2 Copyright License to the Contribution.
Subject to these Developer Terms, You hereby grant to TFH and to other developers on the Developer Portal a perpetual, worldwide, nonexclusive, no-charge, royalty-free, irrevocable copyright license to reproduce, prepare derivative works of, publicly display, publicly perform, sublicense, and distribute your Contributions and such derivative works.
4.3 Patent License to the Contribution.
Subject to these Developer Terms, You hereby grant to TFH and to other developers on the TFH Developer Portal a perpetual, worldwide, non-exclusive, no-charge, royalty-free, irrevocable (except as stated in this section) patent license to make, have made, use, offer to sell, sell, import, and otherwise transfer the Contribution, where such license applies only to those patent claims licensable by you that are necessarily infringed by the Contribution alone or by combination of the Contribution with the Work to which such Contribution was submitted. If any entity institutes patent litigation against You or any other entity (including a cross-claim or counterclaim in a lawsuit) alleging that your Contribution, or the Work to which you have contributed, constitutes direct or contributory patent infringement, then any patent licenses granted to that entity under these Terms for that Contribution or Work shall terminate as of the date such litigation is filed.
4.4 Representations and Warranties.
You represent that you are legally entitled to grant the above license. If your employer has rights to intellectual property that you create that includes your Contributions, you represent that you have received permission to make Contributions on behalf of that employer, that your employer has waived such rights for your Contributions, or that your employer has executed a separate contribution license agreement with TFH.
You represent that each of your Contributions is your original creation. You represent that your Contribution submissions include complete details of any third-party license or other restriction (including, but not limited to, related patents and trademarks) of which you are personally aware and which are associated with any part of Your Contributions.
You are not expected to provide support for Your Contributions, except to the extent You desire to provide support. You may provide support for free, for a fee, or not at all. Unless required by applicable law or agreed to in writing, You provide Your Contributions on an “AS IS” BASIS, WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, either express or implied, including, without limitation, any warranties or conditions of TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, MERCHANTABILITY, or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.
Should You wish to submit work that is not Your original creation, You may submit it to TFH separately from any Contribution, identifying the complete details of its source and of any license or other restriction (including, but not limited to, related patents, trademarks, and license agreements) of which you are personally aware, and conspicuously marking the work as “Submitted on behalf of a third-party: [named here].”
You agree to notify TFH of any facts or circumstances of which you become aware that would make these representations inaccurate in any respect.
4.5 Prohibitions on Content.
Unless expressly permitted by the content owner or by applicable law, you will not, and will not permit your end users or others acting on your behalf to, do the following with content returned from the APIs:
Scrape, build databases, or otherwise create permanent copies of such content, or keep cached copies longer than permitted by the cache header;
Copy, translate, modify, create a derivative work of, sell, lease, lend, convey, distribute, publicly display, or sublicense to any third party;
Misrepresent the source or ownership; or
Remove, obscure, or alter any copyright, trademark, or other proprietary rights notices; or falsify or delete any author attributions, legal notices, or other labels of the origin or source of material.
5. Brand; Attribution
5.1. Brand.
"Brand" is defined as the trade names, trademarks, service marks, logos, domain names, and other distinctive brand features of each party. Except where expressly stated, the Developer Terms do not grant either party any right, title, or interest in or to the other party's Brand. All use by you of TFH's Brand (including any goodwill associated therewith) will inure to the benefit of TFH.
5.2. Attribution.
You agree to display any attributions required by TFH as described in the documentation for the API. TFH hereby grants to you a non-transferable, non-sublicenseable, nonexclusive license while the Developer Terms are in effect to display TFH Brand for the purpose of promoting or advertising that you use the APIs. You must only use the TFH Brand in accordance with the Developer Terms and for the purpose of fulfilling your obligations under this Section. In using TFH's Brand, you must follow the TFH trademark usage guidelines. You understand and agree that TFH has the sole discretion to determine whether your attribution and use of TFH's Brand are in accordance with the above requirements and guidelines.
5.3. Promotional and Marketing Use.
In the course of promoting, marketing, or demonstrating the APIs you are using and the associated TFH products, TFH may produce and distribute incidental depictions, including screenshots, video, or other content from your API Client, and may use your company or product name. You grant us all necessary rights for the above purposes.
6. Purchases, Fees and Taxes
6.1 Purchases are between Buyer and Seller.
TFH does not process user’s Digital Tokens or traditional currency and does not perform any transfers on behalf of users or you.
TFH does not handle, manage, oversee, verify or provide any sort of warranty over any transactions. Consequently, any disputes, claims, losses, misunderstandings, technical errors, or issues of any kind (both accidental and allegedly intentional) related to payments or transactions must be dealt directly between buyer and seller. TFH bears no responsibility whatsoever and will not be a party to any payment-related disputes or discussions, nor is it liable for any losses or damages the parties involved may incur.
6.2 TFH Fees.
We may add a fee for using Miniapps when users make a transaction with you. The amount of this fee will be displayed to you within the platform. All fees are displayed and current as reflected in the Miniapps Services and may be updated and changed from time to time.
6.3 Taxes.
It is your sole responsibility to determine whether, and to what extent, any taxes apply to any transaction via Miniapps or any transactions you make therein, and to withhold, collect, report and remit the correct amount of tax to the appropriate tax authorities.
7. Conduct and Content
7.1 No general monitoring.
TFH will have no general obligation to monitor information generated by users, nor actively to seek facts or circumstances indicating any illegal activity within Miniapps. However, if we become aware, irrespective of the means used, that an illegal product or service has been offered via Miniapps to users located in the European Union, we shall inform the users that have purchased the illegal product or service through Miniapps.
7.2 Prohibited Activities.
Users of Miniapps Services agree not to post or distribute any content that violates any laws or infringes any third-party rights, including but not limited to any intellectual property rights, privacy rights, or rights of publicity.
Also, you agree to not engage in any activities that:
Are unlawful, illegal, fraudulent, or harmful;
Interfere with or disrupt the operation of Miniapps;
Violate any terms set forth in our App Guidelines; and
Promote or facilitate unlawful online gambling or disruptive commercial messages or advertisements.
Include content is not permitted under the
App Guidelines
.
TFH will promptly report suspicions of criminal offenses threatening life or safety to the relevant authorities, providing all available pertinent information.
7.3 Flagging of unlawful content.
TFH has easy to access and user-friendly mechanisms for users to notify us of unlawful content in the Developer Portal. We will act expeditiously to review such reports.
7.4. Removal of unlawful content.
If we determine that any Miniapp is unlawful,its content shall be removed from the Developer Portal, andwe have the right to take down the miniapp. TFH will provide a brief, clear and specific statement of reasons to any Developer affected by the restrictions imposed on the grounds that its miniapp has unlawful content or is incompatible with applicable TFH’s terms and conditions. TFH will endeavor to enforce any restriction diligent, objective and proportionate manner.
8. Liability and Disclaimers
8.1 DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
8.1.1 Your use of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services is at your own risk. The Developer Portal, Miniapps Services, the content and all other IP are provided on an “AS-IS” and “AS AVAILABLE” basis without any representation or warranty, whether express, implied, or statutory. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, we specifically disclaim any implied warranties of title, merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, or non-infringement as to the features, content, or other IP contained in the Services. Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of implied warranties, so the above exclusions may not apply to you. We do not endorse, guarantee, or assume responsibility for any advertisements, offers, or statements made by third parties, including other users concerning the Services.
8.1.2 We do not make any representations or warranties that (a) access to all or part of the Services will be continuous, uninterrupted, timely, secure, or error-free; (b) that the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services or content are accurate, complete, reliable, or current; (c) that the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services are free of viruses or other harmful components; or (d) that the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services or the content will meet your requirements, needs, or expectations.
8.1.3 You understand and agree that we will not be liable for any damages or losses due to or relating to:
Any inaccuracy, defect, error or omission of data
Interruption in any such data;
Any routine, unannounced or unscheduled maintenance as we see fit.This includes, but is not limited to, temporary or permanent interruptions in the provision of Developer Protal or Miniapps Service deriving from or sustained as a result of such maintenance;
Any harm or damage incurred as a result of unlawful actions by third parties
Any harm or damage resulting either directly or indirectly from user actions, negligence, omissions or violations of any applicable laws and governing terms; and
Any other exceptions as described herein or in any other terms that govern your use of Miniapps.
You acknowledge that TFH has no obligation whatsoever to furnish any maintenance and support services with respect to the Apps.
8.1.4 We are not liable to you or any third party for any modification or termination of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services, or suspension or termination of your access to the Services.
8.2 LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
8.2.1 We do not exclude or limit our liability to you where it would be illegal to do so. In countries where the below types of exclusions are not allowed, we are responsible to you only for losses and damages that are a reasonably foreseeable result of our failure to use reasonable care and skill or our breach of our contract with you. This paragraph does not affect consumer rights that cannot be waived or limited by any contract or agreement.
8.2.2 To the extent permitted by law, you agree that under no circumstances will we or any of our officers, directors, employees, contractors, agents, affiliates, or subsidiaries (the “TFH Parties”) be liable to you for any indirect, punitive, incidental, special, consequential, or exemplary damages, including damages for loss of profits, goodwill, use, data, or other intangible property, whether such liability is asserted on the basis of tort or otherwise, and whether or not the TFH Parties have been advised of the possibility of such damages arising out of or in connection with: (a) your use or inability to use the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services, your Digital Tokens, or the World network; (b) inaccessibility or termination of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services; (c) any hacking, tampering, unauthorized access to or alteration of any transaction or your data; (d) any transaction or agreement entered into by you with any third party through the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services; (e) any activities or communications of third parties; (f) the actions of Orb Operators, (g) any loss of the value of any Digital Tokens; (h) any Third-Party Content accessed on or through the Miniapps Services; (i) errors, mistakes, or inaccuracies in our Content; (j) personal injury or property damage of any nature whatsoever resulting from any access to or use of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services; (k) viruses, trojan horses, or the like that may be transmitted to or through the Services; or (l) the defamatory, offensive, or unlawful conduct of any third party. This limitation of liability will apply whether the damages arise from use or misuse of, or reliance on TFH or the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services, notwithstanding any failure of essential purpose of any limited remedy and to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
8.2.3 Under no circumstances will the TFH Parties be liable to you for any direct claims, proceedings, liabilities, obligations, damages, losses, or costs in an amount exceeding $100.00. If you are dissatisfied with the Services, you agree that your sole and exclusive remedy will be for you to discontinue your use of the Services. This limitation of liability will apply to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
8.2.4 Release and Indemnification. You agree to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the TFH Parties from and against any claims, damages, costs, liabilities, reasonable attorneys’ fees, and expenses brought against a TFH Party by any third party arising out of or related to: (a) your use of the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services; (b) your violation of these Terms; (c) your violation of any rights of another person; (d) your conduct in connection with the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services; or (e) your use of WLD, any Digital Tokens, or the World network. Some jurisdictions limit consumer indemnities, so some or all of the indemnity provisions in this paragraph may not apply to you. If you are obligated to indemnify any of the TFH Parties, we reserve the right, in our sole discretion, to control any action or proceeding and to determine whether to settle and on what terms.
IF YOU ARE A CALIFORNIA RESIDENT, you waive the benefits and protections of California Civil Code § 1542, which provides: “[a] general release does not extend to claims that the creditor or releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release and that, if known by him or her, would have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor or released party.”
9. Suspension and Termination
9.1 Termination.
You may stop using our Developer Portal at any time with or without notice. Further, if you want to terminate the Developer Terms, you must provide TFH with prior written notice and upon termination, cease your use of the applicable APIs. TFH reserves the right to terminate the Developer Terms with you or discontinue the Developer Portal or any portion or feature or your access thereto for any reason and at any time without liability or other obligation to you.
9.2 Your Obligations Post-Termination.
Upon any termination of the Developer Terms or discontinuation of your access to the Developer Portal, you will immediately stop using the Developer Portal, cease all use of the TFH Brand, and delete any cached or stored content that was permitted by the cache header under Section 5. TFH may independently communicate with any account owner whose account(s) are associated with your Developer Portal and developer credentials to provide notice of the termination of your right to use the Developer Portal.
9.3 Surviving Provisions.
When the Developer Terms come to an end, those terms that by their nature are intended to continue indefinitely will continue to apply.
10. DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ARBITRATION AND WAIVER OF CLASS ACTION
10.1 PLEASE READ THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPHS CAREFULLY. THEY REQUIRE YOU TO SETTLE DISPUTES WITH US THROUGH INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION BEFORE A SOLE ARBITRATOR, AND NOT AS A MEMBER OF A CLASS ACTION. ARBITRATION PREVENTS YOU FROM SUING US IN COURT OR FROM HAVING A JURY TRIAL, THOUGH YOU MAY BRING A DISPUTE AGAINST US IN SMALL CLAIMS COURT IF YOU QUALIFY.
10.2 We will use our best efforts to resolve any potential disputes through informal, good faith negotiations. If a potential dispute arises, you must contact us by sending an email to legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com so that we can attempt to resolve it without resorting to formal dispute resolution. If we aren’t able to reach an informal resolution within 60 days of your email, and you elect to bring a federal or state statutory claim, common law claim, claim based in contract, tort, fraud, misrepresentation or any other legal theory, or any other formal proceeding arising out of or relating to these Terms, the Content, or the Services (each, a “Dispute”), then you agree to resolve the Dispute through binding arbitration, on an individual basis according to the following terms (collectively, the “Arbitration Agreement”):
Arbitration will be conducted confidentially by a single arbitrator. The arbitrator will apply applicable statutes of limitation and all applicable law and will honor claims of privilege recognized by applicable law.
The Dispute will be solely and finally settled by arbitration administered by JAMS in accordance with the JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules, unless the aggregated amount of the Dispute is $250,000 or more, in which case the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules will apply. Arbitration will occur in San Francisco, California, unless you and we both agree to conduct it elsewhere. You agree that the federal and state courts in San Francisco, California are the proper forum for any appeals of an arbitration award or for court proceedings in the event that this Agreement’s binding arbitration clause is found to be unenforceable.
In any arbitration, regardless of its location, the parties will not seek discovery from each other, and the arbitrator will not allow parties to engage in discovery; rather, each party will disclose the evidence supporting their positions at a mutually agreeable time and date prior to the final arbitration hearing.
This Arbitration Agreement covers the enforceability, revocability, scope, and validity of the Arbitration Agreement or any portion of the Arbitration Agreement, and all other Disputes arising out of or related to the interpretation or applicability of the Arbitration Agreement; and all such matters will be decided by the arbitrator and not by a court or judge.
If the arbitrator or arbitration administrator imposes filing fees or other administrative costs on you, we will reimburse you, upon request, to the extent such fees or costs would exceed those that you would otherwise have to pay if you were proceeding instead in a court. We will also pay additional fees or costs if required to do so by the arbitration administrator's rules or applicable law.
At the request of either party, all arbitration proceedings will be conducted in utmost secrecy and, in such case, all documents, testimony, and records will be received, heard, and maintained by the arbitrator in secrecy under seal, available for inspection only by the parties, their respective attorneys, and their respective experts, consultants, or witnesses who have agreed, in advance and in writing, to receive all such information as confidential to be used solely for purposes of the arbitration.
Other than class procedures and remedies discussed in this Arbitration Agreement, the arbitrator has the authority to grant any remedy that would otherwise be available in court.
Any judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction.
If the requirement to arbitrate or the prohibition against class actions and other Disputes brought on behalf of third parties contained in this Arbitration Agreement is found to be unenforceable, then only the unenforceable provisions will be deemed to have been removed from these Terms and all remaining obligations in these Terms shall continue in full force and effect.
10.3 30-Day Right to Opt Out.
You have the right to opt out and not be bound by this Arbitration Agreement by sending an email from the address you used to set up your application to legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com with the Subject Line: “ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT. You must send your email within 30 days of agreeing to these Terms, otherwise you will be bound to arbitrate Disputes in accordance with the terms of this Arbitration Agreement. If you opt out of this Arbitration Agreement, we will also not be bound by the Arbitration Agreement.
10.4 Changes to this Arbitration Agreement.
We will provide you 30 days’ notice of any changes to the section of these Terms titled
“Dispute Resolution, Arbitration and Waiver of Class Action”
by notice to you, and the changes will become effective 30 days after you receive notice from us. Changes to the
Dispute Resolution, Arbitration and Waiver of Class Action
section will otherwise apply prospectively only to Disputes that arise after the 30th day. If a court or arbitrator decides that the changes to this section are not enforceable or valid, then the changes will be severed from these Terms and the court or arbitrator will apply the terms of the first Arbitration Agreement in effect after you began using the Services. You may exercise your right to opt out of the new Arbitration Agreement terms by following the procedures set forth in the section above titled “30-Day Right to Opt Out.”
This Arbitration Agreement will survive the termination of these Terms, and your use of the Services.
Notwithstanding anything in this Arbitration Agreement to the contrary, either party may bring a lawsuit solely for injunctive relief to stop unauthorized use or abuse of the Services, or infringement of intellectual property rights (for example, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or patent rights) without first engaging in arbitration or the informal dispute resolution process described above.
11. General Provisions
11.1 No Waiver; Severability; Non-Assignability.
Our failure to enforce a provision is not a waiver of our right to do so later. If a provision is found unenforceable, the remaining provisions of these Terms will remain in full effect and an enforceable term will be substituted reflecting our intent as closely as possible, to the extent permitted by applicable law. You may not assign any of your rights under these Terms, and any such attempt will be void. We may assign our rights to any of its affiliates or subsidiaries, or to any successor in interest of any business associated with the Services.
11.2 Entire Agreement.
These Terms constitute the complete and exclusive statement of the agreement between you and us with respect to the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous understandings, agreements, representations, and warranties, both written and oral, concerning the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services. Section headings in these Terms are for convenience only and will not govern the meaning or interpretation of any provision.
11.3 Governing Laws.
These Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, including any disputes arising out of or related to them. The governing law stated in this section will apply without regard to principles of conflict of laws. You further agree that the Developer Portal and Miniapps Service will be deemed to be based solely in the State of California, and that although the Developer Portal and Miniapps Service may be available in other jurisdictions, their availability does not give rise to general or specific personal jurisdiction in any forum outside the State of California.
11.4 Relationship of the Parties.
Nothing in these Terms will be deemed or is intended to be deemed, nor will it cause you and TFH to be treated as partners, joint-venturers, or otherwise as joint associates for profit, and neither you nor TFH will be treated as the agent of the other. This includes the fact that nothing in these Terms establishes or is intended to establish any employment relationship between you and TFH.
11.5 No Professional Advice or Fiduciary Duties.
All Content provided by us is for informational purposes only and should not be construed as professional advice. You should not take, or refrain from taking, any action based on any information contained in the Developer Portal or Miniapps Services. Before you make any financial, legal, or other decisions involving the Developer Portal and Miniapps Services or any Digital Tokens, you should seek independent professional advice from an individual who is licensed and qualified in the area for which such advice would be appropriate. These Terms are not intended to, and do not, create or impose any fiduciary duties on us. To the fullest extent permitted by Law, you acknowledge and agree that we owe no fiduciary duties or liabilities to you or any other party, and that to the extent any such duties or liabilities may exist at law or in equity, those duties and liabilities are hereby irrevocably disclaimed, waived, and eliminated. You further agree that the only duties and obligations that we owe you are those set out expressly in these Terms.
11.6 Change of Control.
In the event that we are acquired by or merged with a third-party entity, or otherwise assigns certain functions to an affiliated or successor entity or other entity that we determine is in the best interest of Users, then we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign the Data we have collected from you as part of such merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control, in accordance with applicable law.
11.7 Force Majeure.
We will not be liable for delays, failure in performance, or interruption of service that result directly or indirectly from significant market volatility in Digital Tokens, any act of God, acts of civil or military authorities, acts of terrorists, civil disturbances, war, strike, health emergency, labor dispute, fire, interruption in telecommunications or Internet services or network provider services, failure of equipment or software, or any cause or condition beyond our reasonable control (each, a “Force Majeure Event”). The occurrence of a Force Majeure Event will not affect the validity and enforceability of any of the remaining provisions of these Terms.
11.8 Point of Contact.
For any issue regarding the Developer Portal, Miniapps and these Terms, please contact us via: legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com
TFHDEVTCS20241014
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Tools for Humanity Cookie Policy
This Cookie Policy explains how we, Tools for Humanity Corporation and its affiliates (collectively “we”, “our”, “us”, or “TFH”), use cookies and similar technologies, like web beacons, to track the online movement of our users when they visit our websites and other Services. A web beacon is a technique used on web pages to unobtrusively (usually invisibly) allow checking that a user has accessed some content. This Cookie Policy is incorporated into and subject to the Tools for Humanity Privacy Notice.
Depending on which of our websites you are visiting, we are using different cookies. We apply techniques of pseudonymisation to all cookies to ensure users’ privacy.
We use the following types of cookies:
Strictly Necessary Cookies:
These cookies are necessary for the Services to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you that amount to a request for services, such as logging in or filling in forms. These also include cookies we may rely on for fraud prevention. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some of the Services may not work. The legal basis for using Strictly Necessary Cookies is legitimate interest. The legitimate interest pursued is providing free information online to people who freely decide to visit that website which would not work without Strictly Necessary Cookies.
Performance/Analytics Cookies:
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our Services. They help us understand page popularity and visitors’ movement around the Services. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and is therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies, we will not know when you have used our Services and will not be able to monitor performance. The legal basis for using Performance/Analytics Cookies is the user’s consent. Your consent can be freely withdrawn at any time.
Functionality Cookies:
These cookies allow us to remember the choices you make and to tailor our Services so we can provide relevant content to you. For example, a functionality cookie can remember your preferences (e.g., country or language selection), or your username. The legal basis for using Functionality Cookies is the user’s consent. Your consent can be freely withdrawn at any time.
Here is a list of the cookies we use for different parts of the website:
Website
Cookies used
toolsforhumanity.com
On the toolsforhumanity.com website we are using Strictly Necessary Cookies and optional Performance/ Analytics Cookies (one cookie of each category). We only use analytics to improve our product. We do not use your data to sell it for third parties‘ advertising.
We and our third-party service providers employ web beacons for the reasons stated below, but primarily to help us better manage content on our Services by informing us which content is effective.
Together, these tools allow us to:
Perform website analytics;
Prevent fraud and prevent attacks against our websites and Services; and
We use cookies and trackers to assign you a unique identifier so we can record:
Websites you visit
Your IP Address
You can block cookies at any time using your web browser settings, but doing so may limit your browsing experience and your ability to use certain features of the Services.
HOW LONG WILL COOKIES STAY ON MY BROWSING DEVICE?
The length of time a cookie will stay on your browsing device depends on whether it is a "persistent" or "session" cookie. Session cookies will only stay on your device until you close your browser. Persistent cookies stay on your browsing device until they expire or are deleted.
HOW TO MANAGE COOKIES AND SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES
You have the right to decide whether to accept cookies that are not Strictly Necessary Cookies.
You can also choose how cookies (across all websites) are handled on your device via your browser settings including blocking or deleting all cookies or just third-party cookies. Each browser manufacturer is different, so check the "Help" menu of your browser to learn how to change your cookie preferences.
In addition, most advertising networks offer you a way to opt out of targeted advertising. If you would like to find out more information, please visit aboutads.info/choices/ or youronlinechoices.com.
Do Not Track: Some Internet browsers - like Internet Explorer, Firefox, and Safari - include the ability to transmit "Do Not Track" or "DNT" signals. Since uniform standards for "DNT" signals have not been adopted, our Sites do not currently process or respond to "DNT" signals.
WILL THIS COOKIE POLICY BE UPDATED?
We may update this Cookie Policy from time to time to reflect, for example, changes to the cookies we use or for other operational, legal or regulatory reasons. If we make any updates, then you will be notified when you first visit our website after the change. You can also revisit this page if you wish to keep yourself informed.
TFHCP20221214
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Cookie-Richtlinie von Tools for Humanity
In dieser Cookie-Richtlinie wird erläutert, wie wir, die Tools for Humanity Corporation und ihre verbundenen Unternehmen (zusammen „wir“, „unser“, „uns“ oder „TFH“), Cookies und ähnliche Technologien wie Web-Beacons verwenden, um die Online-Bewegung unserer Benutzer zu verfolgen, wenn sie unsere Websites und andere Dienste besuchen. Ein Web-Beacon ist eine Technik, die auf Webseiten verwendet wird, um unauffällig (normalerweise unsichtbar) zu überprüfen, ob ein Benutzer auf bestimmte Inhalte zugegriffen hat. Diese Cookie-Richtlinie wird in die
Datenschutzerklärung von Tools for Humanity
aufgenommen und unterliegt dieser.
Je nachdem, welche unserer Websites Sie besuchen, verwenden wir unterschiedliche Cookies. Wir wenden Techniken zur Pseudonymisierung für alle Cookies an, um die Privatsphäre der Benutzer zu gewährleisten.
Wir verwenden die folgenden Arten von Cookies:
Unbedingt notwendige Cookies:
Diese Cookies sind für das Funktionieren der Dienste erforderlich und können in unseren Systemen nicht ausgeschaltet werden. Sie werden in der Regel nur als Reaktion auf Handlungen Ihrerseits gespeichert, die einer Anfrage nach Diensten gleichkommen, wie z. B. das Einloggen oder das Ausfüllen von Formularen. Dazu gehören auch Cookies, die wir zur Betrugsprävention einsetzen. Sie können Ihren Browser so einstellen, dass er diese Cookies blockiert oder Sie vor ihnen warnt, aber einige der Dienste funktionieren dann möglicherweise nicht. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verwendung von unbedingt notwendigen Cookies ist ein berechtigtes Interesse. Das verfolgte berechtigte Interesse besteht darin, Personen, die sich frei entscheiden, eine Website zu besuchen, die ohne unbedingt notwendige Cookies nicht funktionieren würde, online kostenlose Informationen bereitzustellen.
Leistungs-/Analyse-Cookies:
Diese Cookies ermöglichen es uns, Besuche und Datenverkehrsquellen zu zählen, damit wir die Leistung unserer Dienste messen und verbessern können. Sie helfen uns, die Beliebtheit einer Seite und die Bewegung der Besucher in Bezug auf die Dienste zu verstehen. Alle Informationen, die diese Cookies erheben, sind aggregiert und daher anonym. Wenn Sie diese Cookies nicht zulassen, wissen wir nicht, wann Sie unsere Dienste genutzt haben, und können deren Leistung nicht überwachen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verwendung von Leistungs-/Analyse-Cookies ist die Einwilligung des Benutzers. Ihre Einwilligung kann jederzeit frei widerrufen werden.
Funktionalitäts-Cookies:
Diese Cookies ermöglichen es uns, die von Ihnen getroffenen Entscheidungen zu speichern und unsere Dienste so zu gestalten, dass wir Ihnen relevante Inhalte anbieten können. Ein Funktionalitäts-Cookie kann beispielsweise Ihre Präferenzen (z. B. Land oder Sprache) oder Ihren Benutzernamen speichern. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verwendung von Funktionalitäts-Cookies ist die Einwilligung des Benutzers. Ihre Einwilligung kann jederzeit frei widerrufen werden.
Hier ist eine Liste der Cookies, die wir für verschiedene Teile der Website verwenden:
Website
Verwendete Cookies
toolsforhumanity.com
Auf der Website toolsforhumanity.com verwenden wir nur unbedingt notwendige Cookies. Wir verwenden Ihre Daten nicht, um sie für Werbung Dritter zu verkaufen.
TFH Orb Operator Portal
Auf dem TFH Orb Operator Portal verwenden wir unbedingt notwendige Cookies, optionale Funktionalitäts-Cookies und Leistungs-/Analyse-Cookies. Wir verwenden Ihre Daten nicht, um sie für Werbung Dritter zu verkaufen.
Wir und unsere Drittanbieter setzen Web-Beacons aus den unten genannten Gründen ein, in erster Linie jedoch, damit sie uns dabei helfen, Inhalte in unseren Diensten besser zu verwalten, indem sie uns mitteilen, welche Inhalte wirksam sind.
Gemeinsam ermöglichen uns diese Tools:
Website-Analysen durchführen;
Betrug zu verhindern und Angriffe auf unsere Websites und Dienste zu unterbinden und
Wir verwenden Cookies und Tracker, um Ihnen einen eindeutige Identifikator zuzuweisen, damit wir folgende Informationen aufzeichnen können:
Websites, die Sie besuchen
Ihre IP-Adresse
Sie können Cookies jederzeit über die Einstellungen Ihres Webbrowsers blockieren, aber dies kann Ihr Surferlebnis und die Möglichkeit, bestimmte Funktionen der Dienste zu nutzen, einschränken.
WIE LANGE BLEIBEN COOKIES AUF MEINEM BROWSER-GERÄT?
Wie lange ein Cookie auf Ihrem Browser-Gerät bleibt, hängt davon ab, ob es sich um ein „dauerhaftes“ oder ein „Sitzungs“-Cookie handelt. Sitzungscookies bleiben nur auf Ihrem Gerät, bis Sie Ihren Browser schließen. Dauerhafte Cookies bleiben auf Ihrem Browser-Gerät, bis sie ablaufen oder gelöscht werden.
WIE MAN COOKIES UND ÄHNLICHE TECHNOLOGIEN VERWALTET
Sie haben das Recht zu entscheiden, ob Sie Cookies akzeptieren, die keine unbedingt notwendigen Cookies sind.
Sie können über Ihre Browsereinstellungen auch auswählen, wie Cookies (über alle Websites hinweg) auf Ihrem Gerät gehandhabt werden, einschließlich der Blockierung oder Löschung aller Cookies oder nur Cookies Dritter. Jeder Browser-Hersteller ist anders. Prüfen Sie also in Ihrem Browser den Menüpunkt „Hilfe“, um zu erfahren, wie Sie Ihre Cookie-Einstellungen ändern können.
Darüber hinaus bieten Ihnen die meisten Werbenetzwerke die Möglichkeit, gezielte Werbung abzulehnen. Wenn Sie weitere Informationen wünschen, besuchen Sie bitte aboutads.info/choices/ oder youronlinechoices.com.
Nicht verfolgen: Einige Internet-Browser – wie Internet Explorer, Firefox und Safari – bieten die Möglichkeit, „Do Not Track“- oder „DNT“-Signale zu übertragen. Da keine einheitlichen Standards für „DNT“-Signale bestehen, bearbeiten oder reagieren unsere Websites derzeit nicht auf „DNT“-Signale.
WIRD DIESE COOKIE-RICHTLINIE AKTUALISIERT?
Wir können diese Cookie-Richtlinie von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren, um beispielsweise Änderungen an den von uns verwendeten Cookies widerzuspiegeln oder aus anderen betrieblichen, rechtlichen oder regulatorischen Gründen. Wenn wir Aktualisierungen vornehmen, werden Sie benachrichtigt, wenn Sie unsere Website nach der Änderung zum ersten Mal besuchen. Sie können diese Seite auch erneut aufrufen, wenn Sie auf dem Laufenden bleiben möchten.
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Política de cookies de Tools for Humanity
Esta Política de cookies explica cómo nosotros, Tools for Humanity Corporation y sus afiliados (colectivamente, “nosotros”, “nuestro”, “nos” o “TFH”), utilizan cookies y tecnologías similares, como balizas web, para rastrear el movimiento en línea de nuestros usuarios cuando visitan nuestros sitios web y otros Servicios, incluido worldcoin.org. Una baliza web es una técnica utilizada en las páginas web para permitir de forma discreta (normalmente invisible) comprobar que un usuario ha accedido a algún contenido. Esta Política de cookies está incorporada y sujeta a la Declaración de privacidad de
Tools for Humanity
.
Dependiendo de cuál de nuestros sitios web visite, utilizamos diferentes cookies. Aplicamos técnicas de seudonimización a todas las cookies para garantizar la privacidad de los usuarios.
Utilizamos los siguientes tipos de cookies:
Cookies estrictamente necesarias:
Estas cookies son necesarias para que funcionen los Servicios y no se pueden desactivar en nuestros sistemas. Por lo general, solo se establecen en respuesta a acciones realizadas por usted que equivalen a una solicitud de servicios, como iniciar sesión o completar formularios. Estos también incluyen cookies en las que podemos confiar para la prevención del fraude. Puede configurar su navegador para que bloquee o le avise sobre estas cookies, pero es posible que algunos de los Servicios no funcionen. La base legal para el uso de Cookies estrictamente necesarias es el interés legítimo. El interés legítimo que se persigue es proporcionar información gratuita en línea a las personas que libremente deciden visitar ese sitio web que no funcionaría sin las Cookies estrictamente necesarias.
Cookies de rendimiento/análisis:
Estas cookies nos permiten contar las visitas y las fuentes de tráfico para que podamos medir y mejorar el rendimiento de nuestros Servicios. Nos ayudan a comprender la popularidad de la página y el movimiento de los visitantes en torno a los Servicios. Toda la información que recopilan estas cookies se agrega y, por lo tanto, es anónima. Si no permite estas cookies, no sabremos cuándo ha utilizado nuestros Servicios y no podremos controlar el rendimiento. La base legal para el uso de Cookies de rendimiento/analíticas es el consentimiento del usuario. Su consentimiento puede retirarse libremente en cualquier momento.
Cookies de funcionalidad:
Estas cookies nos permiten recordar las elecciones que realiza y adaptar nuestros Servicios para que podamos proporcionarle contenido relevante. Por ejemplo, una cookie de funcionalidad puede recordar sus preferencias (p. ej., selección de país o idioma) o su nombre de usuario. La base legal para el uso de Cookies de funcionalidad es el consentimiento del usuario. Su consentimiento puede retirarse libremente en cualquier momento.
Aquí hay una lista de las cookies que utilizamos para diferentes partes del sitio web:
Sitio web
Cookies utilizadas
toolsforhumanity.com
En el sitio web toolsforhumanity.com solo utilizamos cookies estrictamente necesarias. No utilizamos sus datos para venderlos para publicidad de terceros.
Portal del operador de Orb de TFH
En el Portal del operador de Orb de TFH, utilizamos cookies estrictamente necesarias, cookies de funcionalidad opcionales y cookies de rendimiento/análisis. No utilizamos sus datos para venderlos para publicidad de terceros.
Nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos empleamos balizas web por los motivos que se indican a continuación, pero principalmente para ayudarnos a administrar mejor el contenido de nuestros Servicios al informarnos qué contenido es efectivo.
Juntas, estas herramientas nos permiten:
Realizar análisis de sitios web;
Prevenir el fraude y prevenir ataques contra nuestros sitios web y Servicios; y
Usamos cookies y rastreadores para asignarle un identificador único para que podamos registrar:
Sitios web que visita
Su dirección IP
Puede bloquear las cookies en cualquier momento utilizando la configuración de su navegador web, pero hacerlo puede limitar su experiencia de navegación y su capacidad para usar ciertas funciones de los Servicios.
¿CUÁNTO TIEMPO PERMANECERÁN LAS COOKIES EN MI DISPOSITIVO DE NAVEGACIÓN?
El tiempo que permanecerá una cookie en su dispositivo de navegación depende de si se trata de una cookie "persistente" o de "sesión". Las cookies de sesión solo permanecerán en su dispositivo hasta que cierre su navegador. Las cookies persistentes permanecen en su dispositivo de navegación hasta que caduquen o se eliminen.
CÓMO GESTIONAR COOKIES Y TECNOLOGÍAS SIMILARES
Tiene derecho a decidir si acepta cookies que no sean cookies estrictamente necesarias.
También puede elegir cómo se manejan las cookies (en todos los sitios web) en su dispositivo a través de la configuración de su navegador, incluido el bloqueo o la eliminación de todas las cookies o solo las cookies de terceros. Cada fabricante de navegador es diferente, así que consulte el menú "Ayuda" de su navegador para saber cómo cambiar sus preferencias de cookies.
Además, la mayoría de las redes publicitarias le ofrecen una forma de optar por no recibir publicidad dirigida. Si desea obtener más información, visite aboutads.info/choices/ o youronlinechoices.com.
No rastrear (Do Not Track): Algunos navegadores de Internet, como Internet Explorer, Firefox y Safari, incluyen la capacidad de transmitir señales "Do Not Track" o "DNT". Dado que no se han adoptado estándares uniformes para las señales "DNT", nuestros Sitios actualmente no procesan ni responden a las señales "DNT".
¿SE ACTUALIZARÁ ESTA POLÍTICA DE COOKIES?
Es posible que actualicemos esta Política de cookies de vez en cuando para reflejar, por ejemplo, cambios en las cookies que utilizamos o por otras razones operativas, legales o reglamentarias. Si hacemos alguna actualización, se le notificará cuando visite nuestro sitio web por primera vez después del cambio. También puede volver a visitar esta página si desea mantenerse informado.
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Política de Cookies de Tools for Humanity
Esta Política de Cookies explica cómo nosotros, Tools for Humanity Corporation y sus filiales (en forma conjunta, “nosotros”, “nuestro”, “nos” o “TFH”), usamos las cookies y otras tecnologías similares, como balizas web, para rastrear el movimiento en línea de los usuarios cuando visitan nuestros sitios web y otros Servicios. Una baliza web es una técnica utilizada en las páginas web para permitir verificar con discreción (usualmente de manera invisible) que un usuario ha accedido a un contenido. Esta Política de Cookies se incorpora y está sujeta al Aviso de Privacidad de
Tools for Humanity
.
Utilizaremos cookies diferentes dependiendo de cuáles de nuestros sitios web visite. Aplicamos técnicas de seudonimización a todas las cookies para asegurar la privacidad de los usuarios.
Utilizamos los siguientes tipos de cookies:
Cookies estrictamente necesarias:
estas cookies serán necesarias para que los Servicios funcionen y no se podrán desactivar en nuestros sistemas. Por lo general, solo se crean en respuesta a las acciones realizadas por usted que equivalen a una solicitud de servicios, como el inicio de sesión o la cumplimentación de formularios. También incluyen las cookies en las que podemos basarnos para la prevención de fraudes. Puede configurar su navegador para que bloquee o le avise sobre estas cookies pero, si lo hace, es posible que algunos de los Servicios no funcionen. El sustento legal para el uso de cookies estrictamente necesarias es el interés legítimo. El interés legítimo que se busca es proporcionar información libre en línea a personas que deciden por su propia cuenta visitar el sitio web, el cual no funcionaría sin las cookies estrictamente necesarias.
Cookies de rendimiento/análisis:
estas cookies nos permiten contar las visitas y las fuentes de tráfico para poder medir y mejorar el rendimiento de nuestros Servicios. Nos ayudan a comprender la popularidad de la página y el movimiento de los visitantes en los Servicios. Toda la información que recopilan estas cookies se fusiona y, por lo tanto, es anónima. Si no permite estas cookies, no sabremos cuándo ha utilizado nuestros Servicios y no podremos monitorear el rendimiento. El sustento legal para el uso de las cookies de rendimiento/análisis es el consentimiento del usuario. Puede retirar su consentimiento a voluntad en cualquier momento.
Cookies de funcionalidad:
estas cookies nos permiten recordar las elecciones que hace y adaptar nuestros Servicios para que podamos proporcionarle contenido relevante. Por ejemplo, una cookie de funcionalidad puede recordar sus preferencias (p. ej., selección de país o idioma) o su nombre de usuario. El sustento legal para el uso de las cookies de funcionalidad es el consentimiento del usuario. Puede retirar su consentimiento a voluntad en cualquier momento.
A continuación, le presentamos una lista de las cookies que utilizamos para las diferentes partes del sitio web:
Sitio web
Cookies utilizadas
toolsforhumanity.com
En el sitio web toolsforhumanity.com solo utilizamos cookies estrictamente necesarias. No utilizamos sus datos para venderlos con fines de publicidad de terceros.
Portal del operador de Orb de TFH
En el operador de Orb de TFH utilizamos cookies estrictamente necesarias, cookies funcionales y cookies de rendimiento/análisis opcionales. No utilizamos sus datos para venderlos con fines de publicidad de terceros.
Nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos empleamos balizas web por los motivos que se indican a continuación, pero principalmente para ayudarnos a gestionar mejor el contenido de nuestros Servicios al informarnos qué contenido es efectivo.
Juntas, estas herramientas nos permitirán:
Realizar análisis de sitios web;
Prevenir fraudes y ataques contra nuestros sitios web y Servicios; y
Utilizaremos cookies y rastreadores para asignarle un identificador único que nos permita registrar:
Los sitios web que visita
Su dirección IP
Puede bloquear las cookies en cualquier momento utilizando la configuración de su navegador web, pero hacerlo podrá limitar su experiencia de navegación y su capacidad de usar ciertas características de los Servicios.
¿CUÁNTO TIEMPO PERMANECERÁN LAS COOKIES EN MI DISPOSITIVO DE NAVEGACIÓN?
La cantidad de tiempo que una cookie permanecerá en su dispositivo de navegación dependerá de si es una cookie “persistente” o de “sesión”. Las cookies de sesión solo permanecerán en su dispositivo hasta que cierre el navegador. Las cookies persistentes permanecerán en su dispositivo hasta que venzan o se eliminen.
CÓMO GESTIONAR LAS COOKIES Y TECNOLOGÍAS SIMILARES
Tiene derecho a decidir si acepta las cookies que no sean cookies estrictamente necesarias.
También puede elegir cómo las cookies (en todos los sitios web) se manejan en su dispositivo a través de la configuración de su navegador, lo que incluye bloquear o eliminar todas las cookies o solo las cookies de terceros. Cada fabricante de navegadores es diferente, de modo que deberá consultar el menú de “Ayuda” de su navegador para saber cómo cambiar sus preferencias de las cookies.
Además, la mayoría de las redes publicitarias le ofrecen una manera de optar por no ver publicidad dirigida. Si desea obtener más información, visite aboutads.info/choices/ o youronlinechoices.com.
Do Not Track (No rastrear): Algunos navegadores de Internet, como Internet Explorer, Firefox y Safari, incluyen la capacidad de transmitir señales “Do Not Track” o “DNT”. Dado que no se han adoptado estándares uniformes para las señales “DNT”, en la actualidad nuestros Sitios no procesan ni responden a señales “DNT”.
¿ESTA POLÍTICA DE COOKIES SERÁ ACTUALIZADA?
Podemos actualizar esta Política de cookies de vez en cuando para reflejar, por ejemplo, cambios a las cookies que utilizamos o por otras razones operativas, legales o regulatorias. Si hacemos alguna actualización, le será notificada cuando visite nuestro sitio web por primera vez luego del cambio. También puede volver a visitar esta página si desea mantenerse informado.
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Politique relative aux cookies de Tools for Humanity
La présente Politique relative aux cookies explique comment nous, Tools for Humanity Corporation et ses affiliés (collectivement “nous”, “notre”, “nos”, ou “TFH”), utilisons des cookies et des technologies similaires, comme les balises Web, pour suivre le mouvement en ligne de nos utilisateurs lorsqu’ils consultent nos sites Web et autres Services. Une balise Web provient d’une technique utilisée sur les pages Web pour vérifier discrètement (et généralement de manière invisible) qu’un utilisateur a accédé à un contenu spécifique. La présente Politique relative aux cookies est intégrée et soumise à l
’
Avis de confidentialité de Tools for Humanity
.
Selon le site Web que vous visitez, nous utilisons différents cookies. Nous utilisons des techniques de pseudonymisation pour garantir la confidentialité des utilisateurs.
Nous utilisons les types de cookies suivants :
Cookies strictement nécessaires :
Ces cookies sont nécessaires au fonctionnement des Services et ne peuvent pas être désactivés dans nos systèmes. Ils sont généralement définis uniquement en réponse à des actions que vous effectuez qui correspondent à une demande de services, comme la connexion ou le remplissage de formulaires. Ces cookies comprennent également les cookies sur lesquels nous pouvons nous appuyer pour la prévention de la fraude. Vous pouvez configurer votre navigateur pour qu’il bloque ces cookies ou vous alerte de leur présence, mais dans ce cas, certains Services pourraient ne pas fonctionner. La base juridique de l’utilisation des cookies strictement nécessaires est l’intérêt légitime. L’intérêt légitime recherché consiste à fournir des informations gratuites en ligne aux personnes qui décident librement de visiter ce site Web, lequel ne pourrait pas fonctionner sans les cookies strictement nécessaires.
Cookies de performance/analytiques :
Ces cookies nous permettent de compter les visites et les sources de trafic afin que nous puissions mesurer et améliorer les performances de nos Services. Ils nous aident à comprendre la popularité des pages et le mouvement des visiteurs par rapport à nos Services. Toutes les informations que ces cookies collectent sont agrégées et donc anonymes. Si vous n’autorisez pas ces cookies, nous ne saurons pas quand vous avez utilisé nos Services et nous ne serons pas en mesure de surveiller la performance. La base juridique de l’utilisation des cookies de performance/analytiques est le consentement des utilisateurs. Votre consentement peut être librement retiré à tout moment.
Cookies de fonctionnalité :
Ces cookies nous permettent de mémoriser les choix que vous faites et d’adapter nos Services afin de vous proposer un contenu qui présente un intérêt pour vous. Par exemple, un cookie de fonctionnalité peut mémoriser vos préférences (p. ex., sélection du pays ou de la langue) ou votre nom d’utilisateur. La base juridique de l’utilisation des cookies de fonctionnalité est le consentement des utilisateurs. Votre consentement peut être librement retiré à tout moment.
Veuillez trouver ci-dessous la liste des cookies que nous utilisons selon les différentes sections du site Web :
Site Web
Cookies utilisés
toolsforhumanity.com
Sur le site Web toolsforhumanity.com, nous utilisons uniquement des Cookies strictement nécessaires. Nous ne nous servons pas de vos données pour les revendre à des tiers à des fins publicitaires.
Portail opérateur Orb TFH
Sur le Portail des opérateurs TFH Orb, nous utilisons des cookies strictement nécessaires, des cookies de fonctionnalité et des cookies optionnels de performance/d’analyse. Nous ne nous servons pas de vos données pour les revendre à des tiers à des fins publicitaires.
Nous et nos prestataires de services tiers recourons aux balises Web pour les raisons indiquées ci-dessous, mais principalement pour nous aider à mieux gérer le contenu de nos Services en nous indiquant quel contenu est efficace.
Dans leur globalité, ces outils nous permettent :
d’effectuer des analyses de site Web
de prévenir la fraude et les attaques contre nos sites Web et Services. De plus,
nous avons recours à des cookies et à des traceurs pour vous attribuer un identifiant unique afin de pouvoir enregistrer :
les sites Web que vous consultez
votre adresse IP
Vous pouvez bloquer les cookies à tout moment en utilisant les paramètres de votre navigateur Web, mais cela peut limiter votre expérience de navigation et votre capacité à utiliser certaines fonctionnalités des Services.
COMBIEN DE TEMPS LES COOKIES RESTENT-ILS SUR MON NAVIGATEUR ?
La durée de conservation d’un cookie sur votre navigateur dépend du fait qu’il s’agisse d’un « cookie persistant » ou « de session ». Les cookies de session ne demeurent sur votre navigateur que jusqu’à ce que vous fermiez votre navigateur. Les cookies persistants demeurent sur votre navigateur jusqu’à leur date d’expiration ou jusqu’à ce qu’ils soient effacés.
COMMENT GÉRER LES COOKIES ET LES TECHNOLOGIES DE CE TYPE ?
Vous avez le droit de décider d’accepter ou non les cookies non strictement nécessaires.
Vous pouvez également choisir la manière dont les cookies (sur tous les sites Web) sont traités sur votre appareil via les paramètres de votre navigateur, notamment en bloquant ou en supprimant tous les cookies ou uniquement les cookies tiers. Chaque fabricant de navigateur étant différent, consultez le menu « Aide » de votre navigateur pour savoir comment modifier vos préférences en matière de cookies.
Sachez également que la plupart des réseaux publicitaires vous offrent la possibilité de refuser les publicités ciblées. Pour de plus amples informations, veuillez vous rendre sur aboutads.info/choices/ ou youronlinechoices.com.
Ne pas tracer : Certains navigateurs Internet, tels qu’Internet Explorer, Firefox et Safari, proposent une fonctionnalité pour transmettre les signaux « Ne pas tracer » ou « DNT ». Aucune norme uniforme pour les signaux « DNT » n’ayant été adoptée, nos sites ne traitent pas ni ne répondent pas aux signaux « DNT » actuellement.
LA PRÉSENTE POLITIQUE RELATIVE AUX COOKIES FERA-T-ELLE L’OBJET D’UNE MISE À JOUR ?
Nous nous réservons le droit de mettre à jour la présente politique en matière de cookies de temps à autre pour refléter, par exemple, les modifications apportées aux cookies que nous utilisons ou pour d’autres raisons opérationnelles, légales ou réglementaires. Le cas échéant, vous serez informé(e)s de toute mise à jour lors de votre première visite sur notre site Web au terme de la modification. Nous vous invitons également à consulter de nouveau la présente page pour vous tenir informé(e)s.
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity कुकी नीति
यह कुकी नीति स्पष्ट करती है कि हम, यानी Tools for Humanity Corporation और उसके सहबद्ध (सामूहिक रूप से “हम”, “हमारा/हमारी/हमारे”, “हमें/हमसे/हमने”, या “TFH”), हमारी वेबसाइट्स और अन्य सेवाओं पर हमारे उपयोगकर्ताओं के आने पर उनकी ऑनलाइन गतिविधि ट्रैक करने के लिए कुकीज़ और इस जैसी अन्य टेक्नॉलोजी, जैसे वेब बीकन्स, का उपयोग कैसे करते हैं। वेब बीकन एक ऐसी तकनीक है जिसका इस्तेमाल वेब पेजों पर सहज रूप से (आमतौर पर अदृश्य रूप से) यह पता लगाने के लिए किया जाता है कि उपयोगकर्ता ने किस सामग्री तक पहुँच प्राप्त की है। यह कुकी नीति
Tools for Humanity निजता सूचना
में शामिल है और उसके अधीन है।
हम अलग-अलग कुकीज़ का उपयोग करते हैं, जो इस पर निर्भर है कि आप हमारी किस वेबसाइट पर आ रहे हैं। हम उपयोगकर्ताओं की गोपनीयता सुनिश्चित करने के लिए सभी कुकीज़ पर छद्मनामकरण की तकनीक लागू करते हैं।
हम निम्नलिखित प्रकार की कुकीज़ का उपयोग करते हैं:
सख़्त तौर पर आवश्यक (स्ट्रिक्टली नेसेसरी) कुकीज़:
ये कुकीज़ सेवाओं के कार्य करने के लिए आवश्यक होती हैं और इन्हें हमारे सिस्टम्स में ऑफ़ नहीं किया जा सकता है। वे आमतौर पर केवल आपके द्वारा की गई कार्रवाइयों के जवाब में सेट होती हैं जो सेवाओं के लिए अनुरोध के बराबर होती हैं, जैसे लॉग इन करना या फ़ॉर्म भरना। इनमें वे कुकीज़ भी शामिल हैं जिन पर हम धोखाधड़ी की रोकथाम के लिए निर्भर हो सकते हैं। आप अपने ब्राउज़र को इन कुकीज़ को अवरुद्ध करने या आपको उनके बारे में सचेत करने के लिए निर्धारित कर सकते हैं, हालाँकि ऐसा करने पर कुछ सेवाएं कार्य नहीं कर सकती हैं। सख्त तौर पर आवश्यक कुकीज़ का इस्तेमाल करने का कानूनी आधार वैध हित है। अनुसरण किए जाने वाले वैध हितों से हमारा तात्पर्य उन लोगों को मुफ्त ऑनलाइन जानकारी प्रदान करना हैं, जो स्वतंत्र रूप से उस वेबसाइट पर जाने का निर्णय लेते हैं जो सख्त तौर पर आवश्यक कुकीज़ के बिना काम नहीं करती है।
प्रदर्शन (परफ़ॉर्मेंस)/विश्लेषणात्मक (एनालिटिक्स) कुकीज़:
उदाहरण के लिए, ये कुकीज़ हमें आगमनों की संख्या और यातायात के स्रोतों की गिनती करने की सुविधा देती हैं, ताकि हम हमारे प्लेटफ़ॉर्म के प्रदर्शन को माप सकें और उसमें सुधार कर सकें। वे पृष्ठ की लोकप्रियता और सेवाओं के लिए आने वालों की गतिविधि को समझने में हमारी मदद करती हैं।’ इन कुकीज़ द्वारा एकत्र समस्त जानकारी समूहित की जाती है और इसलिए वह बेनामी होती है। यदि आप इन कुकीज़ को अनुमति नहीं देते तो हम नहीं जान पाएंगे कि आपने कब हमारी सेवाओं का उपयोग किया है और हम उनके प्रदर्शन की निगरानी नहीं कर पाएंगे। प्रदर्शन/एनालिटिक्स कुकीज का उपयोग कानूनी आधार पर तभी किया जाता है, जब उपयोगकर्ता अपनी सहमति देता है।’ आप किसी भी समय स्वेच्छा से अपनी सहमति वापस ले सकते हैं।
कार्यक्षमता (फ़ंक्शनेलिटी) कुकीज़:
ये कुकीज़ हमें आपके द्वारा चुने गए विकल्प याद रखने की और हमारी सेवाओं को अनुकूलित करने की सुविधा देती हैं ताकि हम आपको प्रासंगिक सामग्री प्रदान कर सकें। उदाहरण के लिए, एक कार्यक्षमता कुकीज़ आपकी प्राथमिकताएं (जैसे, देश या भाषा चयन), या आपका उपयोक्तानाम याद रख सकती है। कार्यक्षमता कुकीज़ का उपयोग कानूनी आधार पर तभी किया जाता है, जब उपयोगकर्ता’ अपनी सहमति देता है। आप किसी भी समय स्वेच्छा से अपनी सहमति वापस ले सकते हैं।
यहां उन कुकीज़ की सूची दी गई है, जिनका उपयोग हम वेबसाइट के विभिन्न भागों के लिए करते हैं:
वेबसाइट
उपयोग की गई कुकीज़
toolsforhumanity.com
toolsforhumanity.com वेबसाइट पर हम केवल सख्त तौर पर आवश्यक कुकीज़ का उपयोग करते हैं। हम आपके डेटा का उपयोग तीसरे पक्ष को विज्ञापन के लिए बेचने के लिए नहीं करते हैं।
TFH ओर्ब ऑपरेटर पोर्टल
TFH ओर्ब ऑपरेटर पोर्टल पर हम सख्त तौर पर आवश्यक कुकीज़, कार्यक्षमता (फ़ंक्शनेलिटी) कुकीज़, वैकल्पिक और प्रदर्शन (परफ़ॉर्मेंस)/एनालिटिक्स कुकीज़ का उपयोग कर रहे हैं। हम आपके डेटा का उपयोग तीसरे पक्ष को विज्ञापन के लिए बेचने के लिए नहीं करते हैं।
हम और हमारे तृतीय-पक्ष सेवा प्रदाता नीचे बताए गए कारणों से वेब बीकन का उपयोग करते हैं, लेकिन वे मुख्य रूप से इसका उपयोग हमारी सेवाओं से जुड़े विषय-वस्तुओं को बेहतर ढंग से प्रबंधित करने में मदद करने के लिए करते हैं, हमें यह बताकर कि कौन-सी विषय-वस्तु प्रभावी है।
एक साथ, ये उपकरण हमें इसकी अनुमति देते हैं:
वेबसाइट एनालिटिक्स संचालित करने की सुविधा
धोखाधड़ी की रोकथाम करना और हमारी वेबसाइट्स एवं सेवाओं (Services) पर हमले को रोकना
हम आपको एक अद्वितीय आइडेंटिफ़ायर निर्धारित करने के लिए कुकीज़ और ट्रैकर्स का उपयोग करते हैं ताकि हम निम्नलिखित रिकॉर्ड कर सकें:
वे वेबसाइट्स जिन पर आप जाते हैं
आपका IP पता
आप अपनी वेब ब्राउज़र सेटिंग्स का उपयोग करके किसी भी समय कुकीज़ को अवरुद्ध कर सकते हैं, पर ऐसा करने से आपका ब्राउज़िंग अनुभव और सेवाओं की कुछ विशेषताओं का उपयोग करने की आपकी क्षमता सीमित हो सकती है।
मेरे ब्राउजिंग डिवाइस पर कूकीज कब तक रहेंगी?
आपके ब्राउजिंग डिवाइस पर कुकी कितने समय तक रहेगी यह इस बात पर निर्भर करता है कि यह "स्थायी" कुकी है या केवल एक "सत्र" की कुकी है। सत्र कुकीज़ आपके डिवाइस पर तब तक रहेंगी जब तक आप अपना ब्राउज़र बंद नहीं करते हैं। स्थायी कुकीज आपके ब्राउजिंग डिवाइस पर तब तक रहती हैं, जब तक कि उनकी जीवन-अवधि समाप्त नहीं हो जातीं हैं या हटा नहीं दी जातीं हैं।
कुकीज़ और इसी तरह की तकनीकों का प्रबंधन कैसे करें
आपके पास यह निर्णय लेने का अधिकार है कि क्या ऐसी कुकीज़ को स्वीकार किया जाए जो सख्त तौर पर ज़रूरी कुकीज़ नहीं हैं।
आप यह भी नियत कर सकते हैं कि आपके डिवाइस पर कुकीज़ (सभी वेबसाइटों पर) को कैसे नियंत्रित किया जाता है, जिसमें सभी कुकीज़ या केवल तृतीय-पक्ष कुकीज़ को अवरूद्ध करना या हटाना शामिल है। प्रत्येक ब्राउज़र निर्माता भिन्न होता है, इसलिए अपनी पसंदीदा कुकी को बदलने का तरीका जानने के लिए अपने ब्राउज़र का "सहायता" मेनू को देखें।
साथ ही, अधिकांश विज्ञापन नेटवर्क आपको लक्षित विज्ञापनों से बाहर निकलने का तरीका सुझाते हैं। यदि आप इसके बारे में अधिक जानना चाहते हैं, तो कृपया aboutads.info/choices/ या youronlinechoices.com पर जाएँ।
ट्रैक न करें: कुछ इंटरनेट ब्राउज़र - जैसे इंटरनेट एक्सप्लोरर, फ़ायरफ़ॉक्स और सफारी - में "ट्रैक न करें" या "डीएनटी" सिग्नल प्रसारित करने की क्षमता होती है। चूंकि "DNT" संकेतों के लिए समरूप मानकों को नहीं लागू किया गया है, इसलिए हमारी साइट्स अभी "DNT" संकेतों को संसाधित या प्रतिक्रिया नहीं देती हैं।
क्या यह कुकी नीति अद्यतित की जाएगी?
हम इस कुकी नीति को समय-समय पर अद्यतित कर सकते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, हमारे द्वारा उपयोग की जाने वाली कुकीज़ में बदलाव होने पर या अन्य परिचालन, कानूनी या नियामक कारणों से। कुकी नीति को अद्यतन करने पर, बदलाव के बाद जब आप पहली बार हमारी वेबसाइट पर आएंगे तब आपको सूचित किया जाएगा। यदि आप स्वयं को नवीनतम बदलावों से परिचित रखना चाहते हैं तो आप इस पृष्ठ पर फिर से जा सकते हैं।
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Kebijakan Cookie Tools for Humanity
Kebijakan Cookie ini menjelaskan cara kami, Tools for Humanity Corporation dan afiliasinya (secara bersama-sama disebut sebagai “kami” atau “TFH”), menggunakan cookie dan teknologi serupa, seperti penanda web, untuk menelusuri pergerakan online pengguna kami ketika mereka mengunjungi situs web kami dan Layanan lainnya. Penanda web adalah teknik yang digunakan pada laman web untuk mengizinkan pemeriksaan secara tidak mengganggu (biasanya secara tidak terlihat) bahwa pengguna telah mengakses beberapa konten. Kebijakan Cookie ini tercakup dan tunduk pada
Pemberitahuan Privasi Tools for Humanity
.
Bergantung pada situs web kami yang Anda kunjungi, kami menggunakan cookie yang berbeda. Kami menerapkan teknik penyamaran ke semua cookie untuk memastikan privasi pengguna.
Kami menggunakan jenis cookie berikut:
Cookie yang Sangat Diperlukan:
Cookie ini diperlukan oleh Layanan untuk berfungsi dan tidak dapat dinonaktifkan dalam sistem kami. Cookie ini biasanya hanya diatur untuk menanggapi tindakan yang Anda lakukan yang merupakan permintaan layanan, seperti login atau mengisi formulir. Cookie ini juga termasuk cookie yang dapat kami andalkan untuk mencegah penipuan. Anda dapat mengatur peramban Anda untuk memblokir atau memperingatkan Anda tentang cookie ini, namun beberapa Layanan tidak dapat berfungsi. Dasar hukum untuk menggunakan Cookie yang Sangat Diperlukan adalah kepentingan sah. Kepentingan sah yang diutamakan adalah memberikan informasi gratis secara daring kepada orang-orang yang bebas memutuskan untuk mengunjungi situs web tersebut yang tidak akan berfungsi tanpa Cookie yang Sangat Diperlukan.
Cookie Kinerja/Analitik:
Cookie ini mengizinkan kami untuk menghitung sumber kunjungan dan trafik agar kami dapat mengukur dan meningkatkan kinerja Layanan kami. Cookie ini membantu kami memahami popularitas laman dan pergerakan pengunjung di dalam Layanan. Semua informasi yang dikumpulkan oleh cookie ini diagregatkan dan oleh karena itu bersifat anonim. Jika Anda tidak mengizinkan cookie ini, kami tidak akan tahu waktunya Anda menggunakan Layanan kami dan tidak akan dapat memantau kinerjanya. Dasar hukum untuk menggunakan Cookie Kinerja/Analitik adalah persetujuan pengguna. Persetujuan Anda dapat ditarik secara bebas setiap saat.
Cookie Fungsionalitas:
Cookie ini mengizinkan kami untuk mengingat pilihan yang Anda buat dan menyesuaikan Layanan kami sehingga kami dapat menyediakan konten terkait kepada Anda. Contohnya, cookie fungsionalitas dapat mengingat preferensi Anda (misalnya, pilihan negara atau bahasa) atau nama pengguna Anda. Dasar hukum untuk menggunakan Cookie Fungsionalitas adalah persetujuan pengguna. Persetujuan Anda dapat ditarik secara bebas setiap saat.
Berikut adalah daftar cookie yang kami gunakan untuk berbagai bagian situs web:
Situs web
Cookie yang digunakan
toolsforhumanity.com
Pada situs web toolsforhumanity.com, kami hanya menggunakan Cookie yang Sangat Diperlukan. Kami tidak menggunakan data Anda untuk menjual analitik untuk iklan pihak ketiga.
Portal Operator Orb TFH
Di Portal Operator Orb TFH, kami menggunakan Cookie yang Sangat Diperlukan, Cookie Fungsionalitas opsional, dan Cookie Kinerja/Analitik. Kami tidak menggunakan data Anda untuk menjual analitik untuk iklan pihak ketiga.
Kami dan penyedia layanan pihak ketiga menggunakan penanda web karena alasan yang dinyatakan di bawah, tetapi utamanya untuk membantu kami mengelola konten Layanan kami secara lebih baik dengan memberi tahu kami konten yang efektif.
Secara bersama-sama, alat bantu ini mengizinkan kami untuk:
Melaksanakan analitik situs web;
Mencegah penipuan serta mencegah serangan terhadap situs web dan Layanan kami; dan
Kami menggunakan cookie dan penelusur untuk menetapkan penanda unik kepada Anda agar kami dapat mencatat:
Situs web yang Anda kunjungi
Alamat IP Anda
Anda dapat memblokir cookie setiap saat menggunakan pengaturan peramban web Anda. Namun, dengan melakukan hal tersebut, Anda dapat membatasi pengalaman menjelajah dan kemampuan Anda untuk menggunakan fitur tertentu pada Layanan.
BERAPA LAMA COOKIE AKAN DISIMPAN DI PERANGKAT PERAMBAN SAYA?
Durasi waktu penyimpanan cookie pada perangkat peramban Anda akan bergantung jika cookie tersebut adalah cookie “tetap” atau “sesi”. Cookie sesi hanya akan disimpan pada perangkat Anda sampai Anda menutup peramban Anda. Cookie tetap disimpan pada perangkat peramban Anda sampai cookie kedaluwarsa atau dihapus.
CARA MENGELOLA COOKIE DAN TEKNOLOGI SERUPA
Anda berhak memutuskan apakah akan menerima cookie yang bukan merupakan Cookie yang Sangat Diperlukan.
Anda juga dapat memilih cara cookie (di semua situs web) ditangani pada perangkat Anda melalui pengaturan peramban Anda termasuk memblokir atau menghapus semua cookie atau hanya cookie pihak ketiga. Setiap produsen peramban berbeda, maka periksa menu “Bantuan” peramban Anda untuk mempelajari cara mengubah preferensi cookie Anda.
Selain itu, sebagian besar jaringan periklanan menawarkan cara untuk memilih keluar dari iklan bertarget. Jika Anda ingin mengetahui informasi selengkapnya, harap kunjungi aboutads.info/choices/ atau youronlinechoices.com.
Jangan Ditelusuri: Beberapa peramban Internet - seperti Internet Explorer, Firefox, dan Safari - termasuk kemampuan untuk mentransmisikan sinyal “Jangan Ditelusuri” atau “DNT”. Karena standar keseragaman untuk sinyal “DNT” belum digunakan, Situs kami saat ini tidak memproses atau menanggapi sinyal “DNT”.
APAKAH KEBIJAKAN COOKIE INI AKAN DIPERBARUI?
Kami dapat memperbarui Kebijakan Cookie ini dari waktu ke waktu untuk mencerminkan, contohnya, perubahan terhadap cookie yang kami gunakan untuk tujuan operasi, hukum, atau regulasi. Jika kami melakukan pembaruan, maka Anda akan menerima pemberitahuan ketika pertama kali mengunjungi situs web kami setelah perubahan tersebut. Anda juga dapat mengunjungi laman ini kembali untuk mengikuti informasi terbaru.
TFHCP20230531 - AT
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity クッキーポリシー
本クッキーポリシーは、Tools for Humanityおよびその関連会社（以下、総称して、「TFH」または「当社」といいます。）が、Webビーコンなどのクッキーや類似技術を使用して、当社のウェブサイトやその他の本サービスにサクセスした利用者のオンライン上の動きを追跡する方法について説明します。Webビーコンは、ウェブページ上で使用される技術で、利用者が何らかのコンテンツにアクセスしたことを、邪魔になることなく（通常は目に見えないように）確認できるようにするものです。本クッキーポリシーは、TFHのプライバシーノーティスに組み込まれ、これに従うものとします。
ご訪問先のウェブサイトに応じて、当社は異なるクッキーを使用しています。当社は、利用者のプライバシーを確保するため、すべてのクッキーに仮名化の技術を用いています。
当社では、以下の種類のクッキーを使用しています。
不可欠なクッキー：
このクッキーは、本サービスが機能するために必要であり、当社のシステムではこのクッキーをオフにすることができません。このクッキーは、通常、ログインやフォームへの入力など、サービスの要求に対する利用者のアクションに応じてのみ設定されます。また、これには、不正防止のために当社が信頼するクッキーも含まれます。利用者は、このクッキーをブロックまたは警告するようにブラウザを設定できますが、本サービスの一部が機能しない場合があります。不可欠なクッキーを使用する法的根拠は、正当な利益であり、ここで追求される正当な利益は、不可欠なクッキーなしでは機能しないウェブサイトを訪問することを任意で決めた方々に、オンラインで無料の情報を提供することです。
パフォーマンス/分析クッキー：
このクッキーを使用すると、訪問者数やトラフィックソースをカウントすることができ、これにより本サービスのパフォーマンスを測定し、改善することができます。このクッキーは、ページの人気度や訪問者の本サービス内での動きを把握するのに役立ちます。このクッキーが収集する情報は集計であるため、匿名です。もし、利用者がこのクッキーを許可しない場合、当社は、利用者がいつ当社の本サービスを利用したのかが分からず、パフォーマンスを管理することができません。パフォーマンス/分析クッキーを使用する法的根拠は、利用者の同意です。利用者の同意は、いつでも自由に撤回することができます。
機能性クッキー：
このクッキーは、利用者による選択を記憶し、当社のサービスをカスタマイズして、利用者に関連するコンテンツを提供できるようにします。例えば、このクッキーは、利用者の好み（国や言語の選択など）やユーザー名を記憶することができます。機能性クッキーを使用する法的根拠は、利用者の同意です。利用者の同意は、いつでも自由に撤回することができます。
以下は、ウェブサイトの様々な部分で使用されているクッキーのリストです。
ウェブサイト
使用されているクッキー
toolsforhumanity.com
toolsforhumanity.comのウェブサイトでは、不可欠なクッキーと、選択可能なパフォーマンス/分析クッキー(各カテゴリーのクッキーを1つずつ）を使用しています。当社は、製品の改良のためにのみ分析を使用します。当社が、利用者のデータを、第三者の広告のための販売に使用することはありません。
当社および当社の第三者サービスプロバイダは、以下に記載されている理由でWebビーコンを採用していますが、主な理由は、どのコンテンツが効果的であるかの通知を受けることにより、当社のサービス上のコンテンツをより適切に管理するためです。
これらのツールを組み合わせることで、以下のことが可能になります。
ウェブサイト分析を実施すること
不正行為を防止し、当社のウェブサイトおよび本サービスに対する攻撃を防止すること
当社は、クッキーとトラッカーを使用して、利用者に固有の識別子を割り当て、記録します。
訪問したウェブサイト
利用者のIPアドレス
利用者は、Web ブラウザの設定により、いつでもクッキーをブロックすることができますが、それにより、ブラウズエクスペリエンスが制限されたり、本サービスの特定の機能を使用できなくなったりする場合があります。
クッキーが利用者の利用端末に保存される期間
クッキーが利用者の利用端末に保存される時間は、それが、一時的なクッキーか、永続的なクッキーかによって異なります。一時的クッキーは、利用者がブラウザを閉じるまでの間のみ、端末に残ります。永続的なクッキーは、その有効期限が切れるか、または削除されるまで、利用端末に保存されます。
クッキーおよび類似の技術を管理する方法
利用者には、不可欠なクッキー以外のクッキーを受け入れるかどうかを決定する権利があります。
また、利用者は、ブラウザの設定により、すべてのクッキーまたはサードパーティクッキーのみブロックまたは削除するなど、お使いの端末でクッキーが(すべてのWeb サイトにわたって）どのように処理されるかを選択することもできます。各ブラウザのメーカーは異なりますので、クッキーの環境を変更する方法については、お使いのブラウザの「ヘルプ」メニューでご確認ください。
さらに、ほとんどの広告ネットワークでは、ターゲティング広告をオプトアウトする方法を提供しています。詳細についてはaboutads.info/choices/またはyouronlinechoices.comをご覧ください。
トラッキング拒否：Internet Explorer、Firefox、Safariなどの一部のインターネットブラウザには、「トラッキング拒否」または「DNT（Do Not Track）」というシグナルを送信する機能が含まれていることがあります。「DNT」のシグナルの統一基準はまだ採用されていないため、当社のサイトは現在、このようなシグナルを処理または応答していません。
本クッキーポリシーのアップデート
当社は、例えば、当社が使用するクッキーの変更、またはその他の運用上、法律上もしくは規制上の要請などを反映するために、本クッキーポリシーを随時アップデートすることがあります。当社がアップデートを行った場合、利用者が変更後最初に当社のウェブサイトにアクセスされた際に、お知らせします。また、最新の情報を入手したい場合は、このページを再度読み込むことでご確認いただくことも可能できます。
TFHCP20221214 (OT)
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
툴스포휴머니티
(Tools for Humanity)
쿠키
정책
본 쿠키 정책은 당사, 툴스포휴머니티 주식회사(Tools for Humanity Corporation) 및 그 계열사(총칭하여 "당사", "우리" 또는 "TFH")가 이용자들이 당사 웹사이트 및 기타 서비스를 방문할 때 쿠키 및 웹 비콘과 같은 유사한 기술을 사용하여 이용자의 온라인 이동을 추적하는 방법을 설명합니다. 웹 비콘은 웹 페이지에서 이용자가 일부 콘텐츠에 액세스했음을 눈에 띄지 않게(일반적으로 보이지 않게) 확인할 수 있도록 하는 기술입니다. 본 쿠키 정책은 툴스포휴머니티 개인정보 처리방침에 통합되어 있으며 그 적용을 받습니다.
귀하가 방문하는 웹사이트에 따라 당사는 서로 다른 쿠키를 사용합니다. 당사는 이용자의 개인정보를 보호하기 위해 모든 쿠키에 가명화 기술을 적용합니다.
당사는 다음과 같은 유형의 쿠키를 사용합니다:
필수
쿠키
(Strictly Necessary Cookies):
이러한 쿠키는 서비스 작동에 필수적이며 당사 시스템에서 해제할 수 없습니다. 일반적으로 로그인이나 양식 작성과 같이 서비스 요청에 해당하는 귀하의 행위에 대한 응답으로만 설정됩니다. 여기에는 사기 방지를 위해 당사가 사용할 수 있는 쿠키도 포함됩니다. 귀하는 이러한 쿠키를 차단하거나 경고하도록 브라우저를 설정할 수 있지만 일부 서비스가 작동하지 않을 수 있습니다. 필수 쿠키 사용의 법적 근거는 정당한 이익입니다. 추구되는 정당한 이익은 필수 쿠키 없이 작동하지 않는 웹사이트를 자유롭게 방문하는 사람들에게 온라인에서 무료 정보를 제공하는 것입니다.
성능
/
분석
쿠키
(Performance/Analytics Cookies):
이러한 쿠키를 통해 방문 및 트래픽 소스를 집계하여 서비스 성능을 측정하고 개선할 수 있습니다. 이러한 쿠키는 페이지 인기도와 서비스 내 방문자의 움직임을 이해하는 데 도움이 됩니다. 이러한 쿠키가 수집하는 모든 정보는 총계처리되며, 익명입니다. 이러한 쿠키를 허용하지 않으면 당사는 귀하가 당사 서비스를 언제 사용했는지 알 수 없으며 성능을 모니터링할 수 없습니다. 성능/분석 쿠키 사용의 법적 근거는 이용자의 동의입니다. 귀하의 동의는 언제든지 자유롭게 철회될 수 있습니다.
기능
쿠키
(Functionality Cookies):
이러한 쿠키를 통해 당사는 귀하가 선택한 사항을 기억하고 서비스를 맞춤화하여 귀하에게 관련 있는 콘텐츠를 제공할 수 있습니다. 예를 들어, 기능 쿠키는 귀하의 기호 설정(예: 국가 또는 언어 선택) 또는 사용자 이름을 기억할 수 있습니다. 기능 쿠키 사용의 법적 근거는 이용자의 동의입니다. 귀하의 동의는 언제든지 자유롭게 철회될 수 있습니다
다음은 웹사이트의 여러 부분에서 당사가 사용하는 쿠키 목록입니다:
웹사이트
사용된 쿠키
toolsforhumanity.com
toolsforhumanity.com 웹사이트에서는 필수 쿠키와 선택적 성능/분석 쿠키(각 카테고리별 쿠키 1개씩)를 사용합니다. 당사는 제품 개선을 위해서만 분석을 사용합니다. 당사는 귀하의 데이터를 제3자 광고를 위해 판매하기 위해 사용하지 않습니다.
당사와 제3자 서비스 제공업체는 아래에 명시된 이유로 웹 비콘을 사용하지만, 주로 어떤 콘텐츠가 효과적인지 알려줌으로써 당사 서비스에서 콘텐츠를 더 잘 관리할 수 있도록 돕기 위한 것입니다.
이러한 도구를 함께 사용하면 당사는 다음을 수행할 수 있습니다:
웹사이트 분석
사기 방지 및 당사 웹사이트 및 서비스에 대한 공격 방지
당사는 다음을 기록할 수 있기 위해 귀하에게 고유 식별자를 할당하기 위한 쿠키와 추적기를 사용합니다:
귀하가 방문하는 웹사이트
귀하의 IP 주소
귀하는 웹 브라우저 설정을 사용하여 언제든지 쿠키를 차단할 수 있지만, 그러한 경우 귀하의 브라우징 경험과 서비스의 특정 기능을 사용하는 데 제한이 생길 수 있습니다.
쿠키가
내
브라우징
기기에
얼마나
오래
남아
있나요
?
쿠키가 브라우징 기기에 머무는 기간은 “영구(persistent)” 쿠키인지 “세션(session)” 쿠키인지에 따라 다릅니다. 세션 쿠키는 브라우저를 닫을 때까지만 기기에 남아 있습니다. 영구 쿠키는 만료되거나 삭제될 때까지 브라우징 기기에 남아 있습니다.
쿠키
및
유사
기술
관리
방법
귀하는 필수 쿠키가 아닌 쿠키를 수락할지 여부를 결정할 권리가 있습니다.
또한 브라우저 설정을 통해 모든 쿠키 또는 제3자 쿠키만 차단하거나 삭제하는 등 디바이스에서 (모든 웹사이트에 걸쳐) 쿠키가 처리되는 방식을 선택할 수 있습니다. 브라우저 제조사가 다르므로, 브라우저의 “도움말(Help)” 메뉴에서 쿠키 설정을 변경하는 방법을 확인하세요.
또한 대부분의 광고 네트워크에서는 타겟 광고를 수신 거부할 수 있는 방법을 제공합니다. 자세한 내용을 알아보려면 aboutads.info/choices/ 또는 youronlinechoices.com을 방문하세요.
추적 금지: 인터넷 익스플로러, 파이어폭스, 사파리 등 일부 인터넷 브라우저에는 "추적 금지(Do Not Track)" 또는 "DNT" 신호를 전송할 수 있는 기능이 포함되어 있습니다. "DNT" 신호에 대한 통일된 표준이 채택되지 않았기 때문에 현재 당사 사이트는 "DNT" 신호를 처리하거나 이에 응답하지 않습니다.
이
쿠키
정책이
업데이트되나요
?
당사는 예컨대 당사가 사용하는 쿠키의 변경 또는 기타 운영, 법률 또는 규제상의 이유로 본 쿠키 정책을 수시로 업데이트할 수 있습니다. 당사가 업데이트를 하는 경우 변경 후 당사 웹사이트를 처음 방문할 때 알림을 받게 됩니다. 또한 귀하는 이 페이지를 다시 방문하여 최신 정보를 확인할 수도 있습니다.
TFHCP20221214
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Dasar Kuki Tools for Humanity
Dasar Kuki ini menerangkan bagaimana Tools for Humanity Corporation dan ahli gabungannya (secara kolektif “kita”, “milik kami”, “kami” atau “TFH”), menggunakan kuki dan teknologi seumpamanya, seperti suar web, untuk menjejaki pergerakan dalam talian pengguna kami apabila mereka layari laman sesawang kami dan Perkhidmatan- lain. Suar web adalah teknik yang digunakan pada halaman sesawang untuk memeriksa secara tersembunyi (biasanya secara tidak kelihatan) sama ada pengguna telah mengakses sesuatu kandungan. Dasar Kuki ini digunapakai dan berlandaskan pada Notis Privasi Tools for Humanity.
Bergantung pada laman sesawang kami yang anda layari, kami menggunakan kuki yang berbeza. Kami menggunakan teknik nama samaran pada semua kuki untuk memastikan privasi pengguna terjamin.
Kami menggunakan jenis kuki berikut:
Kuki Yang Amat Diperlukan:
Kuki ini diperlukan untuk Perkhidmatan berfungsi dan tidak boleh dihentikan dalam sistem kami. Biasanya, kuki hanya digunakan apabila anda melakukan tindakan yang menunjukkan permintaan perkhidmatan, seperti log masuk atau mengisi borang. Ini juga termasuk kuki yang digunakan bagi tujuan mencegah penipuan. Anda boleh menetapkan penyemak imbas anda untuk menyekat atau memaklumkan anda tentang kuki ini, tetapi sesetengah Perkhidmatan mungkin tidak berfungsi. Asas undang-undang untuk menggunakan Kuki Yang Amat Diperlukan ini adalah untuk kepentingan sah. Matlamat yang sah adalah untuk menyediakan maklumat percuma dalam talian kepada individu yang bebas memilih untuk melayari laman sesawang tersebut yang tidak akan berfungsi tanpa Kuki yang Amat Diperlukan.
Kuki Prestasi/Analitik:
Kuki ini membolehkan kami mengira lawatan dan sumber trafik supaya kami boleh mengukur dan meningkatkan prestasi Perkhidmatan kami. Kuki ini membantu kami memahami populariti halaman dan pergerakan pelawat di sekitar Perkhidmatan. Semua maklumat yang dikumpul oleh kuki ini dikumpulkan secara keseluruhan dan oleh itu adalah secara tanpa nama. Jika anda tidak membenarkan kuki ini, kami tidak akan tahu bila anda telah menggunakan Perkhidmatan kami dan kami tidak akan dapat memantau prestasi Perkhidmatan kami. Asas undang-undang untuk menggunakan Kuki Prestasi/Analitik adalah persetujuan pengguna. Persetujuan anda boleh ditarik balik secara sukarela pada bila-bila masa.
Kuki Kefungsian:
Kuki ini membolehkan kami mengingati pilihan yang anda buat dan menyesuaikan Perkhidmatan kami supaya kami boleh menyediakan kandungan yang bersesuaian untuk anda. Contohnya, kuki kefungsian boleh mengingati pilihan anda (cth, pemilihan negara atau bahasa), atau nama pengguna anda. Asas undang-undang untuk menggunakan Kuki Fungsian adalah persetujuan pengguna. Persetujuan anda boleh ditarik balik secara sukarela pada bila-bila masa.
Berikut ialah senarai kuki yang kami gunakan untuk bahagian laman sesawang yang berlainan:
Laman Web
Kuki yang digunakan
toolsforhumanity.com
Di laman sesawang toolsforhumanity.com kami menggunakan Kuki yang Amat Diperlukan dan Kuki Prestasi/Analitik pilihan (satu kuki bagi setiap kategori). Kami hanya menggunakan analitik untuk menambah baik produk kami. Kami tidak menjual data anda kepada pihak ketiga untuk tujuan pengiklanan.
Kami dan pembekal perkhidmatan pihak ketiga kami menggunakan suar web atas sebab-sebab yang dinyatakan di bawah, terutamanya untuk membantu kami mengurus kandungan pada Perkhidmatan kami dengan lebih baik dengan memaklumkan kepada kami kandungan yang berkesan.
Bersama-sama, alatan ini membolehkan kami:
Melakukan analisis laman sesawang;
Mencegah penipuan dan mencegah serangan terhadap laman sesawang dan Perkhidmatan kami; dan
Kami menggunakan kuki dan penjejak untuk memberikan anda pengecam unik supaya kami boleh merekodkan:
Laman sesawang yang anda layari
Alamat IP Anda
Anda boleh menyekat kuki pada bila-bila masa menggunakan tetapan pelayar sesawang anda, tetapi melakukan sedemikian boleh mengehadkan pengalaman pelayar sesawang anda dan keupayaan anda untuk menggunakan ciri tertentu Perkhidmatan tersebut.
BERAPA LAMA KUKI AKAN KEKAL DI PERANTI PENYEMAK IMBAS SAYA?
Tempoh masa kuki akan kekal pada peranti pelayar sesawang anda bergantung pada sama ada ia adalah kuki “berterusan” atau “bersesi”. Kuki bersesi hanya akan kekal pada peranti anda sehingga anda menutup pelayar sesawang anda. Kuki berterusan akan kekal pada peranti pelayar sesawang anda sehingga tamat tempoh atau dipadamkan.
CARA MENGURUS KUKI DAN TEKNOLOGI YANG SEUMPAMA
Anda berhak untuk memutuskan sama ada untuk menerima kuki yang bukan Kuki yang Amat Diperlukan.
Anda juga boleh memilih cara kuki (merentas semua laman sesawang) dikendalikan pada peranti anda melalui tetapan pelayar sesawang anda termasuk menyekat atau memadam semua kuki atau hanya kuki dari pihak ketiga. Setiap pengeluar pelayar sesawang adalah berbeza, jadi semak menu “Bantuan” pelayar sesawang anda untuk mengetahui cara menukar pilihan kuki anda.
Selain itu, kebanyakan rangkaian pengiklanan menawarkan anda cara untuk menarik diri daripada pengiklanan yang disasarkan. Jika anda ingin mengetahui maklumat lanjut, sila lawati aboutads.info/choices/ atau youronlinechoices.com.
Jangan Jejak: Sesetengah pelayar Internet - seperti Internet Explorer, Firefox dan Safari - mempunyai keupayaan untuk menghantar isyarat “Jangan Jejak” atau “DNT”. Memandangkan standard seragam untuk isyarat “DNT” belum diterima pakai, Laman kami tidak memproses atau bertindak balas kepada isyarat “DNT” pada masa ini.
ADAKAH DASAR KUKI INI AKAN DIKEMAS KINI?
Kami mungkin mengemas kini Dasar Kuki ini dari semasa ke semasa untuk mencerminkan, sebagai contoh, perubahan pada kuki yang kami gunakan atau atas sebab operasi, undang-undang atau peraturan yang lain. Sekiranya terdapat sebarang kemas kini, anda akan diberitahu apabila anda melayari laman sesawang kami selepas perubahan itu berlaku. Anda juga boleh melawat semula laman ini jika anda ingin terus dimaklumkan.
TFHCP20221214 (OT)
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Polityka plików cookie Tools for Humanity
Niniejsza Polityka plików cookie wyjaśnia, w jaki sposób my, Tools for Humanity Corporation i nasze jednostki stowarzyszone (łącznie zwane dalej „my”, „nasz”, „nas” lub „TFH”), wykorzystujemy pliki cookie i podobne technologie, takie jak sygnały nawigacyjne, do śledzenia aktywności online naszych użytkowników podczas odwiedzania naszych witryn internetowych i innych Usług. Sygnał nawigacyjny to technika stosowana na stronach internetowych w celu dyskretnego (zwykle niewidocznego) sprawdzenia, czy użytkownik uzyskał dostęp do niektórych treści. Niniejsza Polityka plików cookie jest częścią Informacji o ochronie prywatności Tools for Humanity i podlega jej.
W zależności od tego, którą z naszych stron internetowych użytkownik odwiedza, używamy różnych plików cookie. Stosujemy techniki pseudonimizacji do wszystkich plików cookie, aby zapewnić prywatność użytkowników.
Używamy następujących rodzajów plików cookie:
Ściśle niezbędne pliki cookie:
Te pliki cookie są niezbędne do działania Usług i nie można ich wyłączyć w naszych systemach. Tworzone są zazwyczaj jedynie w odpowiedzi na wykonywane przez użytkownika czynności polegające na żądaniu dostępu do usług, takie jak logowanie się albo wypełnianie formularzy. Obejmują one również pliki cookie, które wykorzystujemy w celu zapobiegania oszustwom. Użytkownik może zmienić ustawienia swojej przeglądarki, aby blokowała te pliki cookie albo ostrzegała przed nimi, ale spowoduje to, że niektóre Usługi nie będą działać. Podstawą prawną korzystania z niezbędnych plików cookie jest nasz uzasadniony interes. Naszym prawnie uzasadnionym interesem jest przekazywanie bezpłatnych informacji online osobom, które dobrowolnie decydują się odwiedzić tę stronę internetową, która nie działałaby bez niezbędnych plików cookie.
Pliki cookie poprawiające wydajność/Analityczne pliki cookie:
Są to pliki cookie, które umożliwiają nam określenie liczby i źródeł odwiedzin, dzięki czemu możemy dokonywać pomiarów i doskonalić wydajność naszych Usług. Pomagają nam one poznać popularność stron i sposób korzystania z Usług przez odwiedzających. Wszystkie informacje gromadzone przez takie pliki cookie mają charakter informacji zbiorczych, a przez to są anonimowe. Jeżeli użytkownik nie zaakceptuje tych plików cookie, nie będziemy wiedzieć, kiedy odwiedził on nasze Usługi i nie będziemy w stanie monitorować ich wydajności. Podstawą prawną korzystania z plików cookie poprawiających wydajność/analitycznych jest zgoda użytkownika. Zgodę można wycofać w dowolnym momencie.
Funkcyjne pliki cookie:
Te pliki cookie umożliwiają nam zapamiętanie wyborów użytkownika i dopasowanie Usług tak, byśmy mogli przedstawiać użytkownikowi treści odpowiadające potrzebom użytkownika. Na przykład funkcyjne pliki cookie mogą zapisywać preferencje użytkownika (np. wybór kraju albo języka) albo nazwę użytkownika. Podstawą prawną do korzystania z funkcjonalnych plików cookie jest zgoda użytkownika. Zgodę można wycofać w dowolnym momencie.
Poniżej znajduje się lista plików cookie, których używamy w różnych częściach strony internetowej:
Strona internetowa
Wykorzystywane pliki cookie
toolsforhumanity.com
Na stronie toolsforhumanity.com używamy niezbędnych plików cookie i opcjonalnych plików cookie poprawiających wydajność/analitycznych (po jednym pliku cookie z każdej kategorii). Korzystamy z analiz wyłącznie w celu ulepszenia naszego produktu. Nie wykorzystujemy danych użytkownika w celu ich sprzedaży na potrzeby reklam podmiotów zewnętrznych.
My i nasi usługodawcy zewnętrzni korzystamy z sygnałów nawigacyjnych w celach podanych poniżej, jednak głównie w celu wsparcia lepszego zarządzania przez nas zawartością naszych Usług poprzez zdobywanie informacji na temat skuteczności poszczególnych rodzajów zawartości.
Wszystkie te narzędzia te umożliwiają nam:
analizowanie strony internetowej;
zapobieganie oszustwom i atakom na nasze strony internetowe i Usługi; oraz
Używamy plików cookie i plików śledzących, aby przypisać użytkownikowi unikalny identyfikator, dzięki któremu możemy rejestrować:
odwiedzane przez niego strony internetowe;
adres IP użytkownika.
Użytkownik może zablokować pliki cookie w dowolnym momencie za pomocą ustawień przeglądarki internetowej, ale może to ograniczyć jego wygodę przeglądania i możliwość korzystania z niektórych funkcji Usług.
JAK DŁUGO PLIKI COOKIE POZOSTANĄ NA MOIM URZĄDZENIU?
Czas przechowywania pliku cookie na urządzeniu użytkownika zależy od tego, czy jest to plik cookie „trwały” czy „sesyjny”. Sesyjne pliki cookie pozostaną na urządzeniu użytkownika tylko do momentu zamknięcia przez niego przeglądarki. Trwałe pliki cookie pozostają na urządzeniu użytkownika do momentu ich wygaśnięcia lub usunięcia.
JAK ZARZĄDZAĆ PLIKAMI COOKIE I PODOBNYMI TECHNOLOGIAMI
Użytkownik ma prawo zdecydować, czy akceptować pliki cookie, o ile nie są to niezbędne pliki cookie.
Użytkownik może również wybrać sposób obsługi plików cookie (we wszystkich stronach internetowych) na swoim urządzeniu, w tym blokować lub usuwać wszystkie pliki cookie lub tylko pliki cookie podmiotów zewnętrznych, za pomocą ustawień przeglądarki. Każdy producent przeglądarki przyjmuje inne podejście; aby dowiedzieć się, jak zmienić ustawienia dotyczące plików cookie, należy wejść do menu „Pomoc” przeglądarki.
Ponadto większość sieci reklamowych oferuje użytkownikowi możliwość rezygnacji z reklamy ukierunkowanej. Aby uzyskać więcej informacji, prosimy odwiedzić stronę aboutads.info/choices/ albo youronlinechoices.com.
Ochrona przed śledzeniem (Do Not Track, DNT): Niektóre przeglądarki internetowe, takie jak Internet Explorer, Firefox i Safari, mają możliwość przesyłania sygnałów „Nie śledź” („Do Not Track”, „DNT”). Ponieważ nie przyjęto jednolitych standardów dotyczących sygnałów „DNT”, nasze Strony nie przetwarzają obecnie sygnałów „DNT” ani nie reagują na nie.
CZY TA POLITYKA PLIKÓW COOKIE BĘDZIE AKTUALIZOWANA?
Możemy okresowo aktualizować niniejszą Politykę dotyczącą plików cookie, na przykład w celu odzwierciedlenia zmian w plikach cookie, które wykorzystujemy, albo z innych względów operacyjnych, prawnych albo regulacyjnych. Jeśli wprowadzimy jakiekolwiek aktualizacje, użytkownik zostanie o tym powiadomiony przy pierwszej wizycie na naszej stronie internetowej po wprowadzeniu zmian. Bieżące informacje można również uzyskać, odwiedzając tę stronę.
TFHCP20221214 AT
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Política de Cookies da Tools for Humanity
Esta Política de Cookies explica como nós, a Tools for Humanity Corporation e as suas filiais (coletivamente “nós”, “nosso(s)/nossa(s)”, “nos ou “TFH”), utilizamos cookies e tecnologias similares, tal como os web beacons, para seguir o movimento online dos nossos utilizadores, quando visitam os nossos websites e outros Serviços. Um web beacon é uma técnica utilizada em páginas web para permitir discretamente (geralmente de forma invisível) verificar se um utilizador acedeu a algum conteúdo. Esta Política de Cookies é incorporada e está sujeita à
Declaração de Confidencialidade da Tools for Humanity
.
Dependendo de qual dos nossos websites está a visitar, estamos a utilizar cookies diferentes. Aplicamos técnicas de pseudonimização para todos os cookies, para garantir a privacidade dos utilizadores.
Usamos os seguintes tipos de cookies:
Cookies estritamente necessários:
Estes cookies são necessários para que os Serviços funcionem e não podem ser desativados nos nossos sistemas. Estes, habitualmente, apenas são definidos em resposta a ações realizadas por si que correspondem a um pedido de serviços, tal como iniciar sessão ou preencher formulários. Estes também incluem cookies em que podemos confiar para a prevenção de fraudes. Pode configurar o seu navegador para bloquear ou alertá-lo sobre estes cookies, mas alguns dos Serviços podem não funcionar. O fundamento jurídico para a utilização de cookies estritamente necessários é o interesse legítimo. O interesse legítimo empreendido é o fornecimento de informação gratuita online a pessoas que decidam livremente visitar esse website que não funcionaria sem os cookies estritamente necessários.
Cookies de desempenho/análise:
Estes cookies permitem-nos contar as visitas e fontes de tráfego para que possamos medir e melhorar o desempenho dos nossos Serviços. Ajudam-nos a compreender a popularidade da página e o movimento dos visitantes em torno dos Serviços. Todas as informações que estes cookies recolhem são agregadas e são, portanto, anónimas. Se não permitir estes cookies, não saberemos quando utilizou os nossos Serviços e não poderemos monitorizar o respetivo desempenho. O fundamento jurídico para usar os cookies de desempenho/análise é o consentimento dos utilizadores. O seu consentimento pode ser retirado livremente em qualquer altura.
Cookies de funcionalidade:
Estes cookies permitem-nos lembrar as escolhas que faz e personalizar os nossos Serviços para que possamos fornecer-lhe conteúdo relevante. Por exemplo, um cookie de funcionalidade pode lembrar as suas preferências (por exemplo, seleção de país ou idioma) ou o seu nome de utilizador. O fundamento jurídico para usar os cookies de funcionalidade é o consentimento dos utilizadores. O seu consentimento pode ser retirado livremente em qualquer altura.
Aqui encontra uma lista dos cookies que utilizamos para as diferentes partes do website:
Website
Cookies usados
toolsforhumanity.com
No website toolsforhumanity.com, apenas utilizamos Cookies Estritamente Necessários. Não usamos os seus dados para vendê-los para publicidade de terceiros.
Portal do Operador Orb da TFH
No Portal do Operador Orb da TFH utilizamos cookies estritamente necessários, cookies funcionais opcionais e cookies de desempenho/análise. Não usamos os seus dados para vendê-los para publicidade de terceiros.
Nós e o nosso fornecedor de serviços externo empregamos web beacons pelos motivos indicados abaixo, mas principalmente para nos ajudar a melhor gerir o conteúdo nos nossos Serviços, informando-nos que conteúdo é eficaz.
De forma conjunta, estas ferramentas permitem-nos:
Executar análise do website;
Prevenir fraudes e ataques contra os nossos websites e Serviços; e
Usamos cookies e rastreadores para lhe atribuir um identificador único para que possamos registar:
Websites que visita
O seu endereço IP
Pode bloquear cookies a qualquer momento usando as definições do seu navegador, mas fazê-lo pode limitar a sua experiência de navegação e a sua capacidade de usar determinadas funcionalidades dos Serviços.
DURANTE QUANTO TEMPO FICARÃO OS COOKIES NO MEU DISPOSITIVO DE NAVEGAÇÃO?
O tempo de permanência de um cookie no seu dispositivo de navegação depende se é um cookie "persistente" ou de "sessão". Os cookies de sessão apenas permanecerão no seu dispositivo até que feche o seu navegador. Os cookies persistentes permanecem no seu dispositivo de navegação até estes expirarem ou serem eliminados.
COMO GERIR OS COOKIES E TECNOLOGIAS SEMELHANTES
Tem o direito de decidir se aceita ou não cookies que não sejam cookies estritamente necessários.
Pode também escolher como os cookies (em todos os websites) são tratados no seu dispositivo através das definições do seu navegador, incluindo o bloqueio ou eliminação de todos os cookies ou apenas cookies de terceiros. Cada fabricante de navegador é diferente, por isso verifique o menu "Ajuda" do seu navegador para saber como alterar as suas preferências de cookies.
Adicionalmente, a maioria das redes de publicidade oferecem-lhe uma forma de autoexcluir-se da publicidade orientada. Se pretender obter mais informações, visite aboutads.info/choices/ ou youronlinechoices.com.
Não rastrear: Alguns navegadores de Internet - como o Internet Explorer, Firefox, e Safari - incluem a capacidade de transmitir sinais "Não Rastrear" ou "DNT". Uma vez que não foram adotados sinais uniformes para sinais "DNT", os nossos Sites não processam nem respondem atualmente aos sinais "DNT".
ESTA POLÍTICA DE COOKIES SERÁ ATUALIZADA?
Podemos atualizar esta Política de Cookie de tempos a tempos para refletir, por exemplo, alterações aos cookies que utilizamos ou por outras razões operacionais, legais ou regulamentares. Se fizermos qualquer atualização, então será notificado quando visitar o nosso website pela primeira vez após a alteração. Pode também revisitar esta página se desejar manter-se informado.
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Política de Cookies da Tools for Humanity
Esta Política de Cookies explica como nós, a Tools for Humanity (coletivamente "nós", "nosso", "nos" ou "TFH"), usamos cookies e tecnologias semelhantes, como web beacons, para rastrear o movimento on-line de nossos usuários quando eles visitam nossos sites e outros Serviços. Um web beacon é uma técnica usada em páginas da Web para permitir, de forma discreta (geralmente invisível), a verificação de que um usuário acessou algum conteúdo. Esta Política de Cookies está incorporada e sujeita ao
Aviso de Privacidade da Tools for Humanity
.
Dependendo de qual dos nossos sites você está visitando, utilizamos cookies diferentes. Aplicamos técnicas de pseudonimização a todos os cookies para garantir a privacidade dos utilizadores.
Usamos os seguintes tipos de cookies:
Cookies estritamente necessários:
Esses cookies são necessários para o funcionamento dos Serviços e não podem ser desativados em nossos sistemas. Normalmente, eles são definidos apenas em resposta a ações feitas por você que equivalem a uma solicitação de serviços, como fazer login ou preencher formulários.
Isso também inclui cookies dos quais podemos depender para prevenção de fraudes. Você pode configurar seu navegador para bloquear ou alertá-lo sobre esses cookies, mas alguns dos Serviços podem não funcionar. A base legal para o uso dos cookies estritamente necessários é o interesse legítimo. O interesse legítimo buscado é fornecer informações gratuitas on-line a pessoas que decidem livremente visitar esse site, que não funcionaria sem os cookies estritamente necessários.
Cookies de desempenho/analíticos:
Esses cookies nos permitem contar as visitas e as fontes de tráfego para que possamos medir e melhorar o desempenho de nossos Serviços. Eles nos ajudam a entender a popularidade da página e a movimentação dos visitantes nos Serviços. Todas as informações coletadas por esses cookies são agregadas e, portanto, anônimas. Se você não permitir esses cookies, não saberemos quando você usou nossos Serviços e não poderemos monitorar o desempenho. A base legal para o uso de cookies de desempenho/analíticos é o consentimento do usuário. Seu consentimento pode ser livremente retirado a qualquer momento.
Cookies de funcionalidade:
Esses cookies nos permitem lembrar as escolhas que você faz e adaptar nossos Serviços para que possamos fornecer conteúdo relevante para você. Por exemplo, um cookie de funcionalidade pode lembrar suas preferências (por exemplo, seleção de país ou idioma) ou seu nome de usuário. A base legal para o uso de cookies de funcionalidade é o consentimento do usuário. Seu consentimento pode ser retirado livremente a qualquer momento.
Aqui está uma lista dos cookies que usamos em diferentes partes do site:
Site
Cookies usados
toolsforhumanity.com
No site toolsforhumanity.com usamos Cookies Estritamente Necessários e Cookies de Desempenho/Analíticos opcionais (um cookie de cada categoria). Usamos análises apenas para melhorar nosso produto. Não utilizamos os seus dados para vendê-los para publicidade de terceiros.
Nós e nossos prestadores de serviços terceirizados empregamos web beacons pelos motivos indicados abaixo, mas principalmente para nos ajudar a gerenciar melhor o conteúdo de nossos Serviços, informando-nos qual conteúdo é eficaz.
Juntas, essas ferramentas nos permitem:
Realizar a análise do site;
Prevenir fraudes e ataques contra nossos sites e serviços; e Usamos cookies e rastreadores para atribuir a você um identificador exclusivo para que possamos registrar:
Sites que você visita
Seu endereço IP
Você pode bloquear os cookies a qualquer momento usando as configurações do seu navegador da Web, mas isso pode limitar sua experiência de navegação e sua capacidade de usar determinados recursos dos Serviços.
POR QUANTO TEMPO OS COOKIES PERMANECERÃO EM MEU DISPOSITIVO DE NAVEGAÇÃO?
O tempo que um cookie permanecerá em seu dispositivo de navegação depende de ele ser um cookie "persistente" ou de "sessão". Os cookies de sessão permanecerão em seu dispositivo somente até que você feche o navegador. Os cookies persistentes permanecem em seu dispositivo de navegação até expirarem ou serem excluídos.
COMO GERENCIAR COOKIES E TECNOLOGIAS SEMELHANTES
Você tem o direito de decidir se aceita cookies que não sejam cookies estritamente necessários.
Você também pode escolher como os cookies (em todos os sites) são tratados no seu dispositivo por meio das configurações do navegador, incluindo o bloqueio ou a exclusão de todos os cookies ou apenas dos cookies de terceiros. Cada fabricante de navegador é diferente, portanto, verifique o menu "Ajuda" do seu navegador para saber como alterar suas preferências de cookies.
Além disso, a maioria das redes de publicidade oferece uma maneira de desativar a publicidade direcionada. Se quiser obter mais informações, visite aboutads.info/choices/ ou youronlinechoices.com.
Não rastrear: Alguns navegadores da Internet, como Internet Explorer, Firefox e Safari, incluem a capacidade de transmitir sinais "Não rastrear" ou "DNT". Como não foram adotados padrões uniformes para sinais "DNT", nossos Sites não processam nem respondem a sinais "DNT" no momento.
ESTA POLÍTICA DE COOKIES SERÁ ATUALIZADA?
Podemos atualizar esta Política de Cookies de tempos em tempos para refletir, por exemplo, alterações nos cookies que usamos ou por outros motivos operacionais, legais ou regulatórios. Se fizermos alguma atualização, você será notificado quando visitar nosso site pela primeira vez após a alteração. Você também pode visitar novamente esta página se quiser se manter informado.
TFHCP20221214
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Kuki ya Faragha ya Tools for Humanity
Sera hii ya Kuki inaelezea jinsi sisi, Tools for Humanity Corporation na washirika wake (kwa pamoja “sisi”, au “TFH”), tunavyotumia kuki na teknolojia sawa, kama vile web beacons, ili kufuatilia mienendo ya mtandaoni ya watumaiji wetu wanapotembelea tovuti zetu na Huduma nyingine. Web beacon ni mbinu inayotumika kwenye kurasa za tovuti bila kuzuiwa kuruhusu (kawaida kwa njia isiyoonekana) kuangalia kwamba mtumiaji ametembelea maudhui fulani. Sera hii ya Faragha imejumuishwa na ipo chini ya
Ilani ya Faragha ya Tools for Humanity
.
Kulingana na ni tovuti ipi kati ya tovuti zetu unayotembelea, tunatumia kuki tofauti. Tunanatumia mbinu za majina ya misimbo kwa kuki zote ili kuhakikisha faragha  ya mtumiaji.
Tunatumia aina zifuatazo za kuki:
Kuki Muhimu Sana:
Kuki hizi ni muhimu ili Huduma zifanye kazi na haziwezi kuzimwa katika mifumo yako. Kwa kawaida huwa zimepangwa kutenda kulingana na hatua unazochukua ambazo zinajumuisha kuomba huduma, kama vile kuingia kwenye akaunti au kujaza fomu. Hivi pia vinajumuisha kuki tunazoweza kutegemea kuzuia ulaghai. Unaweza kuandaa kivinjari chako kuzuia au kukupasha habari kuhusu kuki hizi, ila baadhi ya Huduma huenda zikakosa kufanya kazi. Misingi ya kisheria ya kutumia Kuki Muhimu Kabisa ni haja halali. Haja halali inayoangaziwa ni kutoa taarifa bila malipo mtandaoni kwa watu ambao wanaamua kwa njia huru kutembelea tovuti hiyo ambayo haingeweza kufanya kazi bila Kuki Muhimu Kabisa.
Kuki za Utendakazi/Uchambuzi:
Kuki hizi zinatuwezesha kuhesabu mara ya kutembelea na vyanzo vya trafiki ili tuweze kupima na kuimarisha utendakazi wa Huduma zetu. ZInatusaidia kujua umaarufu wa ukurasa na harakati za wageni kuhusu Huduma. Maelezo yote yanayokusanywa na kuki hizi yamekadiriwa na kwa hivyo hayana utambulisho. Ukikosa kuruhusu kuki hizi, hatutajua wakati umetumia Huduma zetu, na hatutaweza kufuatilia utendakazi wake. Misingi ya kisheria ya kutumia Kuki za Utendakazi/Uchambuzi ni idhini ya mtumiaji. Ridhaa yako inaweza kuondolewa kwa hiari wakati wowote.
Kuki za Utendakazi:
Kuki hizi zinatuwezesha kukumbuka machaguo uliyofanya na kubinafsisha Huduma zetu ili tuweze kukupa maudhui muhimu. Kwa mfano, kuki ya utendaji inaweza kukumbuka mapendeleo yako (k.m. chaguo la nchi au lugha), au jina lako la mtumiaji. Msingi wa kisheria wa matumizi ya Kuki za Utendakazi ni idhini ya mtumiaji. Ridhaa yako inaweza kuondolewa kwa hiari wakati wowote.
Hii ni orodha ya kuki tunazotumia kwenye sehemu tofauti za tovuti:
Tovuti
Kuki zinazotumika
toolsforhumanity.com
Kwenye tovuti ya toolsforhumanity.com tunatumia tu Kuki Muhimu Kabisa. Hatutumii data zako ili kuziuza kwa ajili ya kufanya matangazo ya wahusika wengine.
Lango la TFH Orb Operator Portal
Kwenye lango la TFH Orb Operator Portal tunatumia Kuki Muhimu Kabisa, Kuki za Utendaji na Kuki za Utendakazi/Uchambuzi za hiari. Hatutumii data zako ili kuziuza kwa ajili ya kufanya matangazo ya wahusika wengine.
Sisi na watoa huduma wengine tunatumia viashiria vya tovuti (web beacons) kwa sababu zilizoorodheshwa hapa chini, lakini kimsingi ni kutusaidia kudhibiti maudhui kwa njia bora kuhusu Huduma zetu kwa kutufahamisha ni maudhui gani yanayoleta ufanisi.
Kwa pamoja, zana hizi zinatuwezesha:
Kufanya chambuzi za tovuti;
Kuzuia ulaghai na kuzuia mashambulizi dhidi ya tovuti na Huduma zetu; na
Tunatumia kuki na vifuatiliaji ili kukupa kitambulisho cha kipekee ili tuweze kurekodi:
Tovuti unazotembelea
Anwani yako ya IP
Unaweza kuzuia kuki wakati wowote kwa kutumia mipangilio ya kivinjari chako, lakini kufanya hivyo huenda kukawekea vikwazo huduma yako ya kuvinjari na uwezo wako wa kutumia vipengele fulani vya Huduma.
JE, KUKI ZITADUMU KWA MUDA GANI KWENYE KIVINJARI CHANGU?
Urefu wa muda ambao kuki itakuwa kwenye kivinjari chako utategemea kama ni kuki ya “kudumu” au ya “muda”. Kuki za muda zitakuwa kwenye kifaa chako hadi utakapofunga kivinjari chako. Kuki za kudumu zinakuwa kwenye kifaa chako cha kuvinjari hadi zitakapoishiwa na muda au zitakapofutwa.
JINSI YA KUDHIBITI KUKI NA TEKNOLOJIA ZA AINA HIYO
Una haki ya kuamua ikiwa utakubali kuki ambazo si Kuki Muhimu Kabisa.
Unaweza pia kuchagua jinsi kuki (katika tovuti zote) zinashughulikiwa kwenye kifaa chako kupitia mipangilio ya kivinjari chako ikiwemo kuzuia au kufuta kuki zote au kuki za wahusika wengine tu. Kila mtengenezaji wa kivinjari fulani ni tofauti, kwa hivyo angalia kwenye menyu ya “Help” (msaada) ya kivinjari chako ili kujifunza jinzi ya kubadilisha mapendeleo yako kuhusu kuki.
Zaidi ya hayo, mitandao mingi ya matangazo inakupa njia ya kuchagua kuondoka kwenye matangazo lengwa. Ikiwa ungependa kupata maelezo zaidi, tafadhali tembelea aboutads.info/choices/ au youronlinechoices.com.
Do Not Track (Usifuatilie): Baadhi ya vivinjari vya tovuti - kama vile Internet Explorer, Firefox, na Safari - vinajumuisha uwezo wa kuwasilisha ishara za "Do Not Track" au “DNT”. Kwa kuwa viwango vya kawaida vya isahara za "DNT" havijawekwa, tovuti zetu kwa sasa hazichakati au kutangamana na ishara za “DNT”.
JE, SERA HII YA KUKI ITASASISHWA?
Tunaweza kubadilisha sera hii ya kuki mara kwa mara ili kuonyesha, kwa mfano, mabadiliko kwenye kuki tunazotumia au kwa sababu nyinginezo za kiutendakazi, kisheria au kiudhibiti. Tukifanya masasisho yoyote, utajulishwa unapotembelea tovuti yetu kwa mara ya kwanza baada ya mabadiliko hayo. Unaweza pia kurejelea ukurasa huu ikiwa ungependa kuendelea kujifahamisha.
TFHCP20230531
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
นโยบายการใช้คุกกี้ของ Tools for Humanity
นโยบายการใช้คุกกี้นี้อธิบายว่า Worldcoin Foundation (ต่อไปในนโยบายนี้จะเรียกว่า “เรา” หรือ “องค์กร”) ใช้คุกกี้และเทคโนโลยีที่คล้ายกัน เช่น เว็บบีคอน เพื่อติดตามการเคลื่อนไหวออนไลน์ของผู้ใช้เมื่อเข้าเยี่ยมชมเว็บไซต์และบริการอื่น ๆ ของเราอย่างไร เว็บบีคอนเป็นเทคนิคที่ใช้บนหน้าเว็บเพื่อให้สามารถตรวจสอบได้โดยไม่เป็นที่สังเกต (ปกติแล้วจะไม่แสดงให้เห็น) ว่าผู้ใช้ได้เข้าถึงเนื้อหาบางอย่างแล้ว นโยบายการใช้คุกกี้นี้จะรวมเป็นส่วนหนึ่งและอยู่ภายใต้บังคับของ
นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัวของ Tools for Humanity
เราใช้คุกกี้หลายประเภท ขึ้นอยู่กับว่าท่านกำลังเยี่ยมชมเว็บไซต์ใดของเรา เราใช้เทคนิคในการกำหนดนามแฝง (pseudonymisation) กับคุกกี้ทั้งหมดเพื่อดูแลความเป็นส่วนตัวของผู้ใช้
เราใช้คุกกี้ประเภทต่อไปนี้
คุกกี้ที่จำเป็นอย่างยิ่ง:
คุกกี้ประเภทนี้มีความจำเป็นเพื่อให้บริการสามารถทำงานได้ และจะไม่สามารถปิดการใช้งานได้ในระบบของเรา โดยปกติคุกกี้ประเภทนี้จะถูกตั้งค่าให้ตอบสนองต่อการกระทำของท่านในลักษณะที่เป็นการขอใช้บริการเท่านั้น เช่น การเข้าสู่ระบบหรือการกรอกแบบฟอร์ม ซึ่งรวมถึงคุกกี้ที่เราอาจใช้เพื่อป้องกันการทุจริต ท่านสามารถตั้งค่าเบราว์เซอร์ของท่านให้ปิดกั้นหรือแจ้งเตือนท่านเกี่ยวกับคุกกี้ประเภทนี้ได้ แต่บริการบางส่วนอาจไม่สามารถทำงานได้ ฐานทางกฎหมายที่เราอ้างอิงในการใช้คุกกี้ที่จำเป็นอย่างยิ่งคือประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมาย ทั้งนี้ ประโยชน์โดยชอบด้วยกฎหมายจากการดำเนินการของเราคือการมอบข้อมูลผ่านช่องทางออนไลน์โดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่ายแก่บุคคลที่ตัดสินใจเยี่ยมชมเว็บไซต์นั้นโดยสมัครใจ ซึ่งจะไม่สามารถทำงานได้หากไม่มีคุกกี้ที่จำเป็นอย่างยิ่ง
คุกกี้เพื่อวัดผลการทำงานของเว็บไซต์/เพื่อการวิเคราะห์:
คุกกี้ประเภทนี้ช่วยให้เรานับจำนวนการเยี่ยมชมและแหล่งที่มาของการเข้าชมเพื่อให้เราสามารถวัดผลและปรับปรุงประสิทธิภาพของบริการของเราได้ คุกกี้ประเภทนี้ช่วยให้เราเข้าใจความนิยมของหน้าเว็บเพจและการเคลื่อนไหวของผู้เยี่ยมชมในส่วนต่าง ๆ ของบริการ คุกกี้ประเภทนี้เก็บรวบรวมข้อมูลไว้ในลักษณะที่เป็นข้อมูลชุด และดังนั้นจึงไม่สามารถใช้ระบุตัวตนได้ หากท่านไม่อนุญาตให้เราใช้คุกกี้ประเภทนี้ เราจะไม่ทราบเมื่อท่านใช้บริการของเราและจะไม่สามารถตรวจสอบการทำงานของเว็บไซต์เราได้ ฐานทางกฎหมายที่เราอ้างอิงในการใช้คุกกี้เพื่อวัดผลการทำงานของเว็บไซต์/เพื่อการวิเคราะห์คือความยินยอมของผู้ใช้ โดยท่านสามารถถอนความยินยอมได้ตลอดเวลา
คุกกี้เพื่อการทำงานของเว็บไซต์:
คุกกี้ประเภทนี้ช่วยให้เราจดจำสิ่งที่ท่านเลือกและปรับแต่งบริการของเราเพื่อให้เราสามารถแสดงเนื้อหาที่เกี่ยวข้องกับท่านได้ ตัวอย่างเช่น คุกกี้เพื่อการทำงานของเว็บไซต์สามารถจดจำการตั้งค่าของท่าน (เช่น การเลือกประเทศหรือภาษา) หรือชื่อผู้ใช้ของท่าน ฐานทางกฎหมายที่เราอ้างอิงในการใช้คุกกี้เพื่อการทำงานของเว็บไซต์คือความยินยอมของผู้ใช้ โดยท่านสามารถถอนความยินยอมได้ตลอดเวลา
รายการคุกกี้ที่เราใช้สำหรับส่วนต่าง ๆ ของเว็บไซต์มีดังนี้
เว็บไซต์
คุกกี้ที่ใช้
toolsforhumanity.com
บนเว็บไซต์ toolsforhumanity.com เราใช้คุกกี้ที่จำเป็นอย่างเคร่งครัดและคุกกี้เสริมประสิทธิภาพ/การวิเคราะห์ (คุกกี้หนึ่งรายการในแต่ละหมวดหมู่) เราใช้การวิเคราะห์เพื่อปรับปรุงผลิตภัณฑ์ของเราเท่านั้น เราไม่ใช้ข้อมูลของคุณเพื่อขายให้กับการโฆษณาของบุคคลที่สาม
เราและผู้ให้บริการที่เป็นบุคคลภายนอกของเราใช้เว็บบีคอนด้วยเหตุผลที่ระบุไว้ด้านล่าง แต่โดยส่วนใหญ่แล้ว เราใช้เว็บบีคอนเพื่อช่วยให้เราจัดการเนื้อหาในบริการของเราได้ดีขึ้น โดยแจ้งให้เราทราบว่าเนื้อหาใดมีประสิทธิภาพบ้าง
เครื่องมือเหล่านี้ช่วยให้เราสามารถ
ทำการวิเคราะห์เว็บไซต์
ป้องกันการทุจริตและการโจมตีเว็บไซต์และบริการของเรา และ
เราใช้คุกกี้และเครื่องมือติดตามเพื่อกำหนดตัวระบุที่ไม่ซ้ำกันให้กับท่าน เพื่อที่เราจะสามารถบันทึก
เว็บไซต์ที่ท่านเยี่ยมชม
ที่อยู่ IP ของท่าน
ท่านสามารถบล็อกคุกกี้ได้ตลอดเวลาโดยใช้การตั้งค่าเบราว์เซอร์ของท่าน แต่การดำเนินการดังกล่าวอาจจำกัดประสบการณ์การท่องเว็บของท่านและความสามารถในการใช้คุณสมบัติ (feature) บางอย่างของบริการ
คุกกี้จะอยู่บนอุปกรณ์ที่ฉันใช้ท่องเว็บนานแค่ไหน
ระยะเวลาที่คุกกี้จะอยู่บนอุปกรณ์ที่ท่านใช้ท่องเว็บขึ้นอยู่กับว่าคุกกี้นั้นเป็น “คุกกี้ถาวร” หรือ “คุกกี้แบบช่วงเวลา” คุกกี้แบบช่วงเวลาจะอยู่บนอุปกรณ์ของท่านจนกว่าท่านจะปิดเบราว์เซอร์ คุกกี้ถาวรจะอยู่บนอุปกรณ์ที่ท่านใช้ท่องเว็บจนกว่าจะหมดอายุหรือถูกลบ
วิธีจัดการคุกกี้และเทคโนโลยีที่คล้ายกัน
ท่านมีสิทธิเลือกได้ว่าจะยอมรับคุกกี้ที่ไม่ใช่คุกกี้ที่จำเป็นอย่างยิ่งหรือไม่
นอกจากนี้ ท่านสามารถเลือกได้ว่าจะจัดการคุกกี้ (ในทุกเว็บไซต์) บนอุปกรณ์ของท่านอย่างไรผ่านการตั้งค่าเบราว์เซอร์ รวมถึงการบล็อกหรือลบคุกกี้ทั้งหมดหรือเฉพาะคุกกี้ของบุคคลภายนอก ผู้ผลิตเบราว์เซอร์แต่ละรายมีความแตกต่างกัน ดังนั้นโปรดตรวจสอบเมนู “วิธีใช้”(Help) ของเบราว์เซอร์ของท่านเพื่อเรียนรู้วิธีเปลี่ยนการตั้งค่าคุกกี้
นอกจากนี้ เครือข่ายโฆษณาส่วนใหญ่มีช่องทางให้ท่านสามารถเลือกได้ว่าจะไม่รับโฆษณาที่กำหนดเป้าหมาย หากท่านต้องการทราบข้อมูลเพิ่มเติม โปรดไปที่ aboutads.info/choices/ หรือ youronlinechoices.com
Do Not Track:
เบราว์เซอร์อินเทอร์เน็ตบางส่วน เช่น Internet Explorer, Firefox และ Safari มีความสามารถในการส่งสัญญาณ “Do Not Track” หรือ “DNT” เนื่องจากมาตรฐานสากลสำหรับสัญญาณ “DNT” ยังไม่ได้รับการยอมรับ เว็บไซต์ของเราจึงยังไม่สามารถประมวลผลหรือตอบสนองต่อสัญญาณ “DNT” ได้ในขณะนี้
นโยบายการใช้คุกกี้นี้จะมีการปรับปรุงหรือไม่
เราอาจปรับปรุงนโยบายการใช้คุกกี้นี้เป็นครั้งคราว ตัวอย่างเช่น เพื่อให้สอดคล้องกับการเปลี่ยนแปลงของคุกกี้ที่เราใช้หรือด้วยเหตุผลด้านการปฏิบัติงาน กฎหมาย หรือการกำกับดูแลเพื่อให้ปฏิบัติตามกฎระเบียบ หากมีการปรับปรุงนโยบายการใช้คุกกี้นี้ ท่านจะได้รับการแจ้งเตือนเมื่อท่านเข้าเยี่ยมชมเว็บไซต์ของเราเป็นครั้งแรกหลังจากที่มีการเปลี่ยนแปลงดังกล่าว นอกจากนี้ ท่านยังสามารถกลับมาที่หน้านี้ได้หากต้องการทราบข้อมูล
TFHCP20221214
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Chính sách Cookie của Tools for Humanity
Chính sách Cookie này giải thích cách chúng tôi, Tools for Humanity Corporation và các chi nhánh (gọi chung là “chúng tôi”, “của chúng tôi”, hoặc “TFH”), sử dụng cookie và các công nghệ tương tự, như đèn hiệu web, để theo dõi hoạt động trực tuyến của người dùng khi họ truy cập trang web của chúng tôi và các Dịch vụ khác. Web beacon là một kỹ thuật được sử dụng trên các trang web để kiểm tra một cách kín đáo (thường là vô hình) xem người dùng đã truy cập vào một số nội dung nào đó hay chưa. Chính sách Cookie này được tích hợp vào và tuân theo Thông báo Quyền riêng tư của Tools for Humanity.
Tùy thuộc vào trang web quý vị đang truy cập, chúng tôi sẽ sử dụng các loại cookie khác nhau. Chúng tôi áp dụng các kỹ thuật ẩn danh cho tất cả cookie để đảm bảo quyền riêng tư của người dùng.
Chúng tôi sử dụng các loại cookie sau:
Cookie Hoàn toàn Cần thiết:
Những cookie này cần thiết để Dịch vụ hoạt động và không thể tắt trong hệ thống của chúng tôi. Những cookie này thường chỉ được thiết lập để phản hồi các hành động quý vị thực hiện mà có tính chất yêu cầu dịch vụ, chẳng hạn như đăng nhập hoặc điền vào biểu mẫu. Điều này cũng bao gồm những cookie mà chúng tôi có thể dựa vào để phòng ngừa gian lận. Quý vị có thể thiết lập trình duyệt để chặn hoặc cảnh báo quý vị về những cookie này, nhưng một số Dịch vụ có thể không hoạt động. Cơ sở pháp lý cho việc sử dụng Cookie Hoàn toàn Cần thiết là lợi ích hợp pháp. Lợi ích hợp pháp ở đây là cung cấp thông tin miễn phí trực tuyến cho những người tự do quyết định truy cập trang web, trang web này sẽ không hoạt động nếu không có những Cookie Hoàn toàn Cần thiết.
Cookie Hiệu suất/Phân tích:
Những cookie này cho phép chúng tôi đếm số lượt truy cập và nguồn lưu lượng truy cập để chúng tôi có thể đo lường và cải thiện hiệu suất của Dịch vụ. Những cookie này giúp chúng tôi hiểu được mức độ phổ biến của trang và hoạt động của khách truy cập xoay quanh Dịch vụ. Mọi thông tin mà những cookie này thu thập đều được tổng hợp và do đó được ẩn danh. Nếu quý vị không cho phép những cookie này, chúng tôi sẽ không biết khi nào quý vị sử dụng Dịch vụ và sẽ không thể theo dõi hiệu suất. Cơ sở pháp lý cho việc sử dụng Cookie Hiệu suất/Phân tích là sự chấp thuận của người dùng. Quý vị có thể tự do rút lại sự chấp thuận bất kỳ lúc nào.
Cookie Chức năng:
Những cookie này cho phép chúng tôi ghi nhớ các lựa chọn của quý vị và tùy chỉnh Dịch vụ để có thể cung cấp nội dung phù hợp cho quý vị. Ví dụ, cookie chức năng có thể ghi nhớ tùy chọn của quý vị (ví dụ: lựa chọn quốc gia hoặc ngôn ngữ) hoặc tên người dùng của quý vị. Cơ sở pháp lý cho việc sử dụng Cookie Chức năng là sự chấp thuận của người dùng. Quý vị có thể tự do rút lại sự chấp thuận bất kỳ lúc nào.
Sau đây là danh sách những cookie chúng tôi sử dụng cho các phần khác nhau của trang web:
Trang web
Cookie được sử dụng
toolsforhumanity.com
Trên trang web toolsforhumanity.com, chúng tôi sử dụng Cookie Hoàn toàn Cần thiết và Cookie Hiệu suất/Phân tích tùy chọn (một cookie cho mỗi danh mục). Chúng tôi chỉ sử dụng phân tích để cải thiện sản phẩm của mình. Chúng tôi không sử dụng dữ liệu của quý vị để bán cho mục đích quảng cáo của bên thứ ba.
Chúng tôi và các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ bên thứ ba sử dụng web beacon vì những lý do nêu dưới đây, nhưng chủ yếu là để giúp chúng tôi quản lý nội dung trên Dịch vụ của mình tốt hơn bằng cách thông báo cho chúng tôi nội dung nào có hiệu quả.
Kết hợp với nhau, những công cụ này cho phép chúng tôi:
Thực hiện phân tích trang web;
Ngăn chặn gian lận và ngăn chặn các cuộc tấn công vào trang web và Dịch vụ của chúng tôi; và
Chúng tôi sử dụng cookie và trình theo dõi để gán cho quý vị một mã định danh duy nhất để chúng tôi có thể ghi lại:
Các trang web quý vị truy cập
Địa chỉ IP của quý vị
Quý vị có thể chặn cookie bất kỳ lúc nào bằng cách sử dụng cài đặt trong trình duyệt web của mình, nhưng làm như vậy có thể hạn chế trải nghiệm duyệt web của quý vị và khả năng sử dụng một số tính năng nhất định của Dịch vụ.
COOKIE SẼ LƯU LẠI THIẾT BỊ DUYỆT CỦA TÔI TRONG BAO LÂU?
Thời gian cookie lưu lại trên thiết bị duyệt web của quý vị phụ thuộc vào việc đó là cookie “cố định” hay cookie “phiên”. Cookie phiên sẽ chỉ lưu trên thiết bị của quý vị cho đến khi quý vị đóng trình duyệt. Cookie cố định sẽ lưu trên thiết bị duyệt web của quý vị cho đến khi hết hạn hoặc bị xóa.
CÁCH QUẢN LÝ COOKIE VÀ CÁC CÔNG NGHỆ TƯƠNG TỰ
Quý vị có quyền quyết định có chấp nhận cookie không phải là Cookie Hoàn toàn Cần thiết hay không.
Quý vị cũng có thể chọn cách xử lý cookie (trên tất cả các trang web) trên thiết bị của mình thông qua cài đặt trình duyệt, bao gồm chặn hoặc xóa tất cả cookie hoặc chỉ cookie của bên thứ ba. Các trình duyệt đều khác nhau, vì vậy hãy kiểm tra menu “Trợ giúp” trên trình duyệt của quý vị để tìm hiểu cách thay đổi tùy chọn cookie.
Ngoài ra, hầu hết các mạng quảng cáo đều cung cấp cho quý vị cách từ chối quảng cáo nhắm mục tiêu. Nếu quý vị muốn tìm hiểu thêm thông tin, vui lòng truy cập aboutads.info/choices/ hoặc youronlinechoices.com.
Không Theo dõi: Một số trình duyệt Internet - như Internet Explorer, Firefox và Safari - có khả năng truyền tín hiệu “Không Theo dõi” hoặc “DNT”. Vì các tiêu chuẩn thống nhất cho tín hiệu “DNT” chưa được áp dụng nên các Trang của chúng tôi hiện không xử lý hoặc phản hồi tín hiệu “DNT”.
CHÍNH SÁCH COOKIE NÀY CÓ ĐƯỢC CẬP NHẬT KHÔNG?
Chúng tôi có thể cập nhật Chính sách Cookie này theo từng thời điểm để phản ánh, ví dụ, những thay đổi đối với cookie chúng tôi sử dụng hoặc vì những lý do hoạt động, pháp lý hoặc quy định khác. Nếu chúng tôi thực hiện bất kỳ cập nhật nào, quý vị sẽ được thông báo khi lần đầu tiên truy cập trang web sau khi có thay đổi. Quý vị cũng có thể truy cập lại trang này nếu muốn cập nhật thêm thông tin.
TFHCP20221214 - AT
Effective January 10th 2025
Download
Tools for Humanity Cookie 政策
本 Cookie 政策說明我們作為 Tools for Humanity Corporation 及其聯屬公司（統稱為「我們」、「我方」、或「TFH」）如何使用 Cookie 和類似技術，例如網絡信標，在用戶到訪我們的網站和其他服務時追蹤其網上活動。網絡信標是在網頁上使用的一種技術，用於不顯眼地（通常看不見）允許檢查用戶是否已存取某些內容。本 Cookie 政策已納入 Tools for Humanity 私隱聲明並受其管限。
根據您正在到訪的網站，我們使用不同的 Cookie。我們將化名技術應用於所有 Cookie，以確保用戶的私隱。
我們使用下列類型的 Cookie：
絕對必要的 Cookie：
這些 Cookie 是服務運作所必需的，且無法在我們的系統中關閉。通常只會針對您的行動而設定，相當於服務要求，例如登入或填寫表格。這也包括我們為了防範詐騙而可能依賴的 Cookie。您可以設定瀏覽器封鎖或提醒您這些 Cookie，但部分服務可能因而無法運作。使用絕對必要的 Cookie 的法律依據是合法權益。所追求的合法權益是在網上提供免費資訊給自由決定到訪該網站的人士；如果沒有絕對必要的 Cookie，該網站將無法運作。
效能／分析 Cookie：
這些 Cookie 可讓我們計算到訪次數和流量來源，藉此衡量和改善服務的效能。它們幫助我們了解頁面受歡迎程度和訪客在服務中的活動。這些 Cookie 收集的所有資訊都是匯總的，因此會匿名。如果您不允許這些 Cookie，我們將不會知道您何時使用我們的服務，且將無法監控效能。使用效能／分析 Cookie 的法律依據是用戶同意。您可隨時自由撤回同意。
功能 Cookie：
這些 Cookie 讓我們能夠記住您的選擇，並度身打造我方服務，以便我們為您提供相關內容。例如，功能 Cookie 可以記住您的偏好（例如國家／地區或語言選擇）或您的用戶名稱。使用功能 Cookie 的法律依據是用戶同意。您可隨時自由撤回同意。
以下是我們用於網站不同部分的 Cookie 清單：
網站
使用的 Cookie
toolsforhumanity.com
在 toolsforhumanity.com 網站上，我們使用絕對必要的 Cookie 和選擇性的效能／分析 Cookie（每個類別各一個 Cookie）。我們僅使用分析來改善我方產品。我們不會將您的資料用於第三方廣告。
我們和第三方服務供應商基於下述原因使用網絡信標，但主要是為了透過了解哪些內容有效，以助我們更好地管理我方服務上的內容。
這些工具共同讓我們能夠：
分析網站；
防止欺詐並預防對我方網站和服務進行的攻擊；及
我們使用 Cookie 和追蹤工具向您分配唯一的識別碼，以便記錄：
您到訪的網站
您的 IP 位址
您可以隨時使用網絡瀏覽器設定封鎖 Cookie，但這樣做可能會限制您的瀏覽體驗和您使用服務某些功能的能力。
COOKIE 會在我的瀏覽裝置上保留多久？
Cookie 保留在您的瀏覽裝置的時間長度取決於它屬於「持續性」還是「工作階段」Cookie。工作階段 Cookie 會在您關閉瀏覽器後從您的裝置刪除。持續性 Cookie 則會一直保留在您的瀏覽裝置上，直到過期或被刪為止。
如何管理 COOKIE 和類似技術
您有權決定是否接受非絕對必要的 Cookie。
您也可以透過瀏覽器設定選擇在裝置上（於所有網站）處理 Cookie 的方式，包括封鎖或刪除所有 Cookie 或僅限第三方 Cookie。每個瀏覽器製造商都不同，因此請查看您瀏覽器的「幫助」選單，了解如何變更您的 Cookie 偏好。
此外，大多數廣告網絡為您提供選擇退出目標性廣告的方式。如果您想了解更多資訊，請瀏覽 aboutads.info/choices/ 或 youronlinechoices.com。
請勿追蹤：某些 Internet 瀏覽器，例如 Internet Explorer、Firefox 和 Safari，具備傳輸「請勿追蹤」或「DNT」訊號的功能。由於尚未採用「DNT」訊號的統一標準，我們的網站目前並未處理或回應「DNT」訊號。
本 COOKIE 政策是否會更新？
我們可能會不時更新本 Cookie 政策，以反映我們所用 Cookie 的變更等因素，或用於其他營運、法律或規例原因。如果我們進行任何更新，您將在變更後首次到訪我們的網站時收到通知。如果您希望掌握最新資訊，也可以重新瀏覽本頁。
TFHCP20221214
Effective December 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Worldcoin P2P Marketplace Terms And Conditions
Welcome to the Worldcoin P2P Marketplace (the “Marketplace”). These Terms between you and Tools for Humanity Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("TFH", “we” or “us”) govern your use of and access to the Marketplace and all of the associated functionality, content, and services we provide to you (the “Marketplace Services”). These Terms are incorporated into and governed by the
Tools for Humanity User Terms and Conditions
(“User Terms”). Definitions not defined in these terms are defined in the User Terms. In the event of a conflict between the User Terms and these Terms, these Terms shall prevail, but only with respect to the Marketplace and the Marketplace Services.
Please read these Terms carefully before using or accessing the Marketplace Services. By accessing or using any of the Marketplace Services we provide, you expressly agree to be bound by these Terms and by our
Privacy Statement
, which is incorporated as a part of these Terms.
Please note these especially important parts of these Terms:
The Marketplace is not intended to be available to or to be accessed by users established or situated in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or having their ordinary residence or registered office there.
Nothing in the Marketplace Services constitutes an offer to sell, or the solicitation of an offer to buy, any securities. The Marketplace Services do not constitute investment advice. Holding, buying, or selling Worldcoin tokens (“WLD”) or any other Digital Tokens may not be permitted where you live, and it is your responsibility to comply with all applicable law. Please consider whether buying, selling, using, or holding Digital Tokens, including WLD, is suitable for you in light of your financial circumstances and your understanding of Digital Tokens.
Further, you acknowledge that via the Marketplace Services, TFH is providing a technology platform only connecting buyers and sellers wishing to make transactions. At no time does TFH transmit, store, take possession of, custody, or otherwise engage with any traditional or digital currency. TFH does not process transactions, act as a payment processor, or otherwise become involved in processing transactions. All transactions happen separately between buyers and sellers on the Marketplace. All transactions and related liability exist between buyer and seller only. TFH has no liability in regards to transactions between buyers and sellers, and TFH is unable to provide support in regards to transaction problems.
Scope of the Terms
1.1 Eligibility.
In order to use the Marketplace Services, you must comply with these Terms and all applicable laws. You cannot use the Marketplace Services to conduct, promote, or help others to carry out any illegal activity.
In addition,
you must meet all of the following
criteria:
You are 18 years of age or older;
You are not established or situated in the EEA and do not have your ordinary residence or registered office there; and
You are not a “Specially Designated National” as declared by the U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”) or the sanctions lists of any other country, and your name is not on the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Denied Persons List or the banned persons lists of any other country.
If you do not meet all of these requirements, you are not allowed to access or use the Marketplace Services.
1.2 Availability
. Webpages describing the Marketplace Services are accessible worldwide, but this does not mean all Marketplace Services or service features are legal or available in your country. You must meet the eligibility requirements set forth in 1.1  to access and use the Marketplace Services, including not being ordinarily resident or physically located in the countries stated in 1.1 . You may not use VPN or similar tools for the purpose of circumventing any restrictions.
It is your responsibility to make sure that your use of the Marketplace Services is legal where you use them
. Marketplace Services are not available in all languages.
1.3 Updates
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. If we do this, we will make the updated terms available in the Worldcoin App. You understand and agree that your continued use of the Marketplace Services after we have made any such changes constitutes your acceptance of the updated Terms. You can stop using the Marketplace Services at any time if you do not agree to these Terms. Because the Marketplace Services are evolving over time we may change or discontinue all or any part of the Marketplace Services, at any time and without notice, at our sole discretion.
Services
2.1 Marketplace
The Marketplace provides a peer-to-peer platform connecting buyers and sellers wishing to purchase or sell Digital Assets. Participants of the Marketplace in the business of buying and selling Digital Assets and wishing to list their availability for transactions on the Marketplace must be approved as agents on the Marketplace by us and must have a WorldID associated with them (the “Marketplace Partners”). The use of the term “Marketplace Partners” does not refer to a principal - agent relationship between TFH and any users of the Marketplace. Where the Marketplace Partners is a business, the agent doing business on behalf of the business must have a WorldID. Participants of the Marketplace responding to listings by Marketplace Partners do not need to be approved by us, but must have a WorldID if transacting over certain amounts (the “Customers”). Marketplace Partners may also be Customers where they are responding to offers placed by other Marketplace Partners.
Marketplace Partners may list offers to buy or sell Digital Assets on the Marketplace at a certain price (the “Offers”). Customers may respond to Offers via the Marketplace. Details such as payment methods, price, and delivery time/method are negotiated between Marketplace Partners and Customers. TFH has no involvement with these details, but may recommend certain payment methods, price, and delivery time/methods for use. Such recommendations are informational in nature only.
Marketplace Partners and Customers are able to use the Worldcoin App and wallet services to send or receive Digital Assets to fulfill Offers. While Marketplace Partners and Customers may use certain Worldcoin features to complete Offers, they remain fully liable for any transactions that are entered into between the Marketplace Partners and the Customer. TFH is not a party to any transactions.
The Marketplace does not provide any escrow services or guarantee in regards to Marketplace Partners or Customers. Marketplace Partners are approved on a Know-Your-Business (KYB) or Know-Your-Customer (KYC) basis only by TFH. Such approval does not endorse any Marketplace Partners, or guarantee that they will fulfill any transactions. In addition, any rating assigned to a Marketplace Partners or Customer by TFH does not constitute any endorsement or guarantee. Marketplace Partners and Customers accept all risks related to making a transaction, including the risk that they will not receive the proceeds of their purchase or sale. In the event of a problem in regards to any transaction, TFH is not able to assist with a resolution, nor holds any liability for problems arising from any transactions. Further, TFH does not provide any escrow service; Customers accept the risk that the Marketplace Partners may not transfer the proceeds of any sale or purchase to the Customer.
In respect of any transactions processed via the Worldcoin App, Marketplace Partners and Customers acknowledge that the Worldcoin App and wallet are non-custodial services. TFH does not store or custody any Digital Assets, and does not transact, transmit, take possession of, or otherwise have any involvement with making any transactions. Digital Assets are always stored and transmitted on their respective blockchain networks, which can be accessed via other non-custodial wallet solutions. There are no guarantees the transactions will process correctly. In addition, where others have access to your Worldcoin App or wallet, they may use such access to make transactions without your consent. Marketplace Partners and Customers are fully liable for any transactions made from their wallet, and accept all risks related to unauthorized access of their wallets.
2.2 Transactions
Transactions on the Marketplace happen between Marketplace Partners and Customers (or between Marketplace Partners and Marketplace Partners). Transactions are made pursuant to these Terms and the terms (if any) between Marketplace Partners and Customers in regards to a particular transaction. When an Offer is made, Marketplace Partners will specify what terms, if any, form part of the agreement to make a transaction. Both Marketplace Partners and Customers should make sure they have carefully read any Offer and accompanying terms to the Offer before making any transactions. Terms accompanying an Offer are valid in all cases, except where they contradict or violate these Terms, or where they violate applicable law. Marketplace Partners and Customers accept full responsibility to carefully read, acknowledge, and comply with any terms accompanying an Offer. If any such terms are unclear or not agreed by either party, they should not transact. In addition, any terms accompanying an Offer should be followed when making a transaction. If a transaction is made without complying with any accompanying terms, a transaction may not be completed.
Once an Offer is accepted, the Customer must first make a transaction to send the agreed amount and type of either traditional currency or digital currency. Once this transaction is received by the Marketplace Partners, the Marketplace Partners must then send the agreed amount and type of either traditional currency or digital currency to the Customer. Both parties must specify the correct payment methods and receiving methods for their respective transactions. Both parties to the transaction are responsible for sending the correct amounts and types of traditional or digital currency. In the event where transactions are not received, reversed, improperly processed, or otherwise encounter an error, the Marketplace Partners and Customer must work together to resolve any issue. TFH is not able to assist with transaction-related problems.
Some Marketplace Partners may impose limitations or restrictions on the amount of traditional or digital currency they are willing to accept from Customers. These limits are set by Marketplace Partners and not TFH.
The value of Digital Assets can fluctuate significantly over short periods of time. Any Offer you accept will specify the transaction time and exchange rate applicable to our transaction. You are solely responsible for accepting the risk of any price fluctuations, and understand that by the time you complete a transaction, the value of the Digital Assets involved in the transaction may have changed significantly.
2.3 Reputation Score
When you make a transaction via the Marketplace, we allow other users to provide feedback on their interaction with you, including but not limited to a numerical score of how their interaction went, a ‘thumbs up’ or ‘thumbs down’ feedback score, and written commentary. Such feedback may be posted on your profile for other Marketplace Partners and Customers to see. We make no guarantees as to the accuracy of such feedback.
2.4 Advertising on the Marketplace
Marketplace Partners
are prohibited from placing advertisements anywhere on the Marketplace (such as on their profile, Offer or accompanying terms, or in communications with Customers) which would facilitate transactions outside of the Marketplace. Marketplace Partners may share information necessary for Customers to contact them and make arrangements to complete transactions.
2.5 Customer Support and Dispute Resolution
We provide customer support for assistance with certain features and functions in connection with the Marketplace Services, but this support is limited to your experience with the Marketplace Services and use of the Worldcoin App. We are unable to provide support in regards to transactions between Marketplace Partners and Customers, beyond reaching out to Marketplace Partners when they become unresponsive. To get in touch, select “Support” from the in-app menu.
We do not provide dispute resolution services in relation to disagreements between Marketplace Partners and Customers. Any disputes must be resolved directly between you and the Marketplace Partners or Customer.
Purchases, Fees, and Taxes
3.1 TFH
Fees
. We may add a fee for using the Marketplace when you make a transaction with a Marketplace Partners. The amount of this fee will be displayed to you within the Marketplace when you respond to an Offer and will form part of the exchange rate shown in the Offer.
3.2 Marketplace Partners Fees
. Fees Marketplace Partners charge Customers to make a transaction will be displayed as part of the exchange rate in the Offer. Marketplace Partners must clearly state all fees as part of the Offer and may not charge additional fees not described in the Offer.
3.3 Taxes
. It is your sole responsibility to determine whether, and to what extent, any taxes apply to any transaction via the Marketplace Services or any transactions you make as a Marketplace Partners or a Customer, and to withhold, collect, report and remit the correct amount of tax to the appropriate tax authorities.
3.4 Updates
. All fees are displayed and current as reflected in the Marketplace Services and may be updated and changed from time to time.
Compliance
Before being allowed to post Offers on the Marketplace, all Marketplace Partners must pass KYB and/or KYC checks by providing certain information to TFH. TFH may approve or reject such approval in its sole discretion. In addition, TFH may not disclose the reasons for such approval or rejection to you.
From time-to-time, TFH may ask for additional or updated documentation. Failure to provide such information in a timely manner may result in suspension or termination from the Marketplace Services.
Orb Operators
We partner with local independent contractors called “Orb Operators,” who facilitate user signups to the Worldcoin App and help answer questions you may have about TFH. These Orb Operators have received training and are knowledgeable about TFH. However, we have no control over and disclaim all liability for what they say or how they conduct themselves. Orb Operators may also act as Marketplace Partners or Customers on the Marketplace. Their activities as Marketplace Partners and/or customers are separate from their activities as Orb Operators.
Orb Operators and Marketplace Partners are not agents or employees of TFH
in any way. Any effort, feature, process, policy, standard, or other efforts undertaken by TFH
in the interest of its users do not indicate an employment or agency relationship with an Orb Operator
.
Suspension & Termination
We may suspend and restrict your access to the Marketplace Services where: (i) we are so required by a facially valid subpoena, court order, or binding order of a government authority; (ii) we reasonably suspect you of using the Marketplace Services in connection with a Prohibited Use; (iii) use of your using the Marketplace Services is subject to any pending litigation, investigation, or government proceeding and/or we perceive a heightened risk of legal or regulatory non-compliance associated with your activity; (iv) our service partners are unable to support your use; (v) you take any action that we deem as circumventing our controls. In addition, we may terminate your account on the Marketplace at any time without notice where you breach any of these Terms or we decide, in our sole discretion, that your continued use of the Marketplace Services is harmful to TFH.
General Provisions
Check the User Terms for other terms applicable to your use of the Marketplace Services, including governing law and arbitration clauses.
MTOS20231128
Effective December 1st 2023
Download
Términos y condiciones del mercado P2P de Worldcoin
Bienvenido al Mercado P2P de Worldcoin (el “Mercado”). Estas Condiciones entre usted y Tools for Humanity Corporation, una corporación de Delaware (“TFH”, “nosotros” o “nos”) rigen su uso y acceso al Mercado y a todas las funcionalidades, contenido y servicios asociados que le proporcionamos (en conjunto, los “Servicios del Mercado”). Estas Condiciones se incorporan y rigen por las
Condiciones del Usuario de Tools for Humanity
(“Condiciones del Usuario”). Las definiciones no definidas en estas condiciones se definen en las Condiciones del Usuario. En caso de conflicto entre las Condiciones del Usuario y estas Condiciones, prevalecerán estas Condiciones, pero solo con respecto al Mercado y los Servicios del Mercado.
Lea atentamente estas Condiciones antes de utilizar o acceder a los Servicios del Mercado. Al acceder o utilizar cualquiera de los Servicios del Mercado que prestamos, usted acepta expresamente quedar obligado por estas Condiciones
y por
nuestra
Declaración de privacidad
, que se incorpora como parte de las Condiciones.
Tenga en cuenta, especialmente, estas partes importantes de estas Condiciones:
El Mercado no está ideado para estar disponible ni accesible para usuarios establecidos o situados en el Espacio Económico Europeo. (“EEE”) o que tengan allí su residencia habitual o su domicilio social.
Nada de lo contenido en los Servicios del Mercado constituye una oferta de venta ni publicidad sobre una oferta de compra de valores. Los Servicios del Mercado no constituyen asesoramiento en materia de inversión. Es posible que donde resida no se permita poseer, comprar o vender tokens de Worldcoin (“WLD”) ni ningún otro token digital, y es responsabilidad suya cumplir con toda legislación aplicable. Tenga en cuenta si comprar, vender, usar o poseer tokens digitales, incluido WLD, es adecuado para usted en vista de sus circunstancias financieras y su comprensión de los tokens digitales.
Además, usted reconoce que a través de los Servicios del Mercado, TFH ofrece una plataforma tecnológica que solo conecta a compradores y vendedores que desean realizar transacciones. En ningún momento transmite, almacena, toma posesión, custodia ni se involucra de otro modo TFH con ninguna divisa tradicional o digital. TFH no procesa transacciones, actúa como procesador de pagos ni participa de otro modo en el procesamiento de transacciones. Todas las transacciones se realizan por separado entre compradores y vendedores en el Mercado. Todas las transacciones y responsabilidades relacionadas existen solo entre el comprador y el vendedor. TFH no tiene ninguna responsabilidad con respecto a las transacciones entre compradores y vendedores, y TFH no puede prestar apoyo con respecto a los problemas de transacciones.
Alcance de las Condiciones
1.1 Elegibilidad.
Para utilizar los Servicios del Mercado,
debe cumplir con estas Condiciones y todas las leyes aplicables. No puede utilizar los Servicios del Mercado para llevar a cabo, promover o ayudar a otros a llevar a cabo ninguna actividad ilegal.
Además,
debe cumplir todos los
criterios siguientes:
tener 18 años o más;
No estar establecido ni situado en el EEE y no tener en él su residencia habitual ni su domicilio social; y
no ser un “Ciudadano especialmente designado” según la Oficina de control de activos extranjeros (“OFAC”, por sus siglas en inglés) del Departamento del Tesoro de los EE. UU. ni las listas de sanciones de ningún otro país, y no figurar en la Lista de personas denegadas del Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. ni en las listas de personas prohibidas de ningún otro país.
Si no cumple todos estos requisitos, no se le permite acceder ni utilizar los Servicios del Mercado.
1.2 Disponibilidad
. Puede accederse a las páginas web que describen los Servicios del Mercado desde cualquier parte del mundo, pero esto no significa que todos los Servicios del Mercado o funciones de servicio sean legales o estén disponibles en su país. Debe cumplir los requisitos de elegibilidad establecidos en la sección 1.1
para acceder y utilizar los Servicios del Mercado, incluido no ser residente habitual o estar
físicamente ubicado en los
países indicados en la sección 1.1.
. No puede utilizar VPN ni herramientas similares con el fin de eludir restricciones.
Es su responsabilidad asegurarse de que usa los Servicios del Mercado conforme a la legalidad cuando los utilice
. Los Servicios del Mercado no están disponibles en todos los idiomas.
1.3 Actualizaciones
. Podemos cambiar en estas Condiciones según sea necesario. Si lo hacemos, pondremos a su disposición las condiciones actualizadas en la aplicación de Worldcoin. Usted entiende y acepta que el hecho de continuar usando los Servicios del Mercado después de que las hayamos cambiado significa que acepta las Condiciones actualizadas. Puede dejar de utilizar los Servicios del Mercado en cualquier momento si no acepta las Condiciones. Debido a que los Servicios del Mercado evolucionan con el tiempo, podemos cambiar o interrumpir la totalidad o parte de estos, en cualquier momento y sin previo aviso, a nuestra entera discreción.
Servicios
2.1 Mercado P2P
El Mercado ofrece una plataforma entre pares que conecta a compradores y vendedores que desean comprar o vender activos digitales. Los participantes del Mercado en el negocio de compra y venta de Activos digitales y que deseen listar su disponibilidad para transacciones en el Mercado deben ser aprobados como agentes en el Mercado por nosotros y deben tener un WorldID asociado a ellos (los “Socios del Mercado”). El uso del término “Socios del Mercado” no hace referencia a una relación principal-agente entre TFH y cualquier usuario del Mercado. Cuando los Socios del Mercado sean una empresa, el agente que haga negocios en nombre de la empresa debe tener un WorldID. Los participantes del Mercado que respondan a los anuncios de los Socios del Mercado no necesitan recibir nuestra aprobación, pero deben tener un WorldID si realizan transacciones superiores a ciertas cantidades (los “Clientes”). Los Socios del Mercado también pueden ser Clientes cuando respondan a ofertas realizadas por otros Socios del Mercado.
Los Socios del Mercado pueden publicar ofertas para comprar o vender Activos digitales en el Mercado a un precio determinado (las “Ofertas”). Los Clientes pueden responder a las Ofertas a través del Mercado. Los detalles como los métodos de pago, el precio y el plazo/método de entrega se negocian entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes. TFH
no tiene ninguna implicación con estos detalles, pero puede recomendar ciertos métodos de pago, precio y plazo/métodos de entrega para su uso. Dichas recomendaciones son de carácter informativo únicamente.
Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes pueden utilizar la aplicación de Worldcoin y los servicios de billetera para enviar o recibir Activos digitales para cumplir con las Ofertas. Aunque los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes pueden utilizar ciertas características de Worldcoin para completar las Ofertas, siguen siendo plenamente responsables de cualquier transacción que se celebre entre los Socios del Mercado y el Cliente. TFH
no es parte de ninguna transacción.
El Mercado no ofrece ningún servicio de custodia ni garantía con respecto a los Socios del Mercado ni a los Clientes. Solo TFH aprueba a los Socios del Mercado sobre una base de Conozca-Su-Negocio (KYB) o Conozca-Su-Cliente (KYC). Dicha aprobación no avala a ningún Socio del Mercado ni garantiza que realizará ninguna transacción. Además, cualquier calificación asignada a un Socio del Mercado o Cliente por parte de TFH
no constituye ningún respaldo ni garantía. Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes aceptan todos los riesgos relacionados con la realización de una transacción, incluido el riesgo de que no reciban los ingresos de su compra o venta. En caso de un problema con respecto a cualquier transacción, TFH
no puede ayudar con una resolución, ni asume ninguna responsabilidad por los problemas que surjan de cualquier transacción. Además, TFH
no ofrece ningún servicio de custodia; los Clientes aceptan el riesgo de que los Socios del Mercado no transfieran el producto de cualquier venta o compra al Cliente.
Con respecto a cualquier transacción procesada a través de la aplicación de Worldcoin, los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes reconocen que la aplicación de Worldcoin y la billetera son servicios no custodiados. TFH
no almacena ni custodia ningún Activo digital, y no realiza transacciones, transmite, toma posesión de, ni tiene ninguna implicación en la realización de ninguna transacción. Los Activos digitales siempre se almacenan y transmiten en sus respectivas redes de cadena de bloques, a las que se puede acceder a través de otras soluciones de billetera sin custodia. No hay garantías de que las transacciones se procesen correctamente. Además, cuando otros tengan acceso a su aplicación de Worldcoin o billetera, podrán utilizar dicho acceso para realizar transacciones sin su consentimiento. Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes son plenamente responsables de cualquier transacción realizada desde su billetera, y aceptan todos los riesgos relacionados con el acceso no autorizado a sus billeteras.
2.2 Transacciones
Las transacciones en el Mercado tienen lugar entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes (o entre Socios del Mercado). Las transacciones se realizan de conformidad con estas Condiciones y las condiciones (si las hubiera) entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes con respecto a una transacción en particular. Cuando se realiza una Oferta, los Socios del Mercado especificarán qué condiciones, si los hubiera, forman parte del acuerdo para realizar una transacción. Tanto los Socios del Mercado como los Clientes deben asegurarse de haber leído detenidamente cualquier Oferta y las condiciones adjuntas a la Oferta antes de realizar cualquier transacción. Las condiciones que acompañan a una Oferta son válidas en todos los casos, excepto cuando contradigan o infrinjan estas Condiciones, o cuando infrinjan la legislación aplicable. Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes aceptan toda la responsabilidad de leer detenidamente, reconocer y cumplir cualquier condición que acompañe a una Oferta. Si alguna de estas condiciones no está clara o no ha sido acordada por alguna de las partes, no deben realizar la transacción. Además, al realizar una transacción deben respetarse las condiciones que acompañan a una oferta. Si se realiza una transacción sin cumplir alguna de las condiciones que la acompañan, esta no podrá completarse.
Una vez aceptada una Oferta, el Cliente debe realizar primero una transacción para enviar la cantidad y el tipo acordados de divisa tradicional o digital. Una vez que los Socios del Mercado reciben esta transacción, los Socios del Mercado deben enviar al Cliente el importe y el tipo acordados de divisa tradicional o digital. Ambas partes deben especificar los métodos de pago y los métodos de recepción correctos para sus respectivas transacciones. Ambas partes de la transacción son responsables de enviar las cantidades y tipos correctos de divisa tradicional o digital. En caso de que las transacciones no se reciban, se anulen, se procesen incorrectamente o se produzca algún error, los Socios del Mercado y el Cliente deberán colaborar para resolver cualquier problema. TFH
no puede ayudar con los problemas relacionados con las transacciones.
Algunos Socios del Mercado pueden imponer limitaciones o restricciones sobre la cantidad de divisa tradicional o digital que están dispuestos a aceptar de los Clientes. Estos límites los establecen los Socios del Mercado y no TFH.
El valor de los Activos digitales puede fluctuar significativamente en periodos de tiempo cortos. Cualquier Oferta que acepte especificará la hora de la transacción y el tipo de cambio aplicable a nuestra transacción. Usted es el único responsable de aceptar el riesgo de cualquier fluctuación de precios, y entiende que en el momento en que complete una transacción, el valor de los Activos digitales implicados en la misma puede haber cambiado significativamente.
2.3 Puntuación de reputación
Cuando usted realiza una transacción a través del Mercado, permitimos que otros usuarios proporcionen comentarios sobre su interacción con usted, incluyendo, entre otros, una puntuación numérica de cómo fue su interacción, una puntuación de “pulgar hacia arriba” o “pulgar hacia abajo” y comentarios escritos. Dichos comentarios pueden publicarse en su perfil para que otros Socios del Mercado y Clientes puedan verlos. No garantizamos la exactitud de dichos comentarios.
2.4 Publicidad en el Mercado
Los Socios del Mercado
tienen prohibido colocar anuncios en cualquier lugar del Mercado (como en su perfil, Oferta o condiciones adjuntas, o en las comunicaciones con los Clientes) que puedan facilitar transacciones fuera del Mercado. Los Socios del Mercado pueden compartir la información necesaria para que los Clientes se pongan en contacto con ellos y lleguen a acuerdos para completar las transacciones.
2.5 Atención al cliente y resolución de disputas
Ofrecemos asistencia al cliente para ayudarle con ciertas características y funciones en relación con los Servicios del Mercado, pero esta asistencia se limita a su experiencia con los Servicios del Mercado y el uso de la aplicación de Worldcoin. No podemos ofrecer asistencia en relación con las transacciones entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes, más allá de ponernos en contacto con los Socios del Mercado cuando dejen de responder. Para ponerse en contacto, seleccione “Asistencia” en el menú de la aplicación.
No ofrecemos servicios de resolución de disputas en relación con desacuerdos entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes. Cualquier disputa debe resolverse directamente entre usted y los Socios del Mercado o el Cliente.
Compras, cargos e impuestos
3.1 Tarifas
de TFH
. Podemos añadir una tarifa por utilizar el Mercado cuando realice una transacción con un Socio del Mercado. El importe de esta tarifa se le mostrará en el Mercado cuando responda a una Oferta, y formará parte del tipo de cambio mostrado en la Oferta.
3.2 Tarifas de Socios del Mercado
. Las tarifas que los Socios del Mercado cobran a los Clientes por realizar una transacción se mostrarán como parte del tipo de cambio en la Oferta. Los Socios del Mercado deben indicar claramente todas las tarifas como parte de la Oferta, y no pueden cobrar tarifas adicionales no descritas en la Oferta.
3.3 Impuestos
. Usted es el único responsable de determinar si, y en qué medida, se aplica algún impuesto a cualquier transacción a través de los Servicios del Mercado o a cualquier transacción que realice como Socio del Mercado o como Cliente, y de retener, recaudar, declarar y remitir la cantidad correcta de impuestos a las autoridades fiscales correspondientes.
3.4 Actualizaciones
. Todas las tarifas se muestran y están vigentes tal y como se reflejan en los Servicios del Mercado y pueden ser actualizadas y modificadas de vez en cuando.
Cumplimiento
Antes de que se les permita publicar Ofertas en el Mercado, todos los Socios del Mercado deben pasar los controles KYB y/o KYC proporcionando cierta información a TFH. TFH
puede aprobar o rechazar dicha aprobación a su entera discreción. Además, TFH
no puede revelarle los motivos de dicha aprobación o rechazo.
De manera oportuna, TFH
puede solicitar documentación adicional o actualizada. El hecho de no facilitar dicha información a su debido tiempo puede dar lugar a la suspensión o cancelación de los Servicios del Mercado.
Operadores de Orb
Nos asociamos con contratistas locales independientes llamados “Operadores de Orb”, que facilitan las inscripciones de los usuarios en la aplicación de Worldcoin y ayudan a responder las preguntas que pueda usted tener sobre TFH. Estos Operadores de Orb han recibido formación y conocen TFH. Sin embargo, no tenemos control sobre ellos y renunciamos a toda responsabilidad por lo que digan o cómo se comporten. Los Operadores de Orb también pueden actuar como Socios del Mercado o Clientes en el Mercado. Sus actividades como Socios del Mercado y/o clientes son independientes de sus actividades como Operadores de Orb.
Los Operadores de Orb y los Socios del Mercado no son agentes ni empleados de TFH
de ninguna manera. Ninguna iniciativa, función, proceso, política, norma ni demás iniciativas que TFH
lleve a cabo en interés de sus usuarios será indicio de una relación de empleo ni representación con un Operador de Orb
.
Suspensión y terminación
Podremos suspender y restringir su acceso a los Servicios del Mercado: i) si así nos lo exige una citación, orden judicial u orden vinculante de una autoridad gubernamental aparentemente válidas; ii) si sospechamos, dentro de lo razonable, que utiliza el Servicio en relación con un Uso prohibido; iii) si el uso que usted hace de los Servicios del Mercado está sujeto a algún litigio pendiente, investigación o procedimiento gubernamental o percibimos un mayor riesgo de incumplimiento de la legislación o la normativa asociado con su actividad; iv) si nuestros socios de servicio no admiten su uso; v) si usted toma cualquier medida que consideremos que elude nuestros controles. Además, podremos cancelar su cuenta en el Mercado en cualquier momento y sin previo aviso si incumple cualquiera de estas Condiciones o si decidimos, a nuestra entera discreción, que su uso continuado de los Servicios del Mercado es perjudicial para TFH.
Disposiciones generales
Consulte las Condiciones del Usuario para conocer otros términos aplicables a su uso de los Servicios del Mercado, incluidas las cláusulas de derecho aplicable y arbitraje.
MTOS20231128
Effective December 1st 2023
Download
TÉRMINOS y condiciones del Mercado P2P de Worldcoin
Bienvenido al Mercado P2P de Worldcoin (el “Mercado”). Estos Términos entre usted y Tools for Humanity Corporation, sociedad constituida en Delaware (“TFH”, “nosotros” o las inflexiones de primera persona del plural que correspondan) regirán el uso y acceso por parte de usted al Mercado y a toda funcionalidad, contenido y servicios asociados que le proporcionemos (en forma conjunta, “Servicios del Mercado”). Estos Términos se incorporan a los
Términos y Condiciones del Usuario de Tools for Humanity
(los “Términos del Usuario”) y se rigen por dichos términos. Las definiciones no definidas en estos términos se definen en los Términos del Usuario. En caso de conflicto entre los Términos del Usuario y estos Términos, prevalecerán estos Términos, pero solamente con respecto al Mercado y a los Servicios del Mercado.
Le solicitamos que lea estos Términos detenidamente antes de utilizar los Servicios del Mercado o acceder a ellos. Al acceder a cualquiera de los Servicios del Mercado que prestamos o utilizarlos, usted acepta expresamente quedar obligado por estos Términos
y por
nuestra
Política de Privacidad
que se incorpora a los presentes Términos.
Preste atención a las siguientes partes de especial importancia de estos Términos:
No está previsto que el Mercado esté disponible para los usuarios establecidos o ubicados en el Espacio Económico Europeo (“EEE”) o que tengan su lugar de residencia habitual o sede social allí, ni que puedan acceder a dicho mercado.
Ninguna parte de los Servicios del Mercado constituirá una oferta de venta ni la promoción de una oferta de compra de valores. Los Servicios del Mercado no constituirán asesoramiento de inversión. Es posible que en su lugar de residencia no se permita la tenencia, compra o venta de tokens Worldcoin (“WLD”) o de ningún otro Token Digital, y será su responsabilidad cumplir con todas las leyes aplicables. Considere si la compra, la venta, el uso o la tenencia de Tokens Digitales, incluidos WLD, es adecuada para usted en función de su situación financiera y de su comprensión de los Tokens Digitales.
Además, usted reconoce que, a través de los Servicios del Mercado, TFH proporciona una plataforma tecnológica que únicamente conecta a compradores y vendedores que desean realizar transacciones. En ningún momento TFH transmite, almacena, toma posesión de, custodia o interactúa de otro modo con ninguna moneda tradicional o digital. TFH no procesa transacciones, no actúa como procesador de pagos ni participa de otro modo en el procesamiento de transacciones. Todas las transacciones se realizan por separado entre compradores y vendedores en el Mercado. Todas las transacciones y responsabilidades relacionadas existen solo entre el comprador y el vendedor. TFH no tiene ninguna responsabilidad con respecto a las transacciones entre compradores y vendedores, y TFH no puede proporcionar apoyo con respecto a los problemas de transacciones.
Alcance de los Términos
1.1 Elegibilidad.
Para utilizar los Servicios del Mercado,
deberá cumplir con estos Términos y con todas las leyes aplicables. Usted no podrá utilizar los Servicios del Mercado para realizar, promover o ayudar a otros a llevar a cabo ninguna actividad ilegal.
Además,
deberá cumplir con todos los
criterios que se disponen a continuación:
tener 18 años o más;
no encontrarse establecido o ubicado en EEE y no tener su lugar de residencia habitual o sede social allí;
no ser declarado “Nacional Especialmente Designado” por la Oficina de Control de Activos Extranjeros (Office of Foreign Assets Control, “OFAC”) del Departamento del Tesoro de los EE. UU. o las listas de sanciones de cualquier otro país, y que su nombre no se encuentre en la Lista de Personas Denegadas del Departamento de Comercio de los EE. UU. ni en las listas de personas prohibidas de ningún otro país.
Si no cumple con todos estos requisitos, no se le permitirá acceder a los Servicios del Mercado ni utilizarlos.
1.2 Disponibilidad
. Es posible acceder a las páginas web que detallan los Servicios del Mercado desde cualquier parte del mundo, pero esto no significa que todos los Servicios del Mercado o las funciones del servicio sean legales o estén disponibles en el país donde reside. Debe cumplir con los requisitos de elegibilidad establecidos en la sección 1.1
para acceder a los Servicios del Mercado y utilizarlos, lo que incluye no ser residente habitual
ni estar físicamente ubicado en los
países indicados en la sección 1.1
. Usted no podrá usar una red privada virtual (Virtual Private Network, VPN) ni herramientas similares con el fin de eludir alguna restricción.
Será su responsabilidad asegurarse de que el uso que hace de los Servicios del Mercado sea legal en el lugar donde los utilice
. Los Servicios del Mercado no están disponibles en todos los idiomas.
1.3 Actualizaciones
. Podemos realizar cambios en estos Términos oportunamente. Si lo hacemos, se podrá acceder a los términos actualizados en la Aplicación de Worldcoin. Usted comprende y acepta que, si continúa utilizando los Servicios del Mercado después de que hayamos realizado dichos cambios, usted acepta los Términos actualizados. Si no acepta estos Términos, puede dejar de usar los Servicios del Mercado en cualquier momento. Debido a que los Servicios del Mercado evolucionan con el tiempo, podremos cambiar o interrumpir la totalidad o parte de los Servicios del Mercado, en cualquier momento y sin previo aviso, a nuestra entera discreción.
Servicios
2.1 Mercado
El Mercado proporciona una plataforma entre pares que conecta a compradores y vendedores que desean comprar o vender Activos Digitales. Los participantes del Mercado que realicen operaciones de compra y venta de Activos Digitales y deseen mostrar su disponibilidad para transacciones en el Mercado deben ser aprobados como agentes en el Mercado por nosotros y tener una WorldID asociada con ellos (los “Socios del Mercado”). El uso del término “Socios del Mercado” no se refiere a una relación entre mandante y agente entre TFH y ningún usuario del Mercado. Cuando los Socios del Mercado son una empresa, el agente que hace negocios en nombre de la empresa debe tener una WorldID. Los participantes del Mercado que respondan a los anuncios de Socios del Mercado no necesitan ser aprobados por nosotros, pero deben tener una WorldID si realizan transacciones que superen ciertos montos (los “Clientes”). Los Socios del Mercado también pueden ser Clientes cuando responden a ofertas realizadas por otros Socios del Mercado.
Los Socios del Mercado pueden publicar ofertas para comprar o vender Activos Digitales en el Mercado a un precio determinado (las “Ofertas”). Los clientes pueden responder a las Ofertas a través del Mercado. Los detalles como los métodos de pago, el precio y el tiempo/método de entrega se negocian entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes. TFH
no se involucra en estos detalles, pero puede recomendar ciertos métodos de pago, precios y tiempos/métodos de entrega para su uso. Esas recomendaciones son de naturaleza informativa únicamente.
Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes pueden utilizar la Aplicación de Worldcoin y los servicios de billetera para enviar o recibir Activos Digitales para cumplir con las Ofertas. Si bien los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes pueden utilizar ciertas funciones de Worldcoin para completar las Ofertas, siguen siendo plenamente responsables de cualquier transacción que se realice entre los Socios del Mercado y el Cliente. TFH
no es parte de ninguna transacción.
El Mercado no proporciona ningún servicio de depósito en garantía ni garantías con respecto a los Socios del Mercado o a los Clientes. Los Socios del Mercado son aprobados únicamente por TFH sobre la base de Conozca Su Negocio (Know-Your-Business, KYB) o Conozca a Su Cliente (Know-Your-Customer, KYC). Dicha aprobación no respalda a ningún Socio del Mercado ni garantiza que cumplirá con ninguna transacción. Además, cualquier calificación asignada por TFH a un Socio del Mercado o Cliente
no constituye un endoso o garantía de ningún tipo. Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes aceptan todos los riesgos relacionados con la realización de una transacción, incluido el riesgo de que no reciban los ingresos de su compra o venta. En caso de que surjan problemas con respecto a cualquier transacción, TFH
no puede ayudar con su resolución, ni asume ninguna responsabilidad por los problemas que surjan de cualquier transacción. Asimismo, TFH
no brinda ningún servicio de depósito en garantía; los Clientes aceptan el riesgo de que los Socios del Mercado no puedan transferir los ingresos de una venta o compra al Cliente.
Con respecto a cualquier transacción procesada a través de la Aplicación de Worldcoin, los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes reconocen que la Aplicación de Worldcoin y la billetera son servicios sin custodia. TFH
no almacena ni custodia ningún Activo digital; no realiza transacciones con Activos digitales, ni los transmite ni toma posesión de estos, ni tiene participación alguna en la realización de ninguna transacción. Los Activos Digitales siempre se almacenan y transmiten en sus respectivas redes de blockchain, a las que se puede acceder a través de otras soluciones de billetera sin custodia. No hay garantías de que las transacciones se procesen correctamente. Además, en caso de que terceros tengan acceso a su Aplicación de Worldcoin o billetera, podrán usar dicho acceso para realizar transacciones sin su consentimiento. Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes son plenamente responsables de cualquier transacción realizada desde su billetera y aceptan todos los riesgos relacionados con el acceso no autorizado a sus billeteras.
2.2 Transacciones
Las transacciones en el Mercado ocurren entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes (o entre los Socios del Mercado y Socios del Mercado). Las transacciones se realizan de conformidad con estos Términos y los términos (si los hubiera) entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes con respecto a una transacción en particular. Cuando se realiza una Oferta, los Socios del Mercado especificarán qué términos, si los hubiera, forman parte del acuerdo para realizar una transacción. Tanto los Socios del Mercado como los Clientes deben asegurarse de haber leído detenidamente cualquier Oferta y los términos adjuntos a la Oferta antes de realizar cualquier transacción. Los términos que acompañan una Oferta son válidos en todos los casos, excepto cuando contradigan o violen estos Términos, o cuando violen la ley aplicable. Los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes aceptan toda la responsabilidad de leer, reconocer y cumplir cuidadosamente con cualquier término que acompañe una Oferta. Si alguno de estos términos no es claro o no es acordado por cualquiera de las partes, estas no deben realizar una transacción. Además, se debe seguir cualquier término que acompañe una Oferta al realizar una transacción. Si se realiza una transacción sin cumplir con los términos adjuntos, es posible que no se complete la transacción.
Una vez que se acepta una Oferta, el Cliente primero debe realizar una transacción para enviar el monto y tipo acordados de moneda tradicional o moneda digital. Una vez que los Socios del Mercado reciben esta transacción, los Socios del Mercado deben enviar el monto y el tipo de moneda tradicional o digital acordados al Cliente. Ambas partes deben especificar los métodos de pago y los métodos de recepción correctos para sus respectivas transacciones. Ambas partes de la transacción son responsables de enviar los montos y tipos correctos de moneda tradicional o digital. En caso de que las transacciones no se reciban, se reviertan, se procesen indebidamente o tengan un error de otro tipo, los Socios del Mercado y el Cliente deben trabajar juntos para resolver cualquier problema. TFH
no puede ayudar con problemas relacionados con las transacciones.
Algunos Socios del Mercado pueden imponer limitaciones o restricciones a la cantidad de moneda tradicional o digital que están dispuestos a aceptar de los Clientes. Estos límites son establecidos por los Socios del Mercado y no por TFH.
El valor de los Activos Digitales puede fluctuar significativamente durante períodos breves. Cualquier Oferta que acepte especificará el tiempo de transacción y la tasa de cambio aplicable a nuestra transacción. Usted es el único responsable de aceptar el riesgo de cualquier fluctuación de precios, y comprende que, al momento de completar una transacción, el valor de los Activos Digitales involucrados en la transacción puede haber cambiado significativamente.
2.3 Puntaje de reputación
Cuando realiza una transacción a través del Mercado, permitimos que otros usuarios proporcionen una evaluación de su interacción con usted, incluyendo, entre otras cosas, un puntaje numérico de cómo fue su interacción, una calificación de ‘pulgares arriba’ o ‘pulgares abajo’ y comentarios escritos. Dichas evaluaciones pueden publicarse en su perfil para que otros Socios del Mercado y Clientes las vean. No garantizamos la precisión de dichas evaluaciones.
2.4 Anuncios en el Mercado
Los
Socios del Mercado
tienen prohibido colocar anuncios en cualquier lugar del Mercado (como en sus perfiles, en la Oferta o los términos adjuntos, o en las comunicaciones con los Clientes) que faciliten transacciones fuera del Mercado. Los Socios del Mercado pueden compartir la información necesaria para que los Clientes se comuniquen con ellos y hagan los arreglos necesarios para completar las transacciones.
2.5 Atención al cliente y resolución de disputas
Brindamos atención al cliente para obtener asistencia con ciertas características y funciones en relación con los Servicios del Mercado, pero esta asistencia se limita a su experiencia con los Servicios del Mercado y el uso de la Aplicación de Worldcoin. No podemos brindar soporte con respecto a las transacciones entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes, más allá de comunicarnos con los Socios del Mercado cuando no respondan. Para ponerse en contacto, seleccione “Soporte” en el menú de la aplicación.
No proporcionamos servicios de resolución de disputas en relación con los desacuerdos entre los Socios del Mercado y los Clientes. Cualquier disputa debe resolverse directamente entre usted y los Socios del Mercado o el Cliente.
Compras, cargos e impuestos
3.1 Cargos
de TFH
. Podemos agregar un cargo por usar el Mercado cuando realiza una transacción con un Socio del Mercado. El monto de este cargo se le mostrará dentro del Mercado, cuando usted responda a una Oferta, y formará parte del tipo de cambio que se indica en la Oferta.
3.2 Cargos de los Socios del Mercado
. Los cargos que cobran los Socios del Mercado a los Clientes por realizar una transacción se mostrarán como parte de la tasa de cambio en la Oferta. Los Socios del Mercado deben indicar claramente todos los cargos como parte de la Oferta, y no pueden cobrar cargos adicionales no descritos en la Oferta.
3.3 Impuestos
. Es su exclusiva responsabilidad determinar si se aplican impuestos –y en qué medida– a alguna transacción a través de los Servicios del Mercado o a cualquier transacción que realice como Socio del Mercado o Cliente, y retener, cobrar, informar y remitir el monto correcto de impuestos a las autoridades fiscales correspondientes.
3.4 Actualizaciones
. Todos los cargos se exhiben y están vigentes según se refleja en los Servicios del Mercado y podrán actualizarse y modificarse cuando se considere oportuno.
Cumplimiento
Antes de que se les permita publicar Ofertas en el Mercado, todos los Socios del Mercado deben pasar las pruebas de KYB y/o KYC, proporcionando determinada información a TFH. TFH
puede conceder o rechazar dicha aprobación, a su entera discreción. Además, TFH
puede no informarle los motivos de dicha aprobación o rechazo.
Oportunamente, TFH
puede solicitar documentación adicional o actualizada. No proporcionar dicha información de manera oportuna puede dar lugar a la suspensión o cancelación de los Servicios del Mercado.
Operadores de Orb
Nos asociamos con contratistas independientes locales denominados “Operadores de Orb”, que facilitan el registro de los usuarios en la Aplicación de Worldcoin y ayudan a responder las preguntas que usted pueda tener sobre TFH. Estos Operadores de Orb han recibido capacitación y conocen TFH. Sin embargo, no tendremos control y renunciamos a toda responsabilidad respecto de lo que digan o de cómo se comporten. Los Operadores de Orb también pueden actuar como Socios del Mercado o Clientes en el Mercado. Sus actividades como Socios del Mercado o clientes son independientes de sus actividades como Operadores de Orb.
Los Operadores de Orb y los Socios del Mercado no son agentes ni empleados de TFH
de ninguna manera. Cualquier intento, característica, proceso, política, norma u otros esfuerzos realizados por TFH
en beneficio de los usuarios no constituyen una relación de empleo ni de representación con un Operador de Orb
.
Suspensión y rescisión
Podemos suspender y restringir su acceso a los Servicios del Mercado: (i) si estamos obligados por una citación, orden judicial u orden vinculante de una autoridad gubernamental que sea válida a primera vista; (ii) si sospechamos razonablemente que usted utiliza el Servicio del Mercado en relación con un Uso Prohibido; (iii) si el uso que usted hace de los Servicios del Mercado está sujeto a un litigio, una investigación, o un procedimiento gubernamental en curso o percibimos un riesgo elevado de incumplimiento legal o regulatorio asociado con su actividad; (iv) si nuestros socios de servicio no pueden respaldar el uso que usted hace de estos; o (v) si usted toma alguna medida que consideremos que elude nuestros controles. Además, podemos cancelar su cuenta en el Mercado en cualquier momento sin previo aviso cuando usted incumpla cualquiera de estos Términos o decidamos, a nuestra entera discreción, que su uso continuo de los Servicios del Mercado es perjudicial para TFH.
Disposiciones generales
Consulte los Términos del Usuario para conocer otros términos aplicables al uso que usted hace de los Servicios del Mercado, incluidas las leyes vigentes y las cláusulas de arbitraje.
MTOS20231128
Effective July 19th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
I'm not a US person
I’m not using a VPN and I’m not in a restricted location
I will not offer, sell, or transfer WLD to a US person
Effective November 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Aviso de Privacidad de Tools for Humanity
Gracias por elegir ser parte de la Comunidad Worldcoin. Worldcoin es un protocolo de código abierto, respaldado por una comunidad global de desarrolladores, individuos y otros colaboradores.
Este Aviso de Privacidad contempla los datos que usted nos proporciona a través del uso que hace de nuestros sitios web, aplicaciones (“Aplicación de Worldcoin”), protocolo y demás servicios que incluyan un enlace a este Aviso de Privacidad (en forma conjunta, los “Servicios”). Este Aviso de Privacidad se incorpora y se rige según los
Términos y Condiciones de Usuario
(“Términos de Usuario”). Tools for Humanity Corporation (“TFH US”), junto con su subsidiaria alemana Tools for Humanity GmbH (“TFH Germany”; en conjunto, “
TFH
”, “
nosotros
” o “
nos
”), contribuye al desarrollo inicial del protocolo de Worldcoin (“Worldcoin”).
La Ley de Privacidad del Consumidor de California (California Consumer Privacy Act), según pueda ser enmendada por la Ley de Derechos de Privacidad de California (California Privacy Rights Act), no se aplica actualmente a nosotros.
Si usted tiene domicilio en la República Argentina, además de estas condiciones generales también le aplican ciertas condiciones particulares que puede consultar aquí: https://www.argentina.gob.ar/aaip
Responsables del tratamiento
Somos los responsables del tratamiento de datos de todos los “Datos de la Aplicación”: Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104, EE. UU.
“Datos de la Aplicación” se refiere a todos los datos personales recopilados y tratados a través de su uso de World App, conforme se define más adelante en la Sección 5, excepto cualquier dato personal relacionado con el uso que usted haga del protocolo de Worldcoin o los tokens de Worldcoin (como la dirección de su billetera y los datos sobre transacciones, que no recopilamos).
Actualizaciones de este Aviso de Privacidad
De forma periódica, actualizaremos este Aviso de Privacidad. Si realizamos cambios importantes, como la forma en la que usamos su información personal, se lo informaremos por correo electrónico o mensaje en la aplicación de Worldcoin.
¿Qué contiene este Aviso de Privacidad?
Nuestro compromiso con la protección de su privacidad y sus datos
Información que recopilamos y motivo de la recopilación
Cómo utilizamos los datos que recopilamos
Dónde llevamos a cabo el tratamiento de sus datos
Cuándo compartimos sus datos
Cómo se registran sus datos en la blockchain pública
Cómo usamos las cookies
Cuánto tiempo conservamos sus datos
Cómo difiere este Aviso de Privacidad en el caso de niños y adolescentes
Sus derechos legales en virtud del RGPD
Cómo comunicarse con nosotros en relación con este Aviso de Privacidad
Nuestro compromiso con la protección de su privacidad y sus datos
Estamos profundamente comprometidos con la protección de su privacidad y la seguridad de sus datos. Reconocemos que solo podemos cumplir con nuestra misión de distribuir nuestros tokens digitales de manera justa a la mayor cantidad posible de personas si las personas confían en nosotros, y la privacidad y la seguridad de los datos son fundamentales para ganarnos su confianza.
Privacidad
Hemos diseñado nuestros productos y servicios teniendo en cuenta su privacidad. Recopilamos datos para mejorar nuestros productos y servicios. Siempre le informaremos, aquí en este Aviso de Privacidad o en formularios de consentimiento para tratamiento de datos de los productos o servicios específicos, qué datos estamos recopilando, por qué estamos recopilando esos datos y qué hacemos con ellos.
Seguridad de los datos
Contamos con un equipo dedicado a cuidar sus datos y hemos implementado medidas de seguridad físicas y electrónicas que protegen sus datos tanto en tránsito como en reposo. Al mismo tiempo, ningún servicio puede ser completamente seguro. Si tiene alguna inquietud sobre su cuenta o sus datos, comuníquese con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
o escríbanos a Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 EE. UU.
Información que recopilamos y motivo de la recopilación
5.1 Datos que usted nos proporciona
Como usuario, no está obligado a proporcionar ningún dato para acceder a la aplicación de Worldcoin. Sin embargo, es posible que deba proporcionarnos determinados datos para poder utilizar alguna característica dentro de los Servicios.Los fundamentos legales para el tratamiento en los casos que se indican a continuación son el consentimiento del usuario y el cumplimiento de un contrato (nuestro compromiso de prestar los Servicios). A continuación, encontrará una lista de los datos que puede proporcionar y para qué podemos utilizarlos:
Nombre y apellido.
Podrá elegir ingresar su nombre para asociarlo a su cuenta. Nosotros y otros usuarios podremos ver su nombre cuando eligen interactuar con su cuenta. Es posible que le solicitemos su nombre cuando envíe una solicitud en calidad de interesado. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Dirección de correo electrónico.
Usted podrá elegir ingresar su correo electrónico para asociarlo a su cuenta. También puede proporcionar su correo electrónico para suscribirse a nuestra lista de correo para mantenerse actualizado con el proyecto Worldcoin. Es posible que le solicitemos su correo electrónico cuando envíe una solicitud en calidad de interesado. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Número de teléfono.
Usted podrá elegir ingresar su número de teléfono para asociarlo a su cuenta. Con su permiso, otros usuarios podrán encontrar su cuenta a través de su número de teléfono. Podremos solicitarle su número de teléfono cuando envíe una solicitud en calidad de interesado. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Comentarios y correspondencia de su parte.
Esto incluye correos electrónicos, mensajes de chat u otras comunicaciones que nos envíe por correo electrónico o sitios web de redes sociales de terceros. Podemos utilizar un proveedor de servicios externo para facilitar encuestas sobre su uso de nuestros Servicios. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación del Servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Contactos de la agenda.
Usted podrá proporcionar a la Aplicación de Worldcoin acceso a su agenda para habilitar la característica que le permita encontrar e interactuar con otros usuarios que estén en su agenda. La información de la agenda permanece en su dispositivo. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el interés legítimo del interesado que se encuentra dentro de la Aplicación de Worldcoin y el interés del usuario que comparte de encontrar sus contactos en la Aplicación de Worldcoin.
Tenga en cuenta lo siguiente:
Usted será responsable de asegurarse de cumplir con las leyes aplicables al compartir
la información de sus contactos. Esto podrá requerir que obtenga el permiso de sus contactos. Usted puede cambiar
de idea y desactivar nuestro acceso a sus contactos en cualquier momento, desde la configuración de su dispositivo. Si decide importar los contactos de la agenda de su dispositivo a la Aplicación de Worldcoin para saber cuáles de sus contactos utilizan nuestros Servicios o para invitarlos a acompañarlo en el uso de nuestros Servicios, sincronizaremos periódicamente los números de teléfono de sus contactos con los números y las direcciones de billetera correspondientes que hayan proporcionado otros usuarios en nuestros servidores.
Información sobre ubicación
. Usted puede decidir habilitar un servicio basado en la ubicación (como la característica que le permite encontrar un Operador de Orb cerca de donde vive). Nosotros podemos recopilar información sobre su ubicación a través de GPS, dirección IP, información de torres celulares o información de punto de acceso a wifi. El tipo de datos que se recopilen sobre la ubicación depende del servicio que usted esté utilizando, el dispositivo que esté utilizando (por ejemplo, Apple o Android) y la configuración del dispositivo (si los permisos están habilitados o deshabilitados). Usted podrá cambiar sus permisos en cualquier momento desde la configuración del dispositivo. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales.
Datos empresariales
. Si tiene una relación comercial con nosotros (por ejemplo, si usted es un Operador de Orb o un proveedor), es posible que necesitemos información como nombres, dirección postal, correo electrónico, número de teléfono, dirección de billetera y otra documentación (como un documento de identificación emitido por el gobierno) como parte de la promoción de esa relación comercial y para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones de conocer a los clientes. Podremos utilizar servicios de terceros, como Onfido, para que nos ayuden a recopilar y revisar la información y documentación mencionadas anteriormente para satisfacer las obligaciones de conocer a los clientes. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales, a saber, las obligaciones de conocer al cliente (know your customer, KYC) y conocer al negocio (know your business, KYB), según lo exige la ley.
Mercado P2P
. Si utiliza los Servicios del Mercado P2P (cuando estén disponibles) que le permiten comprar tokens digitales de otros usuarios, entonces podemos recopilar información adicional como la dirección de su billetera, su información de contacto (p. ej., su número de teléfono) y su número de cuenta asociado a la transacción (como su número M-PESA). Registramos los datos de la transacción como parte de la prestación de los Servicios del Mercado P2P. También podemos recopilar información adicional para cumplir con los requisitos de KYC aplicables. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación de los Servicios en virtud de los Términos de Usuario y el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales.
Datos de la Aplicación
. Si desea trabajar para nosotros, debe enviarnos su solicitud que incluya su carta de presentación y CV, así como la información personal que desea divulgar. El fundamento legal del tratamiento son los pasos a solicitud de los interesados antes de celebrar un contrato.
5.2 Datos que recopilamos a partir de fuentes externas
Ocasionalmente, podemos obtener información sobre usted de las siguientes fuentes externas:
Datos de la blockchain
. Podremos analizar los datos de la blockchain pública para garantizar que las partes que utilizan nuestros Servicios no estén involucradas en actividades ilegales o prohibidas según los Términos de Usuario, y para analizar las tendencias de transacciones con fines de investigación y desarrollo. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales.
Servicios de verificación de identidad
. Podremos obtener información de servicios de terceros utilizando los datos de usted para verificar su identidad si lo exige la ley (como los requisitos de conocer al cliente aplicables). Cabe aclarar que
no
utilizaremos sus datos biométricos cuando verifiquemos su identidad según lo exige la ley. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales.
Bases de datos de talentos
. Podemos recopilar datos de diversas fuentes para hacer ofertas de trabajo a personas talentosas. El fundamento legal del tratamiento son intereses legítimos. Los intereses legítimos perseguidos son nuestro interés en reclutar personas y el interés de la persona en recibir ofertas de trabajo que impliquen una misión emocionante y una alta remuneración.
5.3 Datos que recopilamos automáticamente
Si lo permite la ley aplicable, podremos recopilar determinados tipos de datos automáticamente cuando usted interactúe con nuestros Servicios. Esta información nos ayuda a abordar problemas de asistencia al cliente, mejorar el rendimiento de los Servicios, proporcionarle una experiencia optimizada y personalizada, y a proteger las credenciales de su Cuenta. La información recopilada automáticamente incluye:
Identificadores en línea
: datos de geolocalización y seguimiento (ver más arriba), sistema operativo de la computadora o el teléfono celular, nombre y versión del navegador web, y direcciones IP. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales (en casos muy limitados, ya que estos datos también se incorporan a nuestra detección de fraude y flujo financiero ilícito) y el cumplimiento del contrato, ya que deseamos proporcionar una experiencia estable y libre de fraude de nuestro software.
Datos de uso
: datos de autenticación, preguntas de seguridad y otros datos recopilados a través de cookies y tecnologías similares. El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de estos datos es la prestación de nuestro servicio en virtud de los Términos de Usuario.
Cookies
: pequeños archivos de datos almacenados en su disco duro o en la memoria del dispositivo que nos ayudan a mejorar nuestros Servicios y su experiencia, ver qué áreas y características de nuestros Servicios son populares y contar las visitas. Para conocer los fundamentos legales del tratamiento de dichos datos, consulte nuestra
Política de Cookies
, donde explicamos los diferentes tipos de cookies que utilizamos.
De manera similar, la Aplicación de Worldcoin recopila información para solucionar problemas y mejorar. Utilizamos servicios de terceros, como Segment.io o PostHog, para ver información fusionada sobre el uso y las interacciones del usuario final. De ser posible, adoptamos medidas para minimizar u ocultar la información que se envía a terceros (como la codificación de los datos). El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de los datos mencionados antes es el interés legítimo de operar la Aplicación de Worldcoin y el sitio web.
5.4 Datos anonimizados y fusionados
La anonimización es una técnica de tratamiento de datos que modifica los datos personales para que no puedan asociarse a una persona específica. Algunos ejemplos de datos anonimizados incluyen lo siguiente:
datos de transacciones;
datos de secuencia de clics;
métricas de rendimiento;
indicadores de fraude.
También fusionamos datos, combinando grandes cantidades de información de modo tal que ya no identifique ni haga referencia a una persona.Utilizamos datos anonimizados o fusionados para nuestros fines comerciales, como entender las necesidades y los comportamientos de los usuarios, mejorar nuestros Servicios, realizar inteligencia comercial y marketing, detectar amenazas de seguridad y entrenar nuestros algoritmos.
El fundamento legal para el tratamiento de los datos mencionados antes es el interés legítimo de una aplicación o sitio web en funcionamiento, comprender el negocio y prevenir el fraude.
Cómo utilizamos los datos que recopilamos
Debemos tener un motivo válido (o un “fundamento legal para el tratamiento”) para usar su información personal. En los casos en los que usted esperaría razonablemente que utilicemos su información personal y el uso que hacemos de esa información cumple con las leyes aplicables, no le pediremos su permiso expreso. Utilizaremos sus datos para los fines que se indican a continuación:
proporcionar y mantener nuestros productos y servicios en virtud de los Términos de Usuario. Estos servicios incluyen:
La Aplicación de Worldcoin donde los usuarios pueden administrar su World ID y tokens digitales, así como aprender sobre criptomonedas en general y el proyecto Worldcoin en específico.
La App Operador donde los operadores de Orb pueden gestionar y supervisar sus Orb bajo gestión y sus estadísticas.
El Mercado P2P donde conectamos a los usuarios con agentes.
El fundamento legal para todos estos casos es el cumplimiento de un contrato, a saber, los Términos de Usuario.
Mejorar y desarrollar nuestros productos y servicios, incluso depurar y reparar errores en nuestros Servicios. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento son los intereses legítimos. Los intereses perseguidos son proporcionar una experiencia estable y segura de nuestro software y hardware.
Para llevar a cabo investigaciones científicas de datos. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento son los intereses legítimos de proporcionar una mejor experiencia del usuario, una mayor asistencia y características más útiles en los Servicios.
Analizar el uso que usted hace de nuestros Servicios para brindar una mejor asistencia. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento son los intereses legítimos. Los intereses perseguidos son proporcionar una mejor experiencia de nuestro software y hardware.
Para permitirle publicar información en una blockchain para demostrar su unicidad. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento es su consentimiento explícito.
Para usar la dirección de su billetera para enviarle tokens digitales que admitimos. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento es el cumplimiento de un contrato, a saber, los Términos de Usuario.
Para cumplir con la ley aplicable, como la ley contra el lavado de dinero y las sanciones. Esto implica:
Usar su dirección IP para bloquear a las personas cuyo país no les permite acceder a los Servicios.
Responder a las solicitudes de los interesados en virtud de las leyes de protección de datos aplicables, como las solicitudes de acceso o eliminación.
Monitorear los flujos financieros potencialmente ilícitos, p. ej., de billeteras incluidas en la lista negra.
El fundamento legal para este tratamiento de datos es el cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales.
Para gestionar sus solicitudes, quejas y consultas de servicio al cliente. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento es el cumplimiento de un contrato, concretamente, los Términos de Usuario.
Resolver disputas, resolver problemas y hacer cumplir nuestros acuerdos con usted, incluido este Aviso de Privacidad y los Términos de Usuario. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento es el cumplimiento de un contrato, concretamente, los Términos de Usuario y los intereses legítimos cuando los intereses perseguidos son la defensa de reclamaciones legales.
Para contactarlo con respecto a las actualizaciones de los Servicios. El fundamento legal de este tratamiento es el cumplimiento de un contrato, a saber, los Términos de Usuario.
Dónde llevamos a cabo el tratamiento de sus datos
7.1 Transferencia de datos.
Cuando nos proporciona sus datos, estos podrán transferirse, almacenarse o tratarse en un lugar distinto del lugar donde se recopilaron originalmente. El país al que se transfieren, o en el que se almacenan o tratan sus datos podrá no tener las mismas leyes de protección de datos que el país en el que proporcionó la información inicialmente.
Nosotros adherimos a los principios establecidos en el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos (RGPD) de la Unión Europea, incluso cuando no sea necesario. Por ejemplo, cuando trabajamos con encargados del tratamiento de datos que operan fuera del Espacio Económico Europeo (EEE), nos aseguramos de que cumplan con el RGPD. Solo compartimos datos con encargados del tratamiento de datos fuera del EEE, si dicha transferencia es legítima y si confiamos en que el encargado del tratamiento de datos protegerá los datos, conforme lo exigen las leyes aplicables y, además, de acuerdo con nuestros estándares. Al transferir datos a un país que no tiene una decisión de adecuación, utilizamos las Cláusulas contractuales estándares de la UE.
7.2 Riesgos de la transferencia
A continuación, se presenta una lista de posibles riesgos que pueden surgir si transferimos sus datos a los Estados Unidos, la Unión Europea u otro país. A continuación, también resumimos cómo mitigamos los riesgos respectivos.
Si bien hacemos todo lo posible para garantizar que nuestros subcontratistas estén obligados contractualmente a proteger adecuadamente sus datos, es posible que estos subcontratistas no estén sujetos a la ley de privacidad de los datos de su país. Si los subcontratistas procesaran ilegalmente sus datos sin autorización, tal vez sea difícil hacer valer sus derechos de privacidad contra ese subcontratista. Mitigamos este riesgo a medida que cerramos acuerdos estrictos de tratamiento de datos con nuestros subcontratistas que los obligan a proteger los datos a nivel del RGPD y a cumplir con las solicitudes de los interesados.
Es posible que la ley de privacidad de los datos de su país sea incompatible con las leyes de privacidad de los datos de los EE. UU. o la UE. Siempre intentamos cumplir con el más alto estándar de protección de datos al que estamos sujetos. Hasta el momento, encontramos que este es el RGPD y tratamos todos los datos como si estuvieran regidos por el RGPD.
Es posible que sus datos estén sujetos al acceso gubernamental de funcionarios y autoridades. En esos casos, nos hemos comprometido a impugnar cualquier solicitud de acceso gubernamental inválida, excesiva o ilegal ante un tribunal. Además, utilizamos el cifrado avanzado para impedir el acceso no autorizado.
Tenga en cuenta que esta lista contiene ejemplos, pero es posible que no incluya todos los posibles riesgos para usted.
7.3 NO SE HA DETERMINADO LA ADECUACIÓN DE LAS LEYES DE PRIVACIDAD DE LOS ESTADOS UNIDOS
La Comisión de la Unión Europea responsable de determinar la adecuación de las Leyes de Privacidad de otras jurisdicciones en comparación con el RGPD aún no ha establecido positivamente que el nivel de protección de datos personales específico de los Estados Unidos, donde se trata parte de sus datos, proporciona el mismo nivel de protección que las Leyes de Privacidad en la Unión Europea.
Cuándo compartiremos sus datos
Nunca venderemos sus datos
.
Cuando compartamos sus datos fuera de nuestra organización, siempre haremos lo siguiente:
los compartiremos de una manera razonablemente segura;
tomaremos medidas para asegurarnos de que se gestionen de un modo compatible con nuestro compromiso con su privacidad; y
prohibiremos que otras empresas los usen con sus propios fines.
Compartimos sus datos de estas maneras limitadas:
Con Worldcoin Foundation:
Los datos, incluida su información personal, pueden compartirse con Worldcoin Foundation o una organización posterior responsable de fomentar y promover la misión del proyecto Worldcoin.
Dentro de nuestra organización:
Solo divulgaremos datos a los miembros de nuestro equipo que necesiten acceso para realizar sus tareas y funciones. Solo divulgaremos los datos necesarios para realizar tareas y funciones específicas, y disponemos de un sistema de estricto control de acceso.
Con proveedores y prestadores de servicios fuera de nuestra organización:
Solo divulgaremos datos a proveedores de servicios de confianza para tratar los datos y proporcionarle nuestros Servicios a usted. Solo divulgaremos datos a proveedores de verificación de identidad si lo exige la ley (es decir, requisitos de conocer al cliente).
Las categorías de dichos proveedores de servicios son:
Proveedores de servicios en la nube (todos los tipos de datos)
Proveedores de SaaS; utilizamos productos SaaS en las siguientes categorías:
Gestión de bases de datos e infraestructura
Seguridad de los datos
Reclutamiento
Comunicación
Encuestas
KYC/KYB, es decir, verificación de documentos oficiales
Gestión de solicitudes del interesado
Asistencia técnica
Asistencia al usuario
Expertos externos
Desarrolladores de software especializados
Especialistas legales
Asesores fiscales
Bancos
Proveedores de servicios de etiquetado (solo bajo salvaguardas especiales)
Servicios de verificación de antecedentes para solicitantes y operadores de Orb
Con las fuerzas del orden público, funcionarios u otros terceros:
podremos divulgar sus datos para cumplir con las leyes aplicables y responder a demandas legales obligatorias. Consideraremos detenidamente cada solicitud para determinar si cumple con la ley y, si corresponde, podremos impugnar las solicitudes inválidas, excesivamente amplias o ilegales. Podemos compartir datos personales con la policía y otras autoridades gubernamentales cuando creamos razonablemente que es necesario para cumplir con las leyes, reglamentaciones u otros procesos u obligaciones legales.
Podemos compartir su información personal si creemos que sus acciones son incompatibles con nuestros Términos de Usuario, si creemos que ha violado la ley o si creemos que es necesario para proteger nuestros derechos, propiedad y seguridad, a nuestros usuarios, al público u otras partes.
Podemos compartir su información personal con nuestros abogados y otros asesores profesionales cuando sea necesario para obtener asesoramiento o, de otro modo, proteger y gestionar nuestros intereses comerciales.
Podemos compartir su información personal en relación con negociaciones relacionadas con una fusión, la venta de activos de la compañía, el financiamiento o la adquisición de la totalidad o una parte de nuestro negocio por parte de otra compañía, o en el transcurso de dichas negociaciones.
Los datos, incluida su información personal, pueden compartirse entre nuestras compañías matrices, filiales y subsidiarias actuales y futuras, y con otras compañías que están bajo el control y la propiedad común.
Podemos compartir su información personal con su consentimiento o siguiendo sus instrucciones.
Cómo se registrarán sus datos en la blockchain pública
La información de las transacciones relacionadas con el uso de nuestros Servicios puede quedar registrada en una blockchain pública.
Tenga en cuenta lo siguiente:
Las blockchain son libros de transacciones públicos que se mantienen en redes descentralizadas operadas por terceros que no están bajo el control ni son operadas por Worldcoin. Debido a la naturaleza pública e inmutable de los libros de blockchain, no podemos garantizar la capacidad para modificar, borrar o controlar la divulgación de los datos que se cargan y almacenan en una blockchain.
Cómo usamos las cookies
Utilizaremos cookies para ayudar a que nuestros Servicios funcionen mejor. Además de las cookies, podremos utilizar otras tecnologías similares, como las balizas web, para rastrear a los usuarios de nuestros Servicios. Las balizas web (también denominadas “imágenes gif transparentes”), serán gráficos diminutos con un identificador único, cuya función es similar a la de las cookies. Se incorpora al presente nuestra
Política de Cookies
por su referencia.
También utilizamos Google Analytics. Podrá encontrar más información sobre cómo Google utiliza los datos cuando usted utiliza los sitios web y las aplicaciones de sus socios en
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Al utilizar los Servicios, usted acepta que acepta que almacenemos y accedamos a cookies y otros datos de su computadora o dispositivo móvil, y que se utilice Google Analytics en relación con dichas actividades. Lea la información en el enlace proporcionado para entender lo que está aceptando.
Cuánto tiempo conservaremos sus datos
Conservaremos sus datos durante el tiempo que sea razonablemente necesario para proporcionarle nuestros Servicios, cumplir con nuestros fines comerciales legítimos y con nuestras obligaciones legales y reglamentarias. Si cierra su cuenta con nosotros, eliminaremos los datos de su cuenta en el plazo de un mes; de lo contrario, eliminaremos los datos de su cuenta después de 2 años de inactividad. Si la ley lo exige, seguiremos conservando sus datos según sea necesario para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones legales y reglamentarias, lo que incluye el monitoreo, la detección y la prevención de fraudes, y las obligaciones fiscales, contables y de presentación de informes financieros.
Tenga en cuenta lo siguiente:
Las blockchain son redes descentralizadas de terceros que no controlamos ni operamos. Debido a la naturaleza pública e inmutable de la tecnología de blockchain, no podremos modificar, borrar ni controlar la divulgación de los datos que se almacenan en las blockchain
Cómo difiere este Aviso de Privacidad en el caso de niños y adolescentes
Las personas menores de 18 años no están autorizadas a utilizar los Servicios, y no recopilamos deliberadamente datos de personas menores de 18 años. Si cree que su hijo menor de 18 años ha obtenido acceso a los Servicios sin su permiso, podrá solicitar la eliminación de los datos del menor comunicándose con nosotros a través de nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
Si tomamos conocimiento de que hemos recopilado datos sobre un niño menor de 18 años, los eliminaremos lo antes posible. Hemos tomado medidas, como la implementación de un modelo de inteligencia artificial (IA) de detección automática de la edad, instrucciones a los operadores y autoconfirmaciones para restringir el uso de los Servicios para los mayores de 18 años. No comercializaremos productos ni servicios para menores de edad.
Los derechos legales en virtud del RGPD
Esta sección se aplica si el tratamiento de sus datos se encuentra dentro del alcance de aplicación del RGPD (
p. ej.
, si usted es residente del Espacio Económico Europeo). Es posible que tenga derechos adicionales en virtud del RGPD, según se indica a continuación. Para ejercer sus derechos disponibles en virtud del RGPD, comuníquese con nosotros en nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
.
Usted tiene derecho a obtener de nosotros, en cualquier momento y por pedido, información sobre los datos personales que procesamos en relación con usted dentro del alcance del Art. 15 del RGPD.
Tiene derecho a exigir que corrijamos de inmediato los datos personales sobre usted si son incorrectos.
Usted tiene derecho, de acuerdo con las condiciones descritas en el Art. 17 del RGPD, a exigir que eliminemos los datos personales sobre usted. Estos prerrequisitos establecen, en particular, un derecho de eliminación si los datos personales ya no son necesarios para los fines para los que fueron recopilados o tratados de otro modo, así como en los casos de tratamiento ilegal, la existencia de una objeción o la existencia de una obligación de eliminación en virtud del Derecho de la Unión o la ley del Estado miembro al que estamos sujetos.
Usted tiene derecho a exigir que restrinjamos el tratamiento de acuerdo con el Art. 18 del RGPD.
Usted tiene derecho a recibir de nosotros los datos personales sobre usted que nos haya proporcionado en un formato estructurado, de uso común y legible en máquina, de acuerdo con el Art. 20 del RGPD.
Usted tiene derecho a objetar en cualquier momento, por motivos relacionados con su situación particular, el tratamiento de datos personales sobre usted que se lleve a cabo, entre otros, sobre la base del Artículo 6 (1) oración 1 lit. f del RGPD, de acuerdo con el Artículo 21 del RGPD.
Usted tiene derecho a comunicarse con la autoridad supervisora competente en caso de quejas sobre el tratamiento de datos que realiza el responsable del tratamiento. La autoridad de supervisión responsable es la Oficina Estatal Bávara para la Supervisión de la Protección de Datos (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
Si el tratamiento de datos personales se basa en su consentimiento, de acuerdo con el Art. 7 del RGPD, usted tiene derecho a revocar su consentimiento para el uso de sus datos personales en cualquier momento con efecto a futuro, por lo que la revocación es tan fácil de declarar como el consentimiento propiamente dicho. Tenga en cuenta que la revocación solo entra en vigencia para el futuro. El tratamiento que tuvo lugar antes de la revocación no se ve afectado.
Cómo comunicarse con nosotros en relación con este Aviso de Privacidad
Usted puede optar por eliminar sus datos de la aplicación de Worldcoin desde el menú de Configuración. Si tiene alguna pregunta o inquietud con respecto a este Aviso de Privacidad, desea ejercer sus derechos o comunicarse con nuestro oficial responsable de la protección de los datos (Data Protection Officer, DPO), envíe su solicitud a través de nuestro
Portal de Solicitudes
o escríbanos a Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104, EE. UU. Responderemos a todas las solicitudes que recibimos de personas que desean ejercer sus derechos de protección de datos de acuerdo con la legislación de protección de datos aplicable. También podrá eliminar sus datos de la aplicación de Worldcoin.
Si tiene alguna inquietud relativa a la privacidad o al uso de datos que no hayamos resuelto de forma satisfactoria, comuníquese con el organismo regulador de la protección de datos de su jurisdicción. Si reside en la UE, puede encontrar su organismo regulador de la protección de datos
aquí
.
Usuarios con domicilio en Argentina
Si usted tiene domicilio en la República Argentina, le informamos que la AGENCIA DE ACCESO A LA INFORMACIÓN PÚBLICA, en su carácter de Órgano de Control de la Ley N° 25.326, tiene la atribución de atender las denuncias y reclamos que interpongan quienes resulten afectados en sus derechos por incumplimiento de las normas vigentes en materia de protección de datos personales.
Puede ponerse en contacto con la Agencia de la siguiente forma:
Dirección: Av. Pte. Gral. Julio A. Roca 710, piso 5 - Ciudad Autónoma de Buenos Aires
Código postal: C1067ABP
Teléfono: (54-11) 3988-3968
Correo electrónico: datospersonales@aaip.gob.ar
TFHPS20231107
Effective February 24th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Name and contact data of the data controller
Tools for Humanity Corp.
548 Market Street, PMB 49951
San Francisco, CA 94104-5401
USA
Hereinafter referred to as “us”, “we”, “company”, “TFH”
Purposes and legal grounds of data processing
This notice applies to the business owners and representatives of companies we collaborate with to mechanically and physically operate the Orbs (“Orb Operators”) and their team members (“Field Staff”, together with Orb Operators referred to as “Operating Partners”).
We process Orb Operators’ personal data to administer, fulfill and evaluate our business relationship with Orb Operators and their companies. The legal basis of this processing is performance of contract.
We process Operating Partners’ personal data to determine their compensation based on the operator rating that provides an incentive for responsible behavior as an Operating Partner. The legal basis of this processing is performance of contract.
We process personal data to determine whether we enter into a business relationship with Orb Operators and their companies. This includes a Know Your Customer (KYC) procedure to comply with anti-money-laundering and anti-terrorist-financing laws and to prevent fraud. Our legal basis for this processing is that it is necessary to comply with our legal obligations and our legitimate interest to make an informed decision about the companies and individuals we collaborate with.
We process Operating Partners’ personal data to provide the Orb App that allows Operating Partners to administer their relationship with us and operate the Orbs. The legal basis for this processing is performance of contract.
We process Operating Partners’ personal data to ensure the Orb App is functioning securely and to improve the Orb App. The legal basis for this processing is legitimate interests, namely the interest to provide a secure and well functioning Orb App.
We process Operating Partners’ personal data to ensure trust and safety and prevent fraud. The legal basis for this processing is legitimate interests, namely the interest to ensure trust and safety and to prevent fraud.
Categories of recipients
Externally we only share data under contractual safeguards and only with selected service providers that ensure the security and protection of the data:
With vendors and service providers outside of our organization:
We only disclose data to service providers whose services we rely on in order to process the data and provide our Services to you. We only disclose data with identity verification vendors if required by Law (i.e., know-your-customer requirements).
The categories of such service providers are:
Cloud service providers (all data types)
SaaS providers; we use SaaS products in the following categories:
Database and infrastructure management
Data security
Recruiting
Communication
Surveys
KYC/KYB i.e. checking official documents
Data subject request management
Technical support
User support
External experts
Specialist software developers
Legal specialists
Tax advisors
Banks
Background check services for applicants and Orb Operators
With law enforcement, officials, or other third parties:
We may disclose your data in order to comply with applicable laws and respond to mandatory legal demands. We will carefully consider each request to determine whether the request complies with the law and, where appropriate, we may challenge invalid, overbroad, or unlawful requests. We may share personal data with police and other government authorities where we reasonably believe it to be necessary to comply with law, regulation or other legal process or obligation.
We may share your personal information if we believe that your actions are inconsistent with our User Terms, if we believe that you have violated the law, or if we believe it is necessary to protect our rights, property, and safety, our users, the public, or others.
We may share your personal information with our lawyers and other professional advisors where necessary to obtain advice or otherwise protect and manage our business interests.
We may share your personal information in connection with, or during negotiations concerning, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business by another company.
Data, including your personal information, may be shared between and among our current and future parents, affiliates, and subsidiaries and other companies under common control and ownership.
We may share your personal information with your consent or at your direction.
Personal Information Collection, disclosing which personal information you collect
For the purposes of performing and administering the contractual relationship with Operating Partners we collect and process the following information
Basic contact information (such as name, postal or email address, phone number, both current and previous)
Demographic data (such as your birthday)
Contract details
Wallet addresses and bank accounts
For the purposes of our KYC procedure of Orb Operators we collect and process the following information:
Basic contact information (such as name, postal or email address, phone number, both current and previous)
Demographic data (such as your birthday)
Government document and identifiers
Audio, video and photos of you
Files you upload
Device information (such as IP address)
Third party account information
Metadata like geolocation data and timestamp
For the purpose of evaluating and monitoring Operating Partners’ performance we collect and process the following information:
Number of sign-ups
Aggregated quality evaluation of sign-ups through several signals that include user engagement and trust and safety complaints
For the purpose of providing the Orb App for Operating Partners and ensuring trust and safety, prevent fraud and improving the Orb App we collect and process the following information from Operating Partners:
“Orb App User Data” from Operating Partners:
User profile including all the data you chose to provide in this context
Phone number
E-Mail address
Name
Aggregated data of user sign-ups
Balance
Wallet address
Relation to team/Orb Operator (if applicable)
“Orb App Metadata” from Operating Partners:
Device data
IP address
Usage events
Geolocation of Orb in case of Orb activation
Survey results and optional analytics data
Retention period
We delete personal data pertaining to the contract and to the compensation related to tax purposes for 10 years and data processed as part of our KYC procedure 5 years after the termination of the business relationship. Other data from the business relationship is deleted three years after termination of the contract. In some cases, we might be required by law to retain such personal data for longer.
We retain Orb App User Data for two years
. In some cases, we might be required by law to retain such personal data for longer.
We retain Orb App Metadata for two years
. In some cases, we might be required by law to retain such personal data for longer.
Subjects’ rights
Under the applicable data protection laws you might have the following rights/ You can make use of your data subject rights by sending an e-mail to the following email address or postal address: dpo@worldcoin.org
You have the right to obtain from us at any time upon request information about the personal data we process concerning you.
You have the right to demand that we immediately correct the personal data concerning you if it is incorrect.
You have the right to demand that we delete the personal data concerning you. These prerequisites provide in particular for a right to erasure if the personal data are no longer necessary for the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed, as well as in cases of unlawful processing, the existence of an objection or the existence of an obligation to erase under Union law or the law of the Member State to which we are subject.
You have the right to demand that we restrict processing.
You have the right to receive from us the personal data concerning you that you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format.
You have the right to object at any time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of personal data concerning you which is carried out based on legitimate interests.
You have the right to contact the competent supervisory authority in the event of complaints about the data processing carried out by the controller. The responsible supervisory authority is: The Bavarian Data Protection Authority (“BayLDA”).
If the processing of personal data is based on your consent, you are entitled to revoke your consent to the use of your personal data at any time with effect for the future, whereby the revocation is just as easy to declare as the consent itself.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your data subject rights.
Whether the provision of personal data is a statutory or contractual requirement, or a requirement necessary to enter into a contract, as well as whether the data subject is obliged to provide the personal data and of the possible consequences of failure to provide such data
For Orb Operators participating in the KYC process is necessary. We are obliged to verify your identity prior to establishing a business relationship with you. To enable us to fulfill this legal obligation, you must provide us with the necessary information and documents and notify us immediately of any relevant changes that arise in the course of the business relationship. If you do not provide us the necessary information and documents, we may not enter into or continue the business relationship requested by you.
For Operating Partners participating in the Orb App is necessary in order to be able to operate the Orbs.
Automated decision-making, including profiling, and, at least in those cases, meaningful information about the logic involved, as well as the significance and the envisaged consequences of such processing for the data subject
Please note that processing of your personal data may include automated decision-making including profiling. We may apply automated decision-making including profiling for onboarding, fraud prevention and verification purposes. We may use verification services provided by an external vendor during the onboarding process, including validation of KYC documentation, and information checking in national registers. The automated decision-making is necessary for entering into a business relationship with us.
Third country transfers
We are in the USA and some of our service providers are established in the USA while others are located in the European Union.
For transferring personal data to the USA, we rely on appropriate safeguards as provided by the
Standard Contractual Clauses
adopted by the European Commission.
The country in which your data is transferred, stored, or processed may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the data. We adhere to the principles stated in the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), even when not required. For example, we only share data with data processors outside of the EEA if such a transfer is lawful and if we are confident that the data processor will protect your data as required under applicable laws and, further, in accordance with our standards.
Below is a list of possible risks that may arise if we transfer your data. Below we also summarize how we mitigate the respective risks.
While we do what we can to ensure that our subcontractors are contractually obligated to adequately protect your data, these subcontractors may not be subject to the data privacy law of your country. If the subcontractors were to illegally process your data without authorization, then it may be difficult to assert your privacy rights against that subcontractor. We mitigate this risk as we close strict data processing agreements with our subcontractors that oblige them to protect the data as required under GDPR and to fulfill data subjects’ requests.
It’s possible that the data privacy law in your country is inconsistent with the data privacy laws in the U.S. or in the E.U. We always try to adhere to the highest standard of data protection we are subject to.
It may be possible that your data will be subject to governmental access of officials and authorities. In those cases we have committed ourselves to challenge any invalid, overbroad, or unlawful governmental request to access in court. We further use advanced encryption to hinder unauthorized access.
Please note that this list contains examples, but may not include all possible risks to you.
Sharing and Selling of Personal Information
We are not selling personal data.
OPPN20250224
Effective February 6th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Tools For Humanity Operator User Terms and Conditions
Welcome to the Worldcoin community!
Worldcoin is an open-source protocol supported by a global community of developers, individuals, and other contributors. Tools for Humanity is a global software and hardware development company building the tools to bring blockchain and digital identity technologies and products to billions of people, including by contributing to the development and growth of the Worldcoin ecosystem.
These Terms between you and Tools for Humanity Corporation, a Delaware corporation (collectively with our affiliates, "TFH", “we” or “us”) govern your use of and access to our websites and applications, including World App and the Operator App (collectively, the “Apps”), and all of the associated functionality, content, and services we provide to you (collectively, the "Services") in relation to the Worldcoin protocol (“Worldcoin”).
Please read these Terms carefully before using or accessing the Services. By accessing or using any of the Services we provide, you expressly agree to be bound by these Terms and by our
Privacy Notice
, which is incorporated as a part of these Terms.
Please note these especially important parts of these Terms:
You agree to resolve any disputes between you and TFH through binding arbitration rather than in court. Please review Section 15 below for details.
Crypto products, including Digital Tokens, are largely unregulated and can be highly risky. There may be no regulatory recourse for any loss from such transactions.
Nothing in the Services constitutes an offer to sell, or the solicitation of an offer to buy, any securities or Digital Tokens. The Services do not constitute investment advice. Holding, buying, or selling any Digital Tokens (as defined in Section 2.6 below) may not be permitted where you live, and it is your responsibility to comply with all applicable law. Please consider whether buying, selling, using, or holding Digital Tokens is suitable for you in light of your financial circumstances and your understanding of Digital Tokens. The value of Digital Tokens may change quickly and may lose all of their value.
In addition, Worldcoin tokens (“WLD”) are not intended to be available for use, purchase, or access by US persons, including US citizens, residents, or persons in the United States, or companies incorporated, located, or resident in the United States, or who have a registered agent in the United States. We do not make WLD available to such US persons.
Furthermore, you agree that you will not sell, transfer or make available WLD to US persons.
Further information on risks associated with WLD can be found
here
.
Third-party services within the meaning of Section 2.5 and connections to decentralized applications within the meaning of Section 2.8, are not intended to be available to or to be accessed by users established or situated in Germany or who have their ordinary residence or registered office there. The P2P Marketplace within the meaning of Section 2.7 is not intended to be available to or to be accessed by users established or situated in the European Economic Area (EEA) or who have their ordinary residence or registered office there.
Scope of the Terms
1.1 Privacy and Your Data
. When accessing the Apps or the Services, you may provide us with categories of personal information, such as your name or telephone number. If you provide information to establish your proof of personhood and to claim your WLD tokens, then you may provide special categories of sensitive personal data, such as your biometric information. Our
Privacy Notice
describes the data we collect from you and how we use it. Please do not use the Services if you do not want us to collect or use your data in the manner described in the
Privacy Notice
.
1.2 Eligibility.
In order to use the Services, you must comply with these Terms and all applicable laws. You cannot use the Services to conduct, promote, or help others to carry out any illegal activity.
In addition, you must meet all of the following criteria:
You are 18 years of age or older; and
You are
not
located in, under the control of, a national, or resident of: Syria, the Crimea, Donetsk, Luhansk, Kherson and Zaporizhzhia regions of Ukraine, Russia, North Korea, Iran, Cuba, or any other country or region with whom the United States, the European Union, or any other country or jurisdiction has restricted the access of the Services;
You are not a “Specially Designated National” as declared by the U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”) or the sanctions lists of any other country, and your name is not on the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Denied Persons List or the banned persons lists of any other country.
If you do not meet all of these requirements, you are not allowed to access or use the Services.
In addition, if you are established or situated in Germany or have your ordinary residence or registered office there, you are not allowed to access or use third-party services within the meaning of Section 2.5, the P2P Marketplace within the meaning of Section 2.7 or decentralized applications within the meaning of Section 2.8. These features are not available for you. Regarding the P2P Marketplace within the meaning of Section 2.7, the same applies if you are established or situated elsewhere in the EEA or have your ordinary residence or registered office there.
1.3 Availability
. Webpages describing the Services are accessible worldwide, but this does not mean all Services or service features are legal or available in your country. Access to certain Services (or certain Service features) in certain countries may be blocked by us or foreign governments. Access to the Orb and our Orb Operators will not be available in Texas, Illinois, Washington, Portland, OR, and Baltimore, MD. You may not use VPN or similar tools for the purpose of circumventing any restrictions. Access to the Apps, and certain features within the Apps, may be unavailable or restricted, depending on your location.
It is your responsibility to make sure that your use of the Services is legal where you use them
. Services are not available in all languages.
1.4 Updates
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. If we do this, we will make the updated terms available on the Services. You understand and agree that your continued use of the Services after we have made any such changes constitutes your acceptance of the updated Terms. You can stop using the Services at any time if you do not agree to these Terms. Because the Services are evolving over time we may change or discontinue all or any part of the Services, at any time and without notice, at our sole discretion.
1.5 Additional Terms.
Additional terms and conditions may apply to specific applications, content, features, or portions of the Services, and all such additional terms and conditions we provide to you will form part of these Terms.
Services
2.1 Operator Agreement
We partner with local independent contractors called “Orb Operators,” who facilitate user signups and help answer questions you may have about us. These Orb Operators receive training and are knowledgeable about Worldcoin.
Upon satisfaction of certain requirements, as defined by TFH from time to time, and at its sole discretion, TFH may elect you to enter into an operator agreement, whereby, among other things, we would be entrusting you with one or more Orbs for the purpose of signing up users in your region.
2.2 Orb App
TFH, at its sole discretion, may allow you to access the Orb App that allows you to monitor certain activity and statistics relevant to you and your business as Orb Operator. We may also make certain features available to help you conduct your business as Orb Operator. Access to the Orb App, and certain features within the Orb App, may be unavailable or restricted, depending on your location. It is your responsibility to make sure that your use of the Services is legal where you use them. Services are not available in all languages.
2.3 Independent Contractors.
We do not control your performance of the Services. You and any persons who assist you, including any field staff, are independent contractors and not our employees. You are free to engage in other businesses so long as such engagement does not create a conflict of interest or impact your ability to perform under a potential operator agreement. No course of dealing between TFH and you, will be construed to create or imply an employment or agency relationship, or a partnership or joint-venturer relationship between the TFH and you or, between TFH and your employees or agents, including field staff. Neither TFH nor you has the authority to bind the other, to incur any liability, or otherwise act on behalf of the other. You acknowledge and agree that you have no authority to alter or modify this User Terms and Conditions or the Marketing Guidelines or our IP, or to make any express or implied warranties of any kind regarding the Orb, WLD, or the Worldcoin network. Each Party will be solely responsible for payment of its employees' or contractors’ (including Sub-Operators’) wages or salaries (including withholding of income taxes, social security, and any other taxes), workers' compensation, and all other employment benefits in compliance with applicable laws. You ensure compliance with the terms of the Agreement by any Sub-Operators who assist you during the Contract Period, and you will be solely liable for the actions or inactions of such Sub-Operators or any conflicts arising out of your relationship with such Sub-Operators.
2.3 Orb Operator Training
While Orb Operators receive constant and frequent training, you hereby acknowledge and accept we have no control over Orb Operator’s statements, behavior and conduct and we disclaim all liability for any consequence derived therefrom.
2.4 Payment Term
We may agree to pay your signup rewards and other payments in fiat currency or in cryptocurrencies such as WLD. We may update the payment amount and type upon notice to you. For payments in fiat currency such as Euro or US Dollars, we may require you to provide an invoice detailing the number of signups per day, dates of signup, and the amounts earned in fiat currency. Unless otherwise stated in an invoice, we will pay the undisputed amount in the invoice within 45 days from the date of receipt. We may also impose certain requirements to earn the rewards or bonuses based on your performance or user actions. We will provide the requirements on the Website. We may reasonably adjust or withhold all or a portion of payment owed to you (i) if we believe that you have attempted to defraud or abuse us or the users or (ii) in order to resolve a user complaint.
2.5 Records.
You may be required to keep complete and accurate records related to your operations under the Operator Agreement. Such records must include, at minimum, expenses incurred and amounts received related to Orb operations, the transacting parties, transaction descriptions, and the transaction dates. We may inspect your books and records in order to verify the financial situation of the Orb Operator and to ensure compliance with applicable regulatory requirements (“Audit”). You will make a reasonable effort to provide records and personnel familiar with the records to us. During such Audit, we may take extracts or make copies of your records as it deems necessary. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we may at any time require you to provide us with your latest financial statements and an overview of your financial status.
Purchases, Fees, and Taxes
3.1 Transaction Fees
. By using the Services, you agree to pay all applicable fees, including transaction fees for Digital Token swaps and transactions. We will let you know of any applicable fee before you make a transaction. If you use a third party payment service, bank fees, credit card and debit card fees charged for any Digital Token purchases may be netted out of the settled amount of your Digital Token purchases. You are also responsible for paying any additional fees charged by your financial service provider.
3.2 Network Fee
. Interactions with the blockchain also incur a network fee. The network fee is charged by and paid to the blockchain network, not to us, for facilitating any interactions.
3.3 Taxes
. It is your sole responsibility to determine whether, and to what extent, any taxes apply to any transaction via the Services, and to withhold, collect, report and remit the correct amount of tax to the appropriate tax authorities.
3.4 Updates
. All fees are displayed and current as reflected in the Services and may be updated and changed from time to time.
Risk Factors
4.1 Not Legal Tender.
Digital Tokens are not legal tender, are not backed by any government, and Digital Token accounts and value balances on the Services are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections, or similar protections found in other countries. We are not a bank and do not offer fiduciary services. Transactions made over World App are largely unregulated in many countries. We make no guarantee as to the functionality of the blockchains we support, which could, among other things, lead to delays, conflicts of interest, or operational decisions by third parties that are unfavorable to certain owners of Digital Tokens, or lead to your inability to complete a transaction using the Services. The transaction details you submit via the Services may not be completed, or may be substantially delayed on the applicable blockchain, and we take no responsibility for the failure of a transaction to be confirmed or processed as expected. There are no warranties or guarantees that a transfer initiated via the Services will successfully transfer title or right in any Digital Token. In addition, there may be risks specific to the use of certain Digital Assets, such as WLD. Further information on risks specific to WLD can be found
here
.
4.2 New Technology.
The Services are new. While this software has been extensively tested, the software used for the Services is still relatively new and could have bugs or security vulnerabilities. Further, the software is still under development and may undergo significant changes over time that may not meet users’ expectations.
4.3 Information Security Risk.
Digital Tokens and use of the Services may be subject to expropriation or theft. Hackers or other malicious groups or organizations may attempt to interfere with the Services in a variety of ways, including, but not limited to, malware attacks, denial of service attacks, consensus-based attacks, Sybil attacks, smurfing and spoofing. Furthermore, because the blockchain networks we support, such as the Ethereum protocol, rest on open source software, the software underlying the Services may contain intentional or unintentional bugs or weaknesses which may negatively affect the Services or result in the loss of user’s Digital Tokens or the loss of user’s ability to access or control her wallet via the Services. In the event of such a software bug or weakness, there may be no remedy and users are not guaranteed any remedy, refund or compensation.
4.4 Accuracy.
Although we intend to provide accurate and timely information provided through the Services (including, without limitation, the content) may not always be entirely accurate, complete or current and may also include technical inaccuracies or typographical errors. In an effort to continue to provide you with as complete and accurate information as possible, information may, to the extent permitted by applicable law, be changed or updated from time to time without notice, including without limitation information regarding our policies, products and services. Accordingly, you should verify all information before relying on it, and all decisions based on information provided through the Services are your sole responsibility and we shall have no liability for such decisions.
4.5 Availability
. Although we strive to provide you with excellent service, we do not guarantee that the Services will be available without interruption. The Services may be temporarily unavailable from time to time for maintenance or other reasons. We assume no responsibility for any error, omission, interruption, deletion, defect, delay in operation or transmission, communications line failure, theft or destruction or unauthorized access to, or alteration of, user communications. We are not responsible for any problems or technical malfunction of any telephone network or lines, computer online systems, servers or providers, computer equipment, software, failure of email or players on account of technical problems or traffic congestion on the Internet or on the Services or combination thereof, including injury or damage to users or to any other person's computer related to or resulting from participating or downloading materials in connection with the Services. We are not responsible for any loss or damage, financial damages or lost profits, loss of business, or personal injury or death, resulting from anyone's use of the Service, any Content posted on or through the Service or transmitted to users, or any interactions between users of the Services, whether online or offline.
4.6 Forks
. The software used to create WLD is open-source and free for anyone to copy and use. This means that anyone can create a modified version of WLD, otherwise known as a “Fork.” In the event of a Fork or any other disruption of a Digital Tokens network, we may not be able to support any activity related to the Fork. Transactions may not be completed, completed partially, incorrectly completed, or substantially delayed when a Fork occurs. We are not responsible for any losses you incur which are caused in whole or in part by a Fork or other network disruption.
4.7 Third Party Services.
Where available (see in particular Section 2.10), we rely upon third party service providers to provide some features and functionality within the Apps, for instance the ability to purchase Digital Assets with fiat currency, or the ability to swap one Digital Asset for another. We do not provide these services, and we are not party to any such transaction. You are solely relying upon third party providers for these services, and you must have an account with the third-party providers and agree to their terms. We are unable to assist you if you encounter problems using their service, and we are not responsible for any transactions you make using third party providers.
Intellectual Property.
5.1 Ownership
. Our software, the application, the Services, the Content, the Marks (as defined below) and the design, selection, and arrangement of the Content in the Services (the “IP”) are protected by copyright, trademark, patent, and other intellectual property rights and laws of the United States and other applicable countries. You agree to abide by all applicable intellectual property rights and laws, as well as any trademark or copyright notices or restrictions contained in the Agreement or the Services. You may not remove any copyright, trademark, or proprietary notices contained in the IP.
5.2 Trademarks.
The Tools for Humanity Corporation name, the Worldcoin name and design, the “Seven Hands” logo and all related logos, and slogans are trademarks or service marks of the Tools for Humanity Corporation or its licensors (the “Marks”). You may not copy, imitate, or use the Marks, in whole or in part, without our written permission. All other trademarks, names, or logos mentioned in connection with the Services are the property of their respective owners and you may not copy, imitate, or use them, in whole or in part, without the written permission of the applicable trademark owner. The inclusion of any marks of others in the Services does not constitute an approval, endorsement, or recommendation by us.
License and Restrictions
6.1 License
. Provided that you are eligible to use the Services and subject to your compliance with these Terms, we hereby grant you a limited license to access and use the Services.
6.2 License Restrictions
. You may not republish Content on any Internet, Intranet or Extranet site or incorporate the information in any other database or compilation, and any other use of the Content is strictly prohibited. Any use of the Services other than as specifically authorized herein, without our prior written permission, is strictly prohibited and will terminate the license granted herein. Such unauthorized use may also violate applicable laws including without limitation copyright and trademark laws and applicable communications regulations and statutes. Unless explicitly stated herein, nothing in these Terms are construed as conferring any license to intellectual property rights, whether by estoppel, implication or otherwise. This license is revocable by us at any time without notice and with or without cause.
6.3 Government
. If you are a U.S. Government end user, we are licensing the Services to you as a “Commercial Item” as that term is defined in the U.S. Code of Federal Regulations (see 48 C.F.R. § 2.101), and the rights we grant you to the Services are the same as the rights we grant to all others under these Terms.
Acceptable Use
7.1
You may use the Services only for your own personal use. We reserve the right at all times and in our sole discretion to review, cancel or suspend your access to or use of the Services. The items on the Prohibited Uses list are only examples and the list is not exhaustive; we may add or remove prohibited uses at our sole discretion.
7.2 Prohibited Uses include:
Illegal Activity:
Any activity that would violate, or assist in the violation of, any sanctions programs administered by OFAC; violate, or assist in the violation of, any laws in the countries where we conduct business; involve proceeds of any illegal activity; or publish, distribute, or disseminate any illegal material or information.
Excessive Use or Hacking:
Any activity that imposes an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure; detrimentally interferes with, intercepts, or expropriates any system, data, or information; transmits or uploads any material to the Services that contains viruses, trojan horses, worms, or any other harmful or deleterious programs; or attempts to gain unauthorized access to the computer systems or networks connected to the Services.
Abuse of Others:
Any activity that interferes with another person’s access to or use of the Services; defames, abuses, extorts, harasses, stalks, threatens, or otherwise violates or infringes upon another person’s privacy, intellectual property, or any other legal rights; incites, threatens, facilitates, promotes, or encourages hatred, racial intolerance, or violent acts against others; or harvests, scrapes, or collects another user’s data from the Services without permission.
Fraud and Other Unfair Business Practices:
Any activity that operates to defraud us, our users, or any other person; provides any false, inaccurate, or misleading information to us; promises unreasonably high rewards or sells a service without added benefit to the buyer; or furthers other predatory and deceptive practices including unlawful lotteries, raffles, bidding fee auctions, contests, sweepstakes, gambling, or any other game of chance.
Intellectual Property Infringement:
Any activity that involves the sale, distribution, or provision of access to counterfeit music, movies, software, or other licensed materials without the appropriate authorization from the rights holder; uses the IP (including the Mark) without express consent or in a manner that otherwise harms us or our brand; implies an untrue endorsement by or affiliation with us; or infringes or violates any copyright, trademark, right of publicity or privacy, or any other proprietary right under the law.
Suspension
We may suspend and restrict your access to the Services: (i) We are so required by a facially valid subpoena, court order, or binding order of a government authority; (ii) We reasonably suspect you of using the Service in connection with a Prohibited Use; (iii) Use of your using the Services is subject to any pending litigation, investigation, or government proceeding and/or we perceive a heightened risk of legal or regulatory non-compliance associated with your activity; (iv) Our service partners are unable to support your use; (v) You take any action that we deem as circumventing our controls.
Not an Offering of Securities or Commodity Interest
The content of the Services does not constitute an offer to buy or sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell investments, securities, partnership interests, commodities or any other financial instruments; the content or the Services also do not constitute, and may not be used for or in connection with, an offer or solicitation by anyone in any state or jurisdiction in which such an offer or solicitation is not authorized or permitted, or to any person to whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.
Content
10.1 Reliance on Content; Changes to the Services.
The information and material we provide to you through the Services (“Content”) are solely for general information purposes, and we do not guarantee its accuracy, usefulness, or completeness. Any reliance you place on our Content is strictly at your own risk. We have no liability or responsibility for any actions you take or do not take because of the Content, or for anyone with whom you share the Content. Other users’ statements describing their use of our Services found on the Services or anywhere else should not be viewed as our endorsement of their statements if the statements are inconsistent with these Terms or our Content. We may update the Content from time to time, but such Content may not be complete or up-to-date, and we are under no obligation to you to update the Content or any other part of the Services. We may modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, any part or all of the Content or Services without prior notice to you. We will not be liable for any modification, suspension, or discontinuance of part or all of the Content or the Services.
10.2 Third-Party Services and Content
. We may provide links to educational materials, webinars, meet-ups, and promotions on social media platforms (“Third-Party Services”) that enable sharing and collaboration among users and other third parties. If you share any personal information, pictures, opinions, content, or any other data on those services, you do so at your own risk, and your use of those services is subject to the terms of use and privacy policies of those services, and not ours. You should review the terms of services of each Third-Party Service to better understand your rights, and the manner in which those platforms use your data. We are not responsible for any loss, theft, compromise, or misuse of your data whatsoever in connection with any Third-Party Service (including negligence) except to the extent such liability cannot be limited under applicable laws. Your use of any information provided by a Third-Party Service (“Third-Party Content”) is at your own risk, and we make no promises to you that any Third-Party Content is accurate, complete, authentic, or appropriate for your personal circumstances. Third-Party Content includes information provided by other users not specifically endorsed by us.
10.3 User Content
. As a member of the Worldcoin community, you may post messages, data, software, images, videos, or other content (“User Content”) on message boards, blogs, social media accounts owned by us, as well as various other publicly available locations on the Services. These forums may be hosted by us or a Third-Party Service Provider on our behalf. You are responsible for all User Content you submit, upload, post, or store through the Services. You must provide all required and appropriate warnings, information, and disclosures regarding your User Content. We are not responsible for any User Content you submit through the Services.
10.4 User Content License
. By submitting User Content to us, you represent that you have all necessary rights to the User Content and you thereby grant us a perpetual, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free, sub-licensable, and transferable license to use, reproduce, distribute, prepare derivative works from, modify, display, and perform all or any portion of the User Content in connection with our marketing and promotions, and for any other legitimate business purpose related to the Services. We may redistribute part or all of and derivative works from your User Content in any media formats and through any media channels we choose. You also hereby grant us and other users a non-exclusive license to use, access, reproduce, distribute, modify, and display, and perform your User Content through the Services.
10.5 User Content Restrictions
. You agree not to use, nor permit any third party to use, the Services to post or transmit any User Content that: (a) is libelous or defamatory, or discloses private or personal matters concerning any person; (b) is indecent, obscene, pornographic, harassing, threatening, abusive, hateful, racially or ethnically offensive; encourages conduct that would be considered a criminal offense, give rise to civil liability, or violate any law, or is otherwise inappropriate; (c) would violate the intellectual property rights of others, including unauthorized copyrighted text, images or programs, trade secrets or other confidential proprietary information, or trademarks or service marks used in an infringing fashion; or (d) unreasonably interferes with another user’s use of the Services. You represent to us that you are posting User Content to the Services voluntarily; accordingly, posting User Content does not create an employer-employee relationship between you and us. You may not copy or use email addresses, mobile phone numbers, balances, usernames, or any other personal information about other users without their permission. Unsolicited emails, mailings, telephone calls, or other communications to other users through the Services or in any other channel are prohibited.
10.6 Complaints and DMCA Takedowns.
If you believe that your trademark or copyrighted work is being infringed by our Content or User Content on the Services or is otherwise being published in a way suggesting some endorsement of or affiliation with us, please send an email to us at legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com with the subject line “[Trademark/Copyright] Complaint,” whichever the case may be. For your complaint to be effective and in order for us to take action under the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (“DMCA”), you must follow all DMCA requirements by including the following information in your email:
Clear identification of the copyrighted work or mark claimed to be infringed, including the Copyright Registration number if the work is registered;
Identification of the work or mark that is claimed to be infringing and that you want removed;
The URL or other clear direction to enable us to locate the alleged infringing content;
Your email address, mailing address, and telephone number; and
A signed statement that you have a good faith belief that the content is infringing, that the information you are providing is correct, and that you are the owner or authorized to represent the owner of the content.
You should also be aware that under Section 512(f) of the DMCA, any person who knowingly sends meritless notices of infringement may be liable for damages, so please do not make any false claims. We may share any information or correspondence you provide us with third parties, including the person who uploaded the allegedly infringing material to the Service.
When we receive a
bona fide
infringement notice, our policy is to: (a) immediately remove or disable access to the infringing content; (b) notify the person who uploaded the infringing material that we have removed or disabled access to the material; and (c) for repeat offenders, terminate the person’s access to the Services. If we receive a counter-notice from such a person, we may send a copy of the counter-notice to you explaining that we may restore the removed material or cease disabling it in 10 business days. Unless you file an action seeking a court order against us or against the person who uploaded the content, we will restore access to the removed material in 10 to 14 business days or more after receipt of the counter-notice, at our discretion.
DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
11.1 Your use of the Services is at your own risk. The Services, WLD, the content and all other IP are provided on an “AS-IS” and “AS AVAILABLE” basis without any representation or warranty, whether express, implied, or statutory. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, we specifically disclaim any implied warranties of title, merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, or non-infringement as to the features, content, or other IP contained in the Services. Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of implied warranties, so the above exclusions may not apply to you. We do not endorse, guarantee, or assume responsibility for any advertisements, offers, or statements made by third parties, including other users concerning the Services.
11.2 We do not make any representations or warranties that (a) access to all or part of the Services will be continuous, uninterrupted, timely, secure, or error-free; (b) that the Services or content are accurate, complete, reliable, or current; (c) that the Services are free of viruses or other harmful components; or (d) that the Services or the content will meet your requirements, needs, or expectations.
11.3 Additionally, we do not make any representations or warranties with respect to the legality of the Services or WLD for any use case, or that the Services or WLD will meet any regulatory or compliance needs. You are solely responsible for determining and complying with all legal and regulatory restrictions and requirements that may govern your use of the Services or WLD. Except for the express statements set forth in these Terms, you hereby acknowledge and agree that you have not relied upon any other statement or understanding, whether written or oral, with respect to your access to and use of the Services or WLD.
11.4 We are not acting and cannot act as your advisor with respect to any financial, legal, investment, or tax matters. Any content speaks only as of the date indicated. Any projections, estimates, forecasts, targets and/or opinions expressed here are subject to risks, uncertainties, and assumptions, and so may be incorrect and may change without notice. No content should be relied upon.
Certain information here may have been obtained from third-party sources. While such sources are believed to be reliable, we have not independently verified all such information and make no representations as to its accuracy. We are not a registered broker-dealer or investment adviser. We make no representations, and specifically disclaim all warranties, express, implied, or statutory, regarding the accuracy, timeliness, or completeness of any material contained in the Services. Our content is for general information only, and you are solely responsible for determining whether or not to use the Services. You acknowledge that trading, using, and holding Digital Tokens is inherently risky. You may lose all of the funds in your wallet. You acknowledge that the Service may be subject to export restrictions and economic sanctions imposed by U.S. law.
11.5 We are not liable to you or any third party for any modification or termination of the Services, or suspension or termination of your access to the Services.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
12.1 We don’t exclude or limit our liability to you where it would be illegal to do so. In countries where the below types of exclusions aren’t allowed, we’re responsible to you only for losses and damages that are a reasonably foreseeable result of our failure to use reasonable care and skill or our breach of our contract with you. This paragraph doesn’t affect consumer rights that can’t be waived or limited by any contract or agreement.
12.2 To the extent permitted by law, you agree that under no circumstances will we or any of our officers, directors, employees, contractors, agents, affiliates, or subsidiaries (the “TFH Parties”) be liable to you for any indirect, punitive, incidental, special, consequential, or exemplary damages, including damages for loss of profits, goodwill, use, data, or other intangible property, whether such liability is asserted on the basis of tort or otherwise, and whether or not the TFH Parties have been advised of the possibility of such damages arising out of or in connection with: (a) your use or inability to use the Services, your Digital Tokens, or the Worldcoin network; (b) inaccessibility or termination of the Services; (c) any hacking, tampering, unauthorized access to or alteration of any transaction or your Data; (d) any transaction or agreement entered into by you with any third party through the Services; (e) any activities or communications of third parties; (f) the actions of Orb Operators’ field staff, (g) any loss of the value of any Digital Tokens; (h) any Third-Party Content accessed on or through the Services; (i) errors, mistakes, or inaccuracies in our Content; (j) personal injury or property damage of any nature whatsoever resulting from any access to or use of the Services; (k) viruses, trojan horses, or the like that may be transmitted to or through the Services; or (l) the defamatory, offensive, or illegal conduct of any third party. This limitation of liability will apply whether the damages arise from use or misuse of, or reliance on TFH or the Services, notwithstanding any failure of essential purpose of any limited remedy and to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
12.3 Under no circumstances will the TFH Parties be liable to you for any direct claims, proceedings, liabilities, obligations, damages, losses, or costs in an amount exceeding $100.00. If you are dissatisfied with the Services, you agree that your sole and exclusive remedy will be for you to discontinue your use of the Services. This limitation of liability will apply to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
12.4 Release and Indemnification.
You agree to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the TFH Parties from and against any claims, damages, costs, liabilities, reasonable attorneys’ fees, and expenses brought against a TFH Party by any third party arising out of or related to: (a) your use of the Services; (b) your violation of these Terms; (c) your violation of any rights of another person; (d) your conduct in connection with the Services; or (e) your use of WLD, any Digital Tokens, or the Worldcoin network. Some jurisdictions limit consumer indemnities, so some or all of the indemnity provisions in this paragraph may not apply to you. If you are obligated to indemnify any of the TFH Parties, we reserve the right, in our sole discretion, to control any action or proceeding and to determine whether to settle and on what terms.
IF YOU ARE A CALIFORNIA RESIDENT, you waive the benefits and protections of
California Civil Code § 1542
, which provides: “[a] general release does not extend to claims that the creditor or releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release and that, if known by him or her, would have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor or released party.”
Governing Law
If you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA)
, then the law of the Federal Republic of Germany will apply to this Agreement and any disputes arising out of or related to this Agreement.
If you reside outside of the EEA
, then the laws of the State of California will apply to this Agreement and any disputes arising out of or related to this Agreement. The governing law stated in this section will apply without regard to principles of conflict of laws. You further agree that the Service will be deemed to be based solely in the State of California, and that although the Services may be available in other jurisdictions, its availability does not give rise to general or specific personal jurisdiction in any forum outside the State of California.
DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ARBITRATION AND WAIVER OF CLASS ACTION
14.1
PLEASE READ THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPHS CAREFULLY. THEY REQUIRE YOU TO SETTLE DISPUTES WITH US THROUGH INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION BEFORE A SOLE ARBITRATOR, AND NOT AS A MEMBER OF A CLASS ACTION. ARBITRATION PREVENTS YOU FROM SUING US IN COURT OR FROM HAVING A JURY TRIAL, THOUGH YOU MAY BRING A DISPUTE AGAINST US IN SMALL CLAIMS COURT IF YOU QUALIFY.
14.2
We will use our best efforts to resolve any potential disputes through informal, good faith negotiations. If a potential dispute arises, you must contact us by sending an email to legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com so that we can attempt to resolve it without resorting to formal dispute resolution. If we aren’t able to reach an informal resolution within 60 days of your email, and you elect to bring a federal or state statutory claim, common law claim, claim based in contract, tort, fraud, misrepresentation or any other legal theory, or any other formal proceeding arising out of or relating to these Terms, the Content, or the Services (each, a “Dispute”), then you agree to resolve the Dispute through binding arbitration, on an individual basis according to the following terms (collectively, the “Arbitration Agreement”):
Arbitration will be conducted confidentially by a single arbitrator. The arbitrator will apply applicable statutes of limitation and all applicable law and will honor claims of privilege recognized by applicable law.
If you reside in the EEA
, then the Dispute will be solely and finally settled by arbitration administered by the German Arbitration Institute (DIS) in accordance with DIS Rules of Arbitration. Arbitration will occur in Berlin, Germany, unless you and we both agree to conduct it elsewhere. You agree that the courts in Berlin, Germany are the proper forum for any appeals of an arbitration award or for court proceedings in the event that this Agreement’s binding arbitration clause is found to be unenforceable.
If you reside outside the EEA
, then the Dispute will be solely and finally settled by arbitration administered by JAMS in accordance with the JAMS Streamlined Arbitration Rules, unless the aggregated amount of the Dispute is $250,000 or more, in which case the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules will apply. Arbitration will occur in San Francisco, California, unless you and we both agree to conduct it elsewhere. You agree that the federal and state courts in San Francisco, California are the proper forum for any appeals of an arbitration award or for court proceedings in the event that this Agreement’s binding arbitration clause is found to be unenforceable.
In any arbitration, regardless of its location, the parties will not seek discovery from each other, and the arbitrator will not allow parties to engage in discovery; rather, each party will disclose the evidence supporting their positions at a mutually agreeable time and date prior to the final arbitration hearing.
This Arbitration Agreement covers the enforceability, revocability, scope, and validity of the Arbitration Agreement or any portion of the Arbitration Agreement, and all other Disputes arising out of or related to the interpretation or applicability of the Arbitration Agreement; and all such matters will be decided by the arbitrator and not by a court or judge.
If the arbitrator or arbitration administrator imposes filing fees or other administrative costs on you, we will reimburse you, upon request, to the extent such fees or costs would exceed those that you would otherwise have to pay if you were proceeding instead in a court. We will also pay additional fees or costs if required to do so by the arbitration administrator's rules or applicable law.
At the request of either party, all arbitration proceedings will be conducted in utmost secrecy and, in such case, all documents, testimony, and records will be received, heard, and maintained by the arbitrator in secrecy under seal, available for inspection only by the parties, their respective attorneys, and their respective experts, consultants, or witnesses who have agreed, in advance and in writing, to receive all such information as confidential to be used solely for purposes of the arbitration.
Other than class procedures and remedies discussed in this Arbitration Agreement, the arbitrator has the authority to grant any remedy that would otherwise be available in court.
Any judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction.
If the requirement to arbitrate or the prohibition against class actions and other Disputes brought on behalf of third parties contained in this Arbitration Agreement is found to be unenforceable, then only the unenforceable provisions will be deemed to have been removed from these Terms and all remaining obligations in these Terms shall continue in full force and effect.
14.3 30-Day Right to Opt Out
. You have the right to opt out and not be bound by this Arbitration Agreement by sending an email from the address you used to set up your application to legalnotice@toolsforhumanity.com with the Subject Line: “ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER OPT-OUT. You must send your email within 30 days of agreeing to these Terms, otherwise you will be bound to arbitrate Disputes in accordance with the terms of this Arbitration Agreement. If you opt out of this Arbitration Agreement, we will also not be bound by the Arbitration Agreement.
14.4 Changes to this Arbitration Agreement.
We will provide you 30 days’ notice of any changes to the section of these Terms titled “
Dispute Resolution, Arbitration and Waiver of Class Action”
by notice to you, and the changes will become effective 30 days after you receive notice from us. Changes to the
Dispute Resolution, Arbitration and Waiver of Class Action
section will otherwise apply prospectively only to Disputes that arise after the 30th day. If a court or arbitrator decides that the changes to this sectionare not enforceable or valid, then the changes will be severed from these Terms and the court or arbitrator will apply the terms of the first Arbitration Agreement in effect after you began using the Services. You may exercise your right to opt out of the new Arbitration Agreement terms by following the procedures set forth in the section above titled “30-Day Right to Opt Out.”
This Arbitration Agreement will survive the termination of these Terms, and your use of the Services.
Notwithstanding anything in this Arbitration Agreement to the contrary, either party may bring a lawsuit solely for injunctive relief to stop unauthorized use or abuse of the Services, or infringement of intellectual property rights (for example, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or patent rights) without first engaging in arbitration or the informal dispute resolution process described above.
General Provisions
15.1 No Waiver; Severability; Non-Assignability
. Our failure to enforce a provision is not a waiver of our right to do so later. If a provision is found unenforceable, the remaining provisions of these Terms will remain in full effect and an enforceable term will be substituted reflecting our intent as closely as possible. You may not assign any of your rights under these Terms, and any such attempt will be void. We may assign our rights to any of its affiliates or subsidiaries, or to any successor in interest of any business associated with the Services.
15.2 Entire Agreement
. These Terms constitute the complete and exclusive statement of the agreement between you and us with respect to the Services and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous understandings, agreements, representations, and warranties, both written and oral, concerning the Services. Section headings in these Terms are for convenience only and will not govern the meaning or interpretation of any provision.
15.3 Survival.
All provisions of these Terms pertaining to suspension or termination, debts owed to TFH, general use of the Services, Disputes with TFH, as well as provisions which by their nature extend beyond the expiration or termination of these Terms, will survive the termination or expiration of these Terms.
15.4 Relationship of the Parties.
Nothing in these Terms will be deemed or is intended to be deemed, nor will it cause you and TFH to be treated as partners, joint-venturers, or otherwise as joint associates for profit, and neither you nor TFH will be treated as the agent of the other. This includes the fact that nothing in these Terms establishes or is intended to establish any employment relationship between you and TFH.
15.5 No Professional Advice or Fiduciary Duties.
All Content provided by us is for informational purposes only and should not be construed as professional advice. You should not take, or refrain from taking, any action based on any information contained in the Services. Before you make any financial, legal, or other decisions involving the Services or any Digital Tokens, you should seek independent professional advice from an individual who is licensed and qualified in the area for which such advice would be appropriate. These Terms are not intended to, and do not, create or impose any fiduciary duties on us. To the fullest extent permitted by Law, you acknowledge and agree that we owe no fiduciary duties or liabilities to you or any other party, and that to the extent any such duties or liabilities may exist at law or in equity, those duties and liabilities are hereby irrevocably disclaimed, waived, and eliminated. You further agree that the only duties and obligations that we owe you are those set out expressly in these Terms.
15.6 Change of Control.
In the event that we are acquired by or merged with a third-party entity, or otherwise assigns certain functions to an affiliated or successor entity or other entity that we determine is in the best interest of Users, then we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign the Data we have collected from you as part of such merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control.
15.7 Force Majeure.
We will not be liable for delays, failure in performance, or interruption of service that result directly or indirectly from significant market volatility in Digital Tokens, any act of God, acts of civil or military authorities, acts of terrorists, civil disturbances, war, strike, health emergency, labor dispute, fire, interruption in telecommunications or Internet services or network provider services, failure of equipment or software, or any cause or condition beyond our reasonable control (each, a “Force Majeure Event”). The occurrence of a Force Majeure Event will not affect the validity and enforceability of any of the remaining provisions of these Terms.
15.8 App Stores.
Where you download our Apps from any app store or distribution platform other than the Apple App Store, including the Google Play Store (the "Distribution Platform") you agree that:
the Terms are between you and us, and not with the provider of the Distribution Platform ("Store Provider");
your use of the Apps must comply with the Store Provider's then-current Distribution Platform Terms of Service;
the Store Provider is only a provider of the Distribution Platform where you obtained the Apps;
We, and not the Store Provider, are solely responsible for the Apps;
the Store Provider has no obligation or liability to you with respect to the Apps or the Terms; and
you acknowledge and agree that the Store Provider is a third-party beneficiary to the Terms as it relates to the Apps.
15.9 Apple App Store
. This section applies where the Apps have been acquired from the Apple App Store. You acknowledge and agree that the Terms are solely between you and us, not Apple, Inc. ("Apple") and that Apple has no responsibility for the Apps or content thereof. Your use of the Apps must comply with the App Store Terms of Service.
You acknowledge that Apple has no obligation whatsoever to furnish any maintenance and support services with respect to the Apps. In the event of any failure of the Apps to conform to any applicable warranty, you may notify Apple, and (where applicable) Apple will refund the purchase price for the Apps to you; to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Apple will have no other warranty obligation whatsoever with respect to the Apps, and any other claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs or expenses attributable to any failure to conform to any warranty will be solely governed by the Terms and any law applicable to us as provider of the Apps.
You acknowledge that Apple is not responsible for addressing any claims of you or any third party relating to the Apps or your possession and/or use of the Apps, including, but not limited to: (i) product liability claims; (ii) any claim that the Apps fail to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory requirement; and (iii) claims arising under consumer protection or similar legislation; and all such claims are governed solely by the Terms and any law applicable to us as provider of the software.
You acknowledge that, in the event of any third-party claim that the Apps or your possession and use of that Apps infringe that third party's intellectual property rights, TFH, not Apple, will be solely responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement and discharge of any such intellectual property infringement claim to the extent required by the Terms.
You represent and warrant that (i) you are not located in a country that is subject to U.S. Government embargo, or that has been designated by the U.S. Government as a "terrorist supporting" country; and (ii) you are not listed on any U.S. Government list of prohibited or restricted parties.
You and TFH acknowledge and agree that Apple, and Apple's subsidiaries, are third-party beneficiaries of the Terms of Service as relates to your license of the Apps, and that, upon your acceptance of the terms and conditions of the Terms of Service, Apple will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to enforce the Terms of Service as relates to your license of the Apps against you as a third-party beneficiary thereof.
15.10 Grievance Redressal
. We have appointed a Grievance Officer for India as detailed below. Please note that the Grievance Officer contact should only be contacted by users in India as per India’s Information Technology (Intermediary Guidelines and Digital Media Ethics Code) Rules, 2021. Additional user verification may be requested.
Grievance Officer: Jannick Preiwisch
EMAIL ID:
grievanceofficer@toolsforhumanity.com
OPTOC 20240206
Effective November 8th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
LAW ENFORCEMENT REQUESTS
Tools for Humanity (TFH) is a US company based in San Francisco, California.  As a US company, TFH responds to all properly served law enforcement process from US-based law enforcement agencies.  Such agents should submit requests via our law enforcement portal, which is available at
https://app.kodexglobal.com/tools-for-humanity/signin
.
Law enforcement authorities outside of the United States should follow the applicable process for obtaining user data from U.S. companies, such as that specified in the relevant mutual legal assistance treaty (MLAT).
TFH also accepts law enforcement process from Germany, Singapore, and Kenya, as it has entities in each of these locations.  The entities in these countries have no user data.
Please note that the World Foundation is a separate entity from TFH. Tools for Humanity and TFH understands that the World Foundation does not have access to any user data.  You can find more information about the World Foundation
here
.
PRIVACY COMMITMENT
TFH is committed to maintaining the privacy of our users.  Accordingly, each request will be reviewed for legality and we reserve the right to object to any data request made unlawfully.
EMERGENCY REQUESTS
If you are a law enforcement agent requesting information from TFH that is likely to prevent imminent death or serious bodily harm, please indicate this in your request using the Kodex
portal
.
F.A.Q.
Can TFH freeze or deliver virtual currency from an identified wallet?
No. TFH cannot access users' wallets.
Where can I find blockchain activity information for a specific wallet?
Currently, TFH World App Wallet users transact on the Optimism blockchain network and all transactions are publicly available here:
https://optimistic.etherscan.io/
and
worldscan.org
.
Effective November 8th 2024
Download
SOLICITAÇÕES DE APLICAÇÃO DA LEI
A Tools for Humanity (TFH) é uma empresa norte-americana sediada em São Francisco, Califórnia. Como uma empresa norte-americana, a TFH responde a todos os
processos de aplicação da lei de agências de aplicação da lei sediadas nos EUA. Esses agentes devem enviar solicitações por meio de nosso portal de aplicação da lei
que está disponível em
https://app.kodexglobal.com/tools-for-humanity/signin
.
As autoridades policiais fora dos Estados Unidos devem seguir o processo aplicável para obter dados de usuários de empresas dos EUA, como o especificado no tratado de assistência jurídica mútua (MLAT) relevante.
A TFH também aceita processos de aplicação da lei da Alemanha, Cingapura e Quênia, pois possui entidades em cada um desses locais. As entidades nesses países não possuem dados de usuários.
Observe que a World Foundation é uma entidade separada da TFH. A Tools for Humanity e a TFH entendem que a World Foundation não tem acesso a nenhum dado de usuário. Você pode encontrar mais informações sobre a World Foundation aqui.
COMPROMISSO COM A PRIVACIDADE
A TFH tem o compromisso de manter a privacidade de nossos usuários. Dessa forma, cada solicitação será analisada quanto à legalidade e nos reservamos o direito de contestar qualquer solicitação de dados feita de forma ilegal.
SOLICITAÇÕES DE EMERGÊNCIA
Se você for um agente da lei solicitando informações da TFH que provavelmente evitarão morte iminente ou danos físicos graves, indique isso em sua solicitação usando o portal Kodex.
PERGUNTAS FREQUENTES
A TFH pode congelar ou entregar moeda virtual de uma carteira identificada?
Não. A TFH não pode acessar as carteiras dos usuários.
Onde posso encontrar informações sobre a atividade de blockchain de uma carteira específica?
Atualmente, os usuários da TFH World App Wallet fazem transações na rede de blockchain Optimism e todas as transações estão disponíveis publicamente
aqui:
https://optimistic.etherscan.io/
e
worldscan.org
.
20241106 LAWENF - MT
Effective December 18th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Test Data Collection Consent Form
THIS ONLY PERTAINS TO TESTING AND TRAINING WHICH IS DECOUPLED FROM REGULAR (ORB) OPERATIONS.
I agree to the following data collection:
Tools for Humanity Corp and Tools for Humanity GmbH
will collect my
biometrically usable face and iris images plus machine readable derivatives of these images
for the
purpose of training machine learning models
with that data. You can freely revoke your consent at any time (e.g. by clicking a button in the app).
The details of the data collection will be explained in great detail below.
1. Background.
1.1  The Purpose.
We develop new technologies in the context of Proof of Personhood (the proof that someone is a unique human being without disclosing which one) and decentralized digital identity (I can prove who I am i.e. by name). For this context we ask you for your data to test our products and to train our neural networks. We call this Test Data Collection.
For this purpose we have developed a web application for computers and phones alike that allows you to manage your data (Data Management App). Our Data Management App implements state-of-the-art encryption techniques and follows strict privacy protocols to safeguard your personal information. Your data will be stored in a secure server environment with restricted access, ensuring that only authorized personnel can handle it.
1.2. The Controllers
The joint data controllers are:
Tools for Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA, and
Tools for Humanity GmbH, Allee am Röthelheimpark 41, 91052 Erlangen, Germany
The details of the joint controllership arrangement are as follows: Tools for Humanity Corporation is primarily responsible for developing, operating, and supporting the Services, including responding to data subject requests and complying with any statutory obligations. Tools for Humanity Corporation maintains the contracts the most service providers, particularly in the context of cloud hosting services i.e. Tools for Humanity Corporation is responsible for the storage and security of the data in the context of this test data collection.
Tools for Humanity GmbH is primarily responsible for developing and training the algorithms, building and managing the data flows from the Orb to our servers. This test data collection is operationally overseen by Tools for Humanity GmbH.
To you, as the test user, both entities act as a single entity. Users can contact either entity for any processing activity. In the relation to the user both entities declare themselves equally responsible for any activity.
2. Data Processing.
2.1   Data We Collect
With your consent, we collect the following biometric and personal data using the Orb and/or your phone:
Images of your irises and your eyes.
These images are collected in the visible and near-infrared spectrum.
Images of your face.
These images are also collected in the visible, near-infrared, and far-infrared spectrum. They can also be combined to greate a video. We also collect (3D) depth images. Together these facial images and the iris images are referred to as “
Image Data
”.
Derivatives of the above data.
We use complex state of the art algorithms and our own neural networks to create numerical representations (“
Derivatives”
) of the above images to enable machine comparisons and interactions between them. These derivatives are strings of numbers (
e.g.
, “10111011100…”) that entail the most important features of the images. It is not possible to fully reverse the Derivatives to the original image. Most importantly, we use our custom version of the Daugman Algorithm to calculate such a string of numbers from the iris image (“
Iris Code”
).
Data from the Data Management App:
Administrative information.
To contact you about the project and to log in to our Data Management App we are collecting the following information: email, First name, Last name, First letter of first name of both parents (to add randomness), year  and month of birth, which ethnicity and gender you identify with (optional) to help optimize algorithmic fairness and to which version of the consent form you have consented to at which time (timestamp).
App metadata.
In order to provide our Data Management App where you can administer and delete your data we are collecting Metadata from you that include your screen resolution, operating system, device used, hashed IP address, timestamp.
Important!
We are collecting Image Data to train our Algorithm.
We do not use the data to know
who
you are (identification).
The data we collect (described above) may or may not be considered biometric data depending on the applicable laws where you live. However, we treat them as biometric data and handle them with extra security and care. The legal basis to collect the Image Data is your explicit consent. The legal basis to calculate derivatives of the Image Data (like the Iris Code) and actively compare it against our database is your explicit consent.
2.2 What We Do with This Data.
We use Data from the Data Management App only for the purpose of providing the Data Management App and to administer our data collection e.g. by contacting you if you have questions about the project, to explain to you what we are doing with your data or to contact you in connection with our project. The legal basis for this is legitimate interest. The legitimate interest pursued is providing an infrastructure for data donations and data collection where users can easily administer their data and withdraw their consent.
With your consent, we use the above data for the following purposes:
Store the Image Data;
Send the Image Data to our team in the European Union;
Use the Image Data to continue developing and improving the software. In detail this means:
Optimizing and improving the IrisCode and Derivatives calculation;
Labeling the collected data;
Developing and training algorithms to recognize, segment and differentiate among images of human irises and faces;
Test the algorithms against the human labeled results;
Developing, training, and testing a system to detect whether a user is a human presenting a real human eye and whether a signup is valid
Developing, training, and testing models that use artificial iris images for further training of algorithms;
Developing, training, and testing models that improve the Orb performance and user experience;
Developing training, and testing models that are able to differentiate between adults and minors to prevent underage users; and
Training and evaluating personnel who work on these systems.
Label your Image Data with the perceived and approximated gender, age range, and skin color to train on algorithmic fairness in light of the diversity in the world. In detail this means:
Detecting and removing bias from our algorithms; and
Training on algorithmic fairness by labeling the approximated gender, age range, and skin color.
Perform a test sign-up with the data. In detail this means:
Calculating Iris Codes;
Comparing your Iris Code against other Iris Codes; and
Security and fraud prevention. This includes:
Detecting whether a user is a living human being which includes checking whether the detected faces temperature matches the range of normal human body temperatures;
Detecting whether a signup shows an unaltered, unobstructed, natural human iris which includes checking whether the face changes during the sign-up; and
Detecting whether the person has already appeared in front of the Orb which includes processing locally stored Derivatives of face images.
We will never sell your data
. We will also not use any data listed in this form to track you or to advertise third parties’ products to you.
2.3 Whom We Share the Data With
When we share your data outside of TFH, we will always:
Share it in a secure way;
Take steps to ensure that it is handled in a manner that is consistent with our commitment to your privacy; and
Prohibit other companies from using it for their own purposes.
If you enable data custody we do share your data in these limited ways:
With Worldcoin
: We may disclose data with the Worldcoin Foundation or a subsequent non-profit organization responsible for promoting and furthering the mission of the Worldcoin project.
Within TFH:
We only disclose data to our team members who require access in order to perform their tasks and duties. We only disclose as much data as is needed to perform specific tasks and duties and have a system of strict access control.
With vendors and service providers outside of TFH:
We only disclose data to service providers whose services we rely on in order to process the data and provide our Services to you.  We only disclose data with identity verification vendors if required by Law (i.e., know-your-customer requirements).
The categories of such service providers are:
Cloud service providers (all data types)
SaaS providers; we use SaaS products in the following categories:
Database and infrastructure management
Data security
Data subject request management
Technical support
External experts
Specialist software developers
Legal specialists
Labeling service providers
We do not share the images or derivatives of the images with anyone not working on the Worldcoin project.
2.4   Retention of Data
.
We will retain the Image Data until the development and improvement of the algorithm has concluded or as required by law or regulation. In any case, we will delete the Image Data upon your request. Additionally, we commit ourselves to delete all Image Data after a maximum of ten years after collection albeit the development of the algorithm and the concomitant deletion of all Image Data will very likely be concluded earlier.
2.5 International Data Transfer
We will transfer your data to the European Union. Our legal basis for this are existing mutual adequacy decisions finding the level of data protection in the EU to be equal to the level in the UK.
2.6 Withdrawing your Consent
You can withdraw your consent at any time by contacting us at:
dpo@toolsforhumanity.com
or by a letter addressed to one of our physical addresses with the subject “DPO request”.
You can also delete your data from within the App under the Settings menu. If you withdraw your consent, then we will no longer use your data for the purposes stated above.
3. Statutory rights
To exercise your rights please contact us at
worldcoin.org/requestportal
. Apart from exceptional cases, we will resolve your request within the statutory deadline of one month. The following list explains the most important statutory rights you have regarding your personal data.
You have the right to obtain from us at any time upon request information about the personal data we process concerning you within the scope of Art. 15 GDPR.
You have the right to demand that we immediately correct the personal data concerning you if it is incorrect.
You have the right, under the conditions described in Art. 17 GDPR, to demand that we delete the personal data concerning you. These prerequisites provide in particular for a right to erasure if the personal data are no longer necessary for the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed, as well as in cases of unlawful processing, the existence of an objection or the existence of an obligation to erase under Union law or the law of the Member State to which we are subject.
You have the right to demand that we restrict processing in accordance with Art. 18 GDPR.
You have the right to receive from us the personal data concerning you that you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format in accordance with Art. 20 GDPR.
You have the right to object at any time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of personal data concerning you which is carried out, inter alia, on the basis of Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, in accordance with Article 21 GDPR.
You have the right to contact the competent supervisory authority in the event of complaints about the data processing carried out by the controller. The responsible supervisory authority is: the Bavarian State Office for Data Protection Supervision (Bayerisches Landesamt für Datenschutz).
If the processing of personal data is based on your consent, you are entitled under Art. 7 GDPR to revoke your consent to the use of your personal data at any time with effect for the future, whereby the revocation is just as easy to declare as the consent itself. Please note that the revocation only takes effect for the future. Processing that took place before the revocation is not affected.
DCCF20240923
Effective March 7th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
DISCLAIMER
This Privacy Notice is for Research and Development purposes only, it is not applicable to World App users and does not reflect data processing in the context of verifying your World ID with an Orb.
To ensure that World ID is as reliable and inclusive as possible, the neural networks powering it require to be trained with data from a diverse population. To collect that training data the World contributor Tools for Humanity collects this data transparently in dedicated data collection campaigns for which the following privacy notice applies.
Name and contact data of the data controller
Tools for Humanity Corp.  (“TFH”, “us”, “we”)
548 Market Street, PMB 49951,
San Francisco, CA 94104, USA
Categories of Data Collected
Depending on the data collection campaign we may collect the following categories data with  your consent:
If you take part in Orb testing or data collection we collect the following information
Image Data: Images of your irises and eyes captured in visible and near-infrared spectrum, as well as images of your face, including 3D depth images.
Derivatives: We create abstractions of the Image Data using advanced algorithms and neural networks to enable machine comparisons and interactions.
If you take part in credentials (“NFC ID”) testing or data collection we collect the following information:
We collect data from the NFC chip of your passport, including your full name, date and place of birth, passport number, issuance and expiry dates, passport picture, and any other relevant data.
We also collect the selfie (i.e. the photo you took of your face) to match the passport photo, your gender and ethnicity.
Video recordings: depending on the research or testing initiative, we might collect, store and analyze a video of your Orb verification if we asked you and you explicitly agreed to it.
If the testing is conducted with your data collection app the following data may have been collected if you actively entered it in the app:
Administrative Information via our Data Management App: email address, first name, last name, the first letter of both parents' first names (for randomness), date of birth, and timestamps related to your consent and feedback you provide to us.
App Metadata: screen resolution, operating system, device used, hashed IP address, and timestamps.
Purposes and legal grounds of data processing
In the context of this processing we collect the personal information described above  for the following purposes:
To perform product testing, to enhance user experience, ensure product usability, and maintain product security.
To develop and improve our (Data Management App) products.
To train neural networks and AI models which includes to label data to promote algorithmic fairness by considering perceived gender, age range, and skin color.
The legal basis for processing your data is your explicit consent, which allows us to utilize this information responsibly and ethically in our research and development initiatives.
Data Security
Access control: Your data is stored in a secure server environment with limited access, meaning that only authorized personnel can view or handle it.
Encryption: Your data is encrypted at rest and in transit.
Data Management: You can easily manage your personal data through our web based Data Management Application (‘Data Management App’).
Categories of recipients
We do not share the images or derivatives of the images with anyone not working on the World Project. Only the following categories of recipients may receive your data to enable the above listed purpose of processing.
Subsidiaries
Internal teams
We only share your data with team members who need to have access to the data to perform their tasks (access on a need to know basis)
Third party service providers. In this context we use the following categories of processors to enable the data processing:
Cloud service providers
Communication tools
IT service provider to provide the interface for testing and data collection
Retention period
We retain the NFC Data for a maximum of one year.
We retain video recordings  for a maximum of 2 years.
We commit to delete all Image Data and Derivatives collected for our data collection efforts after a maximum of ten (10) years after collection.
We store your Administrative Information for as long as we store the corresponding data.
In any case, we will delete the NFC Data, Image Data or any other type of data collected for the purpose of this Notice upon your request.
Subjects’ rights
Under the applicable data protection laws you have the following rights:
to information about the personal data we process
to access to and a copy of the personal data
to correction of personal data
to deletion of personal data
to demand that we restrict processing
to object to personal data processing based on legitimate interests
to contact the competent supervisory authority
The responsible supervisory authority under the  EU’s General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) is: The Bavarian Data Protection Authority (“BayLDA”).
Right to revoke your consent to the use of your personal data
You can exercise these rights by contacting:
contribute@toolsforhumanity.com
or sending a letter addressed to “DPO”, Tools For Humanity Corporation, 548 Market Street, PMB 49951, San Francisco, CA 94104 USA. If you withdraw your consent, then we will no longer use your data for the purposes stated above.
Necessity
You do not need to provide your personal data or agree to video recording in order to participate in product tests. You can also share your feedback directly with us.
Third country transfers (GDPR), under the CCPA already who you share the personal data with
Data is stored and processed in the USA and EU.
TFH complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Further information can be found in TFH’s general privacy notice available under
www.toolsforhumanity.com
Sharing and Selling of Personal Information
We are not selling personal data.
PRANDD20250306
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;